Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2023 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 456.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section and section 3 of this 2023 Act:
(a) “Individual taxpayer identification  number mortgage loan” means a mortgage loan
that a lending institution makes to  an individual using an individual taxpayer identification
number from the Internal  Revenue Service in lieu of requiring the individual to have or use
a Social Security number in any mortgage loan application or mortgage loan documents.
(b) “Lending institution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 456.548.
(c) “Participant” means a person to whom a  lending institution extends credit under a
special purpose credit program.
(d) “Qualified  lending institution” means a lending institution that qualifies in the man-
ner described in subsection (4) of this section to take part in  the pilot program described in
subsection (2) of this section.
(e) “Residential property” means  real property upon which is situated four or fewer
dwelling units designed for residential use.
(f) “Special purpose credit program” means a lending  institution program that grants
credit for the purposes, and in accordance with the requirements, set forth in 12 C.F.R.
1002.8, as in effect on the effective date of this 2023 Act.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department by rule shall  establish and imple-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3870
HB 3492
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment a pilot program through  which the department cooperates with qualified lending insti-
tutions to provide 100 percent  financing for residential property purchases to persons who
qualify for special purpose credit programs. The department shall integrate the pilot program
with existing lending programs the department operates under ORS 456.561 and, to the extent
practicable, shall use existing  departmental resources, personnel, contractors and agree-
ments to originate, negotiate, disburse funds for,  receive and process repayments of, service
and administer mortgage loans the department makes in connection with the pilot  program.
(3)(a) To implement  the pilot program described in subsection (2) of this section, the de-
partment shall enter into agreements with qualified lending institutions, the terms and con-
ditions of which must provide that each qualified lending institution shall:
(A) Develop and implement  a special purpose credit program that extends credit to par-
ticipants on the basis of common characteristics of race, sex  or national origin that the
participants share;
(B) Provide up to 90 percent of the financing, less the amount  of any down payment the
participant makes, and pay all required private mortgage insurance necessary  for partic-
ipants to purchase residential property;
(C) Sell mortgage loans that the lending  institution originates, other than individual
taxpayer identification number mortgage loans, to the department;
(D) Retain all first mortgage loans that are individual taxpayer  identification number
mortgage loans that the qualified lending institution makes in connection with the pilot
program and provide in loan documents for retained mortgage  loans that the participant
shall make repayments  of principal and interest on the first mortgage loan to the lending
institution’s servicer and any payments on any second mortgage loan to a servicer  the de-
partment designates;
(E) Specify in all  mortgage loan agreements the qualified lending institution executes
with participants and sells to  the department that participants shall make all repayments
of principal and interest on the mortgage  loan to a mortgage loan servicer the department
designates; and
(F) Permit the department to offer to the participant a  second mortgage loan for the
purchase of residential property in any amount that the  qualified lending institution does not
finance with the qualified lending institution’s  first mortgage loan and with a lien that is
junior to the qualified lending institution’s first mortgage loan.
(b) In combination with  each first mortgage loan that a qualified lending institution
makes in connection with the department’s pilot program, the department shall  offer each
participant a second mortgage loan with the same repayment term as the first mortgage loan
and at an interest rate that does not exceed one percentage point more than the  interest
rate for the first mortgage loan. The department shall specify  in any loan documents the
department executes with  a participant that the participant shall direct all repayments of
the loan principal and interest to a servicer the department designates.
(c) The department shall service  each loan the department makes under paragraph (b)
of this subsection and shall deposit into the Special Purpose Credit Program Loan Fund  es-
tablished under section 3 of this 2023 Act all proceeds from repayments of principal and in-
terest on each second mortgage loan.
(d) The department shall purchase any mortgage loan a qualified lending  institution of-
fers to sell  to the department under subsection (3)(a)(C) of this section, but may negotiate
[2]
HB 3492
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
with the qualified lending institution to obtain terms of sale that are  advantageous to the
state.
(4)(a) To become a qualified lending institution, a lending institution shall:
(A) Create a  special purpose credit program that complies with the requirements set
forth in 12 C.F.R. 1002.8, as in effect on the effective date of this 2023  Act, and administer
the special purpose  credit program according to a written plan that identifies the class of
persons that the program will benefit and specifies the  procedures and standards for ex-
tending credit under the program;
(B) Document the community need for the lending institution’s special purpose  credit
program and the lending institution’s reasons for identifying the class of persons the lending
institution intends to serve with  the special purpose credit program and make the doc-
umentation available to the department at the department’s request;
(C) Attest to the department in a notarized writing by an officer of the lending institution
that the lending institution’s special purpose credit program meets the  requirements set
forth in 12 C.F.R. 1002.8, as in effect on the effective date of this 2023 Act;
(D) Establish and implement a written policy  of offering and providing up to 90 percent
of the financing that participants  in the special purpose credit program need to purchase
residential property and of paying all needed private mortgage insurance;
(E) Provide homebuyer education in accordance with criteria the department  adopts by
rule; and
(F) Track, compile and report to the department information  the department specifies
for the purpose  of determining whether the lending institution’s special purpose credit pro-
gram is meeting the needs of participants and the community.
(b) If the department determines that a  lending institution no longer qualifies under
paragraph (a) of this  subsection, the department may disqualify the lending institution until
the department determines that the lending institution is qualified.
(5) The  department shall adopt rules and policies that are necessary to implement the
pilot program described in this section.
SECTION 3.
(1)(a) The Special Purpose Credit Program Loan  Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest that the Special  Pur-
pose Credit Program Loan Fund earns must be credited to the fund.
(b) Moneys in the Special  Purpose Credit Program Loan Fund may be invested and rein-
vested as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857.
(2) Moneys in the Special Purpose Credit Program Loan Fund consist of:
(a) Appropriations to the Housing and Community Services Department for the  purpose
of funding the pilot program described in section 2 of this 2023 Act;
(b) Repayments the department receives from participants in the  pilot program with
second mortgage loans that the department makes in connection with the pilot program;
(c) Interest and other earnings on moneys in the fund; and
(d) Other amounts the department receives from any source and deposits into the fund.
(3) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, moneys in the Special Purpose  Credit Pro-
gram Loan Fund  are continuously appropriated to the department for the purpose of making
loans in connection with the pilot program described in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(4) The  department may not during any biennium expend more than 10 percent of the
average quarterly balance of the Special Purpose Credit Program Loan Fund  to pay the costs
[3]
HB 3492
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
of administering the fund or the pilot program described in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4.
There is appropriated to the Housing  and Community Services Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $30,000,000
for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.
(1) Sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act become operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department may adopt  rules and take any
other action before the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this section that is nec-
essary to enable  the department, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section, to undertake and exercise  all of the duties, functions and powers conferred
on the department by sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]