Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 675.382 is amended to read:
675.382. ORS 675.365 to 675.410 do not apply to:
(1) A student enrolled in an approved educational program who  is pursuing a graduate degree
in a mental health field, if the student provides sexual abuse  specific treatment services only for
academic credit as part of an organized and supervised training program.
[(2) A person employed by a local, state or federal government agency, community mental health
program or drug and alcohol treatment program licensed  or certified in this state, if the person’s ac-
tivities and services are performed and provided within the person’s scope of employment. ]
[(3)] (2) A person who is a recognized member of  the clergy, if the person is acting in the
person’s capacity as a member of the clergy.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3280