Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 477.066 is amended to read:
477.066. (1) Each owner and operator of  forestland on which a fire exists or from which it may
have spread, notwithstanding the origin or subsequent spread thereof,  shall immediately proceed to
control and extinguish such fire when  its existence comes to the knowledge of the owner or opera-
tor, without awaiting instructions from the forester, and shall  continue until the fire is extinguished.
(2) If the  forester determines the fire is either burning uncontrolled or the owner or operator
does not then have readily and immediately available personnel and equipment  to control or extin-
guish the fire, the forester, or any forest protective association  or agency under contract or agree-
ment with the State Board of Forestry  for the protection of forestland against fire, and within whose
protection area the fire exists, shall summarily abate the nuisance thus  constituted by controlling
and extinguishing the fire.
(3) An owner may request in writing that  the forester employ alternate fire prevention and
suppression strategies or techniques on the owner’s forestland. The forester may employ  some or
all of the requested strategies or  techniques when, in the judgment of the forester, conditions war-
rant the use of the alternate strategies or techniques.
(4) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, notification to the owner  or operator
of the forestland is considered sufficient notification to the owner of the existence of a fire.
SECTION 2. ORS 477.067 is repealed.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 169