Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the amount  of $250,000, which may be expended as grants to the
Association of Oregon Counties for the purpose of obtaining  contracted services to coordi-
nate tide gate permitting, including but not limited to technical  assistance for tide gate
owners and interagency liaison services  to help direct tide gate projects through permitting
and funding processes.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $262,000  for funding a position within the department
dedicated to providing technical support related to tide gate projects, including  but not lim-
ited to assistance in the evaluation of tide gate options with regard to fish habitat,  fish
passage, tidal inundation and other factors,  consultation with appropriate experts, local
governments and stakeholders, assistance in the  identification of tide gate options and as-
sistance with the resolution of project development issues.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $348,100  for funding a position within the department
dedicated to providing fish passage engineering services related to tide  gates, including but
not limited to collaboration with the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration and
others to facilitate the identification of regulatory compliance options for tide  gate projects
by evaluating proposed tide gate engineering designs.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3456
SB 812
1
[2]