Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Definitions. (1) As used in sections 1 to 6 of this 2025 Act:
(a) “Clinical laboratory” has the meaning given that term in ORS 432.500.
(b) “Health care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 432.500.
(c) “Parkinsonisms” means related conditions that cause a combination of the  movement
abnormalities seen  in Parkinson’s disease, such as tremor at rest, slow movement, muscle
rigidity, impaired speech or muscle stiffness, which often overlap with and  can evolve from
what appears to be Parkinson’s disease, and that include multiple system atrophy, dementia
with Lewy bodies, corticobasal degeneration and progressive supranuclear palsy.
(d) “Parkinson’s disease” means a chronic and progressive  neurologic disorder that re-
sults from deficiency of the neurotransmitter dopamine as the consequence of  specific de-
generative changes in the area of the brain called the basal ganglia and that is characterized
by tremor  at rest, slow movement, muscle rigidity, stooped posture and unsteady or shuffling
gait.
SECTION 2.
Parkinson’s disease registry; advisory committee; rules.  (1) The Oregon
Health Authority  shall establish a registry system to collect data on the incidence and pre-
valence of Parkinson’s disease in Oregon and other related data.
(2) A  health care facility, licensed health care practitioner or clinical laboratory diag-
nosing or providing treatment to patients with Parkinson’s disease  or related parkinsonisms
shall report each case of Parkinson’s disease  or related parkinsonisms to the authority in a
format prescribed by the authority.
(3) The authority may contract with a public or private third party to:
(a) Operate or maintain the statewide registry; and
(b) Fulfill the authority’s duties under sections 1 to 6 of this 2025 Act.
(4) The authority  shall adopt rules establishing a Parkinson’s Disease Registry Advisory
Committee to assist in the development and implementation of the registry,  determine what
data shall be collected and generally advise the authority on issues related to carrying  out
the duties described in sections 1 to 6 of this 2025 Act. Membership of the advisory  commit-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 149
HB 2595
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tee must include a neurologist, a movement disorder specialist, a primary care physician,  a
physician informaticist, a patient diagnosed with Parkinson’s  disease, a person who is
knowledgeable about public health and  safety, a population health researcher familiar with
registries and a Parkinson’s disease researcher and  other individuals the department deems
necessary. The advisory committee shall meet at least biannually.
(5) All  patients diagnosed with Parkinson’s disease or related parkinsonisms shall be no-
tified orally and in writing regarding  the collection of information and patient data on
Parkinson’s disease. Patients who do not wish to participate in the collection of data under
the registry system for purposes of  research shall affirmatively opt out in writing after
having been provided with an opportunity to review the documents and ask questions. A pa-
tient may not be forced to participate in the registry.
(6) The authority shall establish a system for the collection and  dissemination of infor-
mation determining the incidence and prevalence  of Parkinson’s disease and related
parkinsonisms.
(7) Diagnoses of Parkinson’s disease and related parkinsonisms shall be reported, but the
mere incidence of a patient diagnosis shall be the  sole required information for the registry
for any patient who chooses not to participate. For  the subset of patients who choose not
to participate, further data may not be reported to the registry.
(8) No later than December 1 of each  year, the advisory committee shall submit a report
in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation,  to
the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to health care. The report sub-
mitted under this subsection must include, but  is not limited to, a summary of the
committee’s findings relating to patients diagnosed  with Parkinson’s disease and related
parkinsonisms.
SECTION 3.
Confidentiality of information.  (1) All  identifying information regarding in-
dividual patients, health  care facilities and practitioners reported pursuant to section 2 of
this 2025 Act  shall be confidential and privileged. Except as required in connection with the
administration or  enforcement of public health laws or rules, no public health official, em-
ployee or agent shall be examined in an administrative or judicial proceeding as to  the ex-
istence or contents of  data collected under the registry system for Parkinson’s disease and
related parkinsonisms.
(2) All additional information reported in connection with a special study shall be  confi-
dential and privileged and shall be used solely for the purposes of the study, as provided by
ORS 413.196. Nothing  in this section shall prevent the Oregon Health Authority from pub-
lishing statistical compilations relating to morbidity and mortality studies that do not  iden-
tify individual cases or prevent use of this data by third  parties to conduct research as
provided by section 4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
Use of confidential data; rules.  (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt
rules under which  confidential data may be used by third parties to conduct research and
studies for the public good. Research and studies  conducted using confidential data from the
registry must be  reviewed and approved by an institutional review board in accordance with
45 C.F.R. 46.
(2) The authority may enter into agreements to exchange  information with other regis-
tries for patients diagnosed  with Parkinson’s disease and related parkinsonisms to obtain
complete reports of Oregon residents diagnosed or treated in other states and to  provide
[2]
HB 2595
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
information to other states regarding the residents of other states diagnosed or treated in
Oregon. Before  providing information to any other registry, the authority shall ensure that
the recipient registry has comparable confidentiality protections.
SECTION 5.
Action for  damages; license; disciplinary action prohibited for good faith
participation in reporting of data.  (1) An action for damages arising from the disclosure of
confidential or privileged information may not be maintained against any person,  or the
employer or employee of any person, who participates in good faith in the reporting of reg-
istry data  for Parkinson’s disease and related parkinsonisms in accordance with sections 1
to 6 of this 2025 Act.
(2) A license of a health care facility or practitioner may  not be denied, suspended or
revoked for the good faith disclosure of confidential or  privileged information in the report-
ing of registry data for Parkinson’s disease and related  parkinsonisms in accordance with
sections 1 to 6 of this 2025 Act.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to the unauthorized disclosure of
confidential or privileged information when such disclosure is due to gross negligence or
willful misconduct.
SECTION 6.
No prohibition or  requirement to operate separate registry.  Nothing in
sections 1 to 6 of this 2025 Act shall prohibit a health care facility from  operating its own
registry for Parkinson’s disease and related parkinsonisms or  require a health care facility
to operate its own registry for Parkinson’s disease and related parkinsonisms.
SECTION 7. Temporary provisions. At least  90 days before requiring information to be
reported, the  Oregon Health Authority shall provide notification of the mandatory reporting
of diagnoses of  Parkinson’s disease and related parkinsonisms on its website, and shall also
provide that information to associations representing physicians  and hospitals and directly
to the boards regulating health care professionals.
SECTION 8. Section 7 sunset.  Section 7 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 9. Operative date. (1) Sections 1 to 7 of this  2025 Act become operative January
1, 2026.
(2) The members  of the Parkinson’s Disease Registry Advisory Committee shall be ap-
pointed no later than January 1, 2026.
(3) The registry system described  in section 2 of this 2025 Act must be operative no later
than July 1, 2026.
(4) The Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules and take  any other action before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the au-
thority, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section, to under-
take and exercise all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the authority by
sections 1 to 7 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 10.
Captions. The section captions  used in this 2025 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory  law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 11. Effective date.  This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on
which the 2025 regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]