Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 805.222 is amended to read:
805.222. (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish a special registration program  and
provide for issuance of special registration plates for nonprofit groups meeting the qualifications for
tax exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue  Code, for institutions of higher
education and for public bodies, as defined in ORS 174.109.
(2) Plates issued under this section may be issued to owners of motor vehicles registered under
the provisions of ORS 803.420 (6)(a). In addition, the department may adopt rules for  issuance of
special  registration  plates issued pursuant to this section for vehicles not registered under ORS
803.420 (6)(a).
(3) Plates issued under this section may not  contain expressions of political opinion or religious
belief.
(4) Rules adopted under this section shall include, but need not be limited to, rules that:
(a) Describe general qualifications to be met by any nonprofit group, institution of higher  edu-
cation or public body in order to be eligible for plates issued under this section.
(b) Specify circumstances under which the department may cease to issue plates  under this
section.
(c) Require each nonprofit group, institution of higher education or public body for which plates
are issued to file an annual statement on a form designed by the department showing  that the group
is a nonprofit group, institution of  higher education or public body and that the nonprofit group,
institution of higher education or public  body otherwise meets the qualifications imposed for eligi-
bility for plates issued under this  section. The statement shall include names and addresses of cur-
rent directors or officers of the nonprofit group, institution of higher education or public body or
of other persons authorized to  speak for the nonprofit group, institution of higher education or
public body on matters affecting plates issued under this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2678
SB 1022
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Specify the manner in which a  nonprofit group, institution of higher education or public body
may apply for a special registration plate.
(5) In addition to  any other fee authorized by law, for each set of special registration plates is-
sued pursuant to this section, the department shall  collect a surcharge of $40 payable when the
plates are issued and upon each  subsequent renewal of registration of a vehicle bearing the plates.
The department shall distribute the moneys from the surcharge as provided  in subsection (8) of this
section.
(6) The department, in consultation with the nonprofit group, institution  of higher education or
public body requesting the special registration plate, shall develop a unique design for each plate
issued under this section. Any design must comply with requirements described under ORS 803.535.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section,  the department  shall determine how
many sets of plates shall be manufactured for  each plate approved under this section. If the de-
partment does not  issue 2,000 sets of plates for a particular nonprofit group, institution of higher
education or public body in any one year, the department shall cease production of those plates.
(8) If the department  does not issue 300 sets of plates for the following institutions of
higher education in any one year, the department shall cease production of those plates:
(a) Oregon Institute of Technology.
(b) Western Oregon University.
(c) Southern Oregon University.
(d) Eastern Oregon University.
[(8)] (9) Each nonprofit group, institution of higher education or  public body that is found by the
department to be eligible for plates issued under this section  may designate an account into which
the net proceeds of the surcharge collected by the department under  subsection (5) of this section
are to be deposited. The department shall  keep accurate records of the number of plates issued for
each nonprofit group, institution of higher  education or public body that qualifies. After payment
of administrative expenses of the department, moneys collected under  this section for a nonprofit
group, institution of higher education or public body shall be  deposited by the department into an
account specified by that nonprofit  group, institution of higher education or public body. If any
nonprofit group, institution of higher education or public body does not specify an account for the
moneys collected from the sale  of plates issued under this section, the department shall deposit
moneys collected for those plates  into the Passenger Rail Transportation Account established under
ORS 802.100 to be used as other moneys  in the account are used. Deposits under this subsection
shall be made at least quarterly.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 805.225 is amended to read:
805.225. (1) A nonprofit group, institution of higher education or public  body, as defined in ORS
174.109, that requests issuance of a special registration plate under ORS 805.222 shall:
(a) Submit an application, in the manner prescribed by  the Department of Transportation by
rule.
(b) Pay to the  department the anticipated costs of adding the plate to the special registration
plate program, as determined by the department. The department shall refund any amount  of the
payment that is not needed to pay the costs of adding the plate to the program.
[(c) Collect and hold prepaid vouchers for new special registration plates, until it has  received at
least 3,000 vouchers along with required fees. ]
(c) Collect and hold prepaid vouchers for new special registration  plates, until it has re-
ceived the required fees and at least:
[2]
SB 1022
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
(A) For the following institutions of higher education, 500 vouchers:
(i) Oregon Institute of Technology.
(ii) Western Oregon University.
(iii) Southern Oregon University.
(iv) Eastern Oregon University.
(B) For all other applicants, 3,000 vouchers.
(2) Once a participating nonprofit group, institution of higher education or  public body has re-
ceived [ at least 3,000 ] the required number  vouchers, it  shall submit the vouchers, along with the
required fees, to the department.
[(2)] (3)  The department shall begin designing, producing and issuing  the plates after the
nonprofit group, institution of higher education or public body submits the following:
(a) The application;
(b) Payment for the anticipated costs  of adding the plate as determined under subsection (1) of
this section; and
(c) Three thousand prepaid vouchers along with required fees.
[(3)] (4)  For  purposes of this section, costs of adding a new special registration plate include,
but are not limited to, computer programming costs and vendor set-up fees.
[(4)] (5) The department shall adopt rules for the administration and implementation of the  spe-
cial registration plate program.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]