Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $647 million for
deposit into the  Community College Support Fund established under ORS 341.620 for distrib-
ution to community colleges and community college service districts.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $70 million for
distribution to community colleges and community  college service districts for expenditures
intended to  increase the number of graduates from post-secondary career and technical ed-
ucation programs.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $70 million for
distribution to community colleges and community  college service districts for expenditures
related to:
(1) Programs related to student success; and
(2) Programs related to retention of first-generation college students  and students from
underrepresented minority populations.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2460
HB 2642
1
[2]