Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 659A.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Federal immigration authority” has the meaning given that term in ORS 180.805.
(b) “Unfair immigration-related practices” includes:
(A) Threatening to contact a federal immigration authority because the employee  has
exercised a right otherwise provided by law.
(B) Retaliating against an employee because the employee has  updated the employee’s
employment information due to a change in the employee’s immigration status.
(2) It is an unlawful practice  for an employer to engage in unfair immigration-related
practices.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4591