Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 657.100 is amended to read:
657.100. (1) An individual is deemed “unemployed”  in any week during which the individual
performs no services and with respect  to which no remuneration for services performed is paid or
payable to the individual, or in any  week of less than full-time work if the remuneration paid or
payable to the individual for services performed during the week is less  than the individual’s weekly
benefit amount.
(2) For the purposes of ORS 657.155 (1), an individual who performs full-time services in any
week for an employing unit is not unemployed  even though remuneration is neither paid nor payable
to the individual for the services performed; however, nothing in  this subsection shall prevent an
individual from meeting the definition of “unemployed” as used in this  section solely by reason of
the individual’s performance of volunteer services without remuneration for a charitable  institution
or a governmental entity.
(3) The Director of the Employment Department  shall prescribe rules as the director deems
necessary with respect to the various types of unemployment.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (1)  and (2) of this section, rules prescribed by the di-
rector under subsection (3) of this section  may provide that an individual may not be ex-
cluded from being deemed unemployed solely because of service:
(A) Performed for an employing unit that is  legally compelling the individual to perform
the service; and
(B) For which the individual has not received  payment on the individual’s regular payday.
(b) An individual who is deemed unemployed pursuant to this subsection shall  continue
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4159
SB 722
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to be so deemed until the earlier of the date on which:
(A) The individual begins  to receive payment for the service on the individual’s regular
payday; or
(B) The individual permanently ceases work for the employing unit.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 657.100 by section 1 of this  2019 Act apply to claims
for benefits by individuals  described in ORS 657.100 (4) filed in any week, as defined in ORS
657.010, that began or begins on or after December 22, 2018.
SECTION 3.  (1) An individual is entitled to benefits under this section  if, at the time the
individual files a claim for the benefits, the individual:
(a) Is on active duty in the United States Coast Guard and stationed in this state;
(b) Is legally compelled to perform service in the United States  Coast Guard for the
individual’s regular hours of work;
(c) Is not receiving payment for the service because  of the lapse of federal appropri-
ations; and
(d) Would otherwise be eligible for unemployment  compensation for ex-servicemembers
as provided under 5 U.S.C. chapter 85.
(2) Except for the eligibility requirements under  subsection (1) of this section, benefits
under this section shall be  subject to the same requirements and procedures as regular
benefits as defined in ORS 657.158.
(3) If an individual who receives benefits under this  section receives back pay from the
federal government with respect to the period for which  the individual received the benefits,
the back pay shall be considered earnings for that period.
(4) An individual who is entitled to benefits under this section shall  continue to be so
entitled until the earlier of the date on which:
(a) The individual begins to receive payment on the individual’s regular  payday for ser-
vice performed in the United States Coast Guard; or
(b) The individual permanently ceases active duty in the United States Coast Guard.
(5) The Director of the Employment Department may prescribe rules as  the director
deems necessary with respect to benefits under this section.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 657.815, benefits payable under this  section and under rules
prescribed by the director pursuant to this section, and the costs  necessary for the Em-
ployment Department to  administer this section and any rules prescribed by the director
pursuant to  this section, shall be paid using the moneys appropriated to the department
under section 5 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2019 Act applies to claims for benefits under section 3 of
this 2019 Act filed in any week, as defined in ORS 657.010, that  began or begins on or after
December 22, 2018.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated to the Employment Department,  out of the General
Fund, the amount of $  for the purposes of paying:
(1) Benefits under section 3 of this 2019 Act and under any rules prescribed by  the Di-
rector of the Employment Department pursuant to section 3 of this 2019 Act; and
(2) The  costs necessary for the department to administer section 3 of this 2019 Act and
any rules prescribed by the director pursuant to section 3 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
[2]
SB 722
1
2
on its passage.
[3]