Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall establish and maintain a  registry for
tutors who are not licensed through the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(2) Any person providing tutoring  services may submit an application to become regis-
tered as a tutor. The application must include the name of the person, any third-party  or-
ganizations through which the person provides tutoring services and an indication of whether
the person provides tutoring services online. The department may request additional infor-
mation for purposes of verifying a person’s  identification and ensuring current contact in-
formation for the person.
(3) The department shall deny a person’s inclusion  on the registry, or shall remove the
person from the registry, upon a finding of:
(a) A substantiated report under ORS 339.370 to 339.400;
(b) Gross neglect of duty;
(c) Gross unfitness; or
(d) Any false statement knowingly made  on an application to become registered as a tu-
tor.
(4) A finding made under subsection (3) of this section may be based  on an investigation
conducted by a school district, by the department or  by a third-party organization through
which the person currently is providing tutoring services or had  previously provided tutoring
services.
(5) A person who is denied  inclusion on the registry or who is removed from the registry
may appeal the department’s decision as a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(6) The department shall  make the registry accessible by school districts and by members
of the public.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 332.505 is amended to read:
332.505. (1) A district school board may:
(a) Employ a superintendent  of schools and necessary assistant superintendents for the district
and fix the  terms and conditions of employment and the compensation. The district school board
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 170
HB 2060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
shall not contract with a superintendent  for more than a period of three years at a time. The con-
tract shall automatically expire  at the end of its term. Nothing in this paragraph prevents a district
school board from:
(A) Electing to issue a subsequent contract for an additional three years at any time.
(B) Including in the contract provisions that  provide for the termination of employment of the
superintendent prior to the expiration of the contract. If the  superintendent and the district school
board mutually agree to include a termination-without-cause  provision in the contract, the district
school board may  terminate the superintendent’s employment, without cause, at any time during the
contract period only if the district  school board provides the superintendent with at least 12 months’
notice of the termination. Nothing in this subparagraph authorizes the district school board to make
a wrongful termination or a termination for any reason described in subsection (3)(a) of  this section.
(b) Employ personnel, including teachers and administrators, necessary to carry out  the duties
and powers of the board  and fix the duties, terms and conditions of employment and the compen-
sation.
(c) Compensate district employees in any form which may include, but  shall not be limited to,
insurance, tuition reimbursement and salaries.
(d) Employ instructional assistants and intern teachers subject to the rules of  the State Board
of Education. As used in this paragraph:
(A) “Instructional assistant” has the meaning given that term in ORS 342.120.
(B) “Intern teacher” means  a regularly enrolled candidate of an approved educator preparation
provider, as defined in ORS 342.120, who  teaches under the supervision of the staff of the provider
and of the employing district in order  to acquire practical experience in teaching and for which the
candidate  receives  both academic credit from the provider and financial compensation from the
school district or education service district.
(e) Contract with a tutor who is:
(A) Licensed by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission; or
(B) Not licensed by the commission only if the tutor is registered as provided  by section
1 of this 2025 Act.
(2)(a) A district school board shall designate one or more  civil rights coordinators for the school
district. A civil rights coordinator may be an employee of the school district or  the school district
may enter into a contract with  an education service district for the services of a civil rights coor-
dinator. A civil rights coordinator, at a minimum, shall:
(A) Monitor, coordinate and oversee school district compliance  with state and federal laws
prohibiting discrimination in public education;
(B) Oversee investigations of complaints alleging discrimination  in public education and ensure
that the investigations are resolved;
(C) Provide guidance to school and school district personnel on civil rights issues in  the school
district, respond to questions and concerns about  civil rights in the school district and coordinate
efforts to prevent civil rights violations from occurring in the school district;
(D) Satisfy any training requirements prescribed by the State Board of Education by rule; and
(E) Comply with any rules adopted by the State Board of Education for the purpose of imple-
menting this paragraph.
(b) As used  in this subsection, “discrimination” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659.850
when used in relation to state law.
(c) For the purpose of this subsection, the Department of Education shall  annually make avail-
[2]
HB 2060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
able training for civil rights coordinators and the State Board of Education may adopt any necessary
rules.
(3)(a) A district school board may not:
(A) Direct  a superintendent to take any action that conflicts with a local, state or federal law
that applies to school districts;
(B) Take an adverse employment  action against a superintendent for complying with a local,
state or federal law that applies to school districts; or
(C) Employ a superintendent pursuant to a contract that purports to waive, or  conflicts with,
any provision or requirement of subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph.
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Local, state or federal  law” means a local, state or federal directive having the force of
law, including an ordinance, a city or county  resolution, a statute, a court decision, an administra-
tive rule or regulation,  an order issued in compliance with ORS chapter 183, an executive order or
any other directive, declaration or statement that is issued in compliance with the law  as having
the force of law and that is  issued by a local government as defined in ORS 174.116, the state gov-
ernment as defined in ORS 174.111 or the federal government.
(B) “Superintendent” includes an interim superintendent.
(4) The district school board shall maintain written  personnel policies and make the policies
available for inspection by any school employee or member of the public.
(5) The superintendent of the school district shall  cause each employee to be specifically in-
formed of the existence and availability of the personnel policies.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 332.505  by section 2 of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on July 1, 2026.
[3]