Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act, “harassment” means the conduct
described in ORS 166.065, 166.070 or 166.090.
SECTION 2. (1) A petitioner who has been the victim of harassment within the preceding
180 days may petition the circuit court for relief under sections 1 to 9  of this 2025 Act if the
harassment causes the petitioner reasonable apprehension regarding  the petitioner’s per-
sonal safety.
(2) The petition must:
(a) Allege that the petitioner has  been the victim of harassment by the respondent within
the 180 days preceding the filing of the petition;
(b) Allege that the petitioner has reasonable apprehension regarding  the petitioner’s
personal safety; and
(c) Particularly describe the nature and dates  of the harassment that occurred not more
than 180 days before the filing of the petition.
(3) The allegations in the petition must be  made under oath or affirmation or in a dec-
laration under penalty of perjury in the form required by ORCP 1 E.
(4) The circuit court has jurisdiction over all proceedings under  sections 1 to 9 of this
2025 Act.
(5) The petitioner has the burden of proving  a claim under sections 1 to 9 of this 2025
Act by a preponderance of the evidence.
SECTION 3.
(1) When  a person files a petition under section 2 of this 2025 Act, the circuit
court shall hold an ex parte hearing in person or by telephone on the day the petition is filed
or on the following judicial day. Upon a showing that the petitioner has  been the victim of
harassment committed by the respondent within 180 days preceding the  filing of the petition
and that the petitioner has  reasonable apprehension regarding the personal safety of the
petitioner, the court shall, if requested by the petitioner, order:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3582
SB 389
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) That the respondent be restrained  from harassment or attempted harassment of the
petitioner;
(b) That the respondent be restrained from entering, or attempting to  enter, on any
premises and a reasonable  area surrounding the premises when it appears to the court that
such restraint is necessary to prevent the respondent from harassment of the petitioner;
(c) Except as provided in subsection  (2) of this section, other relief that the court con-
siders necessary to provide for the safety and welfare of the petitioner; or
(d) That the  respondent have no contact with the petitioner in person, by telephone, by
mail or by electronic means.
(2) The court may not order  relief under this section or section 4 of this 2025 Act that
affects the respondent’s ability to possess firearms and ammunition or engage in  activities
involving firearms.
(3) The court’s order under subsection (1) of this section is  effective for a period of two
years or until the order is withdrawn or amended.
(4) If the respondent is restrained  from entering, or attempting to enter, an area sur-
rounding the  petitioner’s residence or any other premises, the order restraining the re-
spondent shall specifically describe the area.
(5) The State Court Administrator shall prescribe  the content and form of the petition,
order and related forms for use under sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act. The clerk of the court
shall make available  the forms and an instructional brochure explaining the rights set forth
under sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act.
(6) If the court orders relief:
(a) The clerk of the court shall provide without charge  the number of certified true
copies of the  petition and order necessary to provide the petitioner with one copy and to ef-
fect service and shall have a true copy of the petition and order  delivered to the county
sheriff for service upon the  respondent, unless the court finds that further service is un-
necessary because the respondent appeared in person before the court. In  addition and upon
request by the petitioner, the clerk shall provide  the petitioner, without charge, two exem-
plified copies of the petition and order.
(b) The county  sheriff shall serve the respondent personally unless the petitioner elects
to have the respondent served personally by a private party. Proof of service shall be made
in accordance with ORS 107.720. When the order does not contain the  respondent’s date of
birth and service is effected by the sheriff or other peace officer,  the sheriff or officer shall
verify the respondent’s date of birth  with the respondent and shall record that date on the
order or proof  of service entered into the Law Enforcement Data System under ORS 107.720.
(c) A filing fee, service  fee or hearing fee may not be charged for proceedings seeking
only the relief provided under sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act.
(7) If the county sheriff:
(a) Determines that the order and petition are incomplete,  the sheriff shall return the
order and petition to the clerk of  the court. The clerk of the court shall notify the petitioner,
at the address provided by the petitioner, of the error or omission.
(b) After accepting the order and petition, cannot  complete service within 10 days, the
sheriff shall notify the petitioner, at the address provided by the petitioner, that  the docu-
ments have not been served. If the  petitioner does not respond within 10 days, the sheriff
shall hold the order and petition for future service and file a return to the clerk of the court
[2]
SB 389
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
showing that service was not completed.
(8)(a) Within 30 days after  a restraining order is served under this section, the respond-
ent may request a court hearing upon any relief granted. The hearing request form  shall be
available from the clerk of the court  in the form prescribed by the State Court Administra-
tor.
(b) If the respondent requests a hearing under paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the clerk
of the court shall notify the petitioner of the date and  time of the hearing, and shall supply
the petitioner with a copy of the respondent’s request for a  hearing. The petitioner shall give
to the clerk of the court information sufficient to allow such notification.
(c) The hearing may not be limited to the issues raised in  the respondent’s request for
hearing form. If the respondent seeks to raise an  issue at the hearing not previously raised
in the request  for hearing form, or if the petitioner seeks relief at the hearing not granted
in the original order, the other party shall be entitled to a  reasonable continuance for the
purpose of preparing a response to the issue.
(9) If the respondent fails to request a hearing within 30  days after a restraining order
is served, the restraining order is confirmed by operation of law.
(10) Service of process or other legal documents upon the petitioner is not a violation  of
this section if the petitioner is served as provided in ORCP 7 or 9.
SECTION 4.
(1) If  the respondent in a proceeding under sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act
requests a hearing pursuant to section 3 (8) of this 2025 Act, the court shall  hold the hearing
within 21 days after the request.
(2) In a hearing held pursuant to subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The court may  continue any order issued under section 3 of this 2025 Act if the court
finds that:
(A) Harassment has occurred within the period specified in  section 2 (1) of this 2025 Act;
and
(B) The petitioner  has reasonable apprehension regarding the personal safety of the
petitioner.
(b) The court may cancel or change any order issued under section 3 of this 2025  Act and
may assess against either party reasonable attorney fees and such costs as  may be incurred
in the proceeding.
(3) The court may approve any consent agreement  to bring about a cessation of
harassment of  the parties. However, the court may not approve a term in a consent agree-
ment that provides for  restraint of a party to the agreement unless the other party peti-
tioned for and was granted an order under sections 1 to 9 of this  2025 Act. An order or
consent agreement made under this section may be amended at any time and shall  continue
in effect for a period of two years from the date of the order issued under  section 3 of this
2025 Act.
(4) An undertaking may not be required in any proceeding  under sections 1 to 9 of this
2025 Act.
(5) Any  proceeding under sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act shall be in addition to any other
available civil or criminal remedies.
SECTION 5.
(1) A party may file a  motion under ORS 45.400 requesting that the court
allow the appearance of the party or a witness by telephone or by other two-way electronic
communication device in a proceeding under sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act.
[3]
SB 389
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) In exercising its discretion to allow written notice less than  30 days before the pro-
ceeding as required under ORS 45.400 (2),  the court shall consider the expedited nature of a
proceeding under sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act.
(3) In addition to the factors listed in ORS 45.400 (3)(b) that would support  a finding of
good cause, the court shall consider whether the safety or welfare of the party  or witness
would be threatened if testimony were  required to be provided in person at a proceeding
under sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act.
(4) A motion or good cause  determination under this section or ORS 45.400 is not re-
quired for ex parte hearings held by telephone under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
(1) A sheriff may serve a restraining order issued under sections  1 to 9 of
this 2025 Act  in the county in which the sheriff was elected and in any county that is adja-
cent to the county in which the sheriff was elected.
(2) A sheriff may serve and enter into the Law Enforcement Data System  a copy of a
restraining order under sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act that  was transmitted to the sheriff
by a court or law enforcement agency using an  electronic communication device. Before
transmitting a copy of a restraining order to a  sheriff under this subsection by telephonic
facsimile or electronic mail, the person sending the copy must receive  confirmation from the
sheriff’s office that an electronic communication device is available and operating.  For pur-
poses of this subsection, “electronic  communication device” means a device by which any
kind of electronic communication  can be made, including but not limited to communication
by telephonic facsimile and electronic mail.
SECTION 7. (1) The court may renew for a period  of two years an order entered under
section 3 or 4 of this 2025 Act or renewed under this section upon a finding that  a person in
the petitioner’s  situation would reasonably fear further acts of harassment by the respond-
ent if the order is not renewed.
(2) A finding that  there has been a further act of harassment is not required to renew
an order under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) A court may renew an order on the basis of  an ex parte petition alleging facts sup-
porting the required finding. The  petition must include allegations made under oath or af-
firmation or in a declaration under penalty of perjury  in the form required by ORCP 1 E. If
the renewal order is granted, the provisions of section  3 (6) to (8) of this 2025 Act apply ex-
cept that the court may not  hear any issue other than the basis for renewal unless requested
in the hearing request  form and thereafter agreed to by the petitioner. The court shall hold
a hearing required under this section within 21 days after the respondent’s request.
SECTION 8. (1) A petition under section 2 of this 2025 Act may be filed  in a county in
which:
(a) The petitioner resides;
(b) The respondent resides; or
(c) The harassment occurred.
(2) Any contempt proceedings for violation of a restraining order issued  under sections
1 to 9 of this 2025 Act  must be conducted by the court that issued the order, or by the circuit
court for a county in which a violation of the restraining order occurs. If contempt pro-
ceedings are initiated in the circuit court for a county in which a violation of the restraining
order occurs, the person initiating the contempt proceedings shall file with the court  a copy
of the restraining order,  certified by the clerk of the court that issued the order. Upon filing
[4]
SB 389
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the certified copy of the restraining order, the court shall enforce the order as  though
that court had issued the order.
SECTION 9.
(1) At any time after an order has been issued under  sections 1 to 9 of this
2025 Act and after the time period  set forth in section 3 (8)(a) of this 2025 Act, a party may
request that the court modify, remove  or make less restrictive terms in the order that were
entered under section 3 (1)(b) of this 2025 Act for good cause shown. Application  to the court
under this subsection may be by ex parte motion.
(2) The clerk of the court shall provide  without charge the number of certified true
copies of the request for modification of  the order and notice of hearing necessary to effect
service and, at the  election of the party requesting the modification, shall have a true copy
of the request and notice delivered to the county sheriff for service upon the other party.
(3) The county sheriff shall personally serve the other party with a request under sub-
section (1) of this section, unless the party requesting the  modification under subsection (1)
of this section elects to have the other party personally  served by a private party or unless
otherwise ordered by the court.
(4) The provisions of section 4 (3) of this 2025 Act apply to a modification of an  order
under this section.
(5) The clerk of the court shall deliver a copy of  an order of modification entered under
subsection (1) of this section to the county sheriff for service and entry  into the Law
Enforcement Data System as provided in section 6 of this 2025 Act.
(6)(a) The county sheriff shall serve a copy of an order  of modification entered under
subsection (1) of  this section by mailing a copy of the order to the nonrequesting party by
first class mail.
(b) If  the order of modification recites that the respondent appeared in person before the
court, the necessity for service of the order and proof of service is waived.
(7) The court may  assess against either party reasonable attorney fees and costs that
may be incurred in the proceeding.
SECTION 10.  ORS 21.245 is amended to read:
21.245. (1) The State Court Administrator may  prescribe and charge a reasonable price, covering
the costs of labor and material, for any forms provided by the courts of this  state. The sums so
collected shall be paid over to the State Treasurer and credited  to the Court Forms Revolving Fund.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, no charge shall be made for forms made
available under the provisions of ORS 107.700 to 107.735  or 124.005 to 124.040 or ORS 163.760 to
163.777 or sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act .
SECTION 11.  ORS 36.185 is amended to read:
36.185. After the  appearance by all parties in any civil action, except proceedings under ORS
107.700 to 107.735, 124.005 to 124.040 or 163.760 to 163.777  or sections 1 to 9 of this  2025 Act , a
judge of any circuit court may refer a civil dispute  to mediation under the terms and conditions set
forth in ORS 36.185 to 36.210. When a party to a case files a  written objection to mediation with the
court, the action shall be removed from mediation and proceed in a normal  fashion. All civil
disputants shall be provided with written information describing the mediation process, as  provided
or approved by the State Court Administrator, along with information on established court  medi-
ation opportunities. Filing parties shall be provided with this information at the time  of filing a civil
action. Responding parties  shall be provided with this information by the filing party along with the
initial service of filing documents upon the responding party.
[5]
SB 389
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 12.
 ORS 107.085 is amended to read:
107.085. (1) A suit for  marital annulment, dissolution or separation shall be entitled: “IN THE
MATTER OF THE  MARRIAGE OF (names of parties): PETITION FOR (ultimate relief sought).” The
moving party shall be designated as the “Petitioner” and the other party the “Respondent.”  Nothing
in this section shall preclude both parties from acting as “Copetitioners.”
(2) The petitioner shall state the following in the petition:
(a) The names and dates of birth of all of the children born or adopted during the marriage, and
a reference to and expected date  of birth of any children conceived during the marriage but not yet
born;
(b) The names and dates of birth of all children born to the parties prior to the marriage;
(c) To the extent known:
(A) Whether  there is pending in this state or any other jurisdiction a domestic relations suit,
as defined in ORS 107.510;
(B) Whether there is pending in this state or any other jurisdiction any type of support pro-
ceeding involving dependents of the same  marriage, including one brought under this section or ORS
25.501 to 25.556, 108.110, 109.100, 125.025 or 419B.400 or ORS chapter 110;
(C) Whether  there exists in this state or any other jurisdiction a support order, as defined in
ORS 110.503, involving dependents of the same marriage; and
(D) Whether there exists in this state or any other jurisdiction a protective  order between the
parties as authorized by ORS 30.866, 107.700 to 107.735, 124.005 to 124.040,  163.730 to 163.750 or
163.760 to 163.777 or sections 1 to 9 of this  2025 Act , or any other order that restrains one of the
parties from contact with the other party or with the parties’ minor children; and
(d) That the petitioner acknowledges that by filing the petition the petitioner is  bound by the
terms of the restraining order issued under ORS 107.093.
(3) The petitioner shall include with the petition a certificate regarding  any pending support
proceeding and any existing support order. The petitioner shall use a certificate  that is in a form
established by court rule and include information required by court rule  and subsection (2)(c)(B) and
(C) of this section.
(4) At or prior to the hearing of a suit for  marital annulment, dissolution or separation, the
moving party or the party attending the hearing shall file with  the court a written statement setting
forth the full  names and any former names of the parties, the residence, mailing or contact addresses
of the parties, the ages of both  parties, the date and place of the marriage of the parties, and the
names and ages of the children born to or adopted by the parties. This information shall be  incor-
porated in and made a part of the judgment.
(5) If real property is involved,  the petitioner may have a notice of pendency of the action re-
corded at the time the petition is filed, as provided in ORS 93.740.
(6) The Social Security numbers of the parties and of  the children born or adopted during the
marriage and children born to the parties  prior to the marriage shall be provided as established in
ORS 107.840.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 107.720 is amended to read:
107.720. (1)(a) Whenever a restraining order, as authorized  by ORS 107.095 (1)(c) or (d), 107.716
or 107.718  or section 3 or 4 of this 2025  Act , that includes a security amount and an expiration
date pursuant to  ORS 107.095, 107.716 or 107.718 or section 3 or 4 of this 2025 Act  and this sec-
tion, is issued and the person to be restrained has actual notice of the  order, the clerk of the court
or any other person serving the petition and order shall  immediately deliver to a county sheriff a
[6]
SB 389
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
true copy of proof of service, on which it is stated that personal  service of the petition and order
was served on the respondent, and  copies of the petition and order. Proof of service may be made
by affidavit or by declaration  under penalty of perjury. If an order entered by the court recites that
the respondent appeared in person before the  court, the necessity for service of the order and proof
of service is  waived. Upon receipt of a copy of the order and notice of completion of any required
service by a member of  a law enforcement agency, the county sheriff shall immediately enter the
order into the Law Enforcement Data  System maintained by the Department of State Police and into
the databases of  the National Crime Information Center of the United States Department of Justice.
If the petition and order were served on the respondent by a person other than  a member of a law
enforcement agency, the county sheriff shall enter the order into the Law Enforcement Data  System
and databases of the National Crime Information  Center upon receipt of a true copy of proof of
service. The sheriff shall provide the  petitioner with a true copy of any required proof of service.
Entry into the Law Enforcement Data System constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of
the existence of the order. Law enforcement agencies shall establish  procedures adequate to ensure
that an officer at the scene of an alleged violation of the order may be informed  of the existence
and terms of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any county or tribal land in this state.
(b) When a restraining order has been entered  into the Law Enforcement Data System and the
databases of the National Crime Information Center of the United States  Department of Justice
under paragraph (a) of this subsection, a county  sheriff shall cooperate with a request from a law
enforcement agency from any other jurisdiction to  verify the existence of the restraining order or
to transmit a copy of the order to the requesting jurisdiction.
(2)(a) A restraining order shall remain in effect until the order expires or is  terminated by court
order.
(b) When a restraining order has been entered under ORS 107.718, the restraining order  shall
not be terminated upon a motion for dismissal by the petitioner unless the motion is notarized.
(3) In any situation where  a restraining order described in subsection (1) of this section is ter-
minated before the expiration date, the clerk of the court shall immediately deliver a copy of the
termination order to the county sheriff with whom the original order was filed. Upon receipt  of the
termination order, the county sheriff shall promptly remove the original order from  the Law
Enforcement Data System and the databases of  the National Crime Information Center of the United
States Department of Justice.
(4) Pending a contempt hearing for alleged violation of  a restraining order issued under ORS
107.095 (1)(c) or (d), 107.716 or 107.718  or section 3 or 4  of this 2025 Act , a person arrested and
taken into custody pursuant to ORS 133.310 may be released  as provided in ORS 135.230 to 135.290.
Whenever a restraining order is issued under ORS  107.095 (1)(c) or (d), 107.716 or 107.718  or section
3 or 4 of this 2025 Act , the issuing court shall set a security amount for the violation of the order.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 107.755 is amended to read:
107.755. (1) Each judicial district shall:
(a) Provide a mediation orientation session for all parties in cases in  which child custody, par-
enting time or visitation is in dispute, and in any other domestic relations case  in which mediation
has been ordered. The  orientation session may be structured in any way the circuit court determines
best meets the needs of the parties. The orientation session should be designed to make the parties
aware of:
(A) What mediation is;
(B) Mediation options available to them; and
[7]
SB 389
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) The advantages and disadvantages of each method of dispute resolution.
(b) Except in matters tried under ORS 107.097 and  107.138 or upon a finding of good cause, re-
quire parties in all cases described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection to attend a mediation orien-
tation session prior to any judicial determination of the issues.
(c) Provide mediation under  ORS 107.755 to 107.795 in any case in which child custody, parent-
ing time and visitation are in dispute.
(d) Have developed a  plan that addresses domestic violence issues and other power imbalance
issues in the context of  mediation orientation sessions and mediation of any issue in accordance
with the following guidelines:
(A) All mediation programs and mediators must recognize that mediation is  not an appropriate
process for all cases and that agreement is not  necessarily the appropriate outcome of all mediation;
(B) Neither the existence of nor the provisions of a restraining order issued under ORS  107.718
may be mediated;
(C) All mediation programs and mediators must develop and implement:
(i) A screening and ongoing evaluation process of domestic violence issues for all mediation
cases;
(ii) A provision for opting out of mediation that allows a party to decline mediation after the
party has been informed of the advantages and disadvantages of mediation  or at any time during the
mediation; and
(iii) A set  of safety procedures intended to minimize the likelihood of intimidation or violence
in the orientation  session, during mediation or on the way in or out of the building in which the
orientation or mediation occurs;
(D) When a mediator explains the process to the parties, the  mediator shall include in the ex-
planation the disadvantages of mediation and the alternatives to mediation;
(E) All mediators shall obtain continuing education regarding domestic  violence and related is-
sues; and
(F) Mediation programs shall collect appropriate data. Mediation programs shall  be sensitive
to domestic violence issues when determining what data to collect.
(e) In developing the plan required by paragraph (d) of this  subsection, consult with one or more
of the following:
(A) A statewide or local multidisciplinary domestic violence coordinating council.
(B) A nonprofit private organization funded under ORS 409.292.
(2) Notwithstanding any other  provision of law, mediation under ORS 107.755 to 107.795, in-
cluding the mediation orientation session described in subsection (1)(a) of  this section, may not be
encouraged or provided in proceedings under ORS  30.866, 107.700 to 107.735, 124.005 to 124.040 or
163.738 or sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act .
(3) The court, as provided in  ORS 3.220, may make rules consistent with ORS 107.755 to 107.795
to govern the operation and procedure of mediation provided under this section.
(4) If a court provides mediation of financial issues, it  shall develop a list of mediators who meet
the minimum education and experience qualifications established by  rules adopted under ORS 1.002.
The rules must require demonstrated proficiency in mediation of  financial issues. Once the list is
developed, the judicial district shall maintain the  list. Mediation of financial issues is subject to the
plan developed under subsection  (1)(d) of this section and to the limitations imposed by subsection
(2) of this section.
(5) A circuit court may provide mediation in connection with  its exercise of conciliation juris-
[8]
SB 389
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
diction under ORS 107.510  to 107.610, but a circuit court need not provide conciliation services in
order to provide mediation under ORS 107.755 to 107.795.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 133.310 is amended to read:
133.310. (1) A peace  officer may arrest a person without a warrant if the officer has probable
cause to believe that the person has committed any of the following:
(a) A felony.
(b) A misdemeanor.
(c) An unclassified offense for which the maximum penalty allowed by law is equal to  or greater
than the maximum penalty allowed for a Class C misdemeanor.
(d) Any other crime committed in the officer’s presence.
(2) A peace officer may arrest a person without a warrant when the peace  officer is notified by
telegraph, telephone, radio  or other mode of communication by another peace officer of any state
that there exists a  duly issued warrant for the arrest of a person within the other peace officer’s
jurisdiction.
(3) A peace officer shall arrest and take into custody a person  without a warrant when the
peace officer has probable cause to believe that:
(a) There exists an order issued  pursuant to ORS 30.866, 107.095 (1)(c) or (d), 107.716, 107.718,
124.015, 124.020, 133.035, 163.738, 163.765, 163.767 or 419B.845 or section 3 or 4 of  this 2025 Act
restraining the person;
(b) A true copy of the order and proof of service on the person has been filed as  required in
ORS 107.720, 124.030, 133.035, 163.741, 163.773 or 419B.845; and
(c) The person to be arrested has violated the terms of that order.
(4) A peace officer shall arrest and take into custody a person without a warrant if:
(a) The person protected by a  foreign restraining order as defined by ORS 24.190 presents a
physical or electronic copy of the foreign restraining order to the officer and represents to the of-
ficer that the  order supplied is the most recent order in effect between the parties and that the
person restrained by the order has been  personally served with a copy of the order or has actual
notice of the order; and
(b) The peace officer has probable cause to believe that the person  to be arrested has violated
the terms of the foreign restraining order.
(5) A peace officer shall arrest and take into custody a person without a warrant if:
(a) A foreign restraining order as defined by ORS 24.190 has been filed with a court or  has been
entered into the Law Enforcement Data System or in the databases of the National  Crime Informa-
tion Center of the United States Department of Justice; and
(b) The peace officer has probable cause to believe that the person  to be arrested has violated
the terms of the foreign restraining order.
(6) A peace officer shall arrest and take into custody a person without a warrant  if the peace
officer has probable cause to believe:
(a) The person has been charged with an offense and is presently released as to  that charge
under ORS 135.230 to 135.290; and
(b) The person has failed to comply with a no contact condition of the release agreement.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 133.381 is amended to read:
133.381. (1) When a peace officer  arrests a person pursuant to ORS 133.310 (3) or pursuant to
a warrant issued under ORS 33.075 by a court or judicial officer for the arrest of a person charged
with contempt for violating an order issued under ORS 107.095 (1)(c) or (d),  107.716, 107.718, 124.015,
[9]
SB 389
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
124.020, 163.765 or 163.767 or section 3 or 4 of this  2025 Act , if the person is arrested in a county
other than that in which the warrant or order was originally issued, the peace officer shall take  the
person before a magistrate as provided in  ORS 133.450. If it becomes necessary to take the arrested
person to  the county in which the warrant or order was originally issued, the costs of such trans-
portation shall be paid by that county.
(2) If a person arrested for the reasons described  in subsection (1) of this section is subsequently
found subject to the imposition of  sanctions for contempt, the court, in addition to any other sanc-
tion it may impose, may order the person  to repay a county all costs of transportation incurred by
the county pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 147.015 is amended to read:
147.015. (1) A person is eligible for an award of compensation under ORS 147.005 to 147.367 if:
(a) The person is a victim, or is a  survivor or dependent of a deceased victim, of a compensable
crime that has resulted in or may result in a compensable loss;
(b) The appropriate law enforcement officials were notified of the  perpetration of the crime
allegedly causing the death or injury  to the victim, unless the Department of Justice finds that,
notwithstanding the failure of notification, the applicant acted reasonably under the circumstances;
(c) The application for compensation is not the result of collusion  between the applicant and the
assailant of the victim;
(d) The department determines that the victim acted  reasonably with respect to the incident
causing the death or injury to the victim, taking into account the specific  situation of the victim
and what a reasonable action would be for a person in the victim’s circumstances; and
(e) The application for an award of  compensation under ORS 147.005 to 147.367 is filed with the
department:
(A) Within one year of the date of the injury to the victim; or
(B) Within such further extension of time as the department, for good cause shown, allows.
(2) The requirement under subsection (1)(b) of this section to notify  the appropriate law
enforcement officials of the perpetration of the crime is satisfied if:
(a) As a result of the compensable crime for which the victim or applicant  is applying for com-
pensation, the victim or applicant obtained:
(A) A temporary or permanent stalking protective order under ORS 30.866 or 163.730 to  163.750;
(B) A sexual abuse restraining order under ORS 163.760 to 163.777;
(C) An abuse prevention order under ORS 107.700 to 107.735 or 124.005 to 124.040;
(D) A harassment protective order under sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act;
[(D)] (E) Any other  abuse prevention order or no contact order issued by a state, local, tribal
or federal court; or
[(E)] (F) A medical  assessment, as defined in ORS 147.395, for sexual assault, or any other
forensic exam or medical assessment;
(b) A health  provider, tribal health provider, student health provider or community mental
health provider certifies that the victim reported the crime to the provider; or
(c) The  victim provides to the department documentation that qualifies as law enforcement no-
tification under the rules of the department.
(3) The department shall adopt rules establishing:
(a) A limited counseling award for victims who apply for an award of compensation  but who do
not otherwise qualify under the eligibility requirements of this section.
(b) The types  of documentation that qualify as notification to the appropriate law enforcement
[10]
SB 389
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
officials of the perpetration of the crime as described in subsection (2)(c) of this section.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 163.715 is amended to read:
163.715. (1)  A person commits the crime of unlawful use of a global positioning system device
if the person knowingly affixes a global  positioning system device to a motor vehicle without con-
sent of the owner of the motor vehicle.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, unlawful use of a global positioning
system device is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Unlawful use of a global positioning system device is a Class C  felony if, at the time of the
offense, the person:
(A) Has been previously convicted of stalking under  ORS 163.732, violating a court’s stalking
order under ORS 163.750 or committing an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction; or
(B) Is the  subject of a citation issued under ORS 163.735, an order issued under ORS 30.866,
107.700 to 107.735 or 163.738 or sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act  or another court  order prohibiting
the person from contacting another person.
(3) This section does not apply to:
(a) A police officer who affixes a global positioning system device to a motor vehicle pursuant
to a warrant or court order; or
(b) A person who affixes a global positioning system device to a motor  vehicle operated by a
motor carrier.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Global positioning system device” means an electronic device that permits the tracking of
a person or object by means of global positioning system coordinates.
(b) “Motor carrier” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(c) “Police officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 133.525.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 659A.270 is amended to read:
659A.270. As used in ORS 659A.270 to 659A.285:
(1) “Covered employer” means an employer who employs six  or more individuals in the State
of Oregon for each working day during each of 20 or more  calendar workweeks in the year in which
an eligible employee takes leave to address domestic violence, harassment, sexual assault, bias or
stalking, or in the year immediately preceding the year in  which an eligible employee takes leave
to address domestic violence, harassment, sexual assault, bias or stalking.
(2) “Eligible employee” means an employee who  is a victim of domestic violence, harassment,
sexual assault, bias or stalking or is the  parent or guardian of a minor child or dependent who is
a victim of domestic violence, harassment, sexual assault, bias or stalking.
(3) “Protective order” means  an order authorized by ORS 30.866, 107.095 (1)(c), 107.700 to
107.735, 124.005 to 124.040, 163.730  to 163.750 or 163.760 to 163.777 or sections 1 to 9 of this 2025
Act or any other order that restrains an individual from contact with  an eligible employee or the
employee’s minor child or dependent.
(4) “Victim of bias” means:
(a) An individual who has been a victim of a bias crime as defined in ORS 147.380; or
(b) Any other individual designated as a victim of bias by rule adopted under ORS 659A.805.
(5) “Victim of domestic violence” means:
(a) An individual who has been a victim of abuse, as defined in ORS 107.705; or
(b) Any other individual designated as  a victim of domestic violence by rule adopted under ORS
659A.805.
[11]
SB 389
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) “Victim of harassment” means:
(a) An individual against whom harassment has been committed as described in ORS 166.065.
(b) Any  other individual designated as a victim of harassment by rule adopted under ORS
659A.805.
(7) “Victim of sexual assault” means:
(a) An individual against  whom a sexual offense has been committed as described in ORS 163.305
to 163.467, 163.472 or 163.525; or
(b) Any other  individual designated as a victim of sexual assault by rule adopted under ORS
659A.805.
(8) “Victim of stalking” means:
(a) An individual against whom stalking has been committed as described in ORS 163.732;
(b) An individual designated as a victim of stalking by rule adopted under ORS 659A.805; or
(c) An individual who  has obtained a court’s stalking protective order or a temporary court’s
stalking protective order under ORS 30.866.
(9) “Victim services provider” means a  prosecutor-based victim assistance program or a
nonprofit program offering  safety planning, counseling, support or advocacy related to domestic vi-
olence, harassment, sexual assault, bias or stalking.
SECTION 20.
 Section 2, chapter 204,  Oregon Laws 2005, as amended by section 359, chapter
70, Oregon Laws 2007, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) In carrying out the provisions of section 2, chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987, the Public
Utility Commission shall adopt rules to prohibit the termination of local exchange residential service
if the  termination would significantly endanger a customer, or a person in the household of the
customer, who is:
(a) At risk of domestic violence, as defined in ORS 135.230;
(b) At risk of unwanted sexual contact, as defined in ORS 163.305;
(c) A person with a disability, as defined  in ORS 124.005, who is at risk of abuse, as defined in
ORS 124.005 (1)(a), (d) or (e);
(d) An elderly  person, as defined in ORS 124.005, who is at risk of abuse, as defined in ORS
124.005 (1)(a), (d) or (e); or
(e) A victim of stalking, as described in ORS 163.732.
(2) A customer may establish that termination of  local exchange residential service would sig-
nificantly endanger the customer, or a person in the household of the  customer, by providing a
telecommunications public utility with an affidavit signed by the customer  stating that termination
would place the customer, or a  person in the household of the customer, at significant risk of do-
mestic violence, as  defined in ORS 135.230, or of unwanted sexual contact, as defined in ORS
163.305. The customer must  attach to the affidavit a copy of an order issued under ORS 30.866,
107.700 to 107.735, 124.005 to 124.040  or 163.738 or sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act  that restrains
another person from contact with the customer, or a person in the household of the  customer, or a
copy of any other court order that restrains another person from  contact with the customer, or a
person in the household of the customer, by reason of a risk described in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion or by reason of stalking.
(3) The commission shall require  that each telecommunications public utility establish proce-
dures for submitting and receiving affidavits under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) This section does not apply to termination of any telecommunication  service other than local
exchange residential service.
[12]
SB 389
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
(5) A customer submitting an affidavit as  provided by subsection (2) of this section is not ex-
cused from paying for telecommunication service. Customers are required to enter into a reasonable
payment agreement with the telecommunications public utility if an overdue balance exists. Local
exchange residential service may be terminated if a customer refuses to enter into or fails to abide
by the terms of a reasonable payment agreement.
(6) Nothing in this section prevents the  termination of local exchange residential service if the
telecommunications public utility providing the service does not have  the technical ability to ter-
minate toll telecommunication service without also terminating local exchange residential service.
[13]