Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt  rules to require behavioral health
providers that are certified or licensed by the authority to:
(1) Include in an initial assessment for behavioral health services a screening to deter-
mine if an individual has experienced racial trauma; and
(2) If the individual is  determined to have experienced racial trauma, connect the indi-
vidual with behavioral health services that are culturally specific to the racial  trauma expe-
rienced.
SECTION 2. (1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2445