Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Corrections shall establish and update regularly a com-
prehensive list of:
(1) Each undocumented individual who has been charged with or  convicted of a crime in
this state.
(2) Each crime for which an undocumented individual has been charged or convicted.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2971