Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2, 3 and 4  of this 2017 Act are added to and made a part of the
Oregon Vehicle Code.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Transportation  shall establish a Support Our Troops
registration plate program to issue special registration plates called “Support  Our Troops
registration plates” upon request to owners of motor vehicles registered under ORS  803.420
(1). In addition, the department may adopt rules for  issuance of Support Our Troops regis-
tration plates for vehicles not registered under ORS 803.420 (1).
(2) In addition to any other  fee authorized by law, for each Support Our Troops regis-
tration plate issued under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall collect a  sur-
charge of $40 per year of  registration, payable when the plate is issued and upon each
subsequent renewal of registration of a vehicle bearing the plate. The department shall  dis-
tribute the surcharge as provided in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 803.530, Support Our Troops registration plates may be trans-
ferred from vehicle to  vehicle if the department stops issuing the plates, as long as the plates
are not so old, damaged, mutilated or otherwise rendered illegible  as to be not useful for
purposes of identification.
SECTION 3. Moneys from the surcharge imposed by section 2 of this 2017  Act shall be
transferred to the Oregon Veterans’ Home Account created under  ORS 408.368, after de-
duction of the cost of administration of the Support Our  Troops registration plate program,
including but not limited  to the costs of collecting the Support Our Troops registration plate
surcharge and  transferring Support Our Troops registration plates that are above the
normal costs of issuing, renewing and transferring registration plates in the normal course
of business of the Department of Transportation.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Department of Transportation, after consultation with the  Depart-
ment of  Veterans’ Affairs, shall design the Support Our Troops registration plates issued
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1055
SB 480
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Except as otherwise required by subsection (1) of this section, Support  Our Troops
registration plates shall comply with the requirements of ORS 803.535.
SECTION 5. (1) There is appropriated to the Department of Transportation,  for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for the
purpose of initiating the Support Our Troops registration plate program established under
section 2 of this 2017 Act, including but not limited to the Support  Our Troops registration
plate design, computer programming and production setup. Any portion of the  appropriation
not used for initiating the Support Our Troops registration plate program shall be  trans-
ferred to the account described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding section 3 of this  2017 Act, after deduction of the cost of adminis-
tration of the Support Our Troops registration plate program, as  described in section 3 of
this 2017 Act, the department shall transfer the moneys from the surcharge  imposed by
section 2 of this 2017 Act to an account in the General Fund until sufficient funds  have ac-
cumulated for the purpose described in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) When the department determines that moneys in sufficient amount are available in
the account described in subsection (2) of this  section, but no later than June 30, 2019, the
department shall reimburse the General  Fund, without interest, in an amount equal to the
amount appropriated from the General Fund under subsection (1) of this section. The moneys
used to reimburse the General Fund under this  subsection may not be considered a budget
item on which a limitation is otherwise  fixed by law, but shall be in addition to any specific
biennial appropriation or amount authorized to be expended from  continuously appropriated
moneys for any biennial period.
(4) Any moneys remaining in  the account described in subsection (2) of this section after
the reimbursement required under subsection (3) of this section shall be  transferred to the
Oregon Veterans’ Home Account as provided in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6.
This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]