Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. The Oregon Health Authority shall develop a methodology for calculating a
coordinated care organization’s  global budget that takes into consideration a coordinated
care organization’s investments in:
(1) Improving health outcomes for the coordinated care organization’s members;
(2) Improving the quality of and access to care;
(3) Reducing the delivery of inefficient and ineffectual care; and
(4) Improving community health.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2546