Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development  Department shall conduct a study of high
technology in Oregon. The  department shall submit a report of the study to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to economic development in the  manner
provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3383