Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Corrections shall  conduct a study on the provision of
treatment services  to persons in the custody of the department and present the results of
the study, along with any recommended legislative changes, in  a report to the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary in the  manner provided under
ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2020.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1505