Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 678.010 to
678.410.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon State Board of Nursing shall adopt rules to require a
student-to-faculty ratio of at least  10 students to one faculty member in the clinical compo-
nents of nursing education programs. The board may adopt rules to  allow a ratio of up to
15 students to one faculty member in circumstances determined by the board.
(2) The ratios described in  subsection (1) of this section do not apply to simulation ex-
periences in nursing education programs.
SECTION 3. Section 2  of this 2025 Act applies a nursing education program’s clinical
component beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 914