Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ELK DAMAGE PREVENTION AND COMPENSATION PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.
As used in this section and sections 2 and 3 of this 2024 Act:
(1) “Best preventive measures” has the meaning given that term  in rule by the State
Department of Agriculture.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 69
HB 4061
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) “Eligible damage”:
(a) Means elk  damage on eligible land to standing or harvested agricultural crops, in-
cluding livestock forage, or to infrastructure, including fences or agricultural  equipment,
that has not been covered by insurance.
(b) May include the cost of third-party assessment of the damage.
(3) “Eligible land” means land:
(a) That is privately owned.
(b) That is not enrolled in a conservation reserve program.
(c) That is in a pilot program area, as determined under section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(d) For which no fee is charged for hunting on the land.
(4) “Eligible person” means a person who:
(a) Lives on, leases or works eligible land.
(b) Derives $10,000 or more per year, on average, from producing agricultural  crops on
the eligible land.
(c) Owns crops or infrastructure that is damaged by elk.
(5) “Eligible preventive measure” means a measure that is reasonably expected to  reduce
elk damage on eligible land, including:
(a) Repellants.
(b) Temporary or permanent barriers around small areas.
(c) Permanent barriers, such as fencing, around large areas.
(d) Reasonable time spent on nonlethal deterrence activities such as hazing, but not in-
cluding labor to build barriers.
SECTION 2.
(1) The State Department of Agriculture  shall establish and implement an
elk damage prevention and compensation pilot program.
(2) Under the pilot program, the department shall use available moneys in the Elk Dam-
age Prevention and Compensation Fund established under section 4 of this 2024  Act to pro-
vide compensation  for eligible damages or eligible preventive measures to eligible persons
who suffer loss due to elk damage.
(3) In consultation with the State Department of Fish  and Wildlife, the State Department
of Agriculture shall select, as  two pilot program areas, one area east of the Cascade Moun-
tains and one area west of the Cascade Mountains after considering, for the areas:
(a) The history of elk damage to agriculture.
(b) The timing of elk damage, including throughout the year or seasonally.
(c) Past actions by agencies and landowners to alleviate elk damage.
(d) Elk population sizes and distribution.
(e) How diverse agricultural crop types are.
(4) Under the pilot program, the department may  award compensation for eligible dam-
ages or eligible preventive measures to an eligible  person who demonstrates that the eligible
person:
(a) Has previously used best preventive  measures to prevent elk damage on the eligible
land.
(b) Has not intentionally or unreasonably  created circumstances that attract elk to the
eligible land or otherwise encourage elk damage on the eligible land.
SECTION 3.
To implement the elk damage and compensation pilot program described in
section 2 of this 2024 Act, the State Department of Agriculture shall  adopt rules to establish:
[2]
HB 4061
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) A process for enrolling in, and periodically renewing enrollment in,  the pilot program
that includes verification of whether:
(a) The person qualifies as an eligible person.
(b) The person has implemented best preventive measures on the eligible land.
(c) The person has intentionally or unreasonably created  circumstances that attract elk
to the eligible land or otherwise encourage elk damage on the eligible land.
(2) A process for submitting claims, including evidence of eligible damage that includes
a finding by an  agent of the department, an agent of the United States Department of Agri-
culture or a crop adjuster licensed under ORS 744.531 (3) that elk caused  or probably caused
the eligible damage.
(3) A process for assessing claims that describes:
(a) How the State Department of Agriculture will assess the cost of eligible damage.
(b) The role and selection of professional damage assessors.
(c) Whether, or under what circumstances, an  eligible person may be reimbursed for the
cost of third-party damage assessment as part of compensation for eligible damages.
(4) Methods for determining:
(a) Compensation amounts for eligible damage, such as a  net loss in production at the
end of a growing season relative to regional averages and anticipated loss rates.
(b) Compensation amounts for reasonable  time spent on nonlethal elk deterrence activ-
ities such as hazing.
(c) How to reduce  the amount of a claim that has been partially compensated by an in-
surance company.
(d) Maximum amounts for compensation for eligible damages and  eligible preventive
measures.
(5) A process for prioritizing awards of compensation to eligible persons who:
(a) Have made significant efforts to prevent or mitigate elk damage.
(b) Allow persons licensed by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife to take elk  on
the property that is affected by the elk damage.
(6) A definition  of the term “best preventive measures” that lists ways to deter elk
damage, including the provision of hunting access, either to the public or to individuals by
permission, for lethal take of elk, consistent with applicable laws and rules.
(7) The terms  for awarding compensation for large area barriers, such as fencing, in-
cluding requiring:
(a) Matching funds from the eligible person.
(b) That the eligible  person demonstrate previous use of repellants, hazing and temporary
barriers and that those measures did not adequately prevent elk damage.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Elk Damage Prevention and Compensation Fund is  established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Elk Damage Prevention and  Compensation Fund consists of moneys appropriated
by the Legislative Assembly for  deposit in the fund, grant funds received by the State De-
partment of Agriculture, and other moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or  transferred
to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
(3) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the department for purposes
described in section 2 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) Sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act are repealed on January 2, 2030.
[3]
HB 4061
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Elk Damage Prevention and Compensation Fund es-
tablished under section 4 of this 2024 Act  that are unexpended and unobligated on the date
specified in subsection (1) of this section shall revert to the General Fund.
REPORTS
SECTION 6.
As soon as there is sufficient data and no later than September 15, 2028:
(1) The State Department of Agriculture shall report,  in the manner prescribed in ORS
192.245, to committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural
resources on the elk damage prevention and compensation  pilot program described in section
2 of this 2024 Act. The report must include:
(a) A summary of pilot program descriptive statistics, including but not limited to:
(A) The number of persons participating in the pilot program.
(B) The types and quantities of damage reported under the pilot program.
(C) The amounts awarded under the pilot program.
(b) An evaluation of successes and challenges in administering the pilot program.
(c) A proposal for a permanent elk damage and compensation program.
(d) An evaluation of the benefits  and drawbacks of transitioning to a program that is
partially administered by counties.
(2) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall report, in the manner prescribed in
ORS 192.245, to committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to
natural resources on the pilot program. The report must:
(a) Compare the occurrence of elk damage inside and outside,  and over time within, the
pilot program areas.
(b) Analyze changes to elk hunting opportunities within the pilot program areas.
(c) Summarize information on elk population sizes throughout this state.
(d) Summarize any available information on elk distribution throughout this state.
(e) Describe the types of data that would assist with better understanding elk distribution
throughout this state and how the data might be obtained.
APPROPRIATION
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount of  $______, for deposit in the Elk Damage Prevention and
Compensation Fund established by section 4  of this 2024 Act, to be expended as described in
section 4 of this 2024 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 8. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express  any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
[4]
HB 4061
1
2
3
SECTION 9.
This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]