Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 3, chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) Section 2 [ of this 2022 Act ], chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2022,  applies  to State School
Fund and  Student Investment Account distributions and to High School Graduation and College and
Career Readiness Fund apportionments made for the 2021-2022, 2022-2023, 2023-2024 , [ and]
2024-2025, 2025-2026, 2026-2027, 2027-2028 and 2028-2029 school years.
(2) The Department of Education shall award grants under section 2 [ of this 2022 Act ], chapter
43, Oregon Laws 2022,  to qualifying school districts for the  2021-2022, 2022-2023, 2023-2024, [ and]
2024-2025, 2025-2026, 2026-2027, 2027-2028 and 2028-2029 school years.
SECTION 2.  Section 7, chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  Sections 2 and  4 [ of this 2022 Act ], chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2022,  are repealed on
[July 1, 2025 ] September 30, 2029 .
SECTION 3.  Section 8, chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) On  [ July 1, 2025 ] September 30, 2029 , the School Stabilization Subaccount for
Wildfire-impacted School Districts established under section 4 [ of this 2022 Act ], chapter 43, Oregon
Laws 2022, is abolished.
(2) Any moneys remaining  in the School Stabilization Subaccount for Wildfire-impacted School
Districts on [ July 1, 2025 ] September 30, 2029 , shall be transferred to the Statewide Education In-
itiatives Account.
SECTION 4. In addition to the uses of the Statewide Education Initiatives Account that
are authorized under ORS  327.254, the Department of Education shall transfer $38,500,000
from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account to the  School Stabilization Subaccount for
Wildfire-impacted School Districts established  under section 4, chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2022,
for the purpose of awarding grants as provided by section 2, chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2022.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 979
HB 3149
1
2
July 1, 2025.
[2]