Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 497.
SECTION 2. The State Fish and Wildlife Commission:
(1) Shall require an agent described in ORS 497.022 to  provide a paper copy of any license,
tag or permit issued by the commission upon request by a  purchaser of the license, tag or
permit.
(2) May not require a person to participate  in an electronic licensing system in order to
purchase or use any license, tag or permit issued by the commission.
SECTION 3.  ORS 497.022 is amended to read:
497.022. (1) The State Fish  and Wildlife Commission may appoint agents to issue any of the li-
censes, tags or permits the commission is authorized  by law to issue. The commission shall prescribe
the procedure for the issuance of the licenses, tags and  permits. Agents of the commission shall is-
sue licenses, tags and permits in accordance with the prescribed procedure and  shall charge and
collect the fees prescribed by law for the licenses, tags and permits.
(2)(a) As part of the fees  prescribed in the fee schedule under ORS 497.061 and in addition to
fees otherwise prescribed by law for the  issuance of a license, tag or permit, the issuing agent shall
charge and collect:
(A) For each resident  annual sportspac license issued pursuant to ORS 497.132 (3)(a) and (4)(a),
$5.
(B) For each nonresident annual hunting license issued pursuant to ORS 497.102, $10.
(C) For each nonresident annual deer tag, nonresident  annual elk tag, nonresident annual black
bear tag, nonresident annual mountain goat tag, nonresident annual mountain  sheep tag and non-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 920
SB 461
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
resident annual antelope tag issued pursuant to ORS 497.112 (1), $10.
(D) For any other license, tag or permit, $2 each.
(b) If the agent is a county clerk, the agent shall deposit the agent fees provided for  in this
section in the general fund of the county for which the agent is the clerk. If the agent is an em-
ployee of the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, the agent fees shall be deposited in the  State
Wildlife Fund. Agents  other than county clerks or department employees who issue licenses without
the use of  a state computerized licensing system may retain the agent fees for their license tag or
permit issuance services. Agents other than county clerks or department employees who issue  li-
censes,  tags  or permits using a state computerized licensing system may retain a portion of the
agent fees in not less than the following amounts:
(A) For each resident  annual sportspac license issued pursuant to ORS 497.132 (3)(a) and (4)(a),
$2.50.
(B) For each nonresident annual hunting license issued pursuant to ORS 497.102, $7.50.
(C) For each nonresident annual deer tag, nonresident  annual elk tag, nonresident annual black
bear tag, nonresident annual mountain goat tag, nonresident annual mountain  sheep tag and non-
resident annual antelope tag issued pursuant to ORS 497.112 (1), $7.50.
(D) For any other license, tag or  permit, or for other provided services, as may be specified by
contract between the department and the agent for license, tag or permit issuance service  or other
services performed by the agent, [ $1] $2 each.
(3) If the commission finds that an agent appointed pursuant to this section has violated any of
the provisions of law or the procedures  prescribed by the commission for the issuance of licenses,
tags or permits or the collection and disposition of fees  from licenses, tags or permits, the commis-
sion may revoke the authority of the agent to  issue licenses, tags and permits, or may suspend the
authority of the agent for such time as the commission considers appropriate.
[2]