Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Housing and Community  Services Department shall make one or
more grants to nonprofit institutions to  establish a revolving loan fund that will allow a
first-time home buyer who is purchasing a home, including a share of  a cooperative or a
condominium unit, in which the purchaser’s equity will be limited, to  establish equity at a
faster rate while making monthly payments similar to those described in  subsection (4)(a)(A)
of this subsection.
(2) To be eligible for a grant  under this section, the nonprofit institution must be a
community development financial institution that operates statewide to  support investment
in affordable housing.
(3) Loans made from the loan fund must be used  for the purchase of a dwelling that is
subject to an affordability restriction, such as a  restriction as described in ORS 456.270 to
456.295, that:
(a) Has the effect of limiting the purchaser’s ability to gain  equity from the appreciation
of the dwelling’s value; and
(b) Requires that the purchaser be a low income household as defined in ORS 456.270.
(4) Loans made from the loan fund must:
(a) Have a term of 20 years or less; and
(b) Have a fixed interest rate that is not more than the greater of:
(A) The rate that would allow monthly amortized  principal and interest payments under
the term of the loan to be the amount that  would result from a 30-year fixed-rate amortized
mortgage at  the national current average rate as published by a reputable financial source;
or
(B) 0.5 percent.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3587
SB 937
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, to make grants  under section 1
of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 4. On or before September 15, 2024, and on or before September  15, 2026, the
Housing and Community Services Department shall provide a report  to an appropriate in-
terim committee of the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 on the
use of the loan funds described in section 1 of  this 2023 Act as reported to the department
by the grantees.
SECTION 5.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[2]