Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in  this section, “Foster Youth Promise student” means a student
enrolled in a community college or a public university listed  in ORS 352.002 who is entitled
to a waiver of all tuition and fees under ORS 350.300.
(2) The  Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall develop and implement a pilot
program to assist Foster  Youth Promise students transitioning from a community college
to a public university.
(3) The pilot program must:
(a) Be implemented in each community  college and public university that has existing
support programs for Foster Youth Promise students; and
(b) Develop and implement additional support programs for Foster  Youth Promise stu-
dents, including but not limited to:
(A) Facilitating public university orientations tailored to Foster Youth Promise students;
(B) Developing mentorship programs  for Foster Youth Promise students following
matriculation into a public university;
(C) Encouraging faculty at public universities to identify opportunities for  Foster Youth
Promise students to assist with research and other special projects; and
(D) Developing other  types of programs and strategies to assist Foster Youth Promise
students.
(4) The commission shall:
(a) Analyze  the existing support programs offered to Foster Youth Promise students by
community colleges and public universities;
(b) Coordinate alignment of the existing support programs  offered to Foster Youth
Promise students between community colleges and public universities; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2721
SB 551
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Coordinate private fund-raising efforts to provide Foster Youth Promise students with
additional financial support.
SECTION 2. The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall report on the efficacy
of the pilot program established under section 1 of this  2017 Act, in the manner provided in
ORS 192.245, to the committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to higher education at
least once during each of  five consecutive regular sessions of the Legislative Assembly, be-
ginning with the 2018 regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 3. (1) As used  in this section and section 4 of this 2017 Act, “Foster Youth
Promise student” has the meaning given that term in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The Legislative Assembly finds that assisting Foster Youth  Promise students who
intend to transition from a community college to a  public university as part of the pilot
program established by section 1 of this 2017 Act will:
(a) Help Foster Youth Promise students succeed in their educational endeavors;
(b) Positively  impact the educational and career prospects of both current and future
Foster Youth Promise students; and
(c) Strengthen the efficacy of the tuition waiver provided to current and  former foster
youth under ORS 350.300.
(3) The  factors described in subsection (2) of this section will encourage and promote
economic development within the State of Oregon, and issuance of  lottery bonds to finance
the pilot program is therefore an appropriate use of  state lottery funds under Article XV,
section 4, of the Oregon Constitution, and ORS 461.510.
(4) At the request of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, the State Treasurer
is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, in an amount not to exceed $____ million, for  the purpose described
in subsection (5) of this section,  plus an additional amount to be estimated by the State
Treasurer for payment of bond-related costs incurred by the commission and  the State
Treasurer.
(5) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to this section  must be deposited in the
Foster Youth Promise Support Program Fund established in section 4 of  this 2017 Act in an
amount sufficient to  provide $___ million in net proceeds and interest earnings for disburse-
ment to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission to fund programs to  assist Foster
Youth Promise students transitioning from community colleges to public universities as  part
of the pilot program established under section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(6) Bond-related costs incurred  by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission and
the State Treasurer for the lottery bonds authorized by this section must be  paid from the
gross proceeds of the lottery  bonds and from allocations for the purposes of ORS 286A.576
(1)(c).
SECTION 4.
(1) The Foster Youth Promise Support Program Fund is  established, sepa-
rate and distinct from the General Fund. The  moneys in the Foster Youth Promise Support
Program Fund and the  interest earnings on moneys in the fund are continuously appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission for the purposes described in sub-
section (2) of this section. The fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund under  section
3 of this 2017 Act, and may include other fees, revenues or other  income transferred into the
fund by the Legislative Assembly for payment of costs incurred to establish the Foster Youth
Promise Support Program Fund.
[2]
SB 551
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
(2) Moneys in the fund are available for immediate distribution to the  Higher Education
Coordinating Commission to:
(a) Pay the costs incurred  to fund programs to assist Foster Youth Promise students
transitioning from community  colleges to public universities as part of the pilot program
established under section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(b) Pay bond-related costs, as defined in ORS 286A.560.
SECTION 5.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]