Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TRANSMISSION SYSTEM PLANS
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2021 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
757.
SECTION 2. The Public Utility Commission shall periodically  convene workshops for the
purpose of helping electric companies as defined in ORS  757.600, consumer-owned utilities as
defined in ORS 757.600 and operators of electrical distribution systems to develop and share
information for the identification, adoption and carrying  out of best practices regarding
wildfires, including, but not limited to, risk-based wildfire protection and risk-based wildfire
mitigation procedures and standards.
SECTION 3. (1) As used  in this section, “electric company” has the meaning given that
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 467
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
term in ORS 757.600.
(2) An electric  company must have and operate in compliance with a risk-based wildfire
protection plan that is based  on best practices recommended by the Public Utility Commis-
sion and has been evaluated by the commission. The plan  must be designed to protect public
safety, reduce risk to electric  company customers and promote electrical system resilience
to wildfire damage.
(3) An electric company shall regularly update  a risk-based wildfire protection plan on a
schedule determined by the commission. The plan must, at a minimum:
(a) Identify areas within the service  territory of the electric company that are subject
to a heightened risk of wildfire.
(b) Identify a means for mitigating wildfire  risk that is cost effective and reflects a rea-
sonable balancing of mitigation costs with the resulting reduction of wildfire risk.
(c) Identify preventive actions and programs that the electric  company will carry out to
minimize the risk of company facilities causing a wildfire.
(d) Identify a protocol for the deenergizing of power lines and adjusting of power system
operations to mitigate wildfires, promote the safety of the public and  first responders and
preserve health and communication infrastructure.
(e) Describe the procedures, standards and time frames that the electric  company will
use to inspect company infrastructure in areas that the  company identifies under paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(f) Describe the procedures, standards and time frames that the  electric company will
use to carry out vegetation management in areas that the  company identifies under para-
graph (a) of this subsection.
(g) Identify the development, implementation and administration costs for the plan.
(h) Identify the community outreach and public awareness efforts that the electric com-
pany will use before, during and after a wildfire season.
(4) The commission, in consultation with the State Forestry Department and  local
emergency services agencies, shall evaluate a risk-based wildfire  protection plan that an
electric company submits under this section. The commission shall:
(a) Approve the submitted plan; or
(b) Disapprove the submitted plan and inform the electric company of the modifications
necessary to obtain approval.
(5) The commission shall adopt rules for the implementation of  this section. The rules
may include, but need not be limited to, procedures  and standards regarding vegetation
management, pole materials, circuitry and monitoring systems.
(6) Nothing in this section prohibits the recovery of costs deferred under ORS 757.259.
SECTION 4.
(1) As used in this section, “consumer-owned utility” and “governing  body”
have the meanings given those terms in ORS 757.600.
(2) A  consumer-owned utility must have and operate in compliance with a risk-based
wildfire mitigation plan approved by the governing body of the utility.  The plan must be de-
signed to protect public safety, reduce risk to utility customers and promote electrical  sys-
tem resilience to wildfire damage.
(3) The consumer-owned utility shall regularly update the  risk-based wildfire mitigation
plan on a schedule the governing body deems consistent with prudent utility practices.
(4) A consumer-owned utility shall conduct  a wildfire risk assessment of utility facilities.
[2]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
The utility shall review and revise the assessment on a schedule  the governing body deems
consistent with prudent utility practices.
(5) A consumer-owned utility shall submit a copy of the risk-based  wildfire mitigation
plan approved by the utility governing body to the Public Utility Commission to facilitate
commission functions regarding statewide wildfire  mitigation planning and wildfire
preparedness.
SECTION 5.
An electric company shall submit the first risk-based wildfire protection plan
required of the company under section 3 of this 2021 Act for Public Utility  Commission
evaluation no later than December 31, 2022.
SECTION 6. A consumer-owned utility shall submit the first  risk-based wildfire miti-
gation plan required under section 4 of this 2021 Act to the utility  governing body no later
than December 31, 2023.
INSURERS
SECTION 7.  (1) Issuers of property insurance policies may adopt coverage provisions and
underwriting standards to encourage property protection approaches that:
(a) Harden structures against wildfire damage;
(b) Provide for the establishment and maintenance of defensible spaces;
(c) Create access for emergency vehicles responding to wildfires; or
(d) Create wildfire evacuation routes.
(2) Issuers of property insurance policies may use maps and data developed by  the State
Forestry Department or the State Fire Marshal for the purpose  of determining terms and
conditions of the policies.
(3) The Department of Consumer  and Business Services may work with the State Fire
Marshal and issuers of property insurance policies to develop  property protection approaches
reflecting best practices for wildfire risk mitigation.
DEFENSIBLE SPACE
SECTION 8.
The State Forestry Department shall oversee the development and mainte-
nance of a  comprehensive statewide map of wildfire risk. The map must be sufficiently de-
tailed to allow the assessment of wildfire risk at  the property-ownership level. The
department shall collaborate with the  Department of Land Conservation and Development,
the State Fire Marshal,  other state and local governments and officials, other public bodies,
insurance companies and any other information sources that the State Forestry Department
deems appropriate to develop and  maintain the map. The State Forestry Department shall
make the map described in this section accessible to the public in electronic form.
SECTION 9. (1) The State Fire Marshal shall establish minimum defensible space re-
quirements for wildfire risk reduction on lands in areas identified on the  map described in
section 8 of this 2021 Act as  being susceptible to wildfire. The State Fire Marshal may es-
tablish different  minimum defensible space requirements for homes and infrastructure on
different types of land. Subject to additional  local requirements, a minimum defensible space
requirement that the State Fire Marshal establishes  for a type of land shall apply statewide
for all lands of that type  that are in areas identified as susceptible to wildfire. Unless the
[3]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
State Fire Marshal finds good reason to impose different requirements,  the State Fire Mar-
shal shall adopt requirements that are consistent with defensible space requirements set
forth in International Wildland-Urban Interface Code standards.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection or subsection (3) of  this section, the
State Fire Marshal may administer and enforce the minimum defensible space requirements
established under subsection (1)  of this section that are applicable to the lands within the
jurisdiction of a local government. A local government  may contract with the State Fire
Marshal for the  local government to administer and enforce the minimum defensible space
requirements established by the State Fire Marshal within the jurisdiction of the local gov-
ernment.
(3) A local government may adopt and  enforce local requirements for defensible space
on lands that are greater than the minimum defensible space requirements established by
the State Fire Marshal. Any local  requirements that a local government adopts for defensible
space must  be consistent with defensible space requirements set forth in International
Wildland-Urban Interface Code standards. If a local government adopts  local requirements
under this subsection, within the jurisdiction of the local government the State Fire  Marshal
may administer and enforce the minimum defensible space  requirements established by the
State Fire Marshal under subsection (1) of this section and the local government may enforce
requirements adopted under this subsection that  are greater than the minimum defensible
space requirements  established by the State Fire Marshal. The State Fire Marshal and the
local government shall  coordinate any inspection and enforcement efforts described in this
subsection.
(4) If  a local government contracts under subsection (2) of this section to administer and
enforce minimum defensible space requirements  established by the State Fire Marshal within
the jurisdiction of the local government, the local  government shall periodically report to the
State Fire Marshal regarding  whether lands within the jurisdiction of the local government
are in compliance with the applicable minimum defensible space requirements. The reports
shall state the extent of compliance for each property, the change in degree of  compliance
since the previous report and any other information  required by the State Fire Marshal by
rule. In addition to requiring periodic reports, the State Fire Marshal may at any time  re-
quire a local  government to report the defensible space conditions for any lands on which
minimum defensible space requirements are enforced by the local government.
(5) The  State Fire Marshal shall oversee and coordinate the development and mainte-
nance of a comprehensive statewide map showing lands for which  the State Fire Marshal has
established minimum defensible space requirements under subsection (1) of this section,  the
requirements applicable to those lands and the degree of  compliance on those lands with the
applicable requirements.
(6) The State Fire  Marshal shall administer and enforce a program to provide financial,
administrative, technical or other assistance to  a local government to facilitate the admin-
istration and enforcement of minimum defensible space requirements within the  jurisdiction
of the local  government. A local government shall expend financial assistance provided by
the State  Fire Marshal under this subsection to give priority to the creation of defensible
space on lands owned by communities of color, indigenous communities,  persons with limited
proficiency in English and persons of lower income as defined in ORS 456.055.
SECTION 10.
The Wildfire Defensible Space Fund is established in the State  Treasury,
[4]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Wildfire Defensible
Space Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated
to the State Fire Marshal for the purpose of carrying out the local government  financial
assistance program described in section 9 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 11.
(1) The State Fire Marshal  shall annually report regarding the status of
State Fire Marshal and local government activities for carrying  out section 9 of this 2021
Act to  the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 on or before the date
of convening of the regular session of the Legislative Assembly as specified in ORS 171.010.
(2) The report shall include, but need not be limited to:
(a) A status report regarding the establishment, administration and  enforcement of
defensible space requirements;
(b) The amount of moneys  expended during the year for the establishment, adminis-
tration or enforcement of defensible space requirements;
(c) The amount of moneys expended during the year for the suppression of fires  on
forestland-urban interface lands; and
(d) Any recommendations of the State  Fire Marshal for legislative action, including, but
not limited to, current or future resource needs for establishing, administering or enforcing
defensible space requirements.
LAND USE
SECTION 12.
(1) The Director of the Department  of Land Conservation and Development,
in consultation with counties and cities, shall  establish a Land Use and Wildfire Policy Ad-
visory Committee. The committee shall consist of members appointed as  described in sub-
sections (2) to (5) of this section.
(2) The director and the State Forester, in consultation with counties and cities,  shall
jointly appoint the following to be voting members of the committee:
(a) One member who is a representative of  a city government serving a population of less
than 10,000.
(b) One member who is a representative of  a city government serving a population of
10,000 or more but less than 25,000.
(c) One member who is a representative  of a city government serving a population of
25,000 or more.
(d) One  member who is a representative of a county government serving a population of
less than 30,000.
(e) One member who is a representative of a county government serving a  population of
30,000 or more but less than 100,000.
(f) One member who is a representative of  a county government serving a population of
100,000 or more.
(g) One member who is a city land use planning director.
(h) One member who is a county land use planning director.
(i) One member who is a representative of a utility company.
(j) One member who is a representative of environmental interests.
(k) One member who is a representative of special districts.
(L) One member who is a representative of farming landowners.
[5]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(m) One member who is a representative of ranching landowners.
(n) One member who is a representative of realty interests.
(o) One member who is a representative of land and housing development firms.
(p) One member who is a representative of citizen land use planning organizations.
(q) One member who is a representative of state or regional land use  planning organiza-
tions.
(r) One member who is a representative of public health interests.
(s) One member who is a representative of small forestland owners.
(t) One member who is a representative of large forestland owners.
(u) One member who is a representative of economic development organizations.
(v) One member who is a representative of federally recognized Indian tribes.
(w) One member who is a representative of the Oregon Fire Chiefs Association.
(x) Additional members as determined by the director in consultation with counties  and
cities.
(3) The director and the State Forester shall make the  joint appointments under sub-
section (2) of this section from nominations submitted by entities related  to the represented
interest or entities. The related entity for appointments:
(a) Under subsection (2)(a), (b), (c) and (g)  of this section is the League of Oregon Cities.
(b) Under subsection (2)(d), (e), (f) and (h) of  this section is the Association of Oregon
Counties.
(c) Under subsection (2)(i) of this section is any  one or more of the investor-owned util-
ities and consumer-owned utilities in this state.
(d) Under subsection (2)(j) of this section is the Oregon League of Conservation Voters.
(e) Under subsection (2)(k) of this section is the Special Districts Association of Oregon.
(f) Under subsection (2)(L) of this section is the Oregon Farm Bureau.
(g) Under subsection (2)(m) of this section is the Oregon Cattlemen’s Association.
(h) Under subsection (2)(n) of this section is the Oregon Association of Realtors.
(i) Under subsection (2)(o) of this section is the Oregon Home Builders Association.
(j) Under subsection (2)(p) of this section is the Oregon Property Owners Association.
(k) Under subsection (2)(q) of this section is 1000 Friends of Oregon.
(L) Under subsection (2)(r) of this section is the Oregon Health Authority.
(m) Under subsection (2)(s) of this section is the Oregon Small Woodlands Association.
(n) Under subsection (2)(t) of this section is the Oregon Forest and Industries Council.
(o) Under subsection (2)(u) of this section is Business Oregon.
(p) Under subsection (2)(v) of this section is one  or more of the tribal governing bodies
for Indian tribes in this state.
(q) Under subsection (2)(w) of this section is the State Fire Marshal.
(4) In addition to the members described under subsection (2) of  this section, the fol-
lowing shall serve as nonvoting members of the committee:
(a) One member appointed by the State Forester.
(b) One member appointed by the State Fire Marshal.
(c) One member appointed by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(d) One member appointed by the Environmental Justice Task Force.
(e) One member appointed by the director of the Institute for Natural Resources.
(f) One member appointed by the Director of the Department of Land Conservation and
[6]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Development.
(g) One member appointed by the Director of  the Department of Consumer and Business
Services from the Division of Financial Regulation of the  Department of Consumer and
Business Services.
(h) One member appointed by the  Director of the Department of Consumer and Business
Services from department staff having expertise in building codes.
(5)(a) The President of the Senate, in consultation with the Senate  Minority Leader, shall
appoint two members from among the members  of the Senate to be nonvoting members of
the committee. The two members  appointed under this paragraph may not be from the same
political party.
(b) The Speaker of the  House of Representatives, in consultation with the House Minority
Leader, shall appoint two members from among the members of the House  of Represen-
tatives to be nonvoting members of the committee. The two  members appointed under this
paragraph may not be from the same political party.
(6) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to  the committee are nonvoting
members of the committee and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(7) The members of the committee shall elect a  voting member to be chairperson of the
committee and a voting member to  be vice-chairperson, with all powers appropriate to those
offices.
(8) The  committee shall meet at times and places determined by the chairperson or by
the Director of the Department of Land Conservation  and Development. A majority of the
voting members shall be a quorum for the conducting of  business. Official actions by the
committee require approval by a majority of the voting members.
(9) The Department of Land Conservation and Development  shall provide staff services
for the committee.
(10) Notwithstanding ORS 171.072, members of the committee who  are members of the
Legislative Assembly are not entitled to mileage expenses or a per diem and serve as  volun-
teers on the committee. Other members of the committee are not entitled  to reimbursement
for expenses and serve as volunteers on the committee. However, the Director of the De-
partment of Land Conservation and Development may, in the discretion of the director,  re-
imburse voting members of the committee for unforeseen expenses  from moneys available
for purposes of carrying out the functions of the committee.
SECTION 13.
(1) The State Forestry Department and Oregon State University,  in con-
sultation with the Department of  Land Conservation and Development, shall for each wildfire
risk region of this state  jointly consult with fire protection agencies and districts, fire offi-
cials and personnel and cities and counties  in the region. The departments and the university
shall analyze the wildfire risk for each region to develop recommendations for reducing the
wildfire risk to people, public and  private property, businesses, infrastructure and natural
resources in that region.
(2) The State Forestry Department and the university, in consultation  with the Depart-
ment of Land Conservation and Development, shall  report the recommendations for regional
wildfire risk reduction to the Land Use and Wildfire Policy Advisory Committee no later than
October 1, 2021.
(3) The departments and the committee shall analyze and evaluate  the information to
develop recommendations  regarding possible means for implementing the final recommen-
[7]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dations produced by the Governor’s Council on Wildfire Response through the statewide  land
use planning system and local governments to minimize the risks from wildfires to people,
public and private property, businesses, infrastructure and natural resources.
SECTION 14.
(1) The State Forestry Department, in collaboration with the  Department
of Land Conservation and Development and the Land  Use and Wildfire Policy Advisory
Committee, shall report to an interim committee of the Legislative  Assembly related to na-
tural resources in the manner provided under  ORS 192.245 no later than February 1, 2022,
regarding possible means for implementing the final  recommendations produced by the
Governor’s Council on Wildfire Response.
(2) The report must include, but need not be limited to, the following:
(a) The recommendations developed under section 13 of this 2021 Act.
(b) Existing state and local maps that identify wildfire risk.
(c) To the extent the advisory committee  and the departments deem appropriate, new
map resources that account for regional differences in factors relevant to wildfire risk.
(d) Identification of state and local  resources needed to develop, maintain and update
wildfire risk maps.
(e) Multiple recommendations regarding possible means for using  the statewide land use
planning system and local governments, including, but  not limited to, recommendations re-
garding revisions and updates to  the statewide land use planning system and local zoning
codes.
(f) Planning goals related to natural hazards, including but not limited to Goal 7.
(g) Existing state and  local programs that minimize wildfire risk, including, but not lim-
ited to, programs that identify wildlife risk through mapping  or that define minimum
defensible space.
(h) Identification of  revisions to the statewide land use planning system and to local
building codes appropriate to minimize wildfire risks, including, but not limited to, provisions
regarding sufficient defensible space, safe evacuation, adequate access for wildfire fighting
equipment and personnel, and considerations regarding development in areas of high wildfire
risk that allow for regional  differences in topography, vegetation, soil types and other rele-
vant factors.
(i) Funding, staffing  and other administrative resources necessary for state, county and
city governments to implement wildfire risk reduction programs, including, but  not limited
to, the  costs of program development, implementation and ongoing operations and the need
for stable long-term funding for the programs.
(j) A description of areas of agreement and  disagreement among the departments and
members of the Land Use and Wildfire Policy Advisory Committee.
SECTION 15.
All agencies of state government  as defined in ORS 174.111 are directed to
assist the Land  Use and Wildfire Policy Advisory Committee and the Department of Land
Conservation and Development in the performance of committee and department duties un-
der sections 13 and 14 of this 2021 Act.
HEALTH SYSTEMS FOR SMOKE
SECTION 16. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission shall establish a program to:
(a) Detect wildfire smoke levels through the use of air quality monitoring stations;
[8]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Evaluate  detected wildfire smoke levels to identify public health risks for vulnerable
populations;
(c) Forward wildfire smoke public health risk  information to local public health authori-
ties in affected areas; and
(d) Make wildfire  smoke public health risk information available in a timely manner to
the public by electronic means.
(2) The wildfire smoke level monitoring required under this section is in addition to,  and
not in lieu of, any monitoring requirements applicable to a person in  control of an air con-
tamination source under a program and rules adopted under ORS 468A.337.
(3) The commission shall evaluate public health risks under the program  using one of the
modelings for health risk  evaluation allowed under ORS 468A.337. The commission shall de-
termine the public health risk from wildfire smoke based  on the combination of wildfire
smoke with any other  factors affecting air quality in an area, including, but not limited to,
air contamination from other sources.
(4) The commission shall, to the extent practicable, design the  monitoring system to
provide timely  wildfire smoke information for all areas of this state. However, the commis-
sion may give  priority to the evaluation of wildfire smoke monitor information in areas
where wildfire smoke levels are elevated or changing and in areas  with concentrations of
vulnerable populations.
(5) The commission may enter into agreements with the Oregon Health  Authority or
other state, federal or local health agencies to provide information and education to  the
public regarding:
(a) Wildfire smoke public health risks;
(b) The  availability of timely information concerning wildfire smoke levels and resulting
public health risks; and
(c) The availability and location of clean air shelters described in section 17 of this 2021
Act.
(6) This section does not limit the collection, evaluation or dissemination of other  air
quality monitoring station information in addition to wildfire smoke level information.
SECTION 17.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority  shall cooperate with local governments
to establish clean air  shelters within local communities. If a shelter does not have an air
filtration system capable of  reducing wildfire smoke components to levels that do not present
a public health hazard to vulnerable populations, the  authority shall provide and install such
a filtration system for the shelter.
(2) Locations equipped as clean  air shelters must be available to the public without
charge during periods  when wildfire smoke levels present a public health risk. This sub-
section does not prohibit the authority from requiring that  locations equipped as clean air
shelters also be available to the public without charge when a public health risk  results from
air quality issues not associated with wildfire smoke.
SECTION 18. (1) As used in  this section, “smoke filtration system” means an air
filtration system capable of removing particulates and other harmful components of wildfire
smoke.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a  program to increase the availability
of smoke filtration systems among persons vulnerable to the health effects of wildfire  smoke
who reside in areas susceptible to wildfire smoke. The authority may issue grants for  the
[9]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
installation of  smoke filtration systems in residential buildings, commercial buildings or
buildings open to the public in areas susceptible to wildfire smoke. The authority shall give
grant priority to installations in residential buildings occupied by persons of  lower income,
as defined in ORS 456.055, who are vulnerable to the health effects of wildfire smoke.
(3) The authority may adopt rules establishing standards for smoke  filtration systems
obtained with grant moneys received under this section, including, but not limited to, mini-
mum acceptable efficiency for the removal of particulates  and other harmful substances
generated by wildfires.
EMERGENCY RESPONSE AND DISASTER RECOVERY
SECTION 19.
 ORS 401.025 is amended to read:
401.025. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Emergency” means a human created or natural event or  circumstance that causes or
threatens widespread loss of life, injury to person or property, human suffering  or financial loss,
including but not limited to:
(a) Fire, wildfire, explosion, flood, severe weather, landslides or mud slides, drought, earth-
quake, volcanic activity, tsunamis or other oceanic phenomena, spills or releases of oil  or hazardous
material as defined in ORS 466.605, contamination, utility or transportation  emergencies, disease,
blight, infestation, civil disturbance, riot, sabotage, acts of terrorism and war; and
(b) A rapid influx of individuals  from outside this state, a rapid migration of individuals from
one part of this  state to another or a rapid displacement of individuals if the influx, migration or
displacement results from the type of event or circumstance  described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section.
(2) “Emergency service  agency” means an organization within a local government that performs
essential services for the public’s benefit before,  during or after an emergency, such as law
enforcement, fire control, health, medical and sanitation services, public  works and engineering,
public information and communications.
(3) “Emergency services” means activities engaged in by state and  local government agencies
to prepare for  an emergency and to prevent, minimize, respond to or recover from an emergency,
including but not limited to coordination,  preparedness planning, training, interagency liaison, fire
fighting, oil or hazardous  material spill or release cleanup as defined in ORS 466.605, law enforce-
ment, medical, health and sanitation services, engineering and public works, search and rescue ac-
tivities, warning  and public information, damage assessment, administration and fiscal management,
and those measures defined as “civil defense” in 50 U.S.C. app. 2252.
(4) “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
(5) “Major disaster” means any event defined as a “major disaster” under 42 U.S.C. 5122(2).
SECTION 20.
(1) The Office of Emergency Management shall update its statewide emer-
gency plan as necessary to prepare for or respond to wildfire emergencies on  an area-wide
or statewide basis. The plan developed by the office to prepare for or respond to wildfire
emergencies shall include, but  need not be limited to, wildfire risk mitigation efforts and
evacuation planning.
(2) The office shall coordinate with cities and counties, and with adult foster  homes,
health care facilities and  residential facilities, to establish local or private procedures to
prepare for emergencies related to wildfire and ensure that local efforts to prevent,  respond
[10]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to or recover from an emergency caused by wildfire are conducted in a manner consistent
with the plan developed by the office  to prepare for or respond to wildfire emergencies. The
coordinated activities may include, but need  not be limited to, providing training, carrying
out exercises and promoting community education.
PUBLIC ENGAGEMENT
SECTION 21.
(1) The Task Force on Wildfire Education Coordination is established.
(2) The task force consists of nine members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members who  have expertise in wildfire
prevention, education, communications,  disaster recovery, local government or other mat-
ters the President deems relevant to wildfire education.
(b) The  Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint two members who have
expertise in wildfire prevention, education, communications, disaster recovery, local govern-
ment or other matters the Speaker deems relevant to wildfire education.
(c) The Governor shall appoint five members who have  expertise in wildfire prevention,
education, communications,  disaster recovery, local government or other matters the Gov-
ernor deems relevant to wildfire education.
(3) The task force shall review existing programs in this state for engaging the public in
issues related to wildfire, including,  but not limited to, programs operated by the State
Forestry Department, the office of  the State Fire Marshal or local governments regarding
wildfire prevention, defensible space creation, wildfire risk mitigation, wildfire response  and
community recovery from wildfire. The task force shall develop recommendations for  im-
proving the programs in a manner that will assist efforts to:
(a) Restore and maintain resilient landscapes;
(b) Foster and grow the number of fire-adapted communities;
(c) Respond to wildfires; and
(d) Help communities recover from wildfire.
(4) The task  force may take all lawful actions the task force deems expedient for carrying
out the duties of the task force.
(5) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report of its findings  and recommendations in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to an in-
terim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later  than
September 15, 2022.
(12) The State Forestry Department shall provide staff support to the task force.
[11]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(13) Members of the task  force are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for
expenses and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 22.
Section 21 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2022.
RESTORATION PRIORITIZATION
SECTION 23. (1) The State Forestry Department shall carry out a program  of fuel re-
duction treatments  on forestlands and rangelands, giving priority to treating forestlands and
rangelands that are in the four highest relative importance  categories identified in the
United States Forest Service report  titled “Pacific Northwest Quantitative Wildfire Risk
Assessment: Methods and Results” and dated April 9, 2018, or  on which treatment would
provide a  substantial benefit to this state. The department shall coordinate with managers
of federal lands to implement fuel  reduction treatments on federal forestlands. For treat-
ment projects on private lands, the department shall work with landowners  and nongovern-
mental entities to identify forestlands and rangelands that  are in the four highest relative
importance categories and provide financial assistance for those treatments.
(2) The department shall give priority  to treating forestlands and rangelands in the four
highest relative importance categories that have received treatment approval  under the Na-
tional Environmental Policy Act (42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq.).
(3) The department shall  ensure that forestland and rangeland treatment projects under
the program described in this  section are carried out in coordination with local collaborative
groups, if any, Oregon State University and affected cities and counties.
RESTORATION CAPACITY
SECTION 24. (1) The State Forestry Department, in collaboration with the Department
of Land Conservation and Development, shall carry out a program that  uses the compre-
hensive statewide map of  wildfire risk described in section 8 of this 2021 Act and the relative
importance categories described in section 23 of this 2021 Act to:
(a) Identify state and local resource needs for mitigating wildfire risk.
(b) Develop recommendations regarding revisions and updates to local zoning codes.
(c) Identify revisions to the statewide land use planning system and to local building
codes appropriate to minimize  wildfire risks, including, but not limited to, provisions re-
garding sufficient defensible space, safe evacuation, adequate access  for wildfire fighting
equipment and personnel, and considerations regarding development in areas of high wildfire
risk that allow for regional  differences in topography, vegetation, soil types and other rele-
vant factors.
(d) Estimate funding, staffing and other administrative  resources necessary for state,
county and city governments to implement wildfire risk  reduction programs, including, but
not limited to,  the costs of program development, implementation and ongoing operations
and the amounts needed for stable long-term funding for the programs.
[12]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The State  Forestry Department shall determine whether state policy presents barri-
ers to undertaking increased implementation of fuel reduction  treatment projects on private
lands.
(3) The department shall develop consistent performance  measures and condition-based
metrics for monitoring and communicating the effectiveness of state investments and project
actions in mitigating the risk of wildfire.
(4) The  program described in subsection (1) of this section must provide for the depart-
ment to identify workforce development needs  and develop funding proposals for those needs,
including, but not limited  to, program funding proposals to ensure adequate contracting ca-
pacity for undertaking increased implementation of the program.
 FEDERAL PARTNERSHIP
SECTION 25.
(1) The State Forestry  Department shall cooperate with federal agencies
to develop and implement a program to treat forestlands and rangelands in this state for  the
reduction of fuel load levels and  reduction of other wildfire risks. The department shall, to
the greatest extent practicable, carry  out the program in consultation and cooperation with
forestland and rangeland stakeholders, which may include, but need not be limited to:
(a) The United States Department of Agriculture;
(b) The United States Forest Service; and
(c) The Bureau of Land Management.
(2) The program described in subsection (1) of this section must:
(a) Specify types and levels of treatment and fuel load levels appropriate for achieving
program goals;
(b) Provide for, but not be limited to, an expansion of  State Forestry Department activ-
ities for the  restoration of federal forestlands within this state, including, but not limited to,
activities under ORS 526.274 and 526.275;
(c) Be designed to evaluate and prioritize the carrying out of treatment on  any public
forestlands and rangelands in this state without regard to federal or state ownership;
(d) Maximize the  use of state and federal resources to improve coordination and expedite
implementation of public forestland and rangeland treatments;
(e) Identify for biennial budget requests the capacity  that must exist within state gov-
ernment in order to meet the treatment goals of the program; and
(f) Identify the appropriate state agency to coordinate and oversee public  rangeland
treatments.
SMALL TRACT FORESTLAND INCENTIVE
SECTION 26.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Forest health” means a reduction in the  fuel load of forestland that achieves eco-
logical goals, reduces fuel loads and reduces potential wildfire suppression costs.
(b) “Small tract forestland” has the meaning given that term in ORS 321.700.
(2) A small tract forestland owner may submit to the State Board of Forestry a  plan for
the owner to restore the forest health on the forestland. The board shall  review a plan sub-
mitted under this subsection to determine  whether and to what extent the plan may rea-
[13]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sonably be expected to improve forest health on the forestland. If the  board approves the
plan, upon the forestland owner presenting evidence satisfactory to the board that the  plan
has been timely  completed, the board shall certify to the county assessor that the forestland
qualifies for a credit against the specially assessed  valuation of the forestland under ORS
321.722. The assessor shall apply the  credit certified by the board to the specially assessed
value of the forestland in the first property tax year beginning on or after the date of the
certification. The credit may not exceed:
(a) 
 percent of the specially assessed  value per acre determined under ORS 321.354,
if located in western Oregon; or
(b)  percent of the specially assessed value  per acre determined under ORS 321.833,
if located in eastern Oregon.
(3) A credit claimed under this section does not reduce the assessed  value of the small
tract forestland for purposes of  determining the maximum tax assessment in a subsequent
year under ORS 321.722 (2).
RESILIENCY GOAL
SECTION 27. Section 28 of this 2021 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 527.610 to
527.770.
SECTION 28. It is  the policy of this state to maximize forest resiliency, including, but
not limited to, the achievement  of ecological goals, reduction in fuel loads and reduction in
wildfire suppression costs. The State Board of Forestry shall adopt rules  for maximizing
forest resiliency through  the use of fuel load management on forestlands, including, but not
limited to, the use of managed wildfire and prescribed burns  and commercial and noncom-
mercial harvesting.
FOREST FINANCIAL OVERSIGHT
SECTION 29. The State Forestry Department shall adopt rules for the purpose of  en-
suring efficient and  effective funding of wildfire response. Matters addressed by the rules
must include, but need not be limited to:
(1) Means for addressing delays in the receipt  of federal payments associated with
wildfire costs;
(2) Department structural changes designed to  expedite and standardize the processing
of financial transactions associated with wildfire costs;
(3) Department structural changes to better manage seasonal borrowing costs  to support
wildfire costs; and
(4) Department structural changes to facilitate the  assignment of additional personnel
to wildfire risk mitigation and wildfire response programs when needed.
SECTION 30. The State Forestry Department shall base  the rules adopted under section
29 of this 2021 Act on the recommendations of  the Forestry Financial Oversight Team cre-
ated by the  Governor on October 18, 2019. The department shall adopt any rules based on
team recommendations publicly reported on or before  January 1, 2023, to become effective
no later than June 30, 2023.
SECTION 31. Section 30 of this 2021 Act is repealed January 2, 2024.
[14]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
PROTECTED AREAS
SECTION 32.
(1) The State Forester, in collaboration with the  State Fire Marshal, state
agencies and  local governments as defined in ORS 174.116, shall adopt rules establishing
baseline levels of wildfire protection for lands that are outside of forest protection districts
and susceptible to wildfire. When establishing the baseline levels for lands, the State
Forester shall ensure that the levels are adapted to reflect regional conditions. A county, in
collaboration with the State Forester and the State Fire Marshal, may work to  ensure that
all lands within the county that are outside of forest protection districts and susceptible to
wildfire are provided with wildfire protection services at  the applicable baseline level or a
higher level. As used in this subsection,  “forest protection districts” means lands designated
in State Forester rules as provided under ORS 477.225.
(2) A county, in collaboration with  the State Forester and the State Fire Marshal, may
assist:
(a) Landowners, individuals and businesses with  forming jurisdictions to provide wildfire
protection;
(b) Landowners, individuals, businesses and jurisdictions with obtaining expansion of or
other changes to  boundaries or facility locations of jurisdictions that provide wildfire pro-
tection;
(c) Jurisdictions to expand or adjust jurisdiction service boundaries to ensure  adequate
wildfire protection for lands; and
(d) Jurisdictions in developing wildfire protection facilities, equipment, training and other
resources adequate to ensure that the jurisdiction  provides timely and effective wildfire
protection at the baseline level or higher on lands described in subsection (1) of  this section
throughout the jurisdiction.
(3) The  State Forester may provide financial assistance to counties for carrying out
county duties under subsection (2) of this section from any funds  made available to the State
Forester and designated for that purpose.
SECTION 33.
A county  shall ensure no later than January 1, 2026, that all lands described
in section 32 (1) of this 2021 Act within the county have baseline level  or higher wildfire
protection as described in section 32 of this 2021 Act.
WILDFIRE RESPONSE CAPACITY
SECTION 34. (1) The State Forestry Department shall consult and coordinate with  fed-
eral agencies, private stakeholders and other state agencies to  determine the adequacy of
state, federal and private wildfire  response capacity. The department shall act to facilitate
wildfire prevention and wildfire response communication and coordination between federal,
state, local and private entities.
(2) The department shall, to the  extent practicable, seek to leverage state moneys to
obtain an increase in federal  wildfire resources available to Oregon for effective initial re-
sponse purposes.
(3) The department shall consult with the office of the  State Fire Marshal and with local
fire defense board  chiefs to assess the adequacy of available mutual aid to provide wildfire
response on  forestland-urban interface lands and to identify means for providing additional
[15]
SB 287
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
resources from the state or other entities to enhance wildfire response capacity  on
forestland-urban interface lands.
(4) The department shall identify workforce development needs  associated with wildfire
risk mitigation and wildfire response and  develop funding proposals for meeting those needs
on a sustained basis.
(5) The department may enter into cooperative agreements or contracts with  a local or
private entity for the purpose  of assisting the entity to organize for purposes of wildfire risk
mitigation or wildfire response, including, but not limited  to, facilitating wildfire training and
the acquisition of firefighting equipment for the entity and assisting with payment for li-
ability insurance and other administrative expenses of the entity associated with wildfire risk
mitigation or wildfire response.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 35.
The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EMERGENCY
SECTION 36. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[16]