Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Not later than September 15 of each  year, the Department of Justice shall
report in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 to an interim committee of  the Legislative
Assembly related to the judiciary on court cases in the previous year that  have resulted in
a judgment against  the state or in a settlement that requires the state to pay money to an-
other party. The report must include the names and case numbers of the  cases, if applicable,
the amounts of the judgments and  the amounts to be paid by the state under the settle-
ments.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 121