Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 461.547 is amended to read:
461.547. (1) Each biennium,  the Oregon [ State Lottery Commission ] Department of Adminis-
trative Services  shall  transfer an amount equal to 2.5 percent of the net forecasted receipts from
video lottery games allocated to  the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to coun-
ties for economic development activities. Ninety  percent of the moneys shall be distributed to each
county in proportion to the gross receipts from video  lottery games from each county. Ten percent
of the moneys shall be distributed in equal amounts to each county.  The  Oregon State Lottery
Commission shall determine and inform the department  of the amounts to be transferred
under this subsection.
(2) During the eighth fiscal quarter of each biennium:
(a) The commission shall  determine and inform the department of the amount of net
actual receipts from video  lottery games allocated to the Administrative Services Economic
Development Fund in the biennium;
(b) The commission shall determine and inform the department of the amount  that each
county would have received under subsection (1) of this section  in the biennium had the
transfer been based on the net actual  receipts determined under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section in place of the net forecasted receipts described in subsection (1) of this section;
(c) If the amount determined for a county  under paragraph (b) of this subsection is
greater than the actual amount received under subsection (1) of  this section by the county
in the biennium, the department shall, during the first fiscal quarter of the subsequent
biennium, disburse the difference to the county; and
(d) If the amount determined for a county under paragraph (b) of  this subsection is less
than the actual amount received under subsection (1) of this section by  the county in the
biennium, the department shall decrease one or more future  disbursals to the county under
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 605
HB 2366
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
subsection (1) of this section until the amount of the difference has been deducted.
[(2)] (3) As used in this section:
(a) “Gross receipts from video lottery games” means the amount of money inserted into  video
lottery games plus the value of any free game prizes used by players for subsequent games.
(b) “Net actual receipts from video lottery games” means  the amount of money that is received
from the  operation of video lottery games after the payment of prizes but prior to any other pay-
ment.
(c) “Net forecasted receipts from video lottery games” means the amount of  money that
is forecasted to be  received from the operation of video lottery games, after the payment of
prizes but prior to any other payment,  in the last revenue forecast published in the previous
biennium by the department.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 461.547 by section 1  of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.  ORS 320.005 is amended to read:
320.005. As used in ORS 320.005 to 320.150, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Amusement device” means a video lottery game terminal, including but not limited to any
electronic, mechanical-electronic or nonmechanical device that:
(a) Displays a ticket through the use of a video display screen;
(b) Is available for consumer play upon the payment of consideration;
(c) Determines winners through the element of chance; and
(d) Displays possible prizes on the device.
(2) “Department” means the Department of Revenue.
(3) “Net receipts” has the meaning given  the term  “net  actual  receipts from video lottery
games” under ORS 461.547.
(4) “Operate”  means to make an amusement device available for use by the public for gain,
benefit or advantage.
(5)(a) “Person” means every individual, partnership (limited  or not), corporation (for-profit or
not-for-profit), company, cooperative, joint stock company, joint venture, firm, business trust, asso-
ciation, organization, institution, club, society,  receiver, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, auctioneer,
syndicate, trust, trustee, estate, personal representative or any group of individuals acting  as a unit,
whether mutual, cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit or otherwise.
(b) “Person” includes this or another state, a  municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation
or political subdivision of  this or another state, and the agencies, departments and institutions of
this or another state, irrespective of the nature of the activities engaged in or  functions performed,
but does not include the United States or a  foreign government or any agency, department or
instrumentality of the United States or of any foreign government.
(6) “Tax year” means a period of 12 months beginning July 1 and ending  the following June 30.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]