Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 195.515 is amended to read:
195.515. (1) The  Department of Transportation may enter into an intergovernmental agreement
with a city [ that has a  population of 500,000 or more ] or county  for the removal, storage and dis-
position of personal property deposited, left or displayed on  property that is owned by the depart-
ment. [ The city ] A city or county  shall prioritize removal of personal property that is within the
right of  way of a highway under the jurisdiction of the department as a road authority pursuant to
ORS 810.010.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 377.650,  377.653 and 377.655, an intergovernmental agreement entered
into under this section may  provide alternative provisions related to the removal, storage and dis-
position of personal property if the  alternative provisions conform with the requirements for local
government policy for removal of homeless individuals and personal property under ORS 195.505.
(3) In addition to the  requirements described in subsection (2) of this section, an intergovern-
mental agreement entered into under this section must include the following:
(a) Requirements for posting notice before the removal  of personal property, including but not
limited to the following:
(A) That the notice is created using durable materials and securely posted  within 30 feet of the
personal property to be removed;
(B) That the notice must provide the date the notice begins and the date upon which  the city ,
county or department may begin removing personal property; and
(C) That the notice must provide a description of:
(i) How an individual may access personal property that is removed and stored; and
(ii) The length of time  the city , county  or department will store personal property before the
city , county  or department disposes of it.
(b) A requirement that the notice expires 10 days after the  city , county or department posts the
notice.
(c) A severe weather protocol regarding the weather conditions under  which the city , county
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3762
SB 1024
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
or department will not remove personal property.
(d) Provisions related to inventorying and storing the personal property to be removed.
(e) Provisions related to the city , county  or department relinquishing unclaimed personal prop-
erty after the storage period to the city’s , county’s  or department’s designated agent.
(f) Provisions related to when the city or county  will provide impact reduction services, in-
cluding but not limited to trash collection.
(g) A provision providing that if the department requests city  or county  services  under the
intergovernmental agreement, but  the city or county  is unable or unwilling to provide services as
requested, the department or the  department’s contractor may perform the requested services con-
sistent with the terms of the agreement, including but not limited to posting notice.
(4) The 72-hour notice under ORS 195.505 required under subsection (2) of this section does  not
apply:
(a) When there are grounds for law  enforcement officials to believe that illegal activities other
than camping are occurring;
(b) Where there is an exceptional emergency, such as  possible site contamination by hazardous
materials; or
(c) When there is immediate danger to human life or safety.
(5) Before the city  or county  adopts an intergovernmental  agreement under this section or
changes to the agreement, the  city  or county  shall invite public comment on the proposed agree-
ment or the proposed changes to the agreement.
[2]