Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health Authority shall study Medicaid  supplemental reimburse-
ment for ground emergency  medical transportation services. The authority shall submit a
report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legis-
lation, to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health no later than
September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4042