Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 701.143 is amended to read:
701.143. The  Construction Contractors Board may not process a complaint against a licensed
contractor, including a complaint based upon  a court judgment or an arbitration award, unless the
complaint is filed with the board in a timely manner as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the owner  of a new structure files the com-
plaint, the board must receive the complaint no later than the earlier of:
(a) One year after the date the structure was first occupied; or
(b) Two years  after substantial completion of the structure by the contractor [ filed against ]
subject to the complaint .
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the owner of an existing structure files  the
complaint, the board must receive the complaint no later than [ one year after the date  the work was
substantially completed by the contractor filed against. ] the earlier of:
(a) Six years after the date on  which the owner and the contractor enter into the con-
tract; or
(b) One year after the date on which the contractor delivers  to the owner a written no-
tice of completed work that:
(A) Informs the owner that the contractor considers the work to be complete;
(B) Lists the total cost of the work; and
(C) States that any complaint to the board will be barred unless the owner  files the
complaint within the earlier of:
(i) One year after the date the contractor delivers the notice to the owner; or
(ii) Six years after the date on which the  owner and the contractor enter into the con-
tract.
(3) Regardless of  whether the complaint involves a new or an existing structure, if the owner
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 514
HB 2462
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
of the structure files the complaint and the  licensed contractor failed to begin the work, the board
must receive the complaint no later than one year after the date the parties entered into  the con-
tract.
(4) Regardless of whether the complaint involves a new or an existing structure, if  the owner
of the structure files the complaint and the licensed contractor  failed to substantially complete the
work, the board must receive the complaint no later than [ one year after the date  the contractor
ceased to work on the structure. ] the earlier of:
(a) Six years after the date on  which the owner and the contractor enter into the con-
tract or the date on which the parties make a mutual bargain concerning the work, if the
contractor does not use a written contract; or
(b) One year after the date on which the contractor that is the  subject of the complaint
delivers to the owner a written notice that:
(A) Informs the owner that the contractor considers the work to be  complete or that the
contractor does not intend to complete the work;
(B) Lists the contractor’s estimate of the value of the work performed; and
(C) States that  any complaint to the board will be barred unless the owner files the
complaint within the earlier of:
(i) One year after the date the contractor delivers the notice to the owner; or
(ii) Six years after the date on which the  owner and the contractor enter into the con-
tract or the date on which the parties make a mutual bargain concerning the work, if the
contractor does not use a written contract.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a licensed contractor files the  complaint
against the licensed  contractor performing work as a subcontractor on a new structure, the board
must receive the complaint no later than the earlier of:
(a) Fourteen months after the date the structure was first occupied; or
(b) Two years after substantial completion of the structure.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a licensed contractor files the  complaint
against the licensed contractor performing work as a subcontractor on an existing  structure, the
board must receive the complaint no later than 14 months after the date the work on the  structure
was substantially completed.
(7) If a licensed contractor files the complaint  against the licensed contractor performing work
as a subcontractor on a structure and the subcontractor failed to substantially  complete the work,
the board must receive the complaint no later than 14 months  after the date the subcontractor
ceased to work on the structure.
(8) If the licensed contractor’s  employee, subcontractor or material or equipment supplier files
the complaint, the board must receive the complaint no later than  one year after the date the con-
tractor incurred the indebtedness.
(9) The filing of  a complaint with the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries for
unpaid wages constitutes the  filing of a complaint for purposes of establishing timeliness of the filing
of a complaint under this section.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]