Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
No later than July 1  of each year, the Department of Human Services shall
distribute $350,000 to the  Oregon Foster Youth Connection for the provision of foster youth
advocacy and support.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3552