Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $50,000,000, for deposit in the Housing Project
Revolving Loan Fund established under section 35, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1020