Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is  appropriated to ______, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $______ for ______.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $______
is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses for ______ from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the ______.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $______
is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses for ______ from federal funds collected or received by the ______.
SECTION 4. This 2020 special session Act  being necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public peace, health and  safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2020 special
session Act takes effect on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 88