Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 197.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding any land use regulation,  statewide land use planning
goal or Land Conservation and Development  Commission rule or ORS 215.130 (5) to (11), a
local government shall unconditionally approve an application for the restoration or  re-
placement of a use:
(a) That was damaged, destroyed or interrupted by a wildfire identified  in an executive
order issued by the Governor in accordance with  the Emergency Conflagration Act under
ORS 476.510 to 476.610 between August 1 and September 31, 2020; and
(b) That was for:
(A) A single-family residence; or
(B) Any use of any  building, structure or land that lawfully existed at the time of the
wildfire, including as a nonconforming use.
(2) A local government may require an applicant under subsection (1)(b)(A) of this section
to prove that  a residence was assessed as a residential dwelling for purposes of ad valorem
taxation for the property tax year beginning July 1, 2019, but may not require that an appli-
cant prove that the  destroyed residence was lawful under the existing land use regulations
at any time, including when the building, structure or use was established, at  the time of
interruption or destruction or at the time of the application.
(3) An approval of an application under this section is not a land  use decision as defined
in ORS 197.015.
(4) Notwithstanding a time limitation under ORS 215.130 (6) or (7)  or any land use regu-
lation, approval of an application for a permit under  this section is valid until December 31,
2025.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3587
HB 3367
1
[2]