Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Sections 2 to 5 of this 2023 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
164.015 to 164.135.
(2) ORS 164.098 is added to and made a part of sections 2 to 5 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2.
As used in sections 2 to 5 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “Mercantile establishment” has the meaning given that term in ORS 30.870.
(2) “Merchandise” has the meaning given that term in ORS 30.870.
SECTION 3.
(1) A person commits the  crime of retail theft in the second degree if, by
means other than  extortion, the person commits theft as described in ORS 164.015 of mer-
chandise from a mercantile establishment and the total value of the  merchandise in a single
or aggregate transaction is less than $500.
(2) Retail theft in the second degree is a Class B misdemeanor.
(3)(a) In addition to any other sentence imposed, the court shall  sentence a person con-
victed under this section to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of seven days.
(b) If, at the time  of the offense, a person has one or more previous convictions under
this section or under section 4 of this 2023 Act or has  been convicted of any felony, the court
shall sentence the person to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 90 days.
SECTION 4.
(1) A person commits the crime of retail theft in the  first degree if, by
means other than  extortion, the person commits theft as described in ORS 164.015 of mer-
chandise from a mercantile establishment and the total value of the  merchandise in a single
or aggregate transaction is at least $500 and less than $1,000.
(2) Retail theft in the first degree is a Class A misdemeanor.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1991
HB 2525
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3)(a) In addition to any other sentence imposed, the court shall  sentence a person con-
victed under this section to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 14 days.
(b) If, at the time  of the offense, a person has one or more previous convictions under
this section or under section 3 of this 2023 Act or has  been convicted of any felony, the court
shall sentence the person to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 180 days.
SECTION 5.
(1) A person commits the crime of aggravated retail theft if,  by means other
than extortion, the person commits theft as described in ORS 164.015 of merchandise  from
a mercantile establishment and the total value of the  merchandise in a single or aggregate
transaction is $1,000 or more.
(2) Aggravated retail theft is a Class C felony.
(3) In addition to any other sentence imposed, the court shall  sentence a person con-
victed under this section to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 12 months.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 164.098 is amended to read:
164.098. (1) A person commits the crime of organized retail theft  if, acting in concert with an-
other person:
(a) The person violates ORS 164.015 or aids or abets the other person to violate ORS 164.015;
(b) The subject of the theft is merchandise and the merchandise is taken  from a mercantile es-
tablishment; and
(c) The aggregate value of the merchandise taken within any 90-day period exceeds $5,000.
[(2) As used in this section: ]
[(a) “Merchandise” has the meaning given that term in ORS 30.870. ]
[(b) “Mercantile establishment” has the meaning given that term in ORS 30.870. ]
[(3)] (2) Organized retail theft is a Class B felony.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 164.115, as amended by section 7, chapter 9, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended
to read:
164.115. For the purposes of chapter 743, Oregon Laws 1971, the value of property  shall be as-
certained as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise specified in this section, value  means the market value of the property
at the time and place of the crime, or if such cannot reasonably be ascertained,  the cost of re-
placement of the property within a reasonable time after the crime.
(2) Whether or not they have been issued or delivered, certain written instruments, not including
those having a readily ascertainable market value, shall be evaluated as follows:
(a) The value of an instrument constituting an evidence of debt, including, but not limited to,  a
check, draft or promissory note, shall be considered  the amount due or collectible thereon or
thereby.
(b) The value  of any other instrument which creates, releases, discharges or otherwise affects
any valuable legal right, privilege or obligation shall be considered the  greatest amount of economic
loss which the owner might reasonably suffer because of the loss of the instrument.
(3) The value of a gambling chip, token, imitation currency or similar device is its face value.
(4)(a) The value of the wildlife listed in ORS 496.705  is the amount of damages as specified in
ORS 496.705.
(b) The  value of the wildlife listed on the list of prohibited species, as defined in section 3,
chapter 9, Oregon Laws 2022, is the amount of damages  as specified in section 4, chapter 9, Oregon
Laws 2022.
(5) When the value of property cannot reasonably be ascertained, it shall be presumed to  be an
[2]
HB 2525
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
amount less than $100 in a case of theft, and less than $500 in any other case.
(6) The value of single theft transactions may be added together if the thefts were committed:
(a) Against multiple victims by similar means within a 30-day period; [ or]
(b) Against multiple victims within a 60-day period for offenses described in section 3, 4
or 5 of this 2023 Act; or
[(b)] (c)  Against the same victim, or two or more persons  who are joint owners, within a 180-day
period.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 131.315 is amended to read:
131.315. (1) If conduct constituting elements of an offense or results constituting elements  of an
offense occur in two or more counties, trial of the offense may be held in any  of the counties con-
cerned.
(2) If a cause of death is inflicted on a person in one county and the person dies  therefrom in
another county, trial of the offense may be held in either county.
(3) If the commission  of an offense commenced outside this state is consummated within this
state, trial of the offense shall be held in the county in which the offense is consummated  or the
interest protected by the criminal statute in question is impaired.
(4) If an offense is committed on any body of water located  in, or adjacent to, two or more
counties or forming the boundary between two or more counties, trial  of the offense may be held in
any nearby county bordering on the body of water.
(5) If an offense is  committed in or upon any railroad car, vehicle, aircraft, boat or other
conveyance in transit and it cannot readily be determined in which county the offense was com-
mitted, trial of the offense may be held in any county through or over  which the conveyance passed.
(6) If an offense is committed on the boundary of  two or more counties or within one mile
thereof, trial of the offense may be held in any of the counties concerned.
(7) A person who commits theft, burglary  or robbery may be tried in any county in which the
person exerts control over the property that is the subject of the crime.
(8) If the offense is an attempt or solicitation to commit a crime,  trial of the offense may be held
in any county in which any act that is an element of the offense is committed.
(9) If the offense is criminal conspiracy, trial of the  offense may be held in any county in which
any act or agreement that is an element of the offense occurs.
(10) A person who in one county commits an inchoate offense that results in the commission  of
an offense by another person in another  county, or who commits the crime of hindering prosecution
of the principal offense, may be tried in either county.
(11) A criminal nonsupport action may be tried  in any county in which the dependent child is
found, irrespective of the domicile of the parent, guardian or other person lawfully charged with
support of the child.
(12)(a) If the offense is theft, forgery or identity theft and the offense consists of  an aggregate
transaction  involving  more than one county, trial of the offense may be held in any county in which
one of the acts of theft, forgery or identity theft was committed.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, if the offense is retail theft in the
second degree, retail theft in the first degree or aggravated retail  theft, the merchandise
that was the subject of the theft is sold, and the district attorneys of all  counties in which
trial may be held under paragraph (a) of this subsection decline to prosecute, trial may  be
held in any county in which an item of the merchandise was sold.
(13) When a prosecution is for violation of the Oregon  Securities Law, the trial of the offense
[3]
HB 2525
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
may be held in the county in which:
(a) The offer to purchase  or sell securities took place or where the sale or purchase of securities
took place; or
(b) Any act that is an element of the offense occurred.
(14) When a  prosecution under ORS 165.692 and 165.990 or 411.675 and 411.990 (2) and (3) in-
volves Medicaid funds, the trial of the offense may be held in the county in which the claim was
submitted for payment or in the county in which the claim was paid.
(15)(a) If the offense is stalking under ORS 163.732 and involves contacts  as defined in ORS
163.730 in more than one county, trial of the offense may be held in any county in which a contact
occurred.
(b) If the offense is violating a court’s stalking protective order under ORS 163.750, trial  of the
offense may be held in the county in which the defendant engaged in conduct prohibited by the order
or in the county in which the order was issued.
SECTION 9.
(1) The state shall  reimburse each county as provided in this section for the
costs of incarcerating persons sentenced to a  term of imprisonment for retail theft in the
second degree under section 3 of this 2023 Act, retail  theft in the first degree under section
4 of this 2023 Act or aggravated retail theft under section 5 of this  2023 Act who are com-
mitted under ORS 137.124 to the  custody of the supervisory authority of the county in which
the crime of conviction occurred.
(2) At the end of each month, the county shall submit to the Oregon Department  of Ad-
ministrative Services a written request for  reimbursement for the cost of incarcerating
persons described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The department shall reimburse a county that submits a request under subsection (2)
of this  section within seven days of receiving the request. The reimbursement shall occur
at the  rate of $100 per person per day of incarceration or the actual daily cost of
incarcerating a person, whichever is higher.
(4) The circuit court has jurisdiction over any  dispute involving the reimbursement of
incarceration costs under this section.
SECTION 10. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $ , for distribution  to
counties for incarceration costs under section 9 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 11. The state shall  indemnify an owner or employee of a mercantile establish-
ment as defined in ORS 30.870 against a claim in  a civil action for false imprisonment or
unlawful detention or arrest if, at the time of engaging in the conduct giving rise to the civil
action, the owner  or employee believed the plaintiff was committing an offense described in
sections 2 to 5 of this 2023 Act.
[4]