Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may  be expended for awarding grants through
the Career and Technical Student Organization Grant Program established by ORS 344.077.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be  distributed to fund activities related to
career and technical education that can lead to high wage and high demand jobs  as described
in ORS 327.372 (4).
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3145