Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
A court that issues an order for  the custody of a child must issue the order
in writing within five days after the ruling on which the order is based.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding ORS 107.425 (3), a court may  not appoint an individual,
panel or program to assist the court in creating a parenting plan or resolving disputes re-
garding parenting time, or to assist parents in creating and implementing  parenting plans,
unless both parents agree to the  appointment after a discussion of the costs of the services
and the parents’ responsibility for the costs.
SECTION 3.
If a party appeals an order  or judgment in a domestic relations suit, as de-
fined in ORS  107.510, or an order for the custody of a child and the appellate court remands
the matter to the circuit court for further  proceedings, the judge who presided over the in-
itial proceedings may not preside over the further proceedings.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4234