Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Forestry Department shall study wildfires. The department  shall
submit a report on the  study in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include rec-
ommendations for legislation, to the  committees or interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to natural resources no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3295