Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 837.320 is amended to read:
837.320. [(1) A law enforcement agency may operate an unmanned aircraft system, acquire infor-
mation through the operation of an  unmanned aircraft system, or disclose information acquired through
the operation of an unmanned aircraft system, if: ]
[(a) A warrant is issued authorizing use of an unmanned aircraft system; or ]
[(b) The law  enforcement agency has probable cause to believe that a person has committed a crime,
is committing a crime or is about to commit a crime, and  exigent circumstances exist that make it un-
reasonable for the law enforcement agency to obtain a warrant authorizing use of an unmanned aircraft
system.]
[(2) A warrant authorizing the  use of an unmanned aircraft system must specify the period for
which operation of the unmanned  aircraft system is authorized. In no event may a warrant provide for
the operation of  an unmanned aircraft system for a period of more than 30 days. Upon motion and good
cause shown, a court may renew a warrant after the expiration of the 30-day period. ]
(1) A law enforcement  agency may operate an unmanned aircraft system, acquire infor-
mation through the operation of an unmanned aircraft system or disclose information ac-
quired through the operation of an unmanned aircraft system, in connection with  lawful
police activity, including but not limited to when the law enforcement agency is:
(a) Responding to any call for law enforcement service.
(b) Responding to a public safety emergency in which personal injury  or damage to
property could occur.
(c) Conducting search and rescue operations.
(d) Training as provided in ORS 837.345.
(e) Obtaining information about a property when the property owner has consented.
(2) A law enforcement agency  may operate an unmanned aircraft system not in con-
nection with police activity only if all cameras on the unmanned aircraft system are:
(a) Stowed; or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1638
SB 1186
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
(b) Positioned to provide situational awareness for flight and used  only for airspace de-
confliction.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 837.370 is amended to read:
837.370. (1) [ Except as  provided in subsection (2) of this section, ] A person may not operate an
unmanned aircraft system  over the boundaries of privately owned premises in a manner so as to
intentionally, knowingly or recklessly harass  or annoy the owner or occupant of the privately owned
premises.
[(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply  to the use of an unmanned aircraft system by a
law enforcement agency under ORS 837.335. ]
[(3)(a)] (2)(a) Except as provided  in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, violation of sub-
section (1) of this section is a Class B violation.
(b) If, at the time of  the offense, the person has one prior conviction under this section, violation
of subsection (1) of this section is a Class A violation.
(c) If, at the time  of the offense, the person has two or more prior convictions under this section,
violation of subsection (1) of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.
(d) If the court imposes  a sentence of probation for a violation under paragraph (c) of this sub-
section, the court may order  as a condition of probation that the person may not possess an un-
manned aircraft system.
SECTION 3. ORS 837.330, 837.335 and 837.340 are repealed.
[2]