Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 2. The following costs and expenses that a public utility incurs  are not recov-
erable from public utility customers:
(1) Costs and expenses that are, or are associated with, a criminal or civil fine  or penalty
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 209
HB 4100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that is based on negligence or a higher degree of fault on the part of the public utility.
(2) Costs and expenses that are, or are associated  with, a judgment or settlement from
a civil action  that is based on negligence or a higher degree of fault on the part of the public
utility.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section, “investor-owned utility”  means a public utility,
as defined in ORS 757.005, that provides electric power and is regulated by the Public Utility
Commission under ORS chapter 757.
(2) An investor-owned utility shall provide an incident report to the Department of the
State Fire Marshal  and the State Forestry Department whenever a fire-related incident oc-
curs that  is caused by an electric power line that is under the management, operation,
ownership or control of the investor-owned utility, and the fire-related incident occurred
within this state or posed a risk to the health or safety of residences within this state.
(3) An investor-owned utility shall provide a  copy of an incident report that is provided
under this section to the Public Utility Commission and make public the incident report.
(4) The Department of the State Fire Marshal and the State Forestry  Department may
each, by rule, prescribe the form and content of incident reports that must be provided to
the respective department under this section.
(5) An incident report provided under this section may be used  as evidence, subject to
the Oregon Evidence  Code, in any civil, criminal or enforcement action arising out of any
matter related to the fire-related incident.
(6) The Department of the State Fire Marshal, State Forestry Department and  Public
Utility Commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 477.089 is amended to read:
477.089. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Economic and property damage” means the sum of:
(A)(i) [ The lesser of ] The difference in the fair market value of  property immediately before and
immediately after a wildfire ; or
(ii) The cost of restoring property to  the condition the property was in immediately before a
wildfire; and
(B) Any other objectively verifiable monetary losses.
(b) “Fair market value” means  the amount, as determined by a state certified appraiser  or other
objectively verifiable information, that a willing buyer would  pay to a willing seller for property
in an arm’s-length transaction if both parties were fully informed about  all advantages and disad-
vantages of the property and neither party is acting under a compulsion to buy or sell.
(c) “Forest  tree species” means a tree species that is capable of producing logs, fiber or other
wood materials that are suitable for the production of lumber, sheeting, pulp, firewood  or other
commercial forest products.
(d) “State certified appraiser” means  an individual who has been certified as a state certified
appraiser under ORS 674.310 and is qualified to appraise the property that  is the subject of a fair
market value determination.
(e) “Wildfire” means a fire that:
(A) Results from a violation of this chapter  or of rules adopted under ORS 526.016 or 526.041;
or
(B) Originated on land used or capable of being used for growing  forest tree species regardless
of the existing use of the land.
[2]
HB 4100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Except as provided in ORS 477.092  and 477.095, in a civil action for property damage caused
by a wildfire, the recoverable  economic damages are:
(a) The amount  of economic and property damages, if the wildfire did not occur as the result
of recklessness, gross negligence, willfulness or malice; or
(b) Twice the  amount of economic and property damages, if the wildfire occurred as the result
of recklessness, gross negligence, willfulness or malice.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 477.095  and subject to any other provision of this chapter limiting
the recovery of fire fighting costs, a person who causes a wildfire  is liable to any person or entity
for the full amount of all expenses incurred by the person or entity in fighting the wildfire.
(4) The remedies provided under this section are in  addition to any available criminal or civil
penalties that may be assessed for the violation of a statute or rule but, subject to Article I, section
10, of the Oregon Constitution, are the exclusive remedies  for recovering economic damages  for
damages or injury to property caused by a wildfire. This subsection does not:
(a) Prohibit the bringing of any cross claim, counterclaim or joinder of parties;
(b) Prohibit the institution  of a suit under ORS 496.705 for the recovery of damages for the un-
lawful taking of wildlife; [ or]
(c) Affect the applicability of ORS 31.600 to an action ; or
(d) Affect any other available remedies, including the recovery of noneconomic damages .
(5) This section does not create a new cause of action or alter any existing cause of action.
SECTION 5.
 Section 14, chapter 611, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 14.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Cultural burn” means the intentional application of fire to land by an Indian  tribe or cul-
tural fire practitioner to  achieve cultural goals or objectives identified by a tribal ordinance, tradi-
tional tribal custom or law of  an Indian tribe, such as subsistence, ceremonial activities, biodiversity
or other benefits.
(b) “Cultural fire practitioner” means a person associated with  an Indian tribe with experience
in burning to meet cultural goals or objectives,  including subsistence, ceremonial activities,
biodiversity or other benefits.
(c) “Indian tribe” means a federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon.
(2) The State Forestry Department shall establish  a Prescribed Fire Liability Pilot Program and
administer the program.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the  Department of Consumer and Business
Services shall administer reimbursements for claims under the program.
(4) The program must be administered to:
(a) Increase the pace and scale of the use of prescribed fire and cultural burning.
(b) Reduce barriers for conducting prescribed fires and cultural burning.
(c) Support coverage for  losses from prescribed fires and cultural burning by nonpublic entities
such as cultural fire practitioners, private landowners, nongovernmental entities,  Certified Burn
Managers as defined in ORS 526.005, companies, contractors and operators.
(d) Support nonpublic entities,  such as cultural fire practitioners, private landowners, nongov-
ernmental entities, Certified Burn Managers,  companies, contractors and operators, that are alleged
to have caused damages resulting from prescribed fires or cultural burning.
(5) Under the program, the Department of Consumer and Business Services may  reimburse
claims related to:
(a) A prescribed  fire conducted or supervised by the State Forester, a forest protective associ-
[3]
HB 4100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ation or a rangeland protection association, pursuant to ORS 477.315 to 477.325.
(b) A prescribed fire in a forest protection district, as described in ORS  477.205 to 477.281, that
is conducted or supervised by a Certified Burn Manager pursuant to ORS 526.360.
(c) A cultural burn conducted or supervised by a cultural fire practitioner.
(6) The Department of Consumer and Business Services may only reimburse a  claim for recov-
erable economic damages, as described in ORS 477.089 (2), or  for actual costs, as described in ORS
477.068, subject to the provisions of ORS 477.120, if:
(a) The State Forester,  a forest protective association, a rangeland protection association or a
Certified  Burn  Manager reviewed and approved a burn plan before the prescribed fire or cultural
burning;
(b) Any necessary permit was  obtained before the prescribed fire or cultural burning was con-
ducted;
(c) The prescribed fire  or cultural burning complied with any requirements under a burn plan
or permit;
(d) The claim was submitted to the Department of Consumer  and Business Services not more
than 60 days after an incident report was completed  or as specified by rule by the State Forestry
Department; and
(e) The State Forestry Department has  certified that the claim satisfies the requirements of
paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection.
(7) The limitations imposed  by ORS 30.271 apply to claims under this section for losses arising
from a prescribed fire or cultural burn.
(8) The State Forestry Department:
(a) Shall consult with other relevant state agencies, cultural  fire practitioners, the State
Forester, forest protective associations, rangeland protection associations and Certified  Burn Man-
agers to establish guidelines for the program.
(b) Shall adopt the guidelines by rule.
(c) Shall make the guidelines publicly available on a department website.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, shall adopt rules  to determine how claims
under the program will be accepted and processed.
(e) Shall adopt by  rule a definition of the term “prescribed fire” for purposes of implementing
this section.
(f) Shall adopt rules establishing requirements for incident reports for prescribed fires  and cul-
tural burning.
(g) May adopt rules imposing requirements for eligibility for reimbursement of a claim under this
section that are in addition to eligibility requirements described in subsection (6) of this section.
(9) A person who interacts  with an Indian tribe or cultural fire practitioner pursuant to this
section shall respect tribal sovereignty, customs and culture.
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state’s liability  for all claims under this
section and the guidelines developed by the State Forestry Department pursuant to subsection (8)
of this section, shall be limited as described in this section and to the  amount in the Prescribed Fire
Claims Fund established by section 15 , chapter 611, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023 Act ].
(11) The provisions of ORS 183.310 to 183.497 do not apply to rules adopted under this section.
(12) This section does not undermine or diminish the exercise of tribal sovereignty.
SECTION 6.
(1) The amendments to ORS 477.089 and section 14, chapter 611, Oregon
Laws 2023, by sections 4 and 5 of this 2024 Act apply to claims that arise before, on or  after
[4]
HB 4100
1
2
3
4
5
6
the effective date of this 2024 Act and to actions  in which a court has not entered a final
judgment before the effective date of this 2024 Act.
(2) As used in subsection (1) of this section, “final judgment” means a judgment that  is
not subject to further appeal or review or for which the time to file an appeal  has expired
without a party filing an appeal.
[5]