Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.101 is amended to read:
336.101. (1) The Early Learning Kindergarten Readiness Partnership and Innovation Program  is
established for  the purpose of improving the readiness of children for kindergarten. The program
shall be administered by the Early Learning [ Council] Division as provided by this section.
(2) The [ Early Learning Council ] division shall provide grants under this section based on :
(a) Criteria established by the Early Learning Council  by rule  as described in subsection (3)
of this section; and
(b) Recommendations of the funding advisory committee  convened as described in sub-
section (4) of this section .
(3) Criteria  for grants provided under this section  may include requirements that an appli-
cant must meet one or more of the following criteria:
(a) Form a partnership with at least  one provider of early learning services, child care provider
or elementary school;
(b) Form partnerships with community-based providers of early childhood  services to provide
preschool and other early-learning strategies;
(c) Establish ambitious but meaningful targets for kindergarten readiness;
(d) Invest resources in students who meet criteria established by the council by rule;
(e) Align with, and supplement, federal  programs to provide moneys for educational purposes;
and
(f) Agree to report to, and partner with, any Early Learning Hubs serving the region.
(4) The division shall convene  a funding advisory committee to make recommendations
for grants provided under  this section. The committee must consist of representatives from
school districts and education service districts and  representatives of providers of early
learning services or child care providers. At  least half of the members of the advisory com-
mittee must represent school districts and education service districts.
[(3)] (5) Priority for grants provided under this section may be for programs that:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3619
SB 798
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(a) Assist children in becoming ready for kindergarten or being successful in kindergarten; or
(b) Share professional development strategies and resources with  providers of early learning
services, child care providers and kindergarten teachers.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 336.104 is amended to read:
336.104. (1) The  Early Learning Kindergarten Readiness Partnership and Innovation Account is
established within the Early Learning Division Fund. Separate records shall  be maintained for
moneys in the account. Interest earned by the account shall be credited to the account.
(2) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Department of Education  for
use by the  Early Learning [ Council] Division for the Early Learning  Kindergarten Readiness
Partnership and Innovation Program described in ORS 336.101.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education for use by the Early Learning  Division, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000, which
shall be deposited in the Early Learning Kindergarten  Readiness Partnership and Innovation
Account established by ORS 336.104 for distribution as follows:
(1) At least $10,000,000 to school districts and  education service districts that are eligible
to receive grants under the Early Learning Kindergarten Readiness  Partnership and Inno-
vation Program described in ORS 336.101; and
(2) Any amounts not distributed as provided by subsection (1) of this section to  entities
other than  school districts and education service districts that are eligible to receive grants
under the Early Learning Kindergarten Readiness Partnership and Innovation Program.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]