Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall conduct a study  of the
Small Business Innovation Research matching grant program  administered by the Oregon
Innovation Council. The department shall submit a report of its findings to  the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to economic development in the  manner
provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3185