Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter 672, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Secretary of State, is increased by $2,500,000  for election security en-
hancements.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 642,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for operations, from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from  the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services,  but ex-
cluding lottery funds  and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 642, Oregon Laws
2019, collected or received  by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $270,022 for management occupancy reviews conducted  by the Housing and Community
Services Department.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  479, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys, or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds  and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of  Public Safety Standards and Training, for
operations, is increased by $429,087 for expenditure  of an Assistance to Firefighters grant
award on mobile firefighter training equipment.
SECTION 4.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter  518, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from  charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section  2, chapter 518, Oregon
Laws 2019, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 287
HB 5204
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Chief Human Resources Office, is increased by $307,486 to conduct a  study of engineering
classifications.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 2  (6), chapter 518, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30,
2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges, but excluding lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 518, Oregon Laws 2019, col-
lected or received by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for enterprise asset
management, is increased  by $2,300,000 for infrastructure improvements at the Mill Creek
Corporate Center.
SECTION 5.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 519, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys  or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Commission for the Blind, is  increased by $156,098 for the pur-
chase of vending machine equipment for the commission’s business enterprise program  and
for the case management migration update project.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 3, chapter 519, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June  30,
2021, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received
by the Commission for the Blind,  is increased by $2,552,443 for the purchase of vending ma-
chine equipment for the  commission’s business enterprise program and for the case man-
agement migration update project.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of $86,953
is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2021,  as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses by the  Department of State Lands from the Submerged Lands Enhancement Fund
established under ORS 274.388.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter  454, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds,  federal funds
and funds described in section 2, chapter 454,  Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
Department of State Lands, for Common School Fund programs, is decreased by $86,953.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter  454, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal  funds
collected or received by the Department of State Lands, for Common School Fund programs,
is increased by $427,008 for  the expenditure of federal grant funding for ongoing wetlands
program development and preliminary program development for the eventual  assumption of
permitting authority under 33 U.S.C. 1344 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 5 (1)(a), chapter 664, Oregon Laws  2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for severity resource expenses, is decreased by $2,373,669.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State  Forestry Department by section 1 (2), chapter 664, Oregon Laws 2019, for
[2]
HB 5204
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for fire  protection, is increased by $12,757,565 for the
payment of emergency firefighting costs, interest expenses and  severity resources associated
with the 2019 forest fire season.
SECTION 11.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter  664, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 664,  Oregon Laws 2019, collected
or received by the State Forestry Department,  for fire protection, is increased by $23,587,897
for the payment of emergency firefighting costs associated with the 2019 forest fire season.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (3), chapter 302,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June  30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by  the State Parks and Recreation Department, for community support
and grants, is increased by $665,000 for the expenditure of federal  grant funds for historic
revitalization.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (4), chapter 535,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 3, chapter 535,  Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
Water Resources Department, for technical services, is increased by $260,484 for  the ex-
penditure of federal grant funds  for work on the rehabilitation of high hazard potential dams.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter  689, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the Pacific
Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not described
in section 2, chapter 689, Oregon Laws 2019, collected  or received by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife, for the Wildlife Division, is increased by $300,000  to provide permit
consultation and technical support for the Jordan Cove Energy Project.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter 698, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the State Department of Energy, is increased  by $1,075,258 to expend grant
funds related to the siting of potential renewable energy development projects.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 452,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and including  federal funds for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 452,
Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the State Department  of Agriculture, for natural
resources, is increased by $1,230,000 to address increasing workload around the hemp pro-
gram.
SECTION 17.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
[3]
HB 5204
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter  692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds  and federal
funds, collected or received by the  Department of Justice, for the General Counsel Division,
is increased by $350,877 for the Business Transactions Section.
SECTION 18.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds  and federal
funds, collected or  received by the Department of Justice, for the Civil Enforcement Division,
is increased by $233,801 for an anti-poaching campaign.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of  Revenue by section 2, chapter 220, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Corporate Division, is increased by $387,375, for the
implementation of the corporate activity tax established under  chapter 122, Oregon Laws
2019.
SECTION 20.
Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 612,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements  from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
612, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department  of Revenue, for the Corpo-
rate Division, is increased by $9,984,869  for the implementation of the corporate activity tax
established under chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 3, chapter 220, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the core systems replacement  program and the imple-
mentation of the corporate  activity tax established under chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019, is
decreased by $1,165,000.
SECTION 22.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  amount of
$3,630,000 is established for  the biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Department of
Revenue, for the core systems replacement program, for the  implementation of the corpo-
rate activity tax established under chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 23. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (1), chapter 612, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for administration, is decreased by $28,559.
SECTION 24. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  612, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
612, Oregon  Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for adminis-
tration, is decreased by $7,592.
[4]
HB 5204
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 25.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter 612, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Personal Tax and Compliance Division, is  decreased
by $287,641.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  612, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
612, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the Personal
Tax and Compliance Division, is decreased by $5,870.
SECTION 27.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (4), chapter 612, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Business Division, is decreased by $122,072.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter  612, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
612, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for  the Business
Division, is decreased by $62,885.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (6), chapter 612, Oregon  Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Information  Technology Services Division, is de-
creased by $128,780.
SECTION 30. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 612,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements  from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
612, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department of Revenue,  for the Infor-
mation Technology Services Division, is decreased by $20,964.
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter  612, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
612, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received  by the Department of Revenue, for the
marijuana program, is decreased by $14,053.
SECTION 32. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 7 (8), chapter 220,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payments  of grant-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services by the Department of Education from  the Statewide Education Initiatives
Account established in ORS 327.250, for early warning  system grants, is decreased by
$216,820.
[5]
HB 5204
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
SECTION 33.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (2), chapter  220, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of
Education from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established in ORS 327.250,  for
operations, is increased by $216,820.
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter  220, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of
Education from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established in ORS 327.250,  for
professional development and training for educators, is decreased by $349,586.
SECTION 35. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (2), chapter  220, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of
Education from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established in ORS 327.250,  for
operations, is increased by $349,586.
SECTION 36. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[6]