Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Transitions into Kindergarten is established.
(2) The task force consists of 17 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the  Senate shall appoint two members from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall appoint 13 members as follows:
(A) One member who represents school districts;
(B) One member who represents education service districts;
(C) One member who represents the system  designated to protect and advocate for the
rights of individuals with disabilities;
(D) One member who  represents the parent information and training center for families
with children with disabilities;
(E) One member who is a parent  of a child under five years of age who is receiving early
childhood special education or early intervention services;
(F) One member who is a parent of a child  in any grade from kindergarten through grade
five who requires special education because the child has an intellectual disability  or a de-
velopmental delay;
(G) One member who is a parent  of a child in any grade from kindergarten through grade
five who has dyslexia;
(H) One member who is a kindergarten educator in a public school of this state;
(I) One member who is a public preschool provider;
(J) One member who is a  court appointed special advocate with experience supporting
children in preschool or kindergarten who are receiving early childhood special education  or
early intervention services or receiving special education while in the child welfare system;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2802
SB 953
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(K) One member who is a child welfare caseworker;
(L) One member who is a member of the State Interagency Coordinating Council; and
(M) One member who represents the Department of Education.
(3) The task force shall make recommendations  about best practices for supporting the
transition into kindergarten of children with a disability.
(4) To accomplish the purpose of the task force, the task force shall consider:
(a) Best practices for reviewing, before a child with a  disability begins kindergarten, the
child’s individualized education program or the education plan developed  for the child in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794;
(b) Best practices for ensuring that  accommodations, adaptations, special equipment and
services required for a child with a disability are available and ready to be used by the child
on the first day of kindergarten;
(c) Best practices for conducting activities to identify, locate and evaluate children  who
may need special education and who  will transition into kindergarten the following school
year or who are currently in kindergarten and not receiving special education;
(d) Summer  programs that would assist a child with a disability in becoming familiar with
a new school environment; and
(e) Opportunities for school personnel that are compensable and that assist the  transi-
tion into kindergarten of a child with a disability, including:
(A) In-person conferences  between the child’s preschool provider and school district
staff, including kindergarten educators and school district specialists; and
(B) Meetings between kindergarten educators and an incoming  child with a disability in
a setting that includes the child’s preschool providers.
(5) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to education no later than December 15, 2026.
(12) The Department of Education shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
[2]
SB 953
1
2
3
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
[3]