Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health Authority shall study barriers to accessing dental care
for seniors in this state.  The authority shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to health no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1364