Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Health care provider” has the meaning given that term in ORS 192.556.
(b) “Sex trafficking” has the meaning given that term in ORS 137.221.
(c) “Sexual assault” has the meaning given that term in ORS 181A.323.
(2) A person commits the crime of unlawful disclosure of information  about a victim of
sexual assault or sex trafficking if the person is a health care provider who:
(a) In the course of providing  health care to a patient learns that the patient was a vic-
tim of sexual assault or sex trafficking; and
(b) Without the  patient’s consent or authorization, knowingly discloses the information
regarding the sexual assault or sex  trafficking to a third person in writing, in person or
electronically, including by posting the information to a website.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to a  health care provider disclosing pro-
tected health information as permitted by ORS 192.553 to  192.581 or the federal Health In-
surance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996  (P.L. 104-191) and regulations adopted
under that law including 45 C.F.R. parts 160 and 164.
(4)(a) Unlawful disclosure of information about a victim of sexual assault or sex traf-
ficking is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful disclosure of  information
about a  victim of sexual assault or sex trafficking is a Class C felony if the health care pro-
vider, at the time  of committing the offense, has one or more prior convictions under this
section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1219