Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 171.555 is amended to read:
171.555. (1)(a) Upon  election, the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Rep-
resentatives shall appoint a Joint Committee on Ways and Means. At least  two of the members ap-
pointed from each house shall  have had previous experience on the Joint Committee on Ways and
Means. If the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the President of  the Senate is a member,
either may  designate from time to time an alternate from among the members of the respective
house to exercise powers as a member of the committee except that  the alternate shall not preside
if the Speaker or President is chair. The President of the Senate shall appoint one cochair for the
joint committee and the Speaker  of the House of Representatives shall appoint one cochair for the
joint committee. The cochairs of the joint committee shall alternate as presiding officers.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a member  of the Legislative As-
sembly may  not serve on the Joint Committee on Ways and Means or a subcommittee of the
Joint Committee on Ways and Means if the member, a relative of the  member or a business
with which the  member or relative is associated is a party to a contract with the State of
Oregon for the provision of goods  or services to the state, including but not limited to capital
construction projects. The definitions in ORS 244.020 apply to this paragraph.
(2) The cochairs of the Joint Committee on Ways and Means are authorized to cause to be  in-
vestigated, either through the whole  of the committee or by a selected subcommittee, any complaints
about the management or conduct of  any of the state institutions, departments, officers or activities
for the support of which state money has been appropriated, or for which  appropriations may here-
after be made.
(3) The Joint Committee on Ways and Means may not transact business unless a  quorum is
present. A quorum consists of a majority of committee  members from the House of Representatives
and a majority of committee members from the Senate.
(4) Action by the Joint Committee on Ways and Means requires the affirmative vote of a  ma-
jority of committee members from the House of Representatives and a majority of committee mem-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2512
SB 527
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
bers from the Senate.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 291.330 is amended to read:
291.330. (1) The Emergency Board shall be composed of the  President of the Senate, the Speaker
of the  House of Representatives, the chairpersons of the Senate and House Ways and Means Com-
mittees, eight other members of the Senate, at least four of whom shall  have had some previous
experience on the Ways and Means  Committee, to be appointed by the President of the Senate and
confirmed by a majority of all the members elected to the Senate, and eight  other members of the
House, at least four of whom shall have had some previous experience on  the Ways and Means
Committee, to be appointed by the Speaker and confirmed by a majority of all the  members elected
to the House.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a member of the Legislative  Assembly
may not serve on the Emergency Board if the member, a relative  of the member or a busi-
ness with which the member or relative is associated is a  party to a contract with the State
of Oregon for the provision of goods or services to the state, including but not limited to
capital construction projects. The definitions in ORS 244.020 apply to this subsection.
SECTION 3.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]