Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 163A.215 is amended to read:
163A.215. (1)(a) A notifying agency or a  supervising agency shall release, upon request, any in-
formation that may be necessary to protect the public concerning sex  offenders who reside in a
specific area or concerning a specific sex offender.
(b) A notifying  agency or a supervising agency may release sex offender information to a law
enforcement agency if the notifying agency or supervising  agency determines that the release of
information is in the public interest.
(c) In addition  to the release of information described in this subsection and ORS 137.540,
144.260 and 441.373, a notifying agency or a supervising agency may release sex offender information
to the public in accordance with subsections (2) to (4) of this section.
(2) If the sex offender is classified as a level three sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (3):
(a) The Department of State Police shall release sex offender information on a  website main-
tained by the department; and
(b) The supervising agency or a notifying agency may release sex offender information to:
(A) A person that resides with the sex offender;
(B) A person with whom the sex offender has a significant relationship;
(C) Residential neighbors and churches, community parks,  schools and child care centers, con-
venience stores, businesses and other places that children or other potential victims may frequent;
(D) A long term care facility, as defined in ORS 442.015, or a residential care  facility, as defined
in ORS 443.400, if the agency knows that the sex offender is seeking admission to the facility; and
(E) Local or regional media sources.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of this section, the Department of State  Police may not use
the Internet to make available to the public information concerning a sex offender classified as a
level three sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (3) while  the person is under the supervision of the
Psychiatric  Security  Review Board, unless the department is authorized to do so by a request of the
supervising agency.
(4) If the sex offender is classified as a level two sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (2)[ ,]:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4247
HB 3839
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
(a) The Department of State  Police shall ensure that sex offender information is available
to school districts and any entity that contracts with a school district to  provide school
visitor management services; and
(b) The  supervising agency or a notifying agency may release sex offender information to the
persons or entities described in subsection (2)(b)(A) to (D) of this section.
(5) If the sex offender is classified as a level one sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (1)[ ,]:
(a) The Department of State  Police shall ensure that sex offender information is available
to school districts and any entity that contracts with a school district to  provide school
visitor management services; and
(b) The supervising agency or a notifying agency may release sex offender information to a
person described in subsection (2)(b)(A) of this section.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) “Notifying agency” means the Department of State Police, a  city police department, a county
sheriff’s office or a police department established by a university under ORS 352.121.
(b) “Sex offender information” means information that the Department of State  Police deter-
mines by rule is appropriate for release to the public.
(c) “Supervising agency” means a governmental  entity responsible for supervising a person re-
quired to report as a sex offender under ORS 163A.010 or 163A.015.
[2]