Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 192.820 is amended to read:
192.820. As used in ORS 192.820 to 192.868:
(1) “Actual address” means:
(a) A residential, work or school street address of an individual specified on  the application of
the individual to be a program participant; or
(b) The name of the county in which the program participant resides or the name or number  of
the election precinct in which the program participant is registered to vote.
(2) “Address Confidentiality Program” means the program established under ORS 192.822.
(3) “Application assistant” means an employee of or a volunteer serving a public or  private en-
tity designated by the Attorney General under ORS 192.854 to assist  individuals with applications
to participate in the Address Confidentiality Program.
(4) “Health care provider” means an individual who is authorized in  this state to provide phys-
ical and behavioral health care services and who provides reproductive and  gender-affirming health
care  services.
(5) “Program participant”  means an individual accepted into the Address Confidentiality Pro-
gram under ORS 192.820 to 192.868.
(6) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(7) “Public record” has the meaning given that term in ORS 192.311.
(8) “Substitute address” means  an address designated by the Attorney General under the Ad-
dress Confidentiality Program.
(9) “Victim of a sexual offense” means:
(a) An individual against whom a sexual offense has been committed, as described  in ORS
163.305 to 163.467, 163.427, 163.466 or 163.525; or
(b) Any other individual designated by the Attorney General by rule.
(10) “Victim of bias” means:
(a) An individual  against whom a bias crime or bias incident, as those terms are defined in ORS
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2986
HB 2710
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
147.380, has been committed; or
(b) Any other individual designated by the Attorney General by rule.
(11) “Victim of child abduction” means:
(a) An individual against whom kidnapping or custodial interference has been committed,
as described in ORS 163.215 to 163.257, when the individual was under 18 years of age; or
(b) Any other individual designated by the Attorney General by rule.
[(11)] (12) “Victim of domestic violence” means:
(a) An individual against whom domestic violence has been committed, as defined in ORS
135.230, 181A.355 or 412.072;
(b) An individual who has been a victim of abuse, as defined in ORS 107.705; or
(c) Any other individual designated a victim of domestic violence by the Attorney General by
rule.
[(12)] (13) “Victim of human trafficking” means:
(a) An individual against whom an offense described in ORS 163.263, 163.264  or 163.266 has been
committed; or
(b) Any other individual designated by the Attorney General by rule.  In adopting rules under
this subsection, the  Attorney General shall consider individuals against whom an act recognized as
a severe form of trafficking in persons under 22 U.S.C. 7102 has been committed.
[(13)] (14) “Victim of stalking” means:
(a) An individual against whom stalking has been committed, as described in ORS 163.732; or
(b) Any other individual designated by the Attorney General by rule.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 192.822 is amended to read:
192.822. (1) The Address Confidentiality Program is established in  the Department of Justice to:
(a) Protect the confidentiality of the actual address of a health care provider or a victim of do-
mestic violence, a sexual offense, stalking, bias , [ or] human trafficking  or child abduction ; and
(b) Prevent assailants or potential assailants of the health  care provider or victim from finding
the health care provider or victim through public records.
(2) The Attorney General shall designate  a substitute address for a program participant and act
as the agent of the program participant for purposes  of service of all legal process in this state and
receiving and forwarding first-class, certified or registered mail.
(3) The Attorney General  is not required to forward any packages or mail other than first-class,
certified or registered mail to the program participant.
(4) The Attorney General is not required to track or otherwise maintain records  of any mail
received on behalf of a program participant unless the mail is certified or registered.
SECTION 3.  ORS 192.826 is amended to read:
192.826. (1) Any of the following individuals with the assistance of an application assistant  may
file an application  with the Attorney General to participate in the Address Confidentiality Program:
(a) An adult individual.
(b) A  parent or guardian acting on behalf of a minor when the minor resides with the parent
or guardian.
(c) A guardian acting on behalf of an incapacitated individual.
(2) The application must  be dated, signed and verified by the applicant and the application as-
sistant who assisted in the preparation of the application.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the application must contain all  of the
following:
[2]
HB 2710
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A statement by the applicant  that the applicant or the applicant’s child or ward is a victim
of domestic violence, a sexual offense, stalking, bias , [ or] human trafficking  or child abduction and
that the applicant fears for the applicant’s safety or the safety of the applicant’s child or ward.
(b) Evidence that the applicant or the applicant’s child or ward is a victim of domestic violence,
a sexual offense, stalking, bias , [ or] human  trafficking  or child abduction . This evidence may in-
clude any of the following:
(A) Law enforcement, court or other federal, state or local government records or files;
(B) Documentation from a public or private entity that provides assistance to victims of domes-
tic violence, a sexual offense,  stalking, bias , [ or] human trafficking or child abduction if the appli-
cant or the applicant’s child or ward is an alleged victim of domestic violence, a  sexual offense,
stalking, bias , [ or] human trafficking  or child abduction ;
(C) Documentation from a religious, medical or other professional from whom the applicant has
sought assistance in dealing with the alleged domestic violence, sexual offense,  stalking, bias , [ or]
human trafficking  or child abduction ; or
(D) Other forms of evidence as determined by the Attorney General by rule.
(c) A statement by the applicant that  disclosure of the actual address of the applicant would
endanger the safety of the applicant or the safety of the applicant’s child or ward.
(d) A statement by the applicant that the applicant:
(A) Resides at a location in this state that is not known by assailants or potential  assailants of
the applicant or the applicant’s child or ward; and
(B) Will not disclose the location to assailants or potential assailants  of the applicant or the
applicant’s child or ward while the applicant is a program participant.
(e) Written consent permitting the Attorney General to act as an agent for the applicant for  the
service of all legal process in this state and the receipt of first-class, certified or registered mail.
(f) The mailing  address and telephone number at which the Attorney General can contact the
applicant.
(g) The actual address that the applicant requests not be  disclosed by the Attorney General that
directly relates to the increased risk of the applicant or the  applicant’s child or ward as a victim
of domestic violence, a sexual offense, stalking, bias , [ or] human trafficking  or child abduction .
(h) A sworn statement by the applicant that  to the best of the applicant’s knowledge the infor-
mation contained in the application is true.
(i) A recommendation by  an application assistant that the applicant be a participant in the Ad-
dress Confidentiality Program.
(4) Upon the filing of a properly completed application and upon approval  by the Attorney
General, the Attorney General shall certify the applicant as a program participant.
(5) Upon certification, the Attorney General shall issue an Address Confidentiality Program
authorization card to the program participant. The Address  Confidentiality Program authorization
card is valid as long as the program participant remains certified under the program.
(6) The term of certification shall be  for a period of time determined by the Attorney General
by rule, unless prior to the end of the period one of the following occurs:
(a) The program participant  withdraws the certification by filing with the Attorney General a
request for withdrawal signed by the program participant and acknowledged in writing by a notary
public or an application assistant; or
(b) The Attorney General cancels the certification under ORS 192.834.
(7) A  program participant may renew the certification by filing an application for renewal with
[3]
HB 2710
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
the Attorney General at least 30 days prior to expiration of the current certification.
(8) The Attorney  General shall establish by rule the requirements for an application filed by a
health care provider.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 192.854 is amended to read:
192.854. (1) The Attorney General may designate employees of or volunteers serving  public or
private entities  that provide counseling and shelter services to victims of domestic violence, a sexual
offense, stalking , [ or] human trafficking  or child abduction  as application assistants to assist indi-
viduals applying to participate in the Address Confidentiality Program.
(2) Any assistance rendered to applicants for participation in the Address Confidentiality  Pro-
gram by the Attorney General or an application assistant is not considered legal advice.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]