Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Forestry Department shall study and make recommendations
concerning wildfire prevention.
(2) The department shall provide the results of the study in a report  to an interim com-
mittee of the Legislative  Assembly relating to natural resources, in the manner provided by
ORS 192.245, no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eight-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1933