Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act shall  be known and may be cited as
Kayleigh’s Law.
SECTION 2. (1) At the time of sentencing on a crime described in subsection (4) of this
section, at the request of the victim of the crime, or the prosecutor on behalf  of the victim,
the court shall enter a restraining order prohibiting the defendant from contacting the  vic-
tim.
(2)(a) A certified true copy of the restraining order shall be provided to the defendant
at the time of  sentencing. The order must contain a declaration that the defendant appeared
in person before the court and received a copy of the order.
(b) The clerk of the court shall immediately deliver to the county sheriff a copy  of the
restraining order. Upon receipt of a copy of the restraining  order, the county sheriff shall
immediately enter the  restraining order into the Law Enforcement Data System maintained
by the Department of State Police and the databases of  the National Crime Information
Center of the United States Department of Justice.
(c) Entry into the Law Enforcement Data System constitutes  notice to all law enforce-
ment agencies of the existence of the restraining order. The restraining order is fully en-
forceable in any county or tribal land in this state.
(d) When a restraining order has been entered into the  Law Enforcement Data System
and the databases of the National Crime Information Center of the  United States Depart-
ment of Justice under this subsection, a county sheriff shall cooperate with a  request from
a law enforcement agency from any  other jurisdiction to verify the existence of the re-
straining order or to transmit a copy of the restraining order to the requesting  jurisdiction.
(3)(a) A restraining order described in this section does not expire, and is valid for  the
defendant’s natural lifetime unless any of the following occurs:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3982
SB 1147
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The defendant makes a showing to the court that either the victim has died, or  that
the conviction has been dismissed, set aside or overturned or  that the defendant has been
pardoned; or
(B) The victim  submits a written request to the court for early termination of the order.
(b) The defendant may make a showing as described  in this subsection by filing a motion
for early termination of the  order. If the court grants the motion, the court shall cause the
victim to be notified of the termination of the order.
(c) If the  victim files a written request for early termination of the order under this
subsection, the court may hold a hearing to verify the victim’s request. If the court  termi-
nates the  order pursuant to the victim’s request, the court shall cause the defendant to be
notified of the termination of the order.
(d) If  the court enters an order terminating a restraining order described in this section,
the clerk of the  court shall immediately deliver a copy of the termination order to the county
sheriff with whom the original restraining  order was filed. Upon receipt of the termination
order, the county sheriff shall promptly remove the original restraining order from the Law
Enforcement Data System and the databases of the National Crime Information  Center of
the United States Department of Justice.
(4) This section applies to convictions for:
(a) A crime listed in ORS 137.700 or 137.707;
(b) A sex crime as defined in ORS 163A.005 constituting a felony;
(c) Strangulation under ORS 163.187 constituting a felony;
(d) Assault in the fourth degree under ORS 163.160 (3), constituting domestic violence;
(e) Invasion of personal privacy in the first degree under ORS 163.701;
(f) Stalking under ORS 163.732 constituting a felony; and
(g) Any felony involving the  discharge, use or threatened use of a dangerous or deadly
weapon or knowingly or intentionally causing serious physical injury to another person.
SECTION 3.
(1) A victim of a  crime described in subsection (8) of this section may peti-
tion the court for a restraining order prohibiting  the defendant from contacting the victim
if:
(a) The judgment of conviction was entered before the effective date of this 2025 Act; or
(b) The victim did not request issuance of the order at the time of sentencing.
(2) A petition for an  order described in this section must be filed in the circuit court in
which the judgment of conviction was entered.
(3) The court shall review the  petition and may hold a hearing. If the court determines
that the petitioner was the victim of a crime  described in subsection (8) of this section, the
court shall enter a  restraining order prohibiting the defendant from contacting the
petitioner.
(4)(a) If the circuit court enters a restraining order under this section:
(A) The clerk  of the court shall provide, without charge, certified true copies of the pe-
tition and the restraining order to the petitioner and shall have a  certified true copy of the
petition and the restraining order delivered to the county sheriff for service  upon the de-
fendant.
(B) The county sheriff shall cause the defendant to be served personally.
(b) Upon completion of service, the  county sheriff shall immediately enter the restraining
order into the Law Enforcement Data System maintained by  the Department of State Police
[2]
SB 1147
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and the databases of  the National Crime Information Center of the United States Depart-
ment of Justice.
(c) Entry into the Law Enforcement  Data System constitutes notice to all law enforce-
ment agencies of the existence of the restraining order. The restraining order is fully en-
forceable in any county or tribal land in this state.
(d) When a restraining order  has been entered into the Law Enforcement Data System
and the databases of  the National Crime Information Center of the United States Depart-
ment of Justice  under this subsection, a county sheriff shall cooperate with a request from
a law enforcement agency from any other jurisdiction to verify  the existence of the re-
straining order or to transmit a copy of the restraining order to the requesting  jurisdiction.
(e) If the county sheriff cannot complete service within 14 days after accepting the re-
straining order  and petition, the sheriff shall notify the petitioner, at the address provided
by the petitioner, that the  documents have not been served. If the petitioner does not re-
spond within 10 days, the sheriff shall hold the restraining order and petition for future
service and file a return to the clerk of the court showing that service was not completed.
(5)(a) A restraining order described in this section does not expire, and is valid for  the
defendant’s natural lifetime unless any of the following occurs:
(A) The defendant makes a showing to the  court that either the petitioner has died, or
that the conviction has been dismissed, set aside or overturned or that  the defendant has
been pardoned; or
(B) The petitioner  submits a written request to the court for early termination of the
order.
(b) The defendant may make a showing as described  in this subsection by filing a motion
for early termination of the  order. If the court grants the motion, the court shall cause the
petitioner to be notified of the termination of the order.
(c) If the petitioner files a written request  for early termination of the order under this
subsection, the court may hold a hearing to verify the petitioner’s request. If the court  ter-
minates the  order pursuant to the petitioner’s request, the court shall cause the defendant
to be notified of the termination of the order.
(d) If  the court enters an order terminating a restraining order described in this section,
the clerk of the  court shall immediately deliver a copy of the termination order to the county
sheriff with whom the original restraining  order was filed. Upon receipt of the termination
order, the county sheriff shall promptly remove the original restraining order from the Law
Enforcement Data System and the databases of the National Crime Information  Center of
the United States Department of Justice.
(6) A filing  fee, service fee or hearing fee may not be charged for proceedings described
in this section.
(7)(a) The State Court Administrator shall produce  the forms for petitions and restrain-
ing orders for use under this section and section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(b) The State Court Administrator shall provide the forms to the clerks of the  circuit
court who shall make the forms available to the public.
(8) This section applies to convictions for:
(a) A crime listed in ORS 137.700 or 137.707;
(b) A sex crime as defined in ORS 163A.005 constituting a felony;
(c) Strangulation under ORS 163.187 constituting a felony;
[3]
SB 1147
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
(d) Assault in the fourth degree under ORS 163.160 (3), constituting domestic violence;
(e) Invasion of personal privacy in the first degree under ORS 163.701;
(f) Stalking under ORS 163.732 constituting a felony; and
(g) Any felony involving the  discharge, use or threatened use of a dangerous or deadly
weapon or knowingly or intentionally causing serious physical injury to another person.
SECTION 4.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to sentencing proceedings occurring on or
after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]