Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund,  the amount of $_______, for distribution to the Grant Soil and Water
Conservation District, which may be  expended for employing two or three persons, for two
years, to assist the forest supervisor  of Malheur National Forest with aquatics monitoring,
and for any overhead costs associated with employing the two or three persons.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2456