Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Assessment” means an assessment of an individual’s  health status and a determi-
nation of whether the individual needs the level  of care required for enrollment in a PACE
program.
(b) “PACE program” means a program of all-inclusive care for the elderly as  described
in 42 U.S.C. 1396u-4.
(2) Each biennium, the Department of Human Services  shall determine the number of
full-time staff needed to ensure that each assessment can be  completed no later than 20 days
after the date the assessment is requested.
(3) The  department’s agency request budget, submitted to the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services in accordance with  ORS 291.201 to 291.222, shall include a request for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 850
HB 2589
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
resources sufficient to meet the staffing levels determined under subsection (2) of  this sec-
tion.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, out of
the General Fund,  the amount of $_______, which shall be expended to hire 15 full-time em-
ployees to enable the department to complete assessments, as defined in  section 1 of this
2023 Act, in the timeline described in section 1 (2) of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[2]