Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Employment Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out  of the
General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, which may  be expended for staffing workforce re-
entry programs for adults in custody delivered through the WorkSource Oregon system.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1715