Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For any person who otherwise meets the  required criteria to be awarded
a grant under ORS 341.522 (3), the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall waive
the requirement set forth in ORS 341.522 (3)(d) if that  person attained the person’s highest
level of education as described in ORS 341.522 (3)(c) in 2020 or 2021.
(2) A waiver under subsection (1) of this section shall be applicable to grants awarded in
the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 academic years.
SECTION 2. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 222