Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2017, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $4,600,000, to provide matching funds for the
Northwest National Marine Renewable Energy Center at  Oregon State University to receive
federal funds for a deepwater test facility for utility scale wave energy converters.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1288