Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 30.902 is amended to read:
30.902. A physician licensed pursuant to ORS chapter 677 or a health care facility  as defined
in ORS 442.015 is not a manufacturer, distributor, seller  or lessor of a product for the purposes of
ORS 30.900 to 30.920 if the product is provided by the physician or health care facility  to a patient
as part of a medical procedure and the physician or health care facility  was not involved in the
design or manufacture of the product.
SECTION 2. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the amendments to
ORS 30.902 by section  1 of this 2025 Act apply to claims arising under ORS 30.900 to 30.920
before, on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(2)(a) The amendments to ORS 30.902 by section  1 of this 2025 Act do not apply to claims
for which a final judgment has been entered before the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(b) As used in this subsection, “final judgment” means a judgment for  which the time to
appeal has expired without any party filing an  appeal or that is not subject to further appeal
or review.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1260