Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Eligible costs” means:
(i) Demolition, the restoration of similar  architectural finishes, work on electrical,
plumbing and  mechanical systems and other direct structural costs of seismic retrofitting;
and
(ii) Architectural, engineering, project management,  insurance, testing and other service
costs related to retrofitting.
(B) “Eligible costs” does not mean:
(i) Remodeling or refurbishing  costs intended to enhance aesthetics, functionality or
marketability without extending seismic life safety;
(ii) Costs of abating asbestos or other hazardous materials; or
(iii) Relocation costs or loss of rent  during improvement of the seismic safety, stability
or resiliency of an eligible property.
(b) “Eligible property” means real property improvements:
(A) Constructed before January 1, 1993; and
(B) Having exteriors constructed primarily of unreinforced masonry, unreinforced con-
crete or other building materials declared seismically dangerous by city  or county ordinance
or by a city or county governing body resolution.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department  shall administer a program, to be
known as the  Unreinforced Masonry Seismic Safety Program, for the purpose of awarding
grants on an annual competitive basis from the Oregon Unreinforced Masonry Seismic Safety
Fund established under section 2 of this 2019 Act. The department shall award and disburse
grants under the program for the purposes of:
(a) Improving, on a statewide basis, the seismic safety, stability and  resiliency of eligible
properties; and
(b) Promoting improvements in seismic safety, stability  and resiliency that will lead to
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2652
HB 2208
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
private investment, job creation or retention, the establishment or  expansion of viable busi-
nesses or the creation of a stronger tax base.
(3) Grant applications must state with specificity the  proposed improvements to the
seismic safety, stability and resiliency of the eligible property. The proposed  improvements
must be sufficient to meet or exceed the  seismic performance level for eligible properties
established by the department by rule.
(4) In awarding grants under  the program, the department shall give priority to grants
for:
(a) Eligible property owned by a nonprofit corporation as defined in ORS 65.001; and
(b) Categories of eligible property identified by the department by rule.
(5) An annual grant awarded to an applicant  under this section may not exceed the lesser
of:
(a) Thirty-five percent of the total eligible costs spent on eligible properties; or
(b) $1,500,000 for each eligible property.
(6) The department shall:
(a) Develop criteria for determining  the eligibility of grant applicants and proposed
projects;
(b) Provide project oversight and monitoring for grant awardees;
(c) Provide regular updates to other state agencies that have an interest in  the carrying
out of the program;
(d) Adopt rules for the purposes of carrying out the program; and
(e) Appoint an advisory group of individuals  qualified to review grant applications, advise
on the carrying out of the  program and perform other program-related duties as determined
by the department.
(7) In adopting rules under this  section, the department may consult with other state
agencies having an interest in the carrying out of the program.
(8) If the department awards a grant, the department may not disburse the grant to  the
awardee until:
(a) The improvements to the seismic safety, stability and resiliency of the eligible  prop-
erty are substantially complete; and
(b) The awardee provides written evidence satisfactory to the department  that the
awardee has actually incurred the eligible costs described in  the grant application for im-
provements to the seismic safety, stability and resiliency of the eligible property.
(9) Except as provided in this subsection, a grant awardee  must provide the department
with the evidence described in subsection (8)(b) of this section no later than three years after
the date the grant is awarded. The department may allow an  extension of time for providing
the evidence, not to exceed two years, if  the awardee provides written evidence satisfactory
to the department that the awardee has made significant  progress toward completing the
financing, entitlement, design or construction of the improvements to  the seismic safety,
stability or  resiliency of the eligible property. If an awardee does not provide the department
with the evidence described in subsection  (8)(b) of this section within the time allowed, the
department shall retain the moneys in the fund and void the grant award.
(10) Prior to disbursing a grant under this section,  the department shall reduce the grant
amount by any other grants,  loans, tax exemptions or other financial benefits provided by
the state or other public bodies  related to improvements to the seismic safety, stability and
[2]
HB 2208
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
resiliency of the eligible property.
SECTION 2. The Oregon Unreinforced Masonry Seismic Safety Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon
Unreinforced Masonry Seismic  Safety Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund
are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development  Department for the
purpose of carrying out the Unreinforced Masonry  Seismic Safety Program described in
section 1 of this 2019 Act.  The fund shall consist of any moneys designated for deposit in the
fund or for carrying out the program, including but not  limited to appropriations or other
provisions of moneys by the Legislative Assembly, bond proceeds, and public or  private
moneys from gifts, grants or donations.
SECTION 3. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of bonds authorized pursuant to ORS
286A.035, for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to  issue lottery bonds pursuant to
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $20,000,000 in net proceeds and interest
earnings for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus  an additional
amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds  of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the Oregon Unreinforced Masonry
Seismic Safety Fund established in section 2 of this 2019 Act.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery  bond proceeds for the purpose
of carrying out the Unreinforced Masonry Seismic Safety Program described in section  1 of
this 2019 Act will  create jobs, further economic development and enhance the economic vi-
tality of Oregon communities, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Masonry and concrete buildings are an integral  part of the commercial, industrial and
nonprofit infrastructure of this state. Unreinforced  masonry and unreinforced concrete
buildings pose a significant risk to that infrastructure in the event of an earthquake.
(b) Improvements to the seismic safety, stability and resiliency of unreinforced  masonry
and unreinforced concrete buildings will create jobs and promote economic development
within this state.
SECTION 4.
This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]