Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Hyperbaric oxygen  therapy” means the systemic administration of 100 percent oxy-
gen while the patient is inside a pressurized treatment chamber.
(b) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 413.650.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall administer  a program to reimburse the cost of
hyperbaric oxygen therapy for an individual who:
(a) Is a resident of Oregon;
(b) Is a veteran;
(c) Has been diagnosed with traumatic brain injury or post-traumatic stress disorder and
has been prescribed hyperbaric oxygen therapy by a licensed health care provider;
(d) Is ineligible for medical assistance; and
(e) Has income that is at or below 400 percent of the federal poverty guidelines.
(3) The authority shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this  section and shall
explore any and all opportunities to obtain federal  financial participation in the costs of im-
plementing this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1941