Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 604.027 is amended to read:
604.027. (1) A person desiring  to record a brand on any species of livestock shall submit a
written and signed application therefor to the State  Department of Agriculture, setting forth a fac-
simile and description of the brand,  the species of livestock upon which it will be used and the
specific intended location on the animal. The  application must be accompanied by a brand
[recording] conflict research  fee of $25 for each  brand on each species of livestock on which the
brand is to be used. The person must also pay an activation fee matching the  cycle set for the ap-
proved brand under subsection (4) of this section prior to recordation of the brand. The activation
fee may not exceed [ $100] $200. Upon receipt of an application and the required fees, if the depart-
ment determines that the brand applied for is available, the department shall issue a certificate  of
recordation of the distinctive brand, the approved location on the animal and the species of livestock
to which it applies.
(2) During  September of each year the department shall attempt to notify all holders of an ex-
piring recorded brand of the need to renew the brand. The department shall attempt  the notification
by sending a renewal notice to the holder’s last address as shown on  the department’s records. The
holder of a recorded brand may renew the  brand by submitting to the department a brand renewal
fee for each brand on each species of livestock on which the brand is to  be used. The brand renewal
fee may not exceed [ $100] $200. However, if the species of livestock is  sheep, the fee may not exceed
$50.
(3) A recorded brand expires if the department does not receive the brand  renewal fee by Jan-
uary 4 next following the attempt to notify the brand holder  of the need to renew the brand. Within
60 days after a brand expires,  the department shall give written notice of the expiration by mail
addressed to the person who held the expired brand  at the last address shown on the department’s
records. The fee to activate an expired brand is  equal to the brand [ recording] conflict research  fee
plus a renewal fee. If  the person fails to activate the expired brand within one year after expiration
of the brand, the brand is considered abandoned and any person may apply for recordation and use
of that brand.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4062
HB 3680
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
(4) When issuing or renewing a  brand recordation, the department shall adjust certificate expi-
ration dates as necessary to ensure that an approximately equal number  of brand recordation expire
in each year of a four-year cycle. The department shall prorate a brand renewal fee to  reflect an
adjustment of a certificate expiration date.
(5) The department shall establish the amount of brand activation fees and brand renewal  fees
by rule.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 604.066 is amended to read:
604.066. (1) Except as provided in subsection  (2) of this section, the State Department of Agri-
culture shall charge and collect a brand inspection fee in accordance with the following:
(a) $30 for a lifetime brand inspection for Equidae;
(b) $10 per head for a brand inspection for Equidae, if the brand inspection  certificate utilized
is valid for more than eight days but less than a lifetime; or
(c) $10 per head for a brand inspection on livestock other than  Equidae, if the brand inspection
certificate utilized is valid for more than eight days.
(2) In accordance with  the provisions of ORS chapter 183, the department shall establish a brand
inspection fee on cattle and cattle  hides for which a brand inspection certificate is valid for eight
days. The fee shall be not less than [ $1] $1.35 and not more than [ $1.35] $1.75 per head  of cattle and
not more than [ $2] $2.50 per hide.
(3) Except as provided in this subsection or subsection (4)  of this section, the person requesting
or requiring brand inspection  to be performed shall pay the State Department of Agriculture a brand
inspection fee and the assessments authorized under ORS 577.512. Livestock  auction markets,
slaughterhouses and custom slaughtering  establishments at which brand inspection is performed
shall collect the fees and assessments and forward them to the  department. The person requesting
or requiring brand inspection for cattle delivered to a livestock  auction market is not required to
pay a brand inspection fee on cattle whose value is $10 or less. The person requesting or requiring
brand inspection is not required to pay a brand inspection fee  on cattle not more than 90 days of
age that are to be transported with their mothers to a range or pastureland outside of this state.
(4) The person requesting or requiring brand  inspection is not required to pay a brand in-
spection fee or pay assessments when Oregon cattle are being transported from any  place in this
state to  any place outside of this state and then returned to this state, if the movement is continuous
without unloading enroute, is done in the usual course of ranch operations and is not related to  a
change of ownership.
(5) Except as provided in ORS 577.512, the department shall deposit all fees paid  to it under this
chapter in the State Treasury to the credit of  the Department of Agriculture Service Fund, and such
fees are continuously appropriated to the department for administering and enforcing this  chapter.
The provisions of ORS 561.144 apply to such fees.
[2]