Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CANNABIS EQUITY BOARD
SECTION 1.
(1)(a) The Cannabis Equity Board is established  as a separate office within
the office of the Governor to provide equity oversight within Oregon’s cannabis industry.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1467
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The board shall consist of nine members appointed by  the Governor from the follow-
ing stakeholder groups:
(A) Equity operators;
(B) Registry identification cardholder representatives;
(C) Licensed health care provider representatives;
(D) Public health representatives;
(E) Cannabis producers, processors and retailers;
(F) Local equity experts and leaders; and
(G) Representatives from  community-based organizations that support individuals who
are American Indian, Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx.
(2) The members appointed under this section:
(a) Must have knowledge of the cannabis industry in this  state and be culturally compe-
tent.
(b) May not hold any other public office, except that  a member may hold a voluntary
public position or be a notary public as defined in ORS 194.215.
(3) At least five of the members may not:
(a) Have any financial or property interest in a premises where cannabis is sold,  or be a
spouse or minor  child of an individual who has a financial or property interest described in
this paragraph.
(b) Have any financial or property interest in an entity that is  partially or wholly dedi-
cated to the cultivation, manufacture,  distribution, sale, transportation or storage of
cannabis.
(c) Own stock in a corporation that has  any interest in a premises where cannabis is
cultivated, manufactured, distributed, sold, transported or stored.
(d) Receive a commission or other profit from an individual who applies for a  cannabis
equity license under section 16 of this 2021 Act.
(4) The term of office of each member of the board is  four years. A member shall hold
office until a successor has been appointed and qualified. Before  the expiration of the term
of a member, the Governor shall appoint a  successor whose term begins on September 1 next
following. A member is eligible for reappointment. If there is a vacancy for any  cause, the
Governor shall make an appointment to become immediately effective  for the unexpired
term.
(5) The  appointment of each member of the board is subject to confirmation by the Sen-
ate in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(6) The board shall be overseen by a chairperson appointed by the Governor.
(7) Each member shall be paid a salary as provided by law or, if not  so provided, as pre-
scribed by the Governor.
(8) A majority of the members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
(9)(a) The Governor may  remove a member who no longer meets the requirements of this
section or for any other cause deemed sufficient by the Governor.
(b) Before a removal under this subsection, the Governor shall  provide the member a
copy of the charges and shall fix a time when the member can be heard. The time must be
at least 10 days after the charges are provided to the member. The hearing must  be open to
the public.
(c) If the member is removed, the Governor shall file in the  office of the Secretary of
[2]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
State a complete statement of all  charges made against the member, and the findings on
those charged with a record of the proceedings.
(d) The Governor’s power of removal under  this subsection is absolute and there is no
right of review of the power of removal in any court.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Cannabis Equity Board shall:
(a) Oversee, measure and report on cannabis equity outcomes.
(b) Oversee the funding allocations under ORS 137.300 and 475B.759.
(c) Establish a mechanism to  track the funding allocations described in paragraph (b) of
this subsection.
(d) Partner with any  offices in each city and county charged with equity oversight to
monitor, measure and report equity indicators related to cannabis.
(e) Audit applications for licenses issued under section 16 of  this 2021 Act, verify infor-
mation related to the applicant’s residency and previous convictions and whether  the appli-
cant is an individual.
(f) Establish guidelines for social equity plans submitted to the Oregon Liquor Control
Commission.
(2) The board may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Cannabis Equity Board, in conjunction with  the equity liaisons of the
Oregon Health Authority and the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, shall annually review
and report on key  performance indicators of equity and any additional indicators as deter-
mined necessary by the board. The report must include a review of the  qualification criteria
described in section 16 (1)(b) of this 2021 Act to ensure that holders of licenses issued  under
section 16 of this 2021 Act represent communities most  negatively impacted by cannabis
prohibition initiatives and that the Oregon cannabis industry  is continuously becoming more
racially inclusive. The report described in this section must include:
(a) Information regarding the cannabis equity licenses issued under section 16 of this 2021
Act.
(b) Regulatory recommendations to the  authority and the commission to improve equity
outcomes.
(c) The information reported to  the board by the commission under section 4 of this 2021
Act.
(d) The information reported to the  board by the authority under section 5 of this 2021
Act.
(2) The  board may include additional data reporting or other requirements as the board
determines necessary.
(3) The board shall  annually submit, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, the report
described in this section to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to
cannabis on a date established by the board by rule.
SECTION 4.
(1) The equity liaison of the Oregon  Liquor Control Commission shall report
quarterly to the Cannabis Equity Board on the following:
(a) Demographics for all licensees, as defined in ORS 475B.015;
(b) Demographics for all  applicants for licenses issued under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090,
475B.100 and 475B.105;
(c) The number of applications submitted for cannabis  equity licenses under section 16
of this 2021 Act;
[3]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) The number of cannabis equity licenses issued under section 16 of this 2021 Act;
(e) The average time in which the commission approves  or rejects an application for a
cannabis equity license under section 16 of this 2021 Act;
(f) The average time in which the commission approves or rejects an  application for li-
censes issued under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 and sections 22, 27, 32 and
34 of this 2021 Act; and
(g) Any other information required by the board by rule.
(2)(a) The board may adopt rules to carry out this section.
(b) The commission, with the advice of the equity liaison of the commission,  may adopt
rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 5.
(1) The equity liaison of the Oregon Health Authority shall report quarterly
to the Cannabis Equity Board on the following:
(a) Demographics for registry identification cardholders, as defined in ORS 475B.791;
(b) Demographics for  all individuals who hold registrations issued under ORS 475B.810,
475B.840 and 475B.858;
(c) Information regarding services that  are funded, directly or indirectly, by the author-
ity and that provide educational, mental health or drug abuse  and addiction support to indi-
viduals who are American Indian, Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx; and
(d) Any other information required by the board by rule.
(2)(a) The board may adopt rules to carry out this section.
(b) The authority, with the advice of the equity liaison of the authority, may  adopt rules
to carry out this section.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Cannabis Equity Board may appoint any directors, deputies, counsel,
assistants, investigators or other employees as the board determines necessary to carry  out
the duties of the board.
(2) In appointing and employing or contracting with individuals under this  section, the
board may not exceed the limit on administrative costs established by the board.
SECTION 7. (1) The Cannabis Equity Board shall allocate moneys  from the Cannabis
Equity Fund established under section 9 of this 2021 Act:
(a) To community programs and partners that support landownership, homeownership
and income building through jobs and entrepreneurship for  individuals who are American
Indian, Alaska Native, Black,  Hispanic or Latinx, and that prioritize support for individuals
who are American Indian, Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx.
(b) To courts to cover costs incurred under ORS 475B.401.
(c) To programs that support cannabis businesses  owned by individuals who are Ameri-
can Indian,  Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx with a variety of funding options and
technical assistance and that prioritize funding support for holders of licenses issued under
section 16 of this 2021 Act to address funding gaps for individuals who are American Indian,
Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx. A  program must be culturally competent and
demonstrate past success in assisting individuals who are American Indian, Alaska Native,
Black, Hispanic or Latinx with launching and scaling businesses.
(d) For funding equity liaison positions  within the Oregon Health Authority and the
Oregon Liquor Control Commission to measure and report on issues related  to equity at the
authority and the commission.
(e) For other purposes as the board determines appropriate.
[4]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The board may:
(a) Specify the manner in  which a recipient of moneys from the fund spends the moneys;
(b) Require a recipient of moneys from the fund to report to the board on data regarding
the moneys as determined by the board; and
(c) Review and revise the manner in which moneys transferred from the fund to the au-
thority are spent.
(3) The board may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 8.
(1) The Cannabis Equity Board may, with the approval  of the Governor, in-
vestigate:
(a) A failure to report to the board under section 4 or 5 of this 2021 Act;
(b) Misuse of moneys from the Cannabis Equity Fund by a recipient of the moneys; and
(c) Complaints regarding the issuance of equity licenses under  section 16 of this 2021 Act.
(2) In the manner prescribed in ORS chapter 183 for contested cases, the board may  im-
pose a form of discipline approved by the Governor, including but not limited to revoking  the
transfer of moneys from the fund.
SECTION 9.
The Cannabis Equity Fund  is established separate and distinct from the
General Fund. Interest earned  by the Cannabis Equity Fund shall be credited to the fund.
The Cannabis Equity Fund consists of moneys deposited into the fund under ORS 137.300 and
475B.759 and may include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or  transferred to the
fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise and interest earned on the  moneys in the
fund. The moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Cannabis Equity Board
for:
(1) Providing operating funds to the board, including the payment  of compensation to
members of the board, not to exceed 10 percent of the moneys in the fund on July 1  of each
year; and
(2) The purposes described in section 7 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 10.
(1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall  require that commission
directors and staff who are involved with the commission’s regulation of marijuana complete
equity training at least once every six months.
(2) The commission, with the advice of the equity liaison of the commission and in con-
sultation with the Cannabis Equity Board, shall adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 10a.
(1) The Oregon  Health Authority shall require that authority directors and
staff who are involved with the authority’s regulation of marijuana complete equity training
at least once every six months.
(2) The authority, with the advice of the equity liaison of  the authority and in consulta-
tion with the Cannabis Equity Board, shall adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 475B.040 is amended to read:
475B.040. (1) An applicant for a  license or renewal of a license issued under ORS 475B.010 to
475B.545 shall apply to the Oregon Liquor Control Commission in the form required by the  com-
mission by rule, showing the name and address of the applicant,  location of the premises that is to
be operated under the license and other pertinent information required by  the commission. The
commission may not issue or renew a license until  the applicant has complied with the provisions
of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 and rules adopted under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545.
(2)(a) An applicant for a license or renewal of  a license issued under ORS 475B.010 to
475B.545 shall submit with the application a social equity plan that  meets the requirements
[5]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
established by the commission, in consultation with the equity liaison of the commission,  by
rule.
(b) In adopting rules under this subsection, the commission shall adopt by reference rules
adopted by the Cannabis Equity Board establishing guidelines for social equity plans.
[(2)] (3) The commission may  reject any application that is not submitted in the form required
by the commission by rule. The commission shall  give applicants an opportunity to be heard if an
application is rejected. A hearing under this subsection is not subject to the requirements  for con-
tested case proceedings under ORS chapter 183.
[(3)] (4) Except as provided in subsection [ (2)] (3) of  this section, a revocation of, or a refusal
to issue or renew, a license issued under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 is subject to  the requirements
for contested case proceedings under ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 12.
(1) Notwithstanding the term of office specified in section 1 of this 2021 Act,
of the members first appointed to the Cannabis Equity Board:
(a) Two shall serve for a term ending on December 31, 2022.
(b) Two shall serve for a term ending on December 31, 2023.
(c) Two shall serve for a term ending on December 31, 2024.
(d) Three shall serve for a term ending on December 31, 2025.
(2) The members described in subsection (1) of  this section shall be appointed by the
Governor from among applicants for the membership positions.
SECTION 13.
(1)(a) Not later than August 21, 2022,  the Oregon Health Authority shall
determine:
(A) Demographics for registry identification cardholders, as defined in ORS 475B.791;
(B) Demographics for all  individuals who hold registrations issued under ORS 475B.810,
475B.840 and 475B.858; and
(C) Information regarding services that are  funded, directly or indirectly, by the au-
thority and that provide educational, mental health or  drug abuse and addiction support to
individuals who are American Indian, Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx.
(b) Not later than  August 31, 2022, the authority shall submit to the Cannabis Equity
Board the information described in this subsection.
(2)(a) Not later than August 21, 2022, the Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall  de-
termine:
(A) Demographics for all licensees, as defined in ORS 475B.015;
(B) Demographics for all applicants for licenses issued under ORS  475B.070, 475B.090,
475B.100 and 475B.105; and
(C) The  average time in which the commission approves or rejects an application for li-
censes issued under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105.
(b) Not later than August 31, 2022, the commission  shall submit to the board the infor-
mation described in this subsection.
SECTION 13a.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority  shall dedicate at least two full-time em-
ployees to taking any actions before the operative date specified in section 14 of this 2021
Act that is necessary to enable the authority  to exercise the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the authority by sections 1 to 10 and 13 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall dedicate at least two full-time employees
to taking any actions before the operative date specified  in section 14 of this 2021 Act that
is necessary to enable the commission to exercise the  duties, functions and powers conferred
[6]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
on the commission by sections 1 to 10 and 13 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 13b.
Sections 13 and 13a of this 2021 Act are repealed on September 1, 2022.
SECTION 14. (1) Sections 1 to 10 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 475B.040
by section 11 of this 2021 Act become operative on August 22, 2022.
(2) The Governor, the Oregon Health Authority and the Oregon Liquor  Control Commis-
sion may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section
that is necessary to enable the Governor, the authority and the commission  to exercise, on
and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers  conferred on the Governor, the authority and the commission by
sections 1 to 10 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 475B.040 by section 11  of this
2021 Act.
CANNABIS EQUITY LICENSE
SECTION 15. Sections 16 to 18 of  this 2021 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
475B.010 to 475B.545.
SECTION 16. (1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall  issue an equity license to
an applicant who:
(a) Applies for issuance or renewal of a  license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100
or 475B.105 or section 22, 27, 32 or 34 of this 2021 Act;
(b) Can demonstrate that the  entity on behalf of which the applicant applies is at least
51 percent owned by an individual who is a resident of this state and:
(A) Has been convicted  of a marijuana-related crime in any state and who has an income
that does not  exceed the area median income for the individual’s county of residence, as
adjusted for household size as determined by the Oregon  Housing Stability Council based on
information from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development; or
(B) Is American Indian, Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx, or is a member of an-
other minority  group that, through empirical evidence that is subject to review by the
Cannabis Equity Board, shows historically disproportionate community arrest rates for
marijuana-related crimes at  the same level as individuals who are American Indian, Alaska
Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx; and
(c) Submits a declaration under penalty of perjury that the information contained in  the
application is true and accurate.
(2) The  commission shall begin processing an application for a license under this section
not more than 30 days after the date on which the application was submitted.
(3) The commission shall issue a provisional license under this section to  an applicant
who meets the requirements of subsection  (1) of this section prior to the applicant obtaining
a land use compatibility statement under ORS 475B.063. A provisional license may not be
renewed.
(4) An application for an equity license under this section is not subject to any  rules of
the commission that require the  applicant to complete an application process within a spec-
ified timeframe.
(5)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, the holder of an equity li-
cense may transfer not more than 49 percent of  the ownership of the licensed entity within
the two years immediately after the equity license is issued.
[7]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The holder of  an equity license may transfer more than 49 percent ownership to an-
other individual who meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section,  subject to
rules adopted by the commission.
(6) The commission may not charge the holder of an equity license who applies for a li-
cense or renewal of a license  under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 or section
22, 27, 32 or 34 of this 2021 Act a fee in an amount greater than 60 percent of the fee other-
wise established for issuance or renewal of that license.
(7) The commission, with the advice of the equity liaison of  the commission, may adopt
rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 17.
(1) The Oregon Liquor Control  Commission shall provide support to appli-
cants for the equity  license under section 16 of this 2021 Act during the application process
and provide ongoing support to holders of the equity license.
(2) The commission may identify and contract with third-party partners  to provide cul-
turally competent  technical assistance and support under this section, including but not
limited to colloquial language translation of forms and documents  and interpretation or
translation services for interactions between a licensee or applicant for licensure and a  rep-
resentative of the commission.
(3) The commission may request that  the Cannabis Equity Board provide moneys from
the Cannabis Equity Fund for the purposes described in this section.
(4) The commission, with the advice of the equity liaison of  the commission, may adopt
rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 18. The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall make publicly available de-
mographic information of licensees and employee licensees.  The commission shall ensure
that the information made available is anonymized.
SECTION 19. (1) Prior to  the operative date specified in section 20 of this 2021 Act, the
Oregon Liquor Control Commission  shall ensure adequate staffing to carry out the
commission’s duties under sections 16 to 18 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The holder of a license issued  under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 may,
prior to the operative date specified in section 20 of this 2021  Act, notify the commission in
a manner established by the commission that the licensee meets the requirements of section
16 (1)(b) of this 2021 Act for an  equity license and intends to apply for the equity license
under section 16 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 20.
(1) Sections 16 to 18 of this 2021 Act become operative on August 22, 2022.
(2) The Oregon  Liquor Control Commission may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1)  of this section that is necessary to enable the commission to ex-
ercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the commission by sections 16 to 18 of  this 2021
Act.
CANNABIS ON-PREMISES CONSUMPTION LICENSE
SECTION 21.
Sections 22 and 23 of this 2021 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
475B.010 to 475B.545.
SECTION 22. (1) The consumption and sale of marijuana items at a cannabis  on-premises
consumption site is subject to regulation by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
[8]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2)(a) An  applicant for a cannabis on-premises consumption license under this section
must:
(A) Apply for the license in the manner described in ORS 475B.040;
(B) Provide proof that the applicant is 21 years of age or older; and
(C) Meet the requirements of section 16 (1)(b) of this 2021 Act.
(b) The premises at which an applicant intends to operate a cannabis  on-premises con-
sumption site may not be located:
(A) In an area that is zoned exclusively for residential use; or
(B) Within 1,000 feet of:
(i) A public elementary or secondary school for which attendance is compulsory  under
ORS 339.020; or
(ii) A private or parochial elementary or secondary school,  teaching children as described
in ORS 339.030 (1)(a).
(c) An applicant for a cannabis on-premises consumption  license under this section and
the premises at which the cannabis on-premises consumption site is to be located  must meet
the requirements of any rule adopted by the commission under subsection (3) of this  section.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules that:
(a) Require a person that holds  a license issued under this section to renew the license
annually;
(b) Establish application, licensure and renewal of licensure fees  for a license issued un-
der this section;
(c) Allow the colocation of a cannabis on-premises consumption site  operated by a person
that holds a license under this section and:
(i) A marijuana retailer that holds a license under ORS 475B.105 at a single premises, as
long as the cannabis on-premises consumption site and  the marijuana retailer occupy dif-
ferent areas of the premises;
(ii) A shared processing facility that holds a license issued under section 32 of  this 2021
Act at a single premises,  as long as the cannabis on-premises consumption site and the
shared processing facility occupy different areas of the premises;
(iii) A marijuana grow  site registered under ORS 475B.810 at a single premises, as long
as the cannabis on-premises consumption site and the marijuana grow  site occupy different
areas of the premises;
(d) Allow consumers to bring into a  cannabis on-premises consumption site marijuana
items purchased from a colocated marijuana retailer;
(e) Allow indoors at a premises for which a license  has been issued under this section the
consumption of marijuana items intended to be  smoked, aerosolized or vaporized and
cannabinoid edibles and the use of topical cannabinoid products;
(f) Allow outdoors, in designated areas of a premises for which a license has  been issued
under this section and that  are not visible to the public without assistance, the consumption
of marijuana items intended to be smoked, aerosolized or vaporized and cannabinoid edibles
and the use of topical cannabinoid products;
(g) Prohibit the consumption and sale of alcoholic beverages on a  premises for which a
license has been issued under this section;
(h) Require each indoor portion of a premises  for which a license has been issued under
this section where marijuana items are smoked, aerosolized  or vaporized to have a venti-
[9]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
lation system that:
(A) Exhausts smoke, aerosols and vapors from that portion of the premises; and
(B) Is designed and  terminated in accordance with state building code standards for the
applicable occupancy classification; and
(i) Require a person that holds a license issued under this section to obtain  a cannabis
on-premises consumption site sanitation certificate under subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall  adopt rules related to the sanitation of a
cannabis on-premises consumption site as are reasonably necessary to protect  the public
health of individuals using the cannabis on-premises consumption site.
(b) The rules adopted under this subsection may include:
(A) The establishment of a cannabis on-premises consumption site sanitation  certificate
program;
(B) The establishment of a fee schedule for the certificate program;
(C) Inspection criteria;
(D) Grounds to suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew a certificate under this  sub-
section; and
(E) Other rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this subsection.
(c) The  authority shall inspect a cannabis on-premises consumption site once every six
months to ensure compliance with rules adopted under this subsection.
(d) Fees adopted under this subsection may not exceed the cost of  administering this
subsection and shall be deposited into the Public Health  Account established under ORS
431.210.
(5) The commission shall consult the authority  in the adoption of rules to allow the
colocation of a cannabis on-premises  consumption site and a marijuana grow site registered
under ORS 475B.810, including rules establishing marijuana plant limits  for a marijuana grow
site described in this subsection.
(6) Fees adopted under subsection (3)(b) of this section:
(a) May not exceed, together with other fees collected under ORS 475B.010 to  475B.545,
the cost of administering ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545; and
(b) Shall be  deposited into the Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under
ORS 475B.296.
SECTION 22a.
 Section 22 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 22.  (1) The consumption  and sale of marijuana items at a cannabis on-premises consumption
site is subject to regulation by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(2)(a) An applicant for a cannabis on-premises consumption license under this section must:
(A) Apply for the license in the manner described in ORS 475B.040; and
(B) Provide proof that the applicant is 21 years of age or older[ ; and ]
[(C) Meet the requirements of section 16 (1)(b) of this 2021 Act ].
(b) The premises  at which an applicant intends to operate a cannabis on-premises consumption
site may not be located:
(A) In an area that is zoned exclusively for residential use; or
(B) Within 1,000 feet of:
(i) A public elementary or secondary  school for which attendance is compulsory under ORS
339.020; or
(ii) A private or parochial elementary or secondary school, teaching children as described  in
[10]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 339.030 (1)(a).
(c) An applicant for a cannabis on-premises consumption license under this section and the
premises at which the cannabis on-premises  consumption site is to be located must meet the re-
quirements of any rule adopted by the commission under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules that:
(a) Require a person that  holds a license issued under this section to renew the license annually;
(b) Establish application, licensure and renewal of licensure fees for a license issued under this
section;
(c) Allow  the colocation of a cannabis on-premises consumption site operated by a person that
holds a license under this section and:
(i) A marijuana retailer that holds a license under ORS 475B.105 at a  single premises, as long
as the cannabis on-premises consumption site and the marijuana retailer  occupy different areas of
the premises;
(ii) A shared processing facility that holds a license issued under section 32 of this 2021 Act  at
a single premises, as long as the cannabis on-premises consumption site and the shared  processing
facility occupy different areas of the premises;
(iii) A marijuana grow site registered under ORS 475B.810 at a single premises, as long  as the
cannabis on-premises  consumption site and the marijuana grow site occupy different areas of the
premises;
(d) Allow consumers to bring into a cannabis on-premises consumption site  marijuana items
purchased from a colocated marijuana retailer;
(e) Allow indoors at a premises for which a license has been issued  under this section the con-
sumption of marijuana items intended to be smoked, aerosolized or vaporized and  cannabinoid
edibles and the use of topical cannabinoid products;
(f) Allow outdoors, in designated areas of a premises for which a license has been issued  under
this section and that are not visible to the public without assistance, the consumption  of marijuana
items intended to be smoked, aerosolized or  vaporized and cannabinoid edibles and the use of topical
cannabinoid products;
(g) Prohibit the consumption and sale of alcoholic beverages on  a premises for which a license
has been issued under this section;
(h) Require each indoor portion of a premises for  which a license has been issued under this
section where marijuana items are smoked, aerosolized or vaporized  to have a ventilation system
that:
(A) Exhausts smoke, aerosols and vapors from that portion of the premises; and
(B) Is designed and terminated in accordance with state  building code standards for the appli-
cable occupancy classification; and
(i) Require a person that  holds a license issued under this section to obtain a cannabis on-
premises consumption site sanitation certificate under subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt  rules related to the sanitation of a cannabis
on-premises consumption  site as are reasonably necessary to protect the public health of individuals
using the cannabis on-premises consumption site.
(b) The rules adopted under this subsection may include:
(A) The establishment of a  cannabis on-premises consumption site sanitation certificate program;
(B) The establishment of a fee schedule for the certificate program;
(C) Inspection criteria;
[11]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) Grounds to suspend, revoke or refuse to issue  or renew a certificate under this subsection;
and
(E) Other rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this subsection.
(c) The authority shall inspect a cannabis on-premises consumption site once every six  months
to ensure compliance with rules adopted under this subsection.
(d) Fees adopted under this subsection may not  exceed the cost of administering this subsection
and shall be deposited into the Public Health Account established under ORS 431.210.
(5) The commission shall consult the authority in the adoption of rules to  allow the colocation
of a cannabis on-premises consumption site and a marijuana grow site registered under  ORS
475B.810, including rules establishing marijuana  plant limits for a marijuana grow site described in
this subsection.
(6) Fees adopted under subsection (3)(b) of this section:
(a) May not exceed, together with other fees collected under ORS 475B.010  to 475B.545, the cost
of administering ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545; and
(b) Shall be deposited into the  Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under ORS
475B.296.
SECTION 23.
If a public elementary or secondary school for which attendance is com-
pulsory under ORS 339.020 or a private or parochial elementary or secondary school, teaching
children as  described in ORS 339.030 (1)(a), that has not previously been attended by children
is established within 1,000 feet  of a premises licensed under section 22 of this 2021 Act, the
cannabis on-premises consumption site may remain  at its current location unless the Oregon
Liquor Control Commission revokes the cannabis on-premises consumption license.
SECTION 24.  ORS 475B.381 is amended to read:
475B.381. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  it is unlawful for any
[person] individual to engage in the use of marijuana items in a public place.
(b) An individual 21 years of age or older may engage in the use of marijuana items in
designated areas of a premises for which  a license has been issued under section 22 of this
2021 Act.
(2) A violation of subsection (1) (a) of this section is a Class B violation.
SECTION 25. (1) Sections 22 and 23 of this 2021 Act  and the amendments to ORS 475B.381
by section 24 of this 2021 Act become operative on August 22, 2022.
(2) The amendments to section 22 of  this 2021 Act by section 22a of this 2021 Act become
operative on January 1, 2032.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority and the Oregon Liquor Control Commission may take
any action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is neces-
sary to enable the authority  and the commission to exercise, on and after the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred
on the authority and the commission by sections 22 and 23 of this 2021 Act  and the amend-
ments to ORS 475B.381 by section 24 of this 2021 Act.
CANNABIS DELIVERY LICENSE
SECTION 26. Section 27 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of  ORS 475B.010 to
475B.545.
SECTION 27. (1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall issue a cannabis delivery
[12]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
license to an applicant who:
(a) Applies for the license in the manner described in ORS 475B.040;
(b) Provides proof that the applicant is 21 years of age or older;
(c) Meets the requirements of section 16 (1)(b) of this 2021 Act; and
(d) Meets any other requirements established by the commission by rule.
(2)(a) The holder  of a cannabis delivery license issued under this section may deliver
marijuana items to a residence or a hotel, inn or other dwelling unit that  is made available
for short-term or  transient occupancy. A delivery may be made only to a premises located
in an area that allows the establishment of marijuana retailers under ORS 475B.968.
(b) A delivery may not be made to a dormitory or similar residence that  is located on the
campus of a private or public institution of higher education.
(c) If the holder of a cannabis delivery license is a marijuana retailer licensed under ORS
475B.105, the cannabis delivery license holder may deliver marijuana  items that are part of
the marijuana retailer’s own inventory or  part of the inventory of another marijuana retailer
licensed under ORS 475B.105.
(d) If  the holder of a cannabis delivery license is not a marijuana retailer licensed under
ORS 475B.105, the cannabis delivery license holder may deliver  marijuana items that are part
of the inventory of any marijuana retailer licensed under ORS 475B.105.
(3)(a) The commission shall adopt rules that:
(A) Require a  person that holds a license issued under this section to renew the license
annually; and
(B) Establish application, licensure and  renewal of licensure fees for a license issued
under this section.
(b) The commission may adopt other rules as necessary to carry out this section.
(4) In adopting rules under this section, the commission shall consult  the equity liaison
of the commission.
(5) Fees adopted under subsection (3)(a)(B) of this section:
(a) May  not exceed, together with other fees collected under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545,
the cost of administering ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545; and
(b) Shall be deposited into the Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund  established under
ORS 475B.296.
SECTION 28.
 Section 27 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 27.  (1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall issue a cannabis  delivery license to
an applicant who:
(a) Applies for the license in the manner described in ORS 475B.040;
(b) Provides proof that the applicant is 21 years of age or older; and
[(c) Meets the requirements of section 16 (1)(b) of this 2021 Act; and ]
[(d)] (c) Meets any other requirements established by the commission by rule.
(2)(a) The holder of a cannabis delivery license issued under this  section may deliver marijuana
items to a residence or a hotel,  inn or other dwelling unit that is made available for short-term or
transient occupancy. A delivery may be made only to a premises located in an area  that allows the
establishment of marijuana retailers under ORS 475B.968.
(b) A delivery  may not be made to a dormitory or similar residence that is located on the cam-
pus of a private or public institution of higher education.
(c) If the holder of a cannabis delivery license is  a marijuana retailer licensed under ORS
[13]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
475B.105, the cannabis delivery license holder  may deliver marijuana items that are part of the
marijuana retailer’s own inventory or  part of the inventory of another marijuana retailer licensed
under ORS 475B.105.
(d) If the holder of  a cannabis delivery license is not a marijuana retailer licensed under ORS
475B.105, the cannabis delivery  license holder may deliver marijuana items that are part of the in-
ventory of any marijuana retailer licensed under ORS 475B.105.
(3)(a) The commission shall adopt rules that:
(A) Require a person  that holds a license issued under this section to renew the license annu-
ally; and
(B) Establish application, licensure and renewal of licensure fees for  a license issued under this
section.
(b) The commission may adopt other rules as necessary to carry out this section.
(4) In adopting rules under this section, the  commission shall consult the equity liaison of the
commission.
(5) Fees adopted under subsection (3)(a)(B) of this section:
(a) May not exceed, together with other fees collected under ORS 475B.010  to 475B.545, the cost
of administering ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545; and
(b) Shall be deposited into the  Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under ORS
475B.296.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 475B.206 is amended to read:
475B.206. (1) Except as provided in ORS 475B.136  and 475B.873, [a marijuana producer that holds
a license issued  under ORS 475B.070, marijuana processor that holds a license issued under ORS
475B.090 or marijuana wholesaler that holds a license  issued under ORS 475B.100 ] the following
licensees may deliver marijuana items only  to or on a premises for which a license has been issued
under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 or section  22, 32 or 34 of this 2021 Act , or
to a registry identification cardholder or designated  primary caregiver as allowed under ORS
475B.010 to 475B.545[.]:
(a) A marijuana producer that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.070;
(b) A marijuana processor that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.090;
(c) A marijuana wholesaler that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.100;
(d) A person that  holds a cannabis on-premises consumption license issued under section
22 of this 2021 Act;
(e) A shared processor that holds a license issued under section 32 of this 2021 Act; or
(f) A person that holds a shared processing facility license issued under section 34 of  this
2021 Act.
(2) A licensee to which marijuana items may be delivered under subsection (1) of this  section
may receive marijuana items only from:
(a)(A) A marijuana producer that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.070[ ,];
(B) A  marijuana processor that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.090[ ,];
(C) A  marijuana wholesaler that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.100[ ,];
(D) A  marijuana retailer that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.105 [ or];
(E) A laboratory licensed under ORS 475B.560;
(F) A person that holds a cannabis on-premises consumption license issued under  section
22 of this 2021 Act;
(G) A shared processor that holds a license issued under section 32 of this 2021 Act; or
[14]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(H) A  person that holds a shared processing facility license issued under section 34 of this
2021 Act;
(b) A researcher of cannabis that holds a certificate issued under  ORS 475B.286 and that
transfers limited amounts of marijuana, usable marijuana, cannabinoid products, cannabinoid  con-
centrates  and  cannabinoid extracts in accordance with procedures adopted under ORS 475B.286
(3)(d) and (e);
(c) A marijuana  grow site registered under ORS 475B.810, marijuana processing site registered
under ORS 475B.840, or a medical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS 475B.858, acting in
accordance with procedures  adopted by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission under ORS 475B.167;
or
(d) A marijuana grow site registered  under ORS 475B.810, acting in accordance with ORS
475B.825 and any procedures adopted by rule by the commission.
(3) Except as provided in section 22 of this 2021 Act,  the sale  of marijuana items by a
marijuana retailer that  holds a license issued under ORS 475B.105 must be restricted to the premises
for which the license has been issued, but deliveries  may be made by a marijuana retailer to con-
sumers pursuant to a bona fide order received at the  premises prior to delivery  if the marijuana
retailer holds a delivery license issued under section 27 of this 2021 Act .
(4) The commission may by order waive the requirements of subsections (1) and  (2) of this sec-
tion to ensure compliance with ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 or a rule adopted under ORS  475B.010 to
475B.545. An order  issued under this subsection does not constitute a waiver of any other require-
ment of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 or any other rule adopted under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545.
SECTION 30.
(1) Section 27 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 475B.206  by
section 29 of this 2021 Act become operative on August 22, 2022.
(2) The amendments to section 27 of this 2021 Act by  section 28 of this 2021 Act become
operative on January 1, 2032.
(3) The Oregon  Liquor Control Commission may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1)  of this section that is necessary to enable the commission to ex-
ercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the commission by section 27 of  this 2021 Act and
the amendments to ORS 475B.206 by section 29 of this 2021 Act.
SHARED PROCESSING LICENSES
SECTION 31.
Sections 32 and 34 of this 2021 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
475B.010 to 475B.545.
SECTION 32. (1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall issue  a shared processing
license to process marijuana to an applicant who:
(a) Applies for the license in the manner described in ORS 475B.040;
(b) Provides proof that the applicant is 21 years of age or older;
(c) Meets the requirements of section 16 (1)(b) of this 2021 Act;
(d) Demonstrates that the  shared processing facility licensed under section 34 of this 2021
Act at which the applicant will process  marijuana is not located in an area zoned exclusively
for residential use if the premises will be used to process marijuana extracts; and
(e) Meets any other requirements established by the commission by rule.
(2)(a) The commission shall adopt rules that:
[15]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Require a person that holds a license issued under this section to renew  the license
annually;
(B) Establish application, licensure and renewal of licensure fees  for a license issued
under this section;
(C) Require marijuana processed by a shared processor  under this section to be tested
in accordance with ORS 475B.555; and
(D) Require a shared processor that holds a license issued under  this section to meet any
public health and safety standards and industry best practices established  by the commission
by rule related to:
(i) Cannabinoid edibles;
(ii) Cannabinoid concentrates;
(iii) Cannabinoid extracts; and
(iv) Any other type of cannabinoid product identified by the commission by rule.
(b) The commission may adopt other rules as necessary to carry out this section.
(3) In adopting rules  under this section, the commission shall consult the equity liaison
of the commission.
(4) Fees adopted under subsection (2)(a)(B) of this section:
(a) May not exceed, together with other fees collected under ORS 475B.010 to  475B.545,
the cost of administering ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545; and
(b) Shall be  deposited into the Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under
ORS 475B.296.
SECTION 33.
 Section 32 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 32.  (1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall  issue a shared processing license to
process marijuana to an applicant who:
(a) Applies for the license in the manner described in ORS 475B.040;
(b) Provides proof that the applicant is 21 years of age or older;
[(c) Meets the requirements of section 16 (1)(b) of this 2021 Act; ]
[(d)] (c) Demonstrates that the  shared processing facility licensed under section 34 of this 2021
Act at which  the applicant will process marijuana is not located in an area zoned exclusively for
residential use if the premises will be used to process marijuana extracts; and
[(e)] (d) Meets any other requirements established by the commission by rule.
(2)(a) The commission shall adopt rules that:
(A) Require a person  that holds a license issued under this section to renew the license annu-
ally;
(B) Establish application, licensure and renewal of licensure fees for  a license issued under this
section;
(C) Require marijuana processed by a shared  processor under this section to be tested in ac-
cordance with ORS 475B.555; and
(D) Require a shared processor that holds a license issued under this section to meet any public
health and  safety standards and industry best practices established by the commission by rule re-
lated to:
(i) Cannabinoid edibles;
(ii) Cannabinoid concentrates;
(iii) Cannabinoid extracts; and
(iv) Any other type of cannabinoid product identified by the commission by rule.
[16]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The commission may adopt other rules as necessary to carry out this section.
(3) In adopting rules under this section, the  commission shall consult the equity liaison of the
commission.
(4) Fees adopted under subsection (2)(a)(B) of this section:
(a) May not exceed, together with other fees collected under ORS 475B.010  to 475B.545, the cost
of administering ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545; and
(b) Shall be deposited into the  Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under ORS
475B.296.
SECTION 34.
(1) The  Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall issue a shared processing
facility license to an applicant who:
(a) Applies for the license in the manner described in ORS 475B.040;
(b) Provides proof that the applicant is 21 years of age or older;
(c) Meets the requirements of section 16 (1)(b) of this 2021 Act;
(d) Demonstrates that the premises at which the shared processing facility will be located
is not in an area zoned exclusively for residential use if the premises  will be used to process
marijuana extracts; and
(e) Meets any other requirements established by the commission by rule.
(2) A shared processing facility for which a license is issued under this section may be:
(a) Used by more than one shared processor licensed under section 32 of this 2021 Act.
(b) A premises for which a license is issued under ORS 475B.090.
(3)(a) The commission shall adopt rules that:
(A) Require a  person that holds a license issued under this section to renew the license
annually;
(B) Establish application, licensure and  renewal of licensure fees for a license issued
under this section;
(C) Require the holder of a shared  processing facility license to provide to the commis-
sion a continually  updated listing of the shared processors licensed under section 32 of this
2021 Act that use the shared processing facility; and
(D) Require a shared processing facility for which a  license is issued under this section
to meet any public health and safety  standards and industry best practices established by the
commission by rule related to:
(i) Cannabinoid edibles;
(ii) Cannabinoid concentrates;
(iii) Cannabinoid extracts; and
(iv) Any other type of cannabinoid product identified by the commission by rule.
(b) The commission may adopt other rules as necessary to carry out this section.
(4) In adopting rules  under this section, the commission shall consult the equity liaison
of the commission.
(5) Fees adopted under subsection (3)(a)(B) of this section:
(a) May not exceed, together with other fees collected under ORS 475B.010 to  475B.545,
the cost of administering ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545; and
(b) Shall be  deposited into the Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under
ORS 475B.296.
SECTION 35.
 Section 34 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 34.  (1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall issue  a shared processing facility li-
[17]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cense to an applicant who:
(a) Applies for the license in the manner described in ORS 475B.040;
(b) Provides proof that the applicant is 21 years of age or older;
[(c) Meets the requirements of section 16 (1)(b) of this 2021 Act; ]
[(d)] (c) Demonstrates that the premises  at which the shared processing facility will be located
is not in an area zoned exclusively for residential  use if the premises will be used to process
marijuana extracts; and
[(e)] (d) Meets any other requirements established by the commission by rule.
(2) A shared processing facility for which a license is issued under this section may be:
(a) Used by more than one shared processor licensed under section 32 of this 2021 Act.
(b) A premises for which a license is issued under ORS 475B.090.
(3)(a) The commission shall adopt rules that:
(A) Require a person  that holds a license issued under this section to renew the license annu-
ally;
(B) Establish application, licensure and renewal of licensure fees for  a license issued under this
section;
(C) Require the holder of a shared processing facility license to provide to  the commission a
continually updated listing of the shared processors licensed under section 32 of  this 2021 Act that
use the shared processing facility; and
(D) Require a shared processing facility for which a  license is issued under this section to meet
any public health and safety standards and  industry best practices established by the commission
by rule related to:
(i) Cannabinoid edibles;
(ii) Cannabinoid concentrates;
(iii) Cannabinoid extracts; and
(iv) Any other type of cannabinoid product identified by the commission by rule.
(b) The commission may adopt other rules as necessary to carry out this section.
(4) In adopting rules under this section, the  commission shall consult the equity liaison of the
commission.
(5) Fees adopted under subsection (3)(a)(B) of this section:
(a) May not exceed, together with other fees collected under ORS 475B.010  to 475B.545, the cost
of administering ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545; and
(b) Shall be deposited into the  Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under ORS
475B.296.
SECTION 36.
(1) Sections 32 and 34 of this 2021 Act become operative on August 22, 2022.
(2) The amendments to sections 32 and 34 of this 2021 Act by sections  33 and 35 of this
2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2032.
(3) The Oregon  Liquor Control Commission may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1)  of this section that is necessary to enable the commission to ex-
ercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred  on the commission by sections 32 and 34 of this 2021
Act.
CONVICTIONS AND ARRESTS
(Data Reporting and Sharing)
[18]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 37.
(1) The office of public defense services, as  defined in ORS 151.211, shall
study the laws of this state and compile a list of those offenses  that include, as a predicate
offense or necessary element of the offense:
(a) Possession of less than one ounce of the dried leaves, stems or flowers of  marijuana;
or
(b) Conduct described in ORS 475B.301.
(2) The office shall prepare a report that includes the  list described in subsection (1) of
this section and recommendations of additional offenses that  a conviction for which should
be considered a qualifying marijuana offense as defined in ORS 475B.401. No later than July
1, 2022, the office shall submit, in the manner provided  in ORS 192.245, the report described
in this subsection to the interim  committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the ju-
diciary, to the Judicial Department and to the Cannabis Equity Board.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2023, and  not later than July 1 each year thereafter, the office shall
submit, in the manner provided  in ORS 192.245, an update to the report described in sub-
section (2) of this section to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to
the judiciary, to the Judicial Department and to the Cannabis Equity Board.
SECTION 37a.
Section 37 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 38. (1)(a) The Judicial Department shall, no later than 90 days after the  oper-
ative date specified in section 49 of this 2021 Act, provide to the office of public defense  ser-
vices, as defined in ORS 151.211,  information concerning all persons who may qualify to have
a conviction set aside under ORS 475B.401.
(b) The department shall make best efforts to ensure that the information provided under
paragraph (a) of this subsection is sufficient to identify the  person and the specific case re-
sulting in the conviction.
(2)(a) The Department of State Police shall,  no later than 90 days after the operative date
specified in section 49 of this 2021 Act, provide to the office of public defense services, as
defined in  ORS 151.211, information concerning all persons who may qualify to have an ar-
rest, citation or other charge set aside under ORS 475B.401.
(b) The department shall make best efforts to ensure that the information provided under
paragraph (a) of this subsection is sufficient to identify the person and the specific arrest,
citation or other charge.
SECTION 38a.
Section 38 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 1, 2023.
(Setting Aside of Convictions and Arrests)
SECTION 39.  ORS 475B.401 is amended to read:
475B.401. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Prosecuting attorney” means a district attorney or  a city attorney with a
prosecutorial function.
(b) “Qualifying marijuana offense” means:
(A) A marijuana offense based on conduct described  in ORS 475B.301 or possession of less
than one ounce of the dried leaves, stems or flowers of marijuana;
(B) Child neglect that has, as an element, conduct  described in ORS 475B.301 or pos-
session of less than one ounce of the dried leaves, stems or flowers of marijuana; or
(C) Endangering the welfare of a  minor that has, as an element, conduct described in
[19]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 475B.301 or possession  of less than one ounce of the dried leaves, stems or flowers of
marijuana.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 137.225[ ,]:
(a) A person [ with] who has been convicted of  a qualifying marijuana [ conviction] offense may
apply to the court  in which the judgment of conviction was entered for entry of an order setting
aside the conviction as provided in this section.
(b) A person who has been arrested for, issued a  criminal citation for or otherwise
charged with, but not convicted of, a qualifying marijuana offense may apply to the court
that would have jurisdiction over the crime for which the person  was arrested, cited or
charged, for entry of an order setting aside the record of the arrest, citation or  charge as
provided in this section.
[(2)(a)] (3)(a) The person may file a motion under this section at any  time following entry of
judgment of conviction for a qualifying marijuana [ conviction] offense or at any time  after the
date of an arrest, citation or charge for a  qualifying marijuana offense that did not result in
a conviction.
(b) A person filing a motion under this section is not required to pay the  filing fee established
under ORS 21.135 or any other fee, or file a set of fingerprints.
(c) No background check or  identification by the Department of State Police is required to set
aside a conviction under this section.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a) At the time of filing the motion, the person shall serve a copy of  the motion upon
the office of the prosecuting attorney of the jurisdiction in which the judgment of conviction was
entered or arrest, citation or charge occurred .
(b) The  prosecuting attorney, within 30 days after the filing of the motion under paragraph (a)
of this subsection, may file an objection to granting the motion  only on the basis that the person’s
conviction , arrest, citation or charge  is not  for  a qualifying marijuana [ conviction] offense .
(c) If no objection from the prosecuting attorney is received by the  court within 30 days after
the filing of the motion, the court shall grant the motion and enter an order as described in sub-
section [ (5)] (6) of this section.
[(4)] (5) If the court receives an objection from the prosecuting attorney, the court shall hold  a
hearing to determine whether the conviction or other record  sought  to be set aside is  for  a qual-
ifying marijuana [ conviction] offense . The [ person] prosecuting attorney  has the burden of estab-
lishing, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the conviction  or other record  is  not for  a
qualifying marijuana [ conviction] offense . If the court determines that the conviction or other re-
cord is for a qualifying marijuana [ conviction] offense , the court shall grant the motion and  enter
an order as provided in subsection [ (5)] (6) of this section.
[(5)] (6) Upon granting a motion to set aside a conviction or other record for a  qualifying
marijuana [ conviction] offense  under this section, the court shall enter  an appropriate order. Upon
the entry of the order,  the person for purposes of the law shall be deemed not to have been previ-
ously convicted of or arrested, cited or charged for the offense,  and the court shall issue  an
order sealing the record of conviction and other official records in the case, including  the records
of arrest, citation or charge.
[(6)] (7) The clerk of the  court shall forward a certified copy of the order to such agencies as
directed by the court. A certified copy must be sent to the Department of Corrections  when the
person has been in  the custody of the Department of Corrections. Upon entry of the order, the
conviction, arrest, citation, charge or other proceeding shall be deemed  not to have occurred, and
[20]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the person may answer accordingly any questions relating to its occurrence.
[(7) As used in this section: ]
[(a) “Prosecuting attorney”  means a district attorney or a city attorney with a prosecutorial func-
tion.]
[(b) “Qualifying marijuana conviction” means a conviction for a marijuana offense: ]
[(A) Based on conduct described  in ORS 475B.301 or possession of less than one ounce of the dried
leaves, stems or flowers of marijuana; ]
[(B) Committed prior to July 1, 2015; and ]
[(C) For which the person has completed and fully complied with or performed the sentence of  the
court.]
SECTION 40.
(1) Upon receiving information about a person  under section 38 of this 2021
Act, the office of public defense services, as defined in  ORS 151.211, shall determine whether
the person is  eligible to set aside a conviction, arrest, citation or other charge under ORS
475B.401.
(2)(a) For any  person whom the office has determined is eligible for relief under ORS
475B.401, the office  shall notify the person, within 14 days of receiving the information, that
the person  is eligible for relief, and shall file a motion to set aside the conviction, arrest,
citation or charge under ORS 475B.401.
(b) If the  office cannot determine whether a person is eligible for relief, the office shall
make reasonable efforts to notify the person, within 14 days of  receiving the information,
that the person may qualify for relief under ORS 475B.401, but the  office is unable to defin-
itively determine eligibility.
(3) The filing of a motion under ORS 475B.401 under this section does not  create an
attorney-client relationship between the office, or an employee of  the office, and the person
who is the subject of the motion.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a person from applying for relief under ORS 475B.401.
(5) Beginning on July 1, 2022, and every six months thereafter, the office shall prepare a
report for the Cannabis Equity Board detailing progress  made in setting aside convictions,
arrests, citations and other charges under this section.
SECTION 40a. Section 40 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 1, 2026.
(Probation, Parole and Post-Prison Supervision)
SECTION 41.  ORS 137.542 is amended to read:
137.542. (1)(a) As used in this [ section] subsection , “cannabinoid concentrate,” “cannabinoid
extract,” “medical cannabinoid  product,” “registry identification card” and “usable marijuana” have
the meanings given those terms in ORS 475B.791.
[(2)] (b) Notwithstanding ORS 137.540[ ,]:
(A) If a person who holds  a registry identification card is sentenced to probation, supervision
conditions related to the use of usable marijuana, medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid con-
centrates or cannabinoid extracts must be imposed in the same manner as the court would impose
supervision conditions related to prescription drugs.
(B) The requirement that a person not possess  or consume usable marijuana, medical
cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts may not be a  con-
dition of the person’s probation if the person holds a registry identification card.
[21]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 137.540,  the requirement that a person not possess or consume
marijuana may  not be a condition of probation unless abuse of marijuana was a substantial
factor in the conduct that resulted in the imposition of probation.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 144.086 is amended to read:
144.086. (1)(a) As used in this [ section] subsection , “cannabinoid concentrate,” “cannabinoid
extract,” “medical cannabinoid  product,” “registry identification card” and “usable marijuana” have
the meanings given those terms in ORS 475B.791.
[(2)] (b) Notwithstanding ORS 144.102 and 144.270[ ,]:
(A) If a person who holds a registry identification card is released on post-prison  supervision
or parole, the supervision conditions related to the use of usable marijuana,  medical cannabinoid
products, cannabinoid concentrates  or cannabinoid extracts must be imposed in the same manner
as supervision conditions related to prescription drugs.
(B) The requirement that a person not possess  or consume usable marijuana, medical
cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts may not be a  con-
dition of the  person’s post-prison supervision or parole if the person holds a registry iden-
tification card.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 144.102 and 144.270, the requirement that a person not  possess
or consume marijuana may not be a condition of post-prison  supervision or parole unless
abuse of marijuana was a substantial factor in the conduct that resulted in the  imposition
of post-prison supervision or parole.
SECTION 43. Conduct that constitutes a qualifying marijuana offense under ORS 475B.401
(1)(b)(A) may not be the  basis of a probation violation unless abuse of marijuana was a sub-
stantial factor in the conduct that resulted in the conviction.
SECTION 44. Conduct that constitutes a qualifying marijuana offense under ORS 475B.401
(1)(b)(A) may not be the basis of a post-prison supervision  violation or a parole violation
unless abuse of marijuana was a substantial factor in the conduct that resulted in the  con-
viction.
SECTION 44a. (1) The Judicial Department, the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison
Supervision, county community corrections programs,  courts, district attorneys and any
other entities in this state that maintain records  of parole, probation or post-prison super-
vision violations shall  review all violation records to determine whether the violation of
supervision conditions was based on a qualifying marijuana  offense, as defined in ORS
475B.401, or conduct that  constitutes or may be prosecuted as a qualifying marijuana offense.
(2)(a) If an entity described in  subsection (1) of this section determines that a violation
record indicates the violation was based on a qualifying marijuana  offense or conduct that
constitutes or may be prosecuted as a qualifying marijuana  offense, the entity shall expunge
the violation record.
(b) If a violation record does not contain sufficient information to make  a determination
regarding the basis of the violation, the entity that maintains the record shall notify  the
person who is the  subject of the record that the person may apply to the entity, in the
manner established by the entity,  to expunge the record. If the person provides information
sufficient for the entity to determine that the violation was based on a qualifying marijuana
offense or conduct that constitutes or may be prosecuted  as a qualifying marijuana offense,
the entity shall expunge the violation record.
(3) The entity that maintained a violation record expunged under this section shall notify
[22]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the person who is the subject of the violation record of the expunction and that  the person
may assert that the violation record never existed.
(4) An entity listed in subsection (1) of this section shall complete the review and
expunction of violation records described in this section not later than December 31, 2024.
SECTION 44b.
Section 44a of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
(Permits and Conduct Exempted from Regulations)
SECTION 45.  ORS 475B.266 is amended to read:
475B.266. (1) The Oregon  Liquor Control Commission shall issue permits to qualified applicants
to perform work described in ORS 475B.261. The commission shall adopt rules establishing:
(a) The qualifications for performing work described in ORS 475B.261;
(b) The term of a permit issued under this section;
(c) Procedures for applying for and renewing a permit issued under this section; and
(d) Reasonable application, issuance and renewal fees for a permit issued under this section.
(2)(a) The commission may require an individual applying for a permit under this section  to
successfully complete a course, made available by or through the commission, through which  the
individual receives training on:
(A) Checking identification;
(B) Detecting intoxication;
(C) Handling marijuana items;
(D) If applicable, producing and propagating marijuana;
(E) If applicable, processing marijuana;
(F) The content of ORS 475B.010 to  475B.545 and rules adopted under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545;
or
(G) Any matter deemed necessary by the commission to protect the public health and safety.
(b) The commission or other provider of a course may charge a reasonable fee for the course.
(c) The commission may  not require an individual to successfully complete a course more than
once, except that:
(A) As part of a final  order suspending a permit issued under this section, the commission may
require a permit holder to successfully complete the course as a condition of lifting  the suspension;
and
(B) As part of  a final order revoking a permit issued under this section, the commission shall
require an individual to successfully complete the course prior to applying for a new permit.
(3) The commission shall conduct a criminal records check  under ORS 181A.195 on an individual
applying for a permit under this section.
(4) Subject to the applicable provisions  of ORS chapter 183, the commission may suspend, revoke
or refuse to issue or renew a permit if the individual who is applying for or who holds the permit:
(a) Is convicted of a felony or is convicted of an offense under  ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, except
that the commission may not consider :
(A) A conviction for an offense under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 if  the date of the conviction is
two or more years before the date of the application or renewal; or
(B) A conviction of  a felony under ORS 475B.337, 475B.341, 475B.346 or 475B.349 if the date
of conviction is more than three years before the date of the application or renewal;
(b) Violates any provision of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 or any rule adopted under  ORS 475B.010
[23]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to 475B.545; or
(c) Makes a false statement to the commission.
(5) A permit issued under this section is a personal privilege and permits work  described under
ORS 475B.261 only for the individual who holds the permit.
SECTION 46.
 ORS 475B.301 is amended to read:
475B.301. ORS 475B.025, 475B.030, 475B.033, 475B.035, 475B.040,  475B.045, 475B.050, 475B.055,
475B.060, 475B.063, 475B.065, 475B.068, 475B.070,  475B.085, 475B.090, 475B.100, 475B.105, 475B.115,
475B.119, 475B.136, 475B.139, 475B.144, 475B.146, 475B.154,  475B.158, 475B.163, 475B.173, 475B.177,
475B.206, 475B.211, 475B.216, 475B.224, 475B.232,  475B.236, 475B.241, 475B.246, 475B.256, 475B.261,
475B.266, 475B.276, 475B.281, 475B.286, 475B.296, 475B.461,  475B.474, 475B.479, 475B.486, 475B.491,
475B.501, 475B.506, 475B.514, 475B.518, 475B.521, 475B.523, 475B.526 and 475B.529 and sections 16,
22, 27, 32 and 34 of this 2021 Act  do not apply:
(1) To the production or storage of homegrown plants in the genus Cannabis within  the plant
family Cannabaceae that are otherwise subject to ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545  at a household by one
or more persons 21 years of age  and older, if the total amount of homegrown plants at the household
does not exceed four plants at any time.
(2) To the possession or storage of usable marijuana items at a household by one  or more per-
sons 21 years of age or older, if the  total amount of usable marijuana at the household does not
exceed eight ounces of usable marijuana at any time.
(3) To the making,  processing, possession or storage of cannabinoid products at a household by
one or more persons 21 years of age and older, if the total amount of cannabinoid products at the
household does not exceed 16 ounces in solid form at any time.
(4) To the making,  processing, possession or storage of cannabinoid products at a household by
one or more persons 21 years of age and older, if the total amount of cannabinoid products at the
household does not exceed 72 ounces in liquid form at any time.
(5) To the  making, processing, possession or storage of cannabinoid concentrates at a household
by one or more persons 21 years of age or older, if the total amount of  cannabinoid concentrates
at the household does not exceed 16 ounces at any time.
(6) To the possession of cannabinoid extracts at a household by  one or more persons 21 years
of age or older, if the cannabinoid extracts were purchased from a marijuana retailer that holds a
license under ORS 475B.105,  or transferred by a medical marijuana dispensary registered by the
Oregon Health Authority under  ORS 475B.858, and the total amount of cannabinoid extracts at the
household does not exceed one ounce at any time.
(7) To the  delivery of not more than one ounce of usable marijuana at a time by a person 21
years of age or older to another person 21 years of age or older for noncommercial purposes.
(8) To the delivery of not more than 16 ounces  of cannabinoid products in solid form at a time
by a person 21 years of age or older to another person 21 years of  age or older for noncommercial
purposes.
(9) To the delivery of not more than 72 ounces of cannabinoid products in  liquid form at a time
by a person 21 years of  age or older to another person 21 years of age or older for noncommercial
purposes.
(10) To the delivery of not more than 16 ounces of cannabinoid concentrates  at a time by a
person 21 years of age or older to another person 21 years of  age or older for noncommercial pur-
poses.
[24]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(Applicability and Operative Dates)
SECTION 47.
The amendments to ORS 137.542 and 144.086 by sections 41 and 42 of this
2021 Act apply to supervision imposed on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 48. Sections 43 and 44 of this 2021 Act apply to conduct occurring on or after
the effective date of this 2021 Act alleged to violate a condition of supervision imposed before,
on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 49. (1) Sections 37, 38, 40 and 44a of this  2021 Act and the amendments to ORS
475B.266, 475B.301 and 475B.401 by sections 39, 45 and 46 of this 2021 Act become operative
on August 22, 2022.
(2) The  Judicial Department, the Department of State Police, the Oregon Liquor Control
Commission and the office of public defense services, as defined in ORS 151.211, may take
any action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is neces-
sary to enable the department, the commission and the office  to exercise, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section, all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the department, the commission and the  office by sections 37, 38, 40 and
44a of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 475B.266, 475B.301 and  475B.401 by sections
39, 45 and 46 of this 2021 Act.
FUNDING ALLOCATIONS
SECTION 50.
 ORS 137.300 is amended to read:
137.300. (1) The Criminal Fine Account is established in the General Fund.  Except as otherwise
provided by law, all amounts  collected in state courts as monetary obligations in criminal actions
shall be deposited by the courts in  the account. All moneys in the account are continuously appro-
priated to the Department of Revenue  to be distributed by the Department of Revenue as provided
in this section. The Department  of Revenue shall keep a record of moneys transferred into and out
of the account.
(2) The Legislative Assembly  shall first allocate moneys from the Criminal Fine Account for the
following purposes, in the following order of priority:
(a) Allocations for public safety standards, training and facilities.
(b) Allocations for criminal injuries compensation and assistance to victims of crime and chil-
dren reasonably suspected of being victims of crime.
(c) Allocations for the forensic services provided by the Oregon State Police, including, but  not
limited to, services of the Chief Medical Examiner.
(d) Allocations for the maintenance and operation of the Law Enforcement Data System.
(3) Before making any allocation described in subsection (4) of this section, the Legisla-
tive Assembly shall allocate 10 percent of the moneys remaining in the Criminal Fine  Ac-
count after making the allocations described in subsection (2) of this section to the Cannabis
Equity Fund established under section 9 of this 2021 Act.
[(3)] (4) After making allocations under [ subsection (2) ] subsections (2)  and (3)  of this section,
the Legislative Assembly shall allocate moneys  from the Criminal Fine Account for the following
purposes:
(a) Allocations to the Law Enforcement Medical Liability Account  established under ORS
414.815.
[25]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Allocations to the State Court Facilities and Security Account established under ORS  1.178.
(c) Allocations to the Department of Corrections for the  purpose of planning, operating and
maintaining county juvenile  and adult corrections programs and facilities and drug and alcohol
programs.
(d) Allocations to the Oregon Health Authority  for the purpose of grants under ORS 430.345 for
the establishment, operation and maintenance of alcohol and drug abuse  prevention, early inter-
vention and treatment services provided through a county.
(e) Allocations to the Oregon State Police for the purpose of the enforcement of the laws relat-
ing to driving under the influence of intoxicants.
(f) Allocations to the Arrest and Return Account established under ORS 133.865.
(g) Allocations to the Intoxicated Driver Program Fund established under ORS 813.270.
(h) Allocations to the State Court Technology Fund established under ORS 1.012.
[(4)] (5) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that allocations from the Criminal Fine
Account under subsection [ (3)] (4) of this section be consistent with historical funding of the entities,
programs and accounts  listed in subsection [ (3)] (4) of this section from monetary obligations im-
posed in criminal proceedings. Amounts that are allocated under subsection [ (3)(c)] (4)(c)  of this
section shall be distributed to counties based on the amounts that were transferred to counties by
circuit courts during the 2009-2011 biennium under the provisions of ORS 137.308,  as in effect Jan-
uary 1, 2011.
[(5)] (6) Moneys in the Criminal Fine Account may not be allocated for the payment  of debt
service obligations.
[(6)] (7) The  Department of Revenue shall deposit in the General Fund all moneys remaining in
the Criminal Fine  Account after the distributions listed in subsections (2) [ and (3) ] to (4)  of this
section have been made.
[(7)] (8) The Department of Revenue shall establish by rule  a process for distributing moneys in
the Criminal Fine Account. The department may not distribute more than one-eighth of  the total
biennial allocation to an entity during a calendar quarter.
SECTION 51.
 ORS 475B.759, as amended by section 10,  chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate  and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available  in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Before making any other distribution from the Oregon Marijuana Account,  each
quarter the department shall first distribute 25 percent  of the moneys available in the ac-
count to the Cannabis Equity Fund established under section 9 of this 2021 Act.
[(b)] (c) Subject to subsection (4) of this  section, and after making the transfer of moneys re-
quired by subsection (7) of this section, the department shall  transfer quarterly 20 percent of the
moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to the  cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred  in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that is  not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population of  all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
[26]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
paragraph pursuant to subsection  (4)(a) of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five  percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten  percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total  commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in  each county compared to the total commercially available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of  the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS  475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located  in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
[(c)] (d) After making the transfer of moneys required by subsection (7) of  this section, eighty
percent of the remaining moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty percent of the moneys in the account [ must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used ] must be used as fol-
lows:
(i) Twenty percent of the 40 percent solely for the purposes described in ORS 329.841;
(ii) Ten percent of the 40 percent solely for the purposes described in ORS 329.843; and
(iii) Ten percent of the 40 percent solely for the purposes described in ORS 329.845 ;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account must  be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) In addition to the moneys described in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  fifteen percent
of the moneys  in the account must be used solely for purposes for which moneys in the [ State Police
Account established under ORS 181A.020 ] Cannabis Equity Fund established under  section 9 of
this 2021 Act  may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for :
(i) Purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse  prevention, early intervention and treatment
services[ .];
(ii) Assisting  the Oregon Health Authority in administering ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949; and
(iii) Assisting the authority in providing  public education about the medical use of
marijuana.
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance  prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection [ (3)(b)(A)] (3)(c)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
[27]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
subsection [ (3)(b)(B)(i)] (3)(c)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection [ (3)(b)(B)(ii)] (3)(c)(B)(ii)  of this section.
(5)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection (4) of this section to  receive a transfer
of moneys  from the Oregon Marijuana Account during a given quarter but has received a transfer
of moneys for that quarter shall return the amount transferred to the Department of Revenue,  with
interest as described  under paragraph (f) of this subsection. An ineligible city or county may vol-
untarily transfer the moneys to the Department of Revenue immediately upon receipt of the ineligi-
ble transfer.
(b) If the Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services determines that a city
or county received a transfer of moneys under subsection  [ (3)(b)] (3)(c) of this section but was in-
eligible to receive that transfer under subsection (4) of this section,  the director shall provide notice
to the ineligible city or  county and order the city or county to return the amount received to the
Department of Revenue, with interest as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. A city or
county may appeal the order  within 30 days of the date of the order under the procedures for a
contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under paragraph  (b) of this subsection becomes final, the director shall
notify the Department of  Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon notification, the Depart-
ment of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have the benefit of all  laws of the state pertaining to the
collection of income and excise taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts described  in the no-
tice under paragraph (c) of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not necessary and  the collection
described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject to an order  to return moneys from an ineligible transfer, the
city or county shall  be denied any further relief in connection with the ineligible transfer on or after
the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at the  rate established in ORS 305.220 beginning on
the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys and the interest collected from or returned by an  ineligible city or county
shall be redistributed to the cities  or counties that were eligible to receive a transfer under sub-
section [ (3)(b)] (3)(c) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(6)(a) Not later than July 1 of each year,  each city and county in this state shall certify with
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services whether the city or county  has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issuance  of a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required. The certification shall  be made concurrently with the
certifications  under  ORS 221.770, in a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services.
(b) If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive transfers  of
moneys under subsection [ (3)(b)(A)] (3)(c)(A) of this section. If a  county fails to comply with this
subsection, the county is not eligible to receive transfers of  moneys under subsection [ (3)(b)(B)]
(3)(c)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as provided  in ORS 475B.496 shall file an updated
certification with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services in a  form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, noting the effective date of  the change. A city or county that repeals an
[28]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ordinance as provided in ORS 475B.496 is eligible to  receive quarterly transfers of moneys under
this section for quarters where  the repeal is effective for the entire quarter and the updated certi-
fication was filed at least 30 days before the date of transfer.
(7) Before making the transfer of moneys required by subsection (3) of  this section, the depart-
ment shall transfer quarterly to the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund all  moneys in the
Oregon Marijuana Account in excess of $11,250,000.
SECTION 52.
 Section 16, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 16.  (1) Notwithstanding ORS 475B.759, before  making any other distribution from the
Oregon Marijuana Account established under ORS 475B.759, the Department  of Revenue shall first
distribute quarterly from the account the following:
(a) [ $875,000] $831,250 to  the Oregon Liquor Control Commission for deposit in the Marijuana
Control and Regulation Fund established under ORS 475B.296; [ and]
(b) [ $375,000] $356,250 to the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission for deposit into the Illegal
Marijuana Market Enforcement Grant  Program Fund established under section 15 [ of this 2018
Act], chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018,  for the purposes of paying the costs incurred by the  com-
mission in carrying out the provisions of section 13  [ of this 2018 Act. ], chapter 103, Oregon Laws
2018; and
(c) $62,500 to the Oregon Health Authority  for the administration of ORS 475B.785 to
475B.949.
(2) The final distribution  made under subsection (1) of this section shall be made in the fiscal
quarter beginning on October 1, 2023.
SECTION 53. (1) The amendments to ORS 137.300 and 475B.759  and section 16, chapter
103, Oregon Laws 2018, by sections 50 to 52 of this 2021  Act become operative on August 22,
2022.
(2) The Department  of Revenue may take any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of  this section that is necessary to enable the department to exercise, on
and after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the department by the amendments to ORS 137.300 and
475B.759 and section 16, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018, by  sections 50 to 52 of this 2021 Act.
MEDICAL MARIJUANA PROGRAM
SECTION 54.
Section 55 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 475B.785 to
475B.949.
SECTION 55. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall use moneys transferred to the au-
thority under ORS 475B.759 and section 16, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018, to:
(a) Administer and maintain the program described under ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949;
(b) Establish and maintain  a public education program to routinely monitor and report
on and educate the public about  the known benefits and risks related to marijuana use, the
public health effects  of marijuana use, any public health interventions related to marijuana
use and the impact of marijuana prohibition on the  overall health of individuals who are
American Indian, Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx; and
(c) Provide alcohol and drug abuse prevention,  early intervention and treatment services
to individuals who are American Indian,  Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx in a man-
ner that meets any needs identified under section 5 of this 2021 Act.
[29]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2)(a) The authority shall ensure that the processes to apply for  a registry identification
card under ORS 475B.797 and to  register a location as a marijuana grow site under ORS
475B.810 are equitably accessible regardless of an  individual’s ability to access or use digital
technology.
(b) The authority shall consider  and, as is feasible, remedy other potential barriers to
registration described in this subsection and to meeting the tracking requirements estab-
lished under ORS 475B.895.
(3) The authority shall review, at least once each biennium,  and revise the list of debili-
tating medical conditions to ensure the list meets the mental, physical and behavioral health
needs of individuals who are American Indian, Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx.
(4) The authority shall regularly review and  revise the strategic plan for carrying out
ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 to ensure that registry identification cardholders who are individ-
uals who are American Indian, Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx:
(a) Have access to safe and affordable marijuana for medical use;
(b) Are afforded  equitable access to civil rights protections related to ORS 475B.785 to
475B.949;
(c) Are offered any security measures for registry identification cardholders that  are
offered generally to registry identification cardholders; and
(d) Are equitably included in any methods of reporting and monitoring used  by the au-
thority to discover the need for, and carry out any public  health interventions related to, the
medical use of marijuana.
(5) The authority shall develop, continually update and implement a plan to  address and
eliminate any inequities for a registry  identification cardholder to grow at home marijuana
for the registry  identification cardholder’s use, including inequities and barriers that result
from homeownership or tenancy status,  plant possession limits and land use zoning. The
authority shall publish the plan described in this  subsection in a manner responsive to any
needs identified under section 5 of this 2021 Act.
(6) The authority may, with the advice of the equity liaison of the authority  and in col-
laboration with the Cannabis Equity Board and the Oregon  Liquor Control Commission,
adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 56.
 Section 55 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 55.  (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall use moneys transferred to the  authority under
ORS 475B.759 [ and section 16, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018, ] to:
(a) Provide community health support and other  support, including substance abuse treatment,
to individuals who are American Indian, Alaska  Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx in a manner that
meets the needs identified by the data collection and reporting under section 3 of this 2021 Act.
(b) Study the impact of marijuana  prohibitions on the overall health of individuals who are
American Indian, Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx.
(2)(a) The authority shall  ensure that the processes to apply for a registry identification card
under ORS 475B.797 and to register a location as a marijuana grow site under ORS 475B.810  are
equitably accessible regardless of an individual’s ability to access or use digital technology.
(b) The authority shall consider and remedy  other potential barriers to registration described
in this subsection and to meeting the tracking requirements established under ORS 475B.895.
(3) The authority shall regularly review and revise the list of debilitating medical conditions to
ensure the list meets the mental, physical and behavioral health needs  of individuals who are
[30]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
American Indian, Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx.
(4) The authority shall regularly review and revise  the strategic plan for carrying out ORS
475B.785 to 475B.949 to ensure that registry identification cardholders who are individuals who  are
American Indian, Alaska Native, Black, Hispanic or Latinx:
(a) Have access to safe and affordable marijuana for medical use;
(b) Are afforded equitable access to civil rights  protections related to ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949;
(c) Are  offered any security measures for registry identification cardholders that are offered
generally to registry identification cardholders; and
(d) Are equitably included in any methods of reporting and monitoring used by the  authority to
discover the need  for, and carry out any public health interventions related to, the medical use of
marijuana.
(5) The authority shall develop, continually update and implement a plan to address  and elimi-
nate any inequities for a registry identification cardholder to grow at home marijuana for the  reg-
istry identification cardholder’s use, including inequities and  barriers that result from
homeownership or tenancy status, plant possession limits and land use zoning.
(6) The authority may,  with the advice of the equity liaison of the authority, adopt rules to carry
out this section.
SECTION 57.
 ORS 475B.797 is amended to read:
475B.797. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a program  for the issuance of registry
identification cards to applicants who meet the requirements of this section.
(2) The authority shall issue a registry identification card to an  applicant who is 18 years of age
or older if the applicant pays a fee in an amount established by the authority by rule and  submits
to the authority an application containing the following information:
(a) Written documentation  from the applicant’s attending physician stating that the attending
physician has diagnosed the applicant as having a debilitating medical  condition and that the med-
ical use of marijuana may mitigate the symptoms or effects of the applicant’s debilitating medical
condition;
(b) The name, address and date of birth of the applicant;
(c) The name, address and telephone number of the applicant’s attending physician;
(d) Proof of residency, submitted in a form required by the authority by rule;
(e) The name  and address of the applicant’s designated primary caregiver, if the applicant is
designating a primary caregiver under ORS 475B.804; and
(f) The information described  in ORS 475B.810 (2), if the applicant is applying to produce
marijuana or designate another person under ORS 475B.810 to produce marijuana.
(3)(a) The authority shall issue a registry identification  card to an applicant who is under 18
years of age if:
(A) The applicant pays the fee and submits the application  described in subsection (2) of this
section; and
(B) The custodial parent or legal guardian who is responsible for the health care  decisions of
the applicant signs and submits to the authority a written statement that:
(i) The applicant’s attending  physician has explained to the applicant and to the custodial parent
or legal guardian the possible risks and benefits of the medical use of marijuana;
(ii) The custodial parent or legal guardian consents  to the medical use of marijuana by the ap-
plicant;
(iii) The custodial parent or legal guardian  agrees to serve as the applicant’s designated primary
[31]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
caregiver; and
(iv) The custodial  parent or legal guardian agrees to control the acquisition, dosage and fre-
quency of the medical use of marijuana by the applicant.
(b) An applicant who is under 18 years of age may not apply to produce marijuana  under sub-
section (2)(f) of this section.
(4) The authority shall:
(a) On the date on which the  authority receives an application described in subsection (2) of this
section, issue a receipt to  the applicant verifying that the authority received an application under
subsection (2) or (3) of this section; and
(b) Approve or deny an application  received under subsection (2) or (3) of this section within
30 days after receiving the application.
(5)(a) If the authority approves an application, the authority shall issue a  serially numbered
registry identification card to the applicant within five days after approving the application.  The
registry identification card must include the following information:
(A) The registry identification cardholder’s name, address and date of birth;
(B) The issuance date and expiration date of the registry identification card;
(C) If the registry identification cardholder designated a primary caregiver under ORS 475B.804,
the name and address of the registry identification cardholder’s designated primary caregiver; and
(D) Any other information required by the authority by rule.
(b) If the registry identification cardholder  designated a primary caregiver under ORS 475B.804,
the authority shall issue  an identification card to the designated primary caregiver. The identifica-
tion card must contain the information required by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(6) A registry identification cardholder shall:
(a) In a form and manner prescribed by  the authority, notify the authority of any change con-
cerning the registry identification cardholder’s:
(A) Name, address or attending physician;
(B) Designated primary caregiver, including the designation of a primary caregiver made at  a
time other than at the time of applying for or renewing a registry identification card; or
(C) Person responsible for a marijuana grow site, including  the designation of a person respon-
sible for a marijuana grow site made at a time other than at the time of applying for or renewing
a registry identification card.
(b) Annually renew the registry identification card by paying a fee in an  amount established by
the authority by rule and submitting  to the authority an application that contains the following in-
formation:
(A) Updated written documentation from the registry identification cardholder’s  attending phy-
sician stating  that the registry identification cardholder still has a debilitating medical condition
and that the medical use of marijuana may mitigate the symptoms or  effects of the registry iden-
tification cardholder’s debilitating medical condition;
(B) The information described in subsection (2)(b) to (f) of this section; and
(C) If the registry identification cardholder is  under 18 years of age, a statement signed by the
custodial parent or legal guardian of the  registry identification cardholder that meets the require-
ments of subsection (3) of this section.
(7) The authority shall:
(a) On the date on which the  authority receives an application described in subsection (2) of this
section, issue a receipt to  the applicant verifying that the authority received an application under
[32]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
subsection (6)(b) of this section; and
(b) Approve or deny an application received under subsection (6)(b) of  this section within 30
days after receiving the application.
(8)(a) If the registry identification cardholder’s attending physician determines that the registry
identification cardholder no longer has a debilitating medical condition,  or determines that the
medical use of marijuana is contraindicated for  the registry identification cardholder’s debilitating
medical condition, the registry identification cardholder shall return  the registry identification card
to the authority within 30 calendar days after receiving notice of the determination.
(b) If, because of circumstances beyond the control of the registry identification  cardholder, a
registry identification cardholder is unable to  obtain a second medical opinion about the registry
identification  cardholder’s  continuing eligibility for the medical use of marijuana before having to
return the registry identification card  to the authority, the authority may grant the registry iden-
tification cardholder additional time to obtain a second medical opinion.
(9)(a) The authority may deny an application for a registry identification  card or an application
to renew a registry identification card, or may suspend or revoke a registry identification card, if:
(A) The applicant or registry identification cardholder  does not provide the information required
by this section;
(B) The authority determines that the applicant or  registry identification cardholder provided
false information; or
(C) The authority determines that  the applicant or registry identification cardholder violated a
provision of ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 or a rule adopted under ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949.
(b) If a registry identification card is revoked, any associated identification card issued under
subsection (5)(b) of this section, or marijuana grow site registration card issued  under ORS 475B.810
(6), shall also be revoked.
(c) A person whose application is denied, or whose registry identification card is revoked,  under
this subsection may not reapply for a registry identification card for six  months from the date of the
denial or revocation unless otherwise authorized by the authority.
(10)(a) The authority may deny a designation of a primary caregiver made under  ORS 475B.804,
or suspend or revoke an associated identification card  issued under subsection (5)(b) of this section,
if the authority  determines that the designee or the registry identification cardholder violated a
provision of ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 or a rule adopted under ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949.
(b) A person whose designation has been  denied, or whose identification card has been revoked,
under this subsection may not  be designated as a primary caregiver under ORS 475B.804 for six
months from the date of the denial or revocation unless otherwise authorized by the authority.
(11)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) or (6)(b) of this  section, if an applicant for a registry
identification card, or a  registry identification cardholder applying for renewal of a registry iden-
tification card, submits  to the authority [ proof of having served in the Armed Forces of the United
States] the documentation described in this subsection , the authority may not impose a fee that
is greater than $20 for the issuance or renewal of the registry identification card.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (6)(b)(A) of this section, the requirement that a  registry identifi-
cation cardholder include in the application to renew a registry identification card updated written
documentation from the cardholder’s attending  physician regarding the cardholder’s continuing de-
bilitating medical condition does not apply to a service-disabled veteran who:
(A) Has been assigned a total and permanent disability  rating for compensation that rates the
veteran as unable to secure or follow a substantially gainful occupation as a result of service-
[33]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
connected disabilities as described in 38 C.F.R. 4.16; or
(B) Has a United States Department of Veterans Affairs  total disability rating of 100 percent
as a result of an injury or illness that the veteran incurred, or that  was aggravated, during active
military service and who received a discharge or release under other than dishonorable conditions.
(c) Documentation described in paragraph (a) of this subsection includes:
(A) Proof of having served in the Armed Forces of the United States;
(B) Proof of receiving supplemental nutrition assistance;
(C) Proof of receiving Supplemental Security Income;
(D) Proof of receiving income from Social Security Disability Insurance benefits; or
(E) Proof of being enrolled in the state medical assistance program.
(d) The authority  may not impose a fee greater than $60 for the issuance or renewal of
a registry identification card to an applicant who does not submit the  documentation de-
scribed in this subsection.
(12) For any purpose described in ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949, including  exemption from criminal
liability under ORS 475B.907, a receipt issued by  the authority verifying that an application has
been submitted to the authority under subsection (2), (3) or (6)(b) of this section has the same  legal
effect as a registry  identification card for 30 days following the date on which the receipt was issued
to the applicant.
SECTION 58.
 ORS 475B.831 is amended to read:
475B.831. (1)(a) A registry identification cardholder and  the designated primary caregiver of the
registry identification cardholder may jointly possess:
(A) Six or fewer mature marijuana plants; and
(B) Twelve or fewer immature marijuana plants.
(b)(A) Unless an address is the marijuana grow site of  a person designated to produce marijuana
by a registry  identification cardholder, the address where a registry identification cardholder or the
primary caregiver of a  registry identification cardholder produces marijuana may be used to produce
not more than:
(i) Six or fewer mature marijuana plants per registry identification cardholder, up to 12 mature
marijuana plants; and
(ii) Twelve or fewer immature marijuana plants per registry identification cardholder, up  to 24
immature marijuana plants.
(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, an address that is  subject to this
paragraph may not be used to produce plants in the genus  Cannabis within the plant family
Cannabaceae pursuant to ORS 475B.301.
(C) Subject to subparagraph (D) of this paragraph, an  address that is subject to this paragraph
may be  used to produce plants in the genus Cannabis within the plant family Cannabaceae pursuant
to ORS 475B.301 if a person other than a registry identification cardholder who is using the  address
to produce marijuana plants pursuant to ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 resides at the address.
(D) An address that is subject to this  paragraph may not be used to produce more than 12 total
mature marijuana plants.
(2)(a) A person may be designated to produce marijuana under ORS 475B.810 by no  more than
eight registry identification cardholders.
(b) A person responsible for a marijuana grow site may  produce for a registry identification
cardholder who designates the person to produce marijuana no more than:
(A) Six mature marijuana plants;
[34]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) 12 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the Oregon Health Authority by rule,  of immature marijuana
plants that are less than 24 inches in height.
(3) If the address of a person responsible for a marijuana grow site registered  under ORS
475B.810 is located within city limits in an area zoned for residential use:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  no more than the following amounts
of marijuana plants may be produced at the address:
(A) 12 mature marijuana plants;
(B) 24 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule, of  immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height; or
(b) Subject  to subsection (5) of this section, if each person responsible for a marijuana grow site
located at the address first registered with the authority under ORS 475B.810  before January 1,
2015, no more than the following amounts of marijuana plants may be produced at the address:
(A) The amount of mature marijuana plants located at that address  on December 31, 2014, in
excess of 12 mature marijuana plants, not to exceed 24 mature marijuana plants;
(B) 48 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule, of  immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height.
(4) If the address of a person responsible for a marijuana grow site registered  under ORS
475B.810 is located in an area other than an area described in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  no more than the following amounts
of marijuana plants may be produced at the address:
(A) 48 mature marijuana plants;
(B) 96 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule, of  immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height; or
(b) Subject to subsections (5) and (6) of  this section, if each person responsible for a marijuana
grow site located at the address first registered with the authority under ORS 475B.810  before
January 1, 2015, no more than the following amounts of marijuana  plants may be produced at the
address:
(A) The amount of mature marijuana plants located at that address  on December 31, 2014, in
excess of 48 mature marijuana plants, not to exceed 96 mature marijuana plants;
(B) 192 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule, of  immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height.
(5)(a) If  the authority suspends or revokes the registration of a person responsible for a
marijuana grow site that is located at an address  described in subsection (3)(b) of this section, no
more than the following amounts of marijuana plants may subsequently be produced at any  address
described in subsection (3) of this section at which  the person responsible for the marijuana grow
site produces marijuana:
(A) 12 mature marijuana plants;
(B) 24 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule, of  immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height.
[35]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) If the authority suspends or  revokes the registration of a person responsible for a marijuana
grow site that is located at an address described in subsection (4)(b) of this section,  no more than
the following amounts of marijuana plants may subsequently be produced at any address  described
in subsection (4) of this section at which the person responsible for the  marijuana grow site
produces marijuana:
(A) 48 mature marijuana plants;
(B) 96 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule, of  immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height.
(6) If a registry identification cardholder who designated a person to produce  marijuana for the
registry identification cardholder pursuant to ORS 475B.810 terminates the designation, the person
responsible for the marijuana grow site whose designation has been terminated may not be  desig-
nated to produce marijuana by another registry  identification cardholder, except that the person
may be designated by another registry identification cardholder if no more than 48 mature
marijuana plants and  no more than 96 immature marijuana plants that are 24 or more inches in
height are produced  at the address for the marijuana grow site at which the person produces
marijuana.
(7) Subject to the limits described in subsections (2) to  (6) of this section, if multiple persons
responsible  for  a marijuana grow site under ORS 475B.810 are located at the same address, the
persons designated to produce marijuana by registry identification  cardholders who are located at
that address may  collectively produce marijuana plants for any number of registry identification
cardholders who designate the persons to produce marijuana.
(8) If a law enforcement officer determines that there is a number of marijuana plants at an
address in excess of the quantities  specified in this section, or that an address is being used to
produce a number of marijuana plants  in excess of the quantities specified in subsection (1)(b) of this
section, the law enforcement officer may confiscate only the excess number of marijuana plants.
(9) A marijuana grow site that is colocated  with a cannabis on-premises consumption site
under section 22 of this 2021 Act is not subject to this section.
SECTION 58a.
(1) Section 55 of this 2021 Act and the amendments  to ORS 475B.797 by
section 57 of this 2021 Act become operative on August 22, 2022.
(2) The amendments to section 55 of this 2021 Act by  section 56 of this 2021 Act become
operative on January 2, 2024.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the  authority by section 55 of this 2021 Act and the amendments
to ORS 475B.797 by section 57 of this 2021 Act.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 59.  ORS 475B.015 is amended to read:
475B.015. As used in ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545:
(1) “Cannabinoid” means  any of the chemical compounds that are the active constituents derived
from marijuana.
(2) “Cannabinoid concentrate” means a substance  obtained by separating cannabinoids from
[36]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
marijuana by:
(a) A mechanical extraction process;
(b) A chemical  extraction process using a nonhydrocarbon-based solvent, such as water, vege-
table glycerin, vegetable oils, animal fats, isopropyl alcohol or ethanol;
(c) A chemical extraction process using carbon dioxide, provided  that the process does not in-
volve the use of high heat or pressure; or
(d) Any other process  identified by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, in consultation with
the Oregon Health Authority, by rule.
(3) “Cannabinoid edible” means food or potable liquid into  which a cannabinoid concentrate,
cannabinoid extract or dried marijuana leaves or flowers have been incorporated.
(4) “Cannabinoid extract” means a substance obtained by  separating cannabinoids from
marijuana by:
(a) A chemical extraction process using a hydrocarbon-based solvent, such as butane, hexane
or propane;
(b) A  chemical extraction process using carbon dioxide, if the process uses high heat or pres-
sure; or
(c) Any other process identified by the commission, in consultation with the authority, by rule.
(5)(a) “Cannabinoid product” means a cannabinoid edible  and any other product intended for
human consumption  or use, including a product intended to be applied to the skin or hair, that
contains cannabinoids or dried marijuana leaves or flowers.
(b) “Cannabinoid product” does not include:
(A) Usable marijuana by itself;
(B) A cannabinoid concentrate by itself;
(C) A cannabinoid extract by itself; or
(D) Industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.269.
(6) “Consumer” means a person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds  or uses marijuana items
other than for the purpose of resale.
(7) “Deliver” means the actual, constructive or attempted transfer  from one person to another
of a marijuana item, whether or not there is an agency relationship.
(8) “Designated primary caregiver” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475B.791.
(9)(a) “Financial  consideration” means value that is given or received either directly or indi-
rectly through sales, barter, trade, fees, charges, dues, contributions or donations.
(b) “Financial consideration” does not include marijuana, cannabinoid  products or cannabinoid
concentrates that are delivered within the scope of and in compliance with ORS 475B.301.
(10) “Homegrown” means  grown by a person 21 years of age or older for noncommercial pur-
poses.
(11) “Household” means a housing unit and any place in or around a housing unit at  which the
occupants of the housing unit  are producing, processing, possessing or storing homegrown
marijuana, cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts.
(12) “Housing unit” means a house, an  apartment or a mobile home, or a group of rooms or a
single room that is occupied as  separate living quarters, in which the occupants live and eat sepa-
rately from any other persons in the building and that has direct access from the outside of  the
building or through a common hall.
(13) “Immature marijuana plant” means a marijuana plant that is not flowering.
(14) “Licensee” means a person that holds a license issued under  ORS 475B.070, 475B.090,
[37]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
475B.100 or 475B.105 or section 22, 27, 32 or 34 of this 2021 Act .
(15) “Licensee representative” means  an owner, director, officer, manager, employee, agent or
other representative of a licensee, to the extent that the person acts in a representative capacity.
(16)(a) “Manufacture” means  producing, propagating, preparing, compounding, converting or
processing a marijuana item, either directly or indirectly, by extracting  from substances of natural
origin.
(b) “Manufacture” includes any packaging or repackaging of a marijuana item or the  labeling
or relabeling of a container containing a marijuana item.
(17)(a) “Marijuana” means the plant Cannabis family  Cannabaceae, any part of the plant
Cannabis family Cannabaceae and marijuana seeds.
(b) “Marijuana” does not include:
(A) Industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.269; or
(B) Prescription drugs, as that term is defined in ORS 689.005, including those  containing one
or more  cannabinoids, that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and
dispensed by a pharmacy, as defined in ORS 689.005.
(18) “Marijuana flowers” means the flowers of the  plant genus Cannabis within the plant family
Cannabaceae.
(19) “Marijuana items” means marijuana, cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates  and
cannabinoid extracts.
(20) “Marijuana leaves” means the leaves  of the plant genus Cannabis within the plant family
Cannabaceae.
(21) “Marijuana processor” means a person that processes marijuana items in this state.
(22) “Marijuana producer” means a person that produces marijuana in this state.
(23) “Marijuana retailer”  means a person that sells marijuana items to a consumer in this state.
(24)(a) “Marijuana seeds” means the seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Marijuana seeds” does not include the seeds of industrial hemp, as defined in ORS  571.269.
(25) “Marijuana wholesaler” means a person that purchases marijuana items in this  state for
resale to a person other than a consumer.
(26) “Mature marijuana plant” means a marijuana plant that is not an immature marijuana
plant.
(27) “Medical grade cannabinoid product, cannabinoid concentrate or cannabinoid  extract”
means a cannabinoid product, cannabinoid  concentrate or cannabinoid extract that has a concen-
tration of tetrahydrocannabinol that is permitted under ORS 475B.625 in a single serving of  the
cannabinoid product, cannabinoid concentrate or cannabinoid extract for consumers who hold a
valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475B.797.
(28) “Medical purpose” means a purpose related to using usable marijuana,  cannabinoid pro-
ducts, cannabinoid concentrates  or cannabinoid extracts to mitigate the symptoms or effects of a
debilitating medical condition, as defined in ORS 475B.791.
(29) “Noncommercial” means not dependent or conditioned upon the  provision or receipt of fi-
nancial consideration.
(30)(a) “Premises” includes the following areas of a  location licensed under ORS 475B.010 to
475B.545:
(A) All public and private enclosed areas at the location that are  used in the business operated
at the location, including offices, kitchens, rest rooms and storerooms;
(B) All areas  outside a building that the commission has specifically licensed for the processing,
[38]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
wholesale sale or retail sale of marijuana items; and
(C) For a location that the commission has specifically licensed  for the production of marijuana
outside a building, that portion of the location used to produce marijuana.
(b) “Premises” does not include a primary residence.
(31)(a) “Processes” means the  processing, compounding or conversion of marijuana into
cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts.
(b) “Processes” does not include packaging or labeling.
(32)(a) “Produces” means the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing or  harvesting of
marijuana.
(b) “Produces” does not include:
(A) The drying of marijuana by a marijuana processor, if  the marijuana processor is not other-
wise producing marijuana; or
(B) The cultivation and growing of an immature marijuana plant by a marijuana processor,
marijuana wholesaler or  marijuana retailer if the marijuana processor, marijuana wholesaler or
marijuana retailer purchased or otherwise received the plant from a licensed marijuana producer.
(33) “Propagate” means to grow immature marijuana plants or to breed or produce marijuana
seeds.
(34) “Public place” means  a place to which the general public has access and includes, but is
not limited  to, hallways, lobbies and other parts of apartment houses and hotels not constituting
rooms or apartments designed for actual residence, and highways, streets,  schools, places of
amusement, parks, playgrounds and areas used in connection with public passenger transportation.
(35) “Registry identification cardholder” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475B.791.
(36)(a) “Usable marijuana” means the dried leaves and flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Usable marijuana” does not include:
(A) Marijuana seeds;
(B) The stalks and roots of marijuana; or
(C) Waste material that is a by-product of producing or processing marijuana.
SECTION 60.
 ORS 475B.025 is amended to read:
475B.025. (1) The Oregon Liquor Control  Commission has the duties, functions and powers
specified in ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 and the powers necessary or proper to enable  the commission
to carry out the commission’s duties,  functions and powers under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545. The
jurisdiction, supervision, duties, functions and powers of the commission extend to any  person that
produces, processes, transports, delivers, sells or purchases a marijuana item in  this state. The
commission may sue and be sued.
(2) The duties, functions and powers of the commission specified in ORS 475B.010 to  475B.545
include the following:
(a) To regulate the production, processing, transportation, delivery,  sale and purchase of
marijuana items in accordance with the provisions of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545.
(b) To issue, renew, suspend, revoke  or refuse to issue or renew licenses for the production,
processing or sale of marijuana items, or other licenses related to the  consumption of marijuana
items, and to permit, in the commission’s discretion, the transfer of a license between persons.
(c) To  adopt, amend or repeal rules as necessary to carry out the intent and provisions of ORS
475B.010 to 475B.545, including rules that the commission considers necessary to protect the public
health and safety.
(d) To exercise all powers incidental, convenient or necessary to enable the commission  to ad-
[39]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
minister or  carry out the provisions of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 or any other law of this state that
charges the commission with a duty, function or power related to marijuana. Powers described in
this paragraph include, but are not limited to:
(A) Issuing subpoenas;
(B) Compelling the attendance of witnesses;
(C) Administering oaths;
(D) Certifying official acts;
(E) Taking depositions as provided by law;
(F) Compelling the production of books, payrolls, accounts, papers,  records, documents and tes-
timony; and
(G) Establishing fees  in addition to the application, licensing and renewal fees described in ORS
475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 and sections 22, 27, 32 and 34 of this 2021 Act , provided
that any fee  established by the commission is reasonably calculated not to exceed the cost of the
activity for which the fee is charged.
(e) To adopt rules regulating and prohibiting advertising marijuana items in a manner:
(A) That is appealing to minors;
(B) That promotes excessive use;
(C) That promotes illegal activity; or
(D) That otherwise presents a significant risk to public health and safety.
(f) To regulate the use of marijuana  items for other purposes as deemed necessary or appropri-
ate by the commission.
(g) To establish pilot programs, of not more than three  years in duration, to expand access to
marijuana for medical use for registry  identification cardholders and designated primary caregivers,
as defined in ORS 475B.791.
(3) Fees collected pursuant to subsection (2)(d)(G) of this section shall be deposited in the
Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under ORS 475B.296.
SECTION 61.
 ORS 475B.063 is amended to read:
475B.063. (1) Prior to receiving a license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100  or 475B.105
or section 22 or 34 of this 2021  Act , an applicant shall request and be issued  a land use com-
patibility statement from  the city or county that authorizes the land use. The land use compatibility
statement must demonstrate that the requested license is for  a land use that is allowable as a per-
mitted or conditional use within the given zoning designation where the land is  located. The Oregon
Liquor  Control  Commission may not issue a license if the land use compatibility statement shows
that the proposed land use is prohibited in the applicable zone.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a city or county  that receives a request
for a land use compatibility  statement under this section must act on that request within 21 days
of:
(a) Receipt of the request, if the land use is allowable as an outright permitted use; or
(b) Final local permit approval, if the land use is allowable as a conditional use.
(3) A city or county that receives a request for a land use compatibility  statement under this
section is not required to act on that request during the period that the  commission discontinues
licensing those premises pursuant to ORS 475B.968 (4)(b).
(4) A city or county action concerning a land  use compatibility statement under this section is
not a land use decision [ for purposes of ORS chapter 195, 196, 197, 215 or 227 ] as defined in  ORS
197.015.
[40]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 62.
 ORS 475B.119 is amended to read:
475B.119. (1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission may adopt rules establishing the circum-
stances under which  the commission may require a [ marijuana retailer that holds a license issued
under ORS 475B.105 ] licensee to use an age verification scanner or any other equipment  used to
verify a person’s age for the purpose of ensuring that the [ marijuana retailer ] licensee does not :
(a) Sell  or deliver  marijuana items to a person under 21 years of age[ .];
(b) Allow a person  under 21 years of age to use marijuana items on the premises for
which the licensee holds a license; or
(c) Allow  a person under 21 years of age to enter the premises for which the licensee
holds a license.
(2) Information obtained under this section may  not be retained after verifying a person’s age
and may not be used for any purpose other than verifying a person’s age.
SECTION 63.  ORS 475B.220 is amended to read:
475B.220. (1) As used in  this section, “information that may be used to identify a consumer”
means information that may be acquired through  the production of a piece of identification as de-
scribed in ORS 475B.216, whether the information is contained  in a piece of identification described
in ORS 475B.216 or in a different document or record.
(2) A consumer may not be required to procure for  the purpose of acquiring or purchasing a
marijuana item a piece of identification other than:
(a) A piece of identification described in ORS 475B.216; and
(b) If the consumer is a registry identification cardholder,  as defined in ORS 475B.791, a registry
identification card, as defined in ORS 475B.791.
(3) A marijuana retailer may not record and retain any information that may be used to  identify
a consumer, except as necessary to make deliveries to consumers pursuant to ORS  475B.206 (3)[, as
required by any rules adopted under ORS 475B.206 (3) ] or section 27 of this 2021 Act .
(4) A marijuana retailer may not transfer any  information that may be used to identify a con-
sumer to any other person.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section,  a marijuana retailer may record and retain
the name and contact information of  a consumer for the purpose of notifying the consumer of ser-
vices that the marijuana retailer provides or  of discounts, coupons and other marketing information
if:
(A) The marijuana retailer asks the consumer whether the marijuana retailer may record and
retain the information; and
(B) The consumer consents to the recording and retention of the information.
(b) This subsection does not  authorize a marijuana retailer to transfer information that may be
used to identify a consumer.
(6) This section does not apply to deidentified information the documentation and  transfer of
which is required by the Department of Revenue for purposes of ORS 475B.707.
SECTION 64.
 ORS 475B.227 is amended to read:
475B.227. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Export” includes placing a marijuana item in any mode of transportation for  hire, such as
luggage, mail or parcel  delivery, even if the transportation of the marijuana item is intercepted prior
to the marijuana item leaving this state.
(b) “Marijuana item” includes industrial hemp products and commodities that contain  more than
0.3 percent tetrahydrocannabinol.
[41]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) A person may not import marijuana items into this state or export marijuana items from  this
state.
(3) Except  as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a violation of this section is a Class B
violation.
(4) A violation of this section is a:
(a) Class A misdemeanor, if the importation or exportation:
(A) Is not for consideration and the person [ holds a license issued under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090,
475B.100 or 475B.105 ] is a licensee ; or
(B) Concerns an amount  of marijuana items that exceeds the applicable maximum amount spec-
ified in ORS 475B.337 (1)(a) to (f).
(b) Class C felony, if the importation or exportation:
(A) Is for consideration and the person [ holds a license issued under ORS  475B.070, 475B.090,
475B.100 or 475B.105 ] is a licensee ;
(B) Concerns an amount of marijuana items that  exceeds 16 times the applicable maximum
amount specified in ORS 475B.337 (1)(a) to (f); or
(C) Concerns a cannabinoid extract that was not purchased from a marijuana retailer  that holds
a license issued under ORS 475B.105.
SECTION 65.
 ORS 475B.486 is amended to read:
475B.486. (1) [ For purposes of ] As used in  this section, “reasonable regulations” includes:
(a) Reasonable  conditions on the manner in which a marijuana producer that holds a license
issued under ORS 475B.070 may produce marijuana or in which a researcher of  cannabis that holds
a certificate issued under ORS 475B.286 may  produce marijuana or propagate immature marijuana
plants;
(b) Reasonable conditions on the manner in which a marijuana processor that  holds a license
issued under ORS 475B.090 may  process marijuana or in which a researcher of cannabis that holds
a certificate issued under ORS 475B.286 may process marijuana;
(c) Reasonable conditions on the manner in which a marijuana wholesaler that holds a  license
issued under ORS 475B.100 may sell marijuana at wholesale;
(d) Reasonable  conditions on the manner in which a marijuana retailer that holds a license is-
sued under ORS 475B.105 may sell marijuana items;
(e) Reasonable conditions on the manner in which  a person that holds a license issued
under section 22 of this 2021 Act may operate a cannabis on-premises consumption site;
(f) Reasonable conditions on the manner in which a person that holds a  license issued
under section 34 of this 2021 Act for a shared processing facility may allow  the processing
of marijuana at the shared processing facility;
[(e)] (g) Reasonable  limitations on the hours during which a premises for which a license has
been issued under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 may operate;
[(f)] (h) Reasonable requirements related to the public’s access to a premises  for which a license
or certificate has been issued under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545; and
[(g)] (i) Reasonable limitations on where a premises for which a license or  certificate may be
issued under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 may be located.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 30.935, 215.253  (1) or 633.738, the governing body of a city or county
may adopt ordinances that impose reasonable regulations  on the operation of businesses located at
premises for which a license or certificate has  been issued under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 if the
premises are located in the area subject to the jurisdiction of the city or county, except that  the
[42]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
governing body of a city or county may not:
(a) Adopt an ordinance that prohibits a premises for which a license has been issued under  ORS
475B.105 or section 22 or 34 of this 2021 Act  from being located within a distance that is  greater
than 1,000 feet of another premises for which a license has been issued  under ORS 475B.105 or
section 22 or 34 of this 2021 Act .
(b) Impose a fee in excess of $1,000 for any process in which  the governing body author-
izes the  establishment of a cannabis on-premises consumption site for which a license is re-
quired under section 22 of this 2021 Act.
[(b)] (c) Adopt an ordinance that imposes a setback  requirement for an agricultural building
used to produce marijuana located on a premises for which a  license has been issued under ORS
475B.070 if the agricultural building:
(A) Was constructed on or before July 1,  2015, in compliance with all applicable land use and
building code requirements at the time of construction;
(B) Is located at  an address where a marijuana grow site first registered with the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 475B.810 on or before January 1, 2015;
(C) Was used to produce marijuana pursuant  to the provisions of ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 on
or before January 1, 2015; and
(D) Has four opaque walls and a roof.
SECTION 66.
 ORS 475B.575 is amended to read:
475B.575. Subject to the applicable provisions of  ORS chapter 183, if an applicant or licensee
violates a provision of ORS  475B.550 to 475B.590 or a rule adopted under a provision of ORS
475B.550 to 475B.590, the Oregon Liquor Control Commission may refuse to issue or renew, or may
suspend or revoke, a license issued under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.105 or section
16, 22, 27, 32 or 34 of this 2021 Act .
SECTION 67.
 ORS 475B.635 is amended to read:
475B.635. To ensure compliance with ORS  475B.600 to 475B.655 and any rule adopted under ORS
475B.600 to 475B.655, the Oregon  Liquor Control Commission may inspect the premises of a person
that holds a license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.105 or section 22 or 34 of this
2021 Act.
SECTION 68.  ORS 475B.645 is amended to read:
475B.645. Subject to the applicable provisions  of ORS chapter 183, if the applicant or licensee
violates a provision of ORS 475B.600 to 475B.655 or a rule adopted under  a provision of ORS
475B.600 to 475B.655, the Oregon Liquor Control Commission may refuse to issue or renew, or may
suspend or revoke, a license issued under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.105 or section
22, 27, 32 or 34 of this 2021 Act .
SECTION 69.
 ORS 475B.766 is amended to read:
475B.766. A financial institution  that provides financial services customarily provided by finan-
cial institutions pursuant to powers granted by ORS 717.200 to 717.320, 717.900  and 717.905, the
Bank Act or by ORS chapter 723 to [ a marijuana processing site registered under ORS  475B.840, a
medical marijuana dispensary registered  under ORS 475B.858, a marijuana producer that holds a li-
cense under  ORS 475B.070, a marijuana processor that holds a license under ORS 475B.090, a
marijuana wholesaler that holds  a license under ORS 475B.100, a marijuana retailer that holds a li-
cense under ORS 475B.105, a laboratory that holds a license under ORS 475B.560 or a person to whom
a permit has been issued under ORS 475B.266 ] the following is exempt from any criminal law of this
state an element of which may be proven by substantiating that a person provides financial services
[43]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
customarily provided by financial institutions  pursuant to powers granted by ORS 717.200 to 717.320,
717.900 and 717.905, the Bank Act or ORS chapter 723 to a person [ who] that possesses, delivers
or manufactures marijuana or marijuana derived products[ .]:
(1) A marijuana processing site registered under ORS 475B.840;
(2) A medical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS 475B.858;
(3) A marijuana producer that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.070;
(4) A marijuana processor that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.090;
(5) A marijuana wholesaler that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.100;
(6) A marijuana retailer that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.105;
(7) A laboratory that holds a license under ORS 475B.560;
(8) A person to whom a permit has been issued under ORS 475B.266;
(9) A person that holds a  cannabis on-premises consumption license issued under section
22 of this 2021 Act;
(10) A person that holds  a cannabis delivery license issued under section 27 of this 2021
Act;
(11) A person that holds a shared  processing license issued under section 32 of this 2021
Act;  or
(12) A person that holds a shared processing facility license  issued under section 34 of
this 2021 Act.
SECTION 70.
 ORS 475B.769 is amended to read:
475B.769. (1) Notwithstanding any law relating to the exemption of information from  public dis-
closure under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 or 475B.550 to 475B.590,  upon the request of a financial
institution, the Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall provide to the financial institution the  fol-
lowing  information:
(a) Whether a person with whom the financial institution is doing  business holds a license under
ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100, 475B.105 or 475B.560 or section 22,  27, 32 or 34 of this 2021
Act or a permit under ORS 475B.266;
(b) The name of any other business or individual affiliated with the person;
(c) A copy of the  application, and any supporting documentation submitted with the application,
for a license or a permit submitted by the person;
(d) If applicable, data relating to sales and the volume of product sold by the person;
(e) Whether the person is currently compliant with the provisions of ORS  475B.010 to 475B.545,
475B.550 to 475B.590 and  475B.600 to 475B.655 and rules adopted under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545,
475B.550 to 475B.590 and 475B.600 to 475B.655;
(f) Any past or pending violation by the person of  a provision of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545,
475B.550 to 475B.590 or 475B.600 to 475B.655 or a  rule adopted under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545,
475B.550 to 475B.590 or 475B.600 to 475B.655; and
(g) Any penalty imposed upon the person for violating a  provision of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545,
475B.550 to 475B.590 or 475B.600 to 475B.655 or  a rule adopted under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545,
475B.550 to 475B.590 or 475B.600 to 475B.655.
(2) Upon receiving a request under subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall  provide
the requesting financial institution with the requested information.
(3) The commission may charge a financial institution a reasonable fee to cover the  adminis-
trative costs of providing information under this section.
SECTION 71.
 ORS 475B.968 is amended to read:
[44]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
475B.968. (1) The governing body of a city or county may adopt ordinances to be referred to the
electors of the city or county as described in subsection (2) of this section  that prohibit or allow the
establishment of any one or more of the following in the area subject to the jurisdiction of  the city
or in the unincorporated area subject to the jurisdiction of the county:
(a) Marijuana processing sites registered under ORS 475B.840;
(b) Medical marijuana dispensaries registered under ORS 475B.858;
(c) Marijuana producers that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.070;
(d) Marijuana processors that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.090;
(e) Marijuana wholesalers that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.100;
(f) Marijuana retailers that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.105;
(g) Marijuana producers that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.070 and that  the Oregon
Liquor Control Commission has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475B.122;
(h) Marijuana  processors that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.090 and that the commission
has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475B.127;
(i) Marijuana  wholesalers that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.100 and that the commis-
sion has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475B.129;
(j) Marijuana retailers that  hold a license issued under ORS 475B.105 and that the commission
has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475B.131; [ or]
(k) Cannabis on-premises consumption sites licensed under section 22 of this 2021 Act;
(L) Shared processing facilities licensed under section 34 of this 2021 Act; or
[(k)] (m) Any combination of the entities described in this subsection.
(2) If the governing body of a city or county adopts an ordinance under  this section, the gov-
erning body shall submit the measure of the ordinance to the  electors of the city or county for ap-
proval at the next statewide general election.
(3) If the governing body of a city or county adopts an ordinance under  this section, the gov-
erning body must provide the text of the ordinance:
(a) To the Oregon Health Authority, in  a form and manner prescribed by the authority, if the
ordinance concerns a medical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS 475B.858 or a  marijuana
processing site registered under ORS 475B.840; or
(b) To the commission,  if the ordinance concerns a premises for which a license has been issued
under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545.
(4)(a) Upon receiving notice of a prohibition under subsection (3) of this  section, the authority
shall discontinue registering those  entities to which the prohibition applies until the date of the next
statewide general election.
(b) Upon receiving notice of a prohibition under subsection  (3) of this section, the commission
shall discontinue licensing those premises to which the prohibition applies until the date of the  next
statewide general election.
(5)(a) If an allowance is approved  at the next statewide general election under subsection (2)
of this  section, and the allowance concerns an entity described in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this
section, the authority shall begin registering the  entity to which the allowance applies on the first
business day of the January immediately following the date of the statewide general election.
(b) If an allowance  is approved at the next statewide general election under subsection (2) of
this section, and the allowance concerns an entity described in subsection (1)(c) to  [ (j)] (L) of this
section, the commission shall begin licensing the premises to which the allowance  applies on the
first business day of the January immediately following  the date of the next statewide general
[45]
HB 3112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
election.
(6) If the electors of a city  or county approve an ordinance prohibiting or allowing an entity
described in subsection (1)(a), (b) or (g) to [ (j)] (L) of this section, the governing body  of the city or
county may amend the ordinance, without referring  the amendment to the electors of the city or
county, to prohibit or allow any other entity described in subsection (1)(a), (b) or (g) to [ (j)] (L) of
this section.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a city or county that adopts an ordinance under
this section that prohibits the establishment of an entity described in subsection  (1) of this section
may not impose a tax or fee on the production, processing or sale of  marijuana or any product into
which marijuana has been incorporated.
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, a medical marijuana dispensary is not subject
to an ordinance adopted under this section if the medical marijuana dispensary:
(a) Is registered under ORS 475B.858 on or before the  date on which the governing body adopts
the ordinance; and
(b) Has successfully completed a city or county land use application process.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of  this section, a marijuana processing site is not subject to
an ordinance adopted under this section if the marijuana processing site:
(a) Is registered under ORS 475B.840 on or before the  date on which the governing body adopts
the ordinance; and
(b) Has successfully completed a city or county land use application process.
SECTION 72.
(1) The amendments to  ORS 475B.015, 475B.025, 475B.063, 475B.119, 475B.220,
475B.227, 475B.486, 475B.575, 475B.635, 475B.645, 475B.766, 475B.769 and 475B.968 by sections
59 to 71 of this 2021 Act become operative on August 22, 2022.
(2) The Oregon  Liquor Control Commission may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the  commission to ex-
ercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers  conferred on the commission by the amendments to ORS
475B.015, 475B.025, 475B.063, 475B.119, 475B.220,  475B.227, 475B.486, 475B.575, 475B.635,
475B.645, 475B.766, 475B.769 and 475B.968 by sections 59 to 71 of this 2021 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 73.
The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 74. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[46]