Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 312.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Assessment” has  the meaning given that term in ORS 94.550 or 100.005, as applicable.
(b) “Subject property”  means property that is subject to assessment by a homeowners
association or an association of unit owners, as applicable.
(2) Subject property that has been deeded  to a county under ORS 312.200 shall be exempt
from assessment for the period that begins on the date on which the subject property is
deeded to the county and ends on the earliest of:
(a) The date on which the county transfers title to the property to another owner;
(b) The date on which the county enters into a lease agreement for the property;
(c) The date on which the county determines that it will retain title to the property; or
(d) The date that  is six months following the date on which the subject property was
deeded to the county.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to subject property deeded  to a county
under ORS 312.200 on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3887