Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “electric assisted bicycle” has the meaning given
that term in ORS 801.258.
(2) The State Parks and  Recreation Department shall conduct a study to determine the
feasibility of  authorizing the use of electric assisted bicycles on public trails that allow for
use of nonmotorized bicycles, including what restrictions on use, if any, are appropriate.
(3) The department shall  provide the results of the study, including any recommendations
for legislation, in a report to an appropriate committee  or interim committee of the Legis-
lative Assembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than October 31, 2023.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3959