Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2025 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
401.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon  Public Places Are Safe Places Investment Fund is established
in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) Amounts in the Oregon Public Places Are  Safe Places Investment Fund may be in-
vested as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and interest earned  on moneys in the fund must
be credited to the fund.
(3) Amounts credited to the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Depart-
ment of Emergency Management for the implementation  of strategies for identifying and
developing staging areas for emergency response.
(4) The fund consists of:
(a) Amounts appropriated, or otherwise provided, by the Legislative Assembly for deposit
in the fund; and
(b) Gifts, grants or contributions received by the department for deposit in the fund.
SECTION 3.
(1) There is created within  the Oregon Department of Emergency Manage-
ment an advisory committee to provide recommendations and advice  to the department re-
garding expenditures from the Oregon Public Places Are  Safe Places Investment Fund
established under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The advisory committee initially consists of 26 members appointed  by the Governor
as follows:
(a) The Governor shall appoint  as members one representative from each of the follow-
ing:
(A) The Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(B) The Department of Corrections;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2042
HB 3240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) The Department of Environmental Quality;
(D) The Department of Human Services;
(E) The Department of Justice;
(F) The Department of Land Conservation and Development;
(G) The Department of State Police;
(H) The Department of Transportation;
(I) The office of State Resilience Officer;
(J) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services;
(K) The Oregon Department of Aviation;
(L) The Oregon Health Authority;
(M) The Public Utility Commission of Oregon;
(N) The State Department of Agriculture;
(O) The State Department of Energy;
(P) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(Q) The State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries;
(R) The State Fire Marshal;
(S) The State Forestry Department;
(T) The State Marine Board;
(U) The State Parks and Recreation Department;
(V) The State Treasurer; and
(W) The Water Resources Department.
(b) The Governor shall appoint three members as follows:
(A) One member representing local governments in this state;
(B) One member representing special districts in this state; and
(C) One member of the public who has experience or  interest in disaster response and
recovery.
(3) Appointments shall  be made for a term of four years in a manner to preserve as much
as possible the representation of the advisory committee  described in subsection (2) of this
section. Vacancies shall be filled for any unexpired term as  soon as the Governor can make
such appointments.
(4) The chairperson of the advisory committee may appoint additional members to the
advisory committee. Members added  under this subsection serve for a term of four years.
If a member appointed under  this subsection leaves service on the advisory committee for
any reason, the chairperson may appoint another person for the unexpired term.
(5) The advisory committee  shall choose its own chairperson and shall meet at the call
of the chairperson or the Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
The advisory committee shall adopt rules to govern  its proceedings and may select officers
it considers necessary.
(6) The department shall provide office space  and personnel to assist the advisory com-
mittee as requested by the chairperson, within the limits of available funds.
(7) Members of the advisory committee shall receive no compensation for their services.
Members of the advisory committee other than members employed  in full-time public service
shall be reimbursed by the department  for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in
the performance of their duties. Such reimbursements shall be  subject to the provisions of
ORS 292.210 to 292.288. Members of the advisory committee who are employed in full-time
[2]
HB 3240
1
2
3
4
5
public service may be reimbursed  by their employing agency for their actual and necessary
expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.
SECTION 4.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2025 Act shall be known and may be cited as the
Oregon Public Places Resiliency Investment Act.
[3]