Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Justice  shall study ways to address organized retail
theft.
(2) The department shall provide the results of the  study, including any recommended
legislative changes, in  a report to the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than December 31, 2023.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 922