Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 12.135 is amended to read:
12.135. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Association of unit owners” has the meaning given that term in ORS 100.005.
(b) “Condominium unit” has the meaning given that term in ORS 100.005.
(c) “Homeowners association” has the meaning given that term in ORS 94.550.
(d) “Large  commercial structure,” “residential structure” and “small commercial struc-
ture” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 701.005.
(e) “Manufactured dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 446.003.
(f) “Prefabricated structure” has the meaning given that term in ORS 455.010.
(g) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(h) “Substantial completion” means the date  when the contractee accepts in writing the
construction, alteration or repair  of the improvement to real property or any designated
portion thereof as  having reached that state of completion when it may be used or occupied
for its intended purpose or, if there is no such written  acceptance, the date of acceptance
of the completed construction, alteration or repair of such improvement by the contractee.
[(1)] (2) An action against a person  by a plaintiff who is not a public body, whether in contract,
tort or  otherwise, arising from the person having performed the construction, alteration or repair
of any improvement to real property or the  supervision or inspection thereof, or from the person
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4396
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
having furnished design, planning, surveying,  architectural or engineering services for the improve-
ment, must be commenced before the earliest of:
(a) The applicable period of limitation otherwise established by law;
(b) Ten years after substantial completion or abandonment of the construction, alteration or
repair of a residential structure or  of a small commercial structure[ , as defined in ORS 701.005,
a residential structure, as defined in ORS  701.005, or a large commercial structure, as defined in ORS
701.005, that is owned or maintained by a homeowners association,  as defined in ORS 94.550, or that
is owned or maintained by an association of unit owners, as defined in ORS 100.005 ]; or
(c) Six years after substantial completion or abandonment of  the construction, alteration or re-
pair of a large commercial structure[ , as defined in  ORS 701.005, other than a large commercial
structure described in paragraph (b) of this subsection ].
[(2)] (3)  An action against a person by a  public body, whether in contract, tort or otherwise,
arising from the person having performed the construction, alteration or  repair of any improvement
to real property  or the supervision or inspection thereof, or from the person having furnished design,
planning, surveying, architectural or engineering services for the improvement,  must be commenced
not more than 10 years after substantial completion or  abandonment of such construction, alteration
or repair of the improvement to real property.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section and except as provided in paragraph
(b) of this subsection, the period of limitation for  a tort action against a person by a home-
owners association arising from the defective construction, alteration or repair of a  struc-
ture for which there is documentation of inspection under section  12 of this 2019 Act, or the
supervision or inspection thereof, is six years  after substantial completion or abandonment
of the construction, alteration or repair of the structure.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section and except as provided in paragraph  (c)
of this subsection, the period of limitation for a tort action against a person by an  associ-
ation of unit owners arising from the defective construction, alteration or repair of a con-
dominium unit for which there is documentation of inspection under section 12  of this 2019
Act, or the supervision or inspection thereof, is six years after substantial completion  or
abandonment of the construction, alteration or repair of the structure.
(c) If a construction defect described in this subsection is discovered more than  five but
less than six years after substantial completion  or abandonment, the period of limitation
under this subsection for  a tort action arising from the construction defect is one year after
discovery of the defect.
[(3)(a)] (5)(a)  Notwithstanding subsections [ (1) and] (2) and (3) of this section, an action against
a person registered to practice architecture under ORS 671.010 to  671.220, a person registered to
practice landscape architecture under ORS 671.310 to 671.459 or a person registered to  practice
engineering under ORS 672.002 to 672.325 to recover damages for injury  to a person, property or to
any interest in property, including damages for  delay or economic loss, regardless of legal theory,
arising out of the construction, alteration  or repair of any improvement to real property must be
commenced before the earliest of:
(A) Two years after the date the injury or damage is  first discovered or in the exercise of rea-
sonable care should have been discovered;
(B) Ten years after substantial completion or abandonment  of the construction, alteration or
repair of a residential structure or  of a small commercial structure[ , as defined in ORS 701.005,
a residential structure, as defined in ORS  701.005, or a large commercial structure, as defined in ORS
[2]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
701.005, that is owned or maintained by a  homeowners association, as defined in ORS 94.550, or that
is owned or maintained by an association of unit owners, as defined in ORS 100.005 ]; or
(C) Six years after substantial completion or abandonment of the construction, alteration  or re-
pair of a large commercial structure[ , as defined  in ORS 701.005, other than a large commercial
structure described in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph ].
(b) This subsection applies to actions brought by any person or public body.
[(4) For purposes of this section: ]
[(a) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109; and ]
[(b) “Substantial completion” means  the date when the contractee accepts in writing the con-
struction, alteration or repair of the improvement to real property or any  designated portion thereof as
having reached  that state of completion when it may be used or occupied for its intended purpose or,
if there is no such written acceptance, the date of acceptance of the  completed construction, alteration
or repair of such improvement by the contractee. ]
[(5)] (6)  For purposes of this section, an  improvement to real property is considered abandoned
on the same date that the improvement is considered abandoned under ORS 87.045.
[(6)] (7) This section:
(a) Applies  to an action against a manufacturer, distributor, seller or lessor of a manufactured
dwelling[, as defined in ORS 446.003, ] or of a  prefabricated structure[ , as defined in ORS 455.010 ];
and
(b) Does not apply to actions against any person in actual possession and  control of the im-
provement, as owner, tenant or otherwise, at the time such cause of action accrues.
SECTION 2.  ORS 94.630 is amended to read:
94.630. (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section and ORS  94.779, and except as otherwise
provided in its declaration or bylaws, a homeowners association may:
(a) Adopt and amend bylaws, rules and regulations for the planned community;
(b) Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures  and reserves, and collect assessments
from owners for common expenses and the reserve account established under ORS 94.595;
(c) Hire and  terminate managing agents and other employees, agents and independent contrac-
tors;
(d) Defend against any claims, proceedings or actions brought against it;
(e) Subject to [ subsection] subsections  (2)(b) and  (4) of this section, initiate or intervene in
litigation or administrative proceedings in its own name and without joining the  individual owners
in the following:
(A) Matters relating  to the collection of assessments and the enforcement of governing docu-
ments;
(B) Matters arising out of contracts to which the association is a party;
(C) Actions seeking equitable or other nonmonetary relief regarding matters that affect the
common interests of the owners, including but not limited to the abatement of nuisance;
(D) Matters, including but not limited to actions for damage, destruction, impairment  or loss of
use, relating to or affecting:
(i) Individually owned real  property, the expenses for which, including maintenance, repair or
replacement, insurance or other expenses, the association is responsible; or
(ii) Common property;
(E) Matters relating to or affecting the lots or interests of the  owners including but not limited
to damage, destruction, impairment or loss of use of a lot or portion thereof, if:
[3]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Resulting from a  nuisance or a defect in or damage to common property or individually
owned real property, the expenses for which, including maintenance, repair or replacement,  insur-
ance or other expenses, the association is responsible; or
(ii) Required to facilitate repair to any common property; and
(F) Any other matter to which the association has standing under law or  pursuant to the dec-
laration or bylaws;
(f) Make contracts and incur liabilities;
(g) Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement and modification of common property;
(h) Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the common property;
(i) Acquire, hold, encumber and convey in its own name any right, title or interest to real  or
personal property, except that common property may be conveyed  or subjected to a security interest
only pursuant to ORS 94.665;
(j) Grant easements, leases, licenses and concessions through or  over the common property as
provided in ORS 94.665;
(k) Modify, close, remove, eliminate  or discontinue the use of common property, including any
improvement or  landscaping, regardless of whether the common property is mentioned in the decla-
ration, provided that:
(A) Nothing in this paragraph is intended  to limit the authority of the association to seek ap-
proval of the modification, closure, removal, elimination or discontinuance by the owners; and
(B) Modification, closure, removal, elimination or discontinuance other than  on a temporary
basis of any swimming pool, spa or recreation or  community building must be approved by at least
a majority of owners voting on the matter at a meeting or by written ballot  held in accordance with
the declaration, bylaws or ORS 94.647;
(L) Impose and receive any payments, fees or charges for the use, rental or operation  of the
common property and services provided to owners;
(m) Adopt rules regarding the termination  of utility services paid for out of assessments of the
association and access to and use of recreational and  service facilities available to owners. The
rules must provide  for written notice and an opportunity to be heard before the association may
terminate the rights of  any owners to receive the benefits or services until the correction of any
violation covered by the rule has occurred;
(n) Impose charges for late payment of assessments and attorney fees  related to the collection
of assessments and, after giving written notice and an opportunity  to be heard, levy reasonable fines
for violations of the  declaration, bylaws, rules and regulations of the association, provided that the
charge imposed or the fine levied by the association is based:
(A) On a schedule contained in the declaration or bylaws,  or an amendment to either that is
delivered to each lot, mailed to the mailing address of each lot or mailed to the mailing addresses
designated in writing by the owners; or
(B) On a resolution of the association or its board of directors that is delivered to each  lot,
mailed to the mailing  address of each lot or mailed to the mailing addresses designated in writing
by the owners;
(o) Impose reasonable charges for the preparation and recordation  of amendments to the decla-
ration;
(p) Provide for the indemnification of its officers  and the board of directors and maintain li-
ability insurance for directors and officers;
(q) Assign its right to future income, including the right to receive common expense assess-
[4]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ments; and
(r) Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for the administration and operation  of the
association.
(2)(a) A declaration  may not impose any limitation on the ability of the association to deal with
a declarant that is more restrictive than the limitations  imposed on the ability of the association to
deal with any other person, except during the period of declarant control under ORS 94.600.
(b) Notwithstanding any contrary provision in a  declaration or bylaws, a homeowners
association may not initiate or intervene in litigation  or administrative proceedings under
subsection (1)(e)(E)  of this section regarding a matter that results from a defect in, or
damage arising from a defect in, common property unless owners representing  a majority
of the lots approve in writing of the initiation or intervention within 60 days after the mailing
date of the notice required under ORS 94.662.
(3) A permit or authorization, or an  amendment, modification, termination or other instrument
affecting a permit or authorization, issued by the board of directors that is authorized  by law, the
declaration or bylaws may  be recorded in the deed records of the county in which the planned
community is located. A permit or authorization, or  an amendment, modification, termination or
other instrument affecting a permit or authorization, recorded under this subsection shall:
(a) Be executed by the president and secretary of the association and acknowledged in  the
manner provided for acknowledgment of instruments by the officers;
(b) Include the name of the planned community and a reference to where the declaration  and
any applicable supplemental declarations are recorded;
(c) Identify, by the designations stated or referenced in  the declaration or applicable supple-
mental declaration, all affected lots and common property; and
(d) Include other information and signatures if required by law, the  declaration, bylaws or the
board of directors.
(4)(a) Subject to paragraph (f)  of this subsection, before initiating litigation or an administrative
proceeding in which the association and an owner have an adversarial relationship, the party  that
intends to initiate litigation or an administrative  proceeding shall offer to use any dispute resolution
program available within the county in which the  planned community is located that is in substan-
tial compliance with the standards and guidelines adopted under ORS 36.175. The written offer must
be hand-delivered  or mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address, contained in
the records of the association, for the other party.
(b) If the party receiving the offer does not accept  the offer within 10 days after receipt by
written notice hand-delivered or mailed by certified mail, return  receipt requested, to the address,
contained in the records of the association, for the other party,  the initiating party may commence
the litigation or the administrative proceeding. The notice of  acceptance of the offer to participate
in the program must contain  the name, address and telephone number of the body administering the
dispute resolution program.
(c) If a qualified dispute resolution program exists within the  county in which the planned
community is located and an offer to use  the program is not made as required under paragraph (a)
of this subsection, litigation or an administrative proceeding may be stayed for  30 days upon a mo-
tion of the noninitiating party. If the litigation or administrative action  is stayed under this para-
graph, both parties shall participate in the dispute resolution process.
(d) Unless a stay has been granted under paragraph (c) of this subsection, if the dispute  resol-
ution process is not completed within  30 days after receipt of the initial offer, the initiating party
[5]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
may commence  litigation or an administrative proceeding without regard to whether the dispute
resolution is completed.
(e) Once made, the decision of the court or administrative body arising from litigation or an
administrative proceeding may not be set aside on the grounds that an offer to use  a dispute resol-
ution program was not made.
(f) The requirements of this subsection do not apply to circumstances in which irreparable harm
to a party will occur  due to delay or to litigation or an administrative proceeding initiated to collect
assessments, other than assessments attributable to fines.
SECTION 3.  ORS 94.662 is amended to read:
94.662. (1) At least 10 days prior to instituting any litigation or administrative  proceeding to
recover damages under ORS  94.630 (1)(e)(E), the homeowners association shall provide written no-
tice to each affected owner of the association’s intent to seek damages on behalf of the owner. The
notice shall, at a minimum:
(a) Be mailed to the mailing address of each lot or to the mailing  address designated in writing
to the association by the owner;
(b) Inform each owner of the general nature of the litigation or proceeding;
(c) Describe the specific nature of the damages to be sought on the owner’s behalf;
(d) Set forth the terms under which the  association is willing to seek damages on the owner’s
behalf, including any mechanism proposed for the  determination and distribution of any damages
recovered;
(e) Inform each owner of the owner’s right not to have the damages sought on the owner’s behalf
and specify the procedure for exercising the right; and
(f) Inform the owner that exercising the owner’s right not to  have damages sought on the
owner’s behalf:
(A) Relieves the association of its duty to reimburse or indemnify the owner for the damages;
(B) Does not relieve the owner from the owner’s obligation to pay dues or assessments  relating
to the litigation or proceeding;
(C) Does not impair any easement owned or possessed by the association; and
(D) Does not interfere with the association’s right to make repairs to common areas.
(2) Within  10 days of mailing the notice described in this section, any owner may request in
writing that the association not seek damages on the  owner’s behalf. If an owner makes such a re-
quest, the association shall not  make or continue any claim or action for damages with regard to
the objecting owner’s lot and shall be relieved of any duty to reimburse or  indemnify the owner for
damages under the litigation or proceeding.
(3) If the action is for a claim described in ORS 94.630 (2)(b):
(a) The notice sent under subsection (1) of this section must be sent by certified mail.
(b) In addition to the contents described in subsection (1) of this section, the notice must:
(A) State that the association believes that a defect in the common property exists;
(B) Provide a detailed description of the defect;
(C) Identify the parties the association considers responsible for the defect; and
(D) State that the association may not institute litigation or an administrative  proceed-
ing unless owners representing a  majority of the lots approve in writing of the initiation or
intervention within 60 days after the mailing date of the notice.
(c) The association shall send a  copy of the notice by certified mail to each person iden-
tified in the notice as a party the association considers responsible  for the defect. The re-
[6]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
quirement for sending  notice under this subsection is in addition to the notice of defect
requirement in ORS 701.565 and does not initiate the procedure described in ORS  701.560 to
701.595.
SECTION 4.  ORS 100.405 is amended to read:
100.405. (1)(a) An association  of unit owners shall be organized to serve as a means through
which the unit owners may take action with regard to the  administration, management and opera-
tion of the condominium.
(b) The association of a condominium created on or after September  27, 2007, shall be organized:
(A) As a corporation for profit or a nonprofit corporation; or
(B) If the condominium consists  of four or fewer units, excluding units used for parking, storage
or other use ancillary  to a unit, as an unincorporated association, corporation for profit or a
nonprofit corporation.
(c) If the association is incorporated, the name  of the association shall include the complete
name of the condominium.
(d) Notwithstanding a provision in the declaration or bylaws  of a condominium created before
September 27, 2007, that states that the  association shall be unincorporated or that requires ap-
proval of owners to incorporate  as a nonprofit corporation under ORS chapter 65, an unincorporated
association may be  incorporated as a nonprofit corporation under ORS chapter 65 if the board of
directors adopts a resolution that states the association will be incorporated.
(e) A separate association is not created when an unincorporated association  formed under this
section is incorporated, reinstated after administrative dissolution under ORS 60.654 or  65.654 or
again incorporated following dissolution. The association automatically continues and,  without any
further action by incorporators, directors or officers that may otherwise  be required under Oregon
corporation laws:
(A) The incorporated association has all of the property, powers  and obligations of the associ-
ation that  existed immediately prior to incorporation in addition to the powers and obligations under
Oregon corporation laws.
(B) The bylaws in effect immediately prior to incorporation or reinstatement  constitute the by-
laws of the incorporated association.
(C) The members of the board  of directors and the officers continue to serve as directors and
officers.
(f) If an incorporated association is at any time dissolved, whether inadvertently or  deliberately:
(A) The association continues as an unincorporated association under the same name.
(B) The unincorporated association  has all of the property, powers and obligations of the in-
corporated association existing immediately prior to dissolution.
(C) The unincorporated association shall be governed by  the bylaws, and to the extent applica-
ble, the articles of incorporation of the incorporated association.
(D) The board of directors and the officers serving immediately prior to the dissolution  continue
to serve as the directors and officers of the unincorporated association.
(2) Membership in the association of unit owners shall be limited to unit owners.
(3) The affairs of the association shall be governed by a board of directors as provided  for in
the bylaws adopted under ORS 100.410.
(4) Subject to the provisions of the condominium’s declaration and bylaws, and whether or  not
the association is unincorporated, the association may:
(a) Adopt and amend bylaws and rules and regulations;
[7]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures and  reserves and levy and collect as-
sessments for common expenses from unit owners;
(c) Hire and terminate managing agents and other employees, agents and  independent contrac-
tors;
(d) Defend against any claims, proceedings or actions brought against it;
(e) Subject to [ subsection (11) ] subsections (5) and (12)  of  this section, initiate or intervene in
litigation or administrative proceedings in  its own name, and without joining the individual unit
owners, in the following:
(A) Matters  relating to the collection of assessments and the enforcement of declarations and
bylaws;
(B) Matters arising out of contracts to which the association is a party;
(C) Actions seeking equitable or other nonmonetary relief regarding matters that affect the
common interests of the unit owners, including but not limited to the abatement of nuisance;
(D) Matters relating to or affecting common elements, including but not  limited to actions for
damage, destruction, impairment or loss of use of any common element;
(E) Matters relating to or affecting  the units or interests of unit owners including but not lim-
ited to damage, destruction, impairment or loss of use of a unit or portion thereof, if:
(i) Resulting from a nuisance or a defect in or damage to a common element; or
(ii) Required to facilitate repair to any common element; and
(F) Any other matter to  which the association has standing under law or pursuant to the dec-
laration, bylaws or any articles of incorporation;
(f) Make contracts and incur liabilities;
(g) Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement and modification of common elements;
(h) Cause additional improvement to be made as a part of the common elements;
(i) Acquire by  purchase, lease, devise, gift or voluntary grant real or personal property or any
interest therein and take, hold, possess  and convey real or personal property or any interest therein;
(j) Impose and receive any payments, fees or charges for  the use, rental or operation of the
common elements;
(k) Impose charges for late payments of assessments, attorney fees  for collection of assessments
and, after giving written notice and an opportunity to be heard, levy reasonable  fines for violations
of the declaration, bylaws and rules and regulations of the association, provided that  the charge
imposed or fine levied by the association is based:
(A) On a schedule contained in the declaration  or bylaws, or an amendment to either that is
delivered to each unit, mailed to the mailing address of each unit or mailed  to the mailing addresses
designated in writing by the owners; or
(B) On a resolution  adopted by the board of directors or the association that is delivered to each
unit, mailed to the mailing address of each unit  or mailed to the mailing addresses designated by the
owners in writing;
(L) Adopt  rules regarding the termination of utility services paid for out of assessments of the
association and access to and use of recreational and service facilities available to unit owners that
must provide for written notice and  an opportunity to be heard before the association may terminate
the rights of any owners to receive such benefits or services until  the correction of any violation
covered by the rule has occurred;
(m) Impose reasonable  charges for the preparation and recordation of amendments to the dec-
laration or statements of assessments;
[8]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(n) Assign its right to future income, including the right to receive common expense  assess-
ments;
(o) Provide for the indemnification of its officers and executive board, as may be limited  by ORS
61.218 (3)(d) (1987 Replacement Part), and maintain directors’ and officers’ liability insurance;
(p) Exercise any other powers conferred by the declaration or bylaws;
(q) Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in this state by any such association; and
(r) Exercise any other powers determined by the association to  be necessary and proper for the
governance and operation of the association.
(5) Notwithstanding any contrary provision in a declaration or bylaws, an  association
may not initiate or intervene in litigation or administrative proceedings  under subsection
(4)(e) of this  section regarding a matter that results from a defect in, or damage arising from
a defect in, common elements of the condominium unless owners representing a majority of
the units approve in writing of  the initiation or intervention within 60 days after the mailing
date of the notice required under ORS 100.490. This subsection does  not apply to a breach
of warranty claim against a declarant under ORS 100.185.
[(5)] (6)  Subject to subsection [ (6)] (7)  of this section, unless expressly limited or prohibited by
the declaration, the association has the authority to grant, execute,  acknowledge and deliver on
behalf of the unit owners leases, easements, rights of way, licenses and other similar interests af-
fecting the general common elements and consent to vacation of roadways  within and adjacent to
the condominium.
[(6)(a)(A)] (7)(a)(A)  Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the granting of
a lease, easement, right of way, license or other similar interest pursuant to subsection [ (5)] (6)  of
this section shall be first approved by at least 75 percent of owners present at a meeting of the as-
sociation or with the consent of at least 75 percent of all owners solicited by  any means the board
of directors determines is reasonable. If a meeting  is held to conduct the vote, the meeting notice
must include a statement  that the approval of the grant will be an item of business on the agenda
of the meeting.
(B) Unless the declaration otherwise provides:
(i) The granting of a lease, easement, right of way, license or other similar  interest affecting the
general common elements for a term of two years or  less shall require the approval of a majority
of the board of directors.
(ii) The granting of a lease, easement, right of way, license or other similar interest affecting
the general common elements for a term of more than two years to a public body,  as defined in ORS
174.109, or to a utility or a communications company for  installation and maintenance of power, gas,
electric,  water  or other utility and communication lines and services requires the approval of a
majority of the board of directors.
(iii) The granting of a lease, easement, license or other similar interest to an owner  for the ex-
clusive use of a part of the general common elements to which  the owner’s unit provides primary
access  requires  the approval of a majority of the board of directors. If the approval by the board
of directors includes the right of the owner to make improvements to  the general common elements
to which the owner is being granted exclusive use, ORS 100.535 applies to the general common  el-
ements to the same extent that ORS 100.535 applies to a unit, including the right  of the board under
ORS 100.535 to require an  owner, at owner’s expense, to submit an opinion of a registered architect
or registered professional engineer that the proposed  improvement will not impair the structural
integrity or mechanical systems of the condominium.
[9]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Unless the declaration otherwise provides,  the consent to vacation of roadways within and
adjacent to the condominium must be approved first by at  least a majority of unit owners present
and voting at a meeting of the association or with consent of at least a majority of all owners so-
licited by any means the board of directors determines is reasonable. If a meeting is  held to conduct
the vote, the meeting notice must include a statement that the roadway  vacation will be an item
of business on the agenda of the meeting.
[(7)] (8)  The instrument granting  an interest or consent pursuant to subsection [ (5)] (6)  of this
section shall be executed by the chairperson  and secretary of the association and acknowledged in
the manner  provided for acknowledgment of such instruments by such officers and shall state that
such grant or consent was approved,  if appropriate, by at least the percent of owners required under
subsection [ (6)] (7) of this section.
[(8)(a)] (9)(a)  Unless expressly prohibited by the declaration, any action permitted under sub-
sections  [ (5) and] (6) and (7) of this section regarding a general common element may be taken with
respect to any limited common element as provided in this subsection.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph  (c) of this subsection, the easement, lease or other action
under this section requires the  approval or consent of the owner of the unit to which the use of the
limited common element is reserved and  the holder of a first mortgage or first trust deed affecting
the unit. However, if the use of the limited common element is reserved for five or more units:
(A) When the action is for more than two years, the owners of  75 percent of the units to which
the use of the limited common element is reserved must approve or consent.
(B) When the action is for two years or less, the  owners of a majority of the units to which the
use of the limited common element is reserved must approve or consent.
(c) The instrument granting an interest or consent under this section must:
(A) Be executed by the chairperson and secretary of the association and  acknowledged in the
manner provided for acknowledgment of the instruments by the officers.
(B) State that the grant or consent is given pursuant to this subsection.
(C) Include a certification by the chairperson and secretary that the  action was approved by the
owners in accordance with this subsection.
[(9)] (10) Except as otherwise provided in the association’s declaration or bylaws, the board of
directors  of  the association may modify, close, remove, eliminate or discontinue the use of a general
common element facility or improvement or  portion of the common element landscaping, regardless
of whether such facility, improvement or landscaping is mentioned  in the declaration or shown on
the plat provided that:
(a) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed  as limiting the authority of the board of di-
rectors, in its discretion, to seek approval of such modification, closure, removal,  elimination or
discontinuance by the unit owners; and
(b) Modification, closure,  removal, elimination or discontinuance other than on a temporary ba-
sis of any swimming pool, spa  or recreation or community building must be approved by at least a
majority of the unit owners  voting on such matter at a meeting or by written ballot held in ac-
cordance with the declaration, bylaws or ORS 100.425.
[(10)(a)] (11)(a) A  permit or authorization issued by the board of directors pursuant to authority
granted to the board under law,  the declaration or the bylaws, may be recorded in the deed records
of the  county where the condominium is located. An instrument recorded under this subsection shall:
(A) Include the name of the condominium and a  reference to where the declaration and any
applicable supplemental declarations are recorded;
[10]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Identify, by the designations stated in the declaration or applicable supplemental declaration,
all affected units and common elements;
(C) Include such other information and signatures as may be required by law,  under the decla-
ration or bylaws or as the board of directors may desire; and
(D) Be executed by  the chairperson and secretary of the association and acknowledged in the
manner provided for acknowledgment of such instruments by the officers.
(b) The board  of directors may record an amendment, modification, termination or other instru-
ment relating to the  permit or authorization described in this subsection. Any such instrument shall
include a  reference to the location of the recorded instrument and be executed by the chairperson
and secretary of the association  and acknowledged in the manner provided for acknowledgment of
such instruments.
[(11)(a)] (12)(a)  Subject to paragraph (f) of this subsection, before initiating litigation  or an ad-
ministrative proceeding in which the association and an owner have an adversarial relationship, the
party that intends to initiate litigation  or an administrative proceeding shall offer to use any dispute
resolution program available within the county in which the condominium is located that  is in sub-
stantial compliance with the standards and guidelines adopted  under ORS 36.175. The written offer
must be hand-delivered or mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address, con-
tained in the records of the association, for the other party.
(b) If the party receiving the offer does not  accept the offer within 10 days after receipt by
written notice hand-delivered or mailed by  certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address,
contained in the records of the  association, for the other party, the initiating party may commence
the litigation or the administrative proceeding. The  notice of acceptance of the offer to participate
in the program must contain  the name, address and telephone number of the body administering the
dispute resolution program.
(c) If a qualified dispute resolution program exists within the county in  which the condominium
is located  and an offer to use the program is not made as required under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section, litigation or an  administrative proceeding may be stayed for 30 days upon a motion of the
noninitiating party. If the litigation or administrative action is  stayed under this paragraph, both
parties shall participate in the dispute resolution process.
(d) Unless a stay has been granted under paragraph (c) of this subsection, if the dispute  resol-
ution process is not completed within  30 days after receipt of the initial offer, the initiating party
may commence  litigation or an administrative proceeding without regard to whether the dispute
resolution is completed.
(e) Once made, the decision of the court or administrative body arising from litigation or an
administrative proceeding may not be set aside on the grounds that an offer to use  a dispute resol-
ution program was not made.
(f) The requirements of this subsection do not apply to circumstances in which irreparable harm
to a party will occur  due to delay or to litigation or an administrative proceeding initiated to collect
assessments, other than assessments attributable to fines.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 100.490 is amended to read:
100.490. (1) At least 10 days prior to instituting any litigation  or administrative proceeding to
recover damages under ORS 100.405 (4)(e)(E), the association of unit owners shall provide written
notice to each affected owner of the association’s intent to seek damages on behalf of the owner.
The notice shall, at a minimum:
(a) Be mailed to the mailing address of each unit or to the mailing addresses designated by the
[11]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
owners in writing to the association;
(b) Inform each owner of the general nature of the litigation or proceeding;
(c) Describe the specific nature of the damages to be sought on the owner’s behalf;
(d) Set forth the terms under which the association is  willing to seek damages on the owner’s
behalf, including any mechanism proposed for the  determination and distribution of any damages
recovered;
(e) Inform each owner of the owner’s right not to have the damages sought on the owner’s behalf
and specify the procedure for exercising the right; and
(f) Inform the owner that exercising  the owner’s right not to have damages sought on the
owner’s behalf:
(A) Relieves the association of its duty to reimburse or indemnify the owner for the damages;
(B) Does not relieve the owner from the owner’s obligation to pay dues or assessments  relating
to the litigation or proceeding;
(C) Does not impair any easement owned or possessed by the association; and
(D) Does not interfere with the association’s right to make repairs to common elements.
(2) Within 10 days of mailing the notice described in this section, any owner may request  in
writing that the association not seek damages on the owner’s  behalf. If an owner makes such a re-
quest, the association shall not make or continue any claim or action for  damages with regard to
the objecting owner’s unit or interest and shall be relieved  of any duty to reimburse or indemnify
the owner for damages under the litigation or proceeding.
(3) If the action is for a claim described in ORS 105.405 (5):
(a) The notice sent under subsection (1) of this section must be sent by certified mail.
(b) In addition to the contents described in subsection (1) of this section, the notice must:
(A) State that the association believes that a defect in the common property exists;
(B) Provide a detailed description of the defect;
(C) Identify the parties the association considers responsible for the defect; and
(D) State that the association may not institute litigation or an administrative  proceed-
ing unless owners representing a majority of  the units approve in writing of the initiation
or intervention within 60 days after the mailing date of the notice.
(c) The association shall send a  copy of the notice by certified mail to each person iden-
tified in the notice as a party the association considers responsible  for the defect. The re-
quirement for sending  notice under this subsection is in addition to the notice of defect
requirement in ORS 701.565 and does not initiate the procedure described in ORS  701.560 to
701.595.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 100.105 is amended to read:
100.105. (1) A declaration shall contain:
(a) A description of the property, including property on which a unit or a limited common  ele-
ment is located, whether held in fee  simple, leasehold, easement or other interest or combination
thereof, that is being  submitted to the condominium form of ownership and that conforms to the
description in the surveyor’s certificate provided under ORS 100.115 (1).
(b) Subject to subsection (11) of this section, a statement  of the interest in the property being
submitted to the condominium form of ownership, whether fee simple, leasehold,  easement or other
interest or combination thereof.
(c) Subject to subsection  (5) of this section, the name by which the property shall be known and
a general  description of each unit and the building or buildings, including the number of stories and
[12]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
basements of each building, the total number of units and the principal materials of which  they are
constructed.
(d) The unit designation, a statement that the  location of each unit is shown on the plat, a de-
scription of the boundaries and area in square feet of each  unit and any other data necessary for
proper identification. The area of a unit shall be the same as shown for that unit on the plat de-
scribed in ORS 100.115 (1).
(e) A notice in substantially  the following form in at least 12-point type that is either all capitals
or boldface:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
NOTICE
THE SQUARE FOOTAGE AREAS STATED  IN THIS DECLARATION AND THE PLAT ARE
BASED ON THE BOUNDARIES  OF THE UNITS AS DESCRIBED IN THIS DECLARATION AND
MAY VARY FROM THE AREA OF UNITS CALCULATED FOR OTHER PURPOSES.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(f) A description of the general common elements.
(g) An allocation to each unit of an undivided  interest in the common elements in accordance
with ORS 100.515 and the method used to establish the allocation.
(h) The designation of any limited common elements including:
(A) A general statement of the nature of the limited common element;
(B) A statement of  the unit to which the use of each limited common element is reserved, pro-
vided the statement is not a reference to an assignment of use specified on the plat; and
(C) The allocation of use of any limited common element appertaining to more than one unit.
(i) The method  of determining liability for common expenses and right to common profits in ac-
cordance with ORS 100.530.
(j) The  voting rights allocated to each unit in accordance with ORS 100.525 or in the case of
condominium units committed as property in a timeshare plan defined in  ORS 94.803, the voting
rights allocated in the timeshare instrument.
(k) A statement of the use, residential  or otherwise, for which the building or buildings and each
of the units is intended.
(L) A statement that the  designated agent to receive service of process in cases provided in ORS
100.550 (1) is named in  the Condominium Information Report which will be filed with the Real Estate
Agency in accordance with ORS 100.250 (1)(a).
(m) The method of amending the declaration and the percentage  of voting rights required to
approve an amendment of the declaration in accordance with ORS 100.135.
(n) A statement as to whether or not the association of unit owners pursuant to ORS  100.405
[(5) and (8) ] (6) and (9)  has authority to grant leases, easements, rights of way, licenses and other
similar interests affecting the general and limited common  elements of the condominium and consent
to vacation of roadways within and adjacent to the condominium.
(o) If the condominium contains a floating structure described  in ORS 100.020 (3), a statement
regarding the authority of  the board of directors of the association, subject to ORS 100.410, to
temporarily relocate the floating structure without a majority vote of affected unit owners.
(p) Any restrictions on alienation of units. Any such restrictions created by  documents other
[13]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
than the declaration may be incorporated by reference in the declaration to the official records of
the county in which the property is located.
(q) Any other details regarding the property that the person executing the  declaration considers
desirable. However,  if a provision required to be in the bylaws under ORS 100.415 is included in the
declaration, the voting requirements for amending the bylaws shall also govern the amendment  of
the provision in the declaration.
(2) In the event the declarant  proposes to annex additional property to the condominium under
ORS 100.125, the  declaration shall also contain a general description of the plan of development,
including:
(a) The maximum number of units to be included in the condominium.
(b) The date after which any right to annex additional property will terminate.
(c) A  general description of the nature and proposed use of any additional common elements
which declarant proposes to annex to the condominium, if such common elements might substantially
increase the proportionate amount of the common expenses payable by existing unit owners.
(d) A statement that the method used to establish the allocation of undivided interest  in the
common elements, the method used to determine liability for common expenses and right to common
profits and the  method used to allocate voting rights for each unit annexed shall be as stated in the
declaration in accordance with subsection (1)(g), (i) and (j) of this section.
(e) Such other information  as the Real Estate Commissioner shall require in order to carry out
the purposes of ORS 100.015, 100.116, 100.635 to 100.730 and 100.740 to 100.910.
(3) Except where expressly prohibited  by the declaration and subject to the requirements of ORS
100.135 (2) and subsections (9) and (10) of this section:
(a) Not  later than two years following the termination dates specified in subsections (2)(b) and
(7)(d) of this section, such termination dates may be extended for a period not  exceeding two years;
and
(b) The general description under subsection (2)(c) of this section and the  information included
in the declaration in accordance with subsection (7)(c), (g)  and (h) of this section may be changed
by an amendment to the declaration.
(4) The information included in the declaration in accordance  with subsection (2)(a) and (d) of
this section and subsection (7)(a), (b), (e), (f) and (k) of  this section may not be changed unless all
owners agree  to the change and record an amendment to the declaration in accordance with this
chapter.
(5) The name of the property shall include the word “condominium” or “condominiums” or the
words “a condominium.”
(6) A condominium may  not bear a name which is the same as or deceptively similar to the name
of any other condominium located in the same county.
(7) If the condominium is a flexible  condominium containing variable property, the declaration
shall also contain a general description of the plan of development, including:
(a) A statement that the rights provided for under ORS 100.150 (1) are being reserved.
(b) A statement:
(A) Of any limitations on rights reserved under ORS 100.150  (1), including whether the consent
of any unit owner shall be required, and if so, a statement of the method by which the consent shall
be ascertained; or
(B) That there are no limitations on rights reserved under ORS 100.150 (1).
(c) A statement of the total  number of tracts of variable property within the condominium, in-
[14]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cluding:
(A) A designation of each tract as withdrawable or nonwithdrawable variable property;
(B) Identification of each variable tract by a label in accordance with ORS 100.115 (1)(i);
(C) A statement of the method of labeling each tract depicted on the plat in accordance with
ORS 100.115 (1)(i); and
(D) A statement of the total number of tracts of each type of variable property.
(d) The termination date, which is the date or time  period after which any right reserved under
ORS 100.150 (1) will terminate, and a statement of the circumstances, if any, that will terminate  any
right on or before the date  or time period specified. The date or time period may not exceed seven
years from the recording  of the conveyance of the first unit in the condominium to a person other
than the declarant. Recording shall be in the county in which the property is located.
(e) The maximum number of units that may be created.
(f) A statement that the method used to establish the allocations  of undivided interest in the
common elements, the method used to determine liability for common expenses and right to common
profits and the method used to allocate voting rights as  additional units are created shall be the
same as stated in the declaration in accordance with subsection (1)(g), (i) and (j) of this section.
(g) A general description of all existing improvements and the nature and proposed use of any
improvements that may be  made on variable property if the improvements might substantially in-
crease the proportionate amount of the common expenses payable by existing unit owners.
(h) A statement of whether or not the declarant reserves  the right to create limited common
elements within any variable property, and if so, a general description  of the types that may be
created.
(i) A statement that the plat shows the location and dimensions of all withdrawable variable
property that is labeled “WITHDRAWABLE VARIABLE PROPERTY.”
(j) A statement that if by the termination date all or a portion of the withdrawable  variable
property has not  been withdrawn or reclassified, the withdrawable property shall automatically be
withdrawn from the condominium as of the termination date.
(k) A statement of the rights of the association under ORS 100.155 (2).
(L) A statement of whether or not all or any portion of the variable  property may not be with-
drawn from the condominium and, if so, with respect to the nonwithdrawable variable property:
(A) A statement that the plat shows  the location and dimensions of all nonwithdrawable prop-
erty that is labeled “NONWITHDRAWABLE VARIABLE PROPERTY.”
(B) A description of all improvements that may be made and a statement of the intended  use of
each improvement.
(C) A statement that, if by the termination date all or a  portion of the variable property desig-
nated as “nonwithdrawable variable property” has not been reclassified,  the property shall auto-
matically be reclassified as of the termination date as a general  common element of the
condominium and  any interest in such property held for security purposes shall be automatically
extinguished by such classification.
(D) A statement of the rights of the association under ORS 100.155 (3).
(m) A statement by the local governing  body or appropriate department thereof that the with-
drawal of any variable property designated as “withdrawable variable property” in the  declaration
in accordance with paragraph (L) of this subsection, will not violate any applicable planning  or
zoning regulation or ordinance. The statement may be attached as an exhibit to the declaration.
(8) The plan of development for any variable property included in the declaration or any  sup-
[15]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
plemental declaration of any stage in accordance with  subsection (7) of this section shall be subject
to any plan of development included in the declaration in accordance with  subsection (2) of this
section, except that the  time limitation specified in subsection (7)(d) of this section shall govern any
right reserved under ORS 100.150 (1) with respect to any variable property.
(9) The information  included in the declaration in accordance with subsection (7)(j), (k) and (m)
of this section may not be deleted by amendment.
(10) Approval by the unit owners shall not be required to redesignate variable  property as
“nonwithdrawable variable property” by supplemental declaration or  amendment if such redesig-
nation is required by the local  governing body or appropriate department thereof to comply with
any planning or zoning regulation or ordinance. If as a result  of such redesignation the information
required to be included in the supplemental  declaration or an amendment under subsection (7)(L)(B)
of this section is inconsistent  with the information included in the declaration or supplemental
declaration in accordance with  subsection (7)(g) of this section, an amendment to the declaration
approved by at least 75 percent of owners shall be required.
(11) The statement of an interest in property other than fee simple submitted  to the condomin-
ium form of ownership and any easements, rights or appurtenances belonging  to property submitted
to the condominium form of ownership, whether leasehold or fee simple, shall include:
(a) A reference to the recording index numbers and date of recording of the instrument  creating
the interest; or
(b) A  reference to the law, administrative rule, ordinance or regulation that creates the interest
if the interest is created under law,  administrative rule, ordinance or regulation and not recorded
in the office of the recording officer of the county in which the property is located.
SECTION 7.  ORS 701.570 is amended to read:
701.570. (1)  A contractor, subcontractor or supplier that receives a notice of defect sent under
ORS 701.565 shall, not later than 14 days after receiving the notice of  defect, send a secondary no-
tice to any other known contractor, subcontractor or supplier that may  be responsible for some or
all of the defects described in the notice of defect. The contractor, subcontractor  or supplier must
send the secondary notice by registered or certified mail,  return receipt requested, to an address
described in ORS 701.565 (2). The secondary notice must be accompanied by a statement  describing
the basis for contending that the other  contractor, subcontractor or supplier may be responsible for
some or all of the defects.
(2) A contractor, subcontractor or  supplier that receives a notice of defect or secondary notice
may send the owner a written request to conduct a visual examination of the residence.  Except as
provided in section 11 of this 2019 Act, the written request must be sent not later than  14 days
after the requesting contractor, subcontractor or  supplier receives a notice of defect or secondary
notice. The written request to  conduct a visual examination of the residence must state the esti-
mated time required for the visual examination.
(3) A contractor, subcontractor or  supplier that receives a notice of defect or secondary notice
may send the owner a written  request to inspect the residence. Except as provided in section 11
of this  2019 Act, the written request must be sent not later than 14 days after the requesting con-
tractor, subcontractor or supplier conducted a  visual examination of the residence. The written re-
quest to  inspect the residence must state the nature and scope of the inspection, whether any testing
is to  be performed and the estimated time required for the inspection. The recipient of a secondary
notice that requests to inspect the residence shall send a copy of the request to the  sender of the
secondary notice.
[16]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) A contractor,  subcontractor or supplier that sends a secondary notice and intends to hold
the recipient of the secondary notice liable for a defect  described in a notice of defect shall coor-
dinate the scheduling of any inspection with the owner and all recipients  of a secondary notice from
the contractor, subcontractor or supplier. The contractor, subcontractor or supplier  shall deliver a
copy of any written request to inspect the residence to each recipient  of the secondary notice in
time to provide the recipient with an opportunity to attend the requested inspection  and to partic-
ipate in any remediation. The sender of a secondary notice shall give reasonable  advance notice to
the owner or the  owner’s legal representative, if any, of the identity of any contractor, subcontrac-
tor or supplier who will attend the inspection.  If the sender of  the notice of defect is a home-
owners association or an association of unit owners, the notice must also conform  to section
11 of this 2019 Act.
(5) Except as provided in section 11  of this 2019 Act,  unless otherwise agreed to by the
owner, a contractor, subcontractor or  supplier that receives a notice of defect or secondary notice
shall send  a written response to the owner not later than 90 days after the contractor, subcontractor
or supplier receives a notice  of defect or secondary notice. A contractor, subcontractor or supplier
that receives a secondary notice also shall send a copy of  the written response to the sender of the
secondary notice. The written  response must be sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt
requested. The written response must include:
(a) One or more of the following for each defect  described in the notice of defect or secondary
notice or discovered during the course of any visual examination or inspection:
(A) An acknowledgment of the  existence, nature and extent of the defect without regard to re-
sponsibility for the defect.
(B) A statement describing the existence of a defect  different in nature or extent from the defect
described in the notice of defect or secondary notice, without regard to responsibility for the  defect.
(C) A denial of the existence of the defect.
(b) A copy of the documents described in ORS 701.575 (4).
(c) One or more of the following:
(A) An offer to perform some or all of the remediation. The offer must specify the  date by which
the offered remediation will be completed.
(B) An offer to pay a stated amount of monetary compensation to  the owner for some or all of
the acknowledged defects and any incidental damage.  The offer must specify the date by which
payment will be made.
(C) A denial of responsibility for some or all of the acknowledged defects or  incidental damage.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 701.575 is amended to read:
701.575. (1) An owner sending a notice of  defect under ORS 701.565 shall make the residence
available for visual examination pursuant to any written request sent under ORS 701.570  or section
11 of this 2019 Act . The owner shall make the residence available for visual examination, during
normal business hours or as otherwise agreed, not later than 20 days  after receiving the written
request for visual examination.
(2) An owner sending a notice of defect under ORS 701.565 shall make  the residence available
for an inspection pursuant to  any written request sent under ORS 701.570  or section 11 of this 2019
Act. The owner shall make the residence available for inspection during normal business hours or
at a time that is mutually agreeable to the owner and the requester.
(3) An  inspection by a contractor, subcontractor or supplier may include any reasonable meas-
ures, including testing,  for determining the nature, cause and extent of the defects described in the
[17]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
notice of defect or incidental damage and the nature and extent of the necessary remediation. Unless
the contractor, subcontractor or supplier conducting the inspection and the owner agree  otherwise,
the contractor, subcontractor or supplier conducting the inspection shall repair any damage  caused
by the inspection. Any damage caused by the inspection that is not  repaired may be sought as in-
cidental damage in any subsequent arbitration or court  action by an owner against the contractor,
subcontractor or supplier conducting the inspection.
(4) A contractor, subcontractor or supplier that requests to inspect a residence  must include as
part of the written response of the contractor, subcontractor or  supplier under ORS 701.570  or
section 11 of this 2019 Act [,] a written report or other document  evidencing the result of the in-
spection and the existence or nonexistence of the defects described in the notice of defect or dis-
covered during the inspection.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 701.585 is amended to read:
701.585. (1) If an owner sends a contractor, subcontractor or supplier a notice of defect within
the time allowed for the owner to commence a court action against that contractor,  subcontractor
or supplier for a claim described in ORS 701.565, the time for the owner to commence  the action
shall be extended, notwithstanding any statute of limitation or statute  of ultimate repose, until the
later of:
(a) One hundred and twenty days after the  owner receives a written response from the con-
tractor, subcontractor or  supplier that received the notice of defect if the written response does not
contain a written offer to perform remediation or pay monetary  compensation for one or more of the
defects or incidental damage described in the notice of defect;
(b) One hundred and twenty days after the owner rejects a written offer  by any contractor,
subcontractor or supplier to perform remediation or pay monetary compensation for one or  more of
the defects or incidental damage described in the notice of defect; or
(c) Thirty days after the date specified in an accepted written offer by which the offering con-
tractor, subcontractor or supplier is to complete the  remediation or complete payment of monetary
compensation for one or more of the defects and any incidental  damage described in the notice of
defect.
(2) Subsection (1)  of this section does not shorten or terminate the time for bringing a claim in
accordance with applicable statutes of ultimate repose and statutes of limitation.
(3) Delivery of a secondary notice sent by a contractor, subcontractor or  supplier under ORS
701.570 or section 11 of this 2019 Act does not act to toll the expiration of any right of the owner
to commence a court action against the recipient  of the secondary notice.  However, the right of
the sender of the  secondary notice to commence a court action against the recipient of the
secondary notice shall be  extended, notwithstanding any statute of limitation or statute of
ultimate repose,  until the date that the right of the owner to commence an action against
the sender of the secondary notice expires.
(4) Any remediation performed  pursuant to an accepted offer made under ORS 701.570  or sec-
tion 11 of this 2019 Act does not constitute a new performance and, for purposes of ORS 12.135,
relates back to the earliest date of  substantial completion or abandonment of the construction, al-
teration or repair of the improvement to real property.
SECTION 10. Section 11 of this 2019 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 701.560 to
701.595.
SECTION 11. (1) If the sender  of a notice of defect under ORS 701.565 is a homeowners
association or an association of unit owners:
[18]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A written request under  ORS 701.570 (2) for visual examination of a residence must
be sent not later  than 30 days after the requesting contractor, subcontractor or supplier
receives a notice of defect or secondary notice.
(b) A written  request under ORS 701.570 (3) to inspect a residence must be sent not later
than 30 days after the requesting contractor, subcontractor or supplier receives a notice of
defect or secondary notice.
(c) The contractor, subcontractor or supplier may have a technical or construction ex-
pert attend the inspection. However, the selection of the expert must be  mutually agreed to
by the contractor, subcontractor or supplier and the owner or owner’s representative.  In
addition to the information described in ORS 701.570 (3), a request under  ORS 701.570 (3)
must identify an expert acceptable to the contractor, subcontractor or supplier. If  the owner
or owner’s representative disapproves of  the expert, the owner or owner’s representative
shall give the contractor, subcontractor or supplier  written notice of the disapproval and of
the identity of an expert acceptable to the owner or owner’s representative. If  the contrac-
tor, subcontractor or supplier  disapproves of the expert identified by the owner or owner’s
representative, the two  identified and disapproved experts shall jointly select a third expert
to be the expert that attends the inspection. The contractor, subcontractor  or supplier shall
include the identity of a selected expert in any advance notice that the  contractor, subcon-
tractor or supplier sends under ORS 701.570 (4).
(d) The contractor, subcontractor or supplier shall send the  owner a response to the
notice of defect not later than:
(A) Fourteen days after conducting an inspection of the residence  under ORS 701.575 (3);
or
(B) If no inspection of the residence  is conducted under ORS 701.575 (3), not later than
90 days after the contractor,  subcontractor or supplier receives a notice of defect or sec-
ondary notice.
(2) A response under subsection (1)(d) of this section must contain:
(a) An offer to cure the defect;
(b) An offer to pay an amount equal to the cost of curing the defect;
(c) An offer allowing the owner a choice  between cure of the defect or an amount equal
to the cost of curing the defect; or
(d) A statement that the contractor, subcontractor or supplier declines  to pursue a cure
in lieu of litigation.
(3) If the contractor, subcontractor or supplier does not send a timely  response under
subsection (1)(d) of this  section, or if the response does not conform to subsection (2) of this
section, the owner is excused from further compliance with this section.
(4) An owner may accept  an offer contained in a written response under this section by
delivering a  written acceptance to the offering contractor, subcontractor or supplier within
30 days after receiving the offer. If an owner fails to accept an offer within 30 days after
receipt, the offer is deemed rejected.
(5) If a response under subsection (1)(d) of this section offers to pay an amount equal  to
the cost of curing the defect, the contractor, subcontractor  or supplier shall have 30 days
after sending the response to determine the payment amount. For purposes of subsection (4)
of this section, the offer contained in the  response is not complete until the owner receives
the written determination  by the contractor, subcontractor or supplier. If the owner wishes
[19]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to accept an offer of  payment, but disputes the amount, the parties may select a mediator
to attempt resolution. If the parties cannot agree on a mediator after 45 days,  they may
request that the administrator of the Construction Contractors Board inform  a professional
mediation association or service that the parties wish  to have a mediator selected by the
association or service.
(6) If an owner accepts payment of an  amount equal to the cost of curing the defect, the
owner must make a good faith effort to have a construction contractor correct the defect.
(7) If the owner accepts a contractor, subcontractor or supplier’s offer to perform re-
mediation or to  pay monetary compensation, completion of the remediation or payment sat-
isfies the claims by the owner for those defects included in the offer for which remediation
was performed or compensation paid, but not for any other defect.  Except as provided in
subsection (8)  of this section, if the owner accepts an offer by a contractor, subcontractor
or supplier that received a  secondary notice, completion of the remediation or payment sat-
isfies claims for those defects included in the  offer for which remediation was performed or
compensation paid, including claims by the owner  and claims for contribution or indemnity
against the contractor, subcontractor or supplier by the sender of the secondary notice,  but
not for any other defect.
(8) If the owner accepts an offer by a contractor, subcontractor or supplier that received
a secondary notice to perform remediation  or to pay monetary compensation and the con-
tractor, subcontractor or supplier fails to perform in accordance with the accepted offer,
then the  sender of the secondary notice may perform the remediation or pay the monetary
compensation offered by the nonperforming contractor, subcontractor or supplier.
(9) A response under subsection  (2) of this section that is rejected by an owner is not
admissible to establish contractor, subcontractor  or supplier liability for a defect, or for
damages arising out of a defect, in a subsequent arbitration or court action.
SECTION 12.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Building envelope penetrations” means window and trim  installations and other
penetrations of the building envelope, flashings and water resistant barriers.
(b) “Condominium” has the meaning given that term in ORS 100.005.
(c) “Construction design professional” has the meaning given that term in ORS 30.785.
(2)(a) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall  adopt,
as part of the state building code structural specialty code,  standards for special inspections
of building envelope penetrations and other special inspections to detect  construction defects
in the exterior waterproofing system of:
(A) Structures that are common property of a homeowners association; and
(B) Residential dwellings constructed on lots within the planned community served by the
homeowners association.
(b) The director  shall adopt inspection standards under this subsection in a format that
allows a construction design professional  to identify and select specific special inspections
that are necessary for a particular structure to qualify for the statute of limitation estab-
lished in ORS 12.135 (4) with regard to any alleged construction defect in the structure.
(3) A construction design professional responsible for the design of a  structure that is
common property of a homeowners association, or of residential dwellings to  be constructed
on lots in a planned community served by a homeowners association, shall identify  in the
plans for the structure  any special inspection for which the director has adopted standards
[20]
HB 3432
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under subsection (2)  of this section that the construction design professional deems appro-
priate for ensuring the proper  performance of the exterior waterproofing system of the
structure.
(4) The director shall adopt,  as part of the state building code structural specialty code,
standards for special  inspections of building envelope penetrations and other special in-
spections to detect construction defects in the exterior waterproofing system of a  condo-
minium. The director shall adopt inspection standards under this subsection  in a format that
allows a construction design professional  to identify and select specific special inspections
that are necessary for a unit of the condominium to qualify for the statute  of limitation es-
tablished in ORS 12.135 (4) with regard to any alleged construction defect in the structure.
(5) A construction design professional responsible for  the design of a condominium shall
identify in the plans for the condominium any special inspection for which  the director has
adopted standards  under subsection (4) of this section that the construction design profes-
sional deems appropriate for ensuring the proper performance of  the exterior waterproofing
system of the condominium.
(6) The general contractor for a condominium  or other structure described in subsection
(3) or (5) of this  section shall ensure that all special inspections recommended by a con-
struction design professional designing the  condominium or other structure are performed.
The owner shall pay all costs for the special inspections and shall ensure that the special
inspection results are sent  to the building official for the jurisdiction where the condominium
or other structure is located or, if there is no building official, to  the Department of Con-
sumer and  Business Services. The building official or the department may not issue a cer-
tificate of occupancy  for the condominium or other structure unless the owner has
submitted the results of any special inspections required in the plans prepared by  the con-
struction design professional and proof that any defects identified during the special  in-
spection have been remedied.
(7) The building official or the department shall,  at the time of issuing the certificate of
occupancy for a condominium or other  structure inspected under subsection (6) of this sec-
tion, provide the general contractor and the construction design professional  with doc-
umentation that inspections and the remedying of defects have occurred as required  by this
section. Documentation issued under this subsection  is prima facie evidence that any con-
struction defect claim  brought by a homeowners association or association of unit owners
is subject to the statute of limitation described in ORS 12.135 (4).
SECTION 13.
The Director of the Department of  Consumer and Business Services shall
include special inspection standards  described in section 12 of this 2019 Act by rule in the
structural specialty code chapter dealing with special inspections. The director  shall adopt
rules to include the standards in the structural  specialty code during the first regular rule
adoption amending a state building code specialty code that the director undertakes after the
effective date of this  2019 Act, but if no amendment of a specialty code occurs by July 1, 2020,
the director shall immediately undertake rulemaking to adopt special inspection standards.
SECTION 14. Section 13 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2021.
SECTION 15. The amendments to ORS 12.135 by section  1 of this 2019 Act apply to causes
of action arising on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 16. Section 11 of this 2019 Act and the amendments to ORS  701.570 and 701.585
by sections 7 and 9 of this 2019 Act apply to notices of construction defect  sent by an owner
[21]
HB 3432
1
2
on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act and to any resulting secondary notices.
[22]