Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
DIESEL ENGINES
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468A.795 is amended to read:
468A.795. As used in ORS 468A.795 to 468A.803 and sections 11  to 16, chapter 855, Oregon Laws
2007:
(1) “Combined weight” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(2) “Cost-effectiveness threshold” means the cost,  in dollars, per ton of diesel particulate matter
reduced, as established by rule of the Environmental Quality Commission.
(3) “Diesel engine” means a compression  ignition engine designed primarily to propel a
motor vehicle on public highways in this state.
(4) “Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement” means the  Environmental Mitigation
Trust Agreement required by the Volkswagen “Clean Diesel”  Marketing, Sales Practices and
Products Liability Litigation partial consent decree dated October 25, 2016.
(5) “Equivalent equipment” means a piece  of equipment that performs the same function
and has the equivalent horsepower to a piece of equipment subject to a replacement.
(6) “Equivalent motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle that  performs the same function
and is in the same weight class as a motor vehicle subject to a replacement.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1598
SB 971
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(3)] (7) “Heavy-duty truck” means a motor  vehicle or combination of vehicles operated as a unit
that has a combined weight that is greater than 26,000 pounds.
[(4)] (8)  “Incremental cost” means the cost of a  qualifying repower or retrofit less a baseline
cost that would otherwise be incurred in the normal course of business.
[(5)] (9)  “Medium-duty truck” means a  motor vehicle or combination of vehicles operated as a
unit that has a combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds but less  than or equal to 26,000
pounds.
[(6)] (10) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
[(7)] (11)  “Nonroad [ Oregon] diesel  engine” means [ any Oregon diesel ] a compression ignition
engine that was not designed primarily to propel a motor vehicle on public highways of this state.
[(8) “Oregon diesel engine” means  an engine at least 50 percent of the use of which, as measured
by miles driven or  hours operated, will occur in Oregon for the three years following the repowering
or retrofitting of the engine. ]
[(9)] (12) “Oregon diesel truck engine” means a diesel engine in a truck at least 50  percent of
the use of which, as measured by miles driven or hours operated, has occurred in  Oregon for the
two years preceding the scrapping of the engine.
[(10)] (13) “Public highway” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(14)(a) “Replacement” means:
(A) To scrap a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine and replace the motor vehicle
with an equivalent motor vehicle; or
(B) To scrap a piece of equipment powered by a nonroad  diesel engine and replace the
equipment with equivalent equipment.
(b) “Replacement” does not mean ordinary maintenance, repair or replacement of a diesel
engine.
[(11)] (15) “Repower” means to scrap an old diesel engine and [ replace] substitute  it with a new
engine, a used engine or a remanufactured  engine, or with electric motors, drives or fuel cells, with
a minimum useful life of seven years.
[(12)] (16) “Retrofit” means to equip a diesel engine with new  emissions-reducing parts or tech-
nology after the manufacture of the original engine. A retrofit must use  the greatest degree of
emissions reduction available  for the particular application of the equipment retrofitted that meets
the cost-effectiveness threshold.
[(13)] (17) “Scrap” means to destroy and render inoperable.
[(14)] (18) “Truck” means a motor vehicle or combination of vehicles  operated as a unit that has
a combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 468A.795, as amended by section 6a, chapter 855, Oregon  Laws 2007, is
amended to read:
468A.795. As used in ORS 468A.795 to 468A.803:
(1) “Combined weight” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(2) “Cost-effectiveness threshold” means the cost,  in dollars, per ton of diesel particulate matter
reduced, as established by rule of the Environmental Quality Commission.
(3) “Diesel engine” means a compression ignition engine  designed primarily to propel a
motor vehicle on public highways in this state.
(4) “Environmental Mitigation  Trust Agreement” means the Environmental Mitigation
Trust Agreement required by the Volkswagen “Clean Diesel”  Marketing, Sales Practices and
Products Liability Litigation partial consent decree dated October 25, 2016.
[2]
SB 971
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) “Equivalent equipment” means a piece  of equipment that performs the same function
and has the equivalent horsepower to a piece of equipment subject to a replacement.
(6) “Equivalent motor vehicle” means  a motor vehicle that performs the same function
and is in the same weight class as a motor vehicle subject to a replacement.
[(3)] (7) “Heavy-duty truck” means a motor  vehicle or combination of vehicles operated as a unit
that has a combined weight that is greater than 26,000 pounds.
[(4)] (8)  “Incremental cost” means the cost of a  qualifying repower or retrofit less a baseline
cost that would otherwise be incurred in the normal course of business.
[(5)] (9)  “Medium-duty truck” means a  motor vehicle or combination of vehicles operated as a
unit that has a combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds but less  than or equal to 26,000
pounds.
[(6)] (10) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
[(7)] (11)  “Nonroad [ Oregon] diesel  engine” means [ any Oregon diesel ] a compression ignition
engine that was not designed primarily to propel a motor vehicle on public highways of this state.
[(8) “Oregon diesel engine” means  an engine at least 50 percent of the use of which, as measured
by miles driven or  hours operated, will occur in Oregon for the three years following the repowering
or retrofitting of the engine. ]
[(9)] (12) “Oregon diesel truck engine” means a diesel engine in a truck at least 50  percent of
the use of which, as measured by miles driven or hours operated, has occurred in  Oregon for the
two years preceding the scrapping of the engine.
[(10)] (13) “Public highway” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(14)(a) “Replacement” means:
(A) To scrap a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine and replace the motor vehicle
with an equivalent motor vehicle; or
(B) To scrap a piece of equipment powered by a nonroad  diesel engine and replace the
equipment with equivalent equipment.
(b) “Replacement” does not mean ordinary maintenance, repair or replacement of a diesel
engine.
[(11)] (15) “Repower” means to scrap an old diesel engine and [ replace] substitute  it with a new
engine, a used engine or a remanufactured  engine, or with electric motors, drives or fuel cells, with
a minimum useful life of seven years.
[(12)] (16) “Retrofit” means to equip a diesel engine with new  emissions-reducing parts or tech-
nology after the manufacture of the original engine. A retrofit must use  the greatest degree of
emissions reduction available  for the particular application of the equipment retrofitted that meets
the cost-effectiveness threshold.
[(13)] (17) “Scrap” means to destroy and render inoperable.
[(14)] (18) “Truck” means a motor vehicle or combination of vehicles  operated as a unit that has
a combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 468A.797 is amended to read:
468A.797. (1) The Environmental  Quality Commission by rule shall establish standards related
to the certified  cost necessary to perform a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit, including
but not  limited to rules establishing the certified cost for purposes of the tax credit established in
section 12, chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007.
(2) For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, certified cost:
(a) May not exceed the incremental cost of labor and hardware that the  Department of Envi-
[3]
SB 971
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ronmental Quality finds necessary to perform a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit;
(b) Does not include the cost of any portion of a  replacement,  repower or retrofit undertaken
to comply with any applicable local, state or federal pollution  or emissions law or for ordinary
maintenance, repair or replacement of a diesel engine; and
(c) May not exceed the cost-effectiveness threshold.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 468A.797, as amended by section 7a, chapter 855, Oregon  Laws 2007, is
amended to read:
468A.797. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission by rule shall  establish standards related
to the certified cost necessary to perform a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit.
(2) For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, certified cost:
(a) May not exceed  the incremental cost of labor and hardware that the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality finds necessary to perform a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit;
(b) Does not include the cost  of any portion of a  replacement,  repower or retrofit undertaken
to comply with any applicable local, state  or federal pollution or emissions law or for ordinary
maintenance, repair or replacement of a diesel engine; and
(c) May not exceed the cost-effectiveness threshold.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 468A.799 is amended to read:
468A.799. (1) The Environmental  Quality Commission by rule shall establish standards for [ the
qualifying repower of a nonroad Oregon diesel engine or retrofit of an  Oregon diesel engine, ] quali-
fying replacements, repowers and retrofits,  including but not limited to rules establishing re-
power or retrofit qualifications for purposes of the tax credit established  in section 12, chapter 855,
Oregon Laws 2007.
(2) The  standards adopted by the commission under this section must [ include] require, at a
minimum:
[(a) A requirement for the reduction of diesel particulate matter emissions by at least 25  percent
compared with the baseline emissions for the relevant engine year and application; ]
(a) For the qualifying replacement of a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine, that:
(A) The motor vehicle to  be scrapped has at least three years of remaining useful life;
and
(B) The engine model year of the equivalent motor vehicle is 2010 or newer.
(b) For the qualifying replacement of a piece  of equipment powered by a nonroad diesel
engine, that:
(A) The nonroad piece of equipment to be  scrapped has at least three years of remaining
useful life; and
(B) The equivalent equipment is powered by a nonroad diesel  engine that meets or ex-
ceeds the United States Environmental Protection Agency Tier 4 standards  for nonroad die-
sel exhaust emissions.
(c) For the qualifying repower of a nonroad diesel engine,  that the repower will be ac-
complished using a higher tier engine than the engine to be scrapped, based on the United
States Environmental Protection Agency tier  standards for nonroad diesel exhaust emis-
sions.
(d) For the qualifying retrofit of a diesel engine, a resulting reduction of diesel
particulate matter emissions by at least  85 percent when compared with the baseline emis-
sions for the relevant engine year and application.
[(b)] (e) That  a list of technologies approved as qualifying repowers or retrofits that have  been
[4]
SB 971
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
verified by the United States  Environmental Protection Agency or the California Air Resources
Board[; and ] is included in the standards.
[(c)] (3) [ A requirement that ] A  qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit [ does] may  not in-
clude the replacement, repower or  retrofit of a motor vehicle , piece of equipment  or engine for
which a grant, loan or tax credit under ORS 468A.803 or section  12, chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007,
has previously been awarded or  allowed, unless the replacement, repower or retrofit will reduce
emissions further than the replacement, repower or retrofit funded by the previous grant, loan  or
tax credit.
SECTION 6.  ORS 468A.799, as amended by section 8a, chapter 855, Oregon  Laws 2007, is
amended to read:
468A.799. (1) The Environmental  Quality Commission by rule shall establish standards for [ the
qualifying repower of a nonroad  Oregon diesel engine or retrofit of an Oregon diesel engine ] qualify-
ing replacements, repowers and retrofits .
(2) The standards adopted by the commission under this section must [ include] require, at  a
minimum:
[(a) A  requirement for the reduction of diesel particulate matter emissions by at least 25 percent
compared with the baseline emissions for the relevant engine year and application; ]
(a) For the qualifying replacement of a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine, that:
(A) The motor vehicle to be scrapped has at least three years  of remaining useful life;
and
(B) The engine model year of the equivalent motor vehicle is 2010 or newer.
(b) For the qualifying replacement of a piece  of equipment powered by a nonroad diesel
engine, that:
(A) The nonroad piece of equipment to be  scrapped has at least three years of remaining
useful life; and
(B) The equivalent equipment is powered  by a nonroad diesel engine that meets or ex-
ceeds the United States  Environmental Protection Agency Tier 4 standards for nonroad die-
sel exhaust emissions.
(c) For the qualifying repower of a  nonroad diesel engine, that the repower will be ac-
complished using a higher tier engine than the engine to be scrapped, based on the  United
States Environmental Protection Agency tier standards for  nonroad diesel exhaust emis-
sions.
(d) For the qualifying retrofit of a diesel engine, a resulting reduction of diesel
particulate matter emissions by at least 85 percent when  compared with the baseline emis-
sions for the relevant engine year and application.
[(b)] (e) That a list of technologies approved as qualifying repowers or retrofits that have  been
verified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency or  the California Air Resources
Board[; and ] is included in the standards.
[(c)] (3)  [ A requirement that ] A qualifying replacement, repower or  retrofit [ does] may  not in-
clude the replacement, repower or retrofit of a motor vehicle , piece of  equipment or engine for
which a grant or loan under ORS 468A.803 has previously been awarded or allowed, unless the
replacement, repower or retrofit will reduce emissions further than the replacement, repower  or
retrofit funded by the previous grant or loan.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 468A.801 is amended to read:
468A.801. (1) The Clean Diesel  Engine Fund is established in the State Treasury separate and
[5]
SB 971
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Clean Diesel Engine  Fund shall be credited
to the fund. The moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Department of Environ-
mental Quality to be used for the purposes described in ORS 468A.803.
(2) The Clean Diesel Engine Fund consists of:
(a) Funds appropriated by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Grants provided by the federal government pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act, 42  U.S.C.
7401 et seq., or other federal laws; [ and]
[(c) Any other revenues derived from gifts or  grants given to the state for the purpose of providing
financial assistance to owners or operators of diesel engines for the  purpose of repowering, retrofitting
or scrapping diesel engines to reduce diesel engine emissions. ]
(c) Moneys paid to the State of  Oregon pursuant to the Environmental Mitigation Trust
Agreement;  and
(d) Any other moneys received  by the state for the purpose of providing financial and
technical assistance to owners or operators of diesel engines for the  purpose of reducing
emissions from diesel engines.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 468A.803 is amended to read:
468A.803. (1) The  Department of Environmental Quality shall use the moneys in the Clean Diesel
Engine Fund to award:
(a) Grants  and loans to the owners and operators of motor vehicles powered by diesel
engines, and equipment powered by nonroad diesel engines, for up to 25 percent  of the cer-
tified costs of qualifying replacements as described in ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799;
[(a)] (b)  Grants and loans to the owners and operators of  [ Oregon] diesel engines for up to 100
percent of the certified costs of qualifying retrofits as described in ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799;
[(b)] (c)  Grants and loans to the owners and operators of nonroad [ Oregon] diesel engines  for
up to 25 percent of the certified costs of qualifying  repowers as described in ORS 468A.797 and
468A.799; and
[(c)] (d) Grants to the owners of Oregon diesel truck engines to scrap those engines.
[(2) Subject to and consistent with federal law, any  moneys received from the federal government
that are deposited in the Clean Diesel Engine Fund under ORS 468A.801 (2)(b) must be used  for ini-
tiatives to reduce emissions from diesel engines. Subsections (1), (3) to (5) and (7) of this section and
ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799 do not apply to use of moneys in the Clean Diesel  Engine Fund received
from the federal government. ]
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission by rule may set grant or loan award  rates
at a percentage  that is greater than a percentage allowed under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, provided that the grant  or loan assistance will not exceed the cost-effectiveness
threshold, if the higher percentage award rate would:
(a) Benefit sensitive populations or  areas with elevated concentrations of diesel
particulate matter; or
(b) Otherwise increase participation by those categories of owners or operators.
(3) In determining the amount of a grant or loan under this section, the  department must reduce
the incremental cost of a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit by the  value of any existing
financial incentive that directly reduces the cost of the  qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit,
including tax credits, other grants or loans, or any other public financial assistance.
(4) The department may certify third parties  to perform qualifying replacements, repowers and
retrofits and may contract with third parties to perform such services  for the certified costs of
[6]
SB 971
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
qualifying replacements, repowers  and retrofits. The department may also contract with insti-
tutions of higher education or other public bodies as defined  by ORS 174.109 to train and certify
third parties to perform qualifying replacements, repowers and retrofits.
(5) The department may not award a grant or loan for a  replacement, repower or retrofit
under subsection (1) of this section unless the grant or  loan applicant demonstrates to the
department’s satisfaction that the resulting equivalent motor vehicle, equivalent  equipment,
repowered nonroad diesel engine or retrofitted diesel engine will undergo at least 50 percent
of its use in Oregon, as measured by miles driven  or hours operated, for the three years
following the replacement, repower or retrofit.
[(5)] (6)  The department may  not award a grant to scrap an Oregon diesel truck engine under
subsection (1)[ (c)] of this section unless the engine was manufactured prior to 1994 and  the engine
is in operating condition at the time of the grant application or, if repairs are needed, the  owner
demonstrates to the  department’s satisfaction that the engine can be repaired to an operating con-
dition for less than its  commercial scrap value. The Environmental Quality Commission shall adopt
rules for a maximum grant awarded under subsection (1)[ (c)] of this section for an engine in a
heavy-duty truck and for  an engine in a medium-duty truck. A grant awarded under subsection
(1)[(c)] of this  section may not be combined with any other tax credits, grants or loans, or any other
public financial assistance, to scrap an Oregon diesel truck engine.
(7) Subject to and consistent with federal law, any moneys received from the federal
government that are deposited in  the Clean Diesel Engine Fund under ORS 468A.801 (2)(b)
must be used for initiatives to reduce emissions from diesel engines.  Subsections  (1) to (6)
of this section and ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799 do not apply to use of moneys in the fund  re-
ceived from the federal government.
(8) Subject to and consistent with the terms  of the Environmental Mitigation Trust
Agreement, any moneys received by the State of Oregon pursuant to the agreement that are
deposited in the Clean Diesel Engine Fund must be used by the department  to award grants
for the  purpose of reducing nitrogen oxides emissions from diesel engines. Subsections (1)
to (7) of this section and ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799 do  not apply to use of moneys in the
fund received pursuant to the agreement. To the extent authorized by  the agreement, the
department shall allocate moneys awarded pursuant to this subsection among:
(a) Owners and operators of school buses powered by diesel engines for 30 percent of
certified replacement costs beginning with  the oldest diesel powered school buses in the state
and proceeding until at least 450 buses have been replaced; and
(b) Owners and operators of the following categories of motor  vehicles powered by diesel
engines, subject to  the preferences for grant awards established under section 10 (1)(b) of
this 2017 Act:
(A) Drayage trucks.
(B) Delivery trucks.
(C) Waste hauling trucks.
(D) Transit buses.
(9) The department may not award a grant under subsection (8) of this section to the
owner or operator of a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine unless the following criteria
are met:
(a) Use of the motor vehicle has occurred in Oregon during the  year preceding the date
of the grant.
[7]
SB 971
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The motor vehicle is authorized for use in this state.
(c) For the three years following the receipt of a grant award, at least 50  percent of the
motor vehicle use for which the owner or operator received  the grant will occur in Oregon,
as measured by miles driven or hours operated.
(d) The grant will not exceed the cost-effectiveness threshold  where, notwithstanding
ORS 468A.795, the “cost-effectiveness threshold”  for purposes of this paragraph means the
cost in  dollars per ton of diesel particulate and nitrogen oxides reduced, as established by
rule of the commission.
(e) Any  other criteria the department deems necessary to ensure that a grant award will
result in reducing emissions from diesel engines in this state.
[(6)] (10) The department may use the moneys in  the Clean Diesel Engine Fund to pay expenses
of the department in administering the program described in [ this section ] ORS 468A.795  to
468A.803.
[(7) The commission shall adopt rules to implement this  section and ORS 468A.801, including but
not limited to establishing preferences for grant and loan awards based upon percentage  of engine use
in Oregon, whether a grant or loan applicant will  provide matching funds, whether scrapping, repow-
ering or retrofitting an engine will benefit sensitive populations or areas with  elevated concentrations
of diesel particulate  matter, or such other criteria as the commission may establish. The rules adopted
by the commission shall reserve a portion  of the financial assistance available each year for applicants
that own or operate a small  number of Oregon diesel engines or Oregon diesel truck engines and shall
provide for simplified access to financial assistance for those applicants. ]
[(8) The  department may perform activities necessary to ensure that recipients of grants and loans
from the Clean Diesel Engine Fund comply with  applicable requirements. If the department determines
that a recipient has not complied with applicable requirements, it may order  the recipient to refund all
grant or loan moneys and may impose penalties pursuant to ORS 468.140. ]
SECTION 9.
Section 10 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 468A.795 to
468A.803.
SECTION 10. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission shall  adopt rules to implement
ORS 468A.801 and 468A.803, including but not limited to rules that establish preferences for
awarding:
(a) Grants and loans under ORS 468A.803 (1) based upon  a percentage of diesel engine use
in Oregon, whether a grant  or loan applicant will provide matching funds, whether scrapping,
replacement, repowering or retrofitting an engine  will benefit sensitive populations or areas
with elevated concentrations of diesel particulate matter, or such other  criteria as the
commission may establish; and
(b) Grants  under ORS 468A.803 (8)(b) based upon the estimated number of vehicles in
each category, estimated emission reduction benefits by category measured in tons per  year
relative to the costs of achieving  those benefits, or such other criteria as the commission
may establish.
(2) Rules adopted by  the commission under this section must reserve a portion of the
financial assistance available each year for applicants that own or operate a small  number
of diesel engines or Oregon diesel truck engines and must provide for simplified  access to
financial assistance for those applicants.
(3) The Department of Environmental Quality may perform activities necessary to ensure
that recipients of grants  and loans from the Clean Diesel Engine Fund comply with applicable
[8]
SB 971
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
requirements. If the department  determines that a recipient has not complied with applicable
requirements, the  department may order the recipient to refund all grant or loan moneys
and may impose penalties pursuant to ORS 468.140.
NONROAD DIESEL ENGINE INVENTORY
(Inventory)
SECTION 11. (1) As used in this section, “nonroad diesel engine” means a compression
ignition engine of 25 horsepower or more that  is not designed primarily to propel a motor
vehicle on public highways.
(2) The Department of Environmental Quality shall  hire or contract with a third-party
organization to develop a comprehensive, statewide inventory of  nonroad diesel engines used
in Oregon. The department shall require the  third-party organization to complete the in-
ventory and all other activities necessary to meet the requirements of this section  no later
than July 1, 2019.  A third-party organization hired or contracted with under this section
must have experience related to:
(a) Collecting, analyzing and compiling data and information relating  to developing
equipment and emission inventories;
(b) Tailoring the presentation of data and information to be compatible  with the techno-
logical and informational needs of a government agency  in a manner that enhances and
supplements the agency’s existing information; and
(c) Reviewing, developing and making recommendations on  government financial incen-
tives for reducing diesel engine emissions.
(3) Information  gathered by the third-party organization must include all of the following:
(a) For each vehicle powered by a nonroad diesel engine:
(A) The manufacturer, type, model year, model  number, serial number and purchase date
of the vehicle.
(B) The primary vocation and all other vocations that the vehicle is operated in.
(b) For each nonroad diesel engine, including all  nonroad diesel engines powering a
multiengine vehicle:
(A) The manufacturer, model year, model number, serial number, horsepower and  engine
family name of the nonroad diesel engine.
(B) The purchase date of the nonroad diesel engine, if  different from the purchase date
of the vehicle powered by the nonroad diesel engine.
(C) The annual average hours of operation and annual average fuel consumption  of the
nonroad diesel engine during the previous three years.
(D) Information on whether the nonroad diesel engine can also be used in an  application
other than as a nonroad diesel engine.
(E) Information  on whether the nonroad diesel engine was equipped with new
emissions-reducing parts or technology after the manufacture of the  original nonroad diesel
engine.
(c) For each emissions-reducing  part or technology with which a nonroad diesel engine
was equipped after the  manufacture of the original nonroad diesel engine, the manufacturer,
model number, serial number, purchase date and engine family name of the  part or tech-
[9]
SB 971
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
nology.
(d) Information relating to whether nonroad diesel engines that do  not meet emission
standards in the  State of California are being sold to and used by owners and operators in
this state.
SECTION 12. Section 11 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2020.
SECTION 13. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall maintain an inventory
of nonroad diesel engines used in Oregon. The department shall use the inventory required
by this section to inform any  decision-making or rulemaking by the department or the En-
vironmental Quality Commission that  is related to the adoption or administration of stan-
dards, financial incentives or other policies related  to the control of nonroad diesel engine
emissions. The department and the commission shall utilize the  inventory for purposes in-
cluding, but not limited to:
(a) Ensuring the accuracy and integrity of the department’s understanding of the  share
of air contaminant emissions attributable to the use of nonroad diesel engines in  this state
as compared to the share of air contaminant emissions attributable to all other air contam-
ination sources, as that term is defined in ORS 468A.005.
(b) Determining the specific impacts that the use of nonroad  diesel engines in Oregon
have on any exceedance or projected exceedance  in the near future of national ambient air
quality standards.
(c) Identifying the highest and best uses of any financial  incentives that the department
may offer to  owners and operators of nonroad diesel engines to reduce diesel engine emis-
sions.
(d) Identifying any principally local or regional concerns  related to nonroad diesel engine
emissions and tailored solutions for addressing those principally local or regional concerns.
(e) The economic and socioeconomic impacts on public  and private owners and operators
of nonroad diesel engines  of imposing additional state standards or other air quality regu-
lations related to nonroad diesel engine emissions.
(2) The department shall  aggregate data concerning nonroad diesel engines using the in-
formation contained in the  inventory and make the aggregate data publicly available on the
department’s website.
(3) All nonaggregate and individually identifiable information procured by  or furnished
to the department in connection with maintaining  the inventory required by this section is
exempt from disclosure under ORS chapter 192.
SECTION 14.  Section 13 of this 2017 Act becomes operative January 1, 2020.
(Appropriation)
SECTION 15. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Environmental  Quality, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for  the purpose of hiring a third-party or-
ganization to complete an inventory of nonroad  diesel engines as required by section 11 of
this 2017 Act.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS TO TAX CREDIT
APPLICABLE TO PAST TAX YEARS
[10]
SB 971
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 16.  Section 12, chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007, is amended to read:
Sec. 12.  (1) A personal income or corporate income or excise taxpayer is allowed  a credit
against the taxes that are otherwise due under ORS chapter 316, 317 or 318  for the certified costs
of a repower of a nonroad [ Oregon] diesel engine or retrofit of [ an Oregon ] a diesel engine that oc-
curs after [ the effective date of this 2007 Act ] September 27, 2007, if:
(a) The repower or retrofit has been identified as qualifying for the credit  under rules adopted
by the Environmental Quality Commission under [ section 8 of this 2007 Act ] ORS 468A.799 ;
(b) [ The engine will constitute an Oregon diesel engine ] The repowered  or retrofitted engine
will undergo at least 50 percent of its use in Oregon, as measured by miles  driven or hours
operated, for the three years following the repower or retrofit ; and
(c) The taxpayer has obtained a tax credit cost certification from the Department of Environ-
mental Quality under  section 16 [ of this 2007 Act ], chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007,  for the cost
of the repower or retrofit.
(2) The maximum amount of the tax credit allowed under this section is limited to:
(a) 25 percent of the certified cost of each qualifying repower; and
(b) 50 percent of the certified cost of each qualifying retrofit.
(3) The amount of the tax credit allowed to  the taxpayer under this section in any one tax year
may not exceed the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year.
(4) Any tax credit that  is allowed under this section, but limited by subsection (3) of this section,
and that is not used by the taxpayer in a particular tax year may be carried forward  and offset
against the taxpayer’s tax liability as prescribed in  subsection (3) of this section for the next suc-
ceeding tax year. Any credit  remaining unused in the next succeeding tax year may be carried
forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability as prescribed in subsection (3) of this section
for the second succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused  in the second succeeding tax year
may be carried forward  and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability as prescribed in subsection (3)
of this section for the third succeeding tax year, but may not be carried forward  for any tax year
thereafter.
(5) The credit  allowed under this section is not in lieu of any depreciation or amortization de-
duction for the engine to which the taxpayer otherwise may be entitled for purposes  of ORS chapter
316, 317 or 318. The taxpayer’s adjusted basis for determining gain  or loss may not be decreased by
any tax credits allowed under this section.
(6)(a) The Department of Revenue may disallow  the credit allowed under this section if the de-
partment finds that the  credit was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation, or if the department
learns that the engine that was the subject of the qualifying repower or  retrofit was destroyed by
arson committed by the taxpayer, or if the engine no longer  meets the requirements for obtaining
the tax credit.
(b) If the tax credit is disallowed  pursuant to this subsection, notwithstanding ORS 314.410 or
other law, all prior tax relief provided to the taxpayer shall be  forfeited, the department shall pro-
ceed to collect those  taxes not paid by the taxpayer as a result of the prior granting of the credit
and the taxpayer shall be denied any further credit provided under this section.
(c) The department may perform  activities necessary to ensure that recipients of the tax credit
comply with applicable requirements.
(7)(a) A nonresident individual  shall be allowed the credit computed in the same manner and
subject to the same limitations as the credit allowed a  resident by this section. However, the credit
shall be prorated using the proportion provided in ORS 316.117.
[11]
SB 971
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
(b) If a change in the taxable year of a taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085,  or if the
Department of Revenue terminates the taxpayer’s taxable  year under ORS 314.440, the credit al-
lowed by this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with ORS 314.085.
(c) If a change in the status of a taxpayer from resident to  nonresident or from nonresident to
resident occurs, the credit allowed by this section shall be determined  in a manner consistent with
ORS 316.117.
(8) The taxpayer shall claim the credit on a form prescribed by the Department of  Revenue
containing the information  required by the Department of Revenue. The taxpayer shall maintain the
tax credit cost certification  issued by the Department of Environmental Quality under section 16
[of this 2007 Act ], chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007,  in the records of the taxpayer  for the length
of time prescribed by the Department of Revenue and shall  provide a copy of the cost certification
to the Department of Revenue if requested.
(9) A taxpayer may not claim  a credit under this section and ORS 315.304 with respect to the
same diesel engine or  group of diesel engines. A taxpayer may claim a credit under this section and
under ORS [ 469.185 to 469.225] 469B.130 to 469B.169 with respect to the same diesel engine or group
of diesel engines if the taxpayer  and diesel engines otherwise meet the requirements to be allowed
a tax credit under ORS [ 469.185 to 469.225] 469B.130 to 469B.169 .
CAPTIONS
SECTION 17. The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 18. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[12]