Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding ORS 293.190, any moneys appropriated to the Emergency
Board under section 3, chapter 531, Oregon Laws  2019, that are not expended during the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, do not revert to the General Fund, but shall instead  remain
available during the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for release by the Emergency Board  to
the State Department of Fish and Wildlife for Oregon  Conservation and Recreation Fund
purposes, subject to the condition established in section 3, chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 2.  Section 5, chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  Section 4 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 531, Oregon  Laws 2019,  becomes operative July
1, [2021] 2023.
SECTION 3.  Section 6, chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  Sections 1  and 2 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2019,  are repealed on
January 2, [ 2022] 2024.
SECTION 4. The Legislative Assembly intends that if this 2021  Act becomes law after
June 30, 2021, this 2021 Act shall be retroactive to June 30,  2021. All actions consistent with
chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2019, taken by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife or the
Emergency Board after June 30, 2021 and prior to the effective date of this 2021 Act are
hereby ratified and approved.
SECTION 5.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 631