Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) This section applies to any county during the  period in which the county
is listed in an audit report of the financial  condition of counties issued by the Secretary of
State as being at high risk of financial distress.
(2) The tax collector of a  county described in subsection (1) of this section shall withhold
from property tax distributions made to taxing districts under ORS 311.395 an amount  equal
to three percent of such distributions.
(3) Amounts withheld by a county under this section shall be deposited  in the general
fund of the county and may be used solely to fund the office of the county assessor.
(4) If  a county described in subsection (1) of this section is not listed in a subsequent
audit report, the county shall  cease to withhold amounts under subsection (2) of this section
beginning with the first distributions made under ORS 311.395 after publication of the sub-
sequent audit report.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act applies to property tax  distributions made on or
after July 1, 2025, of  amounts of property tax moneys collected for property tax years be-
ginning on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.  ORS 311.390 is amended to read:
311.390. (1)(a) When the tax collector receives the assessor’s certificate pursuant to ORS 311.115,
the tax collector shall  prepare and file with the county treasurer a percentage schedule of the ratio
of taxes on property, as defined in ORS 310.140,  and other amounts to be collected, after reductions
necessary to comply with Article XI,  section 11b, [ Article XI ] of  the Oregon Constitution, after
making adjustments in accordance with ORS 311.105 (1)(c), for each governmental unit  as shown in
such certificate, compared to the total of each of those amounts.
(b) If a  tax supervising and conservation commission has submitted to the tax collector a list
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4056
HB 3358
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of municipal corporations subject to proration and the amounts prorated under ORS 294.632, before
the tax collector calculates the ratio of  taxes on property under this subsection, the tax collector
shall deduct the amounts submitted by  the tax supervising and conservation commission from the
amounts scheduled for distribution under this section for  municipal corporations subject to the ju-
risdiction of the tax supervising and conservation commission. The amount deducted from the  dis-
tribution to the municipal corporations shall be added to the amount distributed to the county.
(c) The schedule shall be approved by the county accountant, if one exists in the  county, or by
the county clerk before filing. Except  as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the dis-
tribution of collections by the tax  collector shall be made on the basis of the ratios computed pur-
suant to this section. The ratios computed pursuant to this section for a given fiscal year shall  be
used for the distribution of all taxes on  property or penalties that have been imposed, collected and
received for that fiscal year, regardless of the actual date of receipt,  except for moneys retained by
a county to pay bankruptcy costs under ORS 311.484 and amounts  withheld by a tax collector
under section 1 of this 2025 Act . Interest earned on moneys in  the unsegregated tax collections
account shall be distributed according  to the ratio applicable to the year in which the moneys are
distributed.
(2) If, after the  ratios are computed pursuant to this section, the amount of a levy or other tax
on property is changed, or a levy or other tax on property is filed  with the assessor pursuant to
ORS 310.060 that had not been included in the tax distribution schedule for that year, the  tax col-
lector shall revise the percentages provided in subsection (1)  of this section to reflect the corrected
or added levy or tax and shall adjust the amounts previously distributed  and to be distributed
thereafter to reflect the revision in percentages.
(3) If, in the opinion of the tax collector, it is not feasible to make the revisions described  in
subsection (2) of this section, the  tax collector shall treat the amount of the change in levy or tax
or the additional levy or tax as a separate tax collection and segregate the moneys  collected for the
particular  district  or districts in the periodic statement of tax collections given to the county
treasurer pursuant to ORS 311.395.
(4) If the percentage schedule is  revised, a copy shall be filed with the county treasurer after
approval by the county accountant, if one exists in the county, or by the county clerk.
(5) If, after the ratios are computed under this section, a levy or tax is changed or a levy or tax
is filed with  the assessor pursuant to ORS 310.060, that was not included in the tax distribution
schedule for that year, future distributions of interest shall  be based on the revised percentages that
reflect the corrected or added levy or tax. No  adjustments shall be made for previously distributed
interest.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 311.395 is amended to read:
311.395. (1) The tax collector shall make statements of the exact amounts of property tax moneys
in cash and warrants collected as follows:
(a) For the  period beginning on the first Monday following the last Friday in October through
the last Friday in  November, the tax collector shall make weekly statements of those taxes that are
collected for the current tax year.
(b) For the period beginning the first  Monday following the last Friday of November through the
last Friday of October of the  ensuing year, the tax collector shall make quarterly statements of
those taxes that are collected for the current tax year.
(c) The tax collector shall make quarterly statements of taxes collected for prior years.
(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection, if the  balance in the unsegregated
[2]
HB 3358
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tax collection account as of the close of any month for any tax year  (the current tax year or any
prior tax year) exceeds $10,000 or if requested  by any taxing district, and if weekly statements are
not required, then  the tax collector shall make a statement for the period since the last statement
for the tax year.
(e) If  the processing of tax payments for the current tax year received or postmarked on or be-
fore the November 15 due date (or if the due date is extended  under ORS 311.507, the due date
pursuant to the extension) is not substantially completed  as of the last Friday in November, the tax
collector shall continue to make weekly statements  until the end of a week when the processing is
substantially completed.
(2)(a) Each statement shall be of taxes collected during the weekly, monthly, quarterly  or other
period for which the statement is required.
(b) The statements prepared under subsection (1) of this section shall specify the tax years  for
which the payments of taxes were made.
(c) A copy of each statement shall be filed with the county clerk and a copy shall be  filed with
the county treasurer no later than  the fifth business day after the last business day of the period
for which the statement is prepared. A copy of each statement shall be retained in  the office of the
tax collector.
(3) For the purposes of this section, property tax moneys are collected when:
(a) Payment is made in person at the office of the tax collector;
(b) The tax collector receives tax moneys or notice of tax moneys collected by a financial  in-
stitution or other collection agency;
(c) The tax collector receives payment or notice of payment of tax moneys by the state; or
(d) The tax collector has posted a payment that arrived by mail in the county mail receptacle.
(4) Each statement required under subsections (1) and (2) of this  section shall separately state
the amount deposited into the property  tax bankruptcy account under ORS 311.484 , and amounts
withheld under section 1 of this 2025 Act,  for the period covered by the statement.
(5) The statements required under subsections (1)  and (2) of this section may be made more often
and for shorter periods if the tax collector so desires but one of the statements so filed shall  cover
a period coinciding with the last business day of the particular calendar month  or quarter during
the period.
(6) The county treasurer shall credit the total amount of moneys set  out in the statements pre-
pared under subsections (1) and (2) of this  section, except for the amount deposited into the property
tax bankruptcy account under ORS 311.484  and amounts withheld under section  1 of this 2025
Act, to the several funds for which the moneys were respectively received in accordance with  the
schedule provided in ORS 311.390. The  county treasurer shall keep the moneys and warrants re-
ceived from the tax collector in their respective funds.
(7) Within five business days of  receiving a statement required by subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the county treasurer shall distribute the  amount of money set out in the statement, except
for the amount  deposited into the property tax bankruptcy account under ORS 311.484 and amounts
withheld under section 1 of this 2025  Act , to the several taxing units according to the ratios
provided in ORS 311.390. The  county treasurer shall distribute interest earned on moneys in the
unsegregated tax collections account at least as often as the treasurer  receives a statement from
the tax collector under subsection (1)(b) or (d)  of this section. When statements are received under
subsection (1)(a) of this section, the county treasurer shall distribute interest at least once a  calen-
dar month.
[3]
HB 3358
1
2
3
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]