Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Land Conservation and Development shall study  issues
regarding siting of energy facilities in designated critical ground  water areas. The depart-
ment shall submit a report in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recom-
mendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to
land use no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1674