Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Agrivoltaics Task Force is established.
(2) The task force consists of at least 11 members,  who shall be appointed no later than
45 days following the effective date of this 2025 Act, as follows:
(a) One member, appointed by the  Director of Agriculture, to represent the State De-
partment of Agriculture;
(b) One member, appointed by the Director of the State Department of Energy to  repre-
sent the State Department of Energy; and
(c) At least nine members, appointed by the Director of the Department of Land  Con-
servation and Development, with diverse geographic representation, as follows:
(A) One member representing the Association of Oregon Counties;
(B) One member representing a land use organization;
(C) One member representing large agricultural operations;
(D) One member representing small agricultural operations or family farms;
(E) One member representing the solar development industry;
(F) One member familiar with community solar development;
(G) One member with expertise in agrivoltaics technology and deployment;
(H) One member representing the environmental community;
(I) One member with expertise in land valuation; and
(J) At the discretion of the director, an even  number of individuals with expertise, or
who represent other interests, relevant to the purpose of the task force.
(3) The task force shall study and prepare a report on:
(a) The existing land use regulations around solar siting and agriculture  and variations
across the state, if any;
(b) The benefits of agrivoltaics;
(c) The potential for agrivoltaics on smaller family farms or community solar projects;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2097
HB 2063
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
(d) The impacts to the agricultural economy from agrivoltaics,  particularly impacts to
properties or property values from solar siting or solar colocation;
(e) Recommendations on  the size of feasible agrivoltaics projects or the proportion of
land that may be used for agrivoltaics;
(f) Mechanisms to ensure that farming remains the  primary use of land used for
agrivoltaics; and
(g) Solar development impacts on availability of land for farm use.
(4) The task force may study and report on additional topics relating to agrivoltaics.
(5) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9)(a) The task force shall meet no fewer than six  times. The task force shall have its
first meeting on or before 90 days after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(b) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the  call of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee  of the Legislative
Assembly related to land use no later than December 15, 2026.
(12) The Department of Land Conservation and  Development shall provide staff support
to the task force or contract for the administration of the task force.
(13) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]