Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Tourism Commission, for  the biennium
ending June  30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,500,000 for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of section 2 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Local government body” means a local government as  defined in ORS 174.116 or a
special government body as defined in ORS 174.117.
(b) “Youth sporting event” means any kind of sporting event for  participants most of
whom are under the age of 25.
(2)(a) The Oregon  Tourism Commission shall develop, and coadminister with Sport
Oregon in accordance with this  section, a program for awarding grants to local government
bodies to help fund youth sporting events using moneys appropriated under section 1 of  this
2024 Act. The commission may consult  with Sport Oregon about the development of the
program.
(b) To be eligible for a grant, a local government body must, at the time of application:
(A) Be able to provide funding or other resources of its own; or
(B) Have secured other funding, in-kind donations or  other resources from any other
public or private, nonprofit or for-profit, source.
(c) A grant may not be awarded to any local government body in  an amount greater than
$100,000.
(3)(a) The commission shall prescribe an application process, including forms and  dead-
lines, by which a local government body may apply for a grant under this  section. The com-
mission may consult with Sport Oregon about the application process.
(b) At a minimum, the application form must require the applicant to:
(A) Describe the nature of the sporting event for which a grant is sought;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 195
SB 1539
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) State the age range of the participants;
(C) Set forth the  source and amount of the funding described in subsection (2)(b) of this
section;
(D) Describe the potential impact of the  youth sporting event on youth sports in the local
community;
(E) State the potential economic impact on local communities, including, but not limited
to, any increase in tourism or revenue for small or local businesses; and
(F) Provide any other  information the commission considers necessary or important for
reviewing applications.
(4)(a) Applications shall be submitted to Sport Oregon for a preliminary review.
(b) Upon request, Sport Oregon may consult with an applicant about its application, be-
fore or after submission.
(c) An applicant may amend and resubmit its application at any time within  the applica-
tion period.
(5)(a) Sport Oregon shall review all timely and complete applications.
(b) Within 30 days following receipt of an application, Sport Oregon shall:
(A) Approve the application for a grant in the amount requested;
(B) Approve the application for a grant in an amount  other than the amount requested;
or
(C) Reject the application.
(c) As soon as practicable after making a decision under this subsection, Sport Oregon
shall forward only approved applications, with grant recommendations, to the commission.
(6) In reviewing applications, Sport Oregon shall:
(a) Give priority to applications that:
(A) Promise a greater impact on youth sports in the local community;
(B) Promise a greater economic impact on local communities; and
(C) Show an ability to leverage partnerships; and
(b) Approve applications that, taken together, represent regional diversity in Oregon.
(7)(a) Within 30 days following receipt of an application  and grant recommendation for-
warded by Sport Oregon, the commission shall make a final review of the application.
(b) The commission shall review Sport Oregon’s decisions for  compliance with the pro-
visions of this section. The commission may consult with Sport  Oregon about noncompliant
decisions.
(c) The commission shall review Sport Oregon’s recommended grant amounts and  ap-
prove, reject or modify the recommendations.
(d) The final decisions of the commission are not subject to appeal.
(8)(a) As soon as practicable after  making final decisions under subsection (7) of this
section, the commission shall:
(A) Notify Sport Oregon of the final decisions, giving  reasons for the decisions if the
commission and Sport Oregon consider it necessary.
(B) Offer a grant agreement to each approved applicant.
(b) Upon entering into  a grant agreement with an approved applicant, the commission
shall distribute the approved grant amount to the local government body.
(9) Not later than  December 31, 2025, Sport Oregon shall submit to the commission a
report setting forth:
[2]
SB 1539
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
(a) The youth sporting events  that have been sponsored with grant moneys awarded un-
der this section;
(b) A detailed list of what the grant moneys were used for;
(c) The impact each grant has had on:
(A) Youth sports in the local community; and
(B) The economy of local communities, including, but  not limited to, tourism and small
or local businesses; and
(d) Any other  information Sport Oregon considers necessary or important for an evalu-
ation of the grant program.
(10)(a) If the commission discovers that a local  government body used grant moneys for
any purpose other than the purpose for which its grant application was approved, the com-
mission may recover the amount of the grant.
(b) Any and all amounts required to be repaid under this subsection shall be considered
to be liquidated and delinquent,  and the commission shall assign such amounts to the De-
partment of Revenue for collection as provided in ORS 293.250.
(c) All amounts  repaid to the commission or the department under this subsection, in-
cluding grant amounts, penalties,  interest, fees and any other charges, shall be credited to
the account of the commission.
(11) For activities undertaken pursuant to this section, the commission shall distribute
to Sport Oregon out of the moneys appropriated under section 1 of this 2024 Act:
(a) An initial fee of up to $50,000; and
(b) $50,000 in advance of each calendar quarter for the duration  of the youth sports grant
program.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]