Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.008 is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private sources  for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by  the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from  the Fund for Student Success, moneys transferred from the Education Sta-
bility Fund and the Oregon Marijuana  Account and moneys received as provided in paragraph (b)
of this subsection.
(d) The  State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077, 327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125,  327.137, 327.348, 327.356 to
327.359, 336.575, 336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant,  consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a transportation
grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as provided in  ORS 327.011
and 327.013.
(3) For the first school  year after a public charter school ceases to operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of termination or nonrenewal of a  charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to each school district that had sponsored  a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal  to the school district’s general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each education  service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 724
HB 2448
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) All  figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average  daily membership used in the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
more than $3 million for expenses incurred  by the department in providing support to school dis-
tricts, education service districts and public charter schools at any time before, during or after a
threat or hazard that may affect a school  district, an education service district or a public charter
school and for the purpose of helping to improve the safety and security of students and staff.
(8) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
more than $10 million  for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125
(1)(b) to (g).
(9) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing  Facil-
ity Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs  of educational ser-
vices provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  shall transfer the amount of [ $55] $130
million from the State School  Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS
327.348.
(11)(a) Each biennium,  the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified in this subsection shall be  adjusted by the same
percentage  by  which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(12) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language Learner  Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(13) Each  fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section and  ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(14) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend up to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration  of and support for the development of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend up to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of a program to increase the number  of licensed speech-language
pathologists and certified speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.398.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million from  the State School
[2]
HB 2448
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
Fund for  deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS 332.337.
Notwithstanding  ORS  332.337, the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy School
Facilities Fund under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing for  elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
(17) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer an  amount not to exceed
$5,595,000 for the purpose of making tampons and sanitary pads available as  provided by ORS
326.545.
(18) Each fiscal year, the  Department of Education shall transfer the amount of $2.5 million from
the State School Fund to the Small School District Supplement Fund established in ORS 327.359.
(19) Each biennium,  the Department of Education shall transfer to the Oregon Military Depart-
ment the amount necessary to pay the costs of  educational services provided to students admitted
to programs operated by the military department for at-risk youth, as described  in ORS 396.360, that
are outstanding after any General Fund appropriations  and the calculation of available federal funds
for the programs.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 327.008 by section 1 of this 2025 Act  apply to State
School Fund distributions commencing with the 2025-2026 school year distributions.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $150,000,000, for the State School Fund.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[3]