Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue Officer shall conduct a study of transportation
taxes in Oregon. Not later than September 15, 2026, the officer shall submit a report of the
findings of the study, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of
the Legislative Assembly  related to revenue. The report shall include recommendations for
legislation.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2217