Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 411.139, as amended by section 12, chapter 97, Oregon Laws 2022,  is amended
to read:
411.139. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible agency” means an agency that :
(A) Has contracted with the United States Department of State under 8 U.S.C. 1522(c) to provide
initial resettlement and case management services to refugees ; or
(B) Receives funding through a  cooperative agreement with the United States Depart-
ment of State, Bureau of Population, Refugees and Migration to provide reception and
placement services to refugees residing in remote areas of this state .
(b) “Refugee” means an individual who is not a  United States citizen, who has been in the
United States for 60 months or less and who is any of the following:
(A) A refugee admitted under 8 U.S.C. 1157.
(B) An asylee admitted under 8 U.S.C. 1158.
(C) A Cuban or Haitian entrant as defined in 45 C.F.R. 401.2.
(D) A parolee admitted under 8 U.S.C. 1182(d)(5).
(E) An Amerasian immigrant lawfully admitted to the United States who is  described in 8 U.S.C.
1612(a)(2)(A)(v).
(F) A victim of a severe form of trafficking in persons  and the victim’s family members who are
eligible for benefits and services from federal and state programs under 22 U.S.C. 7105(b)(1)(A).
(G) An Iraqi or an Afghan citizen who is a principal noncitizen provided with the status  of
special immigrant by the United States Department of Homeland Security under:
(i) Section 1059(a) of the National Defense Authorization Act  for Fiscal Year 2006, P.L. 109-163,
119 Stat. 3444;
(ii) Section 1244(b) of the Refugee Crisis in Iraq Act of 2007, P.L. 110-181, 122 Stat. 397; or
(iii) Section 602(b) of the Afghan Allies Protection Act of 2009, P.L. 111-8, 123 Stat. 807.
(H) An individual applying for admission as an asylee under 8 U.S.C. 1158, with priority
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1867
SB 1000
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
given to asylum seekers newly arrived to this state and  those at risk of homelessness or who
are homeless.
(I) An individual who has been granted an immigration status that has been  approved for
refugee services by the federal Office of Refugee Resettlement.
(2) The Department of Human Services  shall award grants to eligible agencies to provide the
following services to refugees residing in this state, for up to 24 months:
(a) Assisting refugees with department programs by:
(A) Referring refugees to the  department within three days of the refugee’s arrival in this state;
(B) Completing applications for assistance;
(C) Transporting the refugee to the initial appointments with the department;
(D) Providing to the department all necessary eligibility  information known to the eligible
agency; and
(E) Coordinating services of the department with other social service agencies.
(b) Assisting refugees with:
(A) Navigating the health care and mental health systems,  including providing assistance in
applying for medical assistance;
(B) Accessing housing assistance and finding stable housing;
(C) Setting up utilities and paying utility bills;
(D) Issues with landlords;
(E) Navigating legal or criminal issues including services for victims of crime;
(F) Accessing in-home services including parenting assistance, English as a second language in-
struction, medical and psychosocial support; and
(G) Navigating the culture of the United States.
(c) Providing transportation to appointments.
(d) Training refugees on using public transportation.
(e) Providing immigration assistance and referrals.
(f) Advocating on behalf of refugees regarding domestic violence, federal laws and hate crimes.
(g) Providing refugees  with interpretation services and assistance with access to language ser-
vices.
(h) Providing referrals for refugees to culturally specific support groups and  services, including
religious  organizations.
(i) Pairing refugees with volunteers  for English as a second language training and ongoing lan-
guage support.
(j) Providing support to refugees in budgeting and achieving financial literacy.
(k) Identifying refugees’ employment skills and providing referrals  to employment skills training
and other job support services.
(L) Problem solving with refugees and assisting refugees with life skills development.
(m) Ensuring that refugees have access to  psychosocial support and emotional wellness educa-
tion.
(n) Coordinating medical services  for refugees including referring to and coordinating with
agencies that determine eligibility for disability benefits.
(o) Providing family preservation services, legal services and social service support for domestic
violence and child welfare issues.
(p) Assisting newly arrived refugee children in accessing services to strengthen the children’s
academic performance and successful integration into the community.
[2]
SB 1000
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(q) Other services necessary to assist refugees  in accessing programs administered by the de-
partment.
(3) In addition to the grants provided  under subsection (2) of this section, the department
shall provide funding to each eligible agency to be used to:
(a) Secure housing with trusted landlords for future refugee arrivals;
(b) Provide emergency housing assistance to refugees; and
(c) Establish a rental assistance fund  to provide a minimum of six months of housing
assistance to newly arriving households to help the households achieve financial stability.
(4) The department shall establish a permanent, full-time position for a:
(a) State Refugee Coordinator; and
(b) Refugee Housing Coordinator.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $ , which shall be expended as follows:
(1) $  to provide each eligible agency, as  defined in ORS 411.139, with funding to
carry out ORS 411.139 (3)(a).
(2) $  to provide funding to each eligible agency to carry out ORS 411.139 (3)(b).
(3) $  to hire a full-time State Refugee  Coordinator in accordance with ORS 411.139
(4)(a).
(4) $  to hire a full-time Refugee Housing Coordinator  in accordance with ORS
411.139 (4)(b).
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[3]