Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of  Environmental Quality shall study risks and issues
relating to earthquake-induced toxic inhalation. The  department may consult, partner or
contract with any appropriate entity in carrying out the  study. The department and other
involved entities may consult with state agencies  to define the scope of high-risk facilities
for purposes of the study.
(2) On or before December 1, 2024,  the department shall submit a report on the findings
of the study to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly relating to emergency
management.
(3) On or before March 1,  2025, the department may submit recommendations for legis-
lation to the standing or  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly relating to emer-
gency management.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 76