Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “drive-through  restaurant” means a restaurant,
as defined in ORS 624.010, with a service window that allows customers to order  and receive
food or drink from a motor vehicle for consumption on or off the premises.
(2) A drive-through restaurant shall provide a garbage can within 15  feet of a service
window for customers to  dispose of garbage from a motor vehicle after purchasing food or
drink from the drive-through restaurant.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4212