Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) At least 75 percent of the total number of credit  hours offered during
an academic year by a public institution of higher education must  be taught by full-time
employees of the institution.
(2) No later  than September 1 of every year, each public institution of higher education
shall provide the Higher Education Coordinating Commission with:
(a) The percentage of the total number of credit hours offered during the  previous aca-
demic year by the institution that were taught by  full-time employees of the institution; and
(b) The names and numbers of all courses offered  for credit hours by the institution
during the previous academic year that both were and  were not taught by full-time employ-
ees of the institution.
(3)(a)(A) For each of the first two years in which a public university  listed in ORS 352.002
fails to comply with the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of  this section, the public
university is entitled to only 50 percent of the total amount of public moneys appropriated
by the Legislative  Assembly to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for allocation
to the public university during the following academic year.
(B) If a public  university fails to comply with the requirements set forth in subsection
(1) of this section for  three or more consecutive years, during the academic year following
an academic year in which the  public university is not in compliance with subsection (1) of
this section, the public university may not receive any public moneys  appropriated by the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2302
HB 3115
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Legislative Assembly to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission for allocation to the
public university.
(b)(A) For each of the first two years in which a  community college operated under ORS
chapter 341 fails  to comply with the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section,
the community college is entitled to only 50  percent of the total amount of public moneys
appropriated by the Legislative Assembly  to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission
for allocation to the community college during the following academic year.
(B) If a community college fails to comply with the requirements set forth in  subsection
(1) of this section for  three or more consecutive years, during the academic year following
an academic year in  which the community college is not in compliance with subsection (1)
of this section, the community college may not receive  any public moneys appropriated by
the Legislative Assembly to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission for allocation to
the community college.
(4) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall submit an annual report to the
Legislative Assembly no later than December 31 of each calendar year,  in the manner pre-
scribed by ORS 192.245, reporting on the level of compliance with this section  by each public
institution of higher education during the previous academic year.
(5) As used in this section, “public institution of higher education” means:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; or
(b) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341.
SECTION 2.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, section 1 of this 2023 Act
first applies to the 2024-2025 academic year.
(2) Notwithstanding section 1 (1) of this 2023 Act:
(a) During the 2024-2025  academic year, at least 45 percent of the total number of credit
hours offered during an academic year by a public institution  of higher education must be
taught by full-time employees of the institution.
(b) During the 2025-2026  academic year, at least 55 percent of the total number of credit
hours offered during an academic year by a public institution  of higher education must be
taught by full-time employees of the institution.
(c) During the 2026-2027 academic  year, at least 65 percent of the total number of credit
hours offered during an academic year by a public institution  of higher education must be
taught by full-time employees of the institution.
(3) As used in this section,  “public institution of higher education” has the meaning given
that term in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $_____, which shall be allocated to public uni-
versities listed in ORS 352.002 and  community colleges operated under ORS chapter 341 for
the purpose of increasing the percentage of credit hours  taught by full-time employees of the
institution in the manner required by section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2023.
[2]