Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 181A.820 and 181A.822 to 181A.829:
(a) When a person is arrested for a crime and is found to be in possession of a  firearm
at the time of arrest, the arresting officer shall inquire whether the person is a citizen.
(b) If the arresting officer  learns, after conducting the inquiry under paragraph (a) of
this subsection, that the arrested person is not a citizen, the arresting officer shall:
(A) Immediately notify federal immigration authorities and provide the person’s name,
crime of arrest and any other requested information.
(B) Cooperate, to the extent practicable, with any investigation resulting from the no-
tification.
(2) As used  in this section, “federal immigration authorities” means agents of the United
States Immigration and  Customs Enforcement, or a successor agency, who receive reports
of and investigate violations of immigration law.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 190