Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “media news outlet” means an online, print  or
other media outlet that:
(a) Has been in existence  as a registered business for at least 12 months in the state in
which it is registered as a business; and
(b) Regularly employs staff journalists who produce news coverage  on any topic of news
within Oregon.
(2) A credit in an amount not to exceed $100,  if reported on a joint return, or $50, if re-
ported on any other type of return, shall be allowed against the taxes that are otherwise due
under ORS chapter 316 for the amount that the taxpayer paid or incurred during the tax year
for:
(a) The cost of subscriptions to media news outlets; and
(b) Donations to  an organization that is recognized as exempt under section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code and that supports professional journalists, news media profes-
sionals, government transparency and public records reform.
(3) A taxpayer claiming a credit under this section  shall add to federal taxable income for
Oregon tax purposes any amount that  is deducted for federal tax purposes and that also
serves as the basis for the credit allowed under this section.
(4)(a) A nonresident shall be allowed the credit under this section in  the proportion pro-
vided in ORS 316.117.
(b) If  a change in the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from nonres-
ident to resident occurs, the credit allowed under this section  shall be determined in a
manner consistent with ORS 316.117.
(c) If a change in the  tax year of a taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085, or if the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3026
SB 57
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
Department of Revenue terminates the taxpayer’s tax year under ORS 314.440, the credit
allowed under this section shall be prorated or computed  in a manner consistent with ORS
314.085.
(5) The credit allowed in any one tax year may not exceed the tax liability  of the tax-
payer.
SECTION 3.
(1) A person that is not a media news outlet as defined in section 2 of this
2025 Act may not  advertise that a payment to the person is eligible for the tax credit de-
scribed in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The Department  of Revenue may impose a civil penalty of up to $500 for each violation
of this section.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2025, and before January 1, 2031.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]