Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the State  Fire Marshal, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $950,000 for distribution to Central
Douglas Fire and Rescue for adding living quarters to the fire station in Umpqua.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1720