Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $8,875,000
for distribution in accordance with section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2. The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall distribute the
amount appropriated under section 1 of this 2025 Act to the following organizations:
Name of venue Grant Amount
B-17 Alliance Foundation .......... $ 350,000
Columbia River Maritime
Museum..................................... $ 700,000
Coos Art Museum ..................... $ 325,000
Eastern Oregon Regional
Theatre ..................................... $ 600,000
Elsinore Theatre ....................... $ 350,000
High Desert Museum ................ $ 2,000,000
Historic Jacksonville, Inc. ........ $ 150,000
Maxville Heritage Interpretive
Center ....................................... $ 300,000
Mt. Hood Cultural Center &
Museum..................................... $ 450,000
Museum at Warm Springs ........ $ 1,500,000
Oregon Shakespeare Festival .... $ 375,000
PHAME ..................................... $ 600,000
Salem Art Association .............. $ 175,000
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 954
HB 3191
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
World Forestry Center ............. $ 1,000,000
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $400,000 for
deposit in the Cultural Resources Economic Fund established under section 6,  chapter 786,
Oregon Laws 2013, to be used for any purpose for which moneys in the fund may be used.
SECTION 4.  Section 6, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by  section 27, chapter 812,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 23, chapter 748, Oregon  Laws 2017, section 36, chapter 671, Oregon Laws
2019, section 45, chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021, and section 41, chapter 599, Oregon Laws  2023, is
amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The Cultural Resources Economic Fund  is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on the moneys in  the Cultural Resources Eco-
nomic Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Cultural Resources Economic Fund consists of :
(a) Moneys deposited in the fund under :
(A) Section 5, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013[ ,];
(B) Section 26, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015[ ,];
(C) Section 22, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017[ ,];
(D) Section 44, chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021[ , and];
(E) Section 38 , chapter 599, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023 Act, and may include ]; and
(F) Section 3 of this 2025 Act; and
(b) Fees, revenues or other income deposited in the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
[(2)] (3) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Oregon Business Development
Department for disbursement for the purposes set forth in section 5,  chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013,
section 26, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, section 22, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, section  44,
chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021,  and section 38 , chapter 599, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023
Act].
SECTION 5.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $50,000 for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.  (1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall conduct a compet-
itive grant program to award the moneys appropriated under  section 5 of this 2025 Act to a
nonprofit organization whose mission is to create a thriving environment  for arts, culture,
history, heritage and humanities throughout Oregon.
(2)(a) The nonprofit organization  awarded the grant shall use the moneys to fund its
provision of technical assistance to the arts and cultural organizations of its selection.
(b) The technical assistance provided under this subsection shall consist of assistance
with:
(A) Receiving and expending public moneys; and
(B) Preparing applications for public moneys.
[2]