Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to  the Oregon Military Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,500,000 for:
(1) Creation of exhibits at the Oregon Military Museum; and
(2) Capital expenditures directly related to the establishment and maintenance of the
museum.
SECTION 2.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1195