Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
OREGON VEHICLE INDUSTRY BOARD
SECTION 1.
Oregon Vehicle Industry  Board; membership; term; compensation and ex-
penses. (1) The Oregon Vehicle Industry Board is established.
(2) The Oregon Vehicle Industry Board consists of 13 members appointed by  the Gover-
nor as follows:
(a) Two individuals who represent franchise dealers of new vehicles;
(b) Two individuals who represent dealers of used vehicles;
(c) Two individuals who represent Oregon dismantlers;
(d) Two individuals who represent the interests of the general public;
(e) One individual who represents recreational vehicle dealers;
(f) One individual who represents vehicle dealership office management interests;
(g) One individual who represents auto auctions;
(h) One individual who represents dealers of motorcycles, mopeds or all-terrain  vehicles;
and
(i) One individual, whose interest of representation is determined by the Governor.
(3) All members of the board must be residents of Oregon.
(4) The term of office of each  member of the board is four years, but a member serves
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3197
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
at the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term of a  member, the Gover-
nor shall  appoint a successor whose term begins on July 1 next following. A member is eli-
gible for reappointment. If there is a vacancy for any cause,  the Governor shall make an
appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(5) The  appointment of each member of the board is subject to confirmation by the Sen-
ate in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(6) A member of the board is entitled  to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS
292.495.
SECTION 2.
Initial terms of office. Notwithstanding the term  of office specified by sec-
tion 1 of this 2025  Act, of the members first appointed to the Oregon Vehicle Industry Board:
(1) Three shall serve for a term ending July 1, 2026.
(2) Three shall serve for a term ending July 1, 2027.
(3) Three shall serve for a term ending July 1, 2028.
(4) Four shall serve for a term ending July 1, 2029.
SECTION 3.
Officers; quorum; meetings. (1) The Oregon Vehicle  Industry Board shall
select one of its members as chairperson and another as vice chairperson, for terms and with
duties and powers necessary for  the performance of the functions of the offices as the board
determines.
(2) A majority of the members of the board  constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(3) The board shall meet at least once a quarter at a  time and place determined by the
board. The board shall also meet at such other times  and places as are specified by the call
of the chairperson, vice chairperson or a majority of members of the board.
SECTION 4.
Director; other employees.  (1) The  Oregon Vehicle Industry Board shall ap-
point a director to serve at the pleasure of the Governor.  The determination of qualifications
of the director and appointment of the director shall be made by  the board after consulting
with the Governor.
(2) The director may not be a member of the board.
(3) The designation of the director must be  by written order, filed with the Secretary of
State.
(4) Subject to any applicable provisions of ORS chapter 240, the director shall  appoint all
subordinate officers and employees of the board,  prescribe their duties and fix their com-
pensation.
SECTION 5.
Rulemaking authority; board seal.  (1) In accordance  with applicable pro-
visions of ORS chapter  183, the Oregon Vehicle Industry Board may adopt rules necessary
for the administration of the laws that the board is charged with administering.
(2) The board may adopt a seal.
SECTION 6.
Vehicle Industry Account. (1) The Vehicle Industry Account  is established
in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The account consists of the following:
(a) Fees collected under ORS 822.700 for issuance or renewal of:
(A) Dismantler certificates;
(B) Vehicle dealer certificates; and
(C) Show licenses.
(b) Late fees collected under ORS 822.700.
[2]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Fees collected under ORS 822.705.
(d) Moneys from civil penalties imposed under ORS  822.009 (1) and (3), 822.100, 822.137 and
822.992.
(e) Moneys appropriated to the account by the Legislative Assembly.
(f) Moneys from any other source.
(3) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Vehicle Industry
Board to carry out the provisions of sections 1 to 8 of this 2025 Act  and the administration
of the laws that the board is charged with administering.
SECTION 7.
Penalties. Violation of any rule adopted under section 5  of this 2025 Act is
a Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 8. Vehicle Dealer Records.  The Oregon Vehicle Industry Board shall maintain
separate records for the regulation of  vehicle dealers. The records required under this sec-
tion shall include the following information about persons issued vehicle dealer certificates:
(1) The person’s application for a vehicle dealer certificate.
(2) An alphabetical index of the name of each person applying  for a vehicle dealer cer-
tificate.
(3) A numerical index according to the distinctive number  assigned to each vehicle
dealer.
TRANSFER OF FUNCTIONS
(Transfer of Duties, Functions and Powers)
SECTION 9.
The duties, functions and powers of the Department of  Transportation re-
lated to the regulation of vehicle dealers  and dismantlers, including the issuance of certif-
icates to vehicle dealers and dismantlers, under the Oregon Vehicle  Code are imposed upon,
transferred to and vested in the Oregon Vehicle Industry Board.
(Records and Property)
SECTION 10. (1) The Director of  Transportation shall deliver to the Oregon Vehicle In-
dustry Board all records and property within the jurisdiction of the director that relate  to
the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 9 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The Governor shall resolve any dispute  between the Department of Transportation
and the Oregon Vehicle Industry Board relating to transfers of records and property  under
this section, and the Governor’s decision is final.
(Unexpended Revenues)
SECTION 11. (1) The unexpended balances of amounts authorized to be expended  by the
Department of Transportation for the biennium beginning July 1,  2025, from revenues dedi-
cated, continuously appropriated, appropriated or otherwise made available for the purpose
of administering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers transferred  by section 9 of
this 2025 Act are transferred  to and are available for expenditure by the Oregon Vehicle In-
dustry Board for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  for the purpose of administering and
enforcing the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 9 of this 2025 Act.
[3]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing or limiting
expenditures by the Department of  Transportation remain applicable to expenditures by the
Oregon Vehicle Industry Board under this section.
(Action, Proceeding, Prosecution)
SECTION 12.
The transfer of duties, functions and powers  to the Oregon Vehicle Indus-
try Board by section 9 of this 2025 Act does not affect  any action, proceeding or prosecution
involving or with respect to such duties, functions and powers begun before and pending  at
the time  of the transfer, except that the Oregon Vehicle Industry Board is substituted for
the Department of Transportation in the action, proceeding or prosecution.
(Liability, Duty, Obligation)
SECTION 13. (1) Nothing in sections 1 to 14 and 40 of this 2025 Act  and the amendments
to statutes by sections  15 to 38 and 41 to 56 of this 2025 Act relieves a person of a liability,
duty or obligation accruing  under or with respect to the duties, functions and powers
transferred by section 9 of this 2025  Act. The Oregon Vehicle Industry Board may undertake
the collection or enforcement of any such liability, duty or obligation.
(2) The rights and obligations of  the Department of Transportation legally incurred under
contracts, leases and business transactions executed,  entered into or begun before the op-
erative date of section 9 of this 2025 Act are transferred to the Oregon Vehicle Industry
Board. For the purpose of succession to these rights and obligations, the Oregon  Vehicle
Industry Board is a continuation of the Department  of Transportation and not a new au-
thority.
(Rules)
SECTION 14.
Notwithstanding the transfer of duties,  functions and powers by section 9
of this 2025 Act, the rules of the Department of Transportation in effect on  the operative
date of section 9 of this  2025 Act continue in effect until superseded or repealed by rules of
the Oregon Vehicle Industry Board. References in rules  of the Department of Transportation
to the  Department of Transportation or an officer or employee of the Department of Trans-
portation are considered to be references to the Oregon Vehicle Industry Board or an  officer
or employee of the Oregon Vehicle Industry Board.
AMENDMENTS TO STATUTES
SECTION 15.  ORS 87.152 is amended to read:
87.152. (1) Except as provided  in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a person that makes,
alters, repairs, transports, stores, pastures, cares for, provides services for, supplies materials  for
or performs labor on a chattel at the request of the owner or lawful  possessor of the chattel has a
lien on the chattel in the  possession of the person for the reasonable or agreed charges for labor,
materials or services of the person, and the person may retain possession of the chattel until  the
charges are paid.
[4]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2)(a) Except as  provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person may not create, attach, assert
or claim a possessory lien on a motor vehicle, as defined in ORS 801.360,  unless the person performs
a service that complies  with ORS 646A.480 to 646A.495 and that involves making, altering, repairing,
transporting, storing, providing services for, supplying material for or performing labor in con-
nection with the motor vehicle and the person:
(A) Is a franchised motor vehicle dealership, as defined in ORS 650.120 (5), or  a manufacturer,
as defined in ORS 650.120, of the motor vehicle;
(B) Holds a towing business certificate that the Department of Transportation  issued under ORS
822.205, provided that the person creates, attaches, asserts or claims  a possessory lien only for
transporting or storing the motor vehicle; or
(C) Creates, attaches, asserts or claims the lien against an abandoned motor vehicle.
(b) A person, other than a person that is described in  paragraph (a)(A), (B) or (C) of this sub-
section, shall have in effect a surety bond  or irrevocable letter of credit in the amount of $20,000
before, and shall maintain the surety bond  or irrevocable letter of credit during, any period in which
the person creates, attaches, asserts or claims a possessory lien on a motor vehicle after  making,
altering, repairing, transporting, storing,  performing services for, supplying materials for or per-
forming labor in connection with the motor vehicle.
(c)(A) The surety bond and the irrevocable letter of credit described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection must be issued, respectively,  by a corporate surety that is authorized to transact business
in this  state and by a financial institution, as defined in ORS 706.008. The corporate surety or the
financial institution, as appropriate, shall notify the Department of Transportation of  any cancella-
tion of the surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit. The  corporate surety remains liable under the
surety bond and the financial institution remains obligated under  the irrevocable letter of credit
until the department receives the notice or until the date of cancellation specified in the notice,
whichever is later.
(B) A  surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit described in paragraph (b) of this subsection
must be:
(i) Executed to the State of Oregon;
(ii) Approved by the Attorney General as to form;
(iii) Filed with and held by the department; and
(iv) Conditioned such as to compensate parties damaged as a result of a use of a possessory  lien
in connection with a misrepresentation, a fraud or a violation of a duty set forth  in ORS 646A.480
to 646A.495.
(C) The person described in paragraph (b) of this subsection as  subject to the requirement to
have in effect a surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit must certify in writing to the department
each year that the surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit remains in effect.  If another person
obtains a recovery against the surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit, the  person shall file with
the department not later than three business days after the date of  the recovery a new surety bond
or irrevocable letter of credit in the amount specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(3)(a) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Auction company” means an entity:
(i) That operates throughout the United States;
(ii) That  holds a vehicle dealer certificate that the [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Ve-
hicle Industry  Board  issued under ORS 822.020, or a dismantler certificate that the [ department]
board issued or renewed under ORS 822.110 or 822.125; and
[5]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(iii) The primary activity of which, in this state, consists of disposing of totaled motor  vehicles.
(B) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.360.
(b) An auction company has a lien  on a motor vehicle that the auction company possesses and
stored on premises the auction company owns or controls. The auction company may title  the motor
vehicle in the name of:
(A) The auction company,  if the motor vehicle has remained unclaimed on the auction company’s
premises for more than 30 days;
(B) The insurance company that directed the auction company to take possession of the motor
vehicle;  or
(C) An organization with an exemption from taxation under  section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code that directed the auction company to take possession of the motor vehicle.
(c) ORS 87.166 and 87.172 to 87.212 do not apply to chattel that is subject to this subsection.
(4)(a) The owner of  a motor vehicle may bring an action to recover from a person that refuses,
at the owner’s demand and without a valid possessory lien created and attached as provided  in
subsection (2) or (3) of this section, to release the owner’s motor vehicle or restore to the owner title
to the owner’s motor vehicle if the person changed the title:
(A) The greater of  $2,000 or an amount equivalent to twice the value of the motor vehicle, up
to a maximum amount of $20,000; and
(B) The owner’s reasonable costs and attorney fees.
(b) In addition to the recovery described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the owner may
obtain:
(A) A judgment that:
(i) Directs the Department of Transportation to restore  title to the motor vehicle to the owner
and to invalidate the title the person obtained; or
(ii) Extinguishes the person’s interest in the motor vehicle and directs the department  to issue
title in the name of the plaintiff in the action;
(B) A judgment that declares that the person’s lien is invalid if the person obtained title to the
motor vehicle without complying with this section; and
(C) Reimbursement for any fees the owner pays to the department to reissue the title.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 184.642 is amended to read:
184.642. (1) The Department  of Transportation Operating Fund is established in the State
Treasury separate and distinct from  the General Fund and separate and distinct from the State
Highway Fund. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [ (3)(e)] (3)(d) of this section, moneys in
the Department of Transportation Operating Fund  are continuously appropriated to the Department
of Transportation to pay expenses of the department that are incurred in the performance of func-
tions the department is statutorily required or  authorized to perform and that may not constitu-
tionally be paid from revenues described in section 3a, Article IX of the Oregon Constitution.
(2) The operating fund shall consist of the following:
(a) Taxes paid on motor vehicle fuels or on the use of fuel  in a motor vehicle for which a person
is entitled to a refund under a provision  described in this paragraph but for which no refund is
claimed, in  amounts determined under ORS 184.643. This paragraph applies to refund entitlements
described in ORS 319.280 (1)(a) and (e), 319.320 (1)(a) and 319.831 (1)(b).
(b) Fees collected under ORS 822.700 for issuance or renewal of:
[(A) Dismantler certificates; ]
[(B) Vehicle dealer certificates; ]
[6]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(C) Show licenses; ]
[(D)] (A) Vehicle transporter certificates;
[(E)] (B) Driver training instructor certificates;
[(F)] (C) Commercial driver training school certificates; and
[(G)] (D) Vehicle appraiser certificates.
[(c) Late fees collected under ORS 822.700. ]
[(d) Fees collected under ORS 822.705. ]
[(e)] (c) Moneys from civil penalties imposed under ORS 822.009  (2).
[(f)] (d) Fees collected under ORS 807.410 for identification cards.
[(g)] (e) Fees collected by the department for issuance of permits  to engage in activities de-
scribed in ORS 374.302 to 374.334 that are not directly connected to the  construction, recon-
struction, improvement, repair, maintenance,  operation and use of a public highway, road, street or
roadside rest area.
[(h)] (f) Fees collected under ORS 835.017 for  services provided to the Oregon Department of
Aviation.
[(i)] (g) Interest and other earnings on moneys in the operating fund.
(3) Moneys in the Department of Transportation Operating Fund established by subsections  (1)
and (2) of this section may be spent only as follows:
(a) Taxes described in subsection (2)(a) of this section may be used  only for payment of expenses
of the Department of Transportation that:
(A) May not constitutionally be paid  from revenues described in section 3a, Article IX of the
Oregon Constitution;
(B) Are incurred in the performance of  functions the department is statutorily required or au-
thorized to perform; and
(C) Are not payable from moneys described in paragraphs (b) to [ (e)] (d) of this subsection.
(b) Fees collected under subsection (2)(b) of this section may be used only to carry out the reg-
ulatory functions of the department relating to the businesses that generate the fees.
[(c) Fees collected under ORS 822.705 may be used only for the purposes described in ORS
822.705.]
[(d)] (c) Moneys collected from civil penalties imposed under ORS 822.009 (2) may be used  only
for regulation of vehicle dealers.
[(e)] (d) Moneys collected under ORS  807.410 from fees for identification cards shall be used first
to pay the expenses of the department for performing the  functions of the department relating to
identification cards. After paying the expenses related to identification cards, the  department shall
transfer the remaining moneys collected under ORS 807.410 to the Statewide  Transportation Im-
provement Fund established in ORS 184.751.
[(f)] (e) Moneys from the permits  described in subsection [ (2)(g)] (2)(e) of this section may be
used for costs of issuing the permits and monitoring the activities that generate the fees.
[(g)] (f) Moneys from interest and other earnings on moneys in the operating fund may  be used
for any purpose for which other moneys in the fund may be used.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 802.010 is amended to read:
802.010. (1) The Department of Transportation shall perform all  of the duties, functions and
powers with respect to the following:
(a) The administration of the laws relating to the motor vehicle  fuel license tax, aircraft fuel
license tax and use fuel license tax including ORS chapter 319.
[7]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The administration of the  laws relating to motor vehicle registration and titling [ and the is-
suance of certificates  to vehicle dealers and dismantlers ] including but not limited to the adminis-
tration of the vehicle code.
(c) The administration of the laws relating to driving privileges granted under licenses  and
permits and under the vehicle code.
(d) The administration of the laws relating to operation  of vehicles on highways and of vehicle
size, weight and use limits under the vehicle code.
(e) The administration of ORS 820.130 and 820.140.
(f) The administration of the provisions relating to proof of  compliance with financial responsi-
bility requirements and future responsibility filings.
(2) The Director of Transportation shall act as a reciprocity officer for the purposes  of ORS
802.500 and 802.520.
(3) The director shall have the authority to execute or make such arrangements,  agreements or
declarations to carry out the provisions  of ORS 802.500 and 802.520. The director shall receive no
additional compensation  for service performed under this subsection but shall be allowed actual and
necessary expenses incurred in the performance  of the duties to be paid from the account of the
department.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 802.200 is amended to read:
802.200. In addition to any other records the Department of  Transportation may establish, the
department is subject to the following provisions concerning records:
(1) The department shall maintain  records concerning the titling of vehicles in this state. The
records under this subsection shall include the following:
(a) For vehicles issued a title by this state, the records shall identify the vehicle and contain
the following:
(A) The name of  the vehicle owner and any security interest holders in order of priority, except
that a security interest holder need not be identified if the debtor who granted the interest is in  the
business of selling vehicles and the vehicles constitute inventory held for sale;
(B) The name of any lessor of the vehicle;
(C) The vehicle description; and
(D) Whether a certificate of title was issued for the vehicle.
(b) If the vehicle is an antique vehicle that is reconstructed, the records shall indicate that  the
vehicle is reconstructed.
(c) If the vehicle is a replica, the records shall indicate that the vehicle is a replica.
(d) Any other information concerning the titling  of vehicles that the department considers con-
venient or appropriate.
(e) All odometer disclosures  and readings for a vehicle that are reported to the department un-
der provisions of the vehicle code. The department  shall keep the most recent version of records
required under this paragraph in electronic form.
(f) If the vehicle has  been reported to the department as a totaled vehicle under the provisions
of ORS 819.012 or 819.014, the records shall indicate that the  vehicle is a totaled vehicle unless the
reason for the report was theft and the vehicle has been recovered.
(2) If a vehicle that has been registered or titled in another  jurisdiction is registered or titled
in this state, the department shall  retain a record of any odometer readings shown on the title or
registration documents submitted to the department at the time of registration or title.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 826.003, the department shall maintain  records con-
[8]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cerning the registration of vehicles required to be registered by the  department. The records con-
cerning the registration of vehicles may be stored along with records concerning  the titling of
vehicles. The records under this subsection shall include the following:
(a) For vehicles registered by the department, the  records shall identify the vehicle and contain
the following:
(A) The registration plate number assigned by the department to the vehicle;
(B) The name of the vehicle owner;
(C) The vehicle description and vehicle identification number; and
(D) An indication that the vehicle is a totaled vehicle if it has  been reported to the department
as a totaled vehicle under the provisions of ORS 819.012 or 819.014, unless the reason for the report
was theft and the vehicle has been recovered.
(b) Any other information concerning the registration of vehicles that  the department considers
convenient or appropriate.
[(4) The department shall maintain separate  records for the regulation of vehicle dealers. The re-
cords required under this  subsection shall include the following information about persons issued
dealer certificates: ]
[(a) The person’s application for a vehicle dealer certificate. ]
[(b) An alphabetical index of the name of each person applying for a vehicle dealer certificate. ]
[(c) A numerical index according to the distinctive number assigned to each vehicle dealer. ]
[(5)] (4) The department shall maintain a file on vehicles  for which the title record is canceled
under ORS 819.030.  The records required under this subsection shall disclose the last registered
owner of each vehicle, any security interest holder or holders and lessors of each vehicle  as shown
by the canceled title record for each vehicle and the make and year model for each vehicle.
[(6)] (5) The department shall maintain a record of each agreement or declaration under ORS
802.500 and 802.520.
[(7)] (6) The department shall maintain separate and comprehensive records of all  transactions
affecting the Revolving Account for Emergency Cash Advances described under ORS 802.100.
[(8)] (7) The department shall maintain suitable records  of driver licenses, driver permits and
identification cards. The records required under this subsection shall include all of the following:
(a) An index by name and number.
(b) Supporting documentation of all driver licenses, driver permits or identification cards  issued.
(c) Every application for a driver license, driver permit or identification card.
(d) All driver licenses or driver permits that have been suspended, revoked or canceled.
(e)(A) For each driver license, driver permit or identification card, the  Social Security number
of the person to  whom the driver license, driver permit or identification card is issued or the written
statement that the person has not been assigned a Social Security number.
(B) As used in this paragraph, a “driver license,” “driver permit” or “identification card” means
a driver license, driver permit or identification card that is not a:
(i) Real ID;
(ii) Commercial driver license; or
(iii) Commercial learner driver permit.
(f) For each commercial driver license and commercial  learner driver permit, the Social Security
number of the person to whom the  license or permit is issued, or any other number or identifying
information  that  the Secretary of the United States Department of Transportation determines ap-
propriate to identify the person.
[9]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) For each Real ID, the Social Security number of  the person to whom the Real ID is issued,
or proof that the person is not eligible for a Social Security number.
(h) Emergency contact information provided under ORS 802.275.
[(9)] (8) The Department of  Transportation shall maintain a two-part driving record consisting
of an employment driving  record and a nonemployment driving record for each person as required
under this subsection. All of the following apply to the records required under this subsection:
(a) The  department shall maintain driving records on each person the department determines
requires an Oregon driving record to comply with federal regulations or provisions of the vehicle
code. The department shall establish rules for maintaining driving records under this subsection.
(b) In addition to  other information required by this paragraph, the employment driving record
shall include all reports of drug test results that are made to the department under  ORS 825.410 or
825.415. Notwithstanding any other  provision of law, release of the portion of the employment driv-
ing record that shows drug test results reported under ORS  825.410 or 825.415 is permitted only in
accordance with ORS 802.202. The employment driving record shall also include all motor  vehicle
accidents that the person is  required to report under ORS 811.720, all suspensions of driving privi-
leges required to be placed on the record under  ORS 809.280, all suspensions of the person’s com-
mercial driving privileges that result from operation or use of a  commercial motor vehicle and all
convictions, as determined by the department by rule, of  the person for violation of motor vehicle
laws except convictions for  offenses requiring mandatory revocation or suspension of driving privi-
leges under ORS 809.409, 809.411, 809.510 to 809.545 and 813.400,  but shall include only such acci-
dents, suspensions and convictions that occur while the person is driving a motor vehicle:
(A) In the course of the person’s employment  when the person is employed by another for the
principal purpose of driving a motor vehicle;
(B) Carrying persons or property for compensation;
(C) In the course of the person’s employment in  the collection, transportation or delivery of mail
if the vehicle is government owned or  marked for the collection, transportation or delivery of mail
in accordance with government rules;
(D) That is an authorized emergency vehicle;
(E) That is a commercial motor vehicle; or
(F) In the course of the person’s employment with a federal, state or local  government in a
public works project involving repair or maintenance of water, sewer or road systems.
(c) The nonemployment driving record shall include the person’s:
(A) Motor vehicle accidents that the person is required to report under ORS 811.720, other than
the motor vehicle accidents that are included on the person’s employment driving record;
(B) Suspensions, cancellations and revocations of licenses, permits and driving privileges;
(C) Judgments and convictions,  as determined by the department by rule, for violation of the
motor vehicle laws including, for each violation of ORS 811.100 or 811.111, the speed at which the
person was convicted of traveling and the posted speed, the  speed limit or the speed that constitutes
prima facie evidence of violation of the basic speed rule, as appropriate; and
(D) Diversion agreements entered into under ORS 813.220 within the preceding 15 years.
(d) The department may record other entries to  indicate correspondence, interviews, partic-
ipation in driver improvement programs or other  matters concerning the status of the driving priv-
ileges of the person.
(e) When a person is issued a driver license or driver permit by this state, the department  may
request a copy of driving records that exist for the person in any other jurisdiction.  The department
[10]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
shall adopt rules specifying when the department may request driving  records from other jurisdic-
tions and may apply entries from out-of-state records for use in Oregon.
(f) When  a suspension of a driver permit, driver license or other driving privilege is placed on
the driving record under  ORS 809.280 for failure to appear in court on a traffic crime, the depart-
ment shall note on the record that the suspension was for failure to appear  in court and shall also
note the offense charged against the person on which the person failed to appear.
(g) The Department of Transportation, in  consultation with the Department of State Police, shall
devise and implement a method of noting suspensions and revocations of  driving privileges on the
record in such a way that police agencies  can determine directly from the record what class of of-
fense, as provided by law, is committed by a person who  drives in violation of the suspension or
revocation. If the Department of Transportation and the Department of State  Police devise a mutu-
ally agreeable alternative method of informing police agencies of the nature of a suspension or  re-
vocation and the  consequences of its violation, the implementation of that method shall satisfy the
duty of the Department of Transportation under this paragraph.
[(10)] (9) The department shall maintain accident reports filed with the department under ORS
810.460 and 811.725 to 811.735.
[(11)] (10) The department shall maintain records of  bank checks or money orders returned un-
der ORS 802.110.
[(12)] (11) The department shall maintain records of trip permits issued by  the department under
ORS 803.600, as provided under this subsection. The records required by this  subsection shall in-
clude the following:
(a) A description of the vehicle sufficient to identify the vehicle.
(b) The person to whom the permit was issued.
(c) When the permit was issued.
(d) The type of permit issued.
(e) For registration weight trip permits, the maximum allowable  registration weight permitted
for operation under the permit.
(f) Any other information the department determines appropriate or convenient.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 802.275 is amended to read:
802.275. (1) As used in this section, “emergency situation” means a situation  in which the fol-
lowing  occurs:
(a) An individual is killed, seriously injured  or rendered unconscious and is unable to inde-
pendently communicate with police officers; and
(b) The individual’s emergency contact information is not otherwise available.
(2) The  Department of Transportation shall create an emergency contact information form and
make the form available to individuals.
(3) On the form provided by the department, an individual  may provide, for inclusion in the re-
cords the department maintains  under ORS 802.200 [ (8)] (7) , the individual’s emergency contact in-
formation of no more than two persons who are 18 years of age or older.
(4) If the individual is an unmarried minor who is  not emancipated, the emergency contact in-
formation provided under this section:
(a) Must include one person who is the parent or legal guardian of the individual; and
(b) A parent or guardian  may complete or update the individual’s emergency contact information
on behalf of the individual.
(5) An individual who submits an emergency contact information  form shall complete a state-
[11]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment that states that:
(a) The individual is providing the information voluntarily;
(b) The accuracy of the information supplied on the form  is the sole responsibility of the indi-
vidual; and
(c) The individual authorizes the disclosure to, and use of, the emergency contact  information
by police officers, during  or after an emergency situation, for purposes of contacting those listed
about the location and general condition of the individual.
(6) The department shall adopt rules for the administration and implementation  of this section,
including:
(a) The process for submitting and updating emergency contact information;
(b) The contents of the emergency contact information form; and
(c) Any other  rule the department determines is necessary to administer and implement this
section.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 802.348 is amended to read:
802.348. (1) The Department of Transportation  shall ensure that the membership of advisory
committees to the department reflects the racial and ethnic and ability composition of this  state as
determined by the most recent American  Community Survey from the United States Census Bureau.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies  to all advisory committees to the department, including
but not limited to:
(a) The Continuous Improvement Advisory Committee established in ORS 184.665.
(b) The Freight Advisory Committee established in ORS 366.212.
(c) The Road User Fee Task Force established in ORS 184.843.
(d) Any stakeholder forum established under ORS 366.215.
[(e) The advisory committee on vehicle dealer regulation established in ORS 802.370. ]
[(f)] (e)  The advisory committee on bicycle traffic established in ORS 366.112.
[(g)] (f)  The Transportation Safety Committee established in ORS 802.300.
[(h)] (g)  The Jurisdictional Transfer Advisory Committee  established in section 1, chapter 323,
Oregon Laws 2023.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 802.348, as amended by  section 5, chapter 323, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
802.348. (1) The Department of Transportation  shall ensure that the membership of advisory
committees to the department reflects the racial and ethnic and ability composition of this  state as
determined by the most recent American  Community Survey from the United States Census Bureau.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies  to all advisory committees to the department, including
but not limited to:
(a) The Continuous Improvement Advisory Committee established in ORS 184.665.
(b) The Freight Advisory Committee established in ORS 366.212.
(c) The Road User Fee Task Force established in ORS 184.843.
(d) Any stakeholder forum established under ORS 366.215.
[(e) The advisory committee on vehicle dealer regulation established in ORS 802.370. ]
[(f)] (e)  The advisory committee on bicycle traffic established in ORS 366.112.
[(g)] (f)  The Transportation Safety Committee established in ORS 802.300.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 810.480 is amended to read:
810.480. (1) A police  officer, during normal business hours, may inspect the records, including
electronic records, a vehicle dealer is required to keep under ORS 822.045 and vehicles  included in
[12]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the inventory or located on the premises of a dealer  issued a certificate under ORS 822.020. The
inspections shall be limited in scope to that necessary to determine compliance with  the regulation
of dealers under the vehicle  code and with vehicle title and registration provisions under the vehicle
code and for the purposes of identifying stolen vehicles.
(2) A police officer, at any time, may inspect the books,  records and inventory of and premises
used by any business issued  a certificate under ORS 822.110 for the purpose of determining whether
the provisions relating to the regulation of dismantlers, rules  adopted by the [ Department of Trans-
portation] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  relating to the regulation of dismantlers and laws re-
lating to licensing, titling and wrecking  of vehicles are being complied with. Every business issued
a certificate under ORS 822.110 shall be inspected not less than two times each year.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 822.007 is amended to read:
822.007. (1) In  addition to any other remedies provided by law, the [Department of
Transportation] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  may petition  the circuit court to enjoin a person
from acting as a vehicle dealer in violation of the Oregon Vehicle Code or any rule adopted  by the
[department] board.
(2) A single act in  violation of the provisions of the Oregon Vehicle Code or of any rules
adopted by the [ department] board relating to  vehicle dealers shall be sufficient ground for the court
to issue the injunction.
(3) In addition to issuing an injunction, the court may assess a penalty not to exceed  $15,000 if
the [ department] board proves by a preponderance of the evidence that a person is acting as  a ve-
hicle dealer without possessing a vehicle dealer certificate. The  court shall also award reasonable
costs and disbursements, attorney and enforcement fees.
SECTION 24.  ORS 822.009 is amended to read:
822.009. (1) The [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle  Industry Board  may levy and
collect a civil penalty, in an amount not to exceed $1,000 for each violation,  against any person who
has a vehicle dealer certificate if it finds that the dealer has violated any provisions of the  Oregon
Vehicle Code or of any rules adopted by the [ department] board relating to the regulation  of vehicle
dealers designated to act as  agents of the [ department,] board and the sale of vehicles[ , vehicle titl-
ing or vehicle registration ].
(2) The Department of Transportation may levy and collect a civil penalty, in  an amount
not to exceed $1,000 for each violation, against any person who has a vehicle dealer certif-
icate if it finds that the  dealer has violated any provisions of the Oregon Vehicle Code or of
any rules adopted by the department relating to the regulation of vehicle  dealers designated
to act as agents of the department, vehicle titling or vehicle registration.
[(2)] (3) The [ department] board may levy and collect a civil  penalty, in an amount not to exceed
$5,000 for each vehicle improperly sold, brokered, exchanged  or offered or displayed for sale, against
any person if it finds that the person is in violation of:
(a) ORS 822.005 (1); or
(b) Any rules  adopted by the [ department] board relating to the sale of vehicles and the person
is not subject to subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 822.015 is amended to read:
822.015. (1) In addition to any exemptions from the  vehicle code under ORS 801.026, ORS 822.005
does not apply to the following vehicles or persons:
(a) Road rollers, farm tractors, farm trailers,  trolleys, implements of husbandry, emergency ve-
hicles, well-drilling machinery and boat or utility trailers with a gross weight  of 1,800 pounds or
[13]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
less.
(b) The owner of a vehicle as shown by  the vehicle title issued by any jurisdiction if the person
owned the vehicle primarily for personal, family or household purposes. If the person  has sold,
traded, displayed or offered for sale, trade  or exchange more than five vehicles in one calendar year,
the person shall have the burden of proving that  the person owned the vehicles primarily for per-
sonal, family or household purposes or for other purposes  that the [ Department of Transportation ]
Oregon Vehicle Industry Board , by rule, defines as constituting an exemption under this section.
(c) A receiver, trustee, personal representative or public officer while performing any  official
duties.
(d) The lessor or security interest holder of a vehicle as shown by the vehicle title issued  by
any jurisdiction.
(e) Except  as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a manufacturer who sells vehicles the man-
ufacturer has manufactured in Oregon. Nothing in this paragraph  prevents any manufacturer from
obtaining a vehicle dealer certificate under  ORS 822.020. This paragraph does not exempt a man-
ufacturer who sells or trades campers or travel trailers.
(f) An insurance adjuster authorized to do business under ORS  744.515 or 744.521 who is dis-
posing of vehicles for salvage.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a person who sells or trades  or offers to sell
or trade a  vehicle that has been used in the operation of the person’s business. This paragraph does
not exempt a person who is  in the business of selling, trading, displaying, rebuilding, renting or
leasing vehicles from any requirement to obtain a certificate for dealing in those vehicles.
(h) A person who  receives no money, goods or services, either directly or indirectly, for dis-
playing a vehicle or acting as an agent in the buying or selling of a vehicle.
(i) A person who collects, purchases, acquires, trades or disposes of vehicles and vehicle  parts
for the person’s own use in order to preserve, restore and maintain vehicles for the  person’s own
use or for hobby or historical purposes.
(j) A manufactured structure dealer subject to  the licensing requirement of ORS 446.671 or a
person exempt from licensing  under ORS 446.676 when selling a vehicle, trailer or semitrailer ac-
cepted in trade as part of a manufactured structure  transaction. A manufactured structure dealer-
ship or exempt person may  not directly sell more than three vehicles per calendar year under
authority of this paragraph, but by consignment with a dealer certified under ORS 822.020 may  sell
an unlimited number of vehicles acquired as described in this paragraph.
(k) A lien claimant who sells vehicles in order to foreclose possessory liens.
(L) A lien claimant who, in a 12-month period, sells 12 or  fewer vehicles that the lien claimant
acquired through possessory liens if the vehicles  are sold at the business location of the lien
claimant.
(m) Electric personal assistive mobility devices.
(n) A tower that received title for a vehicle under ORS 822.235.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 822.005,  the following may participate with other dealers in a display
of vehicles,  including but not limited to an auto show, if the display is an event that lasts for 10 days
or less and is an event for which the public is charged admission:
(a) A person who is licensed as a vehicle dealer in another jurisdiction; or
(b) Any employee of a person who is licensed as a vehicle dealer in another jurisdiction.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 822.005, a  person who is licensed as a vehicle dealer in another juris-
diction or an employee of a person who is  certified or licensed as a vehicle dealer may participate
[14]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in a vehicle auction if the vehicle auction is:
(a) Conducted by a vehicle  dealer who holds a vehicle dealer certificate issued under ORS
822.020; and
(b) Open only to certified or licensed vehicle dealers or their employees.
(4) The [ department] board shall  adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section, including
but not limited to specifying which dealers may take vehicles on consignment  from other jurisdic-
tions.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 822.020 is amended to read:
822.020. (1)  Except as provided in ORS 822.022 and 822.035 (9), the [Department of
Transportation] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  shall issue a vehicle dealer certificate to any
person if the person meets all of the following requirements:
(a) The  person must complete the application for a dealer certificate described under ORS
822.025.
(b) The person must deliver to  the [ department] board a bond or letter of credit that meets the
requirements under ORS 822.030.
(c) The person must deliver to the [ department] board a certificate of insurance that meets the
requirements established by ORS 822.033.
(d) The person must pay the fee required under ORS 822.700  for issuance of a vehicle dealer
certificate.
(e) The person must certify  completion of the precertification education and test requirements
of ORS 822.027 (1)(a) if the person is a dealer subject to the education and test requirements.
(2) A vehicle dealer certificate issued or renewed under this section expires three years after
the date of issuance or renewal.
(3) A vehicle dealer certificate may be renewed if  the applicant for renewal does all of the fol-
lowing:
(a) Pays the required fee for renewal under ORS 822.700.
(b) Delivers to the [ department] board a bond that meets the requirements under ORS 822.030.
(c) Delivers to the  [ department] board a certificate of insurance that meets the requirements
under ORS 822.033.
(d) Provides the names of all partners or corporate officers.
(e) Certifies completion of the continuing education requirements of ORS 822.027 (1)(b)  if the
person is a dealer subject to the education requirements.
(f) If the dealer offers new recreational vehicles for sale under the certificate,  certifies that the
dealer maintains a recreational vehicle service facility as  listed in the dealer certificate application
described in ORS 822.025.
(4) If a civil penalty assessed under ORS 822.009 (1) and (3)  remains unpaid  after the date of
issuance of the final order, the [ department] board may refuse to issue  or renew a vehicle dealer
certificate under this  section, until the civil penalty is paid in full or until six years have passed
since the date of issuance of the final order, whichever occurs first.
(5) The [ department] board may adopt rules for the  issuance and renewal of vehicle dealer cer-
tificates under this section.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 822.022 is amended to read:
822.022. The [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle Industry  Board may not issue a
vehicle dealer certificate authorizing a person to deal exclusively in motorcycles, mopeds,  Class I
all-terrain vehicles or snowmobiles or any combination of those vehicles.
[15]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 28.
 ORS 822.025 is amended to read:
822.025. An application for a vehicle dealer certificate issued by the [ Department of Transporta-
tion] Oregon Vehicle Industry  Board under ORS 822.020 shall be in a form prescribed by the [ de-
partment] board and shall contain all of the following:
(1) The names and residence addresses of the persons applying, as follows:
(a) If the applicant is a firm or  partnership, the name of the firm or partnership with the names
and residence addresses of all members thereof.
(b) If the applicant is a corporation, the name of the  corporation with the names of the principal
officers and their residence addresses and  the name of the state under whose laws the corporation
is organized.
(2) The name under which the business will be conducted.
(3) The street address, including city and  county in Oregon, where the business will be con-
ducted.
(4) Whether or not used vehicles are handled.
(5) A certificate from the applicant showing that the  applicant will act as a vehicle dealer and
will conduct business at the location given on the application.
(6) A certificate signed by a person authorized by the  local governing body to do so, stating that
the location of the business as given in the application for a certificate complies with any land use
ordinances or business regulatory ordinances of the city  or county. The provisions of this subsection
do not apply to renewal of a vehicle dealer certificate under  ORS 822.020 unless the location of the
business is being changed at the time of renewal.
(7) Any information required by the Department of Transportation to efficiently administer  the
registration of vehicles [ and regulation of ].
(8) Any information required by the board  to regulate  dealers or other relevant information
required by the department  or board .
[(8)] (9) If the applicant is  a dealer subject to the education and test requirements under ORS
822.027 (1)(a), a certificate from the  provider of each precertification education program listing the
courses that the applicant has completed  and the tests that the applicant has passed in the precer-
tification education program.
[(9)] (10) If the applicant will offer  new recreational vehicles for sale, a certificate from the
applicant stating that the applicant will maintain a recreational vehicle service facility  at the street
address provided by the applicant pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 822.027 is amended to read:
822.027. (1) Except as provided in subsections  (2) and (3) of this section, the following education
requirements apply to an applicant for a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020:
(a) An applicant for a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020 must complete a minimum
of eight hours of courses  in any approved precertification education program described in subsection
(4) of this section and pass the tests required under paragraph (c) of this subsection within one  year
prior to submitting an application for the certificate;
(b) An applicant for a renewal certificate under ORS 822.020 must, for each  year of a certifica-
tion period, complete a minimum of four hours of courses in any approved continuing  education
program described in subsection (4) of  this section and pass the tests required under paragraph (c)
of this subsection prior to submitting an application  for the renewal certificate. An applicant may
not repeat a course in an approved continuing  education program for which the applicant previously
obtained credit within the same certification period; and
[16]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) For each course hour required under paragraphs (a)  and (b) of this subsection, the provider
shall administer a test and  the applicant must pass each test with a score of at least 70 percent in
order to receive credit for the course hour. Each test must contain at least 10 questions.
(2) The precertification education requirements in subsection (1)(a) of  this section do not apply
to an applicant for a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020 if, at the time of  application, the
applicant holds another certificate issued under ORS 822.020.
(3) The continuing education requirements of  subsection (1)(b) of this section do not apply to an
applicant for renewal of a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020 if the applicant is:
(a) A dealer having a  franchise in this state for nationally advertised and recognized motor ve-
hicles;
(b) A dealer having a franchise in this state for new recreational vehicles;
(c) A motor vehicle rental company having a national franchise  under the ownership of a cor-
poration that operates throughout the United States; or
(d) A national auction company that holds a  vehicle dealer certificate and a dismantler certif-
icate whose primary activity in this state is the sale or disposition of totaled vehicles.
(4) Precertification and continuing education programs and the tests required in  subsection (1)
of this section  may be developed by any motor vehicle industry organization including, but not lim-
ited to, the  Oregon Independent Auto Dealers Association. Each education program shall be sub-
mitted to the [ advisory committee established under ORS 802.370 ] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board
for approval every two years. The [ committee] board shall vote to approve or deny approval of each
program. A program that is approved must cover state and  federal law in at least the following
areas:
(a) Motor vehicle advertising;
(b) Odometer laws and regulations;
(c) Vehicle licensing and registration;
(d) Unlawful dealer activities;
(e) Environmental rules and regulations;
(f) Oregon and industry standard motor vehicle forms;
(g) Truthful lending practices;
(h) Motor vehicle financing;
(i) Service and warranty contracts; and
(j) Land use regulations governing motor vehicle dealers.
(5) Precertification and continuing education programs required in subsection  (1) of this section
may be provided by  accredited educational institutions, private vocational schools, correspondence
schools or trade  associations if the education programs have been approved by the [ advisory com-
mittee established under ORS 802.370 ] board as required in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The approval of an education program under subsection (4)  of this section expires two years
from the date of the approval.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 822.030 is amended to read:
822.030. (1) A bond or letter of credit required to qualify for a vehicle dealer certificate  under
ORS 822.020 must comply with all of the following:
(a) The bond shall have a corporate surety licensed to do business within  this state. A letter
of credit shall be  an irrevocable letter of credit issued by an insured institution, as defined in ORS
706.008. The surety or institution  shall notify the [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle
Industry Board if the bond or letter of credit is canceled for any reason.  The surety or institution
[17]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
shall continue  to be liable under the bond or letter of credit until the [ department] board receives
the notice required by this paragraph, or  until the cancellation date specified in the notice, which-
ever is later.
(b) The bond or letter of credit shall be executed to the State of Oregon.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the bond or letter of credit shall  be in the
following sum:
(A) If the person holds a certificate to be a dealer exclusively in motorcycles,  mopeds, Class I
all-terrain vehicles or snowmobiles or any combination of those vehicles, the bond or  letter of credit
shall be for $10,000.
(B) Except as provided in  subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, if the applicant is seeking a cer-
tificate to be a vehicle dealer, the bond or letter of  credit shall be for $50,000 for each year the
certificate is valid.
(d) The bond or letter of credit described in this  subsection shall be approved as to form by the
Attorney  General.
(e) The bond or letter of  credit must be conditioned that the person issued the certificate shall
conduct business as a vehicle dealer without fraud or fraudulent representation and  without violat-
ing any provisions of the vehicle code  relating to vehicle registration, vehicle permits, the transfer
or alteration of vehicles or the regulation of vehicle dealers.
(f) The bond or letter of credit must be filed and held in the office of the [ department] board.
(g) The vehicle dealer shall purchase a bond or letter of credit under  this subsection annually
on or before each anniversary of the issuance of the vehicle dealer’s certificate.
(2) Any person shall  have a right of action against a vehicle dealer, against the surety on the
vehicle dealer’s bond and against the letter of credit in the person’s own  name if the person suffers
any loss or damage by reason of the vehicle dealer’s fraud, fraudulent representations or  violations
of provisions of the vehicle code relating to:
(a) Vehicle registration;
(b) Vehicle permits;
(c) The transfer or alteration of vehicles; or
(d) The regulation of vehicle dealers.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of  this section, the maximum amount available under a bond
or letter of credit described in subsection (1)(c)(B) of  this section for the payment of claims to per-
sons other than retail customers of the dealer is $10,000.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a person other than a retail  customer of the
vehicle dealer may not make a claim  under subsection (2) of this section against the surety on the
vehicle dealer’s bond, or against the vehicle dealer’s letter of credit, if the vehicle dealer holds  a
vehicle  dealer  certificate to deal exclusively in motorcycles, mopeds, Class I all-terrain vehicles or
snowmobiles or any combination of those vehicles.
(5) If the certificate of a  vehicle dealer is not renewed or is voluntarily or involuntarily can-
celed, the sureties on the bond and the issuer of the letter of credit are relieved  from liability that
accrues after the [ department] board cancels the certificate.
SECTION 31.
 ORS 822.033 is amended to read:
822.033. A certificate  of insurance required to qualify for a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS
822.020 or to qualify for renewal of a certificate under ORS 822.020 must comply with all of the
following:
(1) The certificate shall:
[18]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Be issued by an insurance carrier licensed to do business within this state;
(b) Show that the dealer is insured by a policy that  provides the minimum limits of coverage
required under ORS 806.070;
(c) Show that the dealer is insured by a policy that provides for payment of  judgments of the
type described in ORS 806.040;
(d) Show that the dealer is insured by a policy covering  all vehicles manufactured, owned, op-
erated, used or maintained by or under the control of the dealer;
(e) Show that the dealer is insured by a policy that also covers all other persons  who, with the
consent of the dealer, use or operate vehicles manufactured, owned or maintained by or under the
control of the dealer;
(f) Be dated as of the date of the motor vehicle policy for which it is given;
(g) Contain the policy number; and
(h) Provide that the insurer shall give the  [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle In-
dustry Board  written notice of any cancellation of the  policy and that the insurer shall continue
to be  liable under the policy until the [ department] board receives the notice required by this par-
agraph or until the cancellation date specified in the notice, whichever is later.
(2) The certificate of insurance must be filed and held in the office of the [ department] board.
(3) A dealer is exempt from the  requirement to file the certificate of insurance described in this
section if the dealer certifies, in such form as may be required  by the [ department] board, that the
dealer will be dealing exclusively in one or more of the following:
(a) Antique vehicles issued permanent registration under ORS 805.010;
(b) Farm trailers;
(c) Farm tractors;
(d) Implements of husbandry; or
(e) Snowmobiles, Class I or Class III all-terrain vehicles.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 822.035 is amended to read:
822.035. The [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board :
(1) Upon receipt of an application for a vehicle dealer certificate, shall examine  the application
and may make an individual investigation relative to statements contained in the application.
(2) Upon being satisfied that an applicant is entitled to  a vehicle dealer certificate and that the
proper fees have been paid for the certificate, shall  assign the vehicle dealer a distinctive dealer
number that allows the dealer to conduct business under the  certificate and shall forward to the
dealer a vehicle dealer certificate stating thereon the dealer’s number.
(3) Has authority to determine whether or not an applicant for  a vehicle dealer certificate is a
vehicle  dealer.
(4) Has authority to make suitable rules for the issuance of  vehicle dealer certificates to expire
consistently with ORS 822.020.
(5) May make inspections  of any vehicle dealer records required under ORS 822.045 and of any
vehicles included in a vehicle dealer’s inventory or located on the vehicle dealer’s premises. In-
spections authorized by  this subsection may be conducted by the [ department] board at reasonable
intervals and may not exceed a scope of  inspection necessary for the [ department] board to deter-
mine the following:
(a) A vehicle dealer’s compliance with statutes regulating vehicle dealers under the  vehicle
code;
(b) A vehicle dealer’s compliance with those provisions of the vehicle code regulating the  titling
[19]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and registration of vehicles;
(c) A vehicle dealer’s compliance with rules adopted by the [ department] board relating to the
regulation of vehicle dealers [ and the registration and titling of vehicles ]; [ and]
(d) A vehicle  dealer’s compliance with rules adopted by the Department of Transportation
relating to the regulation of registration and titling of vehicles; and
[(d)] (e) The identification of stolen vehicles.
(6) May make inspections during the normal  business hours of the [ department] board , from
Monday through Friday.
(7) Shall provide a vehicle dealer with plates or devices authorized under ORS 805.200 to allow
the exercise of the privileges granted under ORS 822.040.
(8) May provide  a vehicle dealer with identification cards in the names of the owners of the
business or in the names of authorized employees of the business.
(9) May not issue a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020  to an applicant who has been
issued a similar certificate from another jurisdiction that has been revoked or is currently suspended
unless the applicant possesses a current, valid vehicle dealer certificate issued under ORS 822.020.
(10) May not use the revocation or suspension by another  jurisdiction of a vehicle dealer cer-
tificate or similar certificate as  a basis for refusing to allow a vehicle dealer holding a current, valid
vehicle dealer certificate issued under  ORS 822.020 to obtain a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS
822.020 or a supplemental certificate under ORS 822.040.
(11) May adopt any reasonable rules necessary for the administration of the laws  relating to the
regulation of vehicle dealers, the  issuance of vehicle dealer certificates, the issuance of vehicle
dealer identification cards, regulation  of vehicle dealers designated as agents under ORS 802.031 and
the issuance of vehicle dealer plates. The rules adopted under  this subsection must be consistent
with the statutory provisions of the vehicle code. The rules may  include, but are not limited to,
grounds and procedures for the revocation, denial, probation or  suspension of vehicle dealer certif-
icates or of a vehicle dealer’s designation to act as an agent of the [ department] board.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 822.040 is amended to read:
822.040. (1) The holder of a current, valid vehicle dealer certificate issued under  ORS 822.020
may exercise the following privileges under the certificate:
(a) Subject to ORS 822.045, a  dealer is authorized, without violating ORS 803.025 or 803.300, to
use and operate over and along  the highways of this state vehicles displaying the dealer’s plates
whether registered or not or whether or not a title is issued for the vehicle if the vehicle:
(A) Is owned or controlled by the dealer;
(B) Is used by the dealer,  members of the dealer’s firm, any salesperson thereof or any person
authorized by the dealer;
(C) Indicates it is offered for sale; and
(D) When offered for sale, is available for display during the vehicle  dealer’s normal business
hours.
(b) A dealer is entitled to receive dealer plates or devices and replacement  or additional dealer
plates or devices. As many additional dealer plates as may be desired may be obtained  upon the
filing of a formal application for additional  plates with the Department of Transportation. The plates
issued to dealers shall require the payment of fees as provided under ORS 805.250.
(c) The person is  not subject to the prohibitions and penalties under ORS 822.005 as long as the
holder’s vehicle dealer business is conducted in a location approved under the certificate.
(d) The dealer shall  be considered the owner of vehicles manufactured or dealt in by the dealer,
[20]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
before delivery and sale of the vehicles,  and of all vehicles in the dealer’s possession and operated
or driven by the dealer or the dealer’s employees.
(e) Notwithstanding ORS 825.474, in lieu of paying  the weight-mile tax imposed under ORS
825.474, the dealer may pay the fuel  taxes imposed under ORS 319.020 and 319.530, when the vehicle:
(A) Displays the dealer’s plates;
(B) Is actually owned or controlled by the dealer and in  actual use by the dealer, members of
the dealer’s firm, any salesperson of the dealer or any person authorized by the dealer;
(C) Is operated on the highway for the purpose of test driving the vehicle; and
(D) Is unloaded.
(2) The holder  of a vehicle dealer certificate may open additional places of business under the
same business name  by obtaining a supplemental certificate from the [ department] Oregon Vehicle
Industry Board under this subsection. The following all  apply to a supplemental certificate issued
under this subsection:
(a) The [ department] board may not issue  a supplemental certificate under this subsection if the
additional place of business opened will be operated under  a different business name than that in-
dicated on the current certificate. Any business that a vehicle dealer  operates under a separate
business name must be operated under a separate certificate and the dealer must  apply for and pay
the fees for a regular dealer certificate for the business.
(b) A supplemental certificate issued under this subsection is subject to the fee for  supplemental
certificate under ORS 822.700.
(3) The  holder of a vehicle dealer certificate may move a place of business or change a business
name by obtaining a corrected certificate  from the [ department] board. For purposes of this sub-
section, “place of business” includes a recreational vehicle service  facility as defined in ORS
822.082. The following apply to a corrected certificate issued under this subsection:
(a) The [ department] board shall prescribe the form for application for a corrected certificate.
(b) A person applying  for a corrected certificate shall pay the fee for the corrected certificate
established in ORS 822.700.
(4) The [ department] board may establish by rule  the requirements a holder of a vehicle dealer
certificate must meet to display a vehicle at a location other  than the dealer’s place of business for
the purpose of advertising without first obtaining a supplemental certificate from the [ department]
board. In addition to any requirements established  by the [ department] board by rule, all of the
following apply:
(a) The dealer must have a signed agreement with  the owner of the property or the person using
the property where the vehicle is  to be displayed stating that the vehicle is for an advertising pro-
motion only and that  the processing of any documents or other activities required to purchase a
vehicle must be done at the dealer’s place of business.
(b) The vehicle on display must be clearly  marked with the dealer’s name and contact informa-
tion and a notice that the vehicle  is displayed only for the purpose of advertising and may be pur-
chased only at the dealer’s place of business.
(c) Displaying the vehicle must not violate any zoning laws or ordinances.
(d) The dealer or the dealer’s employees may not remain with the vehicle  except for the purpose
of moving the vehicle in or out of the display area.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 822.045 is amended to read:
822.045. (1) A vehicle dealer improperly  conducts a vehicle dealer business and is subject to the
penalties under this section if the vehicle dealer commits any of the following offenses:
[21]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A vehicle dealer commits the offense of failure to  obtain a supplemental vehicle dealer cer-
tificate if the  vehicle dealer opens any additional place of business using the same business name
as a place of business approved under a vehicle dealer certificate without first obtaining a supple-
mental dealer certificate under ORS 822.040.
(b) A  vehicle dealer commits the offense of failure to obtain a corrected vehicle dealer certif-
icate if the  dealer moves a place of business or changes the business name without first obtaining
a corrected dealer certificate under ORS 822.040.
(c) A vehicle dealer  commits the offense of failure to maintain proper vehicle dealer records if
the dealer does not keep records or  books, whether maintained in paper or electronic form, with all
of the following information concerning any used  or secondhand vehicles or campers the dealer
deals with:
(A) A record of the purchase, sale or exchange or of the dealer’s receipt for purpose of sale.
(B) A description of the vehicle or camper.
(C) The name and address of the seller, the purchaser and the alleged owner or other  person
from whom the vehicle or camper was purchased or received or to whom it was sold or delivered.
(D) For motor vehicles, the vehicle  identification number and any other numbers or identifica-
tion marks as may be  thereon and a statement that a number has been obliterated, defaced or
changed, if such is a fact.
(E) For trailers and campers, the vehicle  identification number and any other numbers or iden-
tification marks as may be thereon.
(F) A duly assigned certificate of title or other primary ownership record or  a bill of sale from
the registered  owner of the vehicle or camper from the time of delivery to the dealer until the dealer
disposes of  the vehicle or camper. If title is issued for the vehicle in a form other than a certificate,
or if  the primary ownership record is in a form other than a document, a dealer shall keep records
in accordance  with rules adopted by the Department of Transportation for the purpose of complying
with this subparagraph.
(d) A vehicle dealer commits  the offense of failure to allow administrative inspection if the
dealer refuses to allow  the [ department] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  to conduct an inspection
under ORS 822.035 at any time during normal business hours.
(e) A vehicle dealer commits  the offense of failure to allow police inspection if the dealer refuses
to allow any police officer to conduct an inspection under ORS 810.480 at any time  during normal
business hours.
(f) A vehicle dealer commits the offense of illegal use of dealer vehicle  for hire if the dealer
allows any vehicle operated under vehicle dealer registration to  be loaned or rented with or without
driver for hire or direct compensation.
(g) A vehicle dealer commits the offense of improper use of dealer plates  or devices if the dealer
or employee of the dealer causes or permits the display or use of any special vehicle  dealer regis-
tration plate or device on any vehicle not owned or controlled by the dealer.
(h) A person commits the offense of improper display of  dealer plates if the person operates over
and along the highways of this state any unregistered vehicle owned or  controlled by the dealer and
any dealer plates  issued are not displayed in the manner provided in ORS 803.540 for the display
of registration plates.
(i) A vehicle dealer commits the offense of failure to  exhibit the dealer certificate if the dealer
fails to permanently exhibit the certificate  at the place of business of the person at all times while
the certificate is in force.
[22]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(j) Except  as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a vehicle dealer commits the offense of
failure to provide clear title if:
(A) Within 15 days of  transfer of any interest in a vehicle or camper to the dealer by a con-
sumer, the dealer fails to satisfy:
(i) The interest of any person from whom the dealer purchased  or obtained the vehicle or
camper;
(ii) The interest of any person from whom the person  described in sub-subparagraph (i) of this
subparagraph leased the vehicle or camper; and
(iii) All security interests in the vehicle or camper entered into prior to the time of transfer.
(B) Within 15 days of  receiving clear title to a vehicle or camper from another dealer, the pur-
chasing dealer fails to satisfy  the interest of the dealer from which the purchasing dealer received
the certificate of title or  other primary ownership document. For purposes of this subparagraph, a
purchasing dealer receives a certificate of title or other primary  ownership document from a dealer
on the date:
(i) The purchasing dealer or the Department of Transportation takes  physical possession of the
certificate or document; or
(ii) A written notice is mailed by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to  the
purchasing dealer from the dealer, stating that  the certificate or document is available to be picked
up at a place and time prearranged by both parties. The written notice must  be mailed to a business
address of the purchasing dealer that is on file with  the department. Service by mail under this
sub-subparagraph is effective on the date of mailing.
(k) Except as provided in subsection (3) of  this section, a vehicle dealer commits the offense of
failure to furnish certificate of title or application for title if, within 90 calendar days of  transfer
of any interest in a vehicle or camper by the dealer, the dealer has failed to:
(A) Furnish the certificate of title or other primary ownership record for the  vehicle or camper
and any release thereon  or, if title has been issued or is to be issued in a form other than a certif-
icate, any information or documents  required by rule of the department, to the security interest
holder next named, if any, otherwise to the lessor or, if none, to the purchaser; or
(B) Submit to the department in a manner that complies with any applicable  statutes and rules,
an application for title on behalf of the person  to whom the title is to be furnished or whose name
is to be shown on the title record.
(L) A vehicle dealer commits  the offense of failure to maintain bond or letter of credit coverage
if the dealer permits a bond or letter of credit to lapse during the period that the bond or letter  of
credit is required under ORS 822.020 or if the dealer fails to purchase  a bond or letter of credit
required by ORS 822.030.
(m) A person commits  the offense of acting as a vehicle dealer while under revocation, cancel-
lation or  suspension if the person conducts business as a vehicle dealer in this state and the person’s
vehicle dealer certificate is revoked, canceled or suspended, regardless of  whether the person is li-
censed as a vehicle dealer in another jurisdiction.  This paragraph does not apply if the person has
other current, valid dealer certificates issued in this state.
(n) A vehicle dealer commits the offense of improper  display of a vehicle for advertising pur-
poses if the dealer displays a vehicle at a location other than the dealer’s place of business  for the
purpose of advertising and the dealer does not comply with the provisions of ORS 822.040 (4).
(2) A  dealer is not considered to have committed the offense described in subsection (1)(j)(A) of
this section if the dealer fails to satisfy an interest in a vehicle or camper  that arises from an in-
[23]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ventory financing security interest for which the dealer is the debtor.
(3) A dealer  is not considered to have committed the offense described in subsection (1)(k) of this
section if the dealer demonstrates that:
(a) The dealer has made a good faith effort to comply; and
(b) The dealer’s inability to provide title is due to circumstances beyond the dealer’s control.
(4) The offenses described in this section are subject to the following penalties:
(a) The offense described in this section, failure to obtain a supplemental vehicle dealer certif-
icate, is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) The offense described in this section, failure to obtain  a corrected vehicle dealer certificate,
is a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) The offense described in this section, failure to  maintain proper vehicle dealer records, is a
Class A misdemeanor.
(d) The offense  described in this section, failure to allow administrative inspection, is a Class
A misdemeanor.
(e) The offense described  in this section, failure to allow police inspection, is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(f) The offense described in this section, illegal use of dealer vehicle for  hire, is a Class B traffic
violation.
(g) The offense described in this section, improper use  of dealer plates or devices, is a Class D
traffic violation.
(h) The offense described in this section, improper display of dealer plates, is a Class B traffic
violation.
(i) The offense described in this  section, failure to exhibit the dealer certificate, is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(j) The offense described in this section, failure to provide clear title, is a Class A misdemeanor.
(k) The offense described in this section, failure to furnish  certificate of title or application for
title, is a Class A misdemeanor.
(L) The offense  described in this section, failure to maintain bond or letter of credit coverage,
is a Class A misdemeanor.
(m) The offense described  in this section, acting as a vehicle dealer while under revocation,
cancellation or suspension, is a Class A misdemeanor.
(n) The offense described in this section, improper display of a vehicle  for advertising purposes,
is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 35.
 ORS 822.050 is amended to read:
822.050. (1) The [ Department of  Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  may revoke,
suspend or place on probation a vehicle dealer if the  [department] board determines at any time for
due cause that the dealer has done any of the following:
(a) Violated any grounds for revocation, suspension or probation adopted by  the [ department]
board by rule under ORS 822.035.
(b) Failed to comply with the requirements of the vehicle code with  reference to notices or re-
ports of the transfer of vehicles or campers.
(c) Caused or suffered or is  permitting the unlawful use of any certificate or registration plates.
(d) Violated or caused or permitted to be violated ORS 815.410, 815.415, 815.425 or 815.430.
(e) Falsely certified under ORS 822.033 that the dealer is  exempt from the requirement under
ORS 822.020 to file a certificate of insurance.
[24]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) Continued to fail to provide clear title or repeatedly failed to provide clear title in  violation
of ORS 822.045.
(g) Knowingly certified false information required  by the [ department] board on an application
for a vehicle dealer certificate, supplemental certificate or corrected certificate.
(h) Failed to pay a civil  penalty assessed under ORS 822.009  (1) and (3)  and the amount of
penalty was not paid within 10 days after the order becomes final.
(i) Displayed dealer plates on vehicles unless the vehicle was offered for sale.
(2) The [ department] board shall cancel a vehicle dealer certificate 45 days after receipt of  legal
notice that the bond described under ORS 822.030 is  canceled, unless the [ department] board re-
ceives proof from the vehicle dealer that the  dealer has obtained another bond. Between the day
that the [ department] board receives notice that the bond is canceled and the day the  vehicle dealer
presents proof of another bond, the vehicle dealer may not act as a vehicle dealer.
(3) The [ department] board shall cancel a vehicle dealer certificate 45 days  after receipt of no-
tice that the certificate of insurance  required under ORS 822.033 is canceled, unless the
[department] board receives proof from the vehicle dealer that the dealer has obtained another cer-
tificate  of  insurance. Between the day that the [ department] board receives notice that the certif-
icate of insurance is canceled and the  day the vehicle dealer presents proof of another certificate
of insurance, the vehicle dealer may not act as a vehicle dealer.
(4) The  [ department] board shall cancel a vehicle dealer certificate immediately upon receipt of
notice that zoning approval for the business has been revoked.
(5) Upon revocation, cancellation or  suspension of a vehicle dealer certificate under this section,
the [ department] board shall recall and demand the return of the certificate and  any vehicle dealer
plates issued.
SECTION 36.
 ORS 822.055 is amended to read:
822.055. (1) A person commits  the offense of failure to return a revoked, canceled or suspended
vehicle dealer certificate if the [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle  Industry Board
recalls and demands the person to return any certificate  or registration plates under ORS 822.050
and the person has those items requested and does  not return them to the [ department] board
without further demand.
(2) The offense described in  this section, failure to return revoked, canceled or suspended vehi-
cle dealer certificate, is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 37.  ORS 822.060 is amended to read:
822.060. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person who holds a vehicle
dealer certificate issued under  ORS 822.020 commits the offense of illegal consignment practices if
the person does any of the following:
(a) Takes a vehicle on consignment from a person who does not hold a vehicle dealer  certificate
issued under ORS 822.020, or who is not licensed as  a vehicle dealer in another jurisdiction, and
who does not have proof that the consignor is the registered owner, a security interest holder  or
lessor of the vehicle.
(b) Takes a vehicle  on consignment from a security interest holder without the security interest
holder first completing a repossession action  prior to consigning the vehicle and providing the
dealer with proper documentary proof of the repossession action.
(c) Takes a vehicle on  consignment and does not have the terms of the consignment agreement
in writing and provide a copy of the agreement to the consignor. The agreement shall  include a
provision stating that if the terms of  the agreement are not met, the consignor may file a complaint
[25]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in writing with the [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board , Salem, Oregon.
(d) Sells a  vehicle that the dealer has on consignment and does not pay the consignor within
10 days of the sale.
(e) Sells a vehicle that the dealer has on consignment and does not either  provide the purchaser
with a certificate of title to the vehicle or with other primary ownership records  in the form of
documents or apply  to the Department of Transportation  in the purchaser’s name for title to the
vehicle within 30 days of the sale in a manner provided by the department by rule.
(f) Does not allow the [ department] board or any duly authorized  representative to inspect and
audit any records  of any separate accounts into which the dealer deposits any funds received or
handled by the dealer or in the course of business as a dealer from consignment sale of vehicles at
such times as the [ department] board may direct.
(g) Takes any part of any money paid to the dealer in connection with  any consignment trans-
action as part or  all of the dealer’s commission or fee until the transaction has been completed or
terminated.
(h) Does not make arrangement  for the disposition of money from a consignment transaction
with the seller at the time of establishing a consignment agreement.
(i) Sells a vehicle that the dealer has taken on consignment without first giving the  purchaser
the following disclosure in writing:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
DISCLOSURE REGARDING
CONSIGNMENT SALE
 (Name of  Dealer) is selling the following described vehicle:
 (Year)  (Make)  (Model)  (Vehicle Identification Num-
ber) on consignment.
[ ] There is a security interest in this vehicle.
[ ] There is not a security interest in this vehicle.
YOU SHOULD TAKE ACTION TO ENSURE THAT ANY SECURITY INTERESTS  ARE RE-
LEASED AND  THAT THE TITLE TO THE VEHICLE IS TRANSFERRED TO YOU. OTHERWISE,
YOU MAY TAKE TITLE SUBJECT TO ANY UNSATISFIED SECURITY INTERESTS.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(2) The offense described in this section does not apply if the person takes  a vehicle on
consignment  from  an entity other than a retail customer and the person holds a vehicle dealer cer-
tificate issued under ORS 822.020 and operates a:
(a) Wholesale vehicle auction company; or
(b) National auction company whose primary activity in this state is the  sale or disposition of
totaled vehicles.
(3) The offense described in this section, illegal  consignment practices, is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(4) The [ department] board shall  adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section, including
but not limited to rules to specify which persons may take and sell vehicles on consignment and  to
[26]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
regulate the taking and selling of vehicles on consignment from other jurisdictions.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 822.080 is amended to read:
822.080. (1) Civil penalties under  ORS 822.009 (2) shall be imposed in the manner provided in
ORS 183.745.
(2) An application for a hearing on a civil penalty imposed under ORS 822.009  (2):
(a) Must be in writing;
(b) Must be postmarked or received  by the Department of Transportation within 20 days from
the date of service of the notice provided for in ORS 183.745;
(c) Must state the name and address of the person requesting a hearing; and
(d) Must state the action being contested.
(3) Hearings on civil penalties imposed under ORS 822.009  (2)  shall  be conducted by an admin-
istrative law judge  assigned from the Office of Administrative Hearings established under ORS
183.605.
(4) The department may, at its option, assign any unpaid civil penalty to  the Department of
Revenue for collection. The Department of  Revenue shall deduct reasonable expenses from any
amounts collected.
(5) All civil penalties  received under ORS 822.009 (2) shall be paid into the State Treasury each
month and credited to the Department  of Transportation Operating Fund established by ORS 184.642
(1) and (2).
SECTION 39.
Section 40 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of  the Oregon Ve-
hicle Code.
SECTION 40. (1) Civil penalties under ORS  822.009 (1) or (3) shall be imposed in the
manner provided in ORS 183.745.
(2) An application for a hearing on a civil penalty imposed under ORS 822.009 (1) or (3):
(a) Must be in writing;
(b) Must be postmarked or received by the Oregon Vehicle Industry Board within  20 days
from the date of service of the notice provided for in ORS 183.745;
(c) Must state the name and address of the person requesting a hearing; and
(d) Must state the action being contested.
(3) Hearings on civil penalties imposed under ORS 822.009 (1) or (3) shall  be conducted
by an administrative law judge assigned  from the Office of Administrative Hearings estab-
lished under ORS 183.605.
(4) The board may, at its option, assign any unpaid civil penalty to  the Department of
Revenue for collection. The department shall deduct reasonable expenses  from any amounts
collected.
(5) All civil penalties received under ORS 822.009 (1) or (3) shall  be paid into the State
Treasury each month and credited to the  Vehicle Industry Account established by section 6
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 822.083 is amended to read:
822.083. (1) As used in this section, “show” means a site where recreational  vehicles are tem-
porarily displayed and offered for sale. “Show” does not include a site  that is used to display rec-
reational vehicles for more than 10 days or that is  a place of business listed on a supplemental
certificate issued under ORS 822.040.
(2) A recreational vehicle dealer  may not participate in a show conducted at a site that is more
than 50 miles from the dealer’s  place of business listed in the dealer certificate application described
[27]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in ORS 822.025 unless the show includes a display  by at least two recreational vehicle dealers and
the dealer obtains a show license  from the [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle Industry
Board as described in ORS 822.084.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 822.084 is amended to read:
822.084. (1) A  person who organizes a show, as defined in ORS 822.083, shall apply to the [ De-
partment of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  at least 30 days prior to the com-
mencement of the show for a show license  for each recreational vehicle dealer participating in the
show. The application must include for each  dealer participating in the show the name under which
the business is being conducted and the street address, city and county of the dealer’s place of
business, both as listed in the dealer certificate application described in ORS 822.025.
(2) A person who receives a show license from the [ department] board shall pay the fee  for a
show license established under ORS 822.700.
(3) The [ department] board may adopt all rules necessary and  proper for the administration and
enforcement of ORS 822.082 to 822.084.
SECTION 43.
 ORS 822.093 is amended to read:
822.093. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 822.015  (1)(k) or (L), a lien claimant who sells or offers for sale
vehicles being sold to foreclose possessory liens, or sells or offers for sale  vehicles acquired through
possessory liens, shall keep records sufficient to establish that all vehicles being sold or offered  for
sale were acquired by the lien claimant as the result of a possessory lien. Records kept  in accord-
ance with this  subsection must be made available to the [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon
Vehicle Industry Board  on request.
(2) The [ department] board may adopt such  rules as are necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section, including but not limited to rules that:
(a) Specify the form in which the records must be kept, how the  records must be maintained and
the period for which they must be retained.
(b) Specify how the records will be provided to the [ department] board if requested.
(c) Specify how lien claimants will notify the [ department] board  when vehicles are sold to
foreclose possessory liens and when vehicles acquired through possessory liens are sold.
(3) Rules adopted under this section shall be developed in consultation  with representatives of
those lien claimants who may be affected by this section, including but not limited to towing busi-
ness operators.
(4) The [ department] board may impose a civil penalty, in an amount not to exceed $1,000 for
each violation, against any person who violates this section or any rules  adopted by the
[department] board under this section. Civil penalties shall be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
SECTION 44.
 ORS 822.100 is amended to read:
822.100. (1) A  person commits the offense of conducting a motor vehicle dismantling business
without a certificate if the  person performs any actions of a dismantler and is not the holder of a
valid, current dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110.
(2) The offense described in this section does not apply to persons or  vehicles exempted from
this section under ORS 822.105.
(3) The offense described in  this section, conducting a motor vehicle dismantling business with-
out a certificate, is a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) In addition to the penalty described in  subsection (3) of this section, the [ Department of
Transportation] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  may impose a  civil penalty of not more than
$5,000 on a person who conducts a motor vehicle dismantling business without  a certificate. A civil
[28]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
penalty under this subsection shall be imposed in the manner provided in ORS 183.745.
SECTION 45.
 ORS 822.110 is amended to read:
822.110. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the [ Department of Transporta-
tion] Oregon Vehicle Industry  Board shall issue a dismantler certificate to any person if the per-
son meets all of the following requirements:
(a) The person establishes that the area in which the business is  located and the place of busi-
ness to be approved under the dismantler certificate for use in the motor  vehicle dismantling busi-
ness are zoned for industrial use or subject to another zoning classification that permits the type
of business conducted by the dismantler.
(b) The person pays the fee required under ORS  822.700 for issuance of a dismantler certificate.
(c) The person completes the application for a dismantler certificate described under  ORS
822.115.
(d) The person delivers to the [ department] board any approvals by local governments required
under ORS 822.140.
(e) The person delivers to the [ department] board a bond or letter of credit that meets the re-
quirements of ORS 822.120.
(2) The [ department] board may refuse to issue a dismantler certificate to a person if:
(a) The person has  previously had a dismantler certificate or identification card revoked, can-
celed or suspended under ORS 822.145; or
(b) The [ department] board determines that the application contains  false or misleading infor-
mation.
(3) The [ department] board may issue a duplicate dismantler certificate to a person who  has lost
or destroyed an original dismantler certificate if the person:
(a) Has complied with the requirements of this section for issuance of a certificate; and
(b) Is within the renewal period of the original dismantler certificate.
SECTION 46.
 ORS 822.115 is amended to read:
822.115. An application for a dismantler certificate issued by the  [ Department of
Transportation] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  under ORS 822.110 or for renewal  of a certificate
under ORS 822.125 shall be in a  form prescribed by the [ department] board and shall contain all of
the following:
(1) A full statement of the name of  the person applying for the certificate with the person’s
residence and business addresses.
(2) If the applicant is a firm or partnership, the name of the firm or partnership, with the names
and places of residence of all its members.
(3) If the  applicant is a corporation, the names of the principal officers and their residences and
the name of the state under whose laws the corporation is organized.
(4) A description of the dimensions and the location of the place or places  at which the business
is to be carried on and conducted.
(5) The applicant’s National Motor Vehicle Title Information System identification number.
(6) A fire response plan that is approved by the [ department] board. If the plan is disapproved,
the applicant may revise the plan to comply  with requirements of the [ department] board and re-
submit the plan.
(7) A description of any applicable permits that are required by the  Department of Environ-
mental Quality.
(8) Any other relevant information required by the [ Department of Transportation ] board.
[29]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 47.
 ORS 822.125 is amended to read:
822.125. (1) The holder of a current, valid dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110 is not
subject to the  prohibitions and penalties under ORS 822.100 as long as the holder’s motor vehicle
dismantling business is conducted in the location approved under the certificate.
(2) The holder  of a dismantler certificate may expand the dimensions or move a place of business
approved under the dismantler  certificate or open an additional place of business under the certif-
icate upon issuance of  a supplemental dismantler certificate by the [ Department of Transportation ]
Oregon Vehicle Industry Board . The following apply  to supplemental certificates issued under this
subsection:
(a) The [ department] board shall grant  a supplemental certificate upon request of an applicant
under this subsection  if the applicant obtains local government permission for the supplemental
certificate under ORS 822.140.
(b) Upon application for renewal of the supplemental  certificate, the [ department] board may
waive the requirement that an applicant for renewal under this subsection obtain local  government
approval under ORS  822.140 of the suitability of the applicant to establish, maintain or operate a
motor vehicle dismantling business.
(c) A fee shall be charged for a supplemental dismantler certificate under ORS 822.700.
(3) A dismantler certificate is valid for a one-year period and may be  renewed as provided by
the [ department] board. The [ department] board shall only renew the  certificate of any certificate
holder who does all of the following:
(a) Pays the required fee for renewal under ORS 822.700.
(b) Completes the application described in ORS 822.115.
(c) Obtains local government approval  under ORS 822.140. The [ department] board may waive
the requirement that an applicant for renewal obtain local government approval  under ORS 822.140
of the suitability of the  applicant to establish, maintain or operate a motor vehicle dismantling
business.
(d) Maintains a current bond that meets the requirements under ORS 822.120.
(4) The [ department] board may provide the holder of a dismantler certificate with identification
cards in the  names of the owners of the business or in the names of authorized employees of the
business.
(5) The [ department] board may adopt suitable rules for the issuance and renewal of dismantler
certificates and identification cards.
SECTION 48.
 ORS 822.130 is amended to read:
822.130. (1) The [ Department of  Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  may inspect
the books, records and inventory of any business issued a certificate under  ORS 822.110 for the
purpose of determining compliance with any of the following:
(a) Those laws regulating the issuance of certificates to dismantlers.
(b) Requirements for records under ORS 822.135 and 822.137.
(c) ORS 802.200, 803.140, 819.010, 819.016, 819.030, 819.040 or 822.120.
(d) Rules adopted by  the [ department] board concerning businesses issued certificates under ORS
822.110.
(2) Except  as provided in subsection (4) of this section, each year the [ department] board shall
inspect the premises  used by any business issued a certificate under ORS 822.110 for the purpose
of determining whether  the items listed in subsection (3) of this section are on the premises and
determining compliance with any of the following:
[30]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Those laws regulating the issuance of certificates to dismantlers.
(b) Requirements for records under ORS 822.135 and 822.137.
(c) ORS 802.200, 803.140, 819.010, 819.016, 819.030, 819.040 or 822.120.
(d) Rules adopted by  the [ department] board concerning businesses issued certificates under ORS
822.110.
(3) If the [ Department of Transportation ] board determines that any of  the following items are
on the premises used by a business issued a certificate  under ORS 822.110, the [ Department of
Transportation] board shall  submit a report to the Department of Environmental Quality and include
information about the following:
(a) The presence of piled waste tires, as defined in ORS 459.705, in an amount greater  than 100
waste tires;
(b) If there is a metal shredder;
(c) If there are any open or unlabeled containers of automotive fluids; and
(d) If there is an underground injection control.
(4) The [ Department of Transportation ] board may inspect  a premises under subsection (2) of this
section every two years if the three  most recent, consecutive inspections show that the business is
in compliance with subsection (2)(a) to (d) of this section.
(5) Provisions for enforcing this section are established under ORS 822.135 and 822.145.
SECTION 49.
 ORS 822.133 is amended to read:
822.133. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Crushed motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle, the frame or unibody of which  is compacted
or flattened so that it no longer resembles any  particular year, model or make of motor vehicle and
is less than half of the motor vehicle’s original volume as measured in cubic feet.
(b) “Destroy” means to dismantle, disassemble, damage or substantially alter a motor vehicle:
(A) With the intent of rendering the vehicle permanently inoperable;
(B) To the extent that the cost  of repairing the vehicle exceeds the actual cash value of the
vehicle prior to the damage; or
(C) To the extent that the sum of the cost of repairing the vehicle and the  salvage value of the
vehicle in its damaged condition exceeds the  actual cash value of the vehicle in its repaired condi-
tion.
(c) “Mobile motor vehicle crusher” means a machine  that compacts or flattens a motor vehicle
into a crushed motor vehicle and is designed to be transported on a highway.
(d) “Wrecked vehicle” means a motor vehicle:
(A) That is destroyed, or is acquired with  the intent to destroy, and that will never be operated
as a motor vehicle; or
(B) That has sustained damage to an extent that the vehicle may not lawfully  be operated on
the highways of this state.
(2) In the operation of a motor vehicle dismantling business, a dismantler:
(a) Must physically separate or visually label a  wrecked vehicle in a manner that readily iden-
tifies the ownership status of the wrecked vehicle if the  dismantler takes possession of the wrecked
vehicle  without  immediately obtaining an ownership record or salvage title certificate. A dismantler
need not separate or visually identify a  wrecked vehicle pursuant to this subsection if the vehicle
is subject to an exemption under ORS 803.030 or is obtained from a jurisdiction that does not  issue
certificates of title.
(b) May not remove parts from or destroy a motor vehicle prior to obtaining an  ownership re-
[31]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cord or salvage title certificate for the vehicle.
(c) Must demolish the registration plates of  a wrecked vehicle at the time the ownership record
is received.
(d) Must  notify the [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  of any
changes in the information provided to the [ department] board in the application for a  dismantler
certificate within 30 days of the change.
(e) Must furnish a written report  to the [ department] board, in a form established by the [ de-
partment] board by rule, after a wrecked vehicle is dismantled or destroyed.
(f) Must, every year, have the premises  inspected by local fire inspectors and furnish a written
report to the [ department] board, in a form established by the [ department] board by rule, on the
findings of the inspection.
(g) Must be in  compliance with any agreement with, order of or program or process authorized
by the Department of Environmental Quality that governs the conduct of the dismantler.
(3)(a) A dismantler using a mobile motor vehicle crusher shall:
(A) Hold a current, valid dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110.
(B) Conspicuously display on the mobile motor vehicle crusher the name  of the dismantler’s
business as listed on the dismantler’s application submitted pursuant  to ORS 822.110 and the
dismantler certificate number issued by the [ Department of Transportation ] board.
(C) Comply with all of the applicable statutes and rules regulating dismantlers at each  location
where the dismantler uses the mobile  motor vehicle crusher. If the dismantler is using a mobile
motor vehicle crusher at a location approved under a dismantler certificate, the  dismantler who
holds the dismantler certificate for the location shall be responsible for complying with all  statutes
and rules regarding dismantlers.
(b) If a dismantler is using a mobile motor vehicle crusher at a temporary location for  15 con-
secutive  business  days or less, the dismantler is exempt from obtaining a supplemental dismantler
certificate under ORS 822.125 for the temporary location.
SECTION 50.
 ORS 822.135 is amended to read:
822.135. (1)  A person commits the offense of improperly conducting a motor vehicle dismantling
business if the person holds a dismantler  certificate issued under ORS 822.110 and the person does
any of the following:
(a) Fails to permanently exhibit a dismantler certificate at  a place of business of the person at
all times while the certificate is in force.
(b) Expands the dimensions of or moves any of the person’s places of business or opens any ad-
ditional places of business without obtaining a  supplemental dismantler certificate by the procedure
under ORS 822.125.
(c) Fails to maintain records at the person’s established place of business that record and de-
scribe the following:
(A) Every motor vehicle purchased, transferred, wrecked, dismantled, disassembled  or substan-
tially altered by the person;
(B) The name and address of the person to and from whom the vehicle was transferred;
(C) The vehicle identification number and other identification marks  or numbers on the vehicle;
and
(D) A statement indicating any  such numbers or marks that have been obliterated, defaced or
changed.
(d) Except as otherwise provided, fails to surrender to the Department of Transportation, within
[32]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
30 days  after the date the person acquires the title, a certificate of title or other primary ownership
document or ownership record for a motor vehicle. If  the vehicle is delivered to the person under
the provisions of  ORS 819.215 or 819.280, a copy of the notification to the department under ORS
819.215 or 819.280 is sufficient to comply with the provisions of this paragraph.
(e) Refuses, at any time, to allow a  police officer or an employee of the [ department] Oregon
Vehicle Industry Board  to inspect the books, records, inventory or  premises of the person’s motor
vehicle dismantling business.
(f) Fails to maintain, for  the purposes of the person’s motor vehicle dismantling business, a
building or an enclosure or other barrier  at least six feet in height that is constructed, established
or formed in compliance with rules adopted by the [ department] board.
(g) Fails to keep the premises on the outside of the establishment clear and clean at all times.
(h) Conducts any wrecking, dismantling or altering of vehicles  outside the building, enclosure
or barrier on the premises of the business.
(i) Stores or displays any motor vehicles or major component parts or conducts the motor vehi-
cle dismantling business outside of the building, enclosure or barrier of the place of business.
(j) Fails  to immediately file with the [ department] board, upon transfer of a wrecked or disman-
tled motor vehicle, the form furnished by the [ department] board to report the date  of transfer, a
description of the vehicle, the name and  address of the purchaser and other information respecting
the vehicle required by the [ department] board.
(k) Except as  otherwise provided in this paragraph, fails to keep the business hidden or ade-
quately screened by the terrain or other natural objects or by plantings, fences  or other appropriate
means so as not to be visible from the main traveled way of the highway in accordance with the
rules of the Director of Transportation. This paragraph does not apply to a business that is:
(A) Located in an area zoned for industrial use under authority of the laws of this state; or
(B) A business established before June 30, 1967.
(L) Expands or moves any place of business approved under a  dismantler certificate or opens
any additional locations  for the business without obtaining a supplemental certificate under ORS
822.125 or obtaining an additional dismantler certificate.
(m) Fails to allow the [ department] board to conduct inspections as provided under  ORS 822.130.
(n) Fails to deploy or remove any air bag containing sodium azide from a vehicle  before the
vehicle is wrecked or dismantled.
(o) Fails to ensure  that an air bag containing sodium azide that has been removed from a vehicle
is deployed within seven days of removal unless  the air bag is properly stored by a motor vehicle
dealer, automobile repair facility or dismantler certified under ORS 822.110.
(2) The offense described in this section, improperly  conducting a motor vehicle dismantling
business, is a:
(a) Class A misdemeanor if the person violates subsection (1)(a) to (m) of this section.
(b) Class D violation if the person violates subsection (1)(n) or (o) of this section.
(c) Class C misdemeanor, notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, if  the person violates
subsection  (1)(n)  or (o) of this section and the person has two or more previous convictions for vio-
lating subsection (1)(n) or (o) of this section.
SECTION 51.
 ORS 822.137 is amended to read:
822.137. (1) As used in this section,  “major component part” includes significant parts of a motor
vehicle such as engines, short blocks, frames,  transmissions, transfer cases, cabs, doors, differentials,
front or rear clips, quarter  panels, truck beds or boxes, hoods, bumpers, fenders, catalytic converters
[33]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and airbags. The [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  may by rule  des-
ignate other motor vehicle parts not specified  in this subsection as major component parts. “Major
component part” does not include cores  or parts of cores that require remanufacturing or that are
limited in value to that of scrap metal.
(2) In addition to any other penalty provided by  law, the [ department] board may impose on a
dismantler, in the  manner provided by ORS 183.745, a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 per violation
if the dismantler:
(a) Acquires a  motor vehicle or major component part without obtaining a certificate of sale
and, if applicable, a certificate of title.
(b) Acquires a catalytic converter or a component of a  catalytic converter, that has been re-
moved from a vehicle and is offered  for sale as an independent item, separate and distinct from a
vehicle acquisition, whether individually or as part of a bundle, bale or in other bulk form.
(c) Possesses, sells or  otherwise disposes of a motor vehicle or any part of a motor vehicle
knowing that the vehicle or part has been stolen.
(d) Sells, buys, receives,  conceals, possesses or disposes of a motor vehicle or any part of a
motor vehicle having a missing, defaced, intentionally altered or covered  vehicle identification
number, unless directed to do so by a law enforcement official.
(e) Commits forgery in the second  degree, as defined in ORS 165.007, or misstates a material fact
relating to a certificate of title, registration or other document related  to a motor vehicle that has
been reassembled from parts of other motor vehicles.
(f) Fraudulently obtains, creates or modifies a dismantler certificate.
(g) Fails to maintain records at the certified place of business for  three years from the date of
acquisition of a motor vehicle that describe and identify the vehicle, including:
(A) The certificate of title number;
(B) The state where the vehicle was last registered, if applicable;
(C) The number of the last registration plate issued and the state of issuance, if applicable;
(D) The year, make and model of the vehicle;
(E) The vehicle identification number;
(F) The date acquired;
(G) The vehicle, stock or yard number assigned to the vehicle by the dismantler; and
(H) Any other information required by the [ department] board.
(h) Fails to maintain records at the certified  place of business for three years from the date of
acquisition of a major component part that describe and identify the part, including:
(A) The physical characteristics of the part;
(B) The stock or yard number assigned to the part by the dismantler;
(C) The vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle from which the part came;
(D) Transaction documents  regarding the sale or disposal of a catalytic converter, including
documents that show the  transaction date, dollar amount, stock or yard number assigned to the
catalytic converter and the signatures of buyer and seller; and
(E) Any other information required by the [ department] board.
(i) Commits a dishonest act  or omission during the sale of a motor vehicle or major component
part that, as determined by the [ department] board, causes a loss to the purchaser.
(j) Is convicted of a crime involving false statements or dishonesty that  directly relates to the
business of the  dismantler or suffers any civil judgment imposed for conduct involving fraud, mis-
representation or conversion.
[34]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(k) Fails to comply with any provision of ORS 822.133.
SECTION 52.
 ORS 822.140 is amended to read:
822.140. (1) To meet the requirement  for local government approval of a dismantler certificate
under ORS 822.110 or a supplemental certificate under ORS 822.125, an applicant  must comply with
any regulations established by a city or county under this section  and must obtain the approval of
the governing body of the:
(a) City, if the business is or will be carried on within an incorporated  city of less than 100,000
population.
(b) County, if the business is or will be carried on outside of any incorporated city.
(2) A city or county governing body shall grant approval of a  dismantler certificate or renewal
when requested under this section if the governing body:
(a) Approves the applicant as being suitable to establish, maintain or operate  a motor vehicle
dismantling business;
(b) Determines that the  location or proposed location meets the requirements for location under
ORS 822.110;
(c) Determines that the location does not violate any prohibition under ORS 822.135; and
(d) Approves the location and  determines that the location complies with any regulations
adopted by a city or county under this section.
(3) The governing body of a city or county may regulate the expansion of premises  or the es-
tablishment of premises at a new location under a dismantler certificate. An applicant  must comply
with the regulations before the [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle Industry  Board
may issue a supplemental dismantler certificate. In adopting regulations  under this subsection, a
governing body:
(a) Shall consider the extent of development of surrounding property as a residential area;
(b) Shall  consider the proximity of churches, schools, hospitals, public buildings or other places
of public gathering;
(c) Shall consider the sufficiency in number of other motor vehicle dismantling businesses in  the
vicinity;
(d) Shall consider the health, safety and general welfare of the public;
(e) May establish zones in which motor vehicle dismantling businesses are  permissible and other
zones where they are prohibited; and
(f) May prescribe limitations on the dimensions of the premises on which motor  vehicle dis-
mantling businesses are conducted.
(4) Regulations of  a city governing body that are adopted under this section apply to motor ve-
hicle dismantling businesses located outside  of and within six miles of the boundaries of the city
unless the county governing body in which the area is  located has adopted regulations under this
section that are applicable in the area.
(5) Before granting  approval for a supplemental dismantler certificate, the governing body of a
city or county shall notify all property owners that are or that will  be adjacent to the motor vehicle
dismantling business once the business moves, expands or opens an additional place of business.
SECTION 53.
 ORS 822.145 is amended to read:
822.145. (1) In addition to any  other penalty provided by law, the [ Department of
Transportation] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  may impose sanctions on  any person holding a
dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110 or identification card or supplemental dismantler
certificate issued under ORS  822.125 including, but not limited to, probation or suspension, revoca-
[35]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion or cancellation of the dismantler certificate or identification card if the [ department] board
determines at any time for due cause that any of the following has occurred:
(a) The person holding the certificate has failed to comply  with any requirements for registra-
tion of vehicles under the vehicle code.
(b) The  person holding the certificate has violated ORS 803.140, 819.012, 819.016, 819.040,
822.120, 822.125, 822.133, 822.135, 822.137 or 822.150.
(c) The person holding the certificate has caused or suffered or is permitting  the unlawful use
of the dismantler certificate.
(d) The person holding the certificate has violated any regulation adopted under ORS 822.135.
(e) The person holding the certificate has failed to allow the  [ department] board to conduct in-
spections as provided under ORS 822.130.
(f) The person holding an identification card  has unlawfully used or permitted unlawful use of
the card.
(g) The person holding the certificate is convicted of an  offense under ORS 468.922, 468.926,
468.929, 468.931, 468.936, 468.939, 468.943 or 468.946.
(2) The [ department] board shall cancel or suspend any dismantler certificate immediately:
(a) Upon receipt of legal notice that the bond described under ORS 822.120 is canceled; or
(b) For failure to pay any penalty imposed under ORS 822.135 or 822.137.
(3) Upon revocation, cancellation  or suspension of a dismantler certificate or identification card
under this section, the [ department] board shall recall and demand  the return of the certificate or
identification card.
(4) If the  [ department] board has reason to believe that a person has engaged in or is engaging
in any  activity prohibited under ORS 822.100, the [ department] board may issue an order directed
at the person to cease the activity.
(5) The [ department] board shall adopt rules establishing sanctions authorized by subsection (1)
of this section.
SECTION 54.
 ORS 822.150 is amended to read:
822.150. (1) A person commits the offense of failure to return a  revoked, canceled or suspended
dismantler certificate or identification card if the  [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle
Industry Board recalls and demands the person to return  a certificate or card under ORS 822.145
and the person does not return the certificate or card to the [ department] board.
(2) The offense described in this section, failure to return a revoked, canceled or suspended
dismantler certificate or identification card, is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 55.  ORS 822.705 is amended to read:
822.705. Each person holding or applying for a current vehicle dealer certificate  shall pay a fee
of $75 to the [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  upon application for
issuance or renewal of a certificate. Moneys from  the fee are continuously appropriated to the [ de-
partment] board for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS  822.007[,] and 822.009 (1) and
(3) and [ 822.080] section 40 of this 2025 Act . The fee imposed under this section is  in addition to
fees under ORS 822.700 for issuance and renewal of a vehicle dealer certificate.
SECTION 56.  ORS 822.992 is amended to read:
822.992. (1) The [ Department of Transportation ] Oregon Vehicle Industry Board  may levy a
civil penalty on, and collect the civil penalty from, any person holding a dismantler certificate issued
under ORS 822.110 or identification card or supplemental dismantler certificate issued  under ORS
822.125 in an amount not  to exceed $1,000 for each violation if the person holding the certificate
[36]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
has violated ORS 803.140, 819.012, 819.016, 819.040, 822.120, 822.125, 822.130, 822.135 or 822.150.
(2) The [ department] board shall impose civil penalties under this section in the manner provided
in ORS 183.745.
REPEAL OF OREGON DEALER ADVISORY COMMITTEE
SECTION 57.
ORS 802.370 is repealed.
SECTION 58. The amendments to ORS 802.348  and 822.027 by sections 20, 21 and 29 of this
2025 Act and the repeal of 802.370 by section 57 of this 2025 Act become operative  on January
1, 2028.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 59. (1) Sections 1  to 14 and 40 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to statutes
by sections 15 to 19, 22 to 28, 30 to  38 and 41 to 56 of this 2025 Act become operative on
January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Vehicle Industry Board, the Director of  the Oregon Vehicle Industry
Board, the  Department of Transportation and the Director of Transportation may take any
action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section that is necessary
to enable the Oregon Vehicle Industry Board, the Director of the Oregon Vehicle Industry
Board, the Department of Transportation and the Director of  Transportation to exercise, on
and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on  the board, the department and directors by sections 1 to
14 and 40 of this 2025 Act  and the amendments to statutes by sections 15 to 19, 22 to 28, 30
to 38 and 41 to 56 of this 2025 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 60. The unit and section captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory  law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 61. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[37]