Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $23,500,000, which may be expended  for the
purpose of funding county victim assistance  programs in accordance with the distribution
schedule set forth in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall distribute the
amount appropriated to the department under section 1 of this 2023  Act in accordance with
the following schedule:
(a) For every two full-time equivalent prosecuting  attorneys serving in a county district
attorney office, the department shall distribute an amount sufficient to fund one victim  as-
sistance advocate position in the county district attorney office; or
(b) If only one prosecuting attorney serves in  the county district attorney office, the
department shall distribute an amount sufficient to fund one victim assistance advocate.
(2) Amounts  distributed under this section shall be equal biennial amounts for each full-
time equivalent victim assistance advocate being funded.
(3) Amounts that are unexpended as of June 30, 2023, shall revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 932