Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A state flag is an official state flag only if:
(a) The flag is manufactured of flame retardant materials; and
(b) The flag conforms with the design and official colors under ORS 186.010.
(2) A United  States flag that is manufactured of flame retardant materials is an official
United States flag.
(3) The  person or body responsible for displaying upon or near each public building the
Oregon State flag with the United States flag under ORS 186.110 or 339.875 shall:
(a) Procure an official state flag as described in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) Procure an official United States flag as  described in subsection (2) of this section;
and
(c) Transition from displaying flags manufactured of flammable  materials to flags man-
ufactured of flame retardant materials by July 4, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1864