Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 285B.420 is amended to read:
285B.420. (1) The Oregon Infrastructure Finance Authority may  provide financial assistance in
the form of loans or grants for a levee project to:
[(a) Drainage districts organized under ORS chapter 547; ]
(a) Municipalities;
(b) Corporations or companies for drainage  or flood control organized under ORS chapter 554;
and
(c) For-profit or nonprofit  entities and individuals engaged in the ownership, construction, in-
spection, accreditation, certification or repair of levees.
(2) To qualify for financial assistance under  this section, the [ district] municipality, corporation,
company, entity  or individual must demonstrate, and the authority must find, that the levee project
substantially contributes  to the improvement, expansion or repair of the state’s or a municipality’s
infrastructure system and is essential for the use or development  of farm, industrial or commercial
land in Oregon.
(3) Levee  projects that receive financial assistance under this section are subject to the pro-
visions and requirements of ORS 285B.410 to 285B.482, if applicable.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 285B.420  by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to fi-
nancial assistance provided under ORS 285B.420 before, on or after the effective date of  this
2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4964