Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.423 is amended to read:
336.423. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Entree” means a food that is  generally regarded as being the primary food in a meal and
includes, but is not limited to, sandwiches, burritos, pasta and pizza.
(b) “Snack” means a food that is generally regarded as supplementing  a meal and includes, but
is not limited to, chips, crackers, onion rings,  nachos, french fries, doughnuts, cookies, pastries,
cinnamon rolls and candy.
(2) Except as provided in subsection [ (6)] (7) of this section, all food  and beverage items sold to
students in a public kindergarten through grade  12 school must at a minimum meet the standards
required by this section.
(3) A food or beverage item sold to students in a school during  the times described in
subsection (6)(a) of this section may not contain:
(a) The  federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act’s Red Number 3 (American Chemical So-
ciety Registry Number 16423-68-0);
(b) Potassium bromate; or
(c) Propylparaben.
[(3)] (4) The following shall apply to all  food sold to students in a school during the times de-
scribed in subsection [ (5)(a)] (6)(a) of this section:
(a) A snack item may be sold only in a single-serving size and:
(A) May not have more than 35 percent of the total calories from fat. This  requirement does not
apply to snack items that are legumes, nuts, nut butters, seeds,  seed butters, eggs, nonfried vegeta-
bles and cheese.
(B) May  not have more than 10 percent of the total calories from saturated fat. This requirement
does not apply to snack items that are nuts, nut butters, seeds, seed butters, eggs and cheese.
(C) May not contain more than 35 percent sugar by  weight. This requirement does not apply
to fruit and vegetables.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1728
HB 3015
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) May not contain more than 0.5 grams of trans fat per serving.
(E) May not contain more than 150 total calories if sold in a school in which  the highest grade
level in the school is grade 5 or less.
(F) May not contain more than 180 total calories if sold in a school in which the highest  grade
level in the school is grade 6, 7 or 8.
(G) May not contain more than 200 total calories if sold in a school  in which the highest grade
level in the school is grade 9, 10, 11 or 12.
(b) An entree item that is sold individually:
(A) May not contain more than four grams of fat per 100 calories.
(B) May not contain more than 450 total calories.
[(4)] (5) The following shall apply to all beverages sold to students in a  school during the times
described in subsection [ (5)(a)] (6)(a) of this section:
(a) If the beverage is  sold in a school in which the highest grade level in the school is grade 5
or less, the beverage may not contain caffeine and may be only:
(A) Water.
(B) Fruit or vegetable juice, provided the beverage  item is not more than eight ounces, is 100
percent juice or 100  percent juice diluted with water, has no added sweeteners and contains no more
than 120 calories per eight ounces.
(C) Milk or a nutritionally equivalent milk alternative, provided the  beverage item is not more
than eight ounces, is fat  free or low fat and, if flavored, contains no more than 150 calories per eight
ounces.
(b) If the beverage is sold  in a school in which the highest grade level in the school is grade
6, 7 or 8, the beverage may not contain caffeine and may be only:
(A) Water.
(B) Fruit or  vegetable juice, provided the beverage item is not more than 10 ounces, is 100
percent juice or 100  percent juice diluted with water, has no added sweeteners and contains no more
than 120 calories per eight ounces.
(C) Milk or a nutritionally equivalent  milk alternative, provided the beverage item is not more
than 10 ounces, is fat free or low  fat and, if flavored, contains no more than 150 calories per eight
ounces.
(c) If the beverage is  sold in a school in which the highest grade level in the school is grade
9, 10, 11 or 12, the beverage may be only:
(A) Water.
(B) Flavored water, provided the beverage item is  not more than 20 ounces and contains no
calories.
(C) Fruit or vegetable juice, provided the beverage item is not more than 12 ounces,  is 100
percent juice or 100  percent juice diluted with water, has no added sweeteners and contains no more
than 120 calories per eight ounces.
(D) Milk or a nutritionally equivalent milk alternative,  provided the beverage item is not more
than 12 ounces, is fat free or low fat and, if flavored, contains  no more than 150 calories per eight
ounces.
(E) A beverage item that is not more than 20 ounces and contains no more than 0.5 calories per
ounce.
(F) A beverage item that is not more than 12 ounces and contains no more  than five calories
per ounce.
[2]
HB 3015
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
[(5)(a)] (6)(a) The  standards required by this section apply to food and beverage items sold to
students in a school at all times during the  regular or extended school day when the activities in
the school are primarily under the control of the school district board. This  includes, but is not
limited to, the time before or after classes are in session and the time when  the school is being used
for activities such  as clubs, yearbook, band or choir practice, student government, drama rehearsals
or child care programs.
(b) The standards required by this section do not apply  to food and beverage items sold in a
school at times when the school is being used for school-related  events or nonschool-related events
for which parents and other adults are a significant  part of an audience or are selling food or
beverage items before, during or after the event, such as a sporting event or another  interscholastic
activity, a play or a band or choir concert.
[(6)] (7) The standards required by this section do not apply to:
(a) Food and beverage items  sold as a meal in a school as part of the United States Department
of Agriculture’s National School Lunch Program or School Breakfast Program; or
(b) Entree items that:
(A) At a minimum, meet the standards of the federal programs identified in paragraph (a) of  this
subsection;
(B) Are sold individually in portions  allowed under the federal programs identified in paragraph
(a) of this subsection; and
(C) Are sold not later than one day after items that  are part of a federal program identified in
paragraph (a) of this subsection are sold.
[(7)] (8) A school district board may adopt standards  that are more restrictive than the stan-
dards specified by this section.
[(8)] (9) Each school year, a school district board shall determine whether the school  district is
in compliance with the  standards required by this section and report the results of that determi-
nation to the Department of Education. The department may monitor whether school  districts are
in compliance with the standards required by this section.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on July 1, 2027.
[3]