Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 646A.092 is amended to read:
646A.092. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Advertisement” means any public  notice or announcement of a motor vehicle for sale or
lease.
(b) “Motor vehicle” has the  meaning given that term in ORS 801.360, except that “motor
vehicle” does not include commercial  vehicles, as defined in ORS 801.210, or commercial motor ve-
hicles, as defined in ORS 801.208.
(c) “Seller” means a person that is engaged in the business of selling  or leasing motor vehicles.
(d) “Trade  publication” means a motor vehicle price guide that is nationally recognized and
distributed.
(2) An advertisement for the sale or  lease of a motor vehicle may not claim that a seller will
value property being offered in exchange for payment toward the motor vehicle:
(a) At a specific amount;
(b) Within a range of specified amounts;
(c) At a guaranteed minimum amount; or
(d) As a multiple of or an increase in trade-in allowance.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to an advertisement  for a used motor vehicle
that:
(a) References a value cited in a trade publication that is not published by the seller and that
is readily accessible by the public;
(b) Clearly and conspicuously discloses the name of the trade publication being referenced;
(c) Clearly and conspicuously includes the following disclaimer in at least 10-point  bold type:
“THE VALUE OF USED MOTOR VEHICLES VARIES WITH MILEAGE, USAGE,  INCLUDED
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2799
HB 3177
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
ACCESSORIES AND CONDITION. BOOK VALUES SHOULD  BE CONSIDERED ESTIMATES
ONLY.”; and
(d) If the publisher  of the trade publication publishes and distributes separate issues for specific
geographic regions, references the value cited for the geographic  region in which the motor vehicle
is being offered for sale.
(4) A seller may not publish an advertisement or otherwise  offer a used motor vehicle for
sale or lease until after the seller has:
(a) Checked the motor vehicle’s vehicle identification number  against the list of vehicle
identification numbers in the federal National Highway Traffic Safety Administration’s online
safety recall database; and
(b) Repaired or replaced,  or had repaired or replaced, all parts of the motor vehicle that
are subject to any applicable safety recall notice.
(5) A violation of this section is an unlawful practice under ORS 646.608.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 646A.092 by  section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to ad-
vertisements or offers to sell or lease a motor vehicle that a seller publishes or  makes on
or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]