Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As  used in this section, “radio tower” means a lattice tower that is
generally 60 to 200 feet tall with three or four steel support legs, or a monopole that is gen-
erally 25 to 125 feet tall, to which multiple antennae or other equipment may be attached to
accommodate a variety of communication services, including radio communications service,
radio paging and cellular communications service.
(2) A person who owns or operates a radio tower  shall maintain an emergency backup
power system that can provide emergency backup power for the radio tower for at  least 14
days. The emergency backup power system must be able  to operate in the event of a natural
disaster or inclement weather.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3669