Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 132.586 is amended to read:
132.586. (1) As used in this section, “domestic violence” has  the meaning given that term in ORS
135.230.
(2) When a crime involves domestic violence, the  accusatory instrument may plead, and the
prosecution may prove at trial,  that the crime involved  domestic violence [ as an element of  the
crime]. When a crime is so pleaded, the words  “constituting domestic violence” may be added to the
title of the crime.
(3) An admission or finding that a crime involved domestic violence is not an  additional
element of the offense for purposes of ORS 161.067 (1).
SECTION 2.  ORS 163.160 is amended to read:
163.160. (1) A person commits the crime of assault in the fourth degree if the person:
(a) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes physical injury to another;
(b) With criminal negligence causes physical injury to another  by means of a deadly weapon;
or
(c) With criminal negligence causes serious physical injury to another who is a  vulnerable user
of a public way, as defined in ORS 801.608, by means of a motor vehicle.
(2) Assault in the fourth degree is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, assault in the fourth degree  under subsection
(1)(a) or (b) of this  section is a Class C felony if the person commits the crime of assault in the
fourth degree and:
(a) The assault is committed in the immediate presence of, or is  witnessed by, the person’s or
the victim’s minor child or stepchild  or a minor child residing within the household of the person
or victim;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1467
SB 617
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The person has been previously convicted of violating this section or ORS 163.165, 163.175,
163.185, 163.187 or  163.190, or of committing an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction, and the
victim in the previous conviction is the same person who is the victim of the current crime;
(c) The person has at least three previous convictions for  violating this section or ORS 163.165,
163.175, 163.185, 163.187 or 163.190 or for  committing an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction, in
any combination; or
(d) The person commits the assault knowing that the victim is pregnant.
(4) If a person is convicted of misdemeanor assault in the fourth degree  constituting domestic
violence  [ as an element of the crime ] as described ORS 132.586, the court shall ensure that the
judgment document reflects that the conviction constitutes domestic violence.
(5) For purposes of  subsection (3) of this section, an assault is witnessed if the assault is seen
or directly perceived in any other manner by the child.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 163.190 is amended to read:
163.190. (1) A person commits the crime of menacing if  by word or conduct the person inten-
tionally attempts to place another person in fear of imminent serious physical injury.
(2) Menacing is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) If a person is convicted of menacing constituting domestic violence [ as an  element of the
crime] as described ORS 132.586, the court  shall ensure that the judgment document reflects that the
conviction constitutes domestic violence.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 161.295 is amended to read:
161.295. (1) A person is guilty  except for insanity if, [ as a result of a qualifying mental
disorder] at the time of engaging in criminal  conduct, the person lacks substantial capacity either
to appreciate the criminality of the conduct or  to conform the conduct to the requirements of law ,
and the incapacity is primarily the result of a qualifying mental disorder .
(2) As used in chapter 743, Oregon  Laws 1971, the term “qualifying mental disorder” does not
include an abnormality manifested only by repeated  criminal or otherwise antisocial conduct, nor
does the term include any abnormality constituting solely a personality disorder.
SECTION 5. Section 6 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 163.665 to
163.693.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding ORS 163.665, as  used in ORS 163.670, 163.684, 163.686 and
163.687, “sexually explicit conduct” includes the exhibition or display  of the sexual or other
intimate parts of a child when the child is being observed or recorded for the specific  intent
of arousing the sexual desire of the observer or recorder, regardless of  whether the child
knows that the child is being observed or recorded.
SECTION 7.  ORS 163.701 is amended to read:
163.701. (1) Except as provided in ORS 163.702, a person commits the crime of invasion of  per-
sonal privacy in the first degree if:
(a)(A) The person knowingly makes or records a photograph,  motion picture, videotape or other
visual recording of another person in a state  of nudity without the consent of the other person; and
(B) At the time the visual recording is made or recorded the person being recorded is  in a place
and circumstances where the person has a reasonable expectation of personal privacy; or
(b) The person violates ORS 163.700 and, at the time of the offense, has a prior conviction for:
(A) Invasion of personal privacy in any degree, public indecency,  private indecency or a sex
crime as defined in ORS 163A.005; or
(B) The statutory counterpart of an offense described in subparagraph (A) of  this paragraph in
[2]
SB 617
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
another jurisdiction.
(2)(a) Invasion of personal privacy in the first degree is a Class C felony.
(b) The Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission shall classify invasion of personal privacy in the
first degree as :
(A) Crime category 6 of the sentencing guidelines grid of the commission.
(B) Crime category 8 of the sentencing guidelines  grid of the commission, if the person
whose privacy is invaded is under 18 years of age.
(3) The  court may designate invasion of personal privacy in the first degree as a sex crime under
ORS 163A.005 if the court finds that the circumstances of  the offense require the defendant to reg-
ister and report as a sex offender for the safety of the community.
SECTION 8.
Section 6 of this 2025 Act and  the amendments to ORS 132.586, 161.295,
163.160, 163.190 and 163.701 by sections 1 to 4 and 7 of this 2025 Act apply to conduct occur-
ring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[3]