Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 13, chapter 119, Oregon Laws 2005, as amended by  section 4, chapter 507,
Oregon Laws 2015, and section 14, chapter 326, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  (1)  The Housing and Community Services Department may not issue a certification
under ORS 307.841 to 307.867 on or after January 1, 2018.
(2) A city or county may  not issue a certification under ORS 307.841 to 307.867 on or after
January 1, [ 2026] 2032.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2119