Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Water Resources Department shall study the socioeconomic impacts
of the removal of the Klamath River dams.
(2) The department shall submit a report on the study in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any contrary provision  of law, a person may not remove a
dam that is subject to  ORS 540.443 to 540.491 until after the Water Resources Department
has submitted the report described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4399