Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Judicial Department shall study the establishment of the Central
Violations Bureau under ORS 153.806.
(2) The department shall provide  the results of the study, including any recommended
legislative changes, in a report to the appropriate interim committees of the  Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than December 31, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3110