Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 7, chapter 708, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by  section 27, chapter 820,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 31, chapter 442, Oregon Laws  2017, section 1, chapter 488, Oregon Laws
2017, and section 1, chapter 430, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  (1) As used in this section and ORS 163A.200 to 163A.210:
(a) “Event triggering the obligation to make an initial report” has the meaning given  that term
in ORS 163A.110.
(b) “Existing registrant” means  a person for whom the event triggering the obligation to make
an initial report under ORS 163A.010 (3)(a)(A), 163A.015 (4)(a)(A) or  163A.020 (1)(a)(A), (2)(a)(A) or
(3)(a)(A) occurs before January 1, 2014.
(2)(a) [ No later than December 1, 2026, ] The State  Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision
shall classify existing registrants in one of the levels described  in ORS 163A.100. The Department
of State Police shall enter the  results of the classifications described in this section into the Law
Enforcement Data System within a reasonable time after receipt.
(b) The  board shall classify an existing registrant as a level three sex offender under ORS
163A.100 (3), if:
(A) The person was previously designated a predatory sex offender and  the designation was
made after the person was afforded notice and an opportunity to be heard  as to all factual questions
at a meaningful time and in a meaningful manner; or
(B) The person is a sexually violent dangerous offender under ORS 137.765.
(c) The Psychiatric Security Review Board  may complete the risk assessment of an existing
registrant who is under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric Security Review  Board, regardless of
whether the  person has been found guilty except for insanity of a sex crime or was previously con-
victed of a sex crime, if the State Board  of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision and the Psychiatric
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 359
SB 821
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Security Review Board mutually agree that the Psychiatric  Security Review Board has adequate
resources to perform the assessment and that the performance of the assessment  by the Psychiatric
Security Review Board would assist in classifying the existing registrant in a more timely manner.
(3) As soon as practicable  following the classification of an existing registrant under this sec-
tion, the classifying board shall notify the person of the classification by mail.
(4)(a) An existing registrant who seeks  review of a classification made under this section as a
level two  or level three sex offender as described in ORS 163A.100 may petition the classifying board
for review.  The petition may be filed no later than 60 days after the board provides the notice de-
scribed in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Upon receipt of a petition described in this subsection,  the classifying board shall afford the
person an opportunity to be heard as to all factual questions related to the classification.
(c) After providing the person with notice and an opportunity to  be heard in accordance with
this subsection, the board shall classify the person  in accordance with the classifications described
in ORS 163A.100, based on all of the information available to the classifying board.
(5) The boards shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
[(6) An existing  registrant may not petition for reclassification or relief from the obligation to re-
port as a sex offender as provided in ORS  163A.125 until either all existing registrants have been
classified in one of the  levels described in ORS 163A.100 or December 1, 2018, whichever occurs
first.]
[(7) Notwithstanding ORS 163A.225 or any other provision of law, the Department of  State Police
may until December 1, 2018, continue to use the Internet to  make information available to the public
concerning any adult  sex offender designated as predatory as authorized by the law in effect on De-
cember 31, 2013. ]
[(8)(a)] (6)(a) If the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision  or the Psychiatric Secu-
rity Review Board does not  classify an existing registrant under ORS 163A.100 because the person
has failed or refused to participate in a  sex offender risk assessment as directed by the State Board
of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or the  Psychiatric Security Review Board, the appropriate
board shall classify the person as a level three sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (3).
(b) If an existing registrant classified as a level three sex offender under this subsection notifies
the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or the Psychiatric Security  Review Board of
the willingness to participate in a sex  offender risk assessment, the appropriate board shall perform
the assessment and classify the existing registrant in one of the levels described in ORS 163A.100.
[(9)] (7) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or the  Psychiatric Security Re-
view Board may reassess or  reclassify an existing registrant placed in one of the levels described
in ORS 163A.100 under this section if the classifying board determines  that a factual mistake caused
an erroneous assessment or classification.
SECTION 2.
 Section 2, chapter 430, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  [ Beginning February 1, 2021, and biennially thereafter, ] The State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision shall  biennially report to the  Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided
in ORS 192.245, on:
(1) The progress made in assessing and classifying existing  registrants as defined in section 7,
chapter 708, Oregon Laws 2013, and other sex offenders the board is directed  to assess and classify
under ORS 163A.105, 163A.110 and 163A.115; and
(2) Efforts to reduce the cost and increase the efficiency and accuracy of the assessments.
SECTION 3.
Section 22, chapter 430, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
[2]
SB 821
1
[3]