Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 181A.702 is amended to read:
181A.702. (1) A law enforcement officer who is on duty  and assigned to work crowd management
in a city with a population of over [ 60,000] 5,000 shall have:
(a) The officer’s first initial and last name, or a unique  identifier assigned by the officer’s law
enforcement agency, affixed to the front of the officer’s uniform;
(b) The officer’s first initial and last  name, or a unique identifier assigned by the officer’s law
enforcement agency, affixed to the back of the officer’s uniform;
(c) If wearing a tactical helmet and assigned a unique identifier by  the officer’s law enforcement
agency, the unique identifier affixed to the back of the officer’s helmet;
(d) The name of the jurisdiction of the officer’s law enforcement agency  and the word
“POLICE,” “SHERIFF” or “TROOPER” on the front and back of the officer’s uniform; and
(e) A patch signifying the officer’s law enforcement agency affixed to one shoulder.
(2) The information required under subsection (1) of  this section shall be affixed in a manner
that makes the letters and numbers clearly visible.
(3) A law enforcement agency shall  adopt a policy prohibiting the intentional obscuring by a law
enforcement officer of any of the information required under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) This section does not apply to members of the Oregon State Police.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2245