Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Office of Emergency Management  of the Oregon Military Department
shall create, fill and utilize the following positions within the office:
(1) At least seven teams  to be known as “Regional Emergency Management Support
Teams” each consisting of:
(a) One regional coordinator; and
(b) One multidisciplinary training specialist;
(2) At least three administrative support specialists for  interagency coordination and
programming support; and
(3) At least five exercise and preparedness  specialists for statewide, regional and special
event coordination, development, implementation and reporting.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Military Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $______ for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section
1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2142