Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “electric company,” “qualifying electricity” and
“retail electricity consumer” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 469A.005.
(2) The Public Utility Commission shall, based  on information provided by electric com-
panies to the commission, identify  and compile the projected percentages of electricity sold
by each  electric company to retail electricity consumers in 2025, 2030 and 2035 that will be
qualifying electricity.
(3) The commission shall provide the information compiled pursuant to  this section in a
report, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to  the appropriate interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2021.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2022.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2140