Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 326.545 is amended to read:
326.545. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Public education provider” means:
(A) A school district;
[(B) A public charter school; ]
[(C)] (B) An education service district;
[(D)] (C) A community college; or
[(E)] (D) A public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(b) “Public  school building” means a building used by a public education provider to provide
educational services to students.
(c) “Student  bathroom” means a bathroom that is accessible by female students in kindergarten
or above, including a gender-neutral bathroom[ , a bathroom designated for females and  a bathroom
designated for males ].
(2) Each public education provider shall ensure  that both tampons and sanitary pads are avail-
able at no cost to students through  dispensers located in every student bathroom of every public
school building.
(3) A  public education provider, and any employee of a public education provider, is not liable
in a criminal action  or for civil damages as a result of a student’s use of a tampon or sanitary pad
made available under this section.
(4) The State Board of Education and the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission shall
adopt any rules necessary for the administration of this section. Rules adopted by  the board and
commission shall provide for:
(a) The number of dispensers required in each student bathroom;
(b) The types of products available in each student bathroom;
(c) The provision of tampons and sanitary pads in an alternate location when  the public educa-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3605
SB 677
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
tion provider does not have  control of the student bathrooms used by the students of the public
education provider;
(d) Modifications to or exemptions  from the requirements of this section for student bathrooms
that are not located in commonly accessible areas of the public school buildings of a  community
college or a public university; and
(e) Payments to public education providers for costs incurred under this section, including:
(A) For school  districts, public charter schools and education service districts and subject to
subparagraph (B) of  this paragraph, distributions from amounts available under ORS 327.008 (17) to
be made based on the average daily membership, as defined in  ORS 327.006, of the district or school;
(B) For education service  districts, distributions to be made as provided by subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph may not exceed 7.5  percent of the amounts available for distribution under ORS
327.008 (17);
(C) For community colleges, distributions from the Community College Support Fund to be  made
based on the full-time equivalent student enrollment of the community college; and
(D) For public universities, distributions  from a public university support fund established by the
commission by rule.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]