Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 338.155 is amended to read:
338.155. (1)(a) Students of a public charter school shall be considered to be residents of  the
school district in which  the public charter school is located for purposes of distribution of the State
School  Fund.
(b) All amounts to be distributed from the  State School Fund for public charter schools shall
first be distributed to the school district in which the public charter school is located.
(c) For the purpose of determining the amounts  to be distributed to a school district from the
State School Fund for  a public charter school, the district extended ADMw described in ORS 327.013
shall be calculated:
(A) Except as provided by subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, as though the  students enrolled
at a public charter school  are students enrolled at the public schools of the school district in which
the public charter school is located.
(B) By  not including any portion of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year if  the public charter school ceased to operate because of dissolution or closure or because of
termination or nonrenewal of a charter.
(2) A school district shall enter into a contract with a public charter  school within the
boundaries of the school district that provides for payment to the public charter school  for
the provision of educational services to the public charter school’s students.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5)  of this section and ORS 338.165, the
payment required under subsection (2) of this section shall equal an amount per  weighted
average daily membership (ADMw) of the public charter school that is at least equal to:
(a) Ninety-five  percent of the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant per
ADMw, as calculated under  ORS 327.013, for the sponsor if the sponsor is the board of a
school district; or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1975
SB 915
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Ninety-five percent of the General Purpose Grant per ADMw, as calculated under ORS
327.013, for the school district where the public charter school is located  if the sponsor is the
State Board of Education or an institution of higher education.
[(2)] (4) A school district shall contractually establish, with any virtual public charter school
that is sponsored by the board of  the school district, payment for provision of educational services
to the virtual public charter school’s students. The payment  shall equal an amount per weighted
average daily membership (ADMw) of the virtual public charter school that is at least equal to:
(a) Eighty percent of the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled  in kindergarten through grade eight;
and
(b) Ninety-five percent of the amount of the school district’s General  Purpose Grant per ADMw
as calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
[(3)] (5) A school district shall contractually establish, with any virtual public charter school
that is sponsored by the State Board of Education or an institution of higher education  and that is
within the boundaries of the school district, payment for provision of educational services  to the
virtual public charter school’s  students. The payment shall equal an amount per weighted average
daily membership (ADMw) of the virtual public charter school that is at least equal to:
(a) Ninety percent of the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant per  ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 for students  who are enrolled in kindergarten through grade eight;
and
(b) Ninety-five percent of the amount of the school district’s General  Purpose Grant per ADMw
as calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
[(4)] (6) The estimated amount of each school district’s  General Purpose Grant per ADMw shall
be determined each year by the Department of  Education and made available to all school districts.
[(5)] (7) The school district in which [ the] a public  charter school sponsored by the State
Board of Education or an institution of higher learning  is located shall transfer an  amount per
weighted average daily membership (ADMw) of the public charter school that is equal to 50 percent
of the amount of the school district’s  General Purpose Grant per ADMw as calculated under ORS
327.013 that is not paid to the public charter  school through a contract created pursuant to sub-
section [ (3)] (2) or (5)  of this section to:
(a) For a public charter school sponsored  by the State Board of Education, the Department of
Education;  or
(b) For a public charter school sponsored by an institution of higher education,  the institution
of higher education.
(8)(a) A sponsor may  retain any amounts that are not paid to a public charter school as
provided by subsection (3), (4) or (5) of this  section. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of
this subsection, any amounts retained by the sponsor as provided  by this subsection must
be used for administrative costs incurred by the sponsor in relation to public charter schools.
[(6)] (b) The department may use any moneys received under this section for  activities related
to public charter schools.
[(7)] (9) A school district and a public charter  school may negotiate to establish a payment for
the provision of educational services to the public charter  school’s students that is more than the
minimum [amounts] amount specified in subsection [ (2) or ] (3), (4) or (5)  of this section.
(10)(a) In addition to payments received by a public charter  school under subsection (3),
(4) or (5) of this section and  except as provided by ORS 338.165, the public charter school is
[2]
SB 915
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
entitled to receive:
(A) Any  local, state or federal moneys that are for the benefit of the public charter
school and that are  received by a sponsor or by the school district in which the public
charter school is located.
(B) Any local, state or federal  moneys that are for the benefit of public schools in the
school district and that are received by a sponsor or  by the school district in which the
public charter school is located. Moneys described in this subparagraph must  be distributed
to public charter schools on the same basis that moneys are  distributed to nonchartered
public schools in the school district.
(C) Any local revenues,  as described in ORS 327.011, that are available to the nonchar-
tered public schools in the school district. Moneys described  in this subparagraph must be
distributed to  public charter schools based on the number of students who attend the
schools.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(C) of this subsection,  a virtual public charter school
is not entitled to receive a portion of local revenues, as described in ORS 327.011, but a school
district may choose to distribute a portion of local  revenues to the virtual public charter
school.
[(8)] (11) A school district shall send payment to a public charter school based  on a contract
negotiated under this section within 10 days after receiving  payments from the State School Fund
pursuant to ORS 327.095  or after receiving moneys pursuant to subsection (10) of this
section.
[(9)(a)] (12)(a) A  public charter school may apply for any grant that is available to school dis-
tricts or nonchartered public schools from the Department of Education. The  department shall con-
sider the application of the public charter  school in the same manner as an application from a
school district or nonchartered public school.
(b) The department shall  award any grant that is available to school districts based solely on
the weighted average daily membership (ADMw)  of the school district directly to the public charter
school. This paragraph does not apply to any grant from the State School Fund.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 338.155 by section 1 of this 2017 Act apply to mon-
eys received by a school district or sponsor on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 327.297 is amended to read:
327.297. (1) In addition to those moneys  distributed through the State School Fund, the Depart-
ment of Education shall  award grants to school districts, education service districts, the Youth
Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention  Education Program for activities that
relate to increases in student achievement, including:
(a) Early childhood support including establishing, maintaining or expanding quality
prekindergarten programs;
(b) Class size reduction with an emphasis on the reduction of kindergarten through  grade three
class sizes;
(c) Increases in instructional time including summer  programs and before- and after-school pro-
grams;
(d) Mentoring, teacher retention and professional development;
(e) Remediation, alternative learning and student retention;
(f) Services to at-risk youth;
(g) Programs to improve a student achievement gap between student  groups identified by cul-
[3]
SB 915
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ture, poverty, language and race and other student groups;
(h) Vocational education programs;
(i) Literacy programs;
(j) School library programs; and
(k) Other research-based  student improvement strategies approved by the State Board of Edu-
cation.
(2)(a) Each school district, each education service  district, the Youth Corrections Education
Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program may apply to  the Department of Education
for a grant.
(b) The department shall review and  approve applications based on criteria established by the
State Board  of Education. In establishing the criteria, the State Board of Education shall consider
the recommendations of the Quality Education Commission established under ORS 327.500.
(c) The applications shall include the activities to be funded and the goals  of the district or
program for increases in student performance. The  applications shall become part of the local dis-
trict continuous improvement plan described in ORS 329.095.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 338.155 [ (9)] (12) , the  Department of Education may not award a
grant under this section directly to a public charter school.
(b) A school district that receives  a grant for a public charter school  under this section
[may] shall transfer a portion of the grant to [ a] the public charter school based on the  criteria
used to transfer grants to any nonchartered public charter school in the school  district or
based on the  charter of the school or any other agreement between  the school district and the
public charter school.
(c) A public charter school that receives grant funds under this  subsection [ shall] must use
those funds for the activities specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(4)(a) The amount of each grant for a program or  school district = the program’s or school
district’s ADMw 
×  (the total  amount available for distribution to programs and school districts as
grants in each fiscal year ÷  the total ADMw of all programs and school districts  that receive a
grant).
(b) The amount of each grant for an education service district =  the education service district’s
ADMw ×  (the total amount  available for distribution to education service districts as grants in
each fiscal year ÷  the total ADMw of all education service districts that receive a grant).
(c) As used in this subsection, “ADMw” means:
(A) For a school district,  the extended weighted average daily membership as calculated under
ORS 327.013, 338.155 (1) and 338.165 (2);
(B) For the Youth Corrections Education Program, the extended weighted average daily  mem-
bership as calculated under ORS 327.026;
(C) For the Juvenile Detention Education Program, the  extended weighted average daily mem-
bership as calculated under ORS 327.026; and
(D) For an education service district, the sum of the ADMw of  the school districts located
within the territory of the education service district.
(5) Each district or program shall deposit the grant amounts it receives under this  section in a
separate account, and shall apply amounts in that account  to pay for activities described in the
district’s or program’s application.
(6) The State Board of Education may adopt any  rules necessary for the administration of the
grant program.
[4]
SB 915
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
SECTION 4.  ORS 338.145 is amended to read:
338.145. (1) The  public charter school shall be responsible for providing transportation to stu-
dents who reside within the school  district and who attend the public charter school. The public
charter school may negotiate with a school  district for the provision of transportation to students
attending the public charter school.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the school district within which the public
charter school is located shall  be responsible for the transportation of students attending the public
charter school pursuant to ORS 327.043 in the same manner as students attending  nonchartered
public schools if the student is a resident of the school  district. [ However,] A school district may
not be  required to add or extend existing bus routes or other transportation services pursuant to
this subsection.
(3) Students who attend public charter schools and who reside outside of  the school district may
use existing bus routes and transportation services  of the school district in which a public charter
school is located.
(4)(a) Any transportation costs incurred by a  school district under this section shall be consid-
ered approved  transportation costs for purposes of ORS 327.013 in the same manner as transporta-
tion costs incurred by the school district for  transporting students who attend nonchartered public
schools are considered approved transportation costs for purposes of ORS 327.013.
(b) Any transportation costs incurred by a public charter school for  providing transpor-
tation to students who reside within the school district  and who attend the public charter
school shall be considered approved transportation costs for purposes of ORS 327.013 in the
same manner as transportation costs incurred by a school  district for transporting students
are considered approved transportation costs for purposes of ORS 327.013.  A school district
shall pay the public  charter school the total amount received by the school district for
transportation costs incurred by the public charter school within 10 days after  the school
district receives the amount.
SECTION 5.
The amendments to ORS 327.297, 338.145 and 338.155 by  sections 1, 3 and 4
of this 2017 Act apply to State School Fund distributions and  other distributions of moneys
made to school districts commencing with the 2017-2018 distributions.
SECTION 6.  ORS 340.073 is amended to read:
340.073. (1) A public charter school may elect to participate in the Expanded  Options Program
by amending its charter under ORS 338.065.
(2) Actual instructional costs associated with participating eligible students  shall be negotiated
and paid directly to the eligible post-secondary institution by the public charter school.
(3) The participating  public charter school may not require funding from the sponsor of the
school for payment of Expanded Options Program costs that is in  addition to funding that already
has been contractually established pursuant to ORS 338.155 [ (2)(b) or (3)(b) ] (3), (4) or  (5) or 338.165
(2)(b).
SECTION 7. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[5]