Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of sections 1 to 5,
chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 2. (1) The Housing Accountability and  Production Office shall award grants to
public benefit nonprofit  corporations to provide regional housing coordination services to
support the development of market rate housing within the region, including through support
provided by:
(a) Informing local businesses, school districts, hospitals and other employers about op-
portunities to co-invest in housing;
(b) Providing connections among local governments, investment partners, and land and
housing resources;
(c) Informing local governments and their elected officials of opportunities to contribute
to housing co-investment efforts, including by providing  financial incentives, identifying
available lands for development and eliminating existing barriers;
(d) Maintaining a collection of  available city, county, state and federal housing co-
investment resources to share  with public bodies, developers, nonprofit corporations and
other businesses; and
(e) Assisting housing development partners and local governments in  facilitating agree-
ments and strategies.
(2) The office may award grants to  up to five public benefit nonprofit corporations
throughout the state or to a single nonprofit corporation that shall  provide up to five sub-
grants.
(3) Grants under this section must be awarded on or before January 1, 2026.
(4) On or before September 15, 2027, the office shall provide a  report to an interim com-
mittee of the Legislative Assembly related  to housing in the manner provided in ORS 192.245
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4207
HB 3649
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
on the results of the grant program under this section.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Land  Conservation and Development, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $___, for deposit into the Housing Ac-
countability and  Production Office Fund, established under section 4, chapter 110, Oregon
Laws 2024, to implement section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]