Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000,  for the purpose of funding the grant program
related to establishments that process and sell meat products, as described in section 1,
chapter 537, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 2.
 Section 3, chapter 537, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Section 1 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 537, Oregon Laws 2021,  is repealed on June 30,
[2023] 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1454