Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Attorney General  shall report annually to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary on settlement agreements  entered into by the
Department of Justice that require the state to pay over $4 million.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2669