Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 332.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 247.016 (2) or 255.005 (6), an individual may  vote in
all school district elections, including the  nomination and election of school directors, if the
individual:
(a) Is 16 or 17 years of age;
(b) Has registered to vote in the manner described in ORS 247.012;
(c) Resides at an address that is within the geographic boundaries of the area  eligible to
cast ballots in the school district election; and
(d) Is registered to vote in the school district election not less than 20  calendar days
immediately preceding the election.
(2) The Secretary of State by rule shall establish a process to  allow individuals described
in subsection (1) of this section to cast ballots in school district  elections. The process must
ensure that:
(a) An individual who votes under the process established in  this subsection receives a
ballot that permits the individual to cast a vote only in school district elections; and
(b) To the extent practicable, the ballot style that is used to create ballots  for individuals
described in subsection (1) of this section is the same as the ballot  style used in other ballots
for the same school district elections.
(3) Nothing in this section permits an individual who may vote in all  school district
elections under this section to vote for or be eligible to serve as a director of  an education
service district under ORS chapter 334.
(4) Nothing in this section permits an individual who may vote in all  school district
elections under this section to be eligible to serve as a director of a district school board.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 332.118 is amended to read:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1751
HB 3012
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
332.118. Except as provided in ORS 255.400 to 255.424:
(1) [Unless specifically ] Except as  provided under section 2 of this 2025 Act or  otherwise, ORS
chapter 255 governs the following:
(a) The nomination and election of school directors.
(b) The conduct of all school district elections.
(2) ORS 249.865 to 249.877 govern the recall of school board members.
(3) The Secretary of State has supervising authority over all elections  conducted by school dis-
tricts and over elections conducted by a district boundary board.
(4) A petition  for a proposed change or merger under ORS 330.095, a remonstrance petition un-
der ORS 330.101, a petition for zoning under ORS 332.128 or a petition  to lengthen the course of
study under ORS  335.495 may not be circulated for signatures until the prospective petition has been
filed with the county clerk. The prospective petition must designate the names  and residence ad-
dresses of not  more than three persons as chief petitioner. The authority of the Secretary of State
and the application of the election laws commence when the prospective petition is  filed with the
county  clerk.  The filing of the prospective petition is to be treated like a prospective petition for
an initiative, referendum or recall. Except as otherwise provided in ORS 330.080  to 330.113, ORS
chapter 255 applies to the procedures applicable to petitions  described in this subsection and the
elections held on the petitions.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 247.016 is amended to read:
247.016. (1) Subject  to this section, an otherwise qualified person who is at least 16 years of age
may register to vote.
(2) Except as provided under section 2 of this 2025 Act,  a person who registers to vote under
subsection (1) of  this section may not vote in an election until the person attains the age of 18 years.
(3) If a person  who registers to vote under subsection (1) of this section will be under 18 years
of age  on the date of the next election held on a date listed in ORS 171.185 or the next special
election, the person’s voter registration  information, including but not limited to the person’s name
and any identifying information, may not  be disclosed as a public record under ORS 192.311 to
192.478.
SECTION 5. Section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 247.016 and  332.118
by sections 3 and 4  of this 2025 Act apply to school district elections that occur on or after
January 1, 2027.
[2]