Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “industrial  symbiosis” means the use by one
business or organization of the resources produced by or belonging  to another, including, but
not limited to:
(a) Waste;
(b) By-products;
(c) Residues;
(d) Energy;
(e) Water;
(f) Logistics;
(g) Capacity;
(h) Expertise;
(i) Equipment; and
(j) Materials.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department  shall develop an Industrial Symbiosis
Roadmap for the purpose of promoting industrial symbiosis activities in Oregon by:
(a) Identifying and describing industrial symbiosis opportunities;
(b) Studying best practices and technologies;
(c) Analyzing barriers to adoption; and
(d) Recommending key performance indicators to  measure progress on achieving indus-
trial symbiosis goals.
(3) Oregon’s industrial symbiosis goals include, but are not limited to:
(a) Supporting and coordinating existing industrial symbiosis efforts;
(b) Facilitating new industrial symbiosis opportunities;
(c) Turning waste and by-products into valued resource inputs;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2643
HB 3246
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
(d) Reducing waste management costs;
(e) Generating new business opportunities;
(f) Incentivizing pathways to green jobs that pay a family wage;
(g) Identifying means of improving environmental performance;
(h) Increasing the size and diversity of business networks;
(i) Achieving environmental justice in goals and policies;
(j) Expanding the statewide circular economy; and
(k) Driving innovation.
(4) Not later than September 15, 2026,  the department shall submit a report on the
roadmap to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to economic devel-
opment in the manner provided in ORS 192.245. The report  may include recommendations for
legislation.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]