Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 188.010 is amended to read:
188.010. The Legislative Assembly or  the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, shall con-
sider the following criteria when apportioning the state into congressional and legislative districts:
(1) Each district, as nearly as practicable, shall:
(a) Be contiguous;
(b) Be of equal population;
(c) Utilize existing geographic or political boundaries;
(d) Not divide communities of common interest; and
(e) Be connected by transportation links.
(2) No district shall be drawn for the purpose  of favoring any political party, incumbent legis-
lator or other person.
(3) No district shall be drawn for the purpose of diluting the voting strength of any  language
or ethnic minority group.
(4) Two state House of Representatives districts shall be wholly included within  a single state
senatorial district.
(5) Each  state House of Representatives district and each state Senate district shall, as
nearly as practicable, contain elector registration from one major party that is within  five
percentage points of the elector registration from the other major party,  so as to achieve
parity within five percentage  points in at least 40 state House of Representatives districts
and 20 state Senate districts. To the extent permitted under the United  States Constitution
and federal law, this subsection shall be  given greater weight than the factors described in
subsection (1) of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3791-1
HB 3537
1
2
3
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act shall be submitted to the people for their  approval or rejection
at the next regular general election held throughout this state.
[2]