Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. There shall be subtracted from  federal taxable income any amount that
during the tax year is:
(1) Attributable to hours of overtime worked by the taxpayer;
(2) Required to be compensated as overtime hours; and
(3) Properly reported as income on the taxpayer’s federal income tax return.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to amounts received in tax years  beginning
on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 964