Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 383.001 to
383.245.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Oregon Transportation
Commission may not assess a toll unless the toll proposed  by the commission is referred for
approval or rejection to the electors of this state and is approved by a majority of the votes
cast on the question.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 383.150 is amended to read:
383.150. (1) The Oregon Transportation Commission shall establish a toll program.
(2) As part of the toll program, after seeking and receiving approval from the Federal Highway
Administration, the commission may assess variable rate tolls. Tolling may include,  but is not lim-
ited to assessing variable rate tolls for the purpose of:
(a) Managing congestion; and
(b) Partially or wholly funding the construction, operation or maintenance of a highway.
(3) Subject to section 2  of this 2025 Act,  the commission shall assess tolls [ in the following
locations:]
[(a) On Interstate 205, beginning at the Washington state line  and ending where it intersects with
Interstate 5 in this state. ]
[(b)] on Interstate 5, beginning at  the Washington state line and ending where it intersects with
Interstate 205.
(4) To the extent necessary  and permitted by state and federal law and Article IX, section 3a,
of the Oregon  Constitution, the commission shall ensure tolls assessed pursuant to subsection (3)
of this section or tolls assessed as part of the Interstate 5 Boone Bridge  and Seismic Improvement
Project:
(a) Reduce traffic  congestion by managing demand on the tollway and by improving operations
on the tollway;
(b) Reduce  traffic congestion as a result of the tollway, not only on the tollway but also on ad-
jacent, connected or parallel highways to the tollways, regardless of ownership;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4148
HB 3579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
(c) Improve safety not only on the tollway but also  on adjacent, connected or parallel highways
to the tollways, regardless of ownership; and
(d) Minimize and mitigate impacts to historically and  currently underrepresented and disadvan-
taged communities.
(5) Any unit of government assessing tolls on highways for which the unit of  government is the
road authority, pursuant to ORS 810.010, shall collaborate with other units of government to:
(a) Determine whether assessing tolls  may result in traffic, equity, safety or climate impacts as
a result of assessing tolls;
(b) Determine appropriate investments or efforts that may minimize or reduce any potential  im-
pacts; and
(c) Periodically review any investments or efforts identified and implemented  under this sub-
section.
(6) Before assessing tolls in the locations described under subsection (3) of  this section, the
commission shall report to the Joint Committee on Transportation established under ORS 171.858.
(7) The commission may enter into agreements with the State of Washington,  or the State of
Washington’s tollway operator or other designee, relating to establishing,  reviewing, adjusting and
collecting tolls for the program described in this section.
(8) As used in this section, “highway” has the meaning given that term in ORS 366.005.
[2]