Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Definition of “urgent care center.” As used in sections 2 to 7 of this 2025
Act, “urgent care center” means a facility or portion of a facility  that is open to the public
and provides medical care  to individuals on a walk-in and episodic basis for illnesses or in-
juries that are acute but not life-threatening or do not require emergency medical services.
SECTION 2. Registration required for urgent care  centers. No person or governmental
unit may establish, conduct, maintain, manage or operate an urgent  care center in this state
without registering the  urgent care center with the Oregon Health Authority under section
3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Registration; information  required. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall
adopt by rule a process and criteria for registering an urgent care center in this state.
(2) An urgent care center  registered in this state shall meet the requirements set forth
in this section and  sections 4 and 5 of this 2025 Act and rules adopted by the authority to
carry out this section and sections 4 and 5 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The authority shall prescribe by rule  the fee for registering an urgent care center,
which may  not exceed the authority’s costs related to administering registration require-
ments.
(4) An application to register an  urgent care center shall be in the form and manner and
contain such  information as the authority requires. The authority shall require, at a mini-
mum, that an applicant provide the following information, or affirmatively state  or indicate
that the information required is not applicable with  respect to the urgent care center being
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3350
HB 3221
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
registered:
(a) Legal name of the urgent care center and any  name under which the urgent care
center does business;
(b) Street address of the urgent care center;
(c) Name and contact information of any person that  owns a 10 percent or greater in-
terest, directly or indirectly, in the urgent care center;
(d) Any health care facility or health system that is affiliated  with the urgent care cen-
ter;
(e) Hours and days of operation for the urgent care center;
(f) Types of payment and types of payor accepted by the urgent care center;
(g) Services offered by the urgent care center;
(h) Any limitations on the availability of the  services offered by the urgent care center
during the hours and days of operations of the urgent care center;
(i) Types of licensed providers that are  available at the urgent care center by hour and
day of operations of the urgent care center;
(j) Availability of scheduling an appointment  with a health care provider at the urgent
care center;
(k) On-site diagnostic capabilities of the urgent care center;
(L) Length of  time for a common diagnostic, imaging or laboratory test to be performed
and reviewed by a health care provider and for results to be communicated to a patient;
(m) List of organizations to which the urgent care center refers patients; and
(n) Telemedicine services offered by the urgent care center.
(5) The authority may not register an urgent care center if an application does not:
(a) Contain the information listed in subsection (4) of this section or information required
by the authority by rule; or
(b) State or indicate that the information required is not applicable  to the urgent care
center.
(6) An urgent care center registered in this state shall provide the authority with an
update to  the information listed in subsection (4) of this section or information required by
the authority by rule within 10 days to any change in the information.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) “Health care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(b) “Health system” means:
(A) A  parent corporation of one or more health care facilities, urgent care centers or
other entities that provide health  services and any entity affiliated with the parent corpo-
ration through ownership, governance, control or membership; or
(B) A health care facility, urgent care center or  other entity that provides health ser-
vices and any entity affiliated with the hospital, urgent care center or other entity that
provides health services through ownership, governance, control or membership.
SECTION 4.
Capabilities required; patient visits. (1) An urgent care center  registered in
this state shall, at a minimum, be capable of providing the following services on-site:
(a) Phlebotomy services with access to on-site or off-site laboratory services;
(b) X-ray and diagnostic services for fractures and common respiratory diseases;
(c) Tests for common respiratory diseases;
(d) 12-lead electrocardiogram (ECG);
[2]
HB 3221
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Splints for strains, sprains and fractures; and
(f) Sutures for simple lacerations.
(2) At the end of each patient visit, an urgent care  center registered in this state shall
provide a clinical summary and copy of the health care provider’s  notes made during the
patient visit:
(a) As an electronic health record to any other health care provider or  health care fa-
cility, as requested by a patient; or
(b) As a printed or electronic document to the patient.
SECTION 5.
Posted information required;  uses of the term “emergency” prohibited. (1)
An urgent care center registered in this state shall post the information listed under section
3 (4) of this 2025 Act and information required by the authority by rule under section  3 of
this 2025 Act. The information must be posted near the main public entrance to the  urgent
care center and in a manner that is conspicuous, accessible and readable.
(2) An urgent care center registered in this state may not:
(a) Hold the urgent care center out to the public as providing emergency medical ser-
vices; or
(b) Use the word “emergency” or “ER”  or any derivative of the word “emergency” or
“ER” in the urgent care  center’s name, claims of service or advertising in a manner that
would give the impression  that emergency medical services are provided by or available at
the urgent care center.
SECTION 6.
Online public resource. The Oregon Health Authority shall establish  and
maintain a website where information on urgent care centers  registered in this state is
available to the public. The purpose of the website is to  serve as a resource for assisting
individuals with referrals for health services and medical care.
SECTION 7. Complaint procedures. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules to
establish procedures for the filing of complaints as to an urgent care center and provide for
the confidentiality of the identity of any complainant.
(2) Information obtained  by the authority during an investigation of a complaint or re-
ported violation under this section is confidential  and not subject to public disclosure under
ORS 192.311 to 192.478. Upon the conclusion of the investigation, the  authority may publicly
release a report of the authority’s findings but may not include information in the  report
that could be used to identify the complainant or any patient of the urgent care center.
(3) The authority may report information  obtained during an investigation to a health
professional regulatory board as defined in ORS 676.160 as that information pertains to  a
licensee of the board.
SECTION 8.
Study on incentives. The Oregon Health Authority shall study incentive
options for urgent care centers, as defined in section 1 of this  2025 Act, to accept all patients
regardless of payor for reimbursement. The authority shall submit a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to health care no later than September 15,
2026.
SECTION 9.
Section 8 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 10. Captions. The section captions  used in this 2025 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory  law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[3]
HB 3221
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
SECTION 11.
Operative date. (1) Sections 1 to 7 of  this 2025 Act become operative on
January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1)  of this section that is necessary to enable the authority to exercise, on or
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by sections 1 to 7 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 12. Effective date. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on
which the 2025 regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]