Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is  added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Advanced metastatic cancer” means cancer that has spread from the primary or
original site to nearby tissues, lymph nodes or other parts of the body.
(b) “Associated conditions” means the symptoms or  side effects associated with advanced
metastatic cancer or its treatment, which, at the discretion of a  health care provider, fur-
ther jeopardize the health of a patient if left untreated.
(c) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(d) “Step therapy” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.001.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS  743B.602, a health benefit plan that provides coverage for ad-
vanced metastatic cancer and associated conditions may not require step therapy prior to
providing coverage of a prescription drug approved by the  United States Food and Drug Ad-
ministration.
(3) This section applies to the use of a drug that is:
(a) Consistent with best practices  for the treatment of advanced metastatic cancer or
associated conditions; and
(b) Supported by peer-reviewed, evidence-based literature.
(4) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of  this 2025 Act applies to health benefit plans issued, offered or
renewed on or after January 1, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1399