Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall  distribute funds
to Bridge Meadows to be used for the following purposes:
(a) Expansion of the Bridge Meadows model  of multigenerational housing across this
state;
(b) Development and construction of new housing units;
(c) Operational needs and other support of existing and new housing communities;
(d) Establishment of programs to enhance  intergenerational activities and engagement
among residents; and
(e) Administrative  costs directly related to the expansion and operation of the Bridge
Meadows model of multigenerational housing.
(2) The department shall oversee the use of funds distributed under subsection (1) of this
section and ensure  that the funds are used only for the purposes specified in subsection (1)
of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2162
SB 229
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
(3) Not later than December 31  of each year for five consecutive years, the department
shall submit a report, in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, on the progress and impact
of the distribution of funds made under subsection (1) of this section to the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to housing.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2031.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Housing and Community Services Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $1,000,000
for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
[2]