Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of  State Lands shall conduct a study on the following
issues related to wetlands mitigation:
(a) Whether there is a sufficient quantity  of mitigation banks and mitigation credits
available in this state;
(b) The current geographic distribution of,  and need for, mitigation banks and mitigation
credits;
(c) Strategies for lowering the cost of mitigation credits;
(d) Strategies for reducing risks for the private sector to invest in the creation  of miti-
gation banks; and
(e) Whether the  state should play a role in the creation or ownership of mitigation banks.
(2) The department shall submit a report on the results of  the study to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to agriculture and  natural resources no later
than September 15, 2019.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2020.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2730