Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Place-Based Water Planning Fund is established  in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned by the Place-Based Water
Planning Fund shall be credited to the fund. The fund consists of  moneys appropriated to the
fund by the Legislative Assembly and public or private moneys designated  for deposit in the
fund. Moneys in the  fund are continuously appropriated to the Water Resources Department
for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible implementation coordination costs”:
(A) Means costs associated with actions  taken to coordinate implementation of a state-
recognized place-based integrated water resources plan, including:
(i) Costs of facilitation services related to meetings.
(ii) The provision of stipends to encourage ongoing participation in meetings.
(iii) Costs of  coordination-related actions that occur after state recognition of a place-
based integrated water resources plan.
(B) Does not include the costs of implementing a project.
(b) “Environmental justice community” has the  meaning given that term in ORS 182.535.
(c) “Indian tribe” means a federally recognized Indian tribe in  Oregon that has members
residing on a reservation or tribal trust lands in Oregon.
(d) “Person” has the meaning given that term in ORS 536.007.
(e) “Place-based integrated water resources plan” means a plan that:
(A) Is developed in collaboration with a balanced representation of interests;
(B) Balances current and future in-stream and out-of-stream needs;
(C) Includes the development of  actions that are consistent with the state water re-
sources policy, as  defined in ORS 536.007, and other state laws concerning the water re-
sources of this state;
(D) Facilitates local water resources solutions;
(E) Is developed using an open, equitable and transparent process that fosters  public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 544
HB 3163
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
participation;
(F) Is developed in consultation with the  Water Resources Department and other rele-
vant state agencies;
(G) Strives to integrate solutions to cost-effectively achieve multiple benefits;
(H) Is consistent with the guiding principles of the integrated state water resources
strategy;
(I) Complies with rules  of the Water Resources Commission regarding development of
place-based integrated water resources plans;
(J) Is reviewed by, and recognized by a resolution  of, the Water Resources Commission;
and
(K) Is for an area associated with waters from sources within a hydrologic boundary.
(f) “Situational assessment” includes evaluation of:
(A) An area’s readiness, needs and capacity for developing  a place-based integrated water
resources plan within a hydrologic boundary.
(B) Potential gaps in state and local capacity and data related to development of a
place-based integrated water resources plan.
(C) Actions that may ensure timely  completion of a place-based integrated water re-
sources plan.
(D) Potential critical water issues that may be the  focus when developing a place-based
integrated water resources plan.
(g) “State-recognized place-based integrated water resources plan” means a  place-based
integrated water resources plan that has been reviewed by the Water  Resources Commission
and recognized by a commission resolution stating that the completed place-based integrated
water resources plan adheres to applicable requirements.
(2) The Water Resources Director shall disburse moneys  in the Place-Based Water
Planning Fund established in section 1 of  this 2023 Act as grants to fund up to 75 percent
of the costs of actions supporting the development of a place-based integrated water  re-
sources plan, including costs of:
(a) Filling gaps in state and local capacity, knowledge and skill sets.
(b) Developing data and associated analyses tailored to  the area of a place-based inte-
grated water resources plan.
(c) Building relationships among state agencies and people who  live in, or are interested
in, the area of a place-based integrated water resources plan.
(d) Assisting with building the capacity of a community  to develop a place-based inte-
grated water resources plan.
(e) Facilitating associated  public participation, including participation by members of
environmental justice communities, through  education, outreach, financial support and other
activities.
(f) Assessing critical issues related to a place-based integrated water resources plan.
(g) Designing and managing the  development of a place-based integrated water resources
plan.
(h) That are  eligible implementation coordination costs of a state-recognized place-based
integrated water resources plan.
(i) Supporting development of a place-based integrated water resources plan.
(3) The grants may be awarded to persons, Indian tribes and nonprofit organizations.
[2]
HB 3163
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
(4) The grants may be awarded  as cost sharing with other programs that support water
resources planning.
(5) In addition to disbursing moneys in the fund as grants described in  subsection (2) of
this section, the Water Resources Director may use moneys in the fund to contract  for
situational assessments, data  development, technical assistance and other actions in support
of a place-based integrated water resources plan.
(6) Before issuing funding under subsection (2) or (5) of this section, the Water Resources
Director shall consult with the Department of Environmental Quality,  Oregon Health Au-
thority, State Department of Agriculture and State Department  of Fish and Wildlife to un-
derstand agency capacity to participate in developing a place-based integrated water
resources plan.
(7) The Department of Environmental Quality, Oregon  Health Authority, State Depart-
ment of Agriculture, State Department of Fish and Wildlife and Water Resources  Depart-
ment may provide technical  information and assistance to, and enter into contracts or
agreements with, a person, Indian tribe or nonprofit organization to facilitate  implementa-
tion of this section.
(8) The Water  Resources Commission shall consider state-recognized place-based inte-
grated water resources plans when updating the integrated state water resources strategy.
(9) The commission may adopt rules to implement this section, including rules that:
(a) Further clarify the expenditures that may be funded by the grants.
(b) Prioritize the issuance of funding for purposes described in this section.
(c) Establish requirements for engaging environmental justice  communities pursuant to
this section.
(d) Establish criteria and a process for  state recognition of a place-based integrated wa-
ter resources plan.
(e) Describe how the commission  will consider state-recognized place-based integrated
water resources plans when updating the integrated state water resources strategy.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]