Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 329.488 is amended to read:
329.488. (1) The Department of Education shall contract with a nonprofit entity or a benefit
company that is incorporated, organized, formed or created under  ORS 60.754  to administer
a nationally normed  assessment, in collaboration with the department, to all students in grade 10
who are enrolled in a public school. The purpose of the assessment is to predict the success of stu-
dents on, and provide practice for students taking, college entrance exams.
(2) The department shall base the selection of the contractor under subsection  (1) of this section
on all of the following criteria:
(a) The contractor must be able to provide to the department statewide  data containing the re-
sults of the assessment;
(b) The contractor shall provide an assessment that:
(A) Identifies students with high potential to excel in advanced placement (AP) or  other honors
courses based on a  research-based correlation of scores on the grade 10 assessment to advanced
placement examinations;
(B) Examines students in mathematics, reading and writing; and
(C) Provides results that can be  used by Oregon’s higher education institutions to recruit stu-
dents to attend college;
(c) The contractor must be able to supply schools with an  item-by-item analysis of student per-
formance on the assessment; and
(d) The contractor must be able to make available to each student  taking the assessment a free
career assessment and online exploration of colleges and career opportunities.
(3)(a) In lieu of using the contractor selected by  the department under subsection (1) of this
section, a school district may apply  to the department for a waiver to allow the district to enter into
a contract with [ a different nonprofit entity ] an alternative contractor that is a nonprofit entity
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1818
HB 2513
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
or a benefit company that is incorporated, organized, formed or created under  ORS 60.754 for
the purpose of administering a nationally normed assessment to  all students in grade 10 who are
enrolled in the public schools operated by the district. The department shall grant the waiver if:
(A) The district had entered into a contract with the [ entity] alternative contractor  for the
2007-2008 school year to administer a grade 10 assessment;
(B) The [ entity] alternative contractor , in coordination with the district,  administered a grade
10 assessment during the 2007-2008 school year;
(C) For the most recent school year in which the [ entity] alternative contractor  administered
a grade 10 assessment, the [ entity] alternative contractor  met the criteria set forth in  subsection
(2) of this section as in effect for the school year in which the [ entity] alternative contractor  ad-
ministered the assessment; and
(D) The [ entity] alternative contractor  plans to meet the criteria set forth in subsection (2) of
this section as in effect for the school year for which the school district seeks a waiver.
(b) A waiver granted by the department under this subsection:
(A) Is valid for one school year; and
(B) May be renewed each school year.
(c) The department shall reimburse a school district for the cost of assessments allowed  under
this subsection from funds available to the department under ORS 327.008 (13).
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of this section:
(a) The department may, under rules adopted by the State Board of  Education, waive the as-
sessment for specific groups of students; and
(b) Upon request from a student  who is enrolled in a public school operated by a school district
or the parent or guardian of the student, the school district shall waive the assessment for the stu-
dent.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]