Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS
SECTION 1.
 ORS 677.495 is amended to read:
677.495. As used in ORS 677.495 to 677.535, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Collaboration” means, as indicated by the patient’s condition, community  standards
of care and a physician assistant’s education, training and experience:
(a) Consultation between the physician assistant and  a physician, podiatric physician or
qualified physician assistant; or
(b) Referral by the physician assistant to a physician,  podiatric physician or qualified
physician assistant.
(2) “Collaboration agreement” means a written agreement that describes the manner in
which the physician assistant collaborates with physicians, podiatric  physicians or qualified
physician assistants, and that does not assign supervisory responsibility to, or represent ac-
ceptance of legal responsibility by, a physician, podiatric  physician or qualified physician as-
sistant for the care provided by the physician assistant.
(3) “Physician” means a physician licensed under ORS 677.100 to 677.228.
[(1)] (4) “Physician assistant” means a person who is licensed in accordance with ORS 677.505
to 677.525.
(5) “Podiatric physician”  means a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under ORS
677.805 to 607.840.
[(2) “Practice agreement”  means a written agreement between a physician assistant and a super-
vising physician or supervising physician  organization that describes the manner in which the services
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 206
HB 4081
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the physician assistant will be used. ]
[(3) “Supervising physician” means a physician licensed under ORS  677.100 to 677.228, or a
podiatric physician and surgeon  licensed under ORS 677.805 to 677.840, who supervises a physician
assistant.]
[(4) “Supervising physician organization” means a group of supervising physicians that  collectively
supervises a physician assistant. ]
[(5) “Supervision” means  the acts of overseeing and accepting responsibility for the medical services
provided by a physician assistant in accordance with a practice agreement, including regular  and
routine oversight and chart review. ]
(6) “Qualified physician assistant”  means a physician assistant who has at least 10,000
hours of clinical experience.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 677.510 is amended to read:
677.510. [ (1) A person licensed to practice medicine under this chapter may not use the services of
a physician assistant without the prior approval of the Oregon Medical Board. ]
[(2) A supervising physician or  a supervising physician organization may apply to the board to
use the services of a physician assistant. The application must: ]
[(a) If the applicant is not  a supervising physician organization, state the name and contact infor-
mation of the supervising physician; ]
[(b) If the applicant is a supervising physician organization: ]
[(A) State the names and contact information of all supervising physicians; and ]
[(B) State the  name of the primary supervising physician required by subsection (5) of this
section;]
[(c) Generally describe the medical services provided by each supervising physician; ]
[(d) Contain a statement acknowledging that each supervising physician has reviewed statutes  and
rules relating to the practice of physician assistants and the role of a supervising physician; and ]
[(e) Provide such other information in such a form as the board may require. ]
[(3) The board shall approve or reject an application within seven working days after the board
receives the application, unless the board is conducting an investigation of the supervising  physician
or of any of the supervising physicians in a supervising physician organization applying to use  the
services of a physician assistant. ]
[(4) A  supervising physician organization shall provide the board with a list of the supervising
physicians in  the supervising physician organization. The supervising physician organization shall
continually update the list and notify the board of any changes. ]
[(5) A supervising physician organization  shall designate a primary supervising physician and
notify the board in the manner prescribed by the board. ]
[(6)(a) A physician  assistant may not practice medicine until the physician assistant enters into a
practice agreement with a  supervising physician or supervising physician organization whose applica-
tion has been approved under subsection (3) of this section. The practice agreement must: ]
[(A) Include the name, contact information and license number of  the physician assistant and each
supervising physician. ]
[(B) Describe the  degree and methods of supervision that the supervising physician or supervising
physician organization will use. The degree  of supervision, whether general, direct or personal, must
be based on the level of competency of the physician assistant as  judged by the supervising
physician.]
[(C) Generally describe the medical duties delegated to the physician assistant. ]
[2]
HB 4081
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(D) Describe the services or procedures  common to the practice or specialty that the physician
assistant is not permitted to perform. ]
[(E) Describe the prescriptive and medication  administration privileges that the physician assistant
will exercise. ]
[(F) Provide the list of  settings and licensed facilities in which the physician assistant will provide
services. ]
[(G) State  that the physician assistant and each supervising physician is in full compliance with
the laws and regulations governing the practice of medicine  by physician assistants, supervising phy-
sicians and supervising physician organizations and acknowledge that violation  of laws or regulations
governing the practice of medicine may subject the physician assistant and  supervising physician or
supervising physician organization to discipline. ]
[(H) Be signed by the supervising physician or the primary supervising physician of the supervising
physician organization and by the physician assistant. ]
[(I) Be updated at least every two years. ]
[(b) The supervising physician or supervising physician organization shall provide the  board with
a copy of the practice agreement within 10 days after the physician assistant begins practice with  the
supervising physician or supervising physician organization. The supervising physician or  supervising
physician organization shall keep a copy of  the practice agreement at the practice location and make
a copy of the practice agreement  available to the board on request. The practice agreement is not sub-
ject to board approval, but the board may request a meeting with a supervising physician or  supervis-
ing physician organization and a physician assistant to discuss a practice agreement. ]
[(7) A physician assistant’s supervising physician shall ensure that the physician assistant is com-
petent to perform all duties delegated to the physician assistant. The supervising physician or  super-
vising physician organization and the physician assistant are responsible for  ensuring the competent
practice of the physician assistant. ]
[(8) A supervising physician or the agent of a supervising physician must be competent to  perform
the duties delegated to the physician  assistant by the supervising physician or by a supervising physi-
cian organization. ]
[(9) The board may not require that  a supervising physician be physically present at all times when
the physician assistant is providing services, but may require that: ]
[(a) The physician assistant have access to personal  or telephone communication with a supervising
physician when the physician assistant is providing services; and ]
[(b) The proximity of a supervising physician  and the methods and means of supervision be ap-
propriate to the practice setting and the patient conditions treated in the practice setting. ]
[(10)(a) A supervising physician organization  may supervise any number of physician assistants.
The board may not adopt rules  limiting the number of physician assistants that a supervising physician
organization may supervise. ]
[(b) A physician  assistant who is supervised by a supervising physician organization may be
supervised by any of the supervising physicians in the supervising physician organization. ]
[(11) If a  physician assistant is not supervised by a supervising physician organization, the physi-
cian assistant may be supervised by no more than four supervising  physicians, unless the board ap-
proves a request from the physician assistant, or from a supervising physician, for the physician
assistant to be supervised by more than four supervising physicians. ]
[(12) A supervising physician who is not  acting as part of a supervising physician organization
may supervise four physician assistants, unless the board approves  a request from the supervising
[3]
HB 4081
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
physician or  from a physician assistant for the supervising physician to supervise more than four
physician assistants.]
[(13) A supervising physician who is not acting as  part of a supervising physician organization
may designate a physician to serve as  the agent of the supervising physician for a predetermined period
of time.]
[(14) A physician assistant may render services in any setting included in the practice agreement. ]
[(15) A physician assistant for whom an application under this section  has been approved by the
board on or after January 2, 2006, shall submit to the board, within 24 months after the approval,
documentation of completion of: ]
[(a) A pain management education program  approved by the board and developed in conjunction
with the Pain Management Commission established under ORS 413.570; or ]
[(b) An equivalent pain management education program, as determined by the board. ]
(1) A physician assistant is responsible for the care provided by the physician assistant.
(2) A physician assistant shall engage in collaboration to  the degree determined at the
physician assistant’s primary location of  practice. The determination may include decisions
made by a physician,  podiatric physician or qualified physician assistant with whom the
physician assistant has entered into a collaboration agreement, or the employer, group  or
hospital service and  the credentialing and privileging systems of the physician assistant’s
primary location of practice.
(3) A physician assistant may not provide care unless the physician  assistant has entered
into a collaboration agreement signed by a physician, podiatric physician  or qualified physi-
cian assistant. The collaboration agreement must include:
(a) The physician assistant’s name, license number and primary location of practice;
(b) A general description of the  physician assistant’s process for collaboration with phy-
sicians, podiatric physicians or qualified physician assistants;
(c) If the physician assistant has fewer than 4,000 hours of post-graduate clinical experi-
ence, a plan for the  minimum number of hours per month during which the physician as-
sistant will collaborate, both in person and through  technology, with a specified physician,
podiatric physician or qualified physician assistant; and
(d) The performance assessment  and review process, as described in subsection (5) of this
section.
(4) The collaboration agreement must be kept on file at the physician  assistant’s primary
location of practice and made available to the Oregon Medical Board upon request.
(5) Performance assessments and reviews of a physician assistant must  be completed by
the physician assistant’s employer in accordance with a  performance assessment and review
process established by the employer.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 677.511 is amended to read:
677.511. (1)(a)  A [ supervising physician or supervising physician organization ] physician assist-
ant may apply to the Oregon Medical Board for authority [ for a physician assistant ] to dispense
prescription drugs [ specified by the supervising physician or supervising physician organization ].
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  and except as permitted under ORS 677.515
(4), a physician  assistant may not dispense controlled substances classified in Schedule I or II under
the federal Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. 811 and 812, as modified under ORS 475.035.
[(2) The board shall adopt rules establishing standards and qualifications for physician assistants
with dispensing authority. The rules must require: ]
[4]
HB 4081
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(a) A physician assistant seeking dispensing authority to complete a  drug dispensing training
program; and]
[(b) The supervising  physician or supervising physician organization that applies for dispensing
authority for a physician assistant to: ]
[(A) Provide the board with a plan for drug delivery and control; ]
[(B) Submit an annual report to the board on the physician assistant’s  use of dispensing
authority;]
[(C) Submit to the board a list of the drugs or classes of drugs that the supervising physician or
supervising physician organization proposes to authorize the physician assistant to dispense; and ]
[(D) Submit to the board documentation  showing that the supervising physician or supervising
physician organization has registered the facility from which the physician assistant  will dispense
drugs as a drug outlet with the State Board of Pharmacy under ORS 689.305. ]
[(3) The Oregon Medical  Board and the State Board of Pharmacy shall jointly develop a drug
dispensing training program for physician assistants and adopt that program by rule. ]
[(4) A supervising physician or supervising physician organization that supervises a  physician as-
sistant with dispensing  authority shall comply with rules adopted by the State Board of Pharmacy re-
lating to registration, acquisition, storage, integrity, security, access, dispensing and disposal  of drugs,
record keeping and consultation with pharmacists. ]
[(5) A physician assistant who dispenses a controlled substance classified in Schedule III or  IV
under the federal Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. 811 and  812, as modified under ORS 475.035,
shall report the dispensing  of the controlled substance to the Oregon Health Authority in a manner
consistent with the  requirements for reporting by pharmacies as provided in ORS 431A.855 to
431A.900.]
[(6) Drugs dispensed by a physician  assistant with dispensing authority under this section must
be personally dispensed by the physician assistant. ]
(2) An application for the authority to dispense prescription drugs under  this section
must include any information required by the board by rule.
(3) Prescription drugs dispensed by a physician assistant must  be personally dispensed
by the physician assistant, except  that nonjudgmental dispensing functions may be delegated
to staff assistants when the accuracy and completeness of  the prescription is verified by the
physician assistant.
(4) The physician assistant shall maintain records of the  receipt and distribution of pre-
scription drugs. The records must be readily accessible for inspection by  the board upon re-
quest of the board.
(5) The physician assistant shall ensure that  a prescription drug dispensed by the physi-
cian assistant is labeled in compliance with the requirements of ORS 677.089 (3).
(6) The board  has sole disciplinary authority regarding a physician assistant who has
prescription drug dispensing authority.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 677.515 is amended to read:
677.515. (1) A physician assistant [ licensed under ORS 677.512 ] may provide any medical service,
including prescribing and administering controlled substances in Schedules II through V under the
federal Controlled Substances Act:
[(a) That is delegated by the physician assistant’s supervising  physician or supervising physician
organization; ]
[(b)] (a) That is within the scope of practice of the physician assistant; and
[5]
HB 4081
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(c) That is within the  scope of practice of the supervising physician or supervising physician or-
ganization;]
[(d) That is provided under the supervision of the supervising physician or supervising  physician
organization; ]
[(e) That is generally described in and in compliance with the practice agreement; and ]
[(f)] (b) For which the physician assistant has obtained informed consent as  provided in ORS
677.097, if informed consent is required.
(2) This chapter does not prohibit a  student enrolled in a program for educating physician as-
sistants approved by the Oregon Medical Board from rendering medical services if the services are
rendered in the course of the program.
(3) The degree of [ independent] autonomous judgment that a physician assistant may exercise
shall be determined [ by the supervising physician, or supervising  physician organization, and the
physician assistant in accordance  with the practice agreement ] at the physician assistant’s primary
location of practice by the community standards of care and the physician  assistant’s edu-
cation, training and experience .
[(4) A supervising physician, upon the  approval of the board and in accordance with the rules es-
tablished by the board, may  delegate to the physician assistant the authority to administer and pre-
scribe medications pursuant to this section and ORS 677.535. ]
(4)(a) A physician assistant may apply to the board for authority  to prescribe, dispense
and administer prescription drugs under this section.
(b) The  board may not limit the privilege of administering, dispensing and prescribing pre-
scription drugs to population groups federally designated as underserved, or to geographic areas
of the state that are federally designated health professional shortage areas, federally designated
medically underserved areas or areas designated  as medically disadvantaged and in need of primary
health care providers by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority or the Office of Rural  Health.
All prescriptions written pursuant  to this subsection must bear the name, office address and tele-
phone number of the [ supervising physician ] physician assistant who writes the prescription .
(5) This chapter does not require or prohibit a physician assistant from practicing in a  hospital
licensed pursuant to ORS 441.015 to 441.087.
(6) Prescriptions for  medications prescribed by a physician assistant in accordance with this
section and ORS 475.005, 677.010, 677.500, [ 677.510] 677.511 and 677.535 and dispensed by  a licensed
pharmacist may be  filled by the pharmacist according to the terms of the prescription, and the filling
of such a prescription does not constitute evidence of negligence on the part of the  pharmacist if
the prescription was dispensed within the reasonable and prudent practice of pharmacy.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 677.518 is amended to read:
677.518. A physician assistant[ , practicing under the  supervision of a supervising physician or a
supervising physician organization, is authorized to ] may complete and sign reports of death. Reports
of death signed by a physician  assistant shall [ be accepted as fulfilling ] fulfill all of the laws dealing
with reports of death. A physician assistant who  prepares a report of death [ must] shall comply with
all provisions of ORS 432.133.
SECTION 6. (1) A physician assistant practicing under a practice agreement  that was
entered into or updated  before the operative date specified in section 14 of this 2020 Act may
continue to practice under the practice agreement until the date on which  the practice
agreement must be updated.
(2) On the date on which a practice agreement is due for update, the  physician assistant
[6]
HB 4081
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
shall enter into a collaboration agreement, as defined in ORS 677.495.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 7.
 ORS 109.640 is amended to read:
109.640. (1) A physician, physician assistant licensed under ORS  677.505 to 677.525, nurse prac-
titioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390  or naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chap-
ter 685 may provide birth control information and services to any person  without regard to the age
of the person.
(2) A minor 15  years of age or older may give consent, without the consent of a parent or
guardian of the minor, to:
(a) Hospital care, medical or surgical diagnosis or treatment by a physician licensed  by the
Oregon  Medical  Board or a naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685, and dental or
surgical diagnosis or treatment by a  dentist licensed by the Oregon Board of Dentistry, except as
provided by ORS 109.660.
(b) Diagnosis or treatment by  a physician assistant who is licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525
and who is acting pursuant to a [ practice agreement ] collaboration agreement as defined in  ORS
677.495.
(c) Diagnosis and treatment by a nurse practitioner who is licensed by the Oregon  State Board
of Nursing under ORS 678.375 and who is acting within the scope  of practice for a nurse practi-
tioner.
(d) Except when the minor is obtaining contact lenses for the  first time, diagnosis and treatment
by an optometrist who is licensed by the Oregon Board of Optometry under ORS 683.010 to  683.340
and who is acting within the scope of practice for an optometrist.
SECTION 8.  ORS 441.064 is amended to read:
441.064. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Nurse practitioner” has the meaning given that term in ORS 678.010;
(b) “Physician” has the meaning given that term in ORS 677.010; and
(c) “Physician assistant” has the meaning given that term in ORS 677.495.
(2) The rules of any hospital in this state may grant privileges to nurse practitioners and phy-
sician assistants for purposes of patient care.
(3) Rules must be in writing and may include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Limitations on the scope of privileges;
(b) Monitoring and supervision  of nurse practitioners and  collaboration with  physician assist-
ants in the hospital by physicians who are members of the medical staff;
(c) A requirement that a nurse practitioner or  physician assistant co-admit patients with a
physician who is a member of the medical staff; and
(d) Qualifications of nurse practitioners and physician assistants to be eligible for privileges in-
cluding but not limited to requirements of prior clinical and hospital experience.
(4) The rules may:
(a) Regulate the credentialing and conduct  of nurse practitioners and physician assistants while
using the facilities of the hospital;
(b) Prescribe  the procedures for suspension or termination of a nurse practitioner’s or physician
assistant’s privileges; and
(c) Allow the hospital to refuse privileges to  a nurse practitioner or physician assistant , but
[7]
HB 4081
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
only on the same basis that the hospital refuses privileges to other medical providers .[; and ]
[(d) Allow the hospital to refuse privileges to a  physician assistant based on the refusal of privi-
leges to the physician assistant’s supervising physician. ]
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (3)  of this section, rules adopted by a hospital that grant privi-
leges to licensed registered nurses  who are licensed by the Oregon State Board of Nursing as nurse
practitioners specializing in nurse midwifery must:
(a) Include admitting privileges;
(b) Be consistent with the privileges of the other medical staff; and
(c) Permit the nurse practitioner specializing in nurse midwifery to exercise  the voting rights
of the other members of the medical staff.
(6) Rules described in this section are subject to hospital and medical staff bylaws and  rules
governing credentialing and staff privileges.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 688.510 is amended to read:
688.510. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Fluoroscopy” means  a technique for generating X-ray images and for presenting the X-ray
images simultaneously and continuously as a visible image.
(b) “Physician assistant” means a physician assistant licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525.
[(c) “Supervising physician” means a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 who has entered
into a practice agreement with a physician assistant as described in ORS 677.510. ]
[(d)] (c) “To practice fluoroscopy” means to initiate the generation  of X-rays and to acquire
visible images for the purpose of medical diagnosis.
(2) Except as provided in subsection [ (7)] (5) of this section, a physician assistant  may not
practice fluoroscopy on a person unless the physician assistant:
(a) Holds an active certificate issued by the Board of Medical Imaging under this section; and
(b) Operates fluoroscopic X-ray equipment in compliance with [ this section and ] rules adopted
by the board under this section[ ; and ].
[(c) Fluoroscopy is among the medical duties delegated to the physician assistant pursuant to  a
practice agreement described in ORS 677.510. ]
(3) The board shall issue a certificate to practice fluoroscopy to a physician assistant who:
(a) Completes a fluoroscopy education program approved by the board;
(b) Submits an examination application to the board in a form and manner  prescribed by the
board;
(c) Pays an examination fee established by the board by rule;
(d) Passes an examination on fluoroscopy approved by the board;
(e) Submits a  certificate application to the board in a form and manner prescribed by the board;
(f) Pays a certificate application fee established by the board by rule; and
(g) Meets the standards of ethical and professional  conduct established by a credentialing or-
ganization or professional society related to the practice of medical imaging.
(4) The board shall renew the certificate to practice fluoroscopy of a physician assistant who:
(a) Submits a renewal application to the board in a form and manner prescribed by the board;
(b) Pays a renewal fee established by the board by rule; and
(c) Completes continuing education requirements approved by the board.
[(5) A supervising physician may delegate  fluoroscopy procedures only to a physician assistant who
holds a certificate issued pursuant to this section. ]
[(6)(a) A physician assistant who holds a certificate issued pursuant to this section may practice
[8]
HB 4081
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
fluoroscopy only as authorized by this section. ]
[(b) A physician assistant may practice fluoroscopy only if: ]
[(A) The supervising physician with whom the physician assistant has  entered into a practice
agreement is in  the room where the fluoroscopic procedure is taking place at the time that the procedure
is taking place; or ]
[(B) The supervising physician with whom  the physician assistant has entered into a practice
agreement is in the building where the fluoroscopic procedure is taking place at  the time that the pro-
cedure is  taking place and a medical imaging licensee who specializes in the medical imaging modality
of radiography is in the room where the  procedure is taking place at the time that the procedure is
taking place.]
[(c) The  board may adopt by rule an exception to the requirements of paragraph (b) of this sub-
section if the board determines that the exception does  not create a risk of harm to the public health
and safety. ]
[(7)] (5) A physician assistant may practice fluoroscopy before being issued  a certificate under
this section for the purpose of completing a fluoroscopy training program. A physician  assistant
must be supervised,  as determined by the board by rule, when practicing fluoroscopy under this
subsection.
[(8)] (6) Subject to the  provisions of ORS chapter 183, the board may refuse to issue or renew
a certificate under this section or may suspend or revoke a certificate  under this section if the ap-
plicant or certificate holder violates  a provision of this section or any rule adopted by the board
under this section.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 743A.044 is amended to read:
743A.044. (1) An insurer  may not refuse a claim solely on the ground that the claim was sub-
mitted by a physician assistant rather than by a  [ supervising] physician [ for] with whom the phy-
sician assistant has entered into a collaboration agreement, as defined in ORS 677.495 .
(2) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 11.
The amendments to ORS 743A.044 by section 10  of this 2020 Act apply to
claims submitted on and after the operative date specified in section 15 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 12.  ORS 413.590 is amended to read:
413.590. (1) An approved pain management education program described  in ORS 413.572 (1)(c)
or an equivalent pain management education program as described  in ORS 675.110, 677.228,
[677.510,] 678.101, 684.092, 685.102 or 689.285 must be completed by:
(a) A physician assistant licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(b) A nurse licensed under ORS chapter 678;
(c) A psychologist licensed under ORS 675.010 to 675.150;
(d) A chiropractic physician licensed under ORS chapter 684;
(e) A naturopath licensed under ORS chapter 685;
(f) An acupuncturist licensed under ORS 677.759;
(g) A pharmacist licensed under ORS chapter 689;
(h) A dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679;
(i) An occupational therapist licensed under ORS 675.210 to 675.340;
(j) A physical therapist licensed under ORS 688.010 to 688.201; and
(k) An optometrist licensed under ORS chapter 683.
(2) The Oregon Medical  Board, in consultation with the Pain Management Commission, shall
identify by rule physicians licensed under ORS chapter  677 who, on an ongoing basis, treat patients
[9]
HB 4081
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
in chronic or terminal pain and who must complete one pain management education program  es-
tablished under ORS 413.572. The board  may identify by rule circumstances under which a require-
ment under this section may be waived.
REPEALS
SECTION 13.
Section 9, chapter 550, Oregon Laws 2011, is repealed.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 14. The unit captions used in this 2020 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2020 Act.
OPERATIVE AND EFFECTIVE DATES
SECTION 15. (1) The amendments to ORS 109.640,  413.590, 441.064, 677.495, 677.510,
677.511, 677.515, 677.518, 688.510 and 743A.044 by sections 1 to  5, 7 to 10 and 12 of this 2020
Act and the repeal of section 9, chapter 550, Oregon Laws 2011, by section 13 of this 2020 Act
become operative on January 1, 2021.
(2) The Board of Medical Imaging and the Oregon Medical Board may take  any action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the boards to exercise, on  and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section, all of the duties, functions and  powers conferred on the boards by the amendments
to ORS 109.640,  413.590, 441.064, 677.495, 677.510, 677.511, 677.515, 677.518, 688.510 and 743A.044
by sections 1 to 5, 7 to 10 and 12 of this 2020 Act and the repeal of section 9, chapter 550,
Oregon Laws 2011, by section 13 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 16.
This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[10]