Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 31.155 is amended to read:
31.155. (1) ORS 31.150 and 31.152 do not apply to  an action brought by a public body as defined
in ORS 174.109 or by the Attorney General, a district attorney, a county counsel or a city  attorney
acting in an official capacity.
(2) ORS 31.150 and 31.152 create a procedure for seeking dismissal of claims described in ORS
31.150 (2) and do not affect the substantive law governing those claims.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4884