Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 274.376 is amended to read:
274.376. As used in ORS 274.376 to 274.388:
(1) “Abandoned structure” means a structure that  has been left without authorization on, under
or over state-owned submerged or submersible lands.
(2) “Abandoned vehicle” means a motor vehicle that  has been left without authorization
on, under or over state-owned submerged or submersible lands.
[(2)] (3) “Abandoned vessel” has the meaning given that term in ORS 830.908.
[(3)] (4) “Derelict  structure” means a structure that is on, under or over state-owned submerged
or submersible lands and that is:
(a) Sunk or in imminent danger of sinking due to its dilapidated condition;
(b) Obstructing a waterway;
(c) Endangering life or property; or
(d) In dilapidated condition such that it is in danger of becoming an environmental hazard  as
evidenced by instances of leaking fuel, sewage or other pollutants.
[(4)] (5) “Derelict vessel” has the meaning given that term in ORS 830.908.
(6) “Junk” means old or scrap:
(a) Iron, steel, copper, brass or other ferrous or nonferrous  metals, or objects made of
ferrous or nonferrous metals;
(b) Motor vehicle parts, batteries, furniture, appliances or electronic equipment;
(c) Rope, rags, paper, household trash, debris or waste; or
(d) Other objects made of metal or nonmetal material.
[(5)] (7) “Marine debris” means any manufactured or processed solid material that:
(a) Persists in the marine environment; and
(b) Is disposed of or  abandoned, either with intention or unintentionally, in any waters of which
the submersible or submerged lands belong to the State of Oregon.
(8) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.360.
[(6)] (9)  “Owner” means a person who has a property interest in a  structure , [ or] a vessel , a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1974
SB 926
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
motor vehicle or junk .
SECTION 2.  ORS 274.379 is amended to read:
274.379. (1)  The Department of State Lands is authorized to seize a structure on, under or over
state-owned submerged or submersible lands if:
(a) The department determines, after providing notice and  opportunity for a hearing, that the
structure is an abandoned structure or a derelict structure; and
(b) The owner of the structure has failed to correct the  problems identified in the notice within
20 days or a longer reasonable time as specified in the notice provided under the rules adopted un-
der ORS 274.385 or within any additional time that may be granted by the department.
(2) After providing notice and opportunity for a  hearing, the department is authorized to
seize an abandoned vehicle if the vehicle’s registered owner or motor vehicle liability insurer
fails to correct  the problem identified in the notice within four days, within a longer rea-
sonable time as specified in the  notice provided under the rules adopted under ORS 274.385
or within any additional time that may be granted by the department.
(3) The department is  authorized to seize junk after providing notice in a form and
manner required by the department. The department by rule shall establish procedures for
identifying and notifying potential owners of junk for purposes of this section.
[(2)(a)] (4)(a)  The notice required under [ subsection (1) ] subsections  (1), (2) and (3)  of this
section must:
(A) Identify, with specificity, the department’s proprietary interest in and  jurisdiction over the
state-owned submerged  or submersible lands that the structure , motor vehicle or junk  is on, under
or over;
(B) Identify any person that the department has determined may have a potential interest in the
structure , motor  vehicle or junk  or the land upon which the structure , motor vehicle or junk  is
located; and
(C) Be delivered by certified mail, return receipt  requested, to any person with a potential in-
terest in the structure , motor vehicle or junk, or the land upon which the structure , motor ve-
hicle or junk  is located, as determined by the department after diligent investigation.
(b) As used in this subsection, “diligent investigation” includes but is  not limited to a search
of the county property records.
[(3)] (5) The department may remove, salvage, store and dispose of structures , motor  vehicles
and junk seized under this section.
[(4)(a)] (6)(a) Nothing in this section affects the ability of the department to:
(A) Investigate and prosecute trespasses on and damage to state lands under ORS 273.185; or
(B) Immediately seize without notice a structure , a motor vehicle or junk  that presents a
hazard to navigation or an imminent threat to public health or safety.
(b) If the  department seizes a structure , a motor vehicle or junk  without notice under this
subsection and the department wishes to salvage or dispose of the structure , motor vehicle or
junk, the department shall provide notice as provided for in the rules adopted under ORS 274.385.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 274.382 is amended to read:
274.382. (1) Except as may otherwise  be provided by the Department of State Lands by rule, the
owner of an abandoned structure , [ or] a derelict structure , an abandoned vehicle or junk  is liable
to the department for all costs  arising out of removal, salvage, storage and disposal of a structure ,
a motor vehicle or junk  seized under ORS 274.376 to 274.388. Any order imposing liability for  the
costs is an order other than a contested case and is subject to review under ORS 183.484.
[2]
SB 926
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
(2) If the department sells a structure , a motor vehicle  or junk  seized under ORS 274.376 to
274.388, the liability imposed under this section shall be reduced by the net proceeds of the sale.
(3) Except as may otherwise be provided by the department by rule, an owner of a structure , a
motor vehicle or junk  whose only interest in the structure , motor vehicle or junk  is a security
interest is not  liable for costs arising out of removal, salvage, storage and disposal of a structure ,
a motor vehicle or junk  under ORS 274.376 to 274.388.
SECTION 4.  ORS 274.385 is amended to read:
274.385. The Department of State Lands shall adopt rules  to carry out the provisions of ORS
274.376 to 274.388. The rules shall, at a minimum, include procedures:
(1) For providing notice and opportunity for a hearing prior to the seizure of  abandoned or
derelict structures , abandoned vehicles or junk  under ORS 274.376 to 274.388; and
(2) Related to the manner by which requests to the department for the use  of moneys in the
Submerged Lands Enhancement Fund may be made and evaluated by the department.
SECTION 5.  ORS 274.388 is amended to read:
274.388. (1) The Submerged Lands Enhancement Fund is  established in the State Treasury, sep-
arate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Submerged Lands Enhancement
Fund shall be credited to  the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the De-
partment of State Lands for the purposes specified in this section.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 273.105, the fund shall consist of:
(a) No more than 20 percent of the  moneys collected by the department per biennium pursuant
to the department’s granting of leases, easements, registrations and other permissions  to use or oc-
cupy state-owned submerged or submersible lands; and
(b) Moneys collected by the department under subsection (5) of this section.
(3) Moneys in the Submerged Lands Enhancement Fund may  be used to pay the expenses of the
department associated with management  and enhancement activities on state-owned submerged and
submersible lands, including but not limited to:
(a) Removal,  salvage, storage and disposal of abandoned or derelict structures , abandoned ve-
hicles or junk  under ORS 274.379;
(b) Removal and disposal of marine debris;
(c) Assistance with the  salvage, towing, storage and disposal of abandoned or derelict vessels
pursuant to ORS 830.908 to 830.948; and
(d) Engagement in activities to  improve water quality, watershed enhancement and fish and
wildlife habitat on submerged and submersible lands.
(4) The department may use moneys in the fund to provide funding to a  state agency, county,
city, water  improvement district, watershed council, park and recreation district, port district,
federally recognized Indian tribe or nonprofit organization  to assist the department in completing
any of the management and enhancement activities provided for in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The department may recover payments made from the  fund from an owner of a structure ,
[or vessel ] a motor vehicle or junk  who is liable for the costs of removal, salvage, storage and
disposal of a structure , a motor vehicle or junk  under ORS 274.382.  The department shall deposit
all moneys recovered under this subsection into the fund.
[3]