Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Assembly declares that the purposes of sections 1 to 5 of this
2019 Act are:
(1) Protecting  jobs and the state’s strategic capacity in the residential energy efficiency
industry;
(2) Enabling broad, equitable access to energy improvement projects;
(3) Improving health, safety and energy efficiency in affordable housing; and
(4) Investing in upgrades and maintaining homes to contribute to the  maintenance of our
housing stock.
SECTION 2.
As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2019 Act:
(1) “Affordable  housing” includes residential structures occupied by persons having low
or very low income.
(2) “Construction contractor” means a person holding  a valid license endorsement listed
under ORS 701.021 (2)(a)  to (c) and holding any additional license, certificate, qualification
or endorsement required by the Construction Contractors Board to provide  the services
rendered.
(3) “Energy  improvement project” means construction, reconstruction, alteration or re-
pair that reduces the energy  requirements of a residential structure through energy con-
servation, weatherization improvements or increased energy efficiency. “Energy
improvement project” does not include a project related to:
(a) Ground source heat pumps;
(b) Swimming pool heating;
(c) Hot tubs or spas; or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2435
HB 3094
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Energy generation.
(4) “Low income” and “very low income” have the meanings given those terms  in ORS
458.610.
(5) “Median income” means the median family  income for an area, subject to adjustment
for areas having  unusually high or low incomes or housing costs, all as determined by the
Oregon Housing Stability Council based on  information from the United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development.
(6) “Residential structure” has the meaning given that term in ORS 701.005.
SECTION 3.
(1) There is established  the Home Weatherization, Retrofit and Affordability
Program in the Housing and Community Services Department. Through the program,  the
department shall provide incentive payments under this  section and sections 4 and 5 of this
2019 Act to construction contractors undertaking energy improvement projects.
(2) The department shall  determine the incentive payment for an energy improvement
project under this section by multiplying a payment  rate by the amount of the energy effi-
ciency resulting from  the project over the projected effective useful life of the improvements.
For an improvement project that:
(a) Reduces electrical energy requirements, the  units of increased energy efficiency are
based on the projected reduction in  electrical energy requirements measured in kilowatt-
hours;
(b) Reduces natural gas energy requirements,  the units of increased energy efficiency are
based on the projected reduction in natural gas energy requirements  measured in therms;
and
(c) Reduces wood or oil energy requirements, the units of increased energy efficiency  are
based on the projected  reduction in wood or oil energy requirements measured in millions
of British thermal units (MMBTU).
(3) The department shall establish payment rate schedules  by rule. The department shall
review and modify schedules biennially. The schedules may provide higher payment rates for
energy improvement projects on properties owned by persons or  families of median, low or
very low income or projects in rural areas.
(4) Payments may not be made for a property under this section unless:
(a) The property is owner-occupied and the  owner’s household has income during the
most recently completed tax year of no more than $150,000;
(b) The property is affordable housing as determined by the department; or
(c) The owner is a charitable nonprofit.
(5)(a) To the extent that  the annual budget for the program does not permit the full
implementation of the program, the department  may revise the program consistent with the
purposes of the program to focus on:
(A) Continuing state engagement in providing customer support for the  energy improve-
ment projects;
(B) Signaling that the energy improvement projects are beneficial to both residents and
their communities; and
(C) Maintaining a program framework that may be expanded upon receipt  of additional
funding.
(b) In revising the program under  this subsection, the department shall maintain the
following program principles:
[2]
HB 3094
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The program is available to properties statewide, but with an emphasis on  projects
undertaken in rural areas;
(B) All construction contractors have access to the program; and
(C) The program is accessible to property owners across a wide range of income levels.
(c) In revising the program under this subsection, the department may consider adjusting
any parameters in the program, including the following:
(A) Reducing the target average percentage of funded project costs;
(B) Reducing project incentive caps;
(C) Providing differing targets, caps or eligibility for the benefit  of lower income property
owners; or
(D) Providing a list of preapproved maximum allowable program  costs for certain energy
improvement projects.
(6) The department, with the assistance of the  Construction Contractors Board, shall
encourage construction contractors to communicate to customers who inquire  about im-
provement projects information regarding the  existence of the Home Weatherization,
Retrofit and Affordability Program and the program’s payment rate schedules and eligibility
guidelines under subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Housing and Community Services Department  shall develop and
make available methods for a construction contractor to estimate  the reduced energy re-
quirements expected from an energy improvement project and  estimate the corresponding
incentive payment.
(2) No more than once per month,  a contractor may submit to the department informa-
tion, in a form and manner approved by the department, that includes:
(a) Estimates for energy improvement projects the contractor intends to carry out;
(b) The amount  of the estimated incentive payment for an energy improvement project
as a line item on a written contract for the improvement project; and
(c) Copies of invoices,  estimates or contracts given to a property owner that apply the
estimated incentive payment to reduce the amount owed.
(3) Upon receipt  of the information submitted under subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall reserve  moneys if the proposed qualifying energy improvement projects
listed total $250 or more. The department shall pay to the contractor the incentive  payment
owed upon timely receipt of proof acceptable to the department that the  project is completed
if funds are in reserve. Requests for incentive payments for which  moneys are not in reserve
are contingent on the availability of funds not in reserve.
(4) The department shall remove from reserved moneys amounts for incentive payments
if the department does not receive proof, on or before the  180th day after receiving infor-
mation for the energy improvement project under subsection (2) of this section,  that the
project is complete.
(5) If the department denies any of an incentive payment due to  the lack of available
funds, a contractor may not recover the  denied portion of the payment from the property
owner.
SECTION 5.
The maximum amounts paid from the Home Weatherization, Retrofit and
Affordability Program described in section 3 of this 2019 Act during a calendar year for en-
ergy improvement projects that reduce energy requirements as described in section 3  (2) of
this 2019 Act are:
[3]
HB 3094
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
(1) $4,500 per single-family residence; or
(2) For multifamily residential  structure, the lesser of $4,500 per improved dwelling unit
or $45,000 total for the structure.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall collect informa-
tion the department deems necessary to report relevant  outcomes for the Home
Weatherization, Retrofit and Affordability Program under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(2) No later than September 15, 2020, and each year thereafter, the  department shall
provide a report to the Legislative Assembly or an  appropriate committee of the Legislative
Assembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 on the  information collected under
subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 7. The amount  of $  is established for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2019,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Housing and Community
Services Department to carry out  the Home Weatherization, Retrofit and Affordability Pro-
gram described in section 3 of this 2019 Act  from any moneys appropriated or otherwise
provided for purposes of the program.
SECTION 8. The Housing and Community Services Department shall request, as part of
its budget appropriations for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, the amount  of
$  to carry out the Home Weatherization,  Retrofit and Affordability Program
described in section 3 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 9. Section 10 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 470.
SECTION 10. The Home Weatherization, Retrofit and Affordability Program described in
section 3 of this 2019 Act is a weatherization  program for purposes of referral to the Housing
and Community Services Department under ORS 470.650.
SECTION 11. The Housing and Community Services Department may enter  into intera-
gency agreements with other units of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, to carry
out department programs that provide home weatherization assistance.
SECTION 12. (1) Sections 1 to 11 of this 2019 Act are repealed on January 2, 2023.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if  moneys appropriated for the pur-
poses of  the Home Weatherization, Retrofit and Affordability Program established under
section 3 of this 2019 Act  were reserved under section 4 (3) of this 2019 Act on or before
December 31, 2022, the  moneys may be paid by the Housing and Community Services De-
partment to a construction contractor that has submitted proof of completion of  the energy
improvement project that is timely under section 4  (4) of this 2019 Act if the department
makes the payment on or before June 30, 2023.
SECTION 13. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]