Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2017 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 413.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in sections 2 and 3 of this 2016 Act:
(a) “Community  benefit initiatives” means innovative programs or projects that benefit
the health of the community, including but not limited to  investments in health care man-
agement capabilities and increasing the  capacity of the provider networks to serve the health
care needs of the community.
(b) “Eligibility categories” means the bases on which members  of a coordinated care or-
ganization qualify for medical assistance.
(c) “Flexible services” means services that are  provided in lieu of or as an adjunct to
covered services, such as items or services that address the social determinants of health.
(d) “Related party” means any entity that:
(A) Enters into any type of arrangement with or receives services from a  coordinated
care organization; and
(B) Is associated with the coordinated care organization  by any form of common, pri-
vately held ownership, control or investment.
(e) “Social determinants of  health” means the conditions in which individuals are born,
grow, live, work and age, including but not limited  to food, safe housing, economic opportu-
nities, health care, transportation and education.
SECTION 3.
(1) It is the intent of the  Legislative Assembly that the expenditures of the
Oregon Health Authority in administering the medical assistance program and the manner
in which the authority establishes global budgets for coordinated care  organizations be fully
transparent and available to the public at all times.
(2) The authority shall make readily available to the public the following information:
(a) All  documentation submitted to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in
seeking federal approval of global budgets for coordinated care organizations.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1616
SB 233
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) All documents, financial data and health care utilization data considered by the au-
thority in calculating global budgets for each coordinated care  organization, including but
not limited to the average utilization of each category of service per 1,000 members of the
coordinated care organization,  broken down by the geographic regions and eligibility catego-
ries of the members.
(c) Each coordinated care organization’s related party arrangements.
(3) The authority shall use accurate  and uniform standards for measuring and reporting,
to the public, the Legislative Assembly and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid  Services,
medical loss ratios, administrative costs and earnings.
SECTION 4. 
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall determine the health services  to be
provided by a coordinated care organization  prior to establishing the global budget for the
coordinated care organization. The determination shall be made no  more than once every
12-month period, unless changes are required by federal law.
(2) In establishing the global budget for a  coordinated care organization for a calendar
year, the authority:
(a) Shall use a single statewide risk score methodology;
(b) Shall include funding for clearly identified flexible services;
(c) May not deduct for quality  bonus funds received or quality expenditures made by a
coordinated care organization; and
(d) Shall take into account the coordinated care organization’s:
(A) Costs incurred, expenditures and reinvestment of savings into:
(i) Providing health services; and
(ii) Providing flexible services, community benefit  initiatives and other means of ad-
dressing the social determinants of health; and
(B) Financial arrangements with related parties to ensure  that the financial arrange-
ments:
(i) Are not significantly  different from financial arrangements that would have been en-
tered into in the absence of the relationship between the parties; and
(ii) Do not allow  the opportunity for a coordinated care organization to understate its
earnings and reserves.
(3) The data reporting requirements established by the authority for coordinated  care
organizations must be uniform and sufficiently detailed to allow for comparisons of the  data
between coordinated care organizations and must include the information required by section
3 of this 2017 Act.
(4) The  authority shall provide to each coordinated care organization, no later than Oc-
tober 1 of  each calendar year, the specific requirements and outcomes that the coordinated
care organization must satisfy in order to qualify for incentive  payments in the following
calendar year.
(5) The authority’s actuary must certify the final global budget for each  coordinated care
organization by rate cell and document the underlying  data, assumptions and methodologies
used in doing so.
(6) A coordinated care organization may contest the  final global budget established for
the coordinated care organization by filing an appeal with  the Department of Consumer and
Business Services in accordance with section 5  of this 2017 Act. The coordinated care or-
ganization may seek  judicial review in accordance with ORS 183.480 to dispute a global budget
[2]
SB 233
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
established by the authority  following remand by the department under section 5 (2) of this
2017 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall implement
procedures, consistent with ORS  chapter 183, for the review of an appeal filed by a coordi-
nated care organization under section 4 (6) of this 2017 Act.  The review shall be de novo and
shall consider, upon the request of the coordinated care organization:
(a) Whether the  Oregon Health Authority complied with the provisions of section 4 of
this 2017 Act; and
(b) Whether the underlying data,  assumptions and methodologies used by the authority’s
actuary support the global budget established by the authority.
(2) The department shall accept, reject or modify any portion of the global budget or  re-
mand the issue to the  authority with orders to modify the rate setting process to ensure
fairness, equity and a correct result.
(3) The department’s determination and orders under subsection (2)  of this section are
not subject to judicial review.
[3]