Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Criminal Justice Division of the Department of Justice by section 1  (3), chapter
382, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by  $2,416,495 for
the purpose of  funding positions to support the Internet Crimes Against Children Task
Force.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3