Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “Foster Youth Promise student” means a student
enrolled in community college or a public university listed in ORS  352.002 who is entitled to
a tuition waiver under ORS 350.300.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in coordination with  community
colleges and public universities, shall establish foster youth  success centers in each public
university.
(3) Foster youth success centers established pursuant to this section shall:
(a) Develop and implement peer support programs for Foster Youth Promise students;
(b) Provide outreach  and mentoring to advise foster youth who are attending high school
about their educational options; and
(c) Develop and implement additional support programs to promote the success of Foster
Youth Promise students.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in  this section, “Foster Youth Promise student” means a student
enrolled in community college or a  public university listed in ORS 352.002 who is entitled to
a tuition waiver under ORS 350.300.
(2) The Legislative Assembly finds  that providing Foster Youth Promise students who are
attending public universities with support programs as provided in section 1 of this  2017 Act
will:
(a) Ensure that Foster Youth Promise students succeed in their educational endeavors;
(b) Positively impact the educational  and career prospects of current and future Foster
Youth Promise students; and
(c) Strengthen the efficacy of the tuition waiver  provided to foster youth and former
foster youth under ORS 350.300.
(3) The  factors described in subsection (2) of this section will encourage and promote
economic development within the State of Oregon, and issuance of  lottery bonds to finance
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2756
SB 396
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
the agreement is therefore an appropriate use of state lottery funds under  Article XV, sec-
tion 4, of the Oregon Constitution, and ORS 461.510.
(4) At the request of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, the State Treasurer
is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to  286A.585 for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, in an amount not to exceed $____  million for the purpose described in
subsection (5) of this section, plus  an additional amount, to be estimated by the State
Treasurer, for payment of bond-related costs incurred by the commission and the State
Treasurer.
(5) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to this section must be  deposited into
the Foster Youth Success Center Fund established in section 3 of this 2017 Act in an  amount
sufficient to provide $___ million in  net proceeds and interest earnings for disbursement to
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission to fund  foster youth success centers de-
scribed in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(6) Bond-related costs incurred by the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission and
the State Treasurer for  the lottery bonds authorized by this section must be paid from the
gross proceeds of the lottery bonds and  from allocations for purposes of ORS 286A.576 (1)(c).
SECTION 3.
(1) The Foster Youth Success Center Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The moneys in the Foster  Youth
Success Center Fund and the interest earnings on moneys in the fund are continuously  ap-
propriated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for the purposes described  in
subsection (2)  of this section. The fund consists of moneys deposited into the fund under
section 2 of this 2017 Act, and may include other  fees, revenues or other income transferred
into the fund by the  Legislative Assembly for payment of costs incurred to establish the
Foster Youth Success Center Fund.
(2) Moneys in  the fund are available for immediate distribution to the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission to:
(a) Pay the costs  incurred to fund foster youth success centers described in section 1 of
this 2017 Act.
(b) Pay bond-related costs, as defined in ORS 286A.560.
SECTION 4.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]