Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) On or before  January 1, 2027, the Department of State Lands shall deliver
a petition to the United States Congress requesting the  transfer of federal public lands under
the management of the Bureau of Land  Management or United States Forest Service to this
state for land that is within any county that:
(a) Has more than 50 percent of its land area owned or managed by the federal  govern-
ment; and
(b) By ordinance, has requested that the department include the county within  the plan
for the lands under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) For any lands described under subsection (1) of this section that are transferred  to
this state in response to the petition under this  section, the department shall establish a
program by which the department:
(a) Holds the lands in perpetual trust that is managed by the department.
(b) Annually distributes the  profits and interests from the lands to the counties in which
the lands are sited to  be used only for education, health or economic development of the
residents of the county.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. The repeal of section 1  of this 2025 Act by section 2 of this 2025 Act does
not repeal any program or trust established by the Department of State Lands under section
1 (2) of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2388