Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 459.125 is amended to read:
459.125. (1) Subject to subsection (3) of this section  and  ORS 459.145 and the requirements
of ORS 459.005 to 459.437  and 459.705 to 459.790, the board of county commissioners of Marion
County may:
(a) Sell, enter into short or long-term contracts, solicit bids, enter into direct negotiations, deal
with brokers or use other methods of sale or disposal for the products or by-products  of the disposal
sites of the county.
(b) Require any person or class of persons who generate solid  waste to make use of the disposal,
transfer or material or energy recovery sites or facilities of the county  or disposal, transfer or ma-
terial or energy recovery sites or facilities designated by the county.
(c) Require any person or class of persons who pick up, collect or transport solid waste  to make
use of  the disposal, transfer or material or energy recovery sites or facilities of the county or dis-
posal, transfer or material or energy recovery sites or facilities designated by the county.
(d) Regulate,  license, franchise and certify disposal, transfer and material or energy recovery
sites or facilities; establish, maintain and amend rates charged by  disposal, transfer and material or
energy recovery sites or facilities; establish and  collect license or franchise fees; and otherwise
control and regulate the establishment  and operation of all public or private disposal, transfer and
material or energy recovery sites or facilities located within  the county. Licenses or franchises
granted by the board may be exclusive.
(e) Cause solid wastes received and accepted at the disposal sites of the county to be processed,
recycled or reused.
(2) Contracts and other  agreements authorized under subsection (1) of this section may be for
terms not longer than 20 years.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection  (1) of this section, a city within Marion County may
control or direct the  disposal, transfer or material or energy recovery of any solid waste
generated within the city and enter into contracts  for the disposal, transfer or material or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4167
SB 1067
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
energy recovery of any solid waste generated within the city.
(b) Before exercising  the authorities granted to the city under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, a city must adopt an ordinance setting forth the extent to which the city will
exercise those authorities.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 459.145 is amended to read:
459.145. (1) ORS 459.125 and 459.135  do not apply to, or grant to Marion County any authority
over:
[(1)] (a)  Material kept separate  from waste material for the purpose of recycling or reuse by
persons who generate solid waste and which is handled separately from waste material.
[(2)] (b)  Material or energy  recovery involving the collection, storage, processing or use of ma-
terials kept separate from waste material for the purpose of recycling or reuse  by persons who
generate solid waste.
(2) ORS 459.125 (1) and (2) and 459.135 do not apply to, and ORS 459.125 and 459.135  do not
grant to Marion County any authority over, the  disposal, transfer or material or energy re-
covery of solid waste controlled or directed by a city under ORS 459.125 (3).
[2]