Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 702.200, as amended by section 1, chapter 15, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
702.200. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Athletic association, conference or organization with authority over  intercollegiate sports”
includes the National Collegiate Athletic Association.
(b) “Post-secondary institution of education” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(B) An Oregon-based, generally accredited, private institution of higher education.
(c)[(A)] “Student’s rights” means the rights of a student enrolled in a post-secondary institution
of education to earn compensation for use of the student’s name, image, likeness  or athletic repu-
tation and to contract with and retain professional representation or an athlete agent.
[(B) “Student’s rights” does  not include a right to receive compensation from a post-secondary in-
stitution of education. ]
(2)(a) Except as provided  in this section, a post-secondary institution of education or an athletic
association, conference or organization with authority over intercollegiate sports may not:
(A) Prohibit, prevent or restrict a student athlete from exercising the student’s rights.
(B) Penalize or retaliate against a student athlete for exercising the student’s rights.
(C) Prohibit a student athlete  from participating in an intercollegiate sport for exercising the
student’s rights.
(D) Impose an eligibility requirement on a scholarship or grant that requires a student athlete
to refrain from exercising the student’s rights.
(E) Prohibit a student athlete from receiving food, drink, lodging or  medical expenses or insur-
ance coverage from a third party as compensation for use of the student’s name, image, likeness  or
athletic  reputation.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4645
SB 1193
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Except as provided  in this section, an athletic association, conference or organization with
authority over intercollegiate sports may not:
(A) Prevent a post-secondary institution of education  or a student athlete from participating in
intercollegiate sports, accept  a complaint, open an investigation or take any other adverse action
against a post-secondary institution of education or a student athlete as a result of a  violation, or
an alleged violation, of the rules or regulations of the athletic association,  conference or organiza-
tion related to a student athlete exercising the student’s rights.
(B) Authorize, cause or allow any post-secondary institution of education that is a  member of
the association, conference or organization to take an action prohibited under paragraph (a) of  this
subsection.
(3)(a) A student athlete may not enter into a contract that provides compensation  to the student
athlete for use of  the student athlete’s name, image, likeness or athletic reputation if terms of the
contract conflict with the student athlete’s team  rules or with terms of a contract entered into be-
tween the student athlete’s post-secondary institution of  education and a third party, except neither
the team rules nor a contract entered  into between the post-secondary institution of education and
a third party may prevent a student  athlete from earning compensation for use of the student
athlete’s name, image, likeness or athletic reputation when not  engaged in official team activities,
including participating in or being part of an  advertisement that was created while not engaged in
official  team  activities but that may otherwise be broadcasted, displayed or disseminated at any
time.
(b) A student athlete who enters into  a contract that provides compensation to the student
athlete for use of the student athlete’s name,  image, likeness or athletic reputation shall disclose the
contract  to  an official of the post-secondary institution of education designated by the institution if
the student athlete is a team member or, if the student athlete is not  a team member, at the time
the student athlete seeks to become a team member.
(c) If the post-secondary institution of education asserts that the terms  of the contract conflict
with the team rules or with terms of a contract entered into between the student athlete’s  post-
secondary  institution  of education and a third party, the institution shall disclose the specific rules
or terms asserted to be in conflict to the student athlete or to the student athlete’s professional
representative or athlete agent if the student athlete is represented.
(4)(a) A post-secondary institution of education [ or an athletic association,  conference or organ-
ization with authority over intercollegiate sports ] may [ not] provide to a prospective or current stu-
dent athlete compensation for use of the  student athlete’s name, image, likeness or athletic
reputation.
(b) For any written contract that provides compensation under  this subsection to a stu-
dent athlete who  is a minor, the contract must include written consent of the parent or
guardian of the student athlete.
(c) An athletic association, conference or organization  with authority over intercollegiate
sports may not provide to  a prospective or current student athlete compensation for use of
the student athlete’s name, image, likeness or athletic reputation.
(5) A student athlete may not contract with or retain a person as the  student athlete’s athlete
agent, if the person represented or was employed by a  post-secondary institution of education at any
time in the preceding four years.
(6) Nothing in this section  prohibits a post-secondary institution of education from establishing
or enforcing a conduct code that is applicable to all students enrolled at the institution.
[2]
SB 1193
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
(7)(a) A student  athlete’s compensation for use of the student’s name, image, likeness or athletic
reputation may not be conditioned on the athletic performance of the student athlete.
(b) A person or entity that provides compensation to a student athlete for the  use of the student
athlete’s name, image, likeness or athletic  reputation may condition payment of the compensation
on a student athlete’s attendance at a particular post-secondary institution of education.
(8) An athletic association, conference or organization with authority over  intercollegiate sports
may not prohibit a post-secondary institution of education from identifying,  facilitating, enabling or
supporting opportunities for a  current student athlete to exercise the student athlete’s student’s
rights at the student athlete’s post-secondary institution of education , or  from providing compen-
sation to the student athlete in accordance with this section .
(9) A  post-secondary institution of education, or an employee of a post-secondary institution of
education, may not be held liable for any damages to a student athlete’s ability to exercise the
student athlete’s student’s rights due to any decision or action made by the  post-secondary institu-
tion of education or employee:
(a) That is routinely taken in the course of intercollegiate sports; or
(b) That is part  of identifying, facilitating, enabling or supporting opportunities for the current
student athlete  to exercise the student athlete’s student’s rights at the student athlete’s post-
secondary institution of education.
[3]