Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall study the effect of  dif-
ferent types of sentences on recidivism rates of sex offenders.
(2) The  commission shall provide the results of the study, including any recommended
legislative changes, in a report to the appropriate interim committees of the  Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than December 31, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3106