Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ENERGY POLICY
SECTION 1.
 ORS 469.010 is amended to read:
469.010. The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Continued growth in  demand for [ nonrenewable energy forms ] energy, at affordable cost,
poses a  serious and immediate, as well as future, concern. [ problem. It is essential that future gen-
erations not be left a legacy of vanished or depleted resources, resulting in  massive environmental, so-
cial and financial impact. ]
(2) It is the goal of Oregon to  promote the efficient use of energy resources [ and to develop
permanently sustainable energy resources. The need exists for comprehensive state leadership  in energy
production, distribution and utilization. ] consistent with state environmental policy.  It is, there-
fore, the policy of Oregon:
(a) That the development and use of a diverse array of  affordable, sustainable energy re-
sources be  encouraged. [permanently sustainable energy resources be encouraged utilizing to the
highest degree possible the private sector of our free enterprise system. ]
(b) That the development of  energy resources be accomplished consistent with state
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4297
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
greenhouse gas reduction goals.
[(b)] (c)  That through state government example and policy [ other effective communications ], en-
ergy conservation and  elimination of wasteful and uneconomical uses of energy and materials be
promoted. [ This conservation must include, but not be limited  to, resource recovery and materials re-
cycling.]
[(c) That the  basic human needs of every citizen, present and future, shall be given priority in the
allocation of energy resources, commensurate with perpetuation of a free and productive  economy with
special attention to the preservation and enhancement of environmental quality. ]
(d) That state government assist every citizen and industry in adjusting to [ a diminished avail-
ability of energy ] changes in the available mix of energy resources and to climate change .
(e) That energy-efficient modes of transportation  [ for people and goods ] shall be encouraged[ ,
while energy-inefficient modes of transportation shall be discouraged ].
(f) That cost-effectiveness , balanced with environmental policy considerations,  be considered
in [ state] agency decision-making relating to  energy sources, facilities or conservation[ , and that
cost-effectiveness be considered in all agency decision-making relating to energy facilities ].
(g) That  state government shall provide a source of impartial and objective information in order
that this energy policy may be enhanced.
OREGON ENERGY AND CLIMATE BOARD
SECTION 2. Sections 3, 4, 6 and 7 of this 2017 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
469.010 to 469.155.
(Establishment)
SECTION 3. (1) In order to  ensure close correspondence among Oregon Department of
Energy and Climate policies  and programs, the public interest and state climate policies,
there is created the Oregon Energy and Climate Board.
(2) The Energy  and Climate Director and an Oregon member of the Pacific Northwest
Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council  shall serve as ex officio members of the
board.
(3) The Governor shall appoint five members to the board, subject to confirmation by  the
Senate as provided in ORS 171.562  and 171.565. Members of the board appointed under this
subsection must be residents of this state well informed in energy and climate issues and
shall include the following:
(a) One member who is an economist;
(b) One member from an institution of higher education  in Oregon with expertise in en-
ergy and climate issues;
(c) One member who represents residential energy users;
(d) One member who represents commercial or industrial energy users; and
(e) One member with expertise in transportation issues.
(4) A member of  the board may not hold any pecuniary interest in, have any contract
of employment with, or have any substantial voluntary transactions with any  business entity
conduction operations which if conducted in  this state would be subject to the energy re-
source supplier assessment imposed under ORS 469.421 (8).
[2]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 4. (1) The term of office of  each member appointed to the Oregon Energy and
Climate Board is four years, but the  members of the board may be removed by the Governor.
Before the expiration of the term  of a member, the Governor shall appoint a successor to
assume the duties of the member on July 1 of the next following year.
(2) A member is eligible for reappointment, but no member may serve  more than two
consecutive terms. In case  of a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an ap-
pointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(3) The board shall select one of its members as chairperson and another as vice  chair-
person, for terms and with duties and powers  necessary for the performance of the functions
of the offices as the board determines.
(4) A majority of the members of the board  constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(5) The board shall meet once during each calendar quarter  at a time and place deter-
mined by the chairperson. The board may hold additional meetings at times and places  de-
termined by the chairperson or the Energy and Climate  Director, or as requested by a
majority of the members.
(6) A member of the board is not entitled to compensation  but may be reimbursed from
funds available to the board for actual and  necessary travel and other expenses incurred by
the member in the performance of the member’s official duties in  the manner and amount
provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding the term of office specified by section  3 of this 2016 Act,
of the members first appointed by the Governor to the Oregon Energy and Climate Board:
(1) One shall serve for a term ending July 1, 2019.
(2) One shall serve for a term ending July 1, 2020.
(3) One shall serve for a term ending July 1, 2021.
(4) Two shall serve for terms ending July 1, 2022.
(Duties)
SECTION 6.
(1) The Oregon Energy and  Climate Board shall advise the Oregon Depart-
ment of Energy and Climate regarding:
(a) The implementation, administration and enforcement of  department programs and
activities;
(b) The  development of department policies in accordance with the policy stated in ORS
469.010 and state environmental policies; and
(c) The preparation for submission to the Governor budget  forms under ORS 291.208 for
purposes related to the compilation and preparation of the Governor’s budget  under ORS
291.216.
(2) In advising the department under subsection (1) of this section the board shall give
due regard to the department’s role in aiding agencies of the executive department as defined
in ORS 174.122 in the achievement of the  greenhouse gas reduction goals established by ORS
468A.205.
(3) By  arrangement with the chairperson, the Energy and Climate Director shall review
with the board the activities of the department and,  subject to policy direction by the board,
outline the methods, policies and program of work for the department.
[3]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) The board shall receive regular reports from the Energy Facility Siting  Council and
the Oregon Hanford Cleanup Board.
INTERAGENCY CLIMATE COORDINATING COMMITTEE
SECTION 7. (1) The Interagency Climate Coordinating Committee is established, con-
sisting of the following ex officio members:
(a) The Director of Transportation;
(b) The chairperson of the Public Utility Commission of Oregon;
(c) The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality;
(d) The Director of Agriculture;
(e) The State Forester;
(f) The Water Resources Director;
(g) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department;
(h) The State Fish and Wildlife Director; and
(i) Any number of additional ex  officio members, each from a state agency, as the Oregon
Energy and Climate Board  determines are necessary to ensure that all state agencies
charged with administering policies or programs related to  energy and climate are repres-
ented on the committee.
(2) The committee shall, as requested by the Oregon Energy and  Climate Board, collab-
orate to identify, evaluate and make  recommendations to the Oregon Energy and Climate
Board on ways to coordinate state  policies and programs related to energy and climate, with
a focus on better coordination of policies or  programs so as to increase the effectiveness of
efforts to reduce greenhouse gas emissions  in Oregon consistent with the greenhouse gas
emissions reduction goals established by ORS 468A.205.
(3) The committee shall meet  with the Oregon Energy and Climate Board at such times
and places as are specified by the  call of the chairperson of the Oregon Energy and Climate
Board.
CLIMATE CENSUS REPORT
SECTION 8.
(1) The  Oregon Energy and Climate Board and the Oregon Department of
Energy and Climate shall review and develop a report  on the existing policies and programs
of all  agencies of the executive department, as defined in ORS 174.112, that relate to
greenhouse gas emissions or climate change. For each  climate policy or program, the report
shall describe:
(a) The policy or program and its goals;
(b) Implementation and budget information related to the policy or program;
(c) Any metrics  that have been applied to measure the progress of the agency toward
achieving the goals of the policy or program, and the results of the policy or program based
on those metrics or on other measures of performance; and
(d) Any other relevant data or information.
(2) Based on the review and cataloging of existing climate policies  and programs by the
board and the department under subsection (1) of this section, the board and  the department
shall include in the report a proposal, which may  include recommendations for legislation,
[4]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for restructuring this state’s policies and programs that relate to  greenhouse gas emissions
or climate change, with the goals of ensuring that:
(a) The State of Oregon has an identified agency that is charged with  a definitive lead-
ership role  in climate policy and program coordination, development, analysis and
prioritization;
(b) All state climate policies and programs are  being administered in a manner that is
well-coordinated and that positions this state to achieve the greenhouse gas emissions re-
duction goals set forth in ORS 468A.205; and
(c) All agencies of the executive department  have systems in place to accurately evalu-
ate:
(A) The effectiveness of climate policies or programs administered by the agencies;
(B) Future objectives related to climate  and how those objectives may be best achieved
in a coordinated manner; and
(C) Additional greenhouse gas mitigation strategies that may be pursued by agencies.
(3) The board and the department shall submit the report  required by this section to the
appropriate interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  no later than September 15,
2018.
SECTION 9.
Section 8 of this 2017 Act is repealed on December 31, 2018.
PROVISIONS ABOLISHING GLOBAL WARMING COMMISSION
SECTION 10. The Oregon Global Warming Commission is abolished.
SECTION 11. ORS 468A.210, 468A.215, 468A.220, 468A.225, 468A.230, 468A.235, 468A.240,
468A.245, 468A.250, 468A.255 and 468A.260 are repealed.
SECTION 12. (1) The Chairperson of the Oregon Global Warming Commission shall:
(a) Deliver to the Oregon Department of Energy  and Climate all records, property and
work product within the jurisdiction  of the chairperson that relate to the duties, functions
and powers of the Oregon  Global Warming Commission as those duties, functions and powers
existed prior to the effective date of the abolishment  of the commission by section 10 of this
2017 Act.
(2) The Energy and Climate Director shall take possession  of the records, property and
work product.
(3) The Governor shall resolve any dispute  between the Oregon Global Warming Com-
mission and the Oregon  Department of Energy and Climate relating to transfers of records,
property and work product under this section, and the Governor’s decision is final.
SECTION 13.  ORS 352.823 is amended to read:
352.823. (1) The Oregon Climate  Change Research Institute is established at Oregon State Uni-
versity. In administering the institute, Oregon State University may  seek the cooperation of other
public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(2) The purpose of the Oregon Climate Change Research Institute is to:
(a) Facilitate research by faculty at public universities listed in ORS 352.002 on  climate change
and its effects on natural and human systems in Oregon;
(b) Serve as a clearinghouse for climate change information;
(c) Provide climate change information to the public in integrated and accessible formats;  and
[(d) Support the Oregon Global Warming Commission in developing strategies to prepare for and
[5]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to mitigate the effects of climate change on natural and human systems; and ]
[(e)] (d)  Provide technical assistance to local governments to assist them  in developing climate
change policies, practices and programs.
(3) The Oregon Climate Change Research Institute shall assess,  at least once each biennium, the
state of climate change science, including biological, physical and social science, as  it relates to
Oregon and the likely effects of climate change on the state. The institute shall  submit the assess-
ment to the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 and to the Governor.
(4) State agencies may contract with the Oregon Climate Change  Research Institute to fulfill
agency needs regarding the collection, storage,  integration, analysis, dissemination and monitoring
of climate change information, research and training.
STATE DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY
(Modification of General Duties; Name Change)
SECTION 14.  ORS 469.030 is amended to read:
469.030. (1) There is created the [ State] Oregon Department of Energy  and Climate .
(2) [ The State Department of Energy shall: ] Subject to the policy direction of the Oregon
Energy and Climate  Board, and in furtherance of the energy policies stated in ORS 469.010
and 469.310, the Oregon Department of Energy and Climate shall:
(a) Provide technical analysis and expert advice  to the Governor and the Legislative As-
sembly on energy and climate policy;
[(a)] (b) [Be] Collect, compile and analyze energy data and serve as  the central repository
within the state government for [ the collection of  data on energy resources; ] energy and climate
information, to which all agencies shall send information on all energy  and climate-related
research;
(c) Monitor energy industry research and developments;
[(b) Endeavor to utilize all public and private sources to inform and educate the public about  en-
ergy problems and ways in which the public can conserve energy resources; ]
(d) Track and evaluate:
(A) Progress toward achieving the  greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals established
by ORS 468A.205;
(B) The advancement of regional, national and international  policies to reduce
greenhouse gas emissions;
(C) Local and regional efforts to prepare for the effects of climate change; and
(D) Other  information, policies or analyses that the department determines will aid in the
achievement of the greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals established by ORS 468A.205;
[(c)] (e)  Engage in research, but whenever possible, contract with appropriate  public or private
agencies  and  dispense funds for research projects and other services related to energy resources
and climate , except that the State Department of Energy shall endeavor to  avoid duplication of
research whether completed or in progress;
[(d)] (f)  Qualify for,  accept and disburse or utilize any private or federal moneys or services
available for the  administration of ORS [ 176.820,] 192.501 to 192.505, [ 192.690,] 469.010 to 469.155,
469.300 to 469.563, 469.990, 757.710 and 757.720;
[(e)] (g)  Administer federal and state energy allocation and  conservation programs and energy
[6]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
research and development programs and apply for and receive available funds  [ therefor] for the
programs;
[(f) Be a clearinghouse for energy research  to which all agencies shall send information on all
energy related research; ]
[(g)] (h)  Prepare contingent energy programs to include all forms of energy not  otherwise pro-
vided pursuant to ORS 757.710 and 757.720;
[(h) Maintain an inventory of energy research projects in Oregon and the results thereof; ]
[(i) Collect, compile and analyze energy statistics, data and information; ]
[(j)] (i)  Contract with public and private agencies for  energy activities consistent with ORS
469.010 and this section;
[(k)] (j)  Upon request of the governing body of any affected jurisdiction, coordinate a public  re-
view of a proposed transmission line according to the provisions of ORS 469.442; and
[(L) Advise the Governor on energy-related matters. ]
(k) Provide staff support to the Oregon Energy and Climate Board, the Oregon Hanford
Cleanup Board and the Energy Facility Siting Council.
SECTION 15. (1) The  amendments to ORS 469.030 by section 14 of this 2017 Act are in-
tended to change the name of the “State Department of Energy” to  the “Oregon Department
of Energy and Climate.”
(2) For the purpose of harmonizing and clarifying  statute sections published in Oregon
Revised Statutes, the Legislative Counsel may substitute for words  designating the “State
Department of Energy,”  wherever they occur in Oregon Revised Statutes, other words des-
ignating the “Oregon Department of Energy and Climate.”
(Director)
SECTION 16.  ORS 469.040 is amended to read:
469.040. (1) The [ State] Oregon  Department of Energy  and Climate  shall be under the super-
vision of the Energy and Climate  Director [ of the State Department of Energy ], who shall , subject
to the policy direction of the Oregon Energy and Climate Board :
(a) Supervise the day-to-day functions  of the [ State] Oregon  Department of Energy  and
Climate;
(b) Supervise and facilitate  the work and research on energy facility siting applications at the
direction of the Energy Facility Siting Council;
(c) Hire, assign, reassign and coordinate personnel of the [ State] department [ of Energy ], pre-
scribe their duties and fix their compensation, subject to the State Personnel Relations Law; and
(d) Adopt rules and issue  orders to carry out the duties of the director and the [ State] depart-
ment [of Energy ] in accordance with ORS chapter 183 and the policy stated in ORS 469.010.
(2) The director may delegate to any  officer or employee the exercise and discharge in the
director’s name of any power, duty or function of whatever  character vested in the director by law.
The official act of any person acting in the director’s name and by the director’s authority shall  be
considered an official act of the director.
(3) The director shall be appointed by the  Governor[ .], subject to confirmation by the Senate
in the manner provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
SECTION 17. (1) The amendments to ORS 469.040 by section 16 of this 2017  Act are in-
tended to change the name of the “Director of the State Department of Energy” to  the
[7]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
“Energy and Climate Director.”
(2) For the purpose of harmonizing and clarifying  statute sections published in Oregon
Revised Statutes, the Legislative Counsel may substitute for words  designating the “Director
of the State Department of Energy,” wherever  they occur in Oregon Revised Statutes, other
words designating the “Energy and Climate Director.”
SECTION 18.  ORS 469.110 is amended to read:
469.110. (1) At the direction of the Energy and Climate  Director  [ of the State Department of
Energy] and of the Oregon Energy  and Climate Board , the [ State] Oregon Department of Energy
and Climate may represent the  state’s energy-related interests in any matter involving the federal
government, its departments or agencies, which is within the scope of the power and duties of the
[State] Oregon  Department of Energy  and Climate , and may, upon request, represent the interest
of a county, city, state agency, federally recognized  Native American or American Indian tribe,
special district or owner or operator of an energy facility.
(2) At the  direction of the director  and the board , the department may intervene in any pro-
ceeding undertaken by  an agency for the purpose of expressing its views as to the effect of an
agency action, upon state energy resources and state energy policy.
(Repeal of Energy Advisory Work Group)
SECTION 19. ORS 469.426 is repealed.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 20.  ORS 176.820 is amended to read:
176.820. There is continuously  appropriated from the Motor Vehicle Division Account to the
[State] Oregon  Department of Energy  and Climate , for deposit in the [ State] Oregon  Department
of Energy  and  Climate  Account, sufficient moneys for the payment of expenses incurred under
chapter 606, Oregon Laws 1975, subject  to limitations on payment of expenses as approved under
legislative authority.
SECTION 21.  ORS 244.050 is amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file  with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission  a verified statement of economic interest as required under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor,  Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal judges,  except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives.
(g) The  president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
[8]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) [ Director of the State Department of Energy. ] Energy and Climate Director.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Office of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(EE) Administrator of the Office for Oregon Health Policy and Research.
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) Public defense services executive director.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
[9]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs  the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan service  district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial  officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards and commissions:
(A) Board of Geologic and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
[10]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(FF) Oregon Energy and Climate Board.
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to 777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of the  board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the board of directors of an authority created under ORS  465.600 to
465.621.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a board or commission listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file  with the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics  Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By  April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate described
in subsection (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest  as
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Within 30 days after the filing deadline for  the general election, each candidate described in
subsection (1) of this section who was not a  candidate in the preceding primary election, or who
was nominated for public office described in subsection (1) of this  section at the preceding primary
election by write-in  votes, shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as re-
quired under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (4)  of this section apply only to persons who are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April  15. Subsections
(1) to (4) of this section also apply to persons who do  not become candidates until 30 days after the
filing deadline for the statewide general election.
(6) If a statement required to be filed under this section has not been received by  the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement is  due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply with  the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set by  the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 244.050, as amended by section 10,  chapter 88, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file  with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission  a verified statement of economic interest as required under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor,  Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal judges,  except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
[11]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Legislative Policy and Research Director, the Secretary of the Senate  and the Chief Clerk of the
House of Representatives.
(g) The president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public  uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) [ Director of the State Department of Energy. ] Energy and Climate Director.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Office of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(EE) Administrator of the Office for Oregon Health Policy and Research.
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) Public defense services executive director.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
[12]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs  the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan service  district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial  officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards and commissions:
(A) Board of Geologic and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
[13]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
(FF) Oregon Energy and Climate Board.
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to 777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of the  board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member  of the board of directors of an authority created under ORS 465.600 to
465.621.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a board or commission  listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file with the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060,  244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By  April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate described
in subsection (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest  as
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Within 30 days after the filing deadline for  the general election, each candidate described in
subsection (1) of this section who was not a  candidate in the preceding primary election, or who
was nominated for public office described in subsection (1) of this  section at the preceding primary
election by write-in  votes, shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as re-
quired under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (4)  of this section apply only to persons who are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April  15. Subsections
(1) to (4) of this section also apply to persons who do  not become candidates until 30 days after the
filing deadline for the statewide general election.
(6) If a statement required to be filed under this section has not been received by  the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement is  due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply with  the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set by  the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 401.054 is amended to read:
401.054. (1) Each of the following state  agencies shall designate an individual within the agency
to act as a liaison with the Office of Emergency Management:
(a) The Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(b) The Department of Corrections;
(c) The Department of Environmental Quality;
(d) The Department of Human Services;
(e) The Department of Justice;
[14]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) The Department of Land Conservation and Development;
(g) The Department of State Police;
(h) The Department of Transportation;
(i) The Judicial Department;
(j) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services;
(k) The Oregon Department of Aviation;
(L) The Oregon Department of Energy and Climate;
[(L)] (m)  The Oregon Health Authority;
[(m)] (n)  The Public Utility Commission of Oregon;
[(n)] (o)  The State Department of Agriculture;
[(o) The State Department of Energy; ]
(p) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(q) The State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries;
(r) The State Fire Marshal;
(s) The State Forestry Department;
(t) The State Marine Board;
(u) The State Parks and Recreation Department; and
(v) The Water Resources Department.
(2) Each state agency required to designate a liaison under this section  shall designate an in-
dividual who has authority during an emergency to allocate resources and assets of the agency.
(3) Each individual designated as a liaison under subsection (1) of this section shall assist  in the
coordination  of  the functions of the individual’s agency that relate to emergency preparedness and
response with similar functions of the Office of Emergency Management.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 458.505 is amended to read:
458.505. (1) The community action agency network,  established initially under the federal Eco-
nomic Opportunity Act of 1964, shall  be the delivery system for federal antipoverty programs in
Oregon, including the Community  Services Block Grant, Low Income Energy Assistance Program,
[State] Oregon Department of Energy  and Climate Weatherization Program and  such others as may
become available.
(2) Funds for such programs shall be distributed to the community action  agencies by the
Housing and Community  Services Department with the advice of the Community Action Partnership
of Oregon.
(3) In areas not  served by a community action agency, funds other than federal community ser-
vices funds may be distributed to and administered by organizations that  are found by the Housing
and Community Services Department  to serve the antipoverty purpose of the community action
agency network.
(4) In addition to  complying with all applicable requirements of federal law, a community action
agency  shall:
(a) Be an office, division or agency of the designating political subdivision or a not  for profit
organization in compliance with ORS chapter 65.
(b) Have a  community action board of at least nine but no more than 33 members, constituted
so that:
(A) One-third of the members of the board are elected public  officials currently serving or their
designees. If the number of elected officials reasonably available and willing to serve is less  than
one-third of the membership, membership  of appointed public officials may be counted as meeting the
[15]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
one-third requirement;
(B) At  least one-third of the members are persons chosen through democratic selection proce-
dures adequate to assure that they are representatives of the poor in the area served; and
(C) The remainder  of the members are officials or members of business, industry, labor, religious,
welfare, education or other major groups and interests in the community.
(c) If the agency is a private not for profit organization, be governed by the Community Action
Board. The board shall have all duties, responsibilities and powers normally  associated with such
boards, including, but not limited to:
(A) Selection, appointment and dismissal of the executive director of the agency;
(B) Approval of all contracts, grant applications and budgets and operational policies of the
agency;
(C) Evaluation of programs; and
(D) Securing an annual audit of the agency.
(d) If the organization is an office, division or agency of a  political subdivision, be administered
by the board that shall provide for the  operation of the agency and be directly responsible to the
governing board of the political subdivision. The administering board at a minimum, shall:
(A) Review and approve program policy;
(B) Be involved in and consulted on the hiring and firing of the agency director;
(C) Monitor and evaluate program effectiveness;
(D) Ensure the effectiveness of community involvement in the planning process; and
(E) Assume all duties delegated to it by the governing board.
(e) Have a clearly defined,  specified service area. Community action service areas may not
overlap.
(f) Have an accounting system that meets  generally accepted accounting principles and be so
certified by an independent certified accountant.
(g) Provide assurances against the use of government funds for political activity by the com-
munity action agency.
(h) Provide assurances that no person shall, on the grounds of race, color, sex, sexual orien-
tation or national origin be  excluded from participation in, be denied the benefits of or be subjected
to discrimination under any program or activity funded in whole or in part with funds  made avail-
able through the community action program.
(i) Provide assurances the community action agency  shall comply with any prohibition against
discrimination on the basis of age under the Age Discrimination Act of 1975 or  with respect to an
otherwise qualified individual with disabilities as provided in section 504 of the Rehabilitation  Act
of 1973.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the Oregon Human  Development Corporation is eligible to
receive federal community service funds and low-income energy assistance funds.
(6) The Housing and Community Services Department shall:
(a) Administer federal and state antipoverty programs.
(b) Apply for all available antipoverty funds on behalf of eligible entities as defined in  this sec-
tion.
(c) In conjunction with the Community  Action Partnership of Oregon, develop a collaborative
role in advocating for, and addressing the needs of, all low income Oregonians.
(d) Biennially produce and make available to the public a status  report on efforts by it and state
agencies to reduce the incidence of poverty in Oregon. This report shall  contain figures regarding
[16]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the numbers and types of persons living in  poverty in Oregon. The report shall also describe the
status of efforts by the department and the Department of Human Services  to implement the state
policy regarding homelessness described in ORS 458.528.
(e) On  a regular basis provide information to the Community Action Partnership of Oregon on
the activities and expenditures of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(f) As resources are available, provide resources for  technical assistance, training and program
assistance to eligible entities.
(g) As resources are available, provide resources pursuant to ORS 409.750 for  the training and
technical assistance needs of the Community Action Partnership of Oregon.
(h) Conduct a planning process  to meet the needs of low income people in Oregon. That process
shall fully integrate the Oregon Human Development Corporation into the antipoverty delivery sys-
tem. The planning process shall include development of a  plan for minimum level of services and
funding for low income migrant and seasonal  farmworkers from the antipoverty programs adminis-
tered by the agency.
(i) Limit its administrative budget in an effort  to maximize the availability of antipoverty federal
and state funds for expenditures by local eligible entities.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 469.020 is amended to read:
469.020. As used in ORS 176.820,  469.010 to 469.155, 469.860 (3), 469.880 to 469.895, 469.900 (3),
469.990, 469.992, 757.710 and 757.720, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Agency” includes a department or other  agency of state government, city, county, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, port, people’s  utility district, joint operating agency and electric
cooperative.
(2) “Board” means the Oregon Energy and Climate Board  created under section 3 of this
2017 Act.
[(2)] (3)  “Coal supplier” means any person  engaged in the wholesale distribution in this state
of coal intended for use in this state for an energy facility.
[(3)] (4) “Cost-effective” means that  an energy resource, facility or conservation measure during
its life cycle results in delivered power  costs to the ultimate consumer no greater than the compa-
rable incremental cost of the least cost alternative new energy resource, facility or  conservation
measure. Cost comparison under this definition shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Cost escalations and future availability of fuels;
(b) Waste disposal and decommissioning costs;
(c) Transmission and distribution costs;
(d) Geographic, climatic and other differences in the state; and
(e) Environmental impact.
[(4)] (5) “Council” means the Energy Facility Siting Council established under ORS 469.450.
[(5)] (6)  “Department” means the [ State] Oregon  Department of Energy  and Climate  created
under ORS 469.030.
[(6)] (7)  “Director” means the Energy and Climate  Director [ of the State Department  of
Energy] appointed under ORS 469.040.
[(7)] (8) “Energy facility” has the meaning given in ORS 469.300.
[(8)] (9) “Energy generation area” means an area within which the effects  of two or more small
generating plants may accumulate so the small generating  plants have effects of a magnitude similar
to a single  generating plant of 25 megawatts or more. An energy generation area for facilities using
a geothermal resource and covered by a unit agreement, as provided in ORS 522.405  to 522.545 or
[17]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by federal law, shall be defined in that unit agreement. If no such unit agreement exists, an energy
generation area for facilities using a geothermal resource shall be the area that is within two  miles,
measured from the electrical generating equipment of the facility, of an existing  or proposed
geothermal electric power generating plant,  not including the site of any other such plant not owned
or controlled by the same person.
[(9)] (10) “Geothermal reservoir” means an aquifer or  aquifers containing a common geothermal
fluid.
[(10)] (11) “Nominal electric generating capacity” has the meaning given in ORS 469.300.
[(11)] (12)  “Person” means an individual, partnership, joint venture,  private or public corpo-
ration, association, firm, public service company,  political subdivision, municipal corporation, gov-
ernment agency, people’s utility district, or any other entity, public or private, however organized.
[(12)] (13) “Petroleum supplier” means a petroleum  refiner in this state, or any person engaged
in the wholesale distribution of crude petroleum or derivative thereof or of propane in this state.
[(13)] (14) “Related or supporting facilities” means  any structure, proposed by the applicant, to
be constructed or substantially modified in connection with the  construction of an energy facility,
including associated transmission lines, reservoirs, storage facilities, intake structure, road and  rail
access, pipelines, barge basins, office or public buildings,  and commercial and industrial structures.
“Related or supporting facilities” does not include  geothermal or underground gas storage reser-
voirs, production, injection or monitoring wells or wellhead equipment or pumps.
[(14)] (15) “Site” means a  proposed location of an energy facility, and its related or supporting
facilities.
[(15)] (16) “Thermal power plant” has the meaning given that term by ORS 469.300.
[(16)] (17) “Utility” includes:
(a) An individual, a regulated electrical company, a people’s utility district, a joint  operating
agency, an electric cooperative, municipality or any combination thereof, engaged in or authorized
to engage in the business of generating, transmitting or distributing electric energy;
(b) A person or  public agency generating electric energy from an energy facility for its own
consumption; and
(c) A person engaged in this state in  the transmission or distribution of natural or synthetic gas.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 469.120 is amended to read:
469.120. (1) The [ State] Oregon Department of Energy  and Climate  Account is established.
(2) The account shall consist of all funds received by the [ State] Oregon Department of Energy
and Climate  pursuant to law. All moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to  the
[State] Oregon  Department of Energy  and Climate  for  payment of expenses of the department and
of the Energy Facility Siting Council.
(3) Moneys collected under ORS 469.421 (8) may be expended only for  the purposes of programs
and activities that  the council and the department are charged with administering and authorized
to conduct under the laws of this state, including those enumerated in ORS 469.030.
(4) The Energy and Climate  Director [ of the State Department  of Energy ] shall keep a record
of all moneys deposited in the account. The record shall indicate by  special cumulative accounts the
source from which moneys  are derived and the individual activity or program, including any activ-
ities described in ORS 469.424, against which each withdrawal is charged. On or after October 1 of
each year,  the director shall make available, upon request, the record for the prior fiscal year to
any energy resource supplier that has paid the assessment imposed under ORS 469.421  (8). The di-
rector shall make the record available within 30 days of receiving the request.
[18]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 27.  ORS 469.605 is amended to read:
469.605. (1) No person shall ship or transport radioactive material  identified by the Energy Fa-
cility Siting Council by  rule as posing a significant hazard to public health and safety or the envi-
ronment if improperly transported into or  within the State of Oregon without first obtaining a
permit from the [ State] Oregon Department of Energy  and Climate .
(2) Such permit shall be issued for a period not to exceed one year and shall be  valid for all
shipments within that period of time unless specifically limited by permit conditions.
(3) Application  for a permit under this section shall be made in a form and manner prescribed
by the Energy and Climate  Director [ of the State Department of Energy ] and may include:
(a) A description of the kind, quantity and radioactivity of the material to be transported;
(b) A description of the route or routes proposed to be taken and the transport schedule;
(c) A description of any mode of transportation; and
(d) Other information required by the director to evaluate the application.
(4) The director shall  collect a fee from all applicants for permits under this section in an
amount reasonably calculated to  provide for the costs to the department of performing the duties
of the department under ORS 469.550 (3), 469.563, 469.603 to 469.619 and 469.992. Fees collected un-
der this subsection shall be deposited in the  [ State] Oregon  Department of Energy and Climate
Account established under ORS 469.120.
(5) The director shall issue a permit only if  the application demonstrates that the proposed
transportation will comply with all applicable rules adopted under ORS 469.603 to 469.619 and if the
proposed route complies with federal law as provided in ORS 469.606.
(6) The director may  delegate the authority to issue permits for the transportation of radioactive
material to the Department of Transportation. In exercising such authority, the Department  of
Transportation shall comply with the applicable provisions of ORS 469.603 to 469.619 and rules
adopted by the director or the Energy Facility Siting Council under ORS 469.603 to 469.619.  Permits
issued by the Department of Transportation under this subsection shall  be enforced according to the
provisions of ORS 825.258. The director also may delegate other authority  granted under ORS
469.605 to 469.619 to other state agencies if the delegation will maintain or enhance  the quality of
the transportation safety program.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 28.
(1) Sections 2 to 10, 12,  15 and 17 of this 2017 Act, the amendments to
statutes by sections 1, 13, 14, 16, 18 and 20 to 27 of this 2017 Act and the repeal of  statutes
by sections 11 and 19 of this 2017 Act become operative January 1, 2018.
(2) The members of the Oregon Energy and Climate Board  may be appointed, and the
Oregon Energy and  Climate Board, the Energy and Climate Director and the Oregon De-
partment of Energy and Climate may take  any action, before the operative date provided for
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable  the board, the director and the
department to exercise, on and after the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this
section, the duties, functions and powers of the administrator, the  board and the department
pursuant to sections 2 to 10, 12, 15 and 17 of this 2017  Act, the amendments to statutes by
sections 1, 13, 14, 16, 18 and 20 to 27 of this 2017 Act and the repeal of statutes by sections
11 and 19 of this 2017 Act.
[19]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
CAPTIONS
SECTION 29. The unit  captions used in this 2017 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 30. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[20]