Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 475.752 to
475.980.
SECTION 2. (1) Except as authorized  by a registration under ORS 475.125, it is unlawful
for any person to possess, purchase, make, deliver, sell or  possess with intent to sell or de-
liver a tableting machine, an encapsulating machine or  controlled substance counterfeiting
materials, knowing,  intending or having reasonable cause to believe that the machine or
materials will be used to manufacture a controlled substance or a counterfeit substance.
(2) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a Class C felony.
(3) When the  court sentences a person under this section, the court shall use crime
category 6 of the sentencing guidelines  grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, and
shall determine the sentence by  using the criminal history scale of the sentencing guidelines
grid.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Controlled substance counterfeiting material” means a punch, die,  plate, stone or
other item  designed to print, imprint or reproduce the trademark, trade name or other
identifying mark,  imprint or device of another or any likeness of any of the foregoing upon
a drug or container or labeling thereof so as to render such drug a counterfeit substance.
(b) “Encapsulating machine” means equipment that can be used to fill shells or  capsules
with powdered or granular solids or semisolid material to produce coherent solid contents.
(c) “Tableting machine” means equipment that can be used to compact,  compress or
mold powdered or granular solids or semisolid material to produce coherent solid tablets.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 475.916 is amended to read:
475.916. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally:
(a) To deliver as a registrant a  controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II, except pur-
suant to an order form as required by ORS 475.175;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 218
HB 2175
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
(b) To use in the  course of manufacture or delivery of a controlled substance a registration
number which is fictitious, revoked, suspended or issued to another person;
(c) To acquire or to attempt to acquire or obtain or attempt to obtain possession of a controlled
substance by misrepresentation, fraud, forgery, deception or subterfuge;  or
(d) To furnish false or fraudulent material  information in, or omit any material information from,
any application, report, record or other document required  to be kept or filed under ORS 475.005 to
475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980 .[; or ]
[(e) To make, deliver or  possess any punch, die, plate, stone or other thing designed to print, im-
print or reproduce the trademark, trade name or other identifying mark, imprint or device  of another
or any likeness of any of the foregoing upon any drug or container or labeling thereof so as  to render
the drug a counterfeit substance. ]
(2) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]