Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 352.102 or any other provision of law, a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002 may not charge tuition or mandatory enrollment fees.
(2) This section applies to tuition and mandatory enrollment fees for:
(a) Resident undergraduate students who are earning  their first undergraduate degree;
and
(b) Resident graduate students who are earning their first graduate degree.
SECTION 2.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 341.290 or any other provision of law, a community
college operated under ORS chapter 341 may not charge tuition.
(2) This section applies to tuition for students who are  residents of the community col-
lege district in which the community college is located.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $____, to be allocated to  public universities
listed in ORS 352.002  and community colleges operated under ORS chapter 341 for the pur-
pose of carrying out the provisions of sections 1 and 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  conduct a study to
determine the best methods for:
(a) Eliminating the governing board at each public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(b) Eliminating the authorities of public  universities with respect to state bonds that are
set forth in ORS 352.388 to 352.415; and
(c) Making the commission responsible for the direct oversight and management of  each
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4273
HB 3499
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(2) The  commission shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
must include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to higher education no later than September 15, 2024.
(3) Each  public university shall provide the commission with any assistance required by
the commission that the commission determines is necessary for the  commission to com-
plete the study and report in the manner described in this section.
(4) As used in this section, “governing board” and “state bonds”  have the meanings given
those terms in ORS 352.029.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Legislative Assembly finds that having  an independent governing
board for each public university listed in ORS 352.002 is not in the  best interests of this state
and declares that section 4 of this 2023 Act is  the first step towards making the Higher Ed-
ucation Coordinating Commission responsible for direct oversight and management of each
public university no later than by the 2027-2028 academic year.
(2) As used in this section, “governing board” has the  meaning given that term in ORS
352.029.
SECTION 6.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[2]