Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “charitable organization”  and “game meat” have
the meanings given those terms in ORS 619.095.
(2) A person who takes an antelope,  bighorn sheep, deer, elk, moose or mountain goat
under a permit described in ORS 498.012 may:
(a) Offer the game meat to a charitable organization;
(b) Retain the game meat for private, noncommercial use; or
(c) Make any disposition authorized by the State Fish and Wildlife Commission by rule.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1221