Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 195.530 is amended to read:
195.530. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “City or county law” does not include policies  developed pursuant to ORS 195.500 or 195.505.
(b)(A) “Keeping warm and dry” means using measures necessary for an individual  to survive
outdoors given the environmental conditions.
(B) “Keeping warm and dry” does not include using any measure that involves fire or flame.
(c) “Public property” has the meaning given that term in ORS 131.705.
(2) Any city or  county law that regulates the acts of sitting, lying, sleeping or keeping warm
and dry outdoors on public property that is open to the public must be  objectively reasonable as to
time, place and manner with regards to persons experiencing homelessness.
(3) It is an affirmative defense to a  charge of violating a city or county law described in sub-
section (2) of this section that the law is not objectively reasonable.
(4)(a) A person experiencing homelessness may bring suit for injunctive or declaratory  relief to
challenge the objective reasonableness of a city or county law  described in subsection (2) of this
section. The action must be brought  in the circuit court of the county that enacted the law or of
the county in which the city that enacted the law is located.
(b) Suit may  not be brought under this subsection against a regulation described in sub-
section (6) of this section.
(5) For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of  this section, reasonableness shall be determined
based on the totality of the circumstances, including, but not limited to[ ,]:
(a) The impact of the law on persons experiencing homelessness[ .];
(b) The impact on other users of the public property;
(c) The availability of county or city resources; and
(d) The intended use of the public property.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4360
HB 3876
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
(6) Notwithstanding subsections (2) to (4) of this section, the governing body of a city or
county may adopt the following regulations:
(a) A prohibition on camping on public property between the hours of 7:00  a.m. and 7:00
p.m.
(b) A prohibition on camping in, on or adjacent to:
(A) A city hall;
(B) A county courthouse;
(C) A police station;
(D) A fire station;
(E) A public library;
(F) A public park;
(G) Property associated with the storage  or transmission of utilities, including but not
limited to water, wastewater, sewer, stormwater, electricity and gas;
(H) Public playground equipment;
(I) Public sporting fields;
(J) A highway as defined in ORS 801.305; and
(K) Public property located in a flood plain or flood zone.
(c) A prohibition on locating a campsite within:
(A) 300 feet of the entrance to a business.
(B) 500 feet  of a site that provides services or shelter to persons experiencing
homelessness.
(C) 1,000 feet of the property line of a childcare facility.
[(6)] (7)(a) In any suit brought [ pursuant to ] under subsection  (4) of this section, the court, in
its discretion, may award reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing plaintiff if the plaintiff:
[(a)] (A) Was not seeking to vindicate an interest unique to the plaintiff; and
[(b)] (B) At least 90 days before the action was filed, provided written notice to  the governing
body of the city or county that enacted the law being challenged of an intent to  bring the action .
[and]
(b) The notice [ provided] required under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection must  provide
the governing body with actual notice of the basis  upon which the plaintiff intends to challenge the
law and  the specific provision of the law that the plaintiff considers objectively
unreasonable.
[(7)] (8) Nothing in this section creates a private  right of action for monetary damages for any
person.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]