Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 610.150 is amended to read:
610.150. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Area of known wolf activity” means an area  designated by the State Department of
Fish and Wildlife as having known wolf activity.
[(a)] (b)  “Livestock” means ratites,  psittacines, horses, mules, jackasses, cattle, llamas, alpacas,
sheep, goats, swine,  bison, domesticated fowl and any fur-bearing animal bred and maintained com-
mercially, or otherwise, within pens, cages or hutches.
[(b)] (c)  “Working dog” means any animal of the species Canis familiaris used to aid  in the
herding or guarding of livestock.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture shall establish and  implement a wolf depredation com-
pensation and financial assistance grant program, using  moneys in the Wolf Management Compen-
sation and  Proactive Trust Fund established under ORS 610.155, to provide grants to assist counties
to implement county programs under which:
(a) Compensation is [ paid] provided to persons who suffer  probable or confirmed loss or injury
to livestock or working dogs due to wolf depredation; and
(b) Financial assistance is provided to  persons who implement livestock management techniques
or nonlethal wolf deterrence techniques designed to discourage wolf depredation of livestock.
(3) Subject to available funding in the Wolf  Management Compensation and Proactive Trust
Fund established under  ORS 610.155, a county qualifies for a grant [ under the wolf depredation
compensation and financial assistance grant program ] if the county:
(a) Establishes a county program to[ :] provide compensation and financial assistance as de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
[(A) Compensate persons who suffer  loss or injury to livestock or working dogs due to wolf
depredation; and]
[(B) Provide financial assistance to  persons who implement livestock management techniques or
nonlethal wolf deterrence techniques designed to discourage wolf depredation of livestock. ]
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 607
HB 2369
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Contributes  an amount of moneys equal to 10 percent of the amount necessary to implement,
during the calendar year, the county program.
(c) Establishes [ a procedure ] procedures by which persons  who:
(A) Are  applying for compensation [ under the county program ] provide evidence of the  probable
or confirmed loss or injury to livestock or working dogs due  to wolf depredation[ . Evidence of the
loss or injury must include ], including a finding by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife or the
department’s designated agent that wolf depredation was the probable cause of the loss or injury.
(B) Have applied for compensation may appeal a finding described in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph to the  county advisory committee described in paragraph (d) of this sub-
section.
(C) Are  applying for financial assistance provide an estimate of any potential cost of the
livestock management techniques or  nonlethal wolf deterrence techniques the person plans
to use.
(d) Establishes  a county advisory committee to oversee the county program, consisting of one
county commissioner, two members who own or manage livestock and two members who  support
wolf conservation  or coexistence with wolves. The county advisory committee, once established by
the county, shall agree upon  two county business representatives to serve as additional county ad-
visory committee members.
[(e) Establishes a procedure by which persons applying for financial assistance  under the county
program provide an estimate of the potential  cost of the livestock management techniques or nonlethal
wolf deterrence techniques designed to discourage wolf depredation. ]
(4) In accordance with the Oregon Wolf Conservation and Management Plan, the Director of
Agriculture shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section, including [ but not limited
to] rules that  require participating counties to :
(a) [ Require that ] Prioritize awarding grants to  livestock owners and  managers experiencing
above-normal probable or confirmed  loss or  injury to livestock or working dogs due to wolf
depredation [ be given priority by counties for grant moneys received under the  wolf depredation com-
pensation and financial assistance grant program ].
[(b) Require counties  participating in the wolf depredation compensation and financial assistance
grant program to: ]
[(A) Prepare an annual report that specifies the actions taken by,  and compensation paid and fi-
nancial assistance provided to, counties under the wolf depredation  compensation and financial assist-
ance grant program; ]
(b) Prepare annual  reports that describe the counties’ actions taken under the county
grant programs, including the amounts provided as compensation and financial assistance.
[(B)] (c)  Distribute grant program funds, to the extent possible, in an equal and balanced manner
between [ payments to compensate for loss or injury to livestock or working dogs due to  wolf
depredation and payments to implement livestock management techniques or nonlethal wolf  deterrence
techniques designed to  discourage wolf depredation of livestock ] compensation and financial as-
sistance, with a  minimum of 30 percent of grant program funds being distributed for [ livestock
management techniques or nonlethal wolf deterrence  techniques designed to discourage wolf
depredation of livestock; and ] financial assistance.
[(C)] (d) Establish compensation rates for  probable or confirmed  loss or injury to livestock or
working dogs due to wolf depredation  that are based on  a multiplier of not more than seven
times the  fair market value  of the livestock or working dogs  and the recommendation of the
[2]
HB 2369
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
county advisory committee described in subsection (3)(d) of this section.
[(c)] (e)  Establish eligibility requirements for compensation under county programs  that ensure,
contingent upon available funds, that:
(A) Outside an area of known wolf activity, [ as designated by the State  Department of Fish and
Wildlife, confirmed  loss or injury to livestock or working dogs shall be compensated ] the compen-
sation is provided regardless of the preexistence of wolf deterrence techniques;
(B) Within an area of known wolf activity, [ as designated by the  State Department of Fish and
Wildlife, confirmed loss or injury to livestock or working dogs, as  well as missing livestock above the
level based on loss or  injury attributable to causes other than wolf depredation established by the
county advisory committee described in  subsection (3)(d) of this section, shall be compensable ] the
compensation is provided only  if owners have demonstrated implementation of  best management
practices to deter wolves, including reasonable use  of nonlethal methods when practicable[ , giving
priority for compensation of confirmed losses at fair market value and with other compensation  claims
determined according to the recommendation of the county advisory committee ]; and
(C) Any compensation [ for loss or injury to livestock or working dogs due to wolf depredation ] is
based upon a finding by  the local advisory committee that the person did not unreasonably or
purposefully create circumstances that attract wolves or encourage conflict  between wolves and
livestock or working dogs.
(5) Each biennium the State Department of Agriculture shall :
(a) Prepare a  report that specifies the actions taken by counties, compensation [ paid] and fi-
nancial assistance provided  by counties and  financial assistance provided to counties under the
wolf depredation compensation and financial assistance grant program[ , and];
(b) [ shall] Submit the report , in the manner provided in ORS  192.245, to  committees or in-
terim committees of  the Legislative Assembly  related to natural resources;  and
(c) Post the report on the department’s website for public access.
(6) The State Department of Agriculture may use moneys in the Wolf Management Compensation
and Proactive Trust Fund established under ORS 610.155 to pay expenses incurred in  administering
the wolf depredation compensation and financial assistance grant program.
[3]