Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall fill and utilize the  following po-
sitions:
(1) Three  full-time equivalent positions for the department’s function as the state ap-
proving agency for veterans’ education and training;
(2) One full-time equivalent position for campus veterans programming; and
(3) One full-time equivalent position for the Veteran Educational Bridge  Grant Program
established under ORS 408.115.
SECTION 2.
There are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to the  Veterans’ Department of Veterans’ Affairs Dedicated Lot-
tery Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Veteran Educational Bridge
Grant Program ......................... $ 325,000
(2) Campus veteran resource
center grant program ............... $ 500,000
(3) Department of Veterans’
Affairs Veteran Services
Grant Fund ............................... $ 250,000
(4) Grants to counties for
veterans’ courts ........................ $ 100,000
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2184