Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2022 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 181A.010 to
181A.350.
SECTION 2. (1) There is established within the  Department of State Police the position
of Tribal Relations Liaison.
(2) The liaison shall:
(a) Serve  as the department contact person for all tribal governments and indigenous
persons within this state.
(b) Propose  modifications to department policies and procedures of concern to tribal
governments and indigenous persons within this state.
(c) Perform such other duties the Superintendent of State Police deems necessary based
on suggestions from tribal governments and indigenous persons within this state.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2022 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 181A.355 to
181A.689.
SECTION 4. The Board on Public Safety Standards and Training shall ensure that all
police officers and certified reserve officers are trained  to investigate and report cases in-
volving missing or murdered indigenous persons in this state.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 90