Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The System  of Care Advisory Council shall study the youth behavioral health
workforce in this state. The council shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to behavioral health and health care no later than  September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3495