Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 6 of this 2025 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
468.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 6 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Disproportionately impacted community” means an area of this state that is dispro-
portionately burdened by air  pollution, as determined by criteria established by the Envi-
ronmental Quality Commission by rule for air quality, population density  and the presence
of populations that have a heightened vulnerability to the effects of air pollution.
(2) “School bus” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.460.
(3) “School bus fleet owner” means a school district that owns and operates  a fleet of
school buses or a person that  owns or operates a fleet of school buses that contracts with
a school district to provide transportation to students.
(4) “Zero-emission school bus” means a school bus that:
(a) Meets minimum standards adopted by the  State Board of Education under ORS
820.100; and
(b) Has a drivetrain that produces zero  exhaust emissions of any criteria pollutant or
greenhouse gas.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Legislative Assembly declares that it is the  policy of this state to
increase the purchase of new zero-emission school buses according to the following annual
targets:
(a) By 2030, 10 percent of new school buses purchased in this state are  zero-emission
school buses.
(b) By  2035, 50 percent of new school buses purchased in this state are zero-emission
school buses.
(c) By 2040, 100 percent of new school buses purchased in this state  are zero-emission
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1772
HB 2945
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school buses.
(2) The Legislative Assembly declares that it is the policy of this state that at least 40
percent of available rebates, grants or other financial assistance for the purchase  of new
zero-emission school buses be provided to disproportionately impacted communities.
SECTION 4.
(1)(a) The Department of Environmental Quality, in consultation with the
State Board of Education, shall adopt rules to  require that, of the new school buses pur-
chased by a school bus fleet owner to transport students  in disproportionately impacted
communities:
(A) By 2030, at least 50 percent must be zero-emission school buses; and
(B) By 2035, at least 90 percent must be zero-emission school buses.
(b) Rules adopted under this subsection may establish exceptions to  the requirements
described in subsection (1) of this section  based on the cost or availability of zero-emission
school buses.
(2)(a) A school bus fleet owner may not purchase a  school bus that is not a zero-emission
school bus if the cost to purchase a comparable and available zero-emission school bus is 100
percent or less of the cost to purchase a school bus that is not a zero-emission school bus.
(b) As used in this subsection, “cost to purchase” means the final sales  price minus any
grants, rebates or other financial incentives for which the purchaser qualifies.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall provide technical  and
financial assistance to school bus fleet owners to  assist with efforts to transition to a zero-
emission school bus fleet.
(2) Technical assistance may include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Developing plans to transition to zero-emission school bus fleets;
(b) Assisting with applications for state and federal grants, rebates  or financial assist-
ance; and
(c) Planning for the  development of charging infrastructure, including integration with
local energy networks and developing smart energy solutions that improve local resilience.
(3) Financial assistance shall be  provided in accordance with the goals established under
section 3 of this 2025 Act and may include, but need not be limited to,  grants or rebates for
the purchase of zero-emission school buses.
(4) The  Environmental Quality Commission shall adopt by rule policies and procedures
for providing financial assistance to school bus fleet owners under this section.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Zero-Emission School  Bus Assistance Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Zero-
Emission School Bus Assistance Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Zero-Emission School Bus Assistance Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any public or private source; and
(d) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) Moneys in  the Zero-Emission School Bus Assistance Fund are continuously appropri-
ated to the Department  of Environmental Quality to be used to provide financial assistance
to school bus fleet owners under section 5 of this 2025 Act.
(4)(a) The Environmental  Quality Commission shall require by rule that at least 40 per-
[2]
HB 2945
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
cent of the moneys deposited in the Zero-Emission  School Bus Assistance Fund per biennium
are allocated to fund  the provision of financial assistance for zero-emission school buses used
to transport students in disproportionately impacted communities.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, if the department determines that
the total amount of rebates provided for financial assistance for  zero-emission school buses
used to transport students in disproportionately impacted communities is unlikely to  exceed
40 percent of the total amount of moneys deposited in the fund  during a biennium, the de-
partment may release moneys allocated under paragraph (a) of this subsection  to be used for
the provision of any financial assistance under section 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7.
(1) Sections 2 to 5 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Department of Environmental Quality and the  Environmental Quality Commis-
sion may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section
that is necessary to enable  the department and the commission to exercise, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the department and the commission by sections 2 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]