Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 479.168 to
479.190.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Combination fire and smoke damper” means  a device that meets requirements and
standards that apply to both fire damper and smoke damper devices.
(b) “Fire damper” means a device installed in ducts and air transfer openings  that is
designed to close automatically upon detecting heat and to resist the passage of flame.
(c) “Local authority” means a fire department or code official with authority in a juris-
diction to conduct inspections and issue citations for violations or infractions.
(d) “Smoke control system” means  an engineered system that includes all methods that
can be used  singly or in combination to modify smoke movement, including mechanical fans
that produce pressure differences across smoke barriers to inhibit smoke movement.
(e) “Smoke damper” means a device installed in ducts and  air transfer openings that is
designed to resist the passage of smoke.
(2)(a) An owner of a public building equipped with a fire damper, smoke  damper, combi-
nation fire and smoke damper or smoke control system shall, at a minimum:
(A) Have all newly installed fire dampers, smoke  dampers, combination fire and smoke
dampers and smoke control systems inspected and tested:
(i) Within 12 months  after the fire damper, smoke damper, combination fire and smoke
damper or smoke control system is completely installed; and
(ii) At least once every four years or, for hospitals, at least  every six years regardless
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3126
HB 2707
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the date of installation;
(B) Have  every smoke control system inspected and tested at least once every six to 12
months, in accordance with standards the State Fire Marshal specifies by rule; and
(C) Maintain full inspection and testing  reports on the premises of the public building and
make the reports available for public inspection.
(b) A fire damper, smoke damper or combination fire and smoke damper must  be in-
stalled, inspected, tested and maintained in accordance with this section,  with the
manufacturer’s guidelines and with  applicable standards the State Fire Marshal specifies by
rule.
(3)(a) A contractor or engineer shall conduct  an inspection or test under subsection (2)
of this section. The contractor or engineer  must be an individual with the following quali-
fications:
(A) To  inspect and test fire dampers, smoke dampers and combination fire and smoke
dampers, the contractor or engineer  must have a current and valid certification to inspect
and test fire dampers, smoke dampers and combination fire and smoke dampers.
(B) To inspect and test smoke control systems, the contractor or engineer  must have a
current and valid certification to inspect and test smoke control systems.
(b) A certification under paragraph (a) of  this subsection is valid only if the contractor
or engineer obtains the certification after  completing a program that the American National
Standards Institute accredits under the  ISO/IEC 17024 standard, or a succeeding standard,
and only if the  State Fire Marshal by rule approves the entity that issues the certification
and the standards under which the entity issues the certification.
(4) During inspection and testing, a public building owner must make available to  the
contractor or engineer, in person or  by remote communication, a building engineer or an-
other person  with knowledge of the public building’s systems to provide needed access and
information.
(5)(a) If inspection and testing reveal compliance with  the requirements of this section,
the contractor or engineer shall  issue a certificate of compliance that displays the name and
employer of the contractor or engineer, the name of the owner of the public building  and the
address of the public building, a description of the  location of all fire dampers, smoke
dampers, combination fire and smoke dampers and smoke control systems and  the date of
the inspection and testing.
(b) The State Fire  Marshal may by rule specify a form for and any other necessary con-
tents of the certificate of compliance described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(6)(a) If inspection and testing reveal deficiencies or failures of  compliance, the contrac-
tor or engineer shall issue a deficiency report to the  owner of the public building that iden-
tifies the nature of the deficiency or failure of compliance. The contractor or engineer  shall
also send a copy of the deficiency report to the local authority,  which shall make the copy
available for public inspection. In addition to identifying the location of  deficient equipment
or systems and the nature of the deficiency, a report under this paragraph must  display the
name and employer of the contractor or engineer, the name of  the owner of the public
building and the address of the public building, a description of the location of all  fire
dampers, smoke dampers, combination fire  and smoke dampers and smoke control systems
and the date of the inspection and testing.
(b) The owner of a public building that receives a deficiency report under  paragraph (a)
[2]
HB 2707
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of this subsection shall, within 120 days after the inspection and testing that  revealed the
deficiency or failure to comply, take  steps necessary to correct the deficiency, repair or re-
place any defective equipment and have another inspection and testing conducted  to ensure
compliance with this section and with all applicable standards.
(c) The public building owner shall prepare and maintain documentation  of when and how
the public building owner had all deficiencies corrected and the public building  returned to
compliance. The public building owner shall maintain on the premises of the public building
the documentation described in this  paragraph, together with a copy of the deficiency report
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, and shall make both the documentation and the
deficiency report available for public inspection.
(d) A local authority  for good cause may extend the 120-day period described in paragraph
(b) of this subsection for not more than 90 additional days.
(7)(a) The State  Fire Marshal shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section
and shall work in conjunction with local authorities to coordinate the implementation  and
enforcement of this section.
(b) In adopting rules to specify inspection, testing and maintenance standards  under
subsection (2) of this  section or technical specifications and time periods for an inspection
or test under subsection (6) of this section, the State Fire Marshal shall consider and, if
appropriate, adopt standards that are equivalent to standards that the  National Fire Pro-
tection Association establishes for similar activities including, but not limited to, standards
80, 90a, 92 and 105, as applicable.
(c) In adopting rules that govern  certification requirements for contractors and engi-
neers that perform inspections or  tests under subsection (3) of this section, the State Fire
Marshal shall consider and, if appropriate, adopt certification  requirements that are sub-
stantially similar to requirements the International Certification  Board establishes for Fire
Life Safety 1 or a Fire and Smoke Damper Technician, as applicable.
(8)(a) If a public building owner does not comply  with any of the requirements or duties
set forth in this section or has not received a certificate  of compliance within 120 days after
receiving a deficiency report under subsection (6) of  this section, or within any extended
period that a local authority specifies under subsection (6)(d) of this  section, the local au-
thority shall issue a citation and impose a civil penalty upon the public building owner in  an
amount equivalent to five cents for each  square foot of occupied space within the public
building.
(b) A local authority may impose  the civil penalty described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection in addition to any other penalty the local authority may impose for the same  or
a similar violation under an ordinance of  the local authority or other applicable law or if the
local authority does not specify a  fine or penalty for violating similar standards under an
ordinance or other applicable law.
(c) A local authority shall require a public building owner to  conspicuously post at all
pedestrian entrances to and exits  from a public building that is deficient or not in compliance
under this section a copy of  the citation that the local authority issues under paragraph (a)
of this subsection until the public building  owner corrects deficiencies in the public building
or until the local authority dismisses the citation.
(d) If a public building remains deficient or not in compliance  with this section 240 days
after receiving a deficiency report under subsection (6) of this section, a  local authority shall
[3]
HB 2707
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
issue another citation to, and impose  another civil penalty on, the public building owner in
an amount equivalent to 10 cents per square foot of occupied space, while also  requiring the
posting described in paragraph (c) of this subsection. The local authority  shall also require
the head facilities manager for the public building to attend in person  a four-hour fire life
safety course approved by  the State Fire Marshal, which must be a life safety program that
the American National Standards Institute has accredited.
(e) If a  public building remains deficient or not in compliance with this section for more
than 240 days after receiving a deficiency report under subsection (6) of this section, for ev-
ery subsequent 60-day period in which the public building remains deficient or  not in com-
pliance, the local authority shall issue another citation to, and impose another civil  penalty
on, the public building owner in an amount equivalent to 10 cents  per square foot of occupied
space, while also requiring the posting described in paragraph  (c) of this subsection. A local
authority may not dismiss any of the citations the  local authority imposed under this section
until the public building owner  corrects all deficiencies, returns the public building to com-
pliance and pays all civil penalties the local authority imposed under this section. The  local
authority may also take any other  lawful action necessary to reduce or prevent dangers to
public safety from potential fires and smoke in the public building.
(9) A local authority shall deposit all proceeds from civil penalties the local authority
imposes under this section into the local authority’s  treasury and shall dedicate the proceeds
to programs for training personnel to provide fire  prevention and safety services within the
local authority’s jurisdiction.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]