Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
NEIGHBORHOOD PROTECTION COOPERATIVE GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Fire Marshal shall establish a neighborhood protection coop-
erative grant program to promote wildfire resilience within communities.
(2) In establishing the program described in subsection (1) of this section, the  State Fire
Marshal shall promote collaboration with other related programs to the extent practicable.
(3) Under the program described in subsection (1) of this  section, the State Fire Marshal
shall award grants  to local governments, organizations related to fire districts and nongov-
ernmental organizations for awarding and administering individual grants to property owners
to promote wildfire resilience, pursuant to criteria determined by the State Fire Marshal.
(4) The State Fire Marshal shall develop criteria for awarding grants to local  govern-
ments, organizations related to fire districts and nongovernmental organizations, and  for
awarding individual grants to property owners, in consultation with:
(a) The Department of Consumer and Business Services and the State Forestry Depart-
ment.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 81
SB 1511
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Stakeholders, in  order to make requirements as workable for potential grantee or-
ganizations as possible.
(5) The State Fire Marshal shall publish the  criteria described in subsection (4) of this
section on a State Fire Marshal website.
(6) The criteria described in subsection (4) of this section for awards of grants to  local
governments, organizations related to fire districts and nongovernmental organizations  may
include requirements that grantees:
(a) Create preliminary  plans for identifying neighborhoods in which property owners may
be awarded individual grants.
(b) Conduct initial defensible space assessments for neighborhoods described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(c) Require all persons who perform onsite  hazard assessments funded by a grant under
this section complete defensible space assessment training overseen by the State  Fire Mar-
shal.
(d) Periodically report to the State Fire Marshal on awarding and  administering individ-
ual grants under this section.
(7) The criteria described in subsection (4) of this section  for awards of individual grants
may include qualifications and standards for eligibility, such as preferences  for awarding in-
dividual grants to property owners who own property in neighborhoods:
(a) In areas with high wildfire exposure.
(b) With identifiable social and economic barriers.
(c) That are likely to be successful in implementing wildfire risk reduction measures.
SECTION 2.
The State Fire Marshal shall publish  neighborhood protection cooperative
grant program  criteria, as described in section 1 (5) of this 2024 Act, on or before July 1,
2024.
SECTION 3. (1) The Neighborhood Protection Cooperative Grant Program Fund is estab-
lished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned
by the Neighborhood Protection Cooperative Grant Program Fund shall be  credited to the
fund.
(2) The fund shall consist of all moneys  placed in the fund as provided by law and any
gifts, grants, donations,  endowments or bequests from any public or private source, including
individuals and private organizations.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the State Fire Marshal for the
purpose of carrying out the neighborhood protection cooperative grant  program described in
section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 4.  ORS 476.398 is amended to read:
476.398. (1) The State Fire Marshal shall  biannually report regarding the status of State Fire
Marshal and local government activities for carrying out ORS  476.392 and section 1 of this 2024
Act to a committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly  related to wildfire, in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the State Wildfire Programs Director and to the  Wildfire Pro-
grams Advisory Council:
(a) On or before the date of convening of the regular session of the Legislative Assembly  as
specified in ORS 171.010.
(b) Approximately six months after the date described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) The report shall include, but need not be limited to:
[2]
SB 1511
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A status  report regarding community risk reduction and the establishment, administration
and enforcement of defensible space requirements;
(b) A status report regarding the establishment and administration of the neighborhood
protection cooperative grant program described in section 1 of  this 2024 Act, including rec-
ommendations for improving administration of the program;
[(b)] (c)  The  amount of moneys expended during the year for community risk reduction and the
establishment, administration or enforcement of defensible space requirements;
[(c)] (d)  The amount of moneys expended during  the year for the suppression of fires on
wildland-urban interface lands; and
[(d)] (e)  Any recommendations of the State Fire Marshal for legislative  action, including, but
not limited to[ ,]:
(A) Current or future resource and funding needs for community risk reduction [ and];
(B) Establishing, administering or enforcing defensible space requirements[ .]; and
(C) Improving the  neighborhood protection cooperative grant program described in sec-
tion 1 of this 2024 Act.
RISK REDUCTION CERTIFICATION PROGRAM REPORT
SECTION 5.
(1) In consultation with representatives from the insurance industry,  the
Department of Consumer and Business Services, the Department of the State Fire  Marshal
and the State Forestry Department shall develop a plan and implementation timeline for es-
tablishing a risk reduction certification program that:
(a) Identifies wildfire risk mitigation actions,  including actions taken under the neigh-
borhood protection cooperative grant program described in section 1  of this 2024 Act, that
merit consideration, as favorable to insurance policy holders,  when representatives of the
insurance industry are determining underwriting and insurance premium rates.
(b) Is informed by discussion with decision makers in the insurance industry.
(2) On or before December 1, 2024, the departments shall submit a preliminary report  to
committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  relating to natural resources,
in the manner prescribed in ORS 192.245, and to the Governor, that:
(a) Describes actions taken under subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Suggests a date for submission of a  subsequent, more complete report on actions
described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 6.
Section 5 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
APPROPRIATION
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Fire Marshal, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  out of the General
Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for deposit in the Neighborhood Protection Cooperative Grant
Program Fund established by  section 3 of this 2024 Act, to be expended as described in sec-
tion 3 of this 2024 Act.
CAPTIONS
[3]
SB 1511
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
SECTION 8.
The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]