Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 342.127 is amended to read:
342.127. (1) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall establish and collect:
(a) A fee not to exceed $350  for evaluation of the initial application for each educator license
for which application is made. If the applicant  is eligible for the educator license for which appli-
cation is made, the commission shall issue the license without additional charge.
(b) A fee not to exceed  $350 for the renewal of each educator license and a fee not to exceed
$50 for each official paper license.  If the educator is certified by a national professional organization
for teaching standards recognized  by the commission, the commission shall renew the license with-
out charge.
(c) A fee not to exceed $800  for a beginning educator assessment conducted in lieu of an ap-
proved preparation program required for licensure.
(d) A fee not  to exceed $350 for registration as a public charter school teacher or administrator
that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(e) A fee not to exceed $350 for renewal of a registration as a public charter school teacher or
administrator that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(2) In addition to the fee required by subsection (1) of  this section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission  shall collect a fee not to exceed $150 for the evaluation of an appli-
cant requesting licensing based upon completion of an educator preparation program other  than an
Oregon approved educator preparation program.
(3) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall  collect
a late application fee not to exceed $40 per month up to a maximum of $200  from an applicant who
fails to make timely application for renewal of  the license or registration. The actual amount of the
fee shall be determined in accordance with rules of the commission.
(4) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall  collect
a late application fee not to exceed $350 for the reinstatement of an expired  license. The require-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 131
HB 2035
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
ments for reinstatement and the actual amount of the fee shall be determined in accordance with
rules of the commission.
(5) Notwithstanding the expiration date posted on the  license, the license shall continue to be
valid for an additional 120 days, provided the educator has made a timely  application, as determined
by the commission, for renewal prior to the expiration date on the license.
(6) In addition to the fee required by subsection (1) of  this section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission shall collect a fee not to exceed $1,000 for the reinstatement of a li-
cense that has been suspended or revoked  by the commission for gross neglect of duty or gross
unfitness under ORS 342.175.
(7) In addition to the fee required by subsection  (1) of this section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission shall collect a  fee not to exceed $200 for the issuance of any license
through an expedited process under  ORS 342.125 (7) at the request of any school district, public
charter school or education service district that seeks to employ  the applicant. The fee shall be paid
by the school district, public charter school or education service district.
(8) Notwithstanding subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the commission  may not col-
lect a late application fee from an applicant  for the renewal or reinstatement of a substitute
teaching license.
[(8)] (9) Fees established under this section shall cover, but not exceed, the full cost of  admin-
istrative expenses incurred by the commission during any biennium.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 342.127 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to ap-
plications submitted on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on July 1, 2026.
[2]