Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Judicial Department shall study ways to improve the efficiency of the
process for setting aside convictions. The department shall submit a report  in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary no later  than September 15,
2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2956