Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.680, as amended by section 45, chapter 95, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
336.680. (1) As used  in this section, “approved recovery school” means a school that is under
an agreement with the Department of Education to provide students  enrolled in the school with a
holistic approach to:
(a) Educational services for grades 9 through 12; and
(b) Health care services related to recovery from substance use disorders.
(2) The department shall provide or cause to be provided appropriate  education for students
enrolled in an approved  recovery school. For the purpose of paying the costs of providing education
to students enrolled in an approved recovery  school, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
make the following:
(a) Payments from amounts available from the State School Fund under ORS 327.029.
(b) Payments from  the Statewide Education Initiatives Account, as provided by rule adopted by
the State Board of Education in collaboration with  the advisory committee convened under ORS
336.685. The rules adopted as provided  by this paragraph may include a minimum amount, a maxi-
mum amount or both for approved recovery schools.
(3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may contract with  a school district, an education
service district or a public charter school to provide or cause to be  provided appropriate education
to students enrolled in  an approved recovery school. Unless otherwise specified, any educational
services provided under a contract entered into under this  subsection shall be paid as described in
this section and not by any other state moneys distributed based on average daily membership  that
are available  to the school district, education service district or public charter school for the pur-
pose of providing educational services.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule the standards for  a recovery school to
become and operate as an approved recovery school. The standards must provide that:
(a) The recovery school  must align, to the extent identified by the board, with standards for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 882
HB 2449
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
accreditation established by a nonprofit accrediting organization composed of representatives  of re-
covery  schools  and individuals who support the growth of recovery schools. The standards must in-
clude requirements that:
(A) The recovery school, in compliance with timelines established by the department, be  ac-
credited by a nonprofit accrediting organization that establishes standards  for recovery schools.
Nothing in this subparagraph requires the recovery school to be  accredited at the time the super-
intendent first enters into a contract with the recovery school.
(B) Student enrollment in the recovery school is voluntary. No school district or  state or local
agency may compel or otherwise require a student to enroll in a recovery school. Students enrolled
in an approved recovery school may not be counted in determining the  number of pupils in average
daily membership for purposes of ORS 334.175 (5).
(C) All  students who reside in this state and who meet the eligibility criteria established under
subsection (8) of this section may enroll in  an approved recovery school if space is available. If
space is not available, the  approved recovery school may prioritize for enrollment student groups
identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b).
(D) The school  district, education service district or public charter school with which the de-
partment has entered into a contract for a  recovery school must agree to award high school diplo-
mas, modified diplomas, extended  diplomas and alternative certificates as provided by ORS 329.451
and 339.877. An entity that awards high school diplomas as provided by this subparagraph:
(i) May not impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) or by rule of the State Board of Education; and
(ii) Must accept any credits previously earned  by students in another school or educational
program in this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451
(2)(a) or by rule of the State Board of Education.
(E) Except as provided by subparagraphs  (F) and (G) of this paragraph, the recovery school must
satisfy the same laws that apply to public charter schools under ORS 338.115.
(F) All  administrators and teachers at the recovery school must be licensed by the Teacher
Standards and Practices Commission.
(G) An approved recovery school is  not required to comply with the enrollment requirements
prescribed by ORS 338.115 (1)(bb) or (5).
(H) An approved recovery school must comply with the requirements  of the uniform budget and
accounting system adopted by rule of the State Board of Education under ORS 327.511.
(I) An approved recovery school must provide a peer group support program  for students
of the school that:
(i) Offers social activities, counseling services and case management services; and
(ii) Is community-based, family centered and professionally staffed.
(b) Recovery schools will be approved, to the greatest extent practicable, in a manner that:
(A) Represents a geographic distribution across this state; and
(B) Takes into consideration the needs  for services by the community in which the recovery
school would be located.
(5) Any school that provides the services of a recovery  school may enter into a contract with
the superintendent  to become an approved recovery school, including schools already providing the
services of a recovery school and schools that are proposing to provide the services of a recovery
school.
(6) An approved recovery  school may enter into agreements with other entities, including
[2]
HB 2449
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
community-based organizations and federally recognized tribes of this state,  for the purposes of
providing educational and health care services to students enrolled  in the approved recovery school.
(7)(a) The department shall be responsible for:
(A) Identifying, locating and evaluating students enrolled in an approved recovery  school who
may be in need of special education and related services; and
(B) Ensuring that eligible students receive special education and related services.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, the department may enter  into a contract with a school
district or an education service district.
(8) The department shall establish eligibility criteria for students to enroll in an approved  re-
covery school, based on input from the advisory  committee convened under ORS 336.685 and based
on research from a nonprofit organization composed of representatives of  recovery schools and in-
dividuals who support the growth of recovery schools and other relevant organizations.
(9) For the purposes of administering this section:
(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt any necessary rules.
(b) The  department shall collaborate with the Oregon Health Authority, the Youth Development
Division, the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission, the Oregon Youth Authority, the  Department
of Human Services and local public health and mental health authorities  or providers and shall co-
ordinate, to the greatest extent practicable, funding of services provided  in relation to approved
recovery schools.
(10) Each  biennium, the Department of Education shall prepare a report on the progress, suc-
cesses and challenges of approved recovery schools and submit that report to:
(a) The interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education; and
(b) The advisory committee convened under ORS 336.685.
[3]