Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. The health services to be provided in medical assistance under ORS 414.065
must include computerized tomography coronary calcium score scans with or without  con-
trast when prescribed by a licensed or certified health professional.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2025 Act is  added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 4. (1) A policy or certificate of health  insurance offered in this state that re-
imburses the cost of laboratory services must  reimburse the cost of computerized
tomography coronary calcium score scans with or without contrast, when prescribed by a
licensed or certified health professional.
(2) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act applies to policies and certificates of health in-
surance issued, renewed or extended on or after January 1, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3023