Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Housing and Community Services Department  shall study housing. On
or before September 15, 2025, the department shall submit a report in the  manner provided
by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to the relevant interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 193