Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 459A.735 is amended to read:
459A.735. (1) To facilitate the return of empty beverage containers  and to serve dealers of
beverages, any person may establish a full-service redemption center, subject to  the approval of the
Oregon  Liquor  and Cannabis Commission, at which any person may return empty beverage con-
tainers and receive payment of the refund value of such beverage containers.
(2) Application for approval of a full-service redemption center  shall be filed with the commis-
sion. The application shall state the name and address of  the person responsible for the establish-
ment and operation  of the full-service redemption center, the kind of beverage containers that will
be accepted at the  full-service redemption center, the names and addresses of the dealers to be
served by the full-service redemption  center and proposals for up to two convenience zones de-
scribed in ORS 459A.738. The application  shall include such additional information as the commis-
sion may require.
(3) The commission shall approve  a full-service redemption center if it finds the redemption
center will provide  a convenient service to persons for the return of empty beverage containers.
The order of the commission approving a full-service redemption center shall state:
(a) The location of the convenience zones specified by the commission under ORS 459A.738 (1);
(b) The dealers within the  convenience zones to be served by the full-service redemption center;
(c) The dealers  within the convenience zones not to be served by or not participating in the
full-service redemption center;
(d) The services to be provided by  the redemption center and the equivalent services required
to be provided under ORS 459A.738 (5) by a dealer that  does not participate in, and is not served
by, the full-service redemption center;
(e) The kind of empty beverage containers that the full-service redemption center must accept;
(f)(A) Whether the full-service redemption center will be located in an area zoned for  commer-
cial use under state statute or local ordinance or will be located in an area that  will provide more
convenient service than feasible alternative locations in  an area zoned for commercial use,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3527
HB 2921
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
given the proximity of the location to the dealers within the convenience zones to  be served by the
full-service redemption center; [ and]
(B) The commission may not approve a full-service redemption center if the full-service
redemption center would be located in an area zoned for industrial use and:
(i) The full-service redemption center would  be sited on a lot that is five acres or greater;
or
(ii) Development of the full-service redemption center  would trigger any requirement
that a local government consider or update an analysis as required by a statewide  planning
goal relating to economic development;
(g) That the applicant has notified  the state Senator and state Representative in whose
districts the full-service  redemption center will be located of the proposed full-service re-
demption center and the applicant’s plan for community engagement; and
[(g)] (h)  Such other provisions to ensure  that the full-service redemption center will provide a
convenient service to the public as the commission may determine.
(4) A full-service redemption center approved by the  commission under this section is not a re-
cycling depot for purposes of ORS 90.318, 459A.007, 459A.010, 459A.050 or 459A.080.
(5)(a) No later than five days after  approving a full-service redemption center under subsection
(3) of this section, the commission  shall provide written notice to each dealer that is identified in
the order approving the full-service redemption  center as a dealer within the convenience zones not
to be served by or not participating in the full-service redemption center.
(b) The notice required under this subsection shall include:
(A) All information required to  be in the order approving the full-service redemption center
under subsection (3) of this section; and
(B) Notice of the provisions of ORS 459A.738 that are applicable to  the dealer receiving the
notice.
(6) The commission may review at any time approval of a full-service redemption center. After
written notice to the person responsible  for the establishment and operation of the full-service re-
demption center, and  to the dealers served by the full-service redemption center, the commission
may, after hearing,  withdraw approval of a full-service redemption center if the commission finds
there has not been compliance with its order approving the full-service redemption center, or  if the
full-service redemption center no longer provides a convenient service to the public.
(7) The commission shall provide the opportunity for  public comment before concluding
under subsection (3) or (6) of this section that  a full service redemption center provides a
convenient service to  the public for the redemption of beverage containers. The commission
may deny an application for approval of a full-service redemption center or withdraw  ap-
proval if the commission determines  that the full-service redemption center would have a
or has had a negative impact on the livability  of the surrounding area that outweighs any
convenient service to the public for the redemption of beverage containers.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]