Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of  Agriculture shall conduct an analysis of the
economic competitiveness of Oregon’s agricultural  sector and submit a report on the analy-
sis, in the manner prescribed in ORS 192.245, to  a committee or interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to natural resources on or before December 31, 2026.
(2) The analysis must assess, at minimum:
(a) The economic competitiveness of Oregon agricultural products within  the United
States domestic market, considering:
(A) The impacts of drought, heat, wildfire, climate change and water availability  on crop
production and harvest losses, and any associated crop insurance gaps related to the im-
pacts.
(B) Labor shortages, farmworker housing supply, costs of guest worker programs and tax
credits related to labor and housing.
(C) The overall regulatory burden on Oregon agricultural entities, including the  cost of
compliance verification, compared to regulatory burdens on other sectors within this  state
and compared to agricultural sectors in other states.
(D) Any competitive advantages that agricultural sectors in other states attain  through
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2046
HB 2166
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
ecosystem practice payments, carbon sequestration payments  and other incentive programs,
as well as through investments in solutions such as drought-resilient crops.
(E) Specialty or niche agricultural sectors that may present strong  economic opportu-
nities in national or international markets.
(F) The viability of local food markets in Oregon.
(G) Regional capacity to add value to Oregon commodities.
(H) The transfer and  succession of agricultural operations or lands to protect and sustain
the agricultural economy.
(b) How technological advancements can improve the competitiveness and sustainability
of Oregon agricultural products, and whether there are any barriers to adopting  technolog-
ical advancements.
(c) The efficiency of agricultural infrastructure that is crucial for  getting products to
market, such as the efficiency of transportation networks,  storage facilities and processing
plants.
(d) How implementing climate-smart agricultural practices  can enhance long-term
competitiveness and environmental stewardship,  including the potential agricultural practice
of accessing new markets that prioritize sustainability.
(e) The impacts on the Oregon agricultural sector from changes  in the global market and
supply chains after 2020, considering:
(A) Whether Oregon should increase produce  as a component of the overall agricultural
sector in this state.
(B) The costs of agricultural inputs,  including fuels, fertilizers, other chemical inputs and
energy.
(f) The impacts on  the Oregon agricultural sector from foreign investment in Oregon
agricultural land.
(3) In completing the analysis, the department shall seek and consider input from
stakeholders representing  the diversity of Oregon’s agricultural sector, including but not
limited to Indian tribes, various types and sizes  of agricultural operations, farmworkers,
experts from universities and others with relevant agricultural experience.
(4) The report must include recommendations that may form the basis of a new or re-
vised strategic road map aimed at ensuring the competitiveness of Oregon agriculture,  based
on the results of the analysis.
(5) The department may contract for completion of the analysis and the report.
(6) All agencies of  state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
department, as requested by the department, in  the performance of the duties described in
this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]