Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.185 is amended to read:
327.185. (1) As used in this section, “eligible applicant” means any of the following entities:
(a) Common school districts and union high school districts.
(b) The Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program.
(c) Public charter schools [ that are not virtual public charter schools, as defined in  ORS 338.005,
and] that have a student population of which:
(A) At least 35 percent of the student population is composed of students from the  following
student groups:
(i) Economically disadvantaged, as described in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(A);
(ii) Racial or ethnic groups that have historically experienced academic disparities, as described
in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(B); or
(iii) Students with disabilities, as described in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(C); and
(B) The percentage of the students  from student groups identified under subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph is greater than:
(i) The percentage of all students in the school district  who are economically disadvantaged, if
eligibility is determined based on the percentage of students who are economically disadvantaged;
(ii) The percentage of all  students in the school district who are from racial or ethnic groups
that have historically experienced academic disparities, if eligibility is determined based on the
percentage of students who are from those racial or ethnic groups; or
(iii) The percentage of all students in the school district who are disabled,  if eligibility is de-
termined based on the percentage of students who are disabled.
(2)(a) Eligible applicants may apply for a grant from  the Student Investment Account to receive
a distribution under ORS 327.190.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 338.155 (9), a public charter school that is not  an eligible applicant
may not apply for a grant under this section.
(3) Prior to preparing a grant application, an eligible applicant must:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1118
SB 760
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) If the eligible applicant is a school district, determine whether the school  district will allow
public charter schools sponsored by, or located within, the school district  to participate in the grant
application and the grant agreement.
(b) If the  eligible applicant is a public charter school, determine whether the public charter
school intends to apply for a grant and provide notice of that intent to the school district in  which
the public charter school is located and to the Department of Education.
(4)(a) If an eligible applicant is a school district and  decides to include public charter schools
in the grant application and grant agreement, the school district must provide all  public charter
schools sponsored by, or located within, the school district the  opportunity to participate in the
grant application and grant agreement.
(b)(A) A public charter school is  not required to participate in the grant application and grant
agreement of a school district.
(B) If a public charter school does not participate  in a grant application and grant agreement
under this subsection:
(i) The ADMw of  the public charter school may not be used in the calculation of the school
district ADMw for grants distributed under ORS 327.195; and
(ii) The public charter school is not entitled to any  grant moneys distributed under ORS 327.195.
(C) If a public charter school participates in a grant application and grant agreement  under this
subsection:
(i) The public charter school and school district shall enter into an agreement  for the distrib-
ution of moneys or the provision of services, including any accountability  measures required of the
public charter school by the school district;
(ii) The ADMw of the  public charter school shall be used in the calculation of the school district
ADMw for grants distributed under ORS 327.195; and
(iii) The public charter school is entitled to any grant moneys or services provided for in  the
agreement entered into under this subparagraph.
(5)(a) For the purpose of preparing a grant application, an eligible applicant must determine:
(A) Which of the allowed uses identified in ORS 327.180 (3) the  eligible applicant will fund with
grant moneys; and
(B) Which of the eligible uses identified  under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph the eligible
applicant will designate to meeting student mental and behavioral health needs.
(b) An eligible  applicant shall make the determinations required under paragraph (a) of this
subsection by:
(A) Engaging in strategic planning; and
(B) Considering the recommendations of the Quality Education  Commission established under
ORS 327.500.
(6)(a) The strategic planning required under subsection (5) of this section must include:
(A) A completed needs assessment, as described in ORS 329.095;
(B) An analysis of the potential academic impact, both for the students of the  eligible applicant
and for student groups  identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b), from the allowed uses that would be funded
by grant moneys; and
(C) The creation of budgets for the allowed uses that would be funded by grant moneys.
(b) The  strategic planning required under subsection (5) of this section must take into consid-
eration:
(A) Input  from the community of the eligible applicant, including school employees, students
[2]
SB 760
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
from student groups identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b) and parents of those students; and
(B) Data collected by the eligible applicant to enable the eligible applicant  to make equity-based
decisions.
(7) Based on the strategic planning described in subsection (6) of this section, the eligible ap-
plicant shall develop  a four-year plan for the use of grant moneys. The plan must be updated every
two years and must:
(a) Identify which allowed uses identified in ORS 327.180 (3) will be funded with  grant moneys
and which of those uses will be designated to meet student mental and behavioral health needs.
(b) Describe how the allowed uses identified under paragraph (a)  of this subsection will be used
to:
(A) Meet students’ mental and behavioral health needs;
(B) Increase academic achievement for students of the eligible applicant; and
(C) Reduce academic disparities for student groups identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)  who are
served by the eligible  applicant, and identify which of those student groups will benefit from the
allowed uses that are being funded with grant moneys.
(c) Include the budgets for the allowed uses to be funded with grant moneys.
(d) Be approved by the governing body of the eligible applicant at an open meeting, following:
(A) Provision of the plan at the main office  of the eligible applicant and on the eligible
applicant’s website;
(B) Oral presentation of the plan by an administrator of the eligible  applicant to the governing
body of the eligible applicant; and
(C) Opportunity for the public to comment on the plan at an open meeting.
(e) Be a part of the local district continuous improvement plan described in ORS 329.095, if  the
eligible applicant is a school district.
(8) To apply for a grant, an eligible applicant must submit an  application every two years in a
format and according to timelines prescribed by  the Department of Education. The application must
include:
(a) A completed needs assessment, as described in ORS 329.095;
(b) The plan developed under subsection (7) of this section; and
(c) Budget estimates for  each of the allowed uses identified in the plan developed under sub-
section (7) of this section that will be funded by grant moneys.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.195 is amended to read:
327.195. (1)(a) Except as provided  by paragraph (d) of this subsection, the amount of a grant
awarded from the Student Investment Account = the grant recipient’s ADMw ×  (the  total amount
available for distribution as grants in each biennium ÷  the total ADMw of all grant recipients).
(b) For purposes of this subsection and except as provided by paragraph (c) of this  subsection,
ADMw equals:
(A) For school districts, the ADMw as calculated  under ORS 327.013, except that the additional
amount allowed for students who are in poverty  families, as determined under ORS 327.013
(1)(c)(A)(v)(I), shall be 0.5.
(B) For an  educational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile
Detention Education Program, as provided in ORS 327.026.
(c) When calculating ADMw for a school district, the Department of  Education shall remove
from the calculation any amounts that are attributable to:
[(A) A virtual public charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005; ]
[3]
SB 760
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(B)] (A) A public charter school that provided notice of the public charter school’s intent to
apply for a grant as an eligible applicant; and
[(C)] (B) A public charter school sponsored by, or located  within, the school district that did
not participate in the grant application or grant agreement.
(d) The amount of a grant distributed under this  section may be adjusted by the department to
ensure that:
(A) A grant recipient does not receive any  moneys for uses that are not allowed uses under ORS
327.180 (3).
(B) A school district with an ADMw of 50 or less receives a minimum grant amount.
(2) The State Board of Education shall adopt  any rules necessary for the distribution of grants
under this section, including establishing:
(a) The minimum grant amounts under subsection (1)(d) of this section; and
(b) Any percentages and timelines for installment  payments and adjustments of those installment
payments.
(3) A grant recipient  shall deposit the grant moneys the grant recipient receives under this
section into a separate account and shall apply amounts in  that account as provided by the grant
agreement.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 338.125 is amended to read:
338.125. (1) Student enrollment in a public charter school is voluntary.
(2)(a) All students who reside in the school district in which the public charter  school is located
are eligible for enrollment in the public charter school if space is available.
(b) Students who do not reside in the school district in which the public charter school is  lo-
cated are eligible for enrollment in the  public charter school if space is available [ and subject to
subsection (4) of this section ].
(c) A public charter  school may not limit student enrollment based on race, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity,  ethnicity, national origin, disability, the terms of an individualized ed-
ucation program, income level, proficiency in the English language or athletic ability. A  public
charter school may implement a weighted lottery  that favors historically underserved students as
provided by subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(3)(a) Except as provided by paragraphs (b) and (c)  of this subsection, if the number of applica-
tions from students exceeds the capacity of a program, class, grade  level or building, the public
charter school shall select students through an equitable lottery selection process.  For the purpose
of ameliorating the impact of discrimination  against historically underserved students, an equitable
lottery selection process may include weights that  favor historically underserved students. As used
in this paragraph, “historically underserved students” are students who are at risk because of  any
combination of their race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ethnicity, disability, income  level,
proficiency in the English language, socioeconomic status or geographic location.
(b)(A) A  public charter school may give priority for admission to students who reside within the
attendance boundaries that were in effect at  the time a school district closed a nonchartered public
school  if:
(i) The public charter school began to operate not  more than two years after the nonchartered
public school was closed;
(ii) The school district that closed the nonchartered public  school is the sponsor of the public
charter  school;
(iii) The public charter school is physically located within the  attendance boundaries of the
[4]
SB 760
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
closed nonchartered public school; and
(iv) The  school district board, through board action, approved the public charter school giving
priority as described in this paragraph.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph requires an amendment to a charter.  A school district board may
take an action described in subparagraph (A)(iv) of this  paragraph at any time during the term of
a charter.
(c) After a public charter school has been in operation for one or more  years, the public charter
school may give priority for admission to students who:
(A) Were enrolled in the prior year in the public charter school;
(B) Were enrolled in a public preschool or prekindergarten program operated by  the public
charter school;
(C) Have siblings who are presently enrolled in the school and who were  enrolled in the school
in the prior year;
(D) Are at risk because the student has an economic  or academic disadvantage that requires
special services or assistance, including students who:
(i) Are from economically disadvantaged families;
(ii) Are identified as having special educational needs;
(iii) Are limited in proficiency in the English language;
(iv) Are at risk of dropping out of high school; or
(v) Do not meet minimum standards of academic proficiency; or
(E) If the public charter school is  a party to a cooperative agreement described in ORS 338.080,
reside in the school  district that is the sponsor of the public charter school or in a school district
that is a party to the cooperative agreement.
[(4)(a)] (4) A student who wishes to enroll in a virtual public charter  school does not need the
approval of the school  district where the student is a resident before the student enrolls in the
virtual public charter school. If a student wishes  to enroll in a virtual public charter school, the
parent, legal guardian or person  in parental relationship with the student must provide the following
notices to the school district where the student is a resident:
[(A)] (a) Intent to enroll the student in a virtual public charter school; and
[(B)] (b) Enrollment of the student in a virtual public charter school.
[(b)(A) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection and ORS 339.133, if more than three
percent of the students who reside in a  school district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that
are not sponsored by the school district, a student who is a resident of the  school district must receive
approval from the school  district before enrolling in a virtual public charter school. A school district
is not required to give approval if more than three  percent of the students who reside in the school
district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district. ]
[(B) For the purpose of determining whether more  than three percent of the students who reside in
the school district are enrolled in virtual public  charter schools that are not sponsored by the school
district, the school district board shall include any students who: ]
[(i) Reside in the school district, regardless of  whether the students are considered residents of
different school districts as provided by ORS 339.133 (5); and ]
[(ii) Are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district. ]
[(C) Students who reside in the  school district, regardless of whether the students are considered
residents of different school districts as provided by ORS 339.133 (5), must receive approval from  the
school district before enrolling in a virtual public charter school if the limit described in subparagraph
[5]
SB 760
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) of this paragraph has been met. ]
[(c) If the school district does not give approval under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the  school
district must provide information to the parent, legal guardian or person in parental relationship with
the student about the right to appeal the  decision to the State Board of Education and other online
options available to the student. If an appeal is made to the State  Board of Education, the board must
issue a decision within 30 days of the submission of the appeal. ]
(5) Within 10 days of a student’s enrollment in a public charter  school, the public charter school
shall provide written notice of the  student’s enrollment to the school district in which the public
charter school is located if the student does not reside in the school district where the public
charter school is located.
(6) Within 10  days of receiving the notice described in subsection (5) of this section, the school
district in which the public charter school is located shall  provide to the student’s parent, legal
guardian or person in parental relationship written information about:
(a) The school district’s responsibility to identify, locate and  evaluate students enrolled in the
public charter school to determine which students  may be in need of special education and related
services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(b) The methods by which the school district may be contacted to  answer questions or provide
information related to special education and related services.
(7) When a student  described in subsection (5) of this section withdraws from a public charter
school for a reason other than graduation from high school,  the school district in which the public
charter school is located shall:
(a) Provide to the school district in which the student resides written notice that the student
has withdrawn.
(b) Provide to the student’s parent, legal guardian or  person in parental relationship written
information about:
(A) The responsibility of the school  district in which the student resides to identify, locate and
evaluate students who reside in the school district to determine which students may be in need  of
special education and related services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(B) The methods by  which the school district in which the student resides may be contacted to
answer questions or provide information related to special education and related services.
(8)(a) If a student described in subsection (5)  of this section enrolls in a public charter school
and has  an individualized education program, the school district in which the public charter school
is located must implement  the individualized education program and follow the terms of the indi-
vidualized education program until a new individualized education program is developed.
(b) If a student described  in subsection (5) of this section withdraws from a public charter school
and has an individualized education program, the school district in which the  student resides must
implement the individualized education program and follow the terms  of the individualized education
program until a new individualized education program is developed.
(9) When a virtual public charter school enrolls a student or a student no  longer is enrolled in
a virtual public charter school, the virtual public charter school shall provide  the written notices
described in ORS 338.120 (1)(m) and (n) to the school district where the student is a resident.
(10) A public charter school may conduct fund-raising activities but may not require a  student
to participate in fund-raising activities as a condition of admission to the public charter school.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 338.025 is amended to read:
338.025. (1) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for  the implementation
[6]
SB 760
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
of this chapter. The rules shall follow the intent of this chapter.
(2) Upon application by a public charter school, the State  Board of Education may grant a
waiver of any provision of this chapter if the waiver promotes the  development of programs by
providers, enhances the equitable access by underserved families to the public education of  their
choice, extends the equitable access to  public support by all students or permits high quality pro-
grams of unusual cost.  The State Board of Education may not waive any appeal provision in this
chapter or any provision under ORS  338.115 (1)(a) to (aa), 338.120, [ 338.125 (4),] 338.135 (2)(b) or
339.122.
SECTION 5.
(1) The amendments to ORS 338.025 and  338.125 by sections 3 and 4 of this
2023 Act become operative on July 1, 2023.
(2) The amendments to ORS 338.125 by section 3 of this 2023 Act first  apply to the
2023-2024 school year.
(3) Notwithstanding the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,  a stu-
dent is not required to receive approval from the student’s resident  school district before
enrolling in a virtual public charter school  that is not sponsored by the student’s resident
school district  before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section if the en-
rollment is for the 2023-2024 school year or any other subsequent school year.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[7]