Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.059 is amended to read:
336.059. (1) As used in this section, “sexual abuse” includes sex trafficking of children.
[(1)] (2) Each school district board shall adopt a child sexual abuse prevention  instructional
program for students in kindergarten through grade 12.
[(2)] (3) School districts must include in the program:
(a) Developmentally appropriate, culturally sensitive and evidence-based instruction for each
grade level;
(b) A minimum of four instructional  sessions per school year, with each year’s instruction
building on the previous year’s instruction;
(c) Age-appropriate curriculum including  role-playing, discussion, activities and books to educate
students regarding child sexual abuse prevention;
(d) Instruction providing  students with the knowledge and tools to communicate incidents of
sexual abuse;
(e) Instruction regarding “safe touch,” “unsafe  touch,” [ “safe secrets,” “unsafe secrets,” ] “safe
secrets” and “unsafe secrets”  and how to escape and report a sexual abuse situation;
(f) Techniques to  recognize child sexual abuse, skills to reduce vulnerability and encouragement
to report child sexual abuse;
(g) An evaluation component with measurable outcomes;
(h) A professional training component for administrators, teachers and  other school personnel
regarding communicating child sexual abuse prevention  techniques to students, effects of child sex-
ual abuse on children, receiving child sexual  abuse reports and disclosures and mandated reporting;
and
(i) A parental involvement component to inform parents about  child sexual abuse topics, in-
cluding characteristics of offenders, “grooming”  behaviors and how to discuss child sexual abuse
prevention with children.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1856
SB 631
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
[(3)] (4) Program instruction may be delivered by instructors including  teachers, school counse-
lors and outside agency prevention educators, provided  the instructors have knowledge of and
training in child sexual abuse prevention.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 336.059 by section 1 of this 2025  Act first apply to
the 2025-2026 school year.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]