Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Co-occurring diagnoses” means:
(A) Diagnoses of two or more of the following behavioral health disorders:
(i) A substance use disorder;
(ii) A mental health disorder;
(iii) An eating disorder; or
(iv) Compulsive gambling disorder; or
(B) A diagnosis of a behavioral health disorder listed in subparagraph  (A) of this para-
graph at the same time as a diagnosis of:
(i) An intellectual or developmental disability; or
(ii) A physical health condition.
(b) “Youth” means individuals between the ages of 11 and 25.
(2) The Alcohol and Drug Policy  Commission, in collaboration with the System of Care
Advisory Council established in ORS 418.978,  shall study needed treatment and recovery
services for youth with co-occurring  diagnoses and the barriers to accessing and receiving
holistic services. In conducting the study, the commission and the council shall examine:
(a) Existing state and  local programs that aim to provide treatment and recovery ser-
vices for youth with co-occurring diagnoses, including:
(A) Any deficiencies in existing programs with regard to reimbursement  or the array of
services offered; and
(B) The accessibility of existing programs across health coverage status;
(b) The adequacy of the provider base for treatment and  recovery services for youth with
co-occurring diagnoses to meet the need for services; and
(c) Any statutes, rules or licensing requirements that pose a barrier to  service delivery
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3421
HB 2507
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
or the financial stability  of providing treatment and recovery services for youth with co-
occurring diagnoses.
(3) No later than September 15, 2026, the commission and the council shall report to  the
interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly related to health, in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, on the findings of the study conducted under  this section and shall include
recommendations about:
(a) Ways to improve, adapt or expand  existing state or local programs that are capable
of providing treatment and recovery services for youth with co-occurring diagnoses;
(b) Incentives and workforce programs to address any deficiencies in  the workforce
serving youth with co-occurring diagnoses;
(c) Changes to statutes, rules or licensing  requirements that pose barriers to service
delivery or the financial stability  of providing treatment and recovery services for youth with
co-occurring diagnoses; and
(d) Resource allocations to improve the accessibility of treatment and recovery  services
for youth with co-occurring diagnoses regardless of health coverage status.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]