Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 326.051 is amended to read:
326.051. Subject to ORS 417.300 and 417.305:
(1) In addition to such other duties as are  prescribed by law and pursuant to the requirement
of ORS chapter 183, the State Board of Education shall:
(a) Establish state standards for public kindergartens and public elementary and secondary
schools consistent with the policies stated in ORS 326.011.
(b) Adopt  rules for the general governance of public kindergartens and public elementary and
secondary schools.
(c) Prescribe required or minimum courses of study.
(d) Adopt rules for public kindergartens and public elementary and secondary  schools consistent
with the policy stated in ORS 342.437.
(e) Adopt rules regarding school and interscholastic activities.  The rules  must prohibit a
school district or  a public charter school from charging any fees or requiring participation
in any fundraising activities as a condition of participating in an interscholastic activity.
(f) Adopt rules that provide that no public elementary  or secondary school shall discriminate in
determining participation in interscholastic activities. As  used in this paragraph, “discrimination”
has the meaning given that term in ORS 659.850.
(g) Adopt rules that will  eliminate the use and purchase of elemental mercury, mercury com-
pounds and mercury-added instructional materials by public elementary and secondary schools.
(2) The State Board of Education may:
(a) Consistent with the laws  of this state, accept money or property not otherwise provided for
under paragraph (b) of this subsection, which is donated for the use or benefit of the  public
kindergartens and public elementary and secondary  schools and use such money or property for the
purpose for which it was donated. Until it is used, the board shall deposit any money received under
this paragraph in a special fund with the State Treasurer as provided in ORS 293.265 to 293.275.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2284
HB 2750
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Apply for federal funds, accept  and enter into any contracts or agreements on behalf of the
state for the receipt of funds from the federal government or its agencies and disburse or expend
the federal funds as provided by ORS 327.128. This paragraph applies  to federal funds to be used for:
(A) Educational purposes, including but not limited to any funds  available for the school lunch
program;
(B) Career and technical education programs in public elementary and secondary schools; and
(C) Any  grants available to the state or its political subdivisions for general federal aid for
public kindergartens, public elementary schools and public secondary schools  and their auxiliary
services, improvement of teacher preparation, teacher salaries, construction of school buildings,  ad-
ministration of the Department of  Education and any other educational activities under the juris-
diction of the State Board of Education.
(c) Adopt rules to administer the United States  Department of Agriculture’s National School
Lunch Program and School Breakfast Program for public and  private prekindergarten through grade
12 schools and residential child care facilities.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 339.155 is amended to read:
339.155. (1) A district school board or public charter school  as defined in ORS 338.005 may
not:
(a) Require  payment of fees as a condition of admission to those pupils entitled under the law
to free admission. [ However, The following are not considered as conditions of admission: ]
[(a) Pursuant to ORS 339.141, but subject to ORS 339.147, tuition may be charged for courses  not
part of the regular school program. ]
[(b) A charge may not be  made for a standard, prescribed textbook but a security deposit may be
required, which may be refunded if the textbook is returned in usable  condition. Supplemental texts
shall be made available on loan. ]
[(c) A deposit may be charged for a lock for a locker. ]
(b) Charge for a standard, prescribed textbook. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits:
(A) Charging a security deposit for a textbook, which may be refunded if the textbook  is
returned in usable condition.
(B) Making supplemental texts available on loan.
(2) Pursuant to ORS 339.141, but subject  to ORS 339.147, a district school board or a
public charter  school may charge tuition for courses not part of the regular school program.
(3) A district school board or a public charter school may charge  a deposit for a lock for
a locker.
[(2)] (4) A district  school board or public charter school may require pupils who do not furnish
their own attire for physical education classes to pay  an appropriate fee for uniforms provided by
the district or public charter school.
[(3)] (5) A district school board or public charter school may require pupils who  do not provide
appropriate towels for physical education classes to pay a  fee for use of towels provided by the
district or public charter school.
[(4)(a)] (6)(a) A district school board or public charter school may require  payment of fees for
the use of musical instruments owned or rented by the district or public charter school. The  district
school  board  or public charter school may not charge a fee that exceeds the rental cost of the in-
strument to the district or public charter school or the annual depreciation plus  actual maintenance
cost for each instrument.
(b) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, a district school board or public charter
[2]
HB 2750
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school may not require payment of fees for the use of a musical instrument from  children exempt
from tuition  under ORS 339.147. The district school board or public charter school shall lend musical
instruments, without charge, to children exempt from tuition under ORS 339.147.
[(5)] (7)(a) Subject to ORS 339.147, a district school board or public charter  school may require
payments of fees in any of the following:
[(a)] (A) In any program where the resultant product, in  excess of minimum course requirements
and at the pupil’s option, becomes the personal property of the pupil.
[(b) Admission fees or charges for extracurricular activities where pupil attendance is optional. ]
[(c)] (B) A security deposit conditioned on the  return of materials, supplies or equipment in-
cluding athletic equipment.
[(d)] (C) Items of personal use  or products which a pupil may purchase such as student publi-
cations, class rings, annuals and graduation announcements.
[(e)] (D) Field trips considered optional to a district’s or public charter  school’s regular school
program.
[(f)] (E) Any authorized voluntary pupil health and accident benefit plan.
[(g)] (b) As used in this subsection, “minimum course requirements” means  any product required
to be produced to meet the goals of the course.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 339.147 is amended to read:
339.147. (1)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 339.141, no district  school board or public charter school
as defined in ORS 338.005 shall require tuition for courses not part of the  regular school program,
except for traffic safety education, from a pupil who is a  member of a low-income family in an
amount in excess of what the low-income family may receive as money specifically to be used  for
payment of such tuition.
(b) As used in this subsection, “low-income family” means a family whose children  qualify for
free or reduced price school meals under a federal program, including  but not limited to the Na-
tional School Lunch Act and the Child Nutrition Act of 1966,  and all their subsequent amendments.
(2) A family that does not qualify under subsection  (1) of this section but believes the payment
of school tuition is a  severe hardship may request the district school board or public charter school
to waive in whole or in part the payment of such tuition.
(3) Any parent or guardian who believes that payment of any fee  authorized under ORS 339.155
is a severe hardship may request the district school board or public charter school to waive payment
of the fee and the board or public  charter school shall waive in whole or in part the fee upon a
finding of hardship. Consideration  shall be given to any funds specifically available to the parent,
guardian or child for the payment of fees or other school expenses.
(4) No  district school board or public charter school shall impose or collect fees authorized un-
der ORS 339.155  from any student who is a ward of a juvenile court or of the Oregon Youth Au-
thority or the Department of Human Services unless funds are available therefor in the court’s,
authority’s or department’s budget.
(5) No  district school board or public charter school is required to waive any fee imposed under
ORS 339.155 [ (5)(a) or (d) ] (7)(a)(A) or (C) .
SECTION 4.
 ORS 339.450, as amended by section 14, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2022,  is amended
to read:
339.450. A school, school district or association, whether public or private, may not  deny any
grade or high school student  the right to participate in interscholastic athletics solely on the ground
that the student:
[3]
HB 2750
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) Transferred between schools;
(2) Attends a public charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005;
(3) Participated in athletics at another school; [ or]
(4) Is eligible to attend school under ORS 339.115 (1) and is  enrolled in a program to earn a
certificate for passing an approved high school equivalency test, such as the General Educational
Development (GED) test[ .]; or
(5) Failed to pay  a fee to participate in interscholastic athletics or failed to participate
in any fundraising activities related to interscholastic athletics.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 339.460, as amended by section 13, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2022,  is amended
to read:
339.460. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “High school equivalency  program” means a program provided to assist a student in earning
a certificate for passing an  approved high school equivalency test such as the General Educational
Development (GED) test.
(b) “High school equivalency student” means a student who is eligible to attend school  under
ORS 339.115 (1) and who is enrolled in a high school equivalency program.
(c) “Homeschooled student” means a child who is taught by a private teacher,  a parent or a
legal guardian, as described in ORS 339.030.
(d) “Interscholastic activities” includes:
(A) For students in any grade from kindergarten through grade 12, athletics, music, speech and
other similar or related activities.
(B) For students in any grade from kindergarten through  grade eight, activities that are offered
only before or after regular school hours and that may, but are not required to,  involve interaction
among other schools.
(e) “Public charter school” has the meaning given that term in ORS 338.005.
(2) A school district may not  deny a high school equivalency student, a homeschooled student
or a student who attends  a public charter school that does not provide interscholastic activities the
opportunity to participate  in all interscholastic activities available in the school district within the
attendance boundaries in  which the high school equivalency student, homeschooled student or public
charter school student resides if the student fulfills the following conditions, as applicable:
(a)(A) For a high school equivalency student or a homeschooled student, the student must meet
all school district eligibility requirements except:
(i) The school district’s school or class attendance requirements; and
(ii) The class requirements of the voluntary  association that administers the interscholastic ac-
tivity, if applicable.
(B) For a student who attends a public charter school,  the student must meet all school district
eligibility requirements except the school district’s school or class attendance requirements.
(b) For a homeschooled student or a student who attends a public charter  school, the student
must demonstrate academic eligibility by meeting one of these requirements:
(A) Achieve a minimum score that places the student at or above the 23rd percentile,  based on
national norms, on an examination from the list the State Board of Education  adopts under ORS
339.035. The student must take  the examination prior to the beginning of the school year in which
the student will participate in an  interscholastic activity and for which academic eligibility is being
determined, and the student’s parent or legal guardian must submit the results to the school district
for use in determining the student’s academic eligibility.
[4]
HB 2750
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Meet alternative requirements that a school district adopts, in consultation with  the
student’s parent or legal guardian, to participate in  interscholastic activities, including but not
limited to a requirement that a student submit a portfolio of  work samples to a school district
committee for review to determine whether  the student is eligible to participate in interscholastic
activities.
(c) For a high school equivalency student, the student must demonstrate academic  eligibility by
showing that, prior to beginning  the interscholastic activity, the student has passed at least one
practice test administered through the high school equivalency program.
[(3)(a) In addition to  the requirements set forth in subsection (2) of this section, a public charter
school that enrolls a student who intends to participate  in an interscholastic activity must pay to the
school district or school that offers the interscholastic activity,  as appropriate and if the school district
or school requires payment as provided by this subsection: ]
[(A) An annual fee that is equivalent  to not more than five percent of the amount of the school
district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw, as calculated under ORS 327.013; and ]
[(B) An additional annual fee that is equivalent to not more than  five percent of the amount of the
school district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw, as calculated under ORS 327.013,  if participating
in the interscholastic activity requires the student to enroll in a course for credit. ]
[(b) The school district  and the public charter school shall enter into an agreement to specify the
amount of the fees described in paragraph (a) of this subsection. ]
[(c) A public charter school is  required to pay a fee described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
only once per year per student participating in an interscholastic  activity at a school in the school
district, regardless of the number of interscholastic activities in which the student participates. ]
[(4)] (3) A high school equivalency student, a homeschooled student or a student who attends  a
public charter school  may participate in interscholastic activities while awaiting examination or
practice test results unless the student is awaiting the results to restore academic eligibility.
[(5)] (4) A high school equivalency student, a homeschooled student or a student who attends  a
public charter school who  does not maintain academic eligibility is ineligible to participate in
interscholastic activities for the school year in which the student  is determined to be academically
ineligible  unless:
(a) At least 18 weeks have passed from the later of the date that the student:
(A) Was determined to have not maintained academic eligibility; or
(B) Became a high school equivalency student or a homeschooled student; and
(b) The student takes the required examinations or practice tests and  meets the standards de-
scribed in subsection (2)(b) or (c) of this section.
[(6)(a)] (5)(a) A high school equivalency student, a  homeschooled student or a student who at-
tends a public charter school must fulfill the same  responsibilities and standards of behavior and
performance, including related class or  practice requirements, as other students who participate in
the interscholastic activity.  The student must also comply with all public school requirements during
the time of participation.
(b) A student  who attends a public charter school must be allowed to participate in an inter-
scholastic activity in the same manner that a  resident of the school district may participate in the
interscholastic activity. A school district may not give priority to residents  of the school district to
participate in interscholastic activities, but may  require a student who attends a public charter
school to satisfy any standards for acceptance for participation.
[(7)] (6) A high school equivalency student, a homeschooled student or a student who attends  a
[5]
HB 2750
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
public charter  school who participates in interscholastic activities must reside within the attendance
boundaries of the school at which the  student participates unless the school district has a policy
that allows any student attending a school of the school district to participate in  interscholastic
activities at any school of the school district.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 327.254 is amended to read:
327.254. (1) The Department of Education shall use  moneys in the Statewide Education Initi-
atives Account to provide funding for statewide education initiatives, including:
(a) Funding the High School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Act at the levels
prescribed by ORS 327.856;
(b) Expanding school breakfast and lunch programs;
(c) Operating youth reengagement programs or providing youth reengagement services;
(d) Establishing and maintaining  the Statewide School Safety and Prevention System under ORS
339.341;
(e) Developing and providing statewide equity initiatives, including the Black  or African-
American education plan developed under ORS 329.841, the American Indian or Alaska Native  edu-
cation plan developed under  ORS 329.843, the Latino or Hispanic education plan developed under
ORS 329.845 or any similar education plan identified by the department;
(f) Providing summer learning programs at schools  that are considered high poverty under Title
I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965;
(g) Funding early warning systems to assist students in  graduating from high school, as de-
scribed in ORS 327.367;
(h) Developing and implementing professional development programs and  training programs, in-
cluding programs that increase educator diversity and retain diverse educators;
(i) Planning for increased transparency and accountability in the public  education system of this
state;
(j) Paying costs that are incurred by a school district or a public charter school  for stu-
dent participation in interscholastic activities because  the school district or public charter
school does not require a student to pay related fees or to participate in  related fundraising
activities as a condition of participating in the interscholastic activity;
[(j)] (k) Providing additional funding to school districts participating in the intensive program
under ORS 327.222;
[(k)] (L) Providing technical assistance, including costs incurred for:
(A) The coaching program described in ORS 327.214; and
(B) The intensive program described in ORS 327.222, including costs for student success teams;
[(L)] (m) Funding public charter schools, as described in ORS 327.362;
[(m)] (n) Funding education service districts, as described in subsection (2) of this section; and
[(n)] (o) Funding costs incurred by the department in implementing  this section and ORS 327.175
to 327.235 and 327.274.
(2)(a) The amount of a distribution to an education  service district under this section shall be
made as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection after calculating the  following for each edu-
cation service district:
(A) One percent of the total amount available for distribution to  education service districts in
each biennium.
(B) The education service district’s ADMw ×  (the total amount available for distribution to
education service districts in each biennium ÷  the total ADMw of all education  service districts
[6]
HB 2750
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
that receive a distribution).
(b) The amount of the distribution to an education service district shall be the greater of  the
amounts calculated under paragraph (a) of this subsection, except that, for distributions  made as
provided by paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, the  total amount available for distribution to edu-
cation service districts shall be the amount remaining after any  distributions required under para-
graph (a)(A) of this subsection have been made.
(c) For purposes  of this subsection, ADMw equals the ADMw as calculated under ORS 327.013,
except that the additional amount allowed for students who are in  poverty families, as determined
under ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A)(v)(I), shall be 0.5.
(d) An education service district  shall use moneys received under this section as provided by a
plan developed by the school districts located within the education  service district. A school district
that declines to participate in the development of the plan or that has withdrawn from an education
service district as provided by  ORS 334.015 is not entitled to any moneys distributed to the educa-
tion service district under this subsection.
(e) A plan developed under this subsection must:
(A) Align with and support school districts  in meeting the performance growth targets of the
school districts developing the plan;
(B) Include the provision of technical assistance to school districts in  developing, implementing
and reviewing a plan for receiving a grant from the Student Investment Account;
(C) Provide for  coordination with the department in administering and providing technical as-
sistance to school  districts, including coordinating any coaching programs established under ORS
327.214; and
(D) Be  adopted and amended as provided for local service plans under ORS 334.175 and approved
by the department.
(f) Each education service district must submit an annual report to the department that:
(A) Describes how the education service district spent moneys received under  this subsection;
and
(B) Includes an evaluation of the education service district’s compliance with the plan  from the
superintendent of each school district that participated in the development of the plan.
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules necessary for the distribution of moneys  un-
der this section.
SECTION 7.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[7]