Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A person may not bring a civil action against an individual who,  without
malice, makes a communication regarding an incident of sexual  assault, sexual harassment
or sex discrimination if, at the time of making the communication, the individual has a rea-
sonable belief that sexual assault, sexual harassment or  sex discrimination occurred,
whether or not the individual filed an official complaint.
(2) A prevailing defendant in an action brought  in violation of subsection (1) of this sec-
tion is entitled to recover reasonable attorney fees.
(3) A nonprevailing plaintiff in an action brought in violation of subsection (1) of  this
section is subject to imposition of remedial sanctions under ORS  33.055, including but not
limited to payment to the  prevailing defendant of a sum of money sufficient to compensate
the prevailing defendant for loss, injury and costs suffered by the prevailing defendant as  a
result of the action.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 639