Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Water Resources Department shall study the use of  voluntary agree-
ments for ground water management. The department shall submit a report on the  study in
the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to
the committees or interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly related to natural re-
sources no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2798