Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, when issuing a permit under
a provision of ORS chapter 536 or  537, the Water Resources Department shall consider the
water basin in which the permitted activity would occur.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3698