Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 477.064 is amended to read:
477.064. (1) Any fire  on any forestland in Oregon burning uncontrolled or without proper action
being taken to prevent its spread,  notwithstanding its origin, is declared a public nuisance by reason
of its menace to life, forest resources or property.
(2) The spread of fire in forestland across an ownership boundary is prima facie evidence of  fire
burning uncontrolled , unless the owners or operators of the forestland on both sides  of the
ownership boundary jointly agree in advance that the fire may be conducted  as a prescribed
fire.
SECTION 2.  ORS 477.066 is amended to read:
477.066. (1) Each owner and operator of  forestland on which a fire exists or from which it may
have spread, notwithstanding the origin or subsequent spread thereof,  shall immediately proceed to
control and extinguish such fire when  its existence comes to the knowledge of the owner or opera-
tor, without awaiting instructions from the forester, and shall  continue until the fire is extinguished.
However, the owner or operator of forestland on which a  prescribed fire exists need not ex-
tinguish the fire if:
(a) The owners or operators  agree in advance of the fire that the fire may be conducted
as a prescribed fire as described in ORS 477.064; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2933
HB 2572
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The fire remains on the forestland of the owners or operators that agreed to the fire.
(2)(a) If the forester determines either that  the fire is [ either] burning uncontrolled or that the
owner or operator  does not then have readily and immediately available personnel and equipment
to control or extinguish the fire, the forester, or any forest  protective association or agency under
contract or agreement  with the State Board of Forestry for the protection of forestland against fire,
and within whose protection area the  fire exists, shall summarily abate the nuisance thus consti-
tuted by controlling and extinguishing the fire.
(b) If a fire  is burning as a prescribed fire under circumstances described in subsection
(1)(a) and (b) of this section, the forester may not determine that the  spread of fire across
an ownership boundary demonstrates that the fire is burning uncontrolled.
(3) An owner may request in writing that  the forester employ alternate fire prevention and
suppression strategies or  techniques on the owner’s forestland. The forester may employ some or
all of the requested strategies or techniques when, in the judgment  of the forester, conditions war-
rant the use of the alternate strategies or techniques.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 477.740 is amended to read:
477.740. A person commits the offense of unlawful use of fire if the person:
(1) In the ignition of a fire:
(a) Unlawfully  sets on fire, or causes to be set on fire, any grass, grain, stubble or other material
being or growing on any lands within the state;
(b) Intentionally or negligently allows fire to escape from the person’s own land,  or land of
which the person is in possession or control; or
(c) Accidentally sets any fire on the person’s own land or the land of another and allows  it to
escape from control without extinguishing it, or making a bona fide effort to do so.
(2) Having knowledge of a fire burning on the person’s own  land, or land of which the person
is in possession or control, fails  or neglects to make a bona fide effort to extinguish the same, re-
gardless of whether or not the person is responsible for the  starting or existence thereof , unless
the fire is a prescribed fire .
SECTION 4.
 ORS 526.360 is amended to read:
526.360. (1) The State Board of Forestry  and the [ forester] State Forester  may assist to the
extent possible in developing, for forestry,  grazing or agricultural uses, all forestland classified
pursuant to ORS 526.328 or 526.340 for such uses, including the burning of  brush or other flammable
material for the purpose of:
(a) Removing a fire hazard to any property;
(b) Preparing seed beds;
(c) Removing obstructions to  or interference with the proper seeding or agricultural or grazing
development or use of that land;
(d) Promoting the  establishment of new forest crops on cutover, denuded or underproductive
lands;
(e) Implementing pest  prevention and suppression activities, as provided in ORS 527.310 to
527.370; or
(f) Promoting improvements to forest health, including improvements to fish and  wildlife habitat.
(2) Upon request of the owner or the  agent of the owner of any forestland classified pursuant
to ORS 526.328 or 526.340, the forester may perform or  supervise burning operations thereon for any
of the purposes stated in subsection (1) of this section. The owner or the agent of the owner shall
supply such personnel and equipment and  shall perform such fire control actions and activities as
[2]
HB 2572
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
the forester may require while there is danger of the  fire spreading. The forester may refuse to
perform or supervise burning or to issue any burning permit when, in  the judgment of the forester,
conditions so warrant.
(3) To accomplish the purposes set forth in subsection (1) of  this section, the [ State Board of
Forestry may ] board shall  establish by rule a Certified Burn Manager program.
(4) The rules required by subsection (3) of this section  shall include:
(a) Certification standards, requirements and procedures;
(b) Standards, requirements and procedures to revoke certification;
(c) Actions and activities that a Certified Burn Manager must perform;
(d) Actions and activities that a Certified Burn Manager may not allow or perform;
(e) Limitations on the use of a Certified Burn Manager; and
(f) Any other standard, requirement or  procedure that the board considers necessary for the safe
and effective administration of the program.
(5) The rules required by subsection (3) of this  section may establish and impose fees for
participation in the program.
[(4)] (6) When [ any] a burning for any of the  purposes stated in subsection (1) of this section on
forestland classified pursuant to ORS 526.328 or 526.340 is started under  the supervision of and
supervised by the forester or a Certified Burn Manager, [ no] a person [ shall] may not  be held liable
for property damage  resulting from that burning unless the damage is caused by the negligence of
the person.
(7) When a burning is started under the supervision of a Certified  Burn Manager, the
forester may assess against a person who started the burning fire suppression  costs that are
less than or equal to the amount of fire suppression costs described in ORS 477.120 (4).
SECTION 5.
By December 1, 2021, the State Board of Forestry shall:
(1) Consult with the  Oregon Prescribed Fire Council concerning best practices for con-
ducting the Certified Burn Manager program described in ORS 526.360;
(2) Initiate rulemaking to establish the program; and
(3) Report in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 to  an appropriate committee or sub-
committee of the Legislative Assembly on progress the board  has made in establishing and
implementing the program and when the board expects to launch the program.
SECTION 6.
There is appropriated to the State Board of Forestry, for  the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $  for the purpose of
establishing and implementing the Certified Burn Manager program described in ORS 526.360.
SECTION 7. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]