Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $________, which shall be expended to:
(1) Provide funding to support ___ additional regional health equity coalitions for  a
statewide total of ___;
(2) Provide funding to enable each regional health equity  coalition to hire additional
full-time staff; and
(3) Allocate $________ to regional health equity coalitions to be used for:
(a) Facility costs;
(b) Costs related to providing  child care, transportation and interpretation and trans-
lation services; and
(c) Stipends paid for regional health equity coalition members’ attendance at meetings.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 472