Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall award  a grant
to the Chintimini Wildlife Center. The grant shall  be for the purposes of building or im-
proving:
(a) Modern wildlife enclosures;
(b) Paths that  are accessible to and usable by persons with disabilities, in accordance
with the Americans with Disabilities Act; and
(c) Other facilities or infrastructure necessary to expand the ability of the center to
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4291
SB 1131
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
support education, outreach and visitor opportunities.
(2) The base amount of the grant awarded under this section shall be  $1.5 million. The
department may award an additional amount of up to $500,000, if the center  certifies to the
department that the center has raised matching funds in that amount from other sources.
(3) The department may impose such conditions  on the grant awarded under this section
as is necessary to ensure that grant moneys are  used for the purposes for which they were
awarded.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000  for the purpose of carrying out
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]