Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 332.
SECTION 2. (1) As used  in this section, “Salem-Keizer School District” means the school
district in which the State Capitol is located.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 332.128, the directors of the district school board of  the Salem-
Keizer School District must be nominated by zone.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS  332.126, the directors of the district school board of the Salem-
Keizer School District must be elected by zone.
SECTION 3.  ORS 332.122 is amended to read:
332.122. (1) Except as provided in ORS 255.400 to 255.424,  in common school districts and union
high school districts the directors may be nominated in one of the following methods or a combina-
tion thereof:
(a) At large by position number by the electors of the district.
(b) By zone by electors of zones, if zoning  is approved by the electors under ORS 332.128  or if
zoning is required under section 2 of this 2025 Act .
(2) A person  shall be nominated as a candidate for director by filing a petition for nomination
or a declaration of candidacy under ORS 255.235.
(3) If a candidate is nominated by petition, the petition:
(a) If the candidate is nominated from a zone, must be signed by the electors of the zone.
(b) If the candidate is nominated at large, must be signed by the electors of the district.
(4) Except as provided in ORS 255.400 to 255.424,  a candidate for school director must be an
elector registered in the district. If the district is zoned and the candidate seeks nomination  from
a zone, the candidate also must be a resident of that zone.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 332.124 is amended to read:
332.124. (1) Except as provided  in ORS 255.400 to 255.424, all candidates shall be elected at large
in the district unless the district school board provides for election from zones under  ORS 332.126
or the candidates must be elected by zones as provided by section 2 of this 2025 Act .
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3192
HB 3268
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
(2) In a district in which directors are elected from zones:
(a) The candidate for the office of director in each zone who receives the plurality of the votes
shall be elected.
(b) At the expiration of each director’s term of  office, a successor shall be elected from the same
zone.
(3) Except  as provided in ORS 255.400 to 255.424, in the event that no person from the same zone
is nominated under  ORS 332.122 as a candidate for the vacant office of director by the school dis-
trict election filing deadline or is elected as a write-in candidate  at the subsequent school district
election, or in the event that an office of director becomes vacant at midterm, the district school
board shall fill the vacancy as follows:
(a) The board shall advertise the vacancy for a 20-day period in an attempt to  find an eligible
resident from the same zone to fill the vacancy. If one  or more eligible residents declare interest in
the vacant office, the school district board shall appoint one  of the eligible residents to fill the va-
cant office until June 30 following the next regular school district election.
(b) If, after 20 days of advertising the  vacancy, no eligible resident from the same zone declares
interest in the vacant office, the  school district board shall appoint one of the eligible residents from
the district at large to fill the vacant office until June 30 following the next regular school district
election.
(c) Offices filled in the manner described in paragraphs (a)  and (b) of this subsection shall be-
come vacant  on June 30 following the next regular school district election. Nomination of candidates
for vacant offices shall occur as provided under ORS 332.122.
[2]