Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The purpose of sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act is to:
(1) Ensure that employers pay a fair share penalty for health care coverage  provided to
their employees through the medical assistance program.
(2) Encourage employers to provide affordable health insurance coverage to  low-wage
employees who would otherwise be enrolled in the medical assistance program.
(3) Protect employees who receive medical assistance from retaliation by  their employers
for seeking or obtaining medical assistance.
(4) Pay the state’s share of the costs  of medical assistance provided to working adults
who lack affordable employer-sponsored  health insurance, improve reimbursement to the
health care providers who care for these workers and support  the safety net providers that
care for the remaining uninsured workers.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 1 to 6 of this 2017 Act:
(1)(a) “Covered employee” means an individual who meets all of the  following conditions:
(A) The individual is 18 to 64 years of age.
(B) The individual is employed for an average of at least 20  hours per week by an em-
ployer that offers health insurance coverage to its employees.
(C) The individual is enrolled in medical assistance  on the basis of the individual’s income
and not by reason of a disability or being over 65 years of age.
(b) “Covered  employee” includes a leased employee or other individual under the direction
and control of the employer.
(2)(a) “Employer” means an employing unit as defined in  ORS 657.020 that employed an
average of at least 50 full-time employees on  business days during the preceding calendar
year.
(b) “Employer”  includes all of the members of a controlled group of corporations. As used
in this paragraph, “controlled group of corporations” means a controlled  group of corpo-
rations as  defined in section 1563(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that “more than
50 percent” shall be substituted for “at least 80 percent”  each place it appears in section
1563(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code,  and the determination shall be made without regard
to sections 1563(a)(4) and 1563(e)(3)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(c) “Employer” does not include a public employer as defined in ORS 243.650.
(3) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(4) “Safety net provider” means any  provider of comprehensive primary care or acute
hospital inpatient services  that provides these services to a significant number of medical
assistance and medically indigent patients in relation to the total number of patients  served
by the provider.
(5) “Wages” means wages as defined in ORS 657.105 paid  directly to an individual by the
individual’s employer.
SECTION 3.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in section 4 of this 2017 Act, every employer
shall pay to the Department of Consumer and Business  Services an employer responsibility
penalty for each covered employee, as determined under subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Each year the department shall determine the average cost of  a full year of coverage
[2]
SB 997
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under a group health benefit plan that has an actuarial value of 70 percent.
(3) For each employer, the department shall:
(a) Multiply the amount determined under subsection (2) of this section by  the number
of the employer’s employees who are covered employees;
(b) Multiply the product calculated in paragraph (a) of this subsection by 0.9; and
(c) Impose an employer responsibility penalty on the employer that is equal  to the prod-
uct calculated in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(4) All moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited  in the Employer Re-
sponsibility for Medical Assistance Trust Fund created in section 5 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services has the power and
duties necessary to  administer the collection and enforcement of employer responsibility
penalties required to be remitted by employers under this section and section 3 of  this 2017
Act, including but not limited to the power to:
(a) Adopt rules to administer and enforce sections 1 to 6 of this 2017 Act;
(b) Subpoena documents and subpoena witnesses to testify under oath; and
(c) Institute or prosecute actions for the enforcement of sections 1 to  6 of this 2017 Act.
(2) An employer shall pay to  the department, for deposit into the Employer Responsibility
for Medical Assistance Trust Fund, any penalties imposed  on the employer pursuant to sec-
tion 3 of this 2017 Act.
(3) The department shall annually send to each employer subject to an employer respon-
sibility penalty under section 3 of this 2017 Act a notice of any employer  responsibility pen-
alty imposed and the date on  which payment is due. The amount of the penalty shall become
conclusive and binding upon the employer unless, within 20 days after the  mailing of the
notice to the last-known address of the  employer as shown on the records of the department,
or in the absence of mailing, within 20 days after the delivery  of the notice, the employer
files a request for hearing. Hearings shall be conducted in  accordance with ORS chapter 183.
(4) Interest shall be assessed on  employer responsibility penalties not paid on or before
payment is due at  10 percent per annum. Interest shall begin to accrue the day after the date
the payment is due and  shall be deposited into the Employer Responsibility for Medical As-
sistance Trust Fund.
(5) If an employer responsibility penalty payment is more than  60 days overdue, a penalty
equal to the interest charged as described  in subsection (4) of this section shall be assessed
and due for each month, or part thereof, that the employer responsibility  penalty payment
is not received.
(6) All penalties shall be paid to and  collected by the department at such times and in
such manner as the department may prescribe and  upon collection shall be deposited in the
Employer Responsibility for Medical Assistance Trust Fund.
(7) An employer shall provide information  to all newly hired and existing employees re-
garding the availability of medical assistance for low-income employees and  regarding the
employees’ rights under section 7 of this 2017 Act. The department, in consultation  with the
Oregon Health Authority, shall develop a simple, uniform notice containing the information.
SECTION 5.
 (1) The Employer Responsibility for Medical Assistance Trust Fund  is cre-
ated in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General  Fund, and consists of
moneys collected under section 4 of this 2017 Act. Interest  earned by the Employer Respon-
sibility for Medical Assistance Trust Fund shall be credited to the fund.
[3]
SB 997
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the Oregon Health  Authority to be used for
the following purposes:
(a) To provide payment for the state’s share of  medical assistance costs for covered
employees.
(b) To increase reimbursement to health care providers located in  health profession
shortage areas or medically underserved areas as designated by the  Office of Rural Health.
The supplemental payments shall be for both  fee-for-service medical assistance and care
provided by coordinated care organizations.
(c) To make  supplemental medical assistance payments to providers in practice settings
in which 30 percent or more of the patients are medical assistance recipients or uninsured.
(d) To provide reimbursement to safety net providers that provide care without expecta-
tion of compensation to those Oregonians who do not have health insurance.
(e) To fund medical residency programs.
(3) All  costs to implement and administer sections 1 to 6 of this 2017 Act shall be paid
from moneys deposited in the fund, including any necessary  costs incurred by the authority,
the Department of Consumer and Business Services or any other state government agency.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Oregon Health  Authority shall collaborate with the Employment
Department, the Department of Consumer and Business Services and the  Department of
Revenue to exchange data, in accordance  with federal requirements, as necessary to deter-
mine if individuals enrolled in the medical  assistance program are covered employees as de-
fined in section 2 of this 2017 Act and to administer sections 1 to 6  of this 2017 Act, including
by requesting from a federal agency any necessary waiver of federal requirements.
(2) The authority shall provide to  the Department of Consumer and Business Services
information about employers who have employees who receive medical assistance in  order
to permit the department to determine and collect  the employer responsibility penalty im-
posed pursuant to section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(3) Any and all shared data  related to enrollees in the medical assistance program are
subject to the confidentiality requirements of ORS 413.171 and 657.665.
SECTION 7. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Employer” has the meaning given that term in section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(b) “Health insurance exchange” has the meaning give that term in ORS 741.300.
(c) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(d) “Premium tax credits” means tax credits provided under section 36B of  the Internal
Revenue Code to a person who  is enrolled in a qualified health plan through a health insur-
ance exchange.
(2) It  is an unlawful employment practice for an employer to refuse to hire, discharge,
demote, suspend, retaliate or otherwise discriminate against an employee who applies for  or
receives medical assistance or premium tax credits.
(3) An employee who alleges a violation  of subsection (2) of this section may bring a civil
action under ORS 659A.885 or may file  a complaint with the Commissioner of the Bureau of
Labor and Industries in the manner provided by ORS 659A.820.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 657.660 is amended to read:
657.660. (1) Every employing unit shall keep  true and accurate records of all persons employed
by it and such records of hours worked, wages  paid and other statistics as prescribed by the Di-
rector of the Employment Department for  the administration of this chapter  and section 6 of this
[4]
SB 997
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
2017 Act.
(2) Such records shall be open to inspection by the director or an authorized  representative of
the director at any reasonable time. No person shall  refuse to allow the director or authorized
representative to inspect the  payroll or other records or documents relative to the enforcement of
this chapter  and section 6 of this 2017 Act .
(3) The director may require from any employing unit such reports on the wages, hours,  em-
ployment, unemployment and related matters  concerning its employees as the director deems nec-
essary to the effective administration of this chapter  and section 6 of this 2017 Act .
(4) Every employing unit shall fully, correctly and promptly furnish the director all information
required by the director to carry out the purposes  and provisions of this chapter  and section 6 of
this 2017 Act .
SECTION 9.  ORS 657.665 is amended to read:
657.665. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) to (5) of  this section, all information in the
records of the Employment Department pertaining to the administration  of the unemployment in-
surance, employment service and labor market information programs:
(a) Is confidential  and for the exclusive use and information of the Director of the Employment
Department in administering the unemployment insurance, employment  service and labor market
information programs in Oregon.
(b) May not be used in any  court action or in any proceeding pending in the court unless the
director or the state is a party to the action or proceeding  or unless the proceeding concerns the
establishment, enforcement or modification of  a support obligation and support services are being
provided by the Division of Child Support or the district attorney pursuant to ORS 25.080.
(c) Is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.410 to 192.505.
(2) The Employment Department shall disclose information:
(a) To any claimant or legal representative, at a hearing before an administrative law judge,  to
the extent necessary for the proper presentation of an unemployment insurance claim.
(b) Upon request to the United States  Secretary of Labor. The Employment Department shall
disclose the information in a form and containing the  information that the United States Secretary
of Labor may require. The  information disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other
purpose.
(c) Pursuant to  section 303(a)(7) of the Social Security Act, upon request to any agency of the
United States charged with the administration of public works or  assistance through public em-
ployment. Under this paragraph, the Employment Department shall  disclose the name, address, or-
dinary occupation and employment status of each recipient of  unemployment insurance benefits and
a statement of the recipient’s right  to further benefits under this chapter. The information disclosed
is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose.
(d) Pursuant to section 303(c)(1) of the Social  Security Act, to the Railroad Retirement Board.
Under this paragraph, the Employment Department  shall disclose unemployment insurance records.
The information disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any  other purpose. The costs of
disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by the board.
(e) Pursuant  to section 303(d) of the Social Security Act, upon request to officers and employees
of the United States Department of Agriculture and  to officers or employees of any state Supple-
mental Nutrition Assistance Program agency for the purpose of determining an individual’s  eligibil-
ity for or the amount of supplemental nutrition assistance. The  information disclosed is confidential
and may not be used for any  other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph
[5]
SB 997
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
shall be paid by the United States Department of Agriculture.
(f) Pursuant to section 303(e)(1) and (2)(A)(ii) of the Social Security Act, to state  or local child
support enforcement agencies enforcing child support obligations under Title IV-D of the  Social Se-
curity Act for the purposes of  establishing child support obligations, locating individuals owing child
support obligations and collecting child  support obligations from those individuals. The information
disclosed is confidential and may not be used for  any other purpose. The costs of disclosing infor-
mation under this paragraph shall be paid by the child support enforcement agency.
(g) Pursuant to sections 303(f) and 1137 of  the Social Security Act, to agencies participating in
the income and  eligibility verification system for the purpose of verifying an individual’s eligibility
for benefits, or the  amount of benefits, under unemployment insurance, temporary assistance for
needy families, Medicaid, the Supplemental Nutrition  Assistance Program, Supplemental Security
Income, child support  enforcement or Social Security programs. The information disclosed is confi-
dential and may not be used for any other purpose. The  costs of disclosing information under this
paragraph shall be paid by the requesting agency.
(h) Pursuant to section 303(h) of the Social Security Act and section 3304(a)(16)(B) of the Federal
Unemployment Tax Act, to the United States Department  of Health and Human Services National
Directory of New Hires. The information disclosed is confidential and may  not be used for any other
purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by the  United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
(i) Pursuant to section 303(i) of the Social Security  Act, to officers and employees of the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development and to representatives of a public housing
agency for the purpose  of determining an individual’s eligibility for benefits, or the amount of ben-
efits, under a housing assistance program of the United States Department of Housing and  Urban
Development. The information disclosed is confidential and may not  be used for any other purpose.
The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by  the United States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development or the public housing agency.
(j) Pursuant to regulations of the United States Secretary of  Health and Human Services issued
under section 3304(a)(16)(A) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, and except as required by sec-
tion 303 of the Social Security Act, to the state, a political  subdivision or a federally recognized
Indian tribe that has signed an  agreement with the Department of Human Services to administer
Part A of Title IV of the Social Security Act for the purpose of determining an individual’s eligibility
for assistance, or the amount of assistance, under a  program funded under Part A of Title IV of the
Social Security Act. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be  used for any other
purpose.
(k) Upon request, to  the United States Attorney’s Office. Under this paragraph, the Employment
Department may disclose an individual’s employment and wage information in response to a  federal
grand jury subpoena or for the purpose  of collecting civil and criminal judgments, including
restitution and special assessment  fees. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be
used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid
by the United States Attorney’s Office.
(3) The Employment Department may disclose information secured from employing units:
(a) To agencies  of this state, federal agencies and local government agencies to the extent nec-
essary to properly carry  out governmental planning, performance measurement, program analysis,
socioeconomic analysis and  policy analysis functions performed under applicable law. The informa-
tion disclosed is  confidential and may not be disclosed by the agencies in any manner that would
[6]
SB 997
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
identify individuals, claimants, employees  or employing units. If the information disclosed under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of  the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the agency requesting the information.
(b) As part of a geographic information system. Points on a map may  be used to represent eco-
nomic data, including the  location, employment size class and industrial classification of businesses
in Oregon. Information presented  as part of a geographic information system may not give specific
details regarding a business’s address, actual employment or  proprietary information. If the infor-
mation disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use  of the Employment Department,
the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the party requesting the information.
(c) In accordance with ORS 657.673.
(4) The Employment Department may:
(a) Disclose information to public employees in the performance of their  duties under state or
federal laws relating to the payment of  unemployment insurance benefits, the provision of employ-
ment services and the provision of labor market information.
(b) At the discretion of the Director of the Employment Department and subject to an  intera-
gency agreement, disclose information to public officials in the performance  of their official duties
administering or enforcing laws within their authority and to the  agents or contractors of public
officials. The public official shall agree to assume responsibility for misuse of the information by
the official’s agent or contractor.
(c) Disclose information pursuant  to an informed consent, received from an employer or claim-
ant, to disclose the information.
(d) Disclose information to partners  under the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 for the
purpose of administering state workforce programs  under the Act. The information disclosed is
confidential and may not  be used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under
this paragraph shall be paid by the requesting partner.
(e) Disclose the names and addresses of employing units to the  Bureau of Labor and Industries
for the purpose of disseminating information to employing units.  The names and addresses disclosed
are confidential and may  not be used for any other purpose. If the information disclosed under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of the  Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the bureau.
(f) Disclose information to the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and  Industries for the
purpose of performing duties under ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870,  658.005 to 658.245 or 658.405 to
658.503 or ORS chapter 652, 653 or 659A. The information disclosed may include the names and ad-
dresses of employers and employees and payroll data of employers and employees. The  information
disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose. If the information disclosed
under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment  Department, the costs of dis-
closing the information shall be paid by the bureau.
(g) Disclose information required under ORS 657.660 (3)  and (4) to the Public Employees Re-
tirement System for the purpose of determining the eligibility of members  of the retirement system
for disability retirement allowances under ORS chapter 238. The  information disclosed is confiden-
tial and may not be  used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this par-
agraph shall be paid by the Public Employees Retirement System.
(h) Disclose to the Oregon Business Development Commission information required by  the com-
mission in performing its duty under ORS 285A.050 to verify changes in  employment levels following
direct employer participation in Oregon Business Development Department programs  or indirect
[7]
SB 997
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
participation through municipalities under ORS 285B.410 to 285B.482. The  information disclosed to
the commission may include an employer’s employment level, total subject wages payroll  and whole
hours worked. The information disclosed is confidential and may not  be used for any other purpose.
The commission may not disclose  the information in any manner that would identify an employing
unit or employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duty under  ORS
285A.050. If the information disclosed under this  paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Em-
ployment Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the commission.
(i) Disclose  information to the Department of Revenue for the purpose of performing its duties
under ORS 293.250 or under the revenue  and tax laws of this state. The information disclosed may
include the names and addresses of employers and employees and  payroll data of employers and
employees. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be disclosed by the Department
of Revenue in any manner that would identify an employing unit or employee except to  the extent
necessary to carry out the department’s duties under ORS 293.250 or in auditing or reviewing  any
report or return required or permitted to be filed under the revenue and tax laws administered  by
the department. The  Department of Revenue may not disclose any information received to any pri-
vate collection agency or for any  other purpose. If the information disclosed under this paragraph
is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing  the information
shall be paid by the Department of Revenue.
(j) Disclose information to  the Department of Consumer and Business Services for the purpose
of performing its duties under  ORS chapters 654 and 656 and sections 1 to 6 of this 2017 Act . The
information disclosed may include the name, address, number of employees and  industrial classi-
fication code of an employer  and payroll data of employers and employees. The information disclosed
is confidential and may not  be disclosed by the Department of Consumer and Business Services in
any manner that would identify an employing unit or employee except to  the extent necessary to
carry out the department’s duties under ORS chapters 654 and 656  and sections 1 to 6 of this  2017
Act, including administrative  hearings and court proceedings in which the Department of Consumer
and Business Services is a party. If the information disclosed  under this paragraph is not prepared
for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing  the information shall be paid by
the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(k) Disclose information to the Construction  Contractors Board for the purpose of performing
its duties under ORS chapter 701.  The information disclosed to the board may include the names and
addresses of employers and status of their compliance with this chapter. If the information  disclosed
under this paragraph is not prepared  for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of dis-
closing the information shall be paid by the board.
(L) Disclose information to  the State Fire Marshal to assist the State Fire Marshal in carrying
out duties under ORS 453.307 to 453.414. The  information disclosed may include the name, address,
telephone number and industrial classification code of an employer. The information disclosed  is
confidential and may not be disclosed by the State Fire Marshal in any manner that would  identify
an employing unit except to the extent necessary to carry out duties under ORS  453.307 to 453.414.
If the information  disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment
Department, the costs of disclosing  the information shall be paid by the office of the State Fire
Marshal.
(m) Disclose information to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  for the purpose of
performing the commission’s duties under ORS  chapter 348 and Title IV of the Higher Education
Act of 1965. The information disclosed may include the names and addresses of employers and em-
[8]
SB 997
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ployees and payroll data of employers and employees. The  information disclosed is confidential and
may not be disclosed by the commission in any manner that  would identify an employing unit or
employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duties under  ORS chapter
348 or Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965.  If the information disclosed under this para-
graph is not prepared for  the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the infor-
mation shall be paid by the commission.
(n) Disclose information to the Department of Transportation to  assist the Department of
Transportation  in  carrying out the duties of the Department of Transportation relating to collection
of delinquent and liquidated debts, including taxes,  under ORS 184.610 to 184.656, 184.670 to 184.733
and 805.263, ORS chapter 319 and the Oregon Vehicle Code. The information disclosed may include
the names and addresses of employers and employees and payroll data of employers and employees.
The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be disclosed by the Department of Transpor-
tation in any manner that  would identify an employing unit or employee except to the extent nec-
essary to carry out the Department of Transportation’s duties relating  to collection of delinquent
and liquidated debts or in auditing or reviewing any report or return required or permitted  to be
filed under the revenue and tax laws administered  by the Department of Transportation. The De-
partment of Transportation may not disclose any information received to any private collection
agency or for any other  purpose. If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared
for the use of the Employment Department,  the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by
the Department of Transportation.
(o) Disclose information to the Department of Human Services and the  Oregon Health Authority
to assist the Department of Human Services and the Oregon Health  Authority in the collection of
debts that the Department  of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority are authorized by
law to collect. The information disclosed may include the names,  addresses and payroll data of em-
ployers and employees. The information disclosed is  confidential and may not be disclosed by the
Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority in a manner that  would identify an
employing unit or  employee except to the extent necessary for the collection of debts as described
in this paragraph. The Department of  Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority may not
disclose information received under this paragraph to a private collection agency or use the  infor-
mation for a purpose other than  the collection of debts as described in this paragraph. If the infor-
mation disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use  of the Employment Department,
the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the Department  of Human Services or the
Oregon Health Authority.
(p) Disclose to the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission information  required by the commission
in evaluating and measuring  the performance of alcohol and drug prevention and treatment pro-
grams under ORS 430.242 or the impact of the  programs on employment. The information disclosed
to the commission may include total  subject wages payroll and whole hours worked. The information
disclosed under this paragraph  is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose. The
commission  may  not disclose the information in any manner that would identify an employing unit
or employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duties under ORS  430.242.
If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of  the Employment
Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the commission.
(q) Disclose to any person establishment level information secured  pursuant to this chapter from
federal, state and local government employing units. If the information disclosed  under this para-
graph is not prepared for  the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the infor-
[9]
SB 997
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mation shall be paid by the party requesting the information.
(r) Disclose to any person the industrial classification code assigned to an employing  unit. If the
information disclosed under this paragraph is not  prepared for the use of the Employment Depart-
ment, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the party requesting the information.
(5) The Employment Department may  make public all decisions of the Employment Appeals
Board.
(6) Any officer appointed  by or any employee of the Director of the Employment Department
who discloses confidential information, except with the authority of the director, pursuant to  rules
or as otherwise required by law, may be disqualified from holding any appointment or employment
with the Employment Department.
(7) Any person or any  officer or employee of an entity to whom information is disclosed by the
Employment Department under this section who divulges or uses the  information for any purpose
other than that specified in the provision of law or agreement authorizing the use or  disclosure may
be disqualified from performing any service under contract or disqualified from holding any  ap-
pointment or employment with the state  agency that engaged or employed that person, officer or
employee. The Employment Department may immediately cancel or modify  any information sharing
agreement with an  entity when a person or an officer or employee of that entity discloses confi-
dential information, other than as specified in law or agreement.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 659A.885, as amended by section 5, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
659A.885. (1) Any person claiming to be aggrieved by  an unlawful practice specified in sub-
section (2) of this section may file  a civil action in circuit court. In any action under this subsection,
the court may order injunctive relief and  any other equitable relief that may be appropriate, in-
cluding but  not limited to reinstatement or the hiring of employees with or without back pay. A
court may order back pay in an action under this subsection only for the two-year period imme-
diately preceding the filing  of a complaint under ORS 659A.820 with the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries, or if a complaint was not filed before the action  was commenced, the two-
year period immediately preceding the filing of the  action. In any action under this subsection, the
court may allow the prevailing party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal.  Ex-
cept as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The judge shall determine the facts in an action under this subsection; and
(b) Upon  any appeal of a judgment in an action under this subsection, the appellate court shall
review the judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (3).
(2) An action may be brought under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of  ORS
10.090, 10.092, 25.337, 25.424, 171.120, 408.230, 408.237 (2), 475B.233, 476.574, 652.355, 653.060, 653.601
to 653.661, 659.852, 659A.030, 659A.040, 659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.063, 659A.069, 659A.082,  659A.088,
659A.103 to 659A.145, 659A.150 to 659A.186, 659A.194,  659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.218, 659A.228,
659A.230, 659A.233,  659A.236, 659A.250 to 659A.262, 659A.277, 659A.290, 659A.300, 659A.306,
659A.309, 659A.315, 659A.318, 659A.320, 659A.355, 659A.421, 653.547 or 653.549  or  section 7 of this
2017 Act .
(3) In any action under subsection (1)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS 25.337, 25.424,
659.852, 659A.030, 659A.040, 659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.069, 659A.082, 659A.103 to 659A.145, 659A.199,
659A.203, 659A.228, 659A.230, 659A.250 to 659A.262, 659A.290, 659A.318, 659A.421, 653.547 or 653.549:
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater, and punitive damages;
[10]
SB 997
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(c) Upon appeal of any judgment finding a violation, the appellate court shall review the  judg-
ment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1); and
(d) Any attorney fee agreement shall be subject to approval by the court.
(4) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 652.355  or
653.060, the court may award, in addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater.
(5) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS  171.120, 476.574
or 659A.218, the court may award, in addition to  the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this
section, compensatory damages or $250, whichever is greater.
(6) In any action under  subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 10.090 or 10.092,
the court may award, in  addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section, a civil
penalty in the amount of $720.
(7) Any individual against whom any distinction,  discrimination or restriction on account of
race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, marital status  or age, if the individual
is 18 years of age or older, has been made by any place of public accommodation, as defined in ORS
659A.400, by any employee or person acting on behalf of the place or by  any person aiding or
abetting the place or person in violation of ORS 659A.406 may  bring an action against the operator
or manager of the  place, the employee or person acting on behalf of the place or the aider or abettor
of the place or person. Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, in an  action under this sub-
section:
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory and punitive damages;
(b) The operator or manager of the place of  public accommodation, the employee or person
acting on behalf of the place, and any aider or abettor shall  be jointly and severally liable for all
damages awarded in the action;
(c) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(d) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing plaintiff;
(e) The court may award reasonable attorney  fees and expert witness fees incurred by a de-
fendant who prevails only if the court determines that the  plaintiff had no objectively reasonable
basis for asserting a claim or no  reasonable basis for appealing an adverse decision of a trial court;
and
(f) Upon  any appeal of a judgment under this subsection, the appellate court shall review the
judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1).
(8) When the commissioner or the Attorney General  has reasonable cause to believe that a
person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of resistance to the rights  protected
by ORS  659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, or that a group of persons has been denied
any of the rights protected by ORS  659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, the commissioner
or the  Attorney General may file a civil action on behalf of the aggrieved persons in the same
manner as a person or group of persons may file a civil action  under this section. In a civil action
filed under this subsection, the court may assess against the  respondent, in addition to the relief
authorized under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a civil penalty:
(a) In an amount not exceeding $50,000 for a first violation; and
(b) In an amount not exceeding $100,000 for any subsequent violation.
(9) In any action under subsection (1) of this section  alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145 or
[11]
SB 997
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
659A.421 or alleging discrimination under federal housing law, when  the commissioner is pursuing
the action on behalf of an aggrieved complainant, the  court shall award reasonable attorney fees to
the commissioner if the commissioner prevails in the action.  The court may award reasonable at-
torney fees and expert witness fees  incurred by a defendant that prevails in the action if the court
determines that the commissioner had no objectively reasonable basis for asserting the  claim or for
appealing an adverse decision of the trial court.
(10) In an action under subsection (1) or (8)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145
or 659A.421 or discrimination under federal housing law:
(a) “Aggrieved person” includes a person who believes that the person:
(A) Has been injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory housing practice; or
(B) Will be injured by an  unlawful practice or discriminatory housing practice that is about to
occur.
(b) An aggrieved person in regard to issues to be determined in an action may intervene  as of
right in the action. The Attorney General may intervene in the action if  the Attorney General cer-
tifies that the case is of general public importance. The court may  allow an intervenor prevailing
party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal.
SECTION 11.
Sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act become operative on January 1, 2019.
SECTION 12. The Department of Consumer and  Business Services, the Employment De-
partment, the Oregon Health Authority and the Department of Revenue  may take any action
prior to the operative date specified in section 11 of this 2017 Act that is necessary  to carry
out sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act on the operative date specified in  section 11 of this 2017
Act.
SECTION 13. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[12]