Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is  added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(b) “Independent practice”  means a practice at which a naturopathic physician bills
insurers for services provided by the naturopathic physician using the:
(A) Diagnosis and procedure codes applicable to the services;
(B) Naturopathic physician’s own name; and
(C) Naturopathic physician’s national provider identifier.
(c) “Naturopathic physician” has the meaning given that term in ORS 685.010.
(d) “Nurse Practioner” has the meaning given that term in ORS 678.010.
(e) “Physician” has the meaning given that term in ORS 677.010.
(f) “Physician associate” has the meaning given that term in ORS 677.495.
(2) An individual or group health  benefit plan that reimburses the cost of a service pro-
vided by a physician, physician associate or nurse practitioner shall reimburse the  cost of
the same  service provided by a naturopathic physician if the service is within the scope of
practice of the naturopathic physician.
(3) An individual or  group health benefit plan shall reimburse the cost of a service pro-
vided by a naturopathic physician who is in an independent practice in the same amount and
using the same payment methodology as the reimbursement paid  under the plan to a physi-
cian, physician associate or nurse practitioner providing the service in the same setting  and
geographic area.
(4) An insurer may not reduce the reimbursement paid to a physician, physician associate
or nurse practitioner in order to comply with this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 955
HB 3439
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 243.144, as amended by section 9, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
243.144. Benefit  plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health  services and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810;
(10) ORS 743A.325; [ and]
(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c)[ .]; and
(12) Section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 243.144, as amended by sections 9 and 10, chapter 17, Oregon Laws  2024, is
amended to read:
243.144. Benefit plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the  cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply with  the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810; [ and]
(10) ORS 743A.325[ .]; and
(11) Section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 243.877, as amended by section 11, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
243.877. Benefit plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the  cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply with  the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
[2]
HB 3439
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810;
(10) ORS 743A.325; [ and]
(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c)[ .]; and
(12) Section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 243.877, as amended by sections 11 and 12, chapter 17, Oregon Laws  2024, is
amended to read:
243.877. Benefit  plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health  services and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810; [ and]
(10) ORS 743A.325[ .]; and
(11) Section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[3]