Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 215.448 is amended to read:
215.448. (1) The governing body of a county or its designate may allow, subject to  the approval
of the governing body or its designate, the establishment of a home occupation and the parking of
vehicles in any zone. However, in an exclusive farm use  zone, forest zone or a mixed farm and forest
zone that allows residential uses, the following standards apply to the home occupation:
(a) It [ shall] must be operated by a resident or [ employee of a resident ] owner of the property
on which the business is located  or by an employee of a resident or owner ;
(b) It shall employ on the site no more than five full-time or part-time persons;
(c) It shall be operated substantially in:
(A) The dwelling; or
(B) Other  buildings normally associated with uses permitted in the zone in which the property
is located; and
(d) It shall not unreasonably interfere with other uses permitted in the zone in which  the prop-
erty is located.
(2) The governing body of the county or its designate may establish additional reasonable  con-
ditions of approval for the establishment of a home occupation under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Nothing in this section authorizes the governing body or its designate  to permit construction
of any structure that would not  otherwise be allowed in the zone in which the home occupation is
to be established.
(4) The existence of home occupations  [shall] may not be used as justification for a zone change.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3958