Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 508.775 is amended to read:
508.775. (1) As used in ORS  508.775 to 508.796, “gillnet” means a vertical panel of netting
that hangs from a line with regularly spaced floaters.
[(1)] (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of the commercial fishing laws[ , it  is unlawful
for]:
(a) An individual may not use a gillnet to land salmon in the main stem of the  Columbia
River.
(b) An individual [ to] may operate a vessel in the Columbia River gillnet salmon  fishery
[without], in areas of the Columbia River other  than the main stem of the Columbia River,
only after  first obtaining a vessel permit issued pursuant to ORS 508.775 to 508.796.  [ However, an
individual who holds valid commercial fishing licenses and vessel permits required by and issued
pursuant to the laws of the State of Washington for commercial salmon fishing in the Columbia  River
may land salmon in this state that were taken in the Columbia River gillnet salmon  fishery without the
permit otherwise required by this subsection. ]
[(2)] (c)  [ Notwithstanding any other provision of the commercial fishing laws, it is  unlawful for ]
A wholesaler, canner or buyer [ to] may not  buy or receive salmon taken in the Columbia  River
gillnet fishery from an individual who does not have the permit required by [ subsection (1) of this
section] paragraph (b) of this subsection .
(3) The permit required by subsection (1) (b) of this section is in addition  to and not in lieu of
the boat license required by ORS 508.260.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) An individual who holds valid commercial fishing licenses and vessel permits required
by and issued pursuant to the laws of the State of Washington for commercial salmon fishing
in the Columbia River who lands salmon in this  state that were taken in the Columbia River
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 939
HB 3827
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
gillnet salmon fishery.
(b) A member of a federally recognized Indian tribe.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 508.775 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to ac-
tivities occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 508.781 is amended to read:
508.781. An individual who obtained the permit required by ORS  508.775 for a particular calen-
dar year is eligible to obtain renewal of the permit in a  subsequent calendar year, upon application
and payment of the fees therefor by December 31 of the permit year or by such date as may  be
specified by rule of the State Department of Fish  and Wildlife , only if the individual has used the
permit to land salmon in at least one of the two calendar years preceding the renewal .
SECTION 4. The amendments to ORS 508.781 by section 3 of this 2025 Act  apply to re-
newals of permits occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.  ORS 508.796 is amended to read:
508.796. (1) An individual whose application for renewal  of the permit required by ORS 508.775
is denied by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife may make  written request to the Commercial
Fishery Permit Board  for review of the denial. The review provided in this subsection is in lieu of
any such review by the department or  the State Fish and Wildlife Commission. The request shall
be in such form and shall contain such information as the board  considers appropriate. The request
shall be accompanied  by a nonrefundable fee of $125. Such fees shall apply toward the permit fee
of successful applicants.
(2) In accordance with any applicable provision  of ORS chapter 183, the board shall review de-
nials of applications for  renewal of permits. Orders issued by the board are not subject to review
by the commission, but may be appealed as  provided in ORS 183.480 to 183.500. [ The board may
waive requirements for renewal of permits if the board finds: ]
[(a) That the individual  for personal or economic reasons chose to actively commercially fish in
some other fishery during the Columbia River gillnet salmon seasons; or ]
[(b) That the individual failed to meet the requirements as  the result of illness, accident or other
circumstances beyond the individual’s control. ]
(3) In accordance with any applicable provision of ORS chapter 183,  the board may promulgate
such rules as it considers necessary to carry out its duties, functions and powers.
[(4) The board  may delegate to the department its authority to waive requirements for renewal of
permits.]
[(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, without the prior approval of the  Commercial
Fishery Permit Board, a Columbia River gillnet salmon vessel permit  acquired as a result of a waiver
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may not be transferred to another vessel until the vessel for
which the permit was issued has been used in the Columbia River gillnet salmon fishery for  two or
more calendar years. ]
SECTION 6.
The amendments to ORS 508.796 by section 5 of this 2025 Act  apply to the
review of  denials of permit renewals that occur on or after the effective date of this 2025
Act.
[2]