Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Teacher Standards and Practices  Commission shall study the re-
quirements to obtain a teaching license to determine whether a  reasonable nexus exists be-
tween the requirements and the qualifications necessary for  a teacher to deliver educational
instruction to children in accordance with the  grade-specific academic content standards
adopted by the State Board of Education under ORS 329.045.
(2) The commission shall analyze and determine whether the requirements to obtain  a
teaching license to deliver educational instruction to children  in kindergarten through grade
three exceed the qualifications necessary for a teacher to satisfy the grade-specific academic
content standards adopted by the State Board of Education under ORS 329.045.
(3) The commission shall submit  a report on the findings in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees  of the
Legislative Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4026