Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “ibogaine” means a naturally occurring indole
alkaloid from the root bark of the Tabernanthe iboga shrub.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall,  in collaboration with the Department of Veterans’
Affairs, establish a process through which an individual  who has post-traumatic stress dis-
order, major depressive disorder, an anxiety disorder or substance use disorder may consume
ibogaine for the purpose of treating  the disorder. The process established under this sub-
section must require that:
(a) Prior to consuming ibogaine, the individual is screened for preexisting cardiac-related
conditions that may place the  individual at a heightened risk of fatal cardiac arrhythmia
from the consumption of ibogaine;
(b) The consumption of ibogaine occur in a controlled setting:
(A) Where a health  care provider experienced in managing cardiac complications is
available on site; and
(B) That is  created in consideration of the needs of an individual experiencing the effects
of ibogaine consumption; and
(c) The results of ibogaine consumption are reported  to the authority and the depart-
ment.
(3) In establishing the process described in subsection (2) of this section, the  authority
and the department shall review peer-reviewed studies related to the consumption of ibogaine
and consult with individuals who have personal and professional knowledge of the  impacts
of ibogaine consumption on the disorders described in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The authority and  the department may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this
section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4313
HB 3817
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) The authority and the  department shall submit a report in the manner provided by
ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations  for legislation, to the interim committees
of the Legislative  Assembly related to health care and veterans no later than September 15,
2029.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to:
(a) Require a person to violate federal law; or
(b) Exempt a person from federal law or obstruct the enforcement of federal law.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 475.005, as amended by section 24,  chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, and section
98, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
475.005. As used in ORS 475.005 to  475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Abuse” means the repetitive excessive use  of a drug short of dependence, without legal or
medical supervision, which may have a detrimental effect on the individual or society.
(2) “Administer” means  the direct application of a controlled substance, whether by injection,
inhalation, ingestion or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or an authorized agent thereof; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.
(3) “Administration” means the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States  Depart-
ment of Justice, or its successor agency.
(4) “Agent” means an  authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a man-
ufacturer, distributor or dispenser. It  does not include a common or contract carrier, public
warehouseman or employee of the carrier or warehouseman.
(5) “Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.
(6) “Controlled substance”:
(a) Means a drug or its immediate precursor  classified in Schedules I through V under the fed-
eral Controlled Substances Act, 21  U.S.C. 811 to 812, as modified under ORS 475.035. The use of the
term “precursor” in this paragraph does not control and is not controlled by the use  of the term
“precursor” in ORS 475.752 to 475.980.
(b) Does not include:
(A) The plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(B) Any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae, whether growing or not;
(C) Resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(D) The seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(E) Any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of a  plant, part of a
plant, resin or seed described in this paragraph; [ or]
(F) Psilocybin or psilocin, but only if and to the extent that a person  manufactures, delivers, or
possesses  psilocybin,  psilocin, or psilocybin products in accordance with the provisions of ORS
475A.210 to 475A.722 and rules adopted under ORS 475A.210 to 475A.722[ .]; or
(G) Ibogaine, as defined in section 1 of this 2025 Act, to the extent that  ibogaine is ob-
tained and consumed pursuant to section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(7) “Counterfeit substance” means a controlled substance or its  container or labeling, which,
without authorization, bears  the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, number
or device, or any likeness thereof, of  a manufacturer, distributor or dispenser other than the person
who in fact manufactured, delivered or dispensed the substance.
(8) “Deliver”  or “delivery” means the actual, constructive or attempted transfer of, or possession
[2]
HB 3817
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
with the intent to transfer,  other than by administering or dispensing, from one person to another,
a controlled substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.
(9) “Device”  means instruments, apparatus or contrivances, including their components, parts
or accessories, intended:
(a) For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in  humans or
animals; or
(b) To affect the structure of any function of the body of humans or animals.
(10) “Dispense” means to deliver a controlled substance to an  ultimate user or research subject
by or pursuant  to the lawful order of a practitioner, and includes the prescribing, administering,
packaging, labeling or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery.
(11) “Dispenser” means a practitioner who dispenses.
(12) “Distributor” means a person who delivers.
(13) “Drug” means:
(a) Substances recognized as  drugs in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official
Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of  the United States or official National Formulary, or any supplement
to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment  or prevention of
disease in humans or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure  or any function of the body of
humans or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component  of any article specified in paragraph (a), (b) or
(c) of this subsection; however, the  term does not include devices or their components, parts or ac-
cessories.
(14) “Electronically transmitted” or “electronic  transmission” means a communication sent or
received through technological apparatuses, including computer terminals  or other equipment or
mechanisms linked by telephone or microwave relays, or any similar apparatus having  electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
(15) “Manufacture”  means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion
or processing  of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances
of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction
and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or  repackaging of the substance or labeling or
relabeling of its container, except that this term does not include  the preparation or compounding
of a controlled substance:
(a) By a practitioner as an incident  to administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in
the course of professional practice; or
(b) By a practitioner, or by an authorized agent under  the practitioner’s supervision, for the
purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(16) “Person” includes a government subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust or any
other legal entity.
(17) “Practitioner” means physician, dentist, veterinarian, scientific  investigator, licensed nurse
practitioner, physician associate  or other person licensed, registered or otherwise permitted by law
to dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the  course
of professional practice or research in this state but does not include a pharmacist or a pharmacy.
(18) “Prescription” means a written, oral or electronically transmitted direction, given by  a
practitioner for the preparation and use  of a drug. When the context requires, “prescription” also
[3]
HB 3817
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
means the drug prepared under such written, oral or electronically  transmitted direction. Any label
affixed to a drug prepared under written,  oral or electronically transmitted direction shall promi-
nently display a warning that the removal thereof is prohibited by law.
(19) “Production”  includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing or harvesting of a
controlled substance.
(20) “Research” means an activity conducted by the  person registered with the federal Drug
Enforcement Administration pursuant to a protocol approved  by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(21) “Ultimate user” means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled  substance for the use
of the person or for the use of a member of the household of  the person or for administering to an
animal owned by the person or by a member of the household of the person.
(22) “Usable quantity” means:
(a) An amount of a controlled substance  that is sufficient to physically weigh independent of its
packaging and that does not fall below the uncertainty of the measuring scale; or
(b) An amount of a controlled substance that has not  been deemed unweighable, as determined
by a Department of State Police forensic laboratory, due to the circumstances of  the controlled
substance.
(23) “Within 30  feet,” “within 500 feet” and “within 1,000 feet” mean a straight line measure-
ment in a radius extending for the specified number of feet or less in every direction from a specified
location or from any point on the boundary line of a specified unit of property.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 475.005, as amended by section 24,  chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, and section
98, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, and section 2 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
475.005. As used in ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752  to 475.980, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Abuse” means the repetitive excessive use of a drug  short of dependence, without legal or
medical supervision, which may have a detrimental effect on the individual or society.
(2) “Administer” means the direct application of a controlled substance, whether  by injection,
inhalation, ingestion or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or an authorized agent thereof; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.
(3) “Administration”  means the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States Depart-
ment of Justice, or its successor agency.
(4) “Agent” means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction  of a man-
ufacturer, distributor or dispenser. It does not include a common  or contract carrier, public
warehouseman or employee of the carrier or warehouseman.
(5) “Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.
(6) “Controlled substance”:
(a) Means a drug or its immediate precursor classified in  Schedules I through V under the fed-
eral Controlled Substances Act, 21  U.S.C. 811 to 812, as modified under ORS 475.035. The use of the
term “precursor” in this  paragraph does not control and is not controlled by the use of the term
“precursor” in ORS 475.752 to 475.980.
(b) Does not include:
(A) The plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(B) Any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae, whether growing or not;
(C) Resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
[4]
HB 3817
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) The seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(E) Any compound, manufacture, salt,  derivative, mixture or preparation of a plant, part of a
plant, resin or seed described in this paragraph; or
(F) Psilocybin or psilocin, but only if and to the extent that a person  manufactures, delivers, or
possesses psilocybin, psilocin, or psilocybin products in accordance with the provisions of  ORS
475A.210 to 475A.722 and rules adopted under ORS 475A.210 to 475A.722[ ; or ].
[(G) Ibogaine, as defined in section 1 of this 2025 Act, to  the extent that ibogaine is obtained and
consumed pursuant to section 1 of this 2025 Act. ]
(7) “Counterfeit substance” means a  controlled substance or its container or labeling, which,
without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark,  imprint, number
or device, or any likeness thereof, of  a manufacturer, distributor or dispenser other than the person
who in fact manufactured, delivered or dispensed the substance.
(8) “Deliver”  or “delivery” means the actual, constructive or attempted transfer of, or possession
with the intent to transfer, other than by administering or dispensing, from  one person to another,
a controlled substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.
(9) “Device” means instruments, apparatus or contrivances, including their components,  parts
or accessories, intended:
(a) For use  in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in humans or
animals; or
(b) To affect the structure of any function of the body of humans or animals.
(10) “Dispense” means to deliver a controlled substance to an  ultimate user or research subject
by or pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, and includes the  prescribing, administering,
packaging, labeling or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery.
(11) “Dispenser” means a practitioner who dispenses.
(12) “Distributor” means a person who delivers.
(13) “Drug” means:
(a) Substances recognized as  drugs in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official
Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of  the United States or official National Formulary, or any supplement
to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment  or prevention of
disease in humans or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure  or any function of the body of
humans or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component  of any article specified in paragraph (a), (b) or
(c) of this subsection; however, the  term does not include devices or their components, parts or ac-
cessories.
(14) “Electronically transmitted” or “electronic  transmission” means a communication sent or
received through technological apparatuses, including computer terminals  or other equipment or
mechanisms linked by telephone or microwave relays, or any similar apparatus having  electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
(15) “Manufacture”  means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion
or processing  of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances
of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction
and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or  repackaging of the substance or labeling or
relabeling of its container, except that this term does not include  the preparation or compounding
[5]
HB 3817
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
of a controlled substance:
(a) By a practitioner as an incident  to administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in
the course of professional practice; or
(b) By a practitioner, or by an authorized agent under  the practitioner’s supervision, for the
purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(16) “Person” includes a government subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust or any
other legal entity.
(17) “Practitioner” means physician, dentist, veterinarian, scientific  investigator, licensed nurse
practitioner, physician associate  or other person licensed, registered or otherwise permitted by law
to dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the  course
of professional practice or research in this state but does not include a pharmacist or a pharmacy.
(18) “Prescription” means a written, oral or electronically transmitted direction, given by  a
practitioner for the preparation and use  of a drug. When the context requires, “prescription” also
means the drug prepared under such written, oral or electronically  transmitted direction. Any label
affixed to a drug prepared under written,  oral or electronically transmitted direction shall promi-
nently display a warning that the removal thereof is prohibited by law.
(19) “Production”  includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing or harvesting of a
controlled substance.
(20) “Research” means an activity conducted by the  person registered with the federal Drug
Enforcement Administration pursuant to a protocol approved  by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(21) “Ultimate user” means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled  substance for the use
of the person or for the use of a member of the household of  the person or for administering to an
animal owned by the person or by a member of the household of the person.
(22) “Usable quantity” means:
(a) An amount of a controlled substance  that is sufficient to physically weigh independent of its
packaging and that does not fall below the uncertainty of the measuring scale; or
(b) An amount of a controlled substance that has not  been deemed unweighable, as determined
by a Department of State Police forensic laboratory, due to the circumstances of  the controlled
substance.
(23) “Within 30  feet,” “within 500 feet” and “within 1,000 feet” mean a straight line measure-
ment in a radius extending for the specified number of feet or less in every direction from a specified
location or from any point on the boundary line of a specified unit of property.
SECTION 4.
The amendments to ORS 475.005  by section 3 of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 5. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2030.
[6]