Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Office of Emergency  Management shall conduct a study to identify
strategies for improving access to emergency preparedness  education for Oregon residents
and shall make a report on its findings.
(2) The office shall submit the report required by subsection (1) of this section, and may
include recommendations for  legislation, to the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided
under ORS 192.245 no later than July 31, 2019.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2020.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2996