Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS  181A.010 to
181A.350.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “missing family member” means  a person be-
tween 18 years of age and 30 years of age who has been reported as missing and entered into
state and federal missing persons records by a law enforcement agency under ORS 146.181.
(2) The Department of State  Police shall establish the State Initiated Guidance for Noti-
fying and Assisting the Lost program to allow for the Oregon State Police, county sheriffs
and participating  municipal police departments to exchange messages between a missing
family member and the parent  or former guardian of the missing family member. The de-
partment shall:
(a) On any missing persons website maintained by the department, maintain a link  that
enables a parent or former guardian to submit, by means of written text  or voice recording,
a message addressed to the missing family member of the parent or former guardian.
(b) Attach a message submitted under this subsection to the corresponding  missing per-
sons report  maintained by the department so that the message can be accessed by the re-
cipient as described in this subsection.
(c) Create a personal  identification number that is accessible by the Oregon State Police,
county sheriffs  and participating municipal police departments for each message submitted
under this subsection  that may be provided to and used by a missing family member to
securely access the message from the missing family member’s parent or  former guardian
by means of the telephone line maintained under paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(d) Maintain an automated telephone line that receives calls from  missing family mem-
bers and securely  disseminates to missing family members messages submitted under this
subsection, whether in the form of a voice recording or written text that has been converted
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4744
HB 3926
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
into a synthesized voice message. A  missing family member who accesses a message under
this section may record a response on the telephone  line, and the department shall transmit
the response to the parent or former guardian of the missing family member.
(3) A police officer of a  participating municipal police department, a member of the state
police, a sheriff or a deputy sheriff  who finds a missing family member shall notify the
missing family member of any message for the missing family  member submitted under
subsection (2)(a) of this section, and shall provide the telephone  number and personal iden-
tification number of each message created pursuant to subsection (2)(c) and (d) of  this sec-
tion.
(4) Notwithstanding the requirements set forth in ORS 146.189 regarding the  destruction
of information and materials related to a missing person when the  missing person is dis-
covered to be living, the department shall  retain messages submitted under subsection (2)(a)
of this section for at  least 180 days after a missing family member receives the telephone
number and personal identification number necessary to access a message from the missing
family member’s parent or former guardian. Not later than one year after  a missing family
member receives the information  necessary to access a message submitted under subsection
(2)(a) of this section, or, if the missing family member  records a response, not later than one
year after the response is recorded and transmitted to the parent or  former guardian of the
missing family member, the department shall destroy all information and  materials received
under this section.
(5) Municipal police departments may participate in the program described  in this sec-
tion.
(6)(a) The department  and each sheriff’s office and participating municipal police de-
partment shall adopt written policies to implement  the requirements of this section, includ-
ing standards for maintaining and clearing computer data of missing persons information
collected under this section and stored by law enforcement agencies.
(b) The department may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
[2]