Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eye examination” means an  examination that involves any diagnosis of the eye and
any measurement or assistance of the powers or range of vision of the eye.
(b) “Qualified community organization” means an organization that, during  nonschool
hours or nonschool days, serves students who attend a qualified school.
(c) “Qualified school” means a school:
(A) That qualifies  for assistance under Chapter I of Title I of the federal Elementary and
Secondary Education Act of 1965; or
(B) Where at least 50 percent of the  students are eligible for free or reduced price meals
under the United States Department of Agriculture’s National School Lunch  Program or
School Breakfast Program.
(d) “Qualified site” means the site of a qualified school or a qualified  community organ-
ization.
(e) “Qualified student” means a student who:
(A) Attends a qualified school or is served by a qualified community organization; and
(B) Has been identified as requiring an eye examination or  as requiring assistance of the
powers or range of vision of the eye.
(2)(a) The Department  of Education and the Oregon Health Authority shall jointly es-
tablish and  implement a program that provides the following to a qualified student at no
charge to the qualified student or to the parent or guardian of the qualified student:
(A) An eye examination;
(B) New prescription eyeglasses; and
(C) Replacements for lost or  broken prescription eyeglasses, as needed, for the duration
of the prescription.
(b) Any services  provided under paragraph (a) of this subsection are separate from ser-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 684
HB 2992
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vices provided under ORS 336.211 and do not qualify for reimbursement under ORS 336.211.
(3)(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the program by which a quali-
fied school may:
(A) Prescribe and implement the process by which eye examinations  and prescription
eyeglasses are provided to qualified students; and
(B) Communicate with the parent or legal guardian of a qualified student to:
(i) Inform the parent or legal guardian about:
(I) The purpose of the eye examination;
(II) The importance of providing assistance of the powers or range of  vision of the eye;
and
(III) The process that will be implemented at the qualified school;
(ii) Secure any affirmative or implied required medical consent, as required by the  school
district; and
(iii) Attempt to avoid any duplication in efforts by identifying any previous eye examina-
tions or efforts to provide prescription eyeglasses.
(b) A qualified community organization shall, to the greatest  extent practicable, align the
processes and communications of the qualified community organization  with the processes
and communications of a qualified school attended by qualified students served by the quali-
fied organization.
(4) The Oregon Health Authority,  in consultation with the Department of Education,
shall adopt rules for the program that:
(a) Prescribe the process by which a nonprofit organization  can apply for approval under
this section to:
(A) Provide the services  and equipment described in subsection (2) of this section to
qualified students for whom affirmative or implied medical consent has been granted; and
(B) Receive funding for the  services and equipment described in subsection (2) of this
section.
(b) Establish a process by which funding for the program  is granted to an approved
nonprofit organization to fund the services and equipment described in  subsection (2) of this
section. The rules must require the active seeking and prioritization of federal moneys  for
funding the program, including:
(A) Seeking reimbursement for medical assistance as defined in ORS 414.025;
(B) Seeking any necessary approval from the Centers for Medicare and  Medicaid Services
to carry out the program; and
(c) Allow funding for the program to an approved nonprofit  organization without regard
to whether a provided eye examination includes dilation of the eye.
(5) Within 12 months of receiving funding under this  section, an approved nonprofit or-
ganization shall provide to the Oregon Health Authority the following information:
(a) The number of qualified sites served, including the number of qualified schools, qual-
ified community organizations and school districts.
(b) The number of qualified students served, including the  number who received an eye
examination and the number who received prescription eyeglasses.
(c) The number of eye examinations provided.
(d) The number of prescription eyeglasses provided.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Eye Examination  and Correction Fund is established in the State
[2]
HB 2992
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Eye Exam-
ination and Correction Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Eye Examination and Correction Fund are continuously  appropriated
to the Oregon Health Authority for expenses incurred by the program described in section
1 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority,  on behalf of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept
gifts, grants and donations from public and private sources for the Eye Examination  and
Correction Fund. Moneys received under this subsection  shall be deposited into the Eye Ex-
amination and Correction Fund.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Health Authority and the State Board of Education  must com-
plete rulemaking required under section 1 of this 2025 Act in  a time and manner to ensure
that:
(1) Decisions related  to the recipients and amounts of grants awarded under section 1
of this 2025 Act are made by April 1, 2026; and
(2) Funding is available  to approved nonprofit organizations to provide the services and
equipment described in section 1 (2) of this  2025 Act beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]