Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 90.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) A landlord may not establish rents or elect to  leave a unit vacant
based on  the use of commercial software designed to use algorithms that rely on nonpublic
competitor data.
(b) As used in this subsection, “nonpublic competitor data”  means information that is
not available to the public, including information about actual rent prices,  occupancy rates,
lease start and end dates or  similar rental data, without regard to whether the information
is anonymized.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) Data reports that do not make recommendations with  respect to rents or occupancy;
or
(b) Software used  to establish rent or income limits in accordance with the affordable
housing program guidelines of federal, state or local governments or other political subdi-
visions.
(3)(a) For  the purposes of this subsection, each month that a landlord violates this sec-
tion is a separate violation.
(b) A landlord is liable for actual damages plus $500 per violation to:
(A) A tenant whose rent is established in violation of this section; or
(B) An applicant whose application was denied or delayed processing because the landlord
maintained one or more units as vacant in violation of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 90.323 is amended to read:
90.323. (1) If a tenancy is a week-to-week tenancy, the landlord may not increase the rent with-
out giving the tenant written notice  at least seven days prior to the effective date of the rent in-
crease.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1968
SB 722
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) During any tenancy other than week-to-week, the landlord may not increase the rent:
(a) During the first year after the tenancy begins.
(b) At any time after the  first year of the tenancy without giving the tenant written notice at
least 90 days prior to the effective date of the rent increase.
(c) More than once in any 12-month period.
(d) Except as  permitted under subsection (5) of this section, by a percentage greater than the
maximum calculated under ORS 90.324 (1).
(3) The notices required under this section must specify:
(a) The amount of the rent increase;
(b) The amount of the new rent;
(c) Facts supporting the exemption authorized by subsection  (5) of this section, if the increase
is above the amount allowed in subsection (2)(d) of this section; and
(d) The date on which the increase becomes effective.
(4) A landlord terminating a tenancy  with a 30-day notice without cause as authorized by ORS
90.427 (3) or (4) during the first year of a tenancy may not charge rent for the  next tenancy in an
amount greater than the maximum amount the landlord could have charged the terminated  tenancy
under this section.
(5) A landlord is not subject to subsection (2)(d) or (4) of this section if:
(a) The first certificate of occupancy for the dwelling unit was issued less than [ 15] seven years
from the date of the notice of the rent increase; or
(b) The dwelling unit is regulated or certified as  affordable housing by a federal, state or local
government and the change in rent:
(A) Does not increase the tenant’s portion of the rent; or
(B) Is required by program eligibility requirements or by a change in the tenant’s income.
(6) A landlord that increases rent in violation of subsection (2)(d) or (4) of this section  is liable
to the tenant in an amount equal to three months’ rent plus actual damages suffered by  the tenant.
(7) This section does not apply to tenancies governed by ORS 90.505 to 90.850.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 90.600 is amended to read:
90.600. (1) If a rental agreement is a  month-to-month tenancy to which ORS 90.505 to 90.850
apply, the landlord may not increase the rent:
(a) Without giving each affected tenant notice in writing  at least 90 days prior to the effective
date of the rent increase;
(b) More than once in any 12-month period; or
(c) By a percentage greater than the maximum calculated under ORS 90.324 (1).
(2) The written notice required by subsection (1)(a) of this section must specify:
(a) The amount of the rent increase;
(b) The amount of the new rent;
(c) Facts supporting the exemption authorized by subsection  (3) of this section, if the increase
is above the amount allowed in subsection (1)(c) of this section; and
(d) The date on which the increase becomes effective.
(3) A landlord is not subject to subsection (1)(c) of this section if:
(a) The first certificate of occupancy for the dwelling unit was issued less than [ 15] seven years
from the date of the notice of the rent increase; or
(b) The dwelling unit is regulated or certified as  affordable housing by a federal, state or local
government and the change in rent:
[2]
SB 722
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
(A) Does not increase the tenant’s portion of the rent; or
(B) Is required by program eligibility requirements or by a change in the tenant’s income.
(4) A landlord that increases rent  in violation of subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be liable
to the tenant in an amount equal to three months’ rent plus actual damages suffered by  the tenant.
(5) This section does not create a right to increase rent that does not otherwise exist.
(6) This section does not require  a landlord to compromise, justify or reduce a rent increase that
the landlord otherwise is entitled to impose.
(7) Neither ORS 90.510 (1), requiring a landlord to provide a statement  of policy, nor ORS 90.510
(4), requiring a landlord to provide a written rental agreement, creates a basis for  tenant challenge
of a rent increase, judicially or otherwise.
(8)(a) The tenants who reside in a facility  may elect one committee of seven or fewer members
in a facility-wide election to represent the tenants. One tenant of record for  each rented space may
vote in the election. Upon written  request from the tenants’ committee, the landlord or a represen-
tative of the landlord shall meet with the committee  within 10 to 30 days of the request to discuss
the tenants’ nonrent concerns regarding the facility. Unless the parties agree otherwise,  upon a
request from the tenants’ committee, a landlord  or representative of the landlord shall meet with the
tenants’ committee  at least once, but not more than twice, each calendar year. The meeting shall
be held on the premises if  the facility has suitable meeting space for that purpose, or at a location
reasonably convenient to the tenants. After the meeting, the tenants’ committee shall send a  written
summary of the issues and concerns addressed at the meeting to the landlord. The landlord or the
landlord’s representative shall  make a good faith response in writing to the committee’s summary
within 60 days.
(b) The tenants’ committee may be entitled to informal dispute resolution  under ORS 90.769 if
the landlord or landlord’s representative fails to meet with the tenants’ committee or fails to respond
in good faith to the written summary as required by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[3]