Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
HOUSING DENSITY PROPERTY TAX VALUATION
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “eligible property” means a newly constructed
accessory dwelling unit,  as defined in ORS 215.501, or newly constructed middle housing, as
defined in ORS 197.758, that is used as the occupant’s primary residence.
(2) Eligible property may be granted a  frozen assessed value determined under subsection
(3) of this section for the property tax year for which the frozen assessed value is first
granted and the following four consecutive property tax years.
(3) The frozen assessed value of eligible property shall equal the assessed value of the
eligible property as shown on the later of:
(a) The tax statement delivered pursuant to ORS 311.250 for the  first property tax year
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3802
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that begins after the date on which the certificate of  occupancy for the property is issued;
or
(b) The tax statement delivered pursuant to ORS 311.250 for the last property tax year
that began before the date on which the property is first occupied.
(4) The assessed value of the eligible property  for any property tax year during the period
of the frozen assessed value shall be the least of:
(a) The eligible property’s maximum assessed value as determined under ORS 308.146;
(b) The eligible property’s real market value; or
(c) The eligible property’s frozen assessed value.
(5) A claim for a frozen assessed value for property under this section must:
(a) Be in writing on a form supplied by the Department of Revenue;
(b) Describe the property;
(c) Recite all  facts establishing the eligibility of the property for the frozen assessed
value; and
(d) Have attached:
(A) Any information or documentation required by the department; and
(B) A written declaration by the applicant, subject to penalties for false swearing,  that
the statements contained in the claim are true.
(6)(a) For an initial claim for a frozen assessed value, the claim must be filed with  the
assessor of the county in which the property is located:
(A) If the claimant’s occupancy begins on  or after July 1 and on or before March 15 of
the immediately succeeding calendar year, after January 1 and on or before April 15 imme-
diately preceding the property tax year for which the frozen assessed value is claimed; or
(B) If the claimant’s occupancy begins after March 15 and before July  1, on or before
August 1 of the property tax year for which the frozen assessed value is claimed.
(b) For claims for a continued frozen assessed value, the claim must be filed with  the
county assessor after January 1  and on or before April 15 immediately preceding the prop-
erty tax year for which the frozen assessed value is claimed.
(7) If the property is determined  to be eligible property, a timely claim for the frozen
assessed value has the effect of requiring the county assessor to determine the total  amount
of taxes due on the eligible property in accordance with this section.
(8) Any individual aggrieved by the denial of a claim  for a frozen assessed value under
this section may  appeal to the Oregon Tax Court in the manner provided under ORS 305.404
to 305.560.
(9) Each  year that eligible property is granted a frozen assessed value, the county
assessor shall enter  on the assessment and tax roll that the eligible property has a frozen
assessed value pursuant to this section and is  subject to potential additional taxes as pro-
vided under subsection (12)  of  this section  by adding the notation “potential additional
taxes.”
(10) If eligible property  is transferred to new ownership within the five-year period of
frozen assessed value, the frozen assessed value may continue for  the remaining number of
years if the property is occupied as the new owner’s primary residence  and timely claims are
filed under subsections (5) and (6) of this section.
(11) Upon the earlier of the expiration of the five-year period of frozen  assessed value or
the addition of new property or new improvements as defined in ORS 308.149 to the tax  ac-
[2]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
count of the eligible property, the eligible property shall have for  the immediately succeeding
property tax year the assessed value  the property would have had if it had never been
granted a frozen assessed  value and shall be assessed and taxed as other property similarly
situated is assessed and taxed.
(12)(a) Upon notice or discovery that, as of January 1 of any assessment year within  the
five-year period of frozen assessed value, the eligible property is no longer occupied as the
primary residence of any individual, the county assessor shall:
(A) Immediately terminate the eligible property’s frozen assessed value;
(B) Assess and tax the eligible property as other property similarly  situated is assessed
and taxed; and
(C) Notwithstanding ORS 311.235, add to the general property tax roll  for the property
tax year next following the termination, to be collected  and distributed in the same manner
as other ad valorem property  taxes, an amount equal to the difference between the taxes
assessed against the eligible property and the taxes that would otherwise have been assessed
against the eligible property, for each of the number of years for  which the eligible property
was granted a frozen assessed value.
(b) This subsection does not apply  if the eligible property is unoccupied because the oc-
cupant is required to be absent from the eligible property by reason  of health or active mil-
itary service.
(c) Additional taxes collected under this section  shall be deemed to have been imposed in
the year to which the additional taxes relate.
(13) The frozen assessed value  available under this section is in addition to and not in lieu
of any other property tax limit, exemption or partial  exemption, special assessment or
deferral.
(14) ORS 315.037 does not apply to this section.
RESIDENTIAL USE OF COMMERCIAL LANDS
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 197.
SECTION 3. (1) Notwithstanding an acknowledged comprehensive plan or land use regu-
lations, within an urban growth boundary a local government  may not prohibit the siting and
development of residential uses on any lands  zoned to allow for commercial use. The local
government may only apply those  clear and objective approval standards, conditions and
procedures that would be applicable to the residential zone of the local  government that is
most comparable in density to the allowed commercial uses.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not:
(a) Trigger any requirement that a local government consider or update an analysis  as
required by a statewide planning goal relating to economic development.
(b) Apply on lands where the local government determines that:
(A) The development on the property  cannot be adequately served by water, sewer, storm
water drainage or streets, or will  not be adequately served at the time that development on
the lot is complete;
(B) The property contains a slope of 25 percent or greater;
(C) The property is within a 100-year floodplain; or
(D) The development  of the property is constrained by land use regulations based on
[3]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
statewide land use planning goals relating to:
(i) Natural disasters and hazards; or
(ii) Natural resources, including air, water, land or natural  areas, but not including open
spaces.
APPEALS OF MIDDLE INCOME HOUSING APPROVALS
SECTION 4.
Section 5 of this  2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 197.830 to
197.845.
SECTION 5. The Land Use Board of Appeals shall affirm a land use decision or limited
land use decision by a local government that the board would  otherwise remand under ORS
197.828 or 197.835 (5) to (9), if the decision was to approve the development of  middle income
housing, as defined in ORS 197.843, and:
(1) The respondent or intervenor requests that the board take  additional evidence and
make findings of fact on matters for which the board may find that the  respondent lacked
substantial evidence on the whole record and the board’s findings on those matters would
support the respondent’s decision; or
(2) The respondent’s sole errors were procedural, as described in ORS 197.828  (2)(d) or
197.835 (9)(a)(B).
SECTION 6. Section 5 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 7.  ORS 197.843 is amended to read:
197.843. (1) The Land Use  Board of Appeals shall award attorney fees to an applicant whose
application is only for the development of affordable housing[ , as defined in ORS 197.308, or publicly
supported housing, as defined in ORS 456.250, ] or supportive housing, if the board affirms a
quasi-judicial land use decision approving the application or reverses a quasi-judicial land  use deci-
sion denying the application.
(2) A party who was awarded attorney fees under this  section or ORS 197.850 shall repay the
fees plus any interest from the time of the  judgment if the property upon which the fees are based
is developed for a use other than affordable housing  or supportive housing .
(3) Notwithstanding ORS  197.830 (2), a person may not petition the board for review of a
land use decision or limited land use decision approving  the development of middle income
housing unless the petitioner is an individual who has  a primary residence within one-half
mile of the proposed development.
[(3)] (4) As used in this section:
(a) “Affordable housing” means affordable housing as defined in  ORS 197.308 or publicly
supported housing as defined in ORS 456.250.
[(a)] (b) “Applicant” includes:
(A) An applicant with a funding reservation agreement with a public funder  for the purpose of
developing publicly supported housing;
(B) A housing authority, as defined in ORS 456.005;
(C) A qualified housing sponsor, as defined in ORS 456.548;
(D) A religious nonprofit corporation;
(E) A public benefit nonprofit  corporation whose primary purpose is the development of afford-
able housing; and
(F) A local government that approved the  application of an applicant described in this para-
[4]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
graph.
[(b)] (c)  “Attorney fees” includes prelitigation legal expenses, including preparing  the applica-
tion and supporting the application in local land use hearings or proceedings.
(d) “Middle income housing” means residential housing:
(A) In which each unit on the property is made available to own or rent to  families with
incomes of 120 percent or less  of the area median income as determined by the Oregon
Housing Stability Council based on information from the United States  Department of
Housing and Urban Development; and
(B) Whose affordability  is enforceable, including as described in ORS 456.270 to 456.295,
for a duration of not less than 15 years.
(e) “Supportive housing” means a residential facility or residential home,  as those terms
are defined in ORS 197.660.
EMERGENCY SHELTER SITING
SECTION 8.
Section 4, chapter 18, Oregon Laws  2021, as amended by section 3, chapter
47, Oregon Laws 2022, is repealed.
SECTION 9.  Section 3, chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) A local government shall approve an application for  the development or use of land
for an emergency  shelter, as defined in [ section 2 of this 2021 Act ] 197.782, on any property,
notwithstanding ORS chapter 195, 197, 197A, 215  or 227 or any statewide [ plan] planning goal, rule
of the Land Conservation and Development Commission  or local land use regulation, zoning ordi-
nance, regional framework plan, functional plan or comprehensive plan, if the emergency shelter:
(a) Includes sleeping and restroom facilities for clients;
(b) Will comply with applicable building codes;
(c) Is located inside an  urban growth boundary or in an area zoned for rural residential use as
defined in ORS 215.501;
(d) Will not result in the development of a new building that is sited within an area designated
under a statewide planning goal relating to natural disasters and hazards,  including flood plains or
mapped environmental health  hazards, unless the development complies with regulations directly
related to the hazard;
(e) Has adequate transportation access to commercial and medical services; and
(f) Will not pose any unreasonable risk to public health or safety.
(2) An emergency shelter allowed under this section must be operated by:
(a) A local government as defined in ORS 174.116;
(b) An organization with at least two years’ experience operating an  emergency shelter using
best practices that is:
(A) A local housing authority as defined in ORS 456.375;
(B) A religious corporation as defined in ORS 65.001; or
(C) A public benefit corporation,  as defined in ORS 65.001, whose charitable purpose includes
the support of homeless individuals, that has been recognized as exempt from  income tax under
section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code  [on or before January 1, 2018 ] for at least three years
before the date of the application for a shelter ; or
(c) A nonprofit corporation partnering with any other entity described in this subsection.
(3) An emergency shelter approved under this section:
[5]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) May provide on-site for its clients and at no cost to the clients:
(A) Showering or bathing;
(B) Storage for personal property;
(C) Laundry facilities;
(D) Service of food prepared on-site or off-site;
(E) Recreation areas for children and pets;
(F) Case  management services for housing, financial, vocational, educational or physical or be-
havioral health care services; or
(G) Any other services incidental to shelter.
(b) May include youth shelters,  winter or warming shelters, day shelters and family violence
shelter homes as defined in ORS 409.290.
(4) An  emergency shelter approved under this section may also provide additional services not
described in subsection (3) of this section to  individuals who are transitioning from unsheltered
homeless status. An organization providing services under this subsection may charge a fee of  no
more than $300 per month per client and  only to clients who are financially able to pay the fee and
who request the services.
(5) The approval of an emergency shelter under this section is not a land use decision and  is
subject to review only  under ORS 34.010 to 34.100. A court shall award attorney fees to an ap-
plicant who prevails on an appeal under this subsection.
(6) An application for an emergency shelter is not subject to approval under this  section
if filed when the most recently completed point-in-time count, as reported to the  United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development under 24 C.F.R. part 578,  indicates
that the total sheltered and unsheltered homeless population is less than 0.18 percent  of the
state population, based on the  latest estimate from the Portland State University Population
Research Center.
SITING RESIDENTIAL CARE
SECTION 10.
 ORS 197.660 is amended to read:
197.660. As used in ORS 197.660 to 197.670[ , 215.213, 215.263, 215.283, 215.284 and 443.422]:
(1) “Residential facility” means a building or cluster of buildings for residential use that
may provide treatment or training, that serves between 6 and 15  individuals, not including
any necessary staff persons required to meet licensing requirements, including:
(a) A  residential [ care, residential training or residential treatment ] facility, as [ those terms are ]
defined in ORS 443.400, [ that provides  residential care alone or in conjunction with treatment or
training or a combination thereof for six to fifteen individuals who need not be related. Staff persons
required to meet licensing requirements shall not be counted in the number of facility  residents, and
need not be related to  each other or to any resident of the residential facility. ] including secure res-
idential treatment homes and facilities described in ORS 443.465;
(b) Community housing as defined in ORS 426.502, including licensed residential  treat-
ment facilities;
(c) Community housing as defined in ORS 427.330;
(d) Community-based structured housing as defined in ORS 443.480;
(e) A continuing care retirement community, as defined in ORS 101.020;
(f) Independent residence facilities, as described in ORS 418.475; or
[6]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) Community-based housing, as described in ORS 430.643 (1)(a).
(2) “Residential home” means  a building for residential  use that may provide treatment or
training that serves five or fewer individuals, not  including any necessary staff persons re-
quired to meet licensing requirements, including:
(a) A residential  treatment [ or] home or residential  training home, as defined in ORS 443.400,
including secure residential treatment homes and facilities described in ORS 443.465;
(b) A residential facility registered under ORS 443.480 to 443.500 [ or];
(c) An adult foster home licensed under ORS 443.705 to 443.825 [ that provides residential  care
alone or in  conjunction with treatment or training or a combination thereof for five or fewer individuals
who need  not be related. Staff persons required to meet licensing requirements shall not be counted in
the number of facility residents, and need not  be related to each other or to any resident of the resi-
dential home.];
(d) Community  housing as defined in ORS 426.502, including licensed residential treat-
ment facilities;
(e) Community housing as defined in ORS 427.330;
(f) Community-based structured housing as defined in ORS 443.480;
(g) Independent residence facilities, as described in ORS 418.475; or
(h) Community-based housing, as described in ORS 430.643 (1)(a).
(3) “Zoning requirement” means any standard, criteria,  condition, review procedure, permit re-
quirement or other requirement adopted [ by a city or county under the authority of ORS  chapter 215
or 227 ] as a land use regulation that applies to the approval or siting of  a residential facility or
residential home. A zoning requirement does not include a [ state or ] local health, safety, [ building,]
occupancy or fire code requirement.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 197.667 is amended to read:
197.667. (1) A residential facility [ shall be ] is  a permitted use  in any zone where multifamily
residential uses are a permitted use.
(2) A residential facility [ shall be ] is a conditional use in any zone where multifamily residential
uses are a conditional use.
(3) A [ city or county ] local government  may allow  a residential facility in a residential zone
other than those zones described in subsections (1) and (2)  of this section, including a zone where
a single-family dwelling is allowed.
(4) A  [city or county ] local government  may require an applicant proposing to site a residential
facility within its  jurisdiction to supply the [ city or county ] local government  with a copy of the
entire application and supporting documentation  for state licensing of the facility, except for infor-
mation which is exempt from public disclosure under ORS  192.311 to 192.478. However, [ cities and
counties shall ] a local government may  not require independent proof  of the same conditions that
have been required  by the Department of Human Services under ORS 418.205 to 418.327 for licensing
of a residential facility.
SECTION 12.  ORS 197.665 is amended to read:
197.665. (1) Residential homes [ shall be ] are  a permitted use in:
(a) Any residential zone, including a residential zone which allows a single-family dwelling;  and
(b) Any commercial zone which allows a single-family dwelling.
(2) A [ city or county ] local  government  may not impose any zoning requirement on the estab-
lishment and maintenance of a residential home in a zone  described in subsection (1) of this section
that is more restrictive than a zoning  requirement imposed on a single-family dwelling in the same
[7]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
zone.
(3) A [ city or county ] local government  may:
(a) Allow a residential home in  an existing dwelling in any area zoned for farm use, including
an exclusive farm use zone established under ORS 215.203;
(b) Impose zoning requirements on the  establishment of a residential home in areas described in
paragraph (a) of this  subsection, provided that these requirements are no more restrictive than those
imposed on other nonfarm single-family dwellings in the same zone; and
(c) Allow a division of land for  a residential home in an exclusive farm use zone only as de-
scribed in ORS 215.263 (9).
SECTION 13.
 ORS 197.670 is amended to read:
197.670. [(1) As of October 3, 1989, no city or county shall ] A local government may not :
[(a)] (1)  Deny an application for the  siting of a residential home in a residential or commercial
zone described in ORS 197.665 (1).
[(b)] (2) Deny  an application for the siting of a residential facility in a zone where multifamily
residential uses are allowed, unless the [ city or county ] local government  has  adopted a siting
procedure [ which] that  implements the requirements of ORS 197.667.
[(2) Every city and county  shall amend its zoning ordinance to comply with ORS 197.660 to 197.667
as part of periodic land use plan review occurring  after January 1, 1990. Nothing in this section pro-
hibits a city or county from amending its zoning ordinance prior to periodic review. ]
PLANNED COMMUNITY ACT EXEMPTIONS
SECTION 14.  ORS 94.550 is amended to read:
94.550. As used in ORS 94.550 to 94.783:
(1) “Assessment” means any charge imposed or levied  by a homeowners association on or
against an owner or lot pursuant to the  provisions of the declaration or the bylaws of the planned
community or provisions of ORS 94.550 to 94.783.
(2) “Blanket encumbrance” means a trust deed or mortgage or any other lien or  encumbrance,
mechanic’s lien or otherwise, securing or evidencing the payment  of money and affecting more than
one lot in a  planned community, or an agreement affecting more than one lot by which the developer
holds such planned community under an option, contract to sell or trust agreement.
(3) “Class I planned community” means a planned community that:
(a) Contains at least 13 lots or in which the declarant has reserved the right  to increase the
total number of lots beyond 12; and
(b) Has an estimated annual assessment, including an amount required for reserves  under ORS
94.595, exceeding $10,000 for all lots or $100 per lot based on:
(A) For a planned community created on or after January 1, 2002, the initial estimated annual
assessment, including a constructive assessment based on a  subsidy of the association through a
contribution of funds, goods or services by the declarant; or
(B) For a planned community created before January 1, 2002, a  reasonable estimate of the cost
of fulfilling existing obligations imposed by the declaration, bylaws or other governing document  as
of January 1, 2002.
(4) “Class II planned community” means a planned community that:
(a) Is not a Class I planned community;
(b) Contains at least five lots; and
[8]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Has an estimated annual assessment exceeding $1,000 for all lots based on:
(A) For a planned community created on or after January 1, 2002, the initial estimated annual
assessment, including a constructive assessment based on  a subsidy of the association through a
contribution of funds, goods or services by the declarant; or
(B) For a planned community created  before January 1, 2002, a reasonable estimate of the cost
of fulfilling existing obligations imposed by the declaration, bylaws or other governing document  as
of January 1, 2002.
(5) “Class III planned community” means  a planned community that is not a Class I or II
planned community.
(6) “Common expenses” means expenditures  made by or financial liabilities incurred by the
homeowners association and includes any allocations to the reserve account under ORS 94.595.
(7) “Common property” means any real property or interest in real property  within a planned
community which is owned, held or  leased by the homeowners association or owned as tenants in
common by the lot owners, or designated in the declaration or the  plat for transfer to the associ-
ation.
(8) “Condominium” means property submitted to the provisions of ORS chapter 100.
(9) “Declarant” means any person  who creates a planned community under ORS 94.550 to 94.783.
(10) “Declarant control” means any special declarant right relating to administrative control  of
a homeowners association, including but not limited to:
(a) The right of the declarant or person designated by the declarant to appoint or remove  an
officer or a member of the board of directors;
(b) Any weighted vote  or special voting right granted to a declarant or to units owned by the
declarant so that the declarant will  hold a majority of the voting rights in the association by virtue
of such weighted vote or special voting right; and
(c) The right of the declarant to exercise powers and responsibilities otherwise assigned by  the
declaration or bylaws  or by the provisions of ORS 94.550 to 94.783 to the association, officers of the
association or board of directors of the association.
(11) “Declaration”  means the instrument described in ORS 94.580 which establishes a planned
community, and any amendments to the instrument.
(12) “Electric vehicle charging station” or “charging station” means a facility designed to  de-
liver electrical current for the purpose of charging one or more electric motor vehicles.
(13) “Electronic meeting” means a meeting that is  conducted through telephone, teleconference,
video conference, web conference or any other live electronic means where at  least one participant
is not physically present.
(14) “Governing document” means articles of incorporation, bylaws, a declaration  or a rule,
regulation or resolution that was properly adopted by the  homeowners association or any other in-
strument or plat relating to common ownership or  common maintenance of a portion of a planned
community that is binding upon lots within the planned community.
(15) “Governing entity” means an incorporated  or unincorporated association, committee, person
or any other entity that has authority under a  governing document to maintain commonly main-
tained property, to impose assessments on lots or to act on matters  of common concern on behalf
of lot owners within the planned community.
(16) “Homeowners association” or “association”  means the organization of owners of lots in a
planned community, created under ORS 94.625, required by a governing document or formed  under
ORS 94.574.
[9]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(17) “Majority” or “majority of votes” or “majority of owners” means more than 50 percent  of
the votes in the planned community.
(18) “Mortgagee” means any person who is:
(a) A mortgagee under a mortgage;
(b) A beneficiary under a trust deed; or
(c) The vendor under a land sale contract.
(19) “Owner” means the owner of any lot in a planned community, unless  otherwise specified,
but does not include a person holding only a security interest in a lot.
(20) “Percent of owners” or “percentage of  owners” means the owners representing the specified
voting rights as determined under ORS 94.658.
(21)(a) “Planned community” means any subdivision under ORS 92.010 to 92.192 that  results in
a pattern of ownership of real property and all the buildings, improvements and  rights located on
or belonging to the real property, in which the owners collectively are responsible for  the mainte-
nance, operation, insurance or  other expenses relating to any property within the planned commu-
nity, including common property, if any, or for  the exterior maintenance of any property that is
individually owned.
(b) “Planned community” does not mean:
(A) A condominium under ORS chapter 100;
(B) A subdivision that is exclusively commercial or industrial; [ or]
(C) A timeshare plan under ORS 94.803 to 94.945[ .]; or
(D) A development in which each residential unit is either:
(i) Subject to an affordability restriction, including an affordable  housing covenant, as
defined in ORS 456.270; or
(ii) Owned by a public benefit or religious nonprofit corporation.
(22) “Purchaser” means any person other than a declarant who, by means of a  voluntary trans-
fer, acquires a legal or equitable interest in a lot, other than as security for an obligation.
(23) “Purchaser for resale” means any person who purchases from the declarant more than  two
lots for the purpose of resale whether or not the  purchaser for resale makes improvements to the
lots before reselling them.
(24) “Recorded declaration” means  an instrument recorded with the recording officer of the
county in which  the planned community is located that contains covenants, conditions and re-
strictions that are binding upon lots in the planned community or that  impose servitudes on the real
property.
(25) “Special declarant rights” means any rights, in addition to the rights of the  declarant as a
lot owner, reserved for the benefit of the declarant under the declaration or ORS 94.550 to  94.783,
including but not limited to:
(a) Constructing or completing construction of improvements in the planned community which
are described in the declaration;
(b) Expanding the planned community or withdrawing property  from the planned community
under ORS 94.580 (3) and (4);
(c) Converting lots into common property;
(d) Making the planned community subject to a master association under ORS 94.695; or
(e) Exercising any right of declarant control reserved under ORS 94.600.
(26) “Successor declarant” means the transferee of any special declarant right.
(27) “Turn over” means the act of turning over administrative responsibility pursuant to  ORS
[10]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
94.609 and 94.616.
(28) “Unit” means a building or portion of a building located upon a lot in a planned  community
and designated for separate occupancy or ownership, but  does not include any building or portion
of a building located on common property.
(29) “Votes” means the votes allocated to lots in the declaration under ORS 94.580 (2).
LOCAL REGULATION OF CONDOMINIUMS
SECTION 15.
 ORS 100.022 is amended to read:
100.022. (1) A  zoning, subdivision, building code or other real property law, ordinance or regu-
lation may not :
(a) Prohibit or restrict  the condominium form of ownership ; [ or]
(b) Require any review or approval by any  person of a condominium plat or declaration
that meets the requirements of ORS 100.020 (3); or
(c) Impose any restriction or  requirement upon a structure or development proposed to be
submitted to the condominium form of ownership under this  chapter that it would not impose upon
a structure or development that is or would be  under a different form of ownership.
(2) Except as set forth in this  section, [ no provision of ] this chapter [ invalidates or modifies ] does
not invalidate or modify  any provision of any zoning, subdivision, building code or  other real
property use law, ordinance or regulation  relating to siting and design of new construction .
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does  not prohibit any governmental approval required under
this chapter.
SECTION 16.  ORS 100.105 is amended to read:
100.105. (1) A declaration must contain:
(a) A description of the property, including property on which a unit or a limited common  ele-
ment is located, whether held in fee  simple, leasehold, easement or other interest or combination
thereof, that is being  submitted to the condominium form of ownership and that conforms to the
description in the surveyor’s certificate provided under ORS 100.115 (1).
(b) Subject to subsection (11) of this section, a statement  of the interest in the property being
submitted to the condominium form of ownership, whether fee simple, leasehold,  easement or other
interest or combination thereof.
(c) Subject to subsections  (5) and (6) of this section, the name by which the property is known
and a  general description of each unit and the building or buildings, including the number of stories
and basements of each building, the total number of units  and the principal materials of which they
are constructed.
(d) The unit designation, a statement that the location of each unit  is shown on the plat, a de-
scription of the boundaries and area in square  feet of each unit and any other data necessary for
proper identification. The area of a unit must be the same as shown for that unit on the plat de-
scribed in ORS 100.115 (1).
(e) A notice in substantially the following  form in at least 12-point type in all capitals or bold-
face:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
NOTICE
[11]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
THE SQUARE FOOTAGE AREAS STATED  IN THIS DECLARATION AND THE PLAT ARE
BASED ON THE BOUNDARIES  OF THE UNITS AS DESCRIBED IN THIS DECLARATION AND
MAY VARY FROM THE AREA OF UNITS CALCULATED FOR OTHER PURPOSES.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(f) A description of the general common elements.
(g) An allocation to each unit of an undivided  interest in the common elements in accordance
with ORS 100.515 and the method used to establish the allocation.
(h) The designation of any limited common elements including:
(A) A general statement of the nature of the limited common element;
(B) A statement of  the unit to which the use of each limited common element is reserved, pro-
vided the statement is not a reference to an assignment of use specified on the plat; and
(C) The allocation of use of any limited common element appertaining to more than one unit.
(i) The method  of determining liability for common expenses and right to common profits in ac-
cordance with ORS 100.530.
(j) The voting rights allocated to each unit in accordance  with ORS 100.525 or, in the case of
condominium units committed as property in a timeshare plan defined in  ORS 94.803, the voting
rights allocated in the timeshare instrument.
(k) A statement of the general nature of use, residential or  otherwise, for which the building or
buildings and each of the units is intended.
(L) A statement that the  designated agent to receive service of process in cases provided in ORS
100.550 (1) is named in  the Condominium Information Report which will be filed with the Real Estate
Agency in accordance with ORS 100.250 (1)(a).
(m) The method of amending the  declaration and the percentage of voting rights required to
approve an amendment of the declaration in accordance with ORS 100.135.
(n) A statement as to whether or not the association of unit owners pursuant to ORS 100.405  (5)
and (8) has authority to grant leases, easements,  rights of way, licenses and other similar interests
affecting the general and limited common elements of the condominium and consent to vacation of
roadways within and adjacent to the condominium.
(o) If the condominium contains a floating  structure described in ORS 100.020 (3), a statement
regarding the authority of the board of directors of the association, subject to  ORS 100.410, to
temporarily relocate the floating structure without a majority vote of affected unit owners.
(p) Any restrictions  on alienation of units. Any such restrictions created by documents other
than the declaration may be incorporated by reference in the declaration to the official records of
the county in which the property is located.
(q) Any other details regarding the property that the person executing the  declaration considers
desirable. However,  if a provision required to be in the bylaws under ORS 100.415 is included in the
declaration, the voting requirements for  amending the bylaws also govern the amendment of the
provision in the declaration.
(2) In the event the declarant  proposes to annex additional property to the condominium under
ORS 100.125, the declaration also must contain a general description  of the plan of development  and
a description of the additional property that may be annexed to the condominium , including:
(a) The maximum number of units to be included in the condominium.
(b) The date after which any right to annex additional property will terminate.
(c) A legal description of the additional property that may be annexed.
[12]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(c)] (d) A general description of the nature and proposed use of any additional common elements
which declarant proposes to annex to the condominium, if such common elements might substantially
increase the proportionate amount of the common expenses payable by existing unit owners.
[(d)] (e)  A statement that the method used to establish the allocation of undivided interest  in
the common elements,  the method used to determine liability for common expenses and right to
common profits and the method used to allocate voting rights for each unit annexed is  as stated in
the declaration in accordance with subsection (1)(g), (i) and (j) of this section.
(f) If the additional property being annexed is the final  stage of the condominium, and
the plat of the final stage will result in a portion of  a legally established unit of land being
left out of the condominium that was included  in the description of the additional property
under paragraph (c) of this section, an attached declaration by a  local government with ju-
risdiction over the condominium that:
(A) States that the exclusion of such a remainder  from the condominium will not violate
any applicable planning or zoning regulation or ordinance;
(B) Includes a legal description of the remainder of the additional property; and
(C) Is executed on behalf  of the governing body or appropriate department of the local
government.
[(e)] (g)  Such other information as the Real Estate Commissioner requires in order to  carry out
the purposes of this chapter.
(3) Unless expressly prohibited by the declaration and subject to the requirements  of ORS
100.135 (2) and subsections (9) and (10) of this section:
(a) Not later than two years following the termination date specified in subsection (2)(b) of  this
section, the termination date may be extended for a period not exceeding five years.
(b) Before the termination date specified in the declaration or supplemental declaration  under
subsection (7)(d) of this section, the termination date may be extended for a period not  exceeding
five years.
(c) The general description under subsection [ (2)(c)] (2)(d) of  this section and the information
included in the  declaration or supplemental declaration in accordance with subsection (7)(c), (g) and
(h) of this section may be changed by an amendment to  the declaration or supplemental declaration
and plat or supplemental plat.
(4) The information included in the declaration or supplemental  declaration in accordance with
subsection (2)(a) and [ (d)] (e) of this section and  subsection (7)(a), (b), (e), (f) and (k) of this section
may not be changed unless all owners agree to the change and  an amendment to the declaration
or supplemental declaration and, if applicable, the plat or supplemental plat are recorded in ac-
cordance with this chapter.
(5) The name of the property shall include the word “condominium” or “condominiums” or the
words “a condominium.”
(6) A condominium may  not bear a name which is the same as or deceptively similar to the name
of any other condominium located in the same county.
(7) If the condominium is a flexible  condominium containing variable property, the declaration
shall also contain a general description of the plan of development, including:
(a) A statement that the rights provided for under ORS 100.150 (1) are being reserved.
(b) A statement:
(A) Of any limitations on rights reserved under ORS 100.150  (1), including whether the consent
of any unit owner is required, and if so, a statement of the method by which the consent is ascer-
[13]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tained; or
(B) That there are no limitations on rights reserved under ORS 100.150 (1).
(c) A statement of the total number of tracts of variable  property within the condominium, in-
cluding:
(A) A designation of each tract as withdrawable variable property or  nonwithdrawable variable
property;
(B) Identification of each  variable tract  by a label in  accordance with ORS 100.115 [ (1)(i)]
(1)(h);
(C) A statement of the method of labeling each tract depicted on the plat in accordance with
ORS 100.115 [ (1)(i)] (1)(h); and
(D) A statement of the total number of tracts of each type of variable property.
(d) The termination date, which is the date after  which any right reserved under ORS 100.150
(1) will terminate, and a statement of the circumstances, if any, that will terminate any right on  or
before the date specified. Subject to ORS 100.120, the termination  date from the date of recording
of the conveyance of the first unit in the condominium to a person other than the  declarant may
not exceed:
(A) Twenty  years, only if a condominium consists, or may consist if the condominium is a flexi-
ble condominium, exclusively of units to be used for nonresidential purposes; or
(B) Seven years.
(e) The maximum number of units that may be created.
(f) A statement that the method  used to establish the allocations of undivided interest in the
common elements, the method used to determine liability for common expenses and right to common
profits and  the method used to allocate voting rights as additional units are created is the same as
stated in the declaration in accordance with subsection (1)(g), (i) and (j) of this section.
(g) A general description of all existing improvements and the nature and proposed use of any
improvements that may be  made on variable property if the improvements might substantially in-
crease the proportionate amount of the common expenses payable by existing unit owners.
(h) A statement of whether or not the declarant reserves  the right to create limited common
elements within any variable property, and if so, a general description  of the types that may be
created.
(i) A statement that the plat shows the location and dimensions of all withdrawable variable
property that is labeled “WITHDRAWABLE VARIABLE PROPERTY.”
(j) A statement that if by the termination date all or a portion of the withdrawable  variable
property has not been withdrawn or reclassified, the withdrawable variable property  is automat-
ically withdrawn from the condominium as of the termination date.
(k) A statement of the rights of the association under ORS 100.155 (2).
(L) A statement of whether or not all or any portion of the variable  property may not be with-
drawn from the condominium and, if so, with respect to the nonwithdrawable variable property:
(A) A statement that  the plat shows the location and dimensions of all nonwithdrawable variable
property that is labeled “NONWITHDRAWABLE VARIABLE PROPERTY.”
(B) A description of all improvements that may be made and a statement of the intended  use of
each improvement.
(C) A statement that, if by the  termination date all or a portion of the variable property desig-
nated as  “nonwithdrawable variable property” has not been reclassified, the property is automat-
ically reclassified as of  the termination date as a general common element of the condominium and
[14]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
any interest in the property held for security purposes is automatically extinguished by  the classi-
fication.
(D) A statement of the rights of the association under ORS 100.155 (3).
(m) A statement by the local governing body or  appropriate department thereof that the with-
drawal of  any variable property designated as “withdrawable variable property” in the declaration
in accordance  with paragraph (L) of this subsection, will not violate any applicable planning or
zoning regulation or ordinance. The statement may be attached as an exhibit to the declaration.
(8) The  plan of development for any variable property included in the declaration or any sup-
plemental declaration of any stage in accordance with subsection  (7) of this section is subject to any
plan of development included in  the declaration in accordance with subsection (2) of this section,
except that the time limitation specified in subsection (7)(d) of this section governs any right re-
served under ORS 100.150 (1) with respect to any variable property.
(9) The information  included in the declaration in accordance with subsection (7)(j), (k) and (m)
of this section may not be deleted by amendment.
(10)(a) Approval by the unit owners is not required for  a declarant to redesignate withdrawable
variable property as “nonwithdrawable  variable property” under ORS 100.150 (1) by supplemental
declaration and supplemental plat, for any reason, including if the  redesignation is required by the
local governing body to comply with any planning or zoning regulation or ordinance.
(b) If as a result of a redesignation under paragraph (a) of this  subsection, the information re-
quired to be included in  the supplemental declaration under subsection (7)(L)(B) of this section is
inconsistent with the information  included in the declaration or supplemental declaration in ac-
cordance  with  subsection (7)(g) of this section, an amendment to the declaration or supplemental
declaration and plat or supplemental plat approved by at least 75 percent of owners is required.
(11) The statement of  an interest in property other than fee simple submitted to the condomin-
ium form of ownership and any easements, rights or appurtenances belonging  to property submitted
to the condominium form of ownership, whether leasehold or fee simple, must include:
(a) A reference to the recording index numbers and date of recording of the instrument  creating
the interest; or
(b) A  reference to the law, administrative rule, ordinance or regulation that creates the interest
if the interest is created under law, administrative rule,  ordinance or regulation and not recorded
in the office of the recording officer of the county in which the property is located.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 100.110 is amended to read:
100.110. (1)(a) Before a declaration, supplemental declaration or an amendment thereto  may be
recorded, it must be approved as provided in this section by the county assessor  of the county in
which the property is located and the Real Estate Commissioner.
(b) Before a declaration, supplemental declaration or, if required under  subsection (3) of this
section, an amendment thereto may be recorded, it must be approved by the tax collector of  the
county in which the property is located.
(c) A declaration, supplemental declaration or amendment thereto  may not be approved unless
the requirements of subsections (2) to (7)  of this section are met. Approval must be evidenced by
execution of the declaration or amendment or by a written approval attached thereto.
(d) If the requirements of subsections (2) to (7) of this section are met, the commissioner,  county
assessor and tax collector, if applicable:
(A) Shall approve the declaration, supplemental declaration or amendment; and
[(B) May not impose additional requirements not specified in subsections (2) to (7) of this section. ]
[15]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Other than as specified in this section, may not:
(i) Charge a fee;
(ii) Allow or require review or approval by any person; or
(iii) Impose any additional requirements, review or approval criteria.
(2) The county assessor of the county in which the property is located shall  approve a declara-
tion, supplemental declaration or amendment thereto if:
(a) The name complies with ORS 100.105 (5) and (6); and
(b) The  plat complies with the requirements of ORS 100.115 or the plat amendment complies with
ORS 100.116.
(3) The  tax collector of the county in which the property is located shall approve the declaration
or supplemental declaration, or an  amendment that adds property to the condominium, changes the
boundary of a unit or creates an  additional unit from all or parts of other units or from all or parts
of other units and common elements for which a plat amendment is required under ORS 100.116, if:
(a) All  ad valorem taxes, special assessments, fees, or other charges required by law to be placed
upon the tax roll for the affected units that have or will become a lien upon  the property during the
tax year have been paid;
(b) Advance payment of ad valorem taxes, special assessments, fees or other charges for the af-
fected units that are not  on the tax roll and for which payment is required under paragraph (a) of
this subsection has been made to the tax collector utilizing  the procedures contained in ORS 92.095
and 311.370; and
(c) The additional taxes,  penalty, and any interest attributable thereto, required because of dis-
qualification of the affected units from any special assessment have been paid.
(4) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the commissioner  shall approve the declaration or
amendment thereto if:
(a) The declaration or  the amendment thereto complies with the requirements of ORS 100.105
and 100.135 and other provisions of this chapter;
(b) The bylaws adopted under ORS 100.410 comply with  the requirements of ORS 100.410 and
100.415 and other provisions of this chapter;
(c) The plat  complies with the requirements of ORS 100.115 or the plat amendment complies with
ORS 100.116 and other provisions of this chapter;
(d) The declaration is for a conversion condominium and the declarant has submitted:
(A) An affidavit  that the notice of conversion was given in accordance with ORS 100.305 and
that the notice period has expired;
(B) An affidavit that the notice of conversion was given in accordance  with ORS 100.305 and
copies of the written consent of any  tenants as provided in ORS 100.305 (6) or a signed statement
that no tenants were entitled to notice under ORS 100.305; or
(C) Any applicable combination of the requirements of subparagraphs  (A) and (B) of this para-
graph;
(e) A copy of  the plat executed by the declarant and prepared in conformance with ORS 100.115
or plat amendment prepared in conformance with ORS 100.116 is submitted;
(f) A certification of plat execution,  on a form prescribed and furnished by the commissioner, is:
(A) Executed by the declarant, the professional land  surveyor who signed the surveyor’s certif-
icate  on  the plat, the attorney for the declarant, a representative of the title insurance company that
issued the information required under ORS 100.640 (1)(e) or 100.668 (2)(d)  or another person au-
thorized by the declarant in writing to execute the certification; and
[16]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Submitted stating that the copy is a true copy of the plat signed by the declarant; and
(g) A copy of a reserve study  has been submitted, if a disclosure statement was issued under
ORS 100.655 and the reserve study was not included pursuant to ORS 100.640 (1)(g).
(5) The commissioner shall approve a supplemental declaration if:
(a) The supplemental declaration complies with the requirements of ORS 100.120 and other pro-
visions of this chapter;
(b) The supplemental plat complies with the requirements of ORS 100.115;
(c) The supplemental declaration is for a conversion condominium and the declarant has com-
plied with the requirements of subsection (4)(d) of this section; and
(d) A copy of the supplemental plat  and a certification of plat execution described in subsection
(4)(e) and (f) of this section have been submitted.
(6) Approval by the commissioner  is not required for an amendment to a declaration transferring
the right of use of a limited common element pursuant to ORS 100.515 (5).
(7) Before the commissioner approves the declaration, supplemental declaration or  amendment
thereto under this section:
(a) The declarant or other person requesting approval shall  pay to the commissioner a fee de-
termined by the commissioner under ORS 100.670; and
(b) For an amendment or supplemental declaration, the Condominium Information Report  and
the Annual Report described in ORS 100.260 must be  designated current by the Real Estate Agency
as provided in ORS 100.255 and the fee required under ORS 100.670 must be paid.
(8) If the declaration, supplemental declaration or amendment  thereto approved by the commis-
sioner under subsection (4) or (5) of this section is  not recorded in accordance with ORS 100.115
within one year from the date of  approval by the commissioner, the approval automatically expires
and the declaration, supplemental declaration  or amendment thereto must be resubmitted for ap-
proval in accordance with this section.  The commissioner’s approval must set forth the date on
which the approval expires.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 100.115 is amended to read:
100.115. (1) A plat of the land described in the declaration or a supplemental plat described in
a supplemental declaration, complying with ORS 92.050, 92.060 (1) and  (2), 92.080 and 92.120, shall
be recorded simultaneously with the declaration or supplemental declaration. The  plat or supple-
mental plat shall be titled in accordance with subsection (3) of this section and shall:
(a) Show the location of:
(A) All buildings and  public roads. The location shall be referenced to a point on the boundary
of the property; and
(B) For a  condominium containing units described in ORS 100.020 (3)(b)(C) or (D), the moorage
space or floating  structure. The location shall be referenced to a point on the boundary of the up-
land property regardless of a change in the location resulting from a fluctuation  in the water level
or flow.
(b) Show the designation, location, dimensions and area in square feet of each unit including:
(A) For units in a building described in ORS 100.020 (3)(b)(A),  the horizontal and vertical
boundaries of each unit and the common elements to which each unit has access. The vertical
boundaries shall be referenced to a  known benchmark elevation or other reference point as ap-
proved by the city or county surveyor;
(B) For a space described in ORS  100.020 (3)(b)(B), the horizontal boundaries of each unit and
the common elements to which  each unit has access. If the space is located within a structure, the
[17]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vertical boundaries also shall be shown and referenced to a known benchmark  elevation or other
reference point as approved by the city or county surveyor;
(C) For a moorage space described in ORS 100.020 (3)(b)(C), the  horizontal boundaries of each
unit and the common elements to which each unit has access; and
(D) For a floating structure described in ORS 100.020 (3)(b)(D), the horizontal and  vertical
boundaries of each unit and the common elements to which each unit has access. The vertical
boundaries shall be referenced to an assumed elevation  of an identified point on the floating struc-
ture even  though the assumed elevation may change with the fluctuation of the water level where
the floating structure is moored.
(c) Identify and show, to the extent feasible, the location and dimensions  of all limited common
elements described in the declaration. The plat may not include any statement indicating  to which
unit the use of any noncontiguous limited common element is reserved.
(d) Include a statement, including  signature and official seal, of a registered architect, registered
professional land surveyor or registered professional engineer certifying that the plat fully and ac-
curately depicts the boundaries of the  units of the building and that construction of the units and
buildings as depicted on the  plat has been completed, except that the professional land surveyor who
prepared the plat need not affix a seal to the statement.
(e) Include a surveyor’s certificate, complying with ORS  92.070, that includes information in the
declaration in accordance with ORS 100.105 (1)(a)  and a metes and bounds description or other de-
scription approved by the city or county surveyor.
(f) Include a statement by the declarant that the property and improvements described and  de-
picted on the plat are subject to the provisions of ORS 100.005 to 100.627.
[(g) Include such signatures of approval as may be required by local ordinance or regulation. ]
[(h)] (g)  Include any  other information or data not inconsistent with the declaration that the
declarant desires to include.
[(i)] (h)  If the condominium is a flexible condominium, show the location and dimensions of all
variable property identified in the declaration and  label the variable property as
“WITHDRAWABLE VARIABLE PROPERTY” or “NONWITHDRAWABLE VARIABLE
PROPERTY,” with a letter different from those designating a unit,  building or other tract of vari-
able property. If there is more than one tract, each tract shall be labeled in the same manner.
(2) The supplemental plat required under ORS 100.150 (1) shall  be recorded simultaneously with
the supplemental declaration. The supplemental  plat shall be titled in accordance with subsection
(3) of this section and shall:
(a) Comply with ORS 92.050, 92.060 (1), (2) and (4), 92.080,  92.120 and subsection (3) of this sec-
tion.
(b) If any property is withdrawn:
(A) Show the resulting perimeter boundaries of the condominium after the withdrawal; and
(B) Show the information required under subsection [ (1)(i)] (1)(h) of this section as it relates to
any remaining variable property.
(c) If any property is reclassified, show the information required under subsection  (1)(a) to (d)
of this section.
(d) Include a “Declarant’s Statement” that the property described on the  supplemental plat is
reclassified or withdrawn from the condominium and that the  condominium exists as described and
depicted on the plat.
(e) Include a surveyor’s certificate complying with ORS 92.070.
[18]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The title of each supplemental plat  described in ORS 100.120 shall include the complete name
of the condominium, followed by the additional language specified in this subsection and  the appro-
priate reference to the stage being annexed  or tract of variable property being reclassified. Each
supplemental plat for a condominium recorded on or after January 1, 2002, shall  be numbered se-
quentially and shall:
(a) If property is annexed under ORS  100.125, include the words “Supplemental Plat No.
: Annexation of Stage ”; or
(b) If property is reclassified under ORS 100.150, include the words “Supplemental Plat No.
: Reclassification of Variable Property, Tract .”
(4) Upon request of the county surveyor or assessor, the person offering a plat or supplemental
plat for recording shall also file  an exact copy, certified by the surveyor who made the plat to be
an exact copy of  the plat, with the county assessor and the county surveyor. The exact copy shall
be made  on suitable drafting material having the characteristics of strength, stability and transpar-
ency required by the county surveyor.
(5) Before a plat or a supplemental plat may be recorded, it must be approved by  the city or
county surveyor as provided in ORS 92.100. Before approving  the plat as required by this section,
the city or county surveyor shall:
(a) Check  the boundaries of the plat and units and take measurements and make computations
necessary to determine that the plat complies with this section.
(b) Determine that the name complies with ORS 100.105 (5) and (6).
(c) Determine that the following are consistent:
(A) The designation and area in square feet of each  unit shown on the plat and the unit desig-
nations and areas contained in the declaration in accordance with ORS 100.105 (1)(d);
(B) Limited common elements identified on the plat and the information contained in  the decla-
ration in accordance with ORS 100.105 (1)(h);
(C) The description of the property in the surveyor’s certificate included on  the plat and the
description contained in the declaration in accordance with ORS 100.105 (1)(a); and
(D) For a flexible condominium, the variable property depicted on the plat and  the identification
of the property contained in the declaration in accordance with ORS 100.105 (7)(c).
(6) The person offering the plat or supplemental plat for approval shall:
(a) Submit a copy of the proposed declaration  and bylaws or applicable supplemental declaration
at the time the plat is submitted; and
(b) Submit the original or a copy of the executed declaration and bylaws  or the applicable sup-
plemental declaration approved by the commissioner if required by law prior to approval.
(7) For performing  the services described in subsection (5)(a) to (c) of this section, the city sur-
veyor or county surveyor shall collect from the person offering the plat for approval a fee of $150
plus $25 per  building. The governing body of a city or county may establish a higher fee by resol-
ution or order.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 100.116 is amended to read:
100.116. (1) A plat, including any floor plans that  are a part of a plat, recorded before October
15, 1983, may be amended as provided in this section.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 100.600, the following must be  made by a plat enti-
tled “Plat Amendment”:
(A) A change to the boundary of the property, a unit or a limited common element;
(B) The creation of an additional unit from common elements; or
[19]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) A change  to the configuration of other information required to be graphically depicted on
the plat.
(b) The plat amendment must reference in the title of the amendment  the recording information
of the original plat and any previous plat amendments.
(3) The plat amendment must comply with ORS 92.050, 92.060 (1), (2) and (4), 92.080  and 92.120
and must include:
(a) A graphic depiction of the change;
(b) For a change to the  boundary of the property, a surveyor’s certificate that complies with
ORS 92.070;
(c) If the  plat amendment is an amendment by correction under ORS 100.118, a statement that
the plat amendment is an amendment by correction under ORS 100.118;
(d) A certification,  including signature and official seal, of a registered professional land sur-
veyor that:
(A) The plat amendment accurately depicts the amendments to the plat described in the decla-
ration amendment recorded under subsection (5) of this section; and
(B) Any construction that changes the boundaries of a  unit or limited common element or the
construction of any additional unit or limited common element has been completed; and
(e) A  declaration executed by the association that the plat is being amended pursuant to this
section. If the amendment to the declaration required under subsection (5) of this section is a  cor-
rection amendment under ORS 100.117,  the declaration must be made by the declarant if the
declarant adopts the correction amendment under ORS 100.117.
(4) The declaration required under subsection (3)(e) of this section  must be executed and ac-
knowledged.
(5) The plat  amendment must be accompanied by an amendment to the declaration authorizing
the plat amendment. The  declaration amendment must be executed, approved and recorded in ac-
cordance with ORS 100.110 and 100.135 or, if the declaration amendment is  a correction amendment,
with ORS 100.117.
(6) Before a plat amendment may be recorded, it must be approved by the  city or county sur-
veyor as provided in ORS 92.100. The surveyor shall approve the plat amendment if it complies with
the requirements of this subsection. The person offering the plat amendment shall:
(a) Submit a copy of the proposed amendment to the  declaration required under subsections (3)
to (5) of this section when the plat amendment is submitted.
(b) Submit the original or a copy of the executed amendment to the declaration approved by the
Real Estate Commissioner if required by law prior to approval of the plat amendment.
(c) Upon request  of the county assessor or county surveyor, file an exact copy, certified by the
surveyor who made the plat to be an exact copy  of the plat amendment, with the county assessor
and the county surveyor. The  exact copy must be made on suitable drafting material having the
strength, stability and transparency required by the county surveyor.
(7) A change to a restriction or other information not required to  be graphically depicted on the
plat, or, in the discretion of the city or  county surveyor, a change to graphically depicted informa-
tion that changes the identity, nature or other descriptive  information but does not change the
graphic depiction, may be made by amendment of the declaration without a plat amendment  de-
scribed in subsections (3) to (5) of this section. A declaration amendment under this subsection  must
include:
(a) References to recording index numbers and  date of recording of the declaration or plat and
[20]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
any applicable supplemental declarations, amendments, supplemental plats or plat amendments.
(b) A description of the change to the plat.
(c) A statement that the amendment was approved in accordance with the declaration  and ORS
100.135.
(8) The declaration amendment described in subsection (7) of this section must be  executed, ap-
proved and recorded in accordance with ORS 100.110 and 100.135.
(9) Before the declaration amendment described in subsection (7) of this  section may be re-
corded, it must be approved by the city or county surveyor as provided in ORS 92.100.  The surveyor
shall approve the declaration amendment if it complies with subsection (7) of  this section. The ap-
proval must be evidenced by execution of the amendment or by attached written approval.
(10)(a) Subject  to paragraph (c) of this subsection, floor plans of a condominium for which floor
plans were not required to be shown on a plat  at the time of creation of the condominium or at the
time of the  recording of a supplemental declaration annexing property to the condominium may be
amended by:
(A) An amendment of the declaration under paragraph (b) of this subsection; or
(B) A plat amendment under subsections (3) to (5) of this section.
(b) An amendment of the declaration must include:
(A) References to recording index numbers  and date of recording of the declaration and any
applicable supplemental declarations or amendments.
(B) A description of the change to the floor plans.
(C) A graphic depiction of any change to the boundaries of  a unit or common element and a
statement by a registered architect, registered professional land surveyor or registered  professional
engineer certifying that such graphic depiction fully and accurately depicts  the boundaries of the
unit or common element as it currently exists.
(c) Notwithstanding that floor  plans were not required to be shown on a plat at the time of
creation of the condominium or at the  time of the recording of a supplemental declaration annexing
property to the condominium, if floor plans are shown on a plat, the plat may not be  amended under
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(11) The declaration amendment described in  subsection (10)(b) of this section must be approved
and recorded in accordance  with ORS 100.110 and 100.135 except that any change to the floor plans
need only comply with the requirements of the unit ownership laws  in effect at the time the floor
plans were initially recorded.
(12) After recording any declaration amendment or plat amendment pursuant to this  section, the
county surveyor may make appropriate changes to the surveyor’s copy  of all previously recorded
plats relating to the condominium and any copies filed under ORS 92.120 (3). The  original plat may
not be changed or corrected after the plat is recorded.
(13) For performing the  services described in subsections (6), (9) and (12) of this section, the
county  surveyor  shall collect from the person offering the plat amendment or declaration amendment
for approval a fee established by the county governing body.
(14) Except as provided in this section, a local government may not:
(a) Require that a plat amendment comply with any ordinance or regulation.
(b) Require that the plat amendment be approved by any person.
(c) Condition approval of any permits for the condominium on a plat amendment.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 100.600 is amended to read:
100.600. (1)(a) Subject to ORS 100.605, the  condominium may be terminated if all of the unit
[21]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
owners remove the property from the  provisions of this chapter by executing and recording an in-
strument to that effect and the holders of all liens affecting the units consent thereto or  agree, in
either case by instruments duly recorded, that their liens be transferred to the undivided interest
of the unit owner in the  property after the termination. The instrument shall state the interest of
each unit owner and lienholder as determined under ORS 100.610.
(b) The recording of an instrument of termination shall vacate the plat  but shall not vacate or
terminate any recorded covenants, restrictions, easements or other interests not  imposed under the
declaration or bylaws or any easement granted by the plat  unless the instrument of termination
otherwise provides.
(c) Before  the instrument of termination may be recorded, it must be signed by the county
assessor for the  purpose of acknowledging that the county assessor has been notified of the proposed
termination.
(d) The person offering the instrument of termination for recording  shall cause a copy of the
recorded instrument, including the recording information, to be filed  with the commissioner, the
county assessor and the county surveyor. Upon receipt  of the instrument of termination, the county
surveyor may make  appropriate annotations on the surveyor’s copy of the plat and any copies filed
under ORS 92.120. Corrections or changes are not allowed on the original plat once it is  recorded
with the county clerk.
(e) Failure to file the copies  as required under paragraph (d) of this subsection does not invali-
date the termination.
(2) A portion of the  property may be removed from the provisions of this chapter by recording
simultaneously with the recording officer an amendment to  the declaration and an amended plat
approved as required under ORS 100.110, 100.116 and 100.135. The amendment to the declaration
shall:
(a) Include a metes and bounds legal description of the property being removed;
(b) Include a metes and bounds legal description of the resulting boundaries of the condominium
after the removal;
(c) State the interest of each owner in the property being removed;
(d) State the allocation of interest of each unit in the common elements after the removal;
(e) Be approved and executed by the  owner of any unit being removed and the owner of any unit
to which a limited common element being removed pertains and acknowledged  in the manner pro-
vided for acknowledgment of deeds;
(f) Be approved by the holder of any first mortgage on a unit or limited  common element being
removed;
(g) Be approved by at least 90 percent of owners, including  any owner whose approval is re-
quired under paragraph (e) of this subsection;
(h) Be approved by any other mortgagees whose approval is required under  the declaration or
bylaws;
(i) Include any other approvals required by the declaration or bylaws; and
(j) Include a statement by the local governing body or  appropriate department thereof that the
removal will not violate any applicable planning or zoning  regulation or ordinance. The statement
may be attached as an exhibit to the amendment.
(3) The amended plat required under subsection (2) of this section must:
(a) Comply with ORS 100.116; and
(b) Include a “Statement of Removal” that the property described on the amended plat is  re-
[22]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
moved from the condominium and that the  condominium exists as described and depicted on the
amended plat. The  statement must be made and executed by the association  and acknowledged .[;
and]
[(c) Include such signatures of approval as may be required by local ordinance or regulation. ]
(4) The tax collector for any taxing unit having a lien for taxes or assessments  may consent to
such a transfer of  any tax or assessment lien under subsection (1) of this section or the removal of
a portion of the property under subsection (2) of this section.
SUBDIVIDING FOR DEVELOPMENT OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING
SECTION 21.
 ORS 92.090 is amended to read:
92.090. (1) Subdivision plat names shall be subject to the approval of the county  surveyor or, in
the case where there is no county  surveyor, the county assessor. No tentative subdivision plan or
subdivision plat of a subdivision shall be approved which bears a name similar to or pronounced  the
same as  the name of any other subdivision in the same county, unless the land platted is contiguous
to and platted by the same party that platted the  subdivision bearing that name or unless the party
files and records the consent of the party that platted the contiguous  subdivision bearing that name.
All subdivision plats must continue  the lot numbers and, if used, the block numbers of the subdivi-
sion plat of the same name  last filed. On or after January 1, 1992, any subdivision submitted for final
approval shall not use block numbers or letters unless such subdivision is a continued phase  of a
previously recorded subdivision, bearing the same name, that has previously used block numbers  or
letters.
(2) No tentative  plan for a proposed subdivision and no tentative plan for a proposed partition
shall be approved unless:
(a) The streets and roads  are laid out so as to conform to the plats of subdivisions and partitions
already approved for  adjoining property as to width, general direction and in all other respects un-
less the city or county determines it is in the public interest to modify the street or road pattern.
(b) Streets  and roads held for private use are clearly indicated on the tentative plan and all
reservations or restrictions relating to such private roads and streets are set forth thereon.
(c) The tentative plan complies with the applicable zoning ordinances  and regulations and the
ordinances or regulations adopted under ORS 92.044 that are  then in effect for the city or county
within which the land described in the plan is situated.
(3) No plat of a proposed subdivision or partition shall be approved unless:
(a) Streets and roads  for public use are dedicated without any reservation or restriction other
than reversionary rights upon vacation of any  such street or road and easements for public or pri-
vate utilities.
(b) Streets and roads held for private use and  indicated on the tentative plan of such subdivision
or partition have been approved by the city or county.
(c) The subdivision or partition plat complies with  any applicable zoning ordinances and regu-
lations and any ordinance or regulation adopted under ORS 92.044 that are then in effect  for the
city or county within which the land described in the subdivision or partition plat is situated.
(d) The subdivision or partition plat  is in substantial conformity with the provisions of the ten-
tative plan for the subdivision or partition, as approved.
(e) The subdivision or partition plat contains  a donation to the public of all common improve-
ments, including but not limited to streets, roads, parks, sewage disposal and water supply  systems,
[23]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the donation of which was made a condition of the approval of the tentative  plan for the subdivision
or partition.
(f) Explanations of all common  improvements required as conditions of approval of the tentative
plan of the subdivision or partition have been recorded and referenced on  the subdivision or parti-
tion plat.
(4) Subject  to any standards and procedures adopted pursuant to ORS 92.044, no plat of a sub-
division shall be approved by a city or county unless the city or county has received and  accepted:
(a) A certification by a city-owned domestic water supply  system or by the owner of a privately
owned domestic water supply system, subject to regulation by the Public Utility  Commission of
Oregon, that water will  be available to the lot line of each and every lot depicted in the proposed
subdivision  plat;
(b) A bond, irrevocable letter of credit, contract or  other assurance by the subdivider to the city
or county that a domestic water supply system will be installed by or on behalf  of the subdivider
to the lot line of each and every lot depicted in  the proposed subdivision plat[ ; and the amount of
any such bond, irrevocable  letter of credit, contract or other assurance by the subdivider shall be ] in
an amount determined  by a registered professional engineer, subject to any change in such amount
as determined necessary by the city or county; or
(c) [ In lieu of paragraphs (a) and (b) of  this subsection, ] A statement that no domestic water
supply facility will be provided to the purchaser of any lot  depicted in the proposed subdivision plat,
even though a domestic water supply source may exist. A copy of any such statement, signed by the
subdivider and indorsed by the city or county, shall be filed by the subdivider with the Real  Estate
Commissioner and shall be included by the commissioner in any public report made for the subdivi-
sion under ORS 92.385. If  the making of a public report has been waived or the subdivision is oth-
erwise exempt under the Oregon Subdivision Control Law, the subdivider shall deliver a copy of the
statement to each prospective purchaser of a  lot in the subdivision at or prior to the signing by the
purchaser of the first written agreement for the sale of the lot. The subdivider shall take  a signed
receipt from the purchaser upon delivery of such a statement, shall immediately send a copy  of the
receipt to the  commissioner and shall keep any such receipt on file in this state, subject to in-
spection by the commissioner, for a period of three years after the date the receipt is taken.
(5) Subject  to any standards and procedures adopted pursuant to ORS 92.044, no plat of a sub-
division shall be approved by a city or county unless the city or county has received and  accepted:
(a) A certification by a city-owned sewage disposal system or by the owner of a privately  owned
sewage disposal system  that is subject to regulation by the Public Utility Commission of Oregon that
a sewage disposal system will be available to the lot line of  each and every lot depicted in the
proposed subdivision plat;
(b) A bond, irrevocable letter of credit, contract or  other assurance by the subdivider to the city
or county that a sewage disposal system will be installed by  or on behalf of the subdivider to the
lot line of each and every lot depicted on the  proposed subdivision plat[ ; and the amount of such
bond, irrevocable letter of credit, contract or other assurance shall be ] in an amount  determined by
a registered professional engineer, subject to any change  in such amount as the city or county
considers necessary; or
(c) [ In lieu  of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, ] A statement that no sewage disposal
facility will be provided to the purchaser of any lot depicted in the proposed subdivision plat,  where
the Department of Environmental Quality has approved the proposed method or an alternative
method of sewage disposal for the subdivision in its evaluation report described in  ORS 454.755
[24]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1)(b). A copy of any such statement, signed by the subdivider and indorsed by the  city or county
shall be filed by the subdivider with the Real Estate Commissioner and shall be  included by the
commissioner in the public report made for the subdivision  under ORS 92.385. If the making of a
public report has been waived or the subdivision is otherwise  exempt under the Oregon Subdivision
Control Law, the subdivider shall deliver a copy  of the statement to each prospective purchaser of
a lot in the subdivision at or prior to the signing by  the purchaser of the first written agreement
for the sale of the lot. The subdivider shall take a signed receipt  from the purchaser upon delivery
of such a statement, shall immediately send a  copy of the receipt to the commissioner and shall keep
any such receipt on file in  this state, subject to inspection by the commissioner, for a period of three
years after the date the receipt is taken.
(6) A city or county shall accept as other assurance, as used in subsections  (4)(b) and
(5)(b) of this section, one or more award letters from public  or other reliable funding sources
made to a subdivider who is subdividing the property to develop affordable housing, if  the
awards total an amount greater than the project cost.
[(6)] (7)  Subject to any standards and procedures adopted pursuant to ORS 92.044,  no plat of a
subdivision or partition located within the boundaries of an irrigation district,  drainage district,
water control district, water improvement district or district  improvement company shall be ap-
proved by a city or county unless the city or county has received  and accepted a certification from
the district or company that the subdivision or partition is either entirely excluded from the  district
or company or is included within the district or company  for purposes of receiving services and
subjecting the subdivision or partition to the fees and other charges of the district or company.
PREVAILING WAGES FOR AFFORDABLE
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT
SECTION 22.
 ORS 279C.810 is amended to read:
279C.810. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Funds of a public agency” does not include:
(A) Funds provided in  the form of a government grant to a nonprofit organization, unless the
government grant is issued for  the purpose of construction, reconstruction, major renovation or
painting;
(B) Building and development permit fees paid or waived by the public agency;
(C) Tax credits or tax abatements;
(D) Land that a public agency sells to a private entity at fair market value;
(E) The difference between:
(i) The  value of land that a public agency sells to a private entity as determined at the time of
the sale after taking into account any plan, requirement, covenant, condition, restriction or  other
limitation, exclusive of zoning or land use regulations, that the public  agency imposes on the de-
velopment or use of the land; and
(ii) The fair market value of the land if  the land is not subject to the limitations described in
sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph;
(F) Staff resources of  the public agency used to manage a project or to provide a principal
source of supervision, coordination or oversight of a project;
(G) Staff resources of  the public agency used to design or inspect one or more components of
a project;
[25]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(H) Moneys derived from the sale of bonds that are loaned by a state  agency to a private entity,
unless the moneys will be used for a public improvement;
(I) Value added  to land as a consequence of a public agency’s site preparation, demolition of real
property or remediation or removal of environmental contamination, except  for value added in ex-
cess of the expenses the public agency incurred  in the site preparation, demolition or remediation
or removal when the land is sold for  use in a project otherwise subject to ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870;
or
(J) Bonds,  or loans from the proceeds of bonds, issued in accordance with ORS chapter 289 or
ORS 441.525 to 441.595, unless the bonds or loans will be used for a public improvement.
(b) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization or group of organizations described in  sec-
tion 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that is exempt from income tax  under section 501(a) of
the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870 do not apply to:
(a) [Projects ] A project  for which the contract price does not exceed  $50,000. In determining the
contract price of a project, a public agency:
(A) May not include the value of donated materials or work [ performed on the project by ] that
individuals volunteering to the public agency  perform on the project  without pay; and
(B) Shall include the value of work performed by  every person paid by a contractor or subcon-
tractor in any manner for the person’s work on the project.
(b) [ Projects ] A project  for which [ no] funds of a public agency are  not  directly or  indirectly
used. In accordance with  ORS chapter 183, the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries
shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this paragraph.
(c) [ Projects ] A project :
(A) That [ are] is  privately owned;
(B) That [ use] uses  funds of a private entity;
(C) In which  a  public agency will occupy or use  less than 25 percent of the square footage
of [ a] the  completed project [ will be occupied or used by a public agency ]; and
(D) For which less than $750,000 of funds of a public agency are used.
(d) [ Projects for ] Residential construction that [ are] is  privately owned and [ that predominantly
provide] at least 60 percent of which consists of  affordable housing. As used in this paragraph:
(A) “Affordable housing” means housing that serves occupants whose incomes are  no greater
than 60 percent of the area median income or, if the occupants are owners, whose incomes are no
greater than 80 percent of the area median income.
[(B) “Predominantly” means 60 percent or more. ]
[(C)] (B)  “Privately owned” [ includes] means :
(i) Affordable housing provided on real  property [ owned by ] that  a public agency  owns,  if the
public agency leases the  real property and related structures [ are leased ] to a private entity for
50 or more years; and
(ii) Affordable housing owned by a partnership,  nonprofit corporation or limited liability com-
pany in which a housing authority, as defined in ORS 456.005, is a general partner,  director or
managing member and the housing authority is  not a majority owner in the partnership, nonprofit
corporation or limited liability company.
[(D)] (C) “Residential construction” [ includes the construction, reconstruction, major  renovation ]
means:
(i) A project in  which a public agency or a private owner converts a building or develop-
[26]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment from commercial use to housing;
(ii) The portions of a mixed-use building or development that are  affordable housing, if
at least 60 percent of the building or development consists of affordable housing;
(iii) A project for constructing, reconstructing, performing a major  renovation of  or
painting [ of] a single-family [ houses] house or apartment [ buildings] building that is  not more than
four stories in height and  furnishing all incidental items, such as site work, parking  areas, utilities,
streets and sidewalks, [ pursuant to ] in accordance with  the United States Department of  Labor’s
“All Agency Memorandum No. 130: Application of the Standard of Comparison “Projects of a Char-
acter Similar” Under Davis-Bacon and Related Acts,” dated March 17, 1978[ . However, the commis-
sioner may consider different definitions of residential construction  in determining whether a project
is a residential construction project for purposes of this paragraph, including definitions that: ]; or
(iv) Other  types of construction that the commissioner can consider in determining
whether a prevailing rate of wage applies to a project, including types of construction that:
[(i) Exist ] (I) Are defined  in local ordinances or codes; or
[(ii)] (II)  Differ, in the  prevailing practice of a particular trade or occupation, from the United
States Department of Labor’s description of residential construction.
SURPLUS REAL PROPERTY INVENTORY
SECTION 23.
ORS 197.791 is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 197.
SECTION 24.  ORS 197.791 is amended to read:
197.791. (1) As used in this section[ :],
[(a) “Local government” means a city or county. ]
[(b)] “surplus real property”  means real property in which [ a government entity holds title
through a deed  or other legal instrument ] a local government or special district owns an interest
that is  no longer suitable or needed for the duties and responsibilities of the government entity[ .]
and that is  located within an urban growth boundary or area zoned for rural residential use
as defined in ORS 215.501.
(2) The Department of Land Conservation  and Development shall develop and implement an
electronic system for receiving and displaying [ inventory information described in ] surplus real
property submitted under subsection (3) of this section. The electronic system must be a web-based
or online system that allows:
(a) Government entities to upload inventories described in subsection (3) of this  section using
a template developed by the department; and
(b) The general public to search and view information stored by the system.
(3)[(a)] No later than January 1 of each even-numbered year, each local government and special
district shall prepare and submit to the department, using the  system developed under subsection
(2) of this section, an inventory of surplus real property owned by  the local government  or special
district. [ that is: ]
[(A) Located inside an urban growth boundary; or ]
[(B) Located in an area zoned for rural residential use as defined in ORS 215.501. ]
[(b) A  mass transit district established under ORS 267.010 to 267.394 or a transportation district
organized under ORS 267.510 to 267.650 may submit to the department an inventory of surplus  real
property owned by the district as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection. ]
(4) Nothing in this section requires the  department to verify the accuracy of information re-
[27]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ceived by the department  using the system developed under subsection (2) of this section before
making the information available to the public.
(5) No later than February 1 of each even-numbered year, the department shall present the  in-
formation received by the department under subsection (3) of this section in a  report to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to housing in the manner  provided under ORS
192.245.
DUPLEXES AND SINGLE ROOM OCCUPANCIES
SECTION 25.
 ORS 197.758 is amended to read:
197.758. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Cottage clusters” means groupings of no fewer  than four detached housing units per acre
with a footprint of less than 900 square feet each and that include a common courtyard.
(b) “Middle housing” means:
(A) Duplexes;
(B) Triplexes;
(C) Quadplexes;
(D) Cottage clusters; [ and]
(E) Townhouses[ .]; and
(F) Single room occupancies with up to six units.
(c) “Single  room occupancy” means a residential development with no fewer than four
independently rented, privately accessible and lockable single-unit rooms and with at  least
one shared kitchen if a kitchen  is not provided in each unit and at least one shared bathroom
if a bathroom is not provided in each unit.
[(c)] (d)  “Townhouses” means a dwelling  unit constructed in a row of two or more attached
units, where each dwelling unit is located on an individual lot or parcel and  shares at least one
common wall with an adjacent unit.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, each city with a population  of 25,000 or
more and each county or city within a  metropolitan service district shall allow  the development
of[:]
[(a)] all middle housing types in areas zoned for residential use that allow  for the development
of detached single-family dwellings .[; and ]
[(b) A duplex on each lot or parcel zoned for residential  use that allows for the development of
detached single-family dwellings. ]
(3) Except as  provided in subsection (4) of this section, each city [ not within a metropolitan ser-
vice district with a population of more than 10,000 and less than 25,000 ] shall allow the development
of a duplex on each lot or parcel zoned for residential use that allows for the  development of de-
tached single-family dwellings. Nothing in this subsection prohibits a local government from allowing
middle housing types in addition to duplexes.
(4) This section does not apply to:
[(a) Cities with a population of 1,000 or fewer; ]
[(b)] (a) Lands not within an urban growth boundary;
[(c)] (b) Lands that  are not incorporated and also lack sufficient urban services, as defined in
ORS 195.065;
[(d)] (c)  Lands that are not  zoned for residential use, including lands zoned primarily for com-
[28]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mercial, industrial, agricultural or public uses; or
[(e)] (d) Lands that are not incorporated and are zoned under an  interim zoning designation that
maintains the land’s potential for planned urban development.
(5) Local governments may regulate  siting and design of middle housing required to be permitted
under this section, provided that the regulations do not, individually  or cumulatively, discourage the
development of all middle housing types permitted in the area through unreasonable costs  or delay.
Local governments may regulate  middle housing to comply with protective measures adopted pur-
suant to statewide land use planning goals.
(6) This section does not prohibit local governments from permitting:
(a) Single-family dwellings in areas zoned to allow for single-family dwellings; or
(b) Middle housing in areas not required under this section.
(7) A  local government that amends its comprehensive plan or land use regulations re-
lating to allowing additional middle housing:
(a) Shall consider ways to increase the affordability of middle housing  by considering
ordinances and policies that include but are not limited to:
(A) Waiving or deferring system development charges;
(B) Adopting or amending criteria for property tax  exemptions under ORS 307.515 to
307.523, 307.540 to 307.548 or  307.651 to 307.687 or property tax freezes under ORS 308.450 to
308.481; and
(C) Assessing a construction tax under ORS 320.192 and 320.195.
(b) Is not required to  consider whether the amendments significantly affect an existing
or planned transportation facility.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 197.303 is amended to read:
197.303. (1) As used in ORS 197.286 to 197.314, “needed housing” means all  housing on land
zoned for residential use or mixed residential and commercial use  that is determined to meet the
need shown for housing within an urban growth boundary at price ranges and rent levels  that are
affordable to households within the county with  a variety of incomes, including but not limited to
households with low incomes, very low incomes and extremely low  incomes, as those terms are de-
fined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban  Development under 42 U.S.C. 1437a.
“Needed housing” includes the following housing types:
(a) Attached and detached  single-family housing and multiple family housing for both owner and
renter occupancy;
(b) Government assisted housing;
(c) Mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks as provided in ORS 197.475 to 197.490;
(d) Manufactured homes on individual lots planned  and zoned for single-family residential use
that are in addition to lots within designated manufactured dwelling subdivisions; [ and]
(e) Housing for farmworkers[ .]; and
(f) Single room occupancies as defined in ORS 197.758.
(2) For the purpose of estimating housing needs,  as described in ORS 197.296 (3)(b), a local
government shall use the  population projections prescribed by ORS 195.033 or 195.036 and shall
consider and adopt  findings related to changes in each of the following factors since the last review
under ORS 197.296 (2)(a)(B) and the projected future  changes in these factors over a 20-year plan-
ning period:
(a) Household sizes;
(b) Household demographics;
[29]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Household incomes;
(d) Vacancy rates; and
(e) Housing costs.
(3) A local government shall make the estimate described in subsection (2) of this  section using
a shorter time period than since  the last review under ORS 197.296 (2)(a)(B) if the local government
finds that the shorter time period will provide more accurate  and reliable data related to housing
need. The shorter time period may not be less than three years.
(4) A local government shall use data from  a wider geographic area or use a time period longer
than the time period described in subsection (2)  of this section if the analysis of a wider geographic
area or the use of a longer time period will provide more accurate, complete and  reliable data re-
lating to trends  affecting housing need than an analysis performed pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section. The local government must clearly describe the  geographic area, time frame and source of
data used in an estimate performed under this subsection.
(5) Subsection (1)(a) and (d) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A city with a population of less than 2,500.
(b) A county with a population of less than 15,000.
(6) A local government may take an exception  under ORS 197.732 to the definition of “needed
housing” in subsection (1) of this  section in the same manner that an exception may be taken under
the goals.
SECTION 27.
In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Land Conservation and  Development, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2023,  out of the General Fund, the amount of $1, to provide grants to local
governments to assist them in amending their comprehensive plans as required under sec-
tion 3 (1)(c), chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2019.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 28.
The unit captions used in this 2023 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
OPERATIVE, APPLICABLE AND EFFECTIVE DATES
SECTION 29. (1) Sections 3 and 5 of this  2023 Act and the amendments to ORS 92.090,
94.550, 100.022, 100.105, 100.110, 100.115, 100.116, 100.600, 197.303, 197.660, 197.665, 197.667,
197.670, 197.758, 197.791, 197.843 and 279C.810 by sections 7, 10 to 22 and 24 to 26 of  this 2023
Act become operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Commissioner of  the Bureau of Labor and Industries may adopt rules and take
any other action before the operative  date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is
necessary to enable the commissioner, on  and after the operative date specified in subsection
(1) of this section, to undertake and exercise  all of the duties, functions and powers con-
ferred on the  commissioner by the amendments to ORS 279C.810 by section 22 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 30.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act applies to property tax years beginning on  or af-
ter July 1, 2023.
[30]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 31.
Section 5 of this 2023 Act and the amendments to ORS  197.843 by section
7 of  this 2023 Act apply to decisions for which a notice of intent to appeal, as described in
ORS 197.830 (1), was filed on or after January 1, 2024.
SECTION 32. The amendments to ORS 279C.810 by section 22 of this 2023 Act apply to:
(1) Procurements that a public agency advertises or solicits or, if the public  agency does
not advertise  or solicit the procurement, contracts for public works into which the public
agency enters on and after the operative date specified in section 29 of this 2023 Act; and
(2) Projects for residential  construction, as defined in ORS 279C.210 (2)(d), for which
parties to the project enter into  contracts on and after the operative date specified in section
29 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 33.  Section 3, chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) Notwithstanding  ORS 197.646, a local government shall adopt land use regulations
or amend its comprehensive plan  to implement [ section 2 of this 2019 Act ] ORS 197.758 no later than:
(a) June 30, 2021, for each city subject to [ section 2 (3)  of this 2019 Act; or ] ORS 197.758 (3)
(2021 Edition);
(b) June 30, 2022, for each local government subject to [ section 2 (2) of this  2019 Act. ] ORS
197.758 (2); or
(c) June 30, 2025, for each city subject to ORS 197.758 (3), as amended by section 25 of this
2023 Act.
(2) The  Land Conservation and Development Commission, with the assistance of the Building
Codes Division of the Department of Consumer and Business  Services, shall develop a model middle
housing ordinance no later than December 31, 2020.
(3) A  local government that has not acted within the time provided under subsection (1) of this
section shall directly apply the model ordinance developed by the commission under  subsection (2)
of this section under ORS  197.646 (3) until the local government acts as described in subsection (1)
of this section.
[(4) In adopting regulations or amending a comprehensive plan under this  section, a local govern-
ment shall consider ways to increase the affordability of middle  housing by considering ordinances and
policies that include but are not limited to: ]
[(a) Waiving or deferring system development charges; ]
[(b) Adopting or  amending criteria for property tax exemptions under ORS 307.515 to 307.523,
307.540 to 307.548 or 307.651 to 307.687 or property tax freezes under ORS 308.450 to 308.481; and ]
[(c) Assessing a construction tax under ORS 320.192 and 320.195. ]
[(5) When a local government makes a legislative decision to amend its comprehensive  plan or land
use regulations to allow middle  housing in areas zoned for residential use that allow for detached
single-family dwellings, the local government is not required to consider whether the  amendments sig-
nificantly affect an existing or planned transportation facility. ]
SECTION 34.  Section 4, chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) [ Notwithstanding section 3 (1) or (3) of this 2019 Act, ] The Department of Land Con-
servation and Development may grant to a local government that is subject to [ section 2 of this  2019
Act] ORS 197.758 an extension of the time allowed to adopt land use  regulations or amend its
comprehensive plan under section 3 , chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2019  [ of this 2019 Act ].
(2) An extension under this section may be applied only to specific areas where  the local gov-
ernment has identified water, sewer,  storm drainage or transportation services that are [ either] sig-
nificantly deficient [ or are expected to be significantly deficient before December  31, 2023, ] and for
[31]
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
which the local government has established a plan of actions that  will remedy the deficiency in
those services that is approved by the department. The extension may  not extend beyond the date
that the local government intends to correct the deficiency under the plan.
(3) In areas  where the extension under this section does not apply, the local government shall
apply its own land use regulations consistent with section 3 (1) , chapter 639, Oregon Laws  2019,
[of this 2019 Act ] or the model ordinance developed  under section 3 (2) , chapter 639, Oregon Laws
2019 [ of this 2019 Act ].
(4) A  request for an extension by a local government must be filed with the department no later
than:
(a) December 31, 2020, for a city subject to [ section 2 (3) of this 2019 Act. ] ORS 197.758 (3) (2021
Edition).
(b) June 30, 2021, for a local government subject to [ section 2 (2) of this  2019 Act. ] ORS 197.758
(2).
(c) June 30, 2024, for each city subject to ORS 197.758 (3), as amended by section 25 of this
2023 Act.
(5) The department shall grant or deny a request for an extension under this section:
(a) Within 90 days of receipt of a complete  request from a city subject to [ section 2 (3) of this
2019 Act. ] ORS 197.758 (3).
(b) Within 120 days of receipt of a complete request from a  local government subject to [ section
2 (2) of this 2019 Act. ] ORS 197.758 (2).
(6) The department shall adopt  rules regarding the form and substance of a local government’s
application for an extension under this section. The department may include rules regarding:
(a) Defining the affected areas;
(b) Calculating deficiencies of water, sewer, storm drainage or transportation services;
(c) Service deficiency levels required to qualify for the extension;
(d) The components and timing of a remediation plan necessary to qualify for an extension;
(e) Standards for evaluating applications; and
(f) Establishing deadlines and components for the approval of a plan of action.
SECTION 35.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[32]