Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ENERGY POLICY
SECTION 1.
 ORS 469.010 is amended to read:
469.010. The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Continued growth in  demand for [ nonrenewable energy forms ] energy, at affordable cost,
poses a  serious and immediate, as well as future, concern. [ problem. It is essential that future gen-
erations not be left a legacy of vanished or depleted resources, resulting in  massive environmental, so-
cial and financial impact. ]
(2) It is the goal of Oregon to  promote the efficient use of energy resources [ and to develop
permanently sustainable energy resources. The need exists for comprehensive state leadership  in energy
production, distribution and utilization. ] consistent with state environmental policy.  It is, there-
fore, the policy of Oregon:
(a) That the development and use of a diverse array of  affordable, sustainable energy re-
sources be  encouraged. [permanently sustainable energy resources be encouraged utilizing to the
highest degree possible the private sector of our free enterprise system. ]
(b) That the development of  energy resources be accomplished consistent with state
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4052
HB 3166
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
greenhouse gas reduction goals.
[(b)] (c)  That through state government example and policy [ other effective communications ], en-
ergy conservation and  elimination of wasteful and uneconomical uses of energy and materials be
promoted. [ This conservation must include, but not be limited  to, resource recovery and materials re-
cycling.]
[(c) That the  basic human needs of every citizen, present and future, shall be given priority in the
allocation of energy resources, commensurate with perpetuation of a free and productive  economy with
special attention to the preservation and enhancement of environmental quality. ]
(d) That state government assist every citizen and industry in adjusting to [ a diminished avail-
ability of energy ] changes in the available mix of energy resources .
(e) That energy-efficient modes of transportation  [ for people and goods ] shall be encouraged[ ,
while energy-inefficient modes of transportation shall be discouraged ].
(f) That cost-effectiveness , balanced with environmental policy considerations,  be considered
in [ state] agency decision-making relating to  energy sources, facilities or conservation[ , and that
cost-effectiveness be considered in all agency decision-making relating to energy facilities ].
(g) That  state government shall provide a source of impartial and objective information in order
that this energy policy may be enhanced.
OREGON ENERGY AND CLIMATE BOARD
(Establishment)
SECTION 2. (1) In order to ensure close correspondence among State Department of
Energy policies and programs, the public interest and  state climate policies, there is created
the Oregon Energy and Climate Board.
(2) A member of the Oregon Global Warming Commission and an Oregon member  of the
Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council shall serve as ex officio
members of the board.
(3) The Governor shall appoint five members to the board, subject to confirmation by  the
Senate as provided in ORS 171.562  and 171.565. Members of the board appointed under this
subsection must be residents of this state well informed in energy and climate issues and
shall include the following:
(a) One member who is an economist;
(b) One member from an institution of higher education  in Oregon with expertise in en-
ergy and climate issues;
(c) One member who represents residential energy users;
(d) One member who represents commercial and industrial energy users; and
(e) One member with expertise in transportation issues.
(4) A member of the board may not:
(a) Hold any pecuniary interest in any  business entity conducting operations which if
conducted in this state would be subject to the department’s regulatory jurisdiction; or
(b) Hold any pecuniary interest in, have any contract of employment  with, or have any
substantial voluntary transactions with any business or activity subject to the department’s
regulatory jurisdiction.
SECTION 3.
(1) The term of office of  each member appointed to the Oregon Energy and
[2]
HB 3166
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Climate Board is four years, but the  members of the board may be removed by the Governor.
Before the expiration of the term  of a member, the Governor shall appoint a successor to
assume the duties of the member on July 1 of the next following year.
(2) A member is eligible for reappointment, but no member may serve  more than two
consecutive terms. In case  of a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an ap-
pointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(3) The board shall select one of its members as chairperson and another as vice  chair-
person, for terms and with duties and powers  necessary for the performance of the functions
of the offices as the board determines.
(4) A majority of the members of the board  constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(5) The board shall meet once during each calendar quarter  at a time and place deter-
mined by the chairperson. The board may hold additional meetings at times and places  de-
termined by the chairperson or the Director of  the State Department of Energy, or as
requested by a majority of the members.
(6) A member of the board is not entitled to compensation  but may be reimbursed from
funds available to the board for actual and  necessary travel and other expenses incurred by
the member in the performance of the member’s official duties in  the manner and amount
provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding the term of office specified by section  3 of this 2016 Act,
of the members first appointed by the Governor to the Oregon Energy and Climate Board:
(1) One shall serve for a term ending July 1, 2019.
(2) One shall serve for a term ending July 1, 2020.
(3) One shall serve for a term ending July 1, 2021.
(4) Two shall serve for terms ending July 1, 2022.
(Duties)
SECTION 5.
(1) The Oregon Energy and Climate Board  shall advise the State Department
of Energy regarding the implementation, administration and enforcement of  department
programs and activities and the  development of department policies in accordance with the
policy stated in ORS 469.010 and state environmental policies, with specific  regard to state
greenhouse gas reduction goals.
(2) By arrangement with the chairperson, the Director of the State Department of En-
ergy shall review with the board the activities of the department and, subject to  policy di-
rection by the board, outline the methods, policies and  program of work for the department.
(3) The board shall receive regular reports from, and  act in an advisory role to, the En-
ergy Facility Siting Council and the Oregon Hanford Cleanup Board.
(4) The department shall provide staff  support to the board at the direction of the Energy
and Climate Administrator.
(Energy and Climate Administrator)
SECTION 6. (1) The Director of the State Department  of Energy, upon consultation with
the Oregon  Energy and Climate Board and the Oregon Global Warming Commission, shall
[3]
HB 3166
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
appoint an Energy and Climate  Administrator who shall serve at the pleasure of the director.
(2) The administrator shall receive  such salary as may be provided by law or as fixed by
the director.
(3) The administrator shall serve as the administrative head to:
(a) The Oregon Energy and Climate Board; and
(b) The Oregon Global Warming Commission.
(4) The administrator may suggest rules to the director for:
(a) The governance of the board and the commission;
(b) The conduct of the employees  of the department who serve the board and the com-
mission at the direction of the administrator and the  assignment and performance of the
business of the commission and the board; and
(c) The custody, use and preservation of the records, papers and property of the board
and the commission.
PLANNING AND REPORTING
SECTION 7.
ORS 469.060 and 469.070 are repealed.
SECTION 8. Sections 9 and 11 of this 2017 Act are added to and made  a part of ORS
469.010 to 469.155.
(Statewide Strategic Energy Plan)
SECTION 9. (1) The State Department of Energy, in  consultation with and under the
policy direction of the Oregon Energy and Climate  Board, shall develop a statewide strategic
energy plan to implement the energy policies stated in ORS  469.010 and 469.310 in a manner
that:
(a) Takes a balanced approach  to addressing the competing interests affected by the
policies stated in ORS 469.010 and 469.310; and
(b) Provides for transparency and accountability in the actions of the department.
(2) The statewide strategic energy plan shall include:
(a) A description of this state’s long-term energy needs;
(b) The objectives of the strategy;
(c) Actions that are designed to achieve the objectives of the strategy;
(d) Plans related to the challenges presented by climate change;
(e) Provisions to ensure communication and partnership with key stakeholders;
(f) Quantitative metrics for assessing the performance of the board  and the department
in implementing the strategic plan, which shall include, but need not be limited to:
(A) The consumption, generation, transmission  and production of energy, including fuel
energy;
(B) Energy costs;
(C) Energy sectors, markets, technologies, resources and facilities;
(D) Energy efficiency and conservation; and
(E) The effects of energy use, including effects related to greenhouse gas emissions;
(g) Specific functions and roles to be played by other state agencies in coordinating with
the department to ensure a unified, statewide approach to addressing the energy needs and
[4]
HB 3166
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
goals of this  state consistent with state environmental policy and the policies set forth in
ORS 469.010 and 469.310; and
(h) Public policy options and recommendations.
(3) The statewide strategic energy plan shall take effect upon adoption  by the depart-
ment.
(4) The board shall periodically review and update the statewide strategic energy plan and
recommend updates to the plan to the department. The  review required by this section shall
include an analysis of how each of the  programs of the department contribute to meeting the
goals of the statewide strategic energy plan and how the program can most effectively be
administered in furtherance of the plan. Revisions of  the statewide strategic energy plan
shall take effect upon the department’s adoption of the revised plan by reference in rule.
SECTION 10.
(1) The State  Department of Energy shall initially adopt the statewide
strategic energy plan required by section 9 of this 2017 Act no later than January 1, 2020.
(2) The department shall  prepare a draft statewide strategic energy plan and a report,
that may include recommendations for  legislation, on the draft plan. The department shall,
no later than September 15, 2019,  submit the report to the appropriate interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245.
(Biennial Report)
SECTION 11. (1) No later than November 1 of every even-numbered year, the Oregon
Energy and Climate Board and the State Department of Energy shall jointly  transmit to the
Governor and the Legislative Assembly a comprehensive report on energy resources, policies,
trends and forecasts in Oregon. The purposes of the report shall be to  inform local, state,
regional and federal energy policy development, energy planning and energy investments, and
to identify opportunities to further the energy policies stated in ORS  469.010 and 469.310 in
conformance with the statewide strategic  energy plan required under section 9 of this 2017
Act.
(2) Consistent  with the legislatively approved budget, the report shall include, but need
not be limited to:
(a) Information and analysis on the state’s progress toward achieving the goals of the
statewide strategic energy plan required by section 9 of this 2017 Act and on the effectiveness
of department programs in contributing to meeting the goals of the plan.
(b) The impacts of the activities carried out by the board and  the department on
achieving the greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals as set forth in ORS 468A.205.
(c) Data and information on:
(A) The consumption, generation, transmission  and production of energy, including fuel
energy;
(B) Energy costs;
(C) Energy sectors, markets, technologies, resources and facilities;
(D) Energy efficiency and conservation;
(E) The effects of energy use, including effects related to greenhouse gas emissions;
(F) Local, state, regional and federal regulations, policies and planning  activities related
to energy; and
(G) Emerging energy opportunities, challenges and impacts.
[5]
HB 3166
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The report may include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Recommendations for the development and maximum use of cost-effective conserva-
tion methods  and renewable resources, consistent with the statewide strategic energy plan,
the energy policies stated in ORS 469.010 and 469.310 and, where appropriate, the energy plan
and fish and wildlife program adopted by the Pacific Northwest Electric  Power and Conser-
vation Planning Council pursuant to P.L. 96-501; and
(b) Recommendations for proposed research, development and demonstration  projects
and programs necessary to further the purposes of the statewide strategic energy  plan and
energy policies stated in ORS 469.010 and 469.310.
(4) The report shall be compiled by  collecting, organizing and refining data and informa-
tion:
(a) Acquired by the department in the performance of its existing duties; or
(b) Required by the department by rule to be submitted to the department for purposes
of compiling the report.
(5) Upon request from the department, other agencies shall assist the  department in the
performance of its duties under this section.
(6) The department shall seek public input and provide opportunities for public  comment
during the development of the report.
STATE DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY ADMINISTRATION
(Modification of General Duties)
SECTION 12.
 ORS 469.030 is amended to read:
469.030. (1) There is created the State Department of Energy.
(2) Subject to the policy direction of the Oregon Energy and Climate Board, and in
furtherance of  the energy policies stated in ORS 469.010 and 469.310,  the State Department of
Energy shall:
(a) Provide impartial technical analysis and expert advice to the Governor  and the Leg-
islative Assembly on energy and climate policy;
[(a)] (b) [Be] Collect, compile and analyze energy data and serve as  the central repository
within the  state government for [ the collection of data on energy resources; ] energy information,
to which all agencies shall send information on all energy-related research;
(c) Monitor energy industry research and developments;
[(b) Endeavor to utilize all public and private sources to inform and educate the public about  en-
ergy problems and ways in which the public can conserve energy resources; ]
[(c)] (d) Engage in research, but whenever possible, contract with appropriate public  or private
agencies and dispense funds for research projects  and other services related to energy resources,
except that the State Department of Energy shall endeavor to avoid  duplication of research whether
completed or in progress;
[(d)] (e)  Qualify  for, accept and disburse or utilize any private or federal moneys or services
available for the administration of ORS [ 176.820,] 192.501 to 192.505, [ 192.690,] 469.010 to 469.155,
469.300 to 469.563, 469.990, 757.710 and 757.720;
[(e)] (f)  Administer federal and state energy allocation and conservation programs  and energy
research and development programs  and apply for and receive available funds [ therefor] for the
[6]
HB 3166
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
programs;
[(f) Be a clearinghouse for energy research to which all  agencies shall send information on all
energy related research; ]
(g) Prepare contingent energy programs to include all forms of energy not  otherwise provided
pursuant to ORS 757.710 and 757.720;
[(h) Maintain an inventory of energy research projects in Oregon and the results thereof; ]
[(i) Collect, compile and analyze energy statistics, data and information; ]
[(j)] (h)  Contract  with public and private agencies for energy activities consistent with ORS
469.010 and this section;
[(k)] (i)  Upon request of the governing body of any affected jurisdiction, coordinate a public re-
view of a proposed transmission line according to the provisions of ORS 469.442; and
[(L) Advise the Governor on energy-related matters. ]
(j) Provide staff support  to the Oregon Energy and Climate Board, the Oregon Hanford
Cleanup Board, the Energy Facility Siting Council and  the Oregon Global Warming Com-
mission.
SECTION 13.  ORS 469.110 is amended to read:
469.110. (1) At the direction of  the Director of the State Department of Energy  and of the
Oregon Energy and Climate Board , the  State Department of Energy may represent the state’s
energy-related interests in any  matter involving the federal government, its departments or agencies,
which is within the scope of the power  and duties of the State Department of Energy, and may, upon
request, represent the  interest of a county, city, state agency, federally recognized Native American
or American Indian tribe, special district or owner or operator of an energy facility.
(2) At the direction of the director  and the board , the department may intervene in  any pro-
ceeding undertaken by an agency for the purpose of expressing its views as to the effect  of an
agency action, upon state energy resources and state energy policy.
(Director)
SECTION 14.  ORS 469.040 is amended to read:
469.040. (1) The State Department of Energy shall be under the supervision  of the Director of
the State Department of Energy, who shall , subject to the policy direction of  the Oregon Energy
and Climate Board:
(a) Supervise the day-to-day functions of the State Department of Energy;
(b) Supervise and facilitate the work and research on energy facility siting  applications at the
direction of the Energy Facility Siting Council;
(c) Hire, assign, reassign and coordinate personnel of the State Department of Energy,  prescribe
their duties and fix their compensation, subject to the State Personnel Relations Law; and
(d) Adopt  rules and issue orders to carry out the duties of the director and the State Department
of Energy in accordance with ORS chapter 183 and the policy stated in ORS 469.010.
(2) The director may delegate to any officer or employee  the exercise and discharge in the
director’s name of any power, duty or function of whatever  character vested in the director by law.
The official act of any person acting in the director’s name and by the director’s authority shall  be
considered an official act of the director.
(3) The director shall be appointed by the  Governor[ .], subject to confirmation by the Senate
in the manner provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
[7]
HB 3166
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
OREGON GLOBAL WARMING COMMISSION
SECTION 15.  ORS 468A.220 is amended to read:
468A.220. (1) In addition to the members  appointed under ORS 468A.215, the Oregon Global
Warming Commission includes the following ex officio nonvoting members:
(a) The Director of the State Department of Energy;
(b) The Director of Transportation;
(c) The chairperson of the Public Utility Commission of Oregon;
(d) The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality;
(e) The Director of Agriculture;
(f) The State Forester;
(g) The Water Resources Director; [ and]
(h) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department; and
[(h)] (i) Three additional ex officio nonvoting members, each from  a state agency or an academic
institution.
(2) The following representatives of the Legislative Assembly also shall serve as ex  officio non-
voting  members:
(a) Two members of the Senate, not from the same political party, appointed by  the President
of the Senate; and
(b) Two members of the House of Representatives,  not from the same political party, appointed
by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(3) Each legislative  member serves at the pleasure of the appointing authority and may serve
so long as the member remains in the chamber of the Legislative Assembly from  which the member
was appointed.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 171.072, members of the commission who are members of the Legisla-
tive Assembly are not entitled  to mileage expenses or a per diem and serve as volunteers on the
commission.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 468A.225 is amended to read:
468A.225. (1) A majority of the members of the Oregon Global  Warming Commission constitutes
a quorum for the transaction of business.
(2) Official action by  the commission requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the commission.
[(2)] (3)  The commission shall meet at times and places specified  by a majority of the members
of the commission.
[(3)] (4) The State Department of  Energy shall provide clerical, technical and management per-
sonnel to serve the commission. [ Other agencies shall provide support  as requested by the department
or the commission. ] All other agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are di-
rected to assist the  commission in the performance of the commission’s duties and, to the
extent permitted by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and  advice that
the members of the commission consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 17.  ORS 468A.235 is amended to read:
468A.235. (1) The Oregon Global Warming Commission shall [ recommend] identify, evaluate and
make recommendations to agencies, the Governor and the Legislative Assembly on:
(a) Ways to coordinate  state and local programs and activities related to energy and cli-
mate, with a focus  on better coordination of programs and activities so as to increase the
[8]
HB 3166
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
effectiveness of  efforts to reduce greenhouse gas emissions in Oregon consistent with the
greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals established by ORS 468A.205 ; and
(b) [ shall recommend efforts  to help ] Ways to help the state and residents of  Oregon prepare
for the effects of global warming.
(2) In order to assist the commission in its duties under subsection  (1) of this section,
each ex officio nonvoting member of the commission listed in ORS 468A.220 (1) shall:
(a) Regularly report to the commission on the energy and climate programs and activities
of the agency or institution that the ex officio nonvoting member represents; and
(b) Evaluate and make recommendations to the commission  on how best to coordinate
state energy and climate programs and activities.
(3) In addition to the reporting required under  subsection (2) of this section,  the Office
of the Governor  and state agencies working on multistate and regional efforts to reduce greenhouse
gas emissions shall inform the  commission about [ these] those  efforts and shall consider input from
the commission for [ such] better coordination of  efforts to reduce greenhouse gas emissions .
SECTION 18.  ORS 468A.215 is amended to read:
468A.215. (1) There is  created the Oregon Global Warming Commission. The commission shall
consist of [ 25 members, including 11 ] the  voting members appointed by the Governor  under this
section and [ 14] the  ex officio nonvoting members specified in ORS 468A.220.
(2) Members of  the commission appointed under this section shall be appointed so as to be rep-
resentative of the social, environmental, cultural and economic diversity of the state and to be rep-
resentative of the policy, science, education and implementation  elements of the efforts to reduce
greenhouse gas emissions and to  prepare Oregon for the effects of global warming. Of the members
appointed by the Governor under this section:
(a) One member shall have significant experience in manufacturing;
(b) One member shall have significant experience in energy;
(c) One member shall have significant experience in transportation;
(d) One member shall have significant experience in forestry;
(e) One member shall have significant experience in agriculture; and
(f) One member shall have significant experience in environmental policy.
(3) The Governor shall select a chairperson and a vice  chairperson from among the members
appointed under this section.
(4) The term of office of a member appointed under this section is four years. Before  the expi-
ration of the term of a member, the  Governor shall appoint a successor whose term begins on Jan-
uary 31 next following. A member appointed under this section is eligible for reappointment. In  case
of vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an  appointment to become immediately effective
for the unexpired term.
(5) The members of the commission appointed under this section  must be residents of this state.
Failure of a  member to maintain compliance with the eligibility requirements related to the
member’s appointment shall result in disqualification from serving on the commission.
(6) Voting members of the commission appointed under this section are entitled  to expenses as
provided in ORS 292.495 (2).
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 19.
(1) Sections 2 to 6  and 8 to 11 of this 2017 Act, the amendments to ORS
[9]
HB 3166
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
468A.215, 468A.220, 468A.225, 468A.235, 469.010, 469.030, 469.040 and 469.110 by sections 1 and
12 to 18 of this 2017 Act and the repeal of ORS 469.060 and 469.070  by section 7 of this 2017
Act become operative July 1, 2018.
(2) The Energy and Climate Administrator and the members of  the Oregon Energy and
Climate Board may be appointed, and the Energy and Climate Administrator, the State  De-
partment of Energy and the Oregon Energy and  Climate Board may take any action, before
the operative date provided for in  subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the administrator, the board and the department to exercise, on and after the operative date
specified in subsection (1)  of this section, the duties, functions and powers of the adminis-
trator, the board and the department pursuant to sections 2 to 6 and 8 to 11  of this 2017 Act,
the amendments to ORS 468A.215, 468A.220, 468A.225,  468A.235, 469.010, 469.030, 469.040 and
469.110 by sections 1 and 12 to 18 of this 2017 Act and the repeal of  ORS 469.060 and 469.070
by section 7 of this 2017 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 20.
The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 21. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[10]