Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2019 Act:
(1) “Clean technology sector development project” means  the development, demon-
stration or deployment of any of the following:
(a) A community-based renewable energy project;
(b) An energy storage project;
(c) A project for the use of, or that uses, construction  and design standards or con-
struction methods, products, equipment or devices to  increase resource efficiency in
buildings undergoing new construction, reconstruction, alteration or repair;
(d) A project for the use  of, or that uses, manufacturing standards, methods, products,
equipment or devices to increase resource efficiency in goods or the manufacturing of  goods;
(e) An energy recovery facility, technology, project or product;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 250
HB 2808
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) An agricultural  technology designed to increase resource efficiency or to produce a
type of energy described in ORS 469A.025;
(g) An alternative fuel vehicle or alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure project;
(h) Business activities in Oregon  that will result in, or will aid, promote or facilitate, the
development, demonstration or deployment of one or more of the technologies,  projects,
products or processes described in paragraphs (a) to (g) of this subsection; or
(i) A project not described in paragraphs (a) to (g) of this subsection for a product  or
service that will improve operational performance, productivity or efficiency  while reducing
costs, inputs, energy consumption, waste or environmental pollution.
(2) “Community-based renewable energy project” means:
(a) A renewable energy project with a generating  capacity of 35 megawatts or less that
generates electricity utilizing a type of energy described in ORS 469A.025;
(b) A facility that generates electricity using biomass that also generates thermal  energy
for a secondary purpose; or
(c) A community energy storage project.
(3) “Energy recovery” has the meaning given that term in ORS 459.005.
(4) “Loan program” means a program funded by a grant awarded under section 3  of this
2019 Act.
(5) “Public body” means a federal governmental body, state  government body, local gov-
ernment as defined in ORS 174.116 or special government body as defined in ORS 174.117.
(6) “Qualified borrower” means any person, conducting business for profit  or not for
profit, that is not a public body and that is authorized to conduct business in Oregon.
(7) “Qualified lender” means an entity licensed to do business in Oregon that:
(a)(A) Is a federal credit union maintaining an office in this state;
(B) Is  a nonprofit community development financial institution or nonprofit public benefit
corporation operating as a lending institution;
(C) Is a local economic development organization; or
(D) Is a regional economic development organization;
(b) Has lending experience relevant to  providing loans for clean technology sector devel-
opment projects; and
(c) Has the organizational capacity to  independently underwrite loans, conduct credit
determinations and manage loan portfolios.
(8) “Resource efficiency” means the use of energy, water or natural resources in  a
sustainable manner while minimizing impacts on the environment.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Clean Technology  Sector Development Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Moneys in the Clean Technol-
ogy Sector Development Fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department to be used to award grants pursuant to section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The Clean Technology Sector Development Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative  Assem-
bly;
(b) Moneys donated to the fund; and
(c) Any moneys deposited in the fund from any other public or private source.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Legislative Assembly declares that it is the purpose of  sections 1 to
4 of this 2019 Act to leverage public  and private partnerships to provide public benefits by
[2]
HB 2808
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
creating access to affordable, flexible capital that enables the clean technology  sector to
prosper throughout this state.
(2) In furtherance of the purpose described in subsection (1) of this section, the  Oregon
Business Development Department shall  establish a competitive clean technology sector de-
velopment grant program. The  department shall award grants under the program to qualified
lenders to be used for developing and administering loan  programs to provide loans to qual-
ified borrowers for clean technology sector development projects.
(3) Grants  awarded under this section shall be funded by moneys deposited in the Clean
Technology Sector Development Fund established under section 2 of this 2019 Act.
(4) The department may not disburse grant funds under this section  unless the depart-
ment and the qualified lender that is an intended grant award  recipient first enter into a
grant agreement. The grant agreement must:
(a) Require the portion of any loan made by a qualified lender that is financed by grant
funds disbursed under the grant program to be used for  clean technology sector development
projects;
(b) Require the qualified lender to  provide a mechanism for documenting that clean
technology sector development projects financed by loans provided under a loan  program
comply with all relevant local, state and federal laws;
(c) Require the qualified lender to use accounting, auditing and fiscal  procedures that
conform to generally accepted government accounting standards;
(d) Require the qualified lender to provide at least  biannual reporting to the department
on the clean technology sector  development projects financed by loans provided under a loan
program that  includes, but is not limited to, reporting on the jobs created or maintained and
the number of work hours  associated with each financed clean technology sector develop-
ment project; and
(e) Include provisions protecting the state against loss  or damage resulting from poor
or underperforming loans issued by the qualified lender under a loan program.
(5) In selecting qualified lenders  to receive grants under this section, the department
shall evaluate qualified lenders based on criteria that must include, but need not be limited
to, a qualified lender’s:
(a) Organizational capacity to attract matching capital;
(b) Organizational capacity to conduct business  development resulting in the receipt of
business proposals or investment offers  that are revenue- or equity-generating opportunities
for the qualified lender;
(c) Participation in job growth and economic development in Oregon;
(d) Experience with sustained operation of revolving loan funds;
(e) Dedication to supporting growth of clean technology sector development projects that
may otherwise be inhibited by a lack of access to capital;
(f) Ability to combine funding sources to provide customers with flexible,  affordable loan
terms;  and
(g) Ability to track and collect information on  the benefits to the state of individual loans
issued to qualified borrowers as part of  a loan program, which may include but not be limited
to information on:
(A) Jobs in Oregon that were created  or maintained due to a loan to a qualified borrower;
(B) The regions of Oregon in which the clean  technology sector development projects
[3]
HB 2808
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
funded through the loans are developed, demonstrated or deployed;
(C) Greenhouse gas emissions avoided or sequestered  due to clean technology sector de-
velopment projects funded by the loans;
(D) Kilowatt hours of energy saved or renewable energy  produced through clean tech-
nology sector development projects funded by the loans; and
(E) Additional funds from other sources leveraged as a result of public investment in
clean technology sector development projects through the loan program.
SECTION 4. (1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall:
(a) Review, in consultation with  the State Department of Energy and other relevant state
agencies, the reports received from qualified lenders under section 3 of this 2019 Act; and
(b) Report at least annually to the Oregon  Business Development Commission on the
performance of existing loan programs and other matters related to ensuring that  loan pro-
grams are administered in a manner that furthers the  purposes of sections 1 to 4 of this 2019
Act.
(2) The commission shall:
(a) Offer at least  one opportunity annually for public comment on the information re-
ported to the commission by the Oregon Business Development Department under subsection
(1) of this section;
(b) Utilize the information and public  comments gathered and developed pursuant to this
section to provide oversight and direction  to the Oregon Business Development Department
in carrying out the provisions of sections 1 to 4 of this 2019 Act; and
(c) Report specifically on the implementation of the  competitive clean technology sector
development grant program required under section 3 of this 2019 Act as part  of the biennial
report to the Governor and the Legislative Assembly required under ORS 285A.050.
(3) The Oregon Business Development Department may  adopt rules necessary to imple-
ment the provisions of sections 1 to 4 of this 2019 Act.
[4]