Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $250,000 for distribution to  the Nesika Beach Water District for
the purpose of funding fire protection infrastructure.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1919