Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2025 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
414.
SECTION 2. (1) The Office of Pharmaceutical Purchasing is established  in the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services to support multiagency  and multistate collaborative
purchasing of pharmaceuticals and drive down the cost of  prescription drugs for residents
of this state.
(2) The purpose of the office is to:
(a) Improve coordination in pharmaceutical purchasing to reduce costs for taxpayers  and
consumers;
(b) Leverage the state’s collective purchasing  power to promote cost savings, efficiency
and transparency while maintaining excellent service of each purchasing entity;
(c) Enhance the Oregon Prescription Drug Program and  integrate uniform standards
across this state’s medical  assistance program that will further reduce administrative bur-
den and optimize resource utilization;
(d) Establish and administer a multistate prescription drug purchasing consortium; and
(e) Administer all intergovernmental and interagency agreements necessary to achieve
the office’s purposes described in this subsection.
(3) The office shall:
(a) Provide oversight for all state pharmaceutical  purchasing and state contracts related
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3972
HB 3613
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to pharmaceutical procurement and payments;
(b) Administer the Oregon Prescription Drug Program;
(c) Develop and enforce rules for statewide purchasing agreements, payments made  to
pharmacies and procurement standards;
(d) Monitor state pharmaceutical  purchasing by examining the data collected and main-
tained by state agencies related to pharmaceutical purchases;
(e) Coordinate and facilitate the work  of the advisory board established in section 3 of
this 2025 Act; and
(f) No later than October 1 of  each year, submit a report to the Legislative Assembly in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245, after consultation from the advisory board,  that in-
cludes at a minimum:
(i) Total pharmaceutical expenditures by agency and program;
(ii) Identification of fragmentation in state pharmaceutical purchasing;
(iii) Current procurement practices of each agency and program;
(iv) Barriers to effective defragmentation and leveraging of purchasing power; and
(v) Recommendations for legislative action to reduce costs and improve coordination.
(4) The Director of  the Department of Administrative Services shall appoint an adminis-
trator for the office and all subordinate officers and employees of the office.
SECTION 3.
(1) There is created in the Office of Pharmaceutical Purchasing the Office
of Pharmaceutical Purchasing Advisory Board. The purpose of the advisory board is to co-
ordinate pharmaceutical purchasing across state agencies and programs.
(2) The administrator of  the Office of Pharmaceutical Purchasing shall serve as chair of
the advisory board and, after consultation  with the Governor, shall appoint the following
members:
(a) The executive director of the Oregon Educators Benefit Board;
(b) The executive director of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board;
(c) The executive director of the Public Employees Retirement System;
(d) The executive director of the Prescription Drug Affordability Board; and
(e) A member representing each of the following entities:
(A) The Department of Corrections;
(B) The Oregon State Hospital;
(C) The Oregon Health Authority pharmacy policy and programs office;
(D) Local health departments;
(E) The Universal Health Plan Governance Board;
(F) Oregon State University College of Pharmacy; and
(G) An Oregon Health Authority public health representative.
(3) With approval from a majority of the  advisory board members, the administrator may
appoint additional members to the advisory board.
(4) One less than a majority of the advisory board constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(5) The advisory board shall be considered a public body and is subject to ORS 192.610  to
192.705.
(6) The advisory board shall:
(a) Meet at least once per quarter;
(b) Review the recommendations made by the Office of Pharmaceutical Purchasing  re-
[2]
HB 3613
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
garding defragmentation;
(c) Communicate to the office the barriers and challenges that inhibit effective leveraging
of pharmaceutical purchasing power;
(d) Develop legislative recommendations to reduce fragmentation and improve Oregon’s
pharmaceutical purchasing power;
(e) Review the multistate purchasing consortium growth and savings  reports and advise
the administrator of the office; and
(f) Serve as stewards of  Oregon tax dollars to ensure that every agency and program
maintains service excellence while effectively  leveraging Oregon’s collective pharmaceutical
purchasing power.
SECTION 4.
The Office of Pharmaceutical Purchasing shall adopt  rules to carry out the
provisions of sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.  ORS 414.312 is amended to read:
414.312. (1) As used in ORS 414.312 to 414.318:
(a) “Pharmacy benefit manager”  means an entity that negotiates and executes contracts with
pharmacies, manages preferred drug lists, negotiates rebates with  prescription drug manufacturers
and serves as  an intermediary between the Oregon Prescription Drug Program, prescription drug
manufacturers and pharmacies.
(b) “Prescription drug claims processor” means an entity that processes  and pays prescription
drug claims, adjudicates pharmacy claims, transmits prescription drug  prices and claims data be-
tween pharmacies and  the Oregon Prescription Drug Program and processes related payments to
pharmacies.
(c) “Program price” means the reimbursement rates and prescription drug prices established by
the administrator of the Oregon Prescription Drug Program.
(2) The Oregon Prescription Drug Program is established in the  [ Oregon Health Authority ] Of-
fice of Pharmaceutical Purchasing . The purpose of the program is to:
(a) Purchase  prescription drugs, replenish prescription drugs dispensed or reimburse pharmacies
for prescription drugs in order to receive discounted prices and rebates;
(b) Make prescription drugs available at the lowest possible  cost to participants in the program
as a means to promote health;
(c) Maintain a list of prescription  drugs recommended as the most effective prescription drugs
available at the best possible prices; and
(d) Promote health through the purchase and provision of discount prescription  drugs and co-
ordination of comprehensive prescription benefit services for eligible entities and members.
(3) The [ Director of the Oregon Health Authority ] administrator of the office  shall appoint an
administrator of the Oregon Prescription Drug Program. The administrator may:
(a) Negotiate price discounts and rebates  on prescription drugs with prescription drug man-
ufacturers or group purchasing organizations;
(b) Purchase prescription  drugs on behalf of individuals and entities that participate in the
program;
(c) Contract  with a prescription drug claims processor to adjudicate pharmacy claims and
transmit program prices to pharmacies;
(d) Determine program prices and reimburse or  replenish pharmacies for prescription drugs
dispensed or transferred;
(e) Adopt and implement a preferred drug list for the program;
[3]
HB 3613
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) Develop a system for allocating  and distributing the operational costs of the program and any
rebates obtained to participants of the program; and
(g) Cooperate with other states or regional consortia in the bulk purchase of prescription  drugs.
(4) The following individuals or entities may participate in the program:
(a) Public Employees’ Benefit Board, Oregon Educators Benefit Board  and Public Employees
Retirement System;
(b) Local  governments as defined in ORS 174.116 and special government bodies as defined in
ORS 174.117 that directly or indirectly purchase prescription drugs;
(c) Oregon Health and Science University established under ORS 353.020;
[(d) State agencies that directly or indirectly purchase prescription drugs, including agencies  that
dispense prescription drugs directly to persons in state-operated facilities; ]
[(e)] (d) Residents of this state who lack or are underinsured for prescription drug coverage;
[(f)] (e)  Private entities; and
[(g)] (f)  Labor organizations.
(5) The following individuals or entities must  participate in the program unless the indi-
vidual or entity can demonstrate that a lower price is available for  the same prescription
drug without utilizing the program:
(a) State agencies that directly or indirectly purchase prescription drugs,  including
agencies that dispense prescription drugs directly to persons in state-operated  facilities; and
(b) Coordinated care organizations.
[(5)] (6)  The administrator may establish different program prices for pharmacies in rural areas
to maintain statewide access to the program.
[(6)] (7)  The administrator may establish the terms and conditions  for a pharmacy to enroll in
the program. A licensed pharmacy that is willing to accept the terms and conditions established by
the administrator may apply to enroll in the program.
[(7)] (8) Except as provided in subsection [ (8)] (9) of this section, the administrator may not:
[(a) Contract with a pharmacy benefit manager; ]
[(b)] (a)  Establish a state-managed wholesale or retail drug distribution  or dispensing system;
or
[(c)] (b) Require pharmacies to  maintain or allocate separate inventories for prescription drugs
dispensed through the program.
[(8)] (9)  The administrator shall contract with one or more entities  to perform any of the func-
tions of the program, including but not limited to:
(a) Contracting with a  pharmacy benefit manager and directly or indirectly with such pharmacy
networks as the administrator considers necessary to maintain statewide access to the program.
(b) Negotiating with prescription drug manufacturers on behalf of the administrator.
[(9)] (10)  Notwithstanding subsection [ (4)(e)] (4)(d) of this section, individuals who are  eligible
for Medicare Part D prescription drug coverage may participate in the program.
[(10)] (11)  The program  may contract with vendors as necessary to utilize discount purchasing
programs, including but not limited to  group purchasing organizations established to meet the cri-
teria of the Nonprofit Institutions Act, 15 U.S.C. 13c, or that  are exempt under the Robinson-Patman
Act, 15 U.S.C. 13.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 414.314 is amended to read:
414.314. (1) An individual or entity described in ORS 414.312 (4) may  apply to participate in the
Oregon Prescription Drug Program.  Participants shall apply on an application provided by the
[4]
HB 3613
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[Oregon Health Authority ] Office of Pharmaceutical Purchasing . The [ authority] office  may
charge  participants  a nominal fee to participate in the program. The [ authority] office shall issue a
prescription drug identification card to participants of the program.
(2) The [ authority] office  shall provide a mechanism to  calculate and transmit the program
prices for prescription drugs to a pharmacy. The pharmacy shall charge the participant  the program
price for a prescription drug.
(3) A pharmacy may charge the participant the professional dispensing fee set  by the Oregon
Health Authority.
(4) Prescription drug identification cards issued  under this section must contain the information
necessary for proper claims adjudication or transmission of price data.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 414.318 is amended to read:
414.318. The Prescription Drug Purchasing Fund is  established separate and distinct from the
General Fund. The Prescription  Drug Purchasing Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to the
fund by the Legislative  Assembly and moneys received by the [ Oregon Health Authority ] Oregon
Department of  Administrative Services  for the purposes established in this section in the form
of gifts, grants,  bequests, endowments or donations. The moneys in the Prescription Drug Purchasing
Fund are continuously appropriated to the [ authority] department  and shall be used  to purchase
prescription  drugs,  reimburse pharmacies for prescription drugs and reimburse the [ authority] de-
partment for the costs of  administering the Oregon Prescription Drug Program, including con-
tracted services costs, computer costs, professional dispensing fees paid  to retail pharmacies and
other reasonable program costs. Interest earned on the fund shall be credited to the fund.
SECTION 8.  ORS 414.320 is amended to read:
414.320. The [ Oregon Health Authority ] Office of Pharmaceutical Purchasing shall adopt  rules
to implement and administer ORS 414.312 to 414.318. The rules  shall include but are not limited to
establishing procedures for:
(1) Issuing prescription drug  identification cards to individuals and entities that participate in
the Oregon Prescription Drug Program; and
(2) Enrolling pharmacies in the program.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 414.334 is amended to read:
414.334. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt  a  uniform  Practitioner-Managed Pre-
scription Drug Plan for the medical assistance program  to  be used by fee-for-service reimburse-
ment and prescription drugs  provided by coordinated care organizations . The purpose of the
plan is to ensure that enrollees in the medical assistance program receive the  most effective pre-
scription drug available at the best possible price.
(2) In adopting the plan, the authority shall consider recommendations of the Pharmacy  and
Therapeutics Committee.
(3) The authority shall consult with representatives of the  regulatory boards and associations
representing practitioners who are prescribers under the medical assistance program and  ensure
that practitioners  receive educational materials and have access to training on the Practitioner-
Managed Prescription Drug Plan.
(4) Notwithstanding the Practitioner-Managed Prescription Drug Plan adopted by the  authority,
a practitioner may prescribe any drug that the practitioner indicates  is medically necessary for an
enrollee as being the most effective available.
(5) An enrollee may appeal to the authority a decision of a practitioner or the authority to  not
provide a prescription drug requested by the enrollee.
[5]
HB 3613
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) This section does not limit the decision of a practitioner as to the scope and duration  of
treatment of chronic conditions, including but not limited to arthritis, diabetes and asthma.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 414.359 is amended to read:
414.359. (1)  The Mental Health Clinical Advisory Group is established in the Oregon Health
Authority. The Mental Health Clinical Advisory Group shall develop evidence-based  algorithms for
mental health treatments, including treatments with mental health drugs based on:
(a) The efficacy of the drug;
(b) The cost of the drug;
(c) Potential side effects of the drug;
(d) A patient’s profile; and
(e) A patient’s history with the drug.
(2) The Mental Health Clinical Advisory Group consists of  18 members appointed by the au-
thority as follows:
(a) Two psychiatrists each with an active community practice;
(b) One child and adolescent psychiatrist;
(c) Two licensed clinical psychologists;
(d) One psychiatric nurse practitioner with prescribing privileges;
(e) Two primary care providers;
(f) Two pharmacists, one of whom must have experience dispensing to long term  care facilities
and patients with special needs;
(g) Two individuals, each  representing a statewide mental health advocacy organization for
children and adults with mental illness, who have experience as a consumer of  mental health ser-
vices or as a family member of a consumer of mental health services;
(h) Two individuals each representing a coordinated care organization;
(i) One consumer of mental health services;
(j) One member of a federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe;
(k) One member who represents the Department of Corrections who  has a clinical background;
and
(L) One member who is a clinical  psychiatrist and who represents the Oregon Psychiatric Ac-
cess Line.
(3) The Mental Health Clinical  Advisory Group shall, in developing treatment algorithms, con-
sider all of the following:
(a) Peer-reviewed medical literature;
(b) Observational studies;
(c) Studies of health economics;
(d) Input from patients and physicians; and
(e) Any other information that the group deems appropriate.
(4) The Mental Health Clinical  Advisory Group shall make recommendations to the authority
and the Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee, including but not limited to:
(a) Implementation of evidence-based algorithms.
(b) Any changes needed to [ any preferred drug  list used by the authority ] the Practitioner-
Managed Prescription Drug Plan or any preferred drug list used by  the authority or a coor-
dinated care organization.
(c) Practice guidelines for the treatment of mental health disorders with mental health drugs.
(d) Coordinating the work of the group with an entity that offers a psychiatric advice hotline.
[6]
HB 3613
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) Recommendations of the Mental Health Clinical Advisory Group shall be posted to the
website of the authority no later than 30 days after the group approves the recommendations.
(6) No later than December 31 of each year,  the Mental Health Clinical Advisory Group shall
report to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health on  recommendations
made to the authority under subsection (4) of this  section and the report may include recommen-
dations for legislation.
(7) A member of the Mental  Health Clinical Advisory Group is not entitled to compensation but
may be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses  incurred in the performance of the member’s offi-
cial duties.
(8) The Mental Health  Clinical Advisory Group shall select one of its members as chairperson
and another as vice chairperson, for terms and  with duties and powers necessary for the perform-
ance of the functions of the group.
(9) A majority of the members of the Mental Health Clinical Advisory Group constitutes a quo-
rum for the transaction of business.
(10) The Mental Health Clinical Advisory Group shall meet at least once every two months at
a time and place determined by the chairperson. The group also may meet at other times and  places
specified by the call of the chairperson or of a majority  of the members of the group. The group
may meet in executive session when discussing factors listed in subsection (1) of this section.
(11) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS  174.111, are directed to assist the
Mental Health Clinical Advisory Group  in the performance of duties of the group and, to the extent
permitted by laws relating to confidentiality,  to furnish information and advice the members of the
group consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 413.032 is amended to read:
413.032. (1) The Oregon Health Authority is established. The authority shall:
(a) Carry out policies adopted by the Oregon Health Policy Board;
(b) Administer the Oregon Integrated and  Coordinated Health Care Delivery System established
in ORS 414.570 and the COFA Dental Program established in ORS 413.614;
[(c) Administer the Oregon Prescription Drug Program; ]
[(d)] (c)  Develop the policies for  and the provision of publicly funded medical care and medical
assistance in this state;
[(e)] (d) Develop the policies for and the provision of mental health  treatment and treatment of
addictions;
[(f)] (e) Assess, promote and protect the health of the public as specified by state and  federal
law;
[(g)] (f)  Provide regular reports to the board with respect to  the performance of health services
contractors serving recipients  of medical assistance, including reports of trends in health services
and enrollee satisfaction;
[(h)] (g)  Guide  and support, with the authorization of the board, community-centered health ini-
tiatives designed to address critical risk  factors, especially those that contribute to chronic disease;
[(i)] (h) Be  the state Medicaid agency for the administration of funds from Titles XIX and XXI
of the Social Security Act and administer medical assistance under ORS chapter 414;
[(j)] (i) In consultation with  the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services,
periodically review and recommend standards and methodologies to the Legislative Assembly for:
(A) Review of administrative expenses of health insurers;
(B) Approval of rates; and
[7]
HB 3613
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Enforcement of rating rules adopted by the Department of  Consumer and Business Services;
[(k)] (j)  Structure reimbursement rates for  providers that serve recipients of medical assistance
to reward comprehensive management of diseases, quality outcomes and the efficient use  of re-
sources  and  to promote cost-effective procedures, services and programs including, without limita-
tion, preventive health, dental and primary care  services, web-based office visits, telephone
consultations and telemedicine consultations;
[(L)] (k) Guide and support community three-share agreements in which an employer,  state or
local government and an individual all contribute a portion of a premium for a community-centered
health initiative or for insurance coverage;
[(m)] (L) Develop, in consultation with the Department of Consumer and Business  Services, one
or more products designed to provide more affordable options for the small group market;
[(n)] (m)  Implement policies and programs to  expand the skilled, diverse workforce as described
in ORS 414.018 (4); and
[(o)] (n)  Implement  a process for collecting the health outcome and quality measure data iden-
tified by the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee and  the Behavioral Health Committee and re-
port the data to the Oregon Health Policy Board.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority is authorized to:
(a) Create an  all-claims, all-payer database to collect health care data and monitor and evaluate
health care reform in Oregon and to  provide comparative cost and quality information to consumers,
providers and purchasers of health care about Oregon’s health care  systems and health plan net-
works in order to provide comparative information to consumers.
(b) Develop uniform contracting standards for  the purchase of health care, including the fol-
lowing:
(A) Uniform quality standards and performance measures;
(B) Evidence-based guidelines for major chronic  disease management and health care services
with unexplained variations in frequency or cost;
(C) Evidence-based effectiveness guidelines for select new technologies and medical equipment;
(D) A statewide drug formulary that may be used by publicly funded health benefit plans; and
(E) Standards that accept and consider tribal-based practices for mental health  and substance
abuse prevention, counseling and treatment for persons who are Native  American or Alaska Native
as equivalent to evidence-based practices.
(3) The enumeration of duties,  functions and powers in this section is not intended to be exclu-
sive nor to limit the duties, functions and  powers imposed on or vested in the Oregon Health Au-
thority by ORS 413.006 to 413.042, 415.012 to 415.430, 415.501, 741.001  to 741.540, 741.802 and 741.900
or by other statutes.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 413.011 is amended to read:
413.011. (1) The duties of the Oregon Health Policy Board are to:
(a) Be the policy-making and  oversight body for the Oregon Health Authority established in ORS
413.032 and all of the authority’s departmental divisions.
(b) Develop and  submit a plan to the Legislative Assembly to provide and fund access to af-
fordable, quality health care for all Oregonians.
(c) Develop a program to provide health insurance premium assistance to all low  and moderate
income individuals who are legal residents of Oregon.
(d) Publish health outcome  and quality measure data collected by the Oregon Health Authority
at aggregate levels that do not disclose information otherwise protected by law. The  information
[8]
HB 3613
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
published must report, for  each coordinated care organization and each health benefit plan sold
through the health insurance  exchange or offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board or the
Public Employees’ Benefit Board:
(A) Quality measures;
(B) Costs;
(C) Health outcomes; and
(D) Other information that is necessary for members of the public to evaluate the value of health
services delivered by each coordinated care organization and by each health benefit plan.
(e) Establish evidence-based clinical standards and practice  guidelines that may be used by
providers.
(f) Approve and monitor community-centered health initiatives  described in ORS 413.032 [ (1)(h)]
(1)(g) that are consistent with public health  goals, strategies, programs and performance standards
adopted by the Oregon Health Policy Board to  improve the health of all Oregonians, and to regu-
larly report to the  Legislative Assembly on the accomplishments and needed changes to the initi-
atives.
(g) Establish cost containment mechanisms to reduce health care costs.
(h) Ensure that Oregon’s health care workforce is sufficient  in numbers and training to meet the
demand that will be created by the expansion  in health coverage, health care system transforma-
tions, an increasingly diverse population and an aging workforce.
(i) Work with the Oregon  congressional delegation to advance the adoption of changes in federal
law or policy to promote Oregon’s comprehensive health reform plan.
(j) Establish a health benefit package in accordance with ORS  741.340 to be used as the baseline
for all health benefit plans offered through the health insurance exchange.
(k) Investigate and  report annually to the Legislative Assembly on the feasibility and advis-
ability of future changes to the health insurance market in Oregon,  including but not limited to the
following:
(A) A requirement for every resident to have health insurance coverage.
(B) A payroll tax as a means to encourage employers to continue providing  health insurance to
their employees.
(L) Meet cost-containment goals by structuring reimbursement  rates to reward comprehensive
management of diseases, quality outcomes and the efficient use of resources by  promoting cost-
effective procedures, services and programs including, without limitation, preventive  health, dental
and primary care services, web-based office  visits, telephone consultations and telemedicine consul-
tations.
(m) Oversee the expenditure  of moneys from the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund to support
grants to primary care providers and rural  health practitioners, to increase the number of primary
care educators and to support efforts to create and develop career ladder opportunities.
(n) Work  with the Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee, administrators of the medical
assistance program and  the Department of Corrections to identify uniform contracting standards for
health benefit plans that achieve maximum quality and cost outcomes and  align the contracting
standards for all state programs to the greatest extent practicable.
(o) Work with the  Health Information Technology Oversight Council to foster health information
technology systems and practices that promote the  Oregon Integrated and Coordinated Health Care
Delivery System established by ORS 414.570 and  align health information technology systems and
practices across this state.
[9]
HB 3613
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
(2) The Oregon Health Policy Board is authorized to:
(a) Subject to the approval of the Governor, organize and  reorganize the authority as the board
considers necessary to properly conduct the work of the authority.
(b) Submit directly to the Legislative Counsel, no later  than October 1 of each even-numbered
year, requests for measures  necessary to provide statutory authorization to carry out any of the
board’s duties or to implement any of the board’s recommendations. The  measures may be filed prior
to the beginning of the legislative session  in accordance with the rules of the House of Represen-
tatives and the Senate.
(3) If the board or the authority is unable to perform, in whole or in part,  any of the duties
described  in ORS 413.006 to 413.042 and 741.340 without federal approval, the authority is authorized
to request, in accordance with ORS 413.072, waivers or other approval necessary to perform  those
duties. The authority shall implement any portions of  those duties not requiring legislative authority
or federal approval, to the extent practicable.
(4) The enumeration of duties,  functions and powers in this section is not intended to be exclu-
sive nor to  limit the duties, functions and powers imposed on the board by ORS 413.006 to 413.042
and 741.340 and by other statutes.
(5) The board shall consult  with the Department of Consumer and Business Services in com-
pleting the tasks set forth in subsection (1)(j) and (k)(A) of this section.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 410.080 is amended to read:
410.080. (1) The Department of Human Services is the designated single state agency  for all
federal programs under ORS 409.010 and 410.040  to 410.300 except that the Oregon Health Authority
is the single state agency responsible for supervising the administration of all programs  funded by
Title XIX or Title XXI of the Social Security Act as provided in ORS 413.032 [ (1)(i)] (1)(h).
(2) Except as provided in  ORS 410.070 (2)(d) and 410.100, the administration of services to clients
under ORS 410.040 to  410.300 shall be through area agencies, and shall comply with all applicable
federal regulations.
SECTION 14. (1) Sections 2 to 4 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 410.080,
413.011, 413.032, 414.312, 414.314, 414.318, 414.320, 414.334 and 414.359 by sections 5 to 13 of this
2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services may take any action before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the department
to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section, all the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by sections 2  to 4 of this 2025 Act
and the amendments to ORS 410.080, 413.011, 413.032, 414.312, 414.314, 414.318,  414.320, 414.334
and 414.359 by sections 5 to 13 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 15.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[10]