Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Affordable housing” has the meaning given that term in ORS 197A.465.
(b) “Low-income community” has the meaning given that term in section 45D(e)  of the
Internal Revenue Code, except that  the community must have a population of at least 1,000
but not more than 49,900 at the close of the tax year.
(c) “Opportunity zone” means a population census tract that is  a low-income community.
(d) “Opportunity zone property” means a project that consists of at least 50 percent  af-
fordable housing units by square feet and is located in an opportunity zone.
(2) There shall be subtracted  from federal taxable income an amount equal to a per-
centage of the gain recognized from the sale or exchange of opportunity zone  property in the
tax year, as follows:
(a) 50 percent, if prior to sale the property is held by the taxpayer for at least 10 years
but fewer than 15 years;
(b) 75 percent, if prior to sale the property is  held by the taxpayer the property is held
for at least 15 years, but fewer than 17 years; and
(c) 100 percent, if prior to sale the property is held  by the taxpayer the property is held
for at least 17 years.
(3) The subtraction under this section shall be allowed only if:
(a) Throughout the holding period set forth  in subsection (2) of this section, the oppor-
tunity zone property  is in compliance with all applicable state or federal laws or standards,
including occupational safety or health laws, rules, regulations and standards  applicable for
affordable housing;
(b) At the time of sale, the opportunity zone property has installed and in  use a solar
photovoltaic energy system or a solar  thermal energy system that directly connects to an
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2124
HB 2863
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
electric company’s electrical system within  this state or indirectly connects through the
system of an electric company’s retail electricity consumer or the electric system  of a third
party that is not  an electric company’s retail electricity consumer but whose system is lo-
cated within this state; and
(c) The sale or exchange constitutes a substantially complete termination of all of  the
taxpayer’s ownership interest in the opportunity zone property.
(4) Prior to making the subtraction allowed under this section, the taxpayer shall obtain
verification of eligibility for the subtraction from the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment. The verification shall be in  the form and manner required by the Oregon Business
Development Department by rule. The taxpayer shall  provide a copy of the verification to the
Department of Revenue upon request.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Affordable housing” has the meaning given that term in ORS 197A.465.
(b) “Low-income community” has the meaning given that term in section 45D(e)  of the
Internal Revenue Code, except that  the community must have a population of at least 1,000
but not more than 49,900 at the close of the tax year.
(c) “Opportunity zone” means a population census tract that is  a low-income community.
(d) “Opportunity zone property” means a project that consists of at least 50 percent  af-
fordable housing units by square feet and is located in an opportunity zone.
(2) There shall be subtracted  from federal taxable income an amount equal to a per-
centage of the gain recognized from the sale or exchange of opportunity zone  property in the
tax year, as follows:
(a) 50 percent, if prior to sale the property is held by the taxpayer for at least 10 years
but fewer than 15 years;
(b) 75 percent, if prior to sale the property is  held by the taxpayer the property is held
for at least 15 years, but fewer than 17 years; and
(c) 100 percent, if prior to sale the property is held  by the taxpayer the property is held
for at least 17 years.
(3) The subtraction under this section shall be allowed only if:
(a) Throughout the holding period set forth  in subsection (2) of this section, the oppor-
tunity zone property  is in compliance with all applicable state or federal laws or standards,
including occupational safety or health laws, rules, regulations and standards  applicable for
affordable housing;
(b) At the time of sale, the opportunity zone property has installed and in  use a solar
photovoltaic energy system or a solar  thermal energy system that directly connects to an
electric company’s electrical system within  this state or indirectly connects through the
system of an electric company’s retail electricity consumer or the electric system  of a third
party that is not  an electric company’s retail electricity consumer but whose system is lo-
cated within this state; and
(c) The sale or exchange constitutes a substantially complete termination of all of  the
taxpayer’s ownership interest in the opportunity zone property.
(4) Prior to making the subtraction allowed under this section, the taxpayer shall obtain
verification of eligibility for the subtraction from the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment. The verification shall be in  the form and manner required by the Oregon Business
[2]
HB 2863
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
Development Department by rule. The taxpayer shall  provide a copy of the verification to the
Department of Revenue upon request.
SECTION 5.
Sections 2 and 4 of this 2025  Act apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2031.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]