Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at the request  of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, the State Treasurer  is authorized to issue lottery
bonds pursuant to  ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $4.5 million in net
proceeds for the purposes described  in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional
amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred  to the
department for deposit in the  ODAS Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553  for distribution to the Ontario Recreation District to facilitate the con-
struction and project management of the Ontario Community Recreation Center.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public  education or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that
improving access to physical activity, a  safe community space and direct and indirect social
services will enhance the economic viability of the region, create jobs and improve the qual-
ity of life for the community.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1465