Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the State Department of Agriculture,  for the
biennium beginning July 1,  2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $700,000 for the
purpose of funding a program of  state inspection authorized by section 2, chapter 6, Oregon
Laws 2020 (first special session).
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3431