Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall study the effect of the
payment of fines on rates of recidivism.
(2) The commission shall provide the results of the study, including any  recommended
legislative changes, in  a report to the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than December 31, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3065