Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The University of Oregon shall conduct a study on the prevalence of  child
abuse in this state. The  university shall submit a report on the study, in the manner pro-
vided by ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to hu-
man services no later than September 15, 2023.
SECTION 2. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June  30,
2023, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $700,000, for the purposes specified in section
1 of this 2022 Act.
(2) Moneys distributed by the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission for the Uni-
versity of Oregon’s  duties under section 1 of this 2022 Act may not be used to pay the uni-
versity for facilities and administrative costs not directly related to the Oregon child abuse
prevalence study and report described in section 1 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2022 Act are repealed on January 2, 2024.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 42