Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. A taxpayer shall be exempt from the tax imposed under this chapter if  the
taxpayer has Oregon adjusted gross income that is equal to or less than  120 percent of the
median Oregon adjusted gross income for  all taxpayers filing the type of return filed, as de-
termined by the Department of  Revenue for tax years ending in the immediately preceding
calendar year.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3907