Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 660.300 to
660.420.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Local industry sector partnership” means  a collaboration between local businesses
and regional  workforce partners that is reflective of local key industries facing critical
workforce shortages or increased strategic workforce opportunities.
(b) “Regional workforce partners”  includes community-based organizations, educational
institutions, labor organization and other workforce service providers.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall, in consultation with  the State
Workforce and Talent Development Board, develop a program  to award grants to local
workforce development boards to convene local industry sector partnerships to  assist in
carrying out the activities described under this section.
(3) Program grant proceeds may be used solely to:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 507
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Align workforce development  activities that aim to increase participation in
workforce programs by individuals from priority populations in a manner that is consistent
with and  responsive to critical workforce shortages and strategic workforce opportunities
as identified by the State Workforce and Talent Development Board under ORS 660.324;
(b) Develop  structured processes to address mutual workforce development goals and
promote consensus in decision-making;
(c) Identify industry-specific  workforce needs in local workforce development areas, in-
cluding the  need for high-value credentials, to inform the development and implementation
of culturally and linguistically diverse workforce education and training curricula;
(d) Develop targeted recruitment strategies  to increase equitable participation by indi-
viduals from priority populations in local workforce programs; and
(e) Promote workforce development programs and activities in targeted industry sectors.
(4) In convening local industry sector partnerships  under this section, local workforce
development boards shall:
(a) Consider  alignment of workforce development programs among statewide targeted
key industries to address critical workforce shortages and strategic workforce  opportunities.
(b) Ensure that each partnership represents a single targeted industry sector.
(c) Demonstrate how the  local industry sector partnership complements the workforce
development goals of local workforce partners and is  consistent with a local plan described
in ORS 660.327.
(5) The commission may adopt any rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 660.300 is amended to read:
660.300. As used in ORS 660.300 to 660.420:
(1) “Chief elected official” means a county  commissioner, a county judge or the mayor of the
City of Portland.
(2) “Critical workforce shortage” means a current or projected shortage of workers
within an  occupation or industry considered to be critical to the well-being of the communi-
ties and economy of Oregon.
[(2)] (3) “Federal Act” or “federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act” means the federal
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq.).
[(3)] (4) “Local workforce development area” means the  City of Portland or a county when the
city  or  county has been designated as a local workforce development area under ORS 660.324. “Lo-
cal workforce  development area” may include two or more counties that have joined together to
form a local workforce development area and  that have been designated as a local workforce de-
velopment area under ORS 660.324.
[(4)] (5) “Local workforce development board” means a board established pursuant to section
3122 of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.
[(5)] (6) “Maritime sector” includes but is not limited to:
(a) Enterprises  engaged in the design, construction, manufacture, acquisition, operation, supply,
repair or maintenance of marine vessels or component parts of marine vessels;
(b) Enterprises engaged in managing or operating shipping lines;
(c) Customs brokerage services, shipyards, shipping and freight forwarding services, dry docks,
marine railways and marine repair shops;
(d) Enterprises engaged in commercial or recreational fishing;
[2]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Enterprises and academic institutions engaged in scientific research of ocean processes, ma-
rine life or other ocean resources; and
(f) Enterprises engaged in marine  tours or travel, water sports or other marine leisure activities.
[(6)] (7) “Participant” means a person receiving  services under the federal Workforce Innovation
and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq.).
[(7)] (8) “Participant records” means records relating to matters such as grades,  conduct, per-
sonal and academic evaluations, results of psychometric testing, counseling, disciplinary  actions, if
any, and other personal matters.
[(8)] (9) “Priority populations” means:
(a) Communities of color;
(b) Women;
(c) Low-income communities;
(d) Rural and frontier communities;
(e) Veterans;
(f) Persons with disabilities;
(g) Incarcerated and formerly incarcerated individuals;
(h) Members of Oregon’s nine federally recognized Indian tribes;
(i) Individuals who disproportionately experience discrimination in  employment on the basis of
age; [ and]
(j) Individuals who identify as members of the LGBTQ+ community[ .]; and
(k) Individuals who are from immigrant and refugee communities.
[(9)] (10) “State workforce agencies” means state agencies that administer workforce programs.
(11) “Strategic workforce opportunity” means an opportunity to:
(a) Grow, strengthen and diversify workforce participation in a particular industry;
(b) Advance the overall economic mobility and well-being of Oregonians; and
(c) Respond to a workforce development investment  or initiative undertaken for the
purpose of achieving significant economic and community gains in Oregon.
[(10)] (12) “Workforce development” means services designed to help  individuals attain employ-
ment and progress along career  pathways and to help businesses better achieve business goals by
more easily finding skilled employees. “Workforce development” includes:
(a) Education and training services;
(b) Apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training programs registered with  the State Appren-
ticeship and Training Council;
(c) Labor market analysis;
(d) Employment and reemployment services;
(e) Employee recruitment and retention services; and
(f) Convening, coordinating, oversight  and evaluation services for business and state workforce
agencies.
[(11)] (13) “Workforce programs” means  programs that have a primary mission of helping indi-
viduals become employed, retain employment, increase wages and progress along  career pathways
and that are responsible for outcomes related to the primary mission.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 660.324 is amended to read:
660.324. (1) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board shall identify:
(a) Key industries in this state and the workforce skills needed for key industries  to grow and
thrive;
[3]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) In collaboration with workforce representatives, needs for education, training, work experi-
ence, and job preparation to ensure Oregonians access  to stable high-wage jobs and employment
advancement; [and]
(c) Opportunities for partnerships with key industry sectors to coordinate  workforce develop-
ment, economic development and education in response to industry and workforce needs[ .]; and
(d) Critical workforce  shortages and strategic workforce opportunities based on criteria
established by the board.
(2) The board shall assist the Governor in:
(a) Developing Oregon’s workforce development system;
(b) Ensuring  timely consultation and collaboration with chief elected officials, local workforce
development boards and other  workforce stakeholders, including but not limited to business and la-
bor organizations and organizations working with persons  with disabilities, persons living at or be-
low 100 percent of the federal poverty guidelines and the chronically unemployed  and
underemployed;
(c) Reviewing and approving local workforce plans;
(d) Developing, as required by the federal Act, allocation formulas  for the distribution of funds
to local workforce development areas for adult employment and training activities  and for youth
activities that are developed by the local workforce development boards;
(e) Working with local  workforce development boards to increase efficiencies and align
workforce programs and services with local needs;
(f) Recommending the duties and responsibilities of state  agencies to implement the federal Act,
to avoid  conflicts of interest and to capitalize on the experience developed by workforce partners
that are efficient and effective at meeting the requirements of the federal Act;
(g) Participating  in the development of a coordinated statewide system of activities and services
that includes both mandatory and optional partners of the one-stop delivery system,  as provided in
the federal Act;
(h) Providing  for the development, accountability and continuous improvement of comprehensive
workforce performance measures to assess the  effectiveness of the workforce development activities
in this state;
(i) Developing a statewide employment statistics system, as described in section 15(e)  of the
Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. 49L-2(e)); and
(j) Preparing an annual report and submitting it to the United States Department of Labor.
(3) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board, in partnership with the  Governor, shall
establish criteria for use by chief elected officials in appointing members to local workforce devel-
opment boards  in accordance with the requirements of section 3122 of the federal Workforce Inno-
vation and Opportunity Act. The State Workforce and Talent Development Board shall establish  the
following requirements:
(a) To transact business at a  meeting of a local workforce development board, a quorum of
members must participate. A  quorum shall consist of a majority of the members. At least 25 percent
of the members participating must be representatives of business.
(b) When appropriate and upon a request from the chief elected official of a county or the  City
of Portland, the State Workforce  and Talent Development Board shall consider the county or the
City of Portland to be a candidate for designation as a local  workforce development area. The board
shall consult with the county or the City of Portland before designating the  county or the City of
Portland as a local workforce development area. After  considering the criteria in section 3121 of the
[4]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
federal Act for designating local workforce development areas, chief elected officials  may submit a
request to the board to combine their  units of government into a local workforce development area.
The board shall make recommendations to the Governor about the designation  of local workforce
development areas. Only the Governor may  designate local workforce development areas. The Gov-
ernor must show just cause  for not designating a requested local workforce development area. A
county or the City of Portland may submit an appeal to the board, as  provided in section 3121 of
the federal Act, if the  Governor does not grant the county’s or the city’s request to designate a local
workforce development area.
(4) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board shall  provide guidance and direction to
local workforce development boards in the development of local workforce plans. The  State
Workforce and Talent Development Board shall adopt policies that:
(a) Require each  local workforce development board, in partnership with its chief elected offi-
cials and in  accordance with section 3123 of the federal Act, to develop and submit to the Governor
and the State Workforce and Talent Development  Board a strategic local workforce plan that in-
cludes, but is not limited to, performance goals; and
(b) Permit each local workforce development board, in consultation with its chief  elected offi-
cials:
(A) To determine, consistent with the requirements of the federal Act, the appropriate level of
services based on the workforce needs in the local workforce development area; and
(B) To designate or certify one-stop operators and to terminate for cause  the eligibility of such
operators.
(5) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board  may charter and enter into performance
compacts with local workforce development boards.
(6) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board shall:
(a) Function as the primary advisory committee to the Employment Department in conjunction
with the Employment Department Advisory Council established under ORS 657.695;
(b) Collaborate with  other advisory bodies also tasked with workforce development, including
but not limited to the Oregon State Rehabilitation Council, the Commission for the Blind, the  State
Apprenticeship and Training Council and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission;
(c) Work with the Oregon Business Development Commission to identify areas  of common in-
terest to efficiently align resources, recommend  common strategies and provide accountability for
reaching statewide goals; [ and]
(d) Hold state workforce agencies  and local workforce development boards accountable for
meeting performance goals and system outcomes[ .]; and
(e) Collaborate with the Oregon Business Development  Department, the Employment
Department and other partners from  training or workforce development entities in this state
to establish criteria for identifying critical workforce shortages and  strategic workforce op-
portunities.
(7) The  State Workforce and Talent Development Board shall convene, engage and coordinate
with senior executives of identified key industries in this state,  the Oregon Business Development
Commission, the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, the Department of Education,  the Bu-
reau of Labor and Industries, the STEM Investment Council, local workforce development boards,
the Employment Department, the Department of Human Services, the  Commission for the Blind, the
Youth Development Council and any other partners from training or  workforce development entities
in this state to:
[5]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Determine needs across identified key industries in  this state, including challenges and op-
portunities in developing and growing relevant talent pipelines;
(b) Ensure that the talent pipeline development infrastructure includes:
(A) A listening  process to collect workforce needs of employers from identified key industries
in this state;
(B) Curriculum alignment for high-demand occupation skill needs;
(C) Prediction and monitoring of national  trends relating to high-demand industries and occu-
pations;
(D) Occupation-aligned education and training options with a clearly articulated progression;
(E) Skills assessments; and
(F) Academic career counseling;
(c) Utilize sector partnerships to:
(A) Advise the development of career pathway programs for critical occupations in identified
key industries in this state; and
(B) Ensure the coordination of education,  economic development, business and workforce initi-
atives between key partners to develop a strong talent pipeline;
(d) Leverage and optimize existing measures and  data systems to improve systems alignment and
interagency communication; and
(e) Ensure state alignment and coordination  between industry sector partnerships and initiatives
in the local workforce development areas.
(8)(a) Every biennium, the State Workforce and Talent Development  Board shall coordinate and
collaborate  with  entities listed under subsection (7) of this section to create a single, unified state
Workforce and Talent Development Plan.
(b) The Workforce and Talent Development Plan must include:
(A) A strategy, with quantitative goals, for the statewide workforce  development system for the
State of Oregon in accordance with section 3111  of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportu-
nity Act;
(B) Quantifiable goals designed to promote Oregonians’ self-sufficiency  and that will empower
Oregonians to gain independence from public assistance and move up the socioeconomic ladder;
(C) Expectations for performance and the  priorities for delivery of services to local workforce
development boards and state workforce agencies;
(D) Industry-based information  and data from the Employment Department and other agencies
and entities listed in subsection (7) of this section related to talent needs and gaps;
(E) Analysis of data regarding the skills required for identified key industry jobs;
(F) Information regarding the status of career pathway programs  targeted at identified key in-
dustries in this state;
(G) Recommendations related to advancing talent pipeline and  career pathways development
based on the identified talent issues and trends;
(H) Recommendations regarding the alignment and consistency of data nomenclature,  collection
practices and data sharing;
(I) Utilization and,  as appropriate, expansion of existing data-sharing agreements between
agencies and partners;
(J) Identification of talent issues and trends related to identified  key industries in this state that
are in strategic alignment with state and local workforce and economic priorities;
(K) Identification and prioritization of the urgent talent gaps of identified key  industries in this
[6]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
state;
(L) A response to immediate talent needs  through the creation of additional opportunities for
Oregonians to pursue education and training in disciplines critical to the advancement of  identified
key industries in this state;
(M) Ways to strengthen efforts  to enhance student work experience and job preparedness in
high-demand and critical occupations;
(N) New means of delivering workforce training and proficiency-based  education to enhance
program efficiency, upgrading  and sharing resources and facilities and improving student outcomes
and access  to typically underrepresented populations while meeting talent needs of traded sector
and high growth industries; and
(O) Ways to increase the skills of the existing professional and  technical workforce, including
the issuance of certifications, badges and industry-based credentials.
(c) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board shall:
(A) Update the plan every biennium; and
(B) Submit a report about the plan every year to:
(i) The Governor; and
(ii) The Legislative Assembly in the manner provided by ORS 192.245.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 660.327 is amended to read:
660.327. In accordance with section 3122 of the federal Act,  each local workforce development
board shall:
(1) Consistent with section 3123 of the federal Act, in  partnership with the chief elected official
for the local area involved, develop and submit a local plan to the Governor. The local plan must:
(a) Be developed by the local workforce development board with local workforce partners;
(b) Identify critical workforce shortages  and strategic workforce opportunities in local
key industries, based on criteria established by the State Workforce and  Talent Development
Board;
[(b)] (c) Identify strategies and outcomes that the local  workforce development board will im-
plement in the local workforce development area that are  consistent with and responsive to
critical workforce shortages  and strategic workforce opportunities as identified by the local
workforce development board under  this section and the State Workforce and Talent Devel-
opment Board under ORS 660.324 ;
[(c)] (d) Make all parties to the local plan accountable for carrying  out the strategies and
achieving the outcomes identified in the local plan; and
[(d)] (e) Be submitted to and approved by the State Workforce and Talent Development Board.
(2) Consistent with section 3151(d) of the federal Act, with the agreement of the  chief elected
official, designate or certify one-stop operators as described in section  3151(d)(2)(A) of the federal
Act and may terminate for cause the eligibility of such operators.
(3) Consistent with section 3153  of the federal Act, identify eligible providers of youth activities
in the local area and award grants or contracts on a  competitive basis to those providers, based on
recommendations of a youth council.
(4) Consistent  with section 3152 of the federal Act, identify eligible providers of training services
described in section 3174(d)(4) of the federal Act.
(5) Subject to the approval of the chief elected official, develop a budget for the purpose  of
carrying out the duties of the local workforce development  board under section 3122 of the federal
Act.
[7]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) In partnership  with the chief elected official, provide oversight of local programs of youth
activities authorized under section 3164 of the federal Act, local  employment and training activities
authorized under section 3174 of the federal Act and the one-stop delivery system  in the local area.
(7) With the chief elected official and the Governor, negotiate and  reach agreement on local
performance measures as described in section 3141(c) of the federal Act.
(8) Coordinate the workforce development activities authorized under the  federal Act and car-
ried out  in the local area with economic development strategies and develop other employer linkages
with such activities.
(9) Promote the participation  of private sector employers in the statewide workforce develop-
ment system and ensure the effective  provision, through the system, of connecting, brokering and
coaching activities, through intermediaries such as the one-stop operator in the local area  or
through other organizations, to assist such employers in meeting hiring needs.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 660.380 is amended to read:
660.380. (1) The Prosperity [ 10,000] Program is established  in the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission. From funds appropriated to the commission  for the program, the commission
shall award grants to local workforce development boards to administer the program  for the
following  purposes:
(a) To provide career coaching, occupational training and job placement services;
(b) To provide wraparound supports and services that  are necessary to facilitate reengagement
in the workforce, including, but not limited to, transportation, child care and rental assistance;
(c) To provide  paid work experiences, including stipends and wages and other income supports
for individuals from priority populations; and
(d) To support targeted recruitment and engagement efforts.
(2) The goals of the Prosperity [ 10,000] Program are to:
[(a) Include at least 10,000 total individuals who participate in the program; ]
[(b)] (a) Improve the capacity and responsiveness of the public workforce system in this state
by providing assistance for workforce development program navigation, expanding  access to
community-based career counseling  and wraparound supports and services, and providing opportu-
nities to earn industry-recognized certificates, credentials and  degrees through work-based learning
experiences;
[(c)] (b) Ensure that  services and benefits available through workforce programs are provided
to individuals from priority populations;
[(d)] (c) Provide increased access for priority populations to services and  benefits available
through workforce programs;
[(e)] (d) Ensure that at least 50 percent of the individuals  who participate in the program are
women;
[(f)] (e) Ensure that at least 80 percent of the individuals who  participate successfully complete
the program;
[(g)] (f) Ensure that at least 75 percent of the individuals who participate  in the program suc-
cessfully obtain employment; and
[(h)] (g) Ensure that at  least 75 percent of the individuals who participate in the program earn
at least $17 per hour.
(3)(a) [ The Prosperity 10,000 Program shall be administered by local workforce development
boards.] In administering the  Prosperity Program,  the local workforce development boards shall:
(A) Establish criteria and standards for [distribute] distributing  resources and available
[8]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
funds to nonprofit community-based organizations, educational institutions, labor  organizations and
other workforce service providers to facilitate the provision of workforce development services and
wraparound supports to individuals who participate in the program;
(B) Coordinate with state workforce agencies and other workforce partners to  expand regional
community-based partnerships that work to support and sustain workforce development services  and
wraparound supports; [ and]
(C) Connect with  businesses and organizations in targeted industry sectors to identify training
needs and ensure that business needs relating to a skilled workforce are met[ .]; and
(D) Pursue and advance local workforce development strategies that are  consistent with
and responsive to critical workforce  shortages and strategic workforce opportunities as
identified by local workforce development boards under ORS 660.327 and the State Workforce
and Talent Development Board under ORS 660.324.
(b) In distributing funds and resources  to the entities described under paragraph (a)(A)
of this subsection, local  workforce development boards shall take into consideration funding
proposals that:
(A) Describe how the entity intends to engage  with employers in targeted industry sec-
tors to provide workforce development opportunities to individuals from  priority populations;
(B) Demonstrate the entity’s experience serving individuals from priority populations;
(C) Describe how the entity intends to collaborate  with one or more of the following to
increase accessibility for priority populations to workforce programs and opportunities:
(i) Workforce service providers, as defined in ORS 660.400;
(ii) Community-based organizations, as defined in ORS 660.390;
(iii) Kindergarten through grade 12 schools;
(iv) Community colleges;
(v) Education and training partners;
(vi) Local workforce development boards;
(vii) Economic development organizations;
(viii) Industry associations; and
(ix) Universities, as defined in ORS 660.350;
(D) Demonstrate that an entity described under subparagraph (C)  of this paragraph with
which the entity intends to  partner possesses specific qualifications, including the organiza-
tional and technical capacity necessary to carry out the purposes described under  subsection
(1) of this section; and
(E) Prioritize opportunities to leverage the use of other funding sources, including federal
funds and private sector contributions, toward workforce programs and opportunities.
[(b)] (c) An entity that collaborates with a local workforce development  board to accomplish the
workforce development activities described under this subsection shall, in accordance  with ORS
660.327, participate with local workforce development boards in developing a proposed local plan.
(4)(a) If  an entity receives funds distributed from a local workforce development board under
this section and provides paid work experience to individuals who participate in the  program es-
tablished under this section, the entity shall:
(A) Notwithstanding ORS 653.025 and subsection  [ (2)(h)] (2)(g)  of this section, pay wages to in-
dividuals participating in the program at a rate that is:
(i) Equivalent to an entry-level training wage as determined by  the entity pursuant to paragraph
(b) of this subsection; and
[9]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) In alignment with the  wage progression schedule established by the entity under subpara-
graph (B) of this paragraph;
(B) Establish  a wage progression schedule that includes the step progression requirements and
the rate  calculation formula upon which the entity shall make determinations about a participating
individual’s eligibility to increase the individual’s wage rate  from an entry-level training wage to a
wage rate that  is equivalent to the average area wage standard for an hour’s work in the same trade
or occupation in the locality where the labor is performed;
(C) Develop  a training plan for individuals participating in the program that includes, at a
minimum:
(i) The entry-level training wage that will be paid to the individual;
(ii) A statement that the individual shall  be paid according to the wage progression schedule
established by the entity, along with a description of the requirements  that the individual must meet
in order to progress to a higher wage rate under the wage progression schedule;
(iii) A statement that the entry-level training wage paid to  the individual may not be less than
the federal minimum wage rate or the applicable state  minimum wage rate, whichever is greater;
and
(iv) A statement explaining that the entry-level  training wage paid to the individual is a mini-
mum standard  and that a higher wage rate shall be paid to the individual if so required under other
applicable federal or state laws, regulations or a collective bargaining agreement; and
(D) Provide each individual participating in the program with  a copy of the training plan de-
scribed in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph on the date on  which the individual first begins par-
ticipating in the program.
(b) For purposes of paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection, the entry-level training  wage shall be a
percentage amount of the average area wage standard for an hour’s  work in the same trade or oc-
cupation in the locality  where the labor is performed, but in no event may the entry-level training
wage be less than the applicable state minimum wage rate under ORS 653.025.
(c) Each individual who performs work  for an entity described in this subsection shall be con-
sidered an employee  of the entity for purposes of state wage and hour laws and state laws prohib-
iting employment discrimination and retaliation.
(5)(a) As used in this subsection, “SNAP Employment and Training Program”  means the em-
ployment and training component of the federal  Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program under
7 U.S.C. 2015(d)(4).
(b) To the extent possible, the Department of Human Services shall:
(A) Incorporate the  Prosperity [ 10,000] Program into the statewide plan for the SNAP Employ-
ment and Training Program;
(B) Seek  federal reimbursement for 50 percent of the Prosperity [ 10,000] Program’s costs and for
other eligible activities as reported by the local workforce development boards;
(C) Refer individuals who receive supplemental nutrition assistance under ORS 411.806 to
411.845 to participate in the Prosperity [ 10,000] Program; and
(D) Distribute moneys received as reimbursement under  subparagraph (B) of this paragraph to
local workforce development boards, not later than 60 days after the  department receives an invoice
that is consistent with requirements under the SNAP Employment and Training  Program, for rein-
vestment in workforce development and  wraparound supports and services provided under the
Prosperity [ 10,000] Program.
(6) The State Workforce and  Talent Development Board, in consultation with the Committee for
[10]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Continuous Improvement, shall:
(a) Oversee the progress of the Prosperity [ 10,000] Program;
(b) Ensure that program goals are met; and
(c) Identify areas for program improvement.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 660.385 is amended to read:
660.385. [(1)(a) Not  later than 60 days following March 17, 2022, the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission shall distribute the funds specifically appropriated  to the commission under section
13, chapter 28, Oregon Laws 2022, to local workforce development boards to administer the  Prosperity
10,000 Program. ]
[(b)] (1) The Higher Education Coordinating  Commission shall distribute all moneys received
from moneys made available [ under sections 13 and 14, chapter 28, Oregon Laws 2022 ] by the Leg-
islative Assembly for the Prosperity Program  established under ORS 660.380 , to local
workforce development boards using the same formula as required under the  federal Workforce In-
novation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq.) for the allocation of funds to  local workforce
development  boards.
(2) Each local workforce development board shall compile data on the progress made  toward
carrying out the Prosperity [ 10,000] Program. The boards shall prepare and  submit a joint report
that includes data, disaggregated by race, gender and  geography, to the commission and the State
Workforce and Talent  Development Board no later than October 31 of each year, in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245.
SECTION 8.  ORS 660.400 is amended to read:
660.400. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.390.
(b) “Community college” has the meaning given that term in ORS 341.005.
(c) “Workforce service provider” includes:
(A) Nonprofit and public workforce education, training and career services providers.
(B) Governmental entities that are providers of workforce development services.
(2) There is established in the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission a program to award
grants to workforce service providers and community-based organizations that :
(a) Administer workforce programs in the health care,  manufacturing and technology industry
sectors and other key sectors that are consistent with and responsive to critical workforce
shortages and strategic  workforce opportunities as identified by the State Workforce and
Talent Development Board;  and
(b) That prioritize equitable program participation by individuals from priority populations.
(3) The commission shall , in consultation with the State  Workforce and Talent Develop-
ment Board, local workforce development boards and industry consortia described  under
ORS 660.410,  establish  criteria and standards by which a workforce service provider or a
community-based organization may  submit a proposal to receive a grant under this section. In es-
tablishing criteria and  standards, the commission shall consider federal nondiscrimination and equal
opportunity provisions of the Workforce Innovation  and Opportunity Act. The commission shall
award grants on a competitive basis, taking into consideration proposals that:
(a) Describe how the workforce service  provider or the community-based organization intends
to engage with employers in [ the] targeted industry sectors  to provide workforce development op-
portunities to individuals from priority populations.
(b) Describe how the workforce service provider or the community-based organization
[11]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
will engage with other community-based organizations and education and training partners
to provide workforce development opportunities to individuals from priority populations.
(c) Demonstrate how a proposed workforce program  complements the state Workforce
and Talent Development Plan described under ORS 660.324.
(d) Demonstrate, for  workforce programs intended to serve specific geographical areas,
how the program complements the workforce development goals of local  workforce partners
and is consistent with a local plan described in ORS 660.327.
[(b)] (e) Demonstrate the workforce service provider’s or the community-based organization’s
experience serving individuals from priority populations.
[(c) Describe how the workforce service provider or the community-based organization intends  to
collaborate with one or more of the following entities to increase accessibility for priority populations
to workforce programs and opportunities: ]
[(A) Other workforce service providers or community-based organizations; ]
[(B) Kindergarten through grade 12 schools; ]
[(C) Community colleges; ]
[(D) Education and training partners; ]
[(E) Local workforce development boards; ]
[(F) Economic development organizations; ]
[(G) Industry associations; and ]
[(H) Universities, as defined in ORS 660.350. ]
[(d)] (f) Demonstrate that a workforce partner with which a workforce service provider or a
community-based organization intends to partner possesses specific qualifications, including  the or-
ganizational and technical capacity,  necessary to carry out the purposes described under subsection
[(5)(a) to (d) ] (4)(a) to (d)  of this section.
[(e)] (g) Prioritize opportunities to  leverage the use of other funding sources, including federal
funds and private sector contributions, toward workforce programs and opportunities.
(h) Describe how  the workforce service provider or the community-based organization
intends to collaborate with one or more of the following entities to increase  accessibility for
priority populations to workforce programs and opportunities:
(A) Other workforce service providers or community-based organizations;
(B) Kindergarten through grade 12 schools;
(C) Community colleges;
(D) Education and training partners;
(E) Local workforce development boards;
(F) Economic development organizations;
(G) Industry associations; and
(H) Universities, as defined in ORS 660.350.
[(4) In awarding grants under  this section, the commission shall consult with the State Workforce
and Talent Development Board and shall incorporate  input from local workforce development boards
and industry consortia convened under ORS 660.410. ]
[(5)] (4) Except as  otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section,  grant moneys
awarded under this section shall be expended for one or more of the following purposes:
(a) To provide paid work experience, including stipends and wages;
(b) To offer tuition and fee assistance for workforce programs;
(c) To provide wraparound workforce development services;
[12]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) To develop culturally and linguistically specific career pathways for obtaining  certificates,
credentials or degrees recognized by targeted industry sectors; and
(e) To fund organizational investments, including, but not limited to:
(A) Hiring staff;
(B) Developing organizational development strategies;
(C) Purchasing equipment, technology or other training-related supplies;
(D) Covering administrative costs; and
(E) Any other activities identified  in a grant proposal as necessary to administer workforce
programs described under this section.
[(6)(a)] (5)(a) If a grant recipient expends moneys to provide  paid work experience to individuals
participating in a workforce program administered by the grant recipient, the grant recipient shall:
(A) Notwithstanding ORS 653.025,  pay wages to individuals participating in the program at a
rate that is:
(i) Equivalent to an entry-level training wage as  determined by the grant recipient pursuant to
paragraph (b) of this subsection; and
(ii) In alignment with the wage progression schedule established by  the grant recipient under
subparagraph (B) of this paragraph;
(B) Establish a wage progression schedule that includes the step progression requirements  and
the rate calculation formula upon which the grant recipient shall make determinations about  a
participating individual’s eligibility to  increase the individual’s wage rate from an entry-level train-
ing wage to a wage rate that is equivalent to the average area wage  standard for an hour’s work
in the same trade or occupation in the locality where the labor is performed;
(C) Develop  a training plan for individuals participating in the program that includes, at a
minimum:
(i) The entry-level training wage that will be paid to the individual;
(ii) A statement that the individual shall  be paid according to the wage progression schedule
established by the grant recipient  entity, along with a description of the requirements that the in-
dividual must meet in order to progress to a higher wage rate under the wage progression schedule;
(iii) A statement that the entry-level training wage  paid to the individual may not be less than
the federal minimum wage rate or the  applicable state minimum wage rate, whichever is greater;
and
(iv) A statement explaining that the entry-level training wage paid  to the individual is a mini-
mum standard  and that a higher wage rate shall be paid to the individual if so required under other
applicable federal or state laws, regulations or a collective bargaining agreement; and
(D) Provide each individual participating in the program  with a copy of the training plan de-
scribed in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph  on the date on which the individual first begins par-
ticipating in the program.
(b) For purposes of paragraph  (a)(A) of this subsection, the entry-level training wage shall be a
percentage amount of the average area wage standard  for an hour’s work in the same trade or oc-
cupation in the locality where the labor is performed, but in no event may  the entry-level training
wage be less than the applicable state minimum wage rate under ORS 653.025.
(c) An individual who performs work for  grant recipient described in this subsection shall be
considered an employee of the grant  recipient for purposes of state wage and hour laws and state
laws prohibiting employment discrimination and retaliation.
[(7)] (6) The commission shall  compile information from each recipient of a grant under this
[13]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section regarding the  status and use of grant funds to ensure funding is expended for permissible
purposes. At a minimum, the information must include, where applicable:
(a) The number of individuals who have  registered for or completed a workforce program in
health care, manufacturing or technology;
(b) The number of workforce programs developed  and administered by a workforce service pro-
vider or a community-based organization;
(c) The job placement rate for and  income earnings by individuals participating in a workforce
program described under this section;
(d) The number of individuals from  priority populations who receive services or benefits from
workforce  programs  administered by a workforce service provider or a community-based organiza-
tion; and
(e) A description of the types and amount of wraparound  workforce development services pro-
vided by a workforce service provider or a community-based organization.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the commission may, in consultation
with the  State Workforce and Talent Development Board, issue grant award moneys directly
to workforce service providers and community-based organizations where, in  the opinion of
the commission, awarding the  moneys directly will allow the workforce service provide or
community-based organization to effectively  respond to a particular strategic workforce op-
portunity identified by the board.
(8) The commission may adopt any rules necessary for  carrying out the provisions of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 660.405 is amended to read:
660.405. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.390.
(b) “Comprehensive one-stop center” has the meaning given that term in 34 C.F.R. 361.305.
(c) “Workforce benefits navigator” means an individual who:
(A) Is employed at a comprehensive  one-stop center or a community-based organization to advise
and assist individuals from priority populations in accessing workforce programs and  applying for
benefits and services that are available under the programs;
(B) Has comprehensive  knowledge and understanding of workforce programs and the benefits
and services that are available under those programs;
(C) Is aware of the cultural and linguistic differences of individuals from priority populations,
including knowledge of the lived experiences of such individuals; and
(D) Is trained in trauma-informed practices.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, in consultation with the State Workforce
and Talent Development Board, shall  [ establish and administer a program to] award grants for
[pilot] projects implemented by local workforce development  boards that partner with comprehensive
one-stop centers or community-based organizations to employ a workforce benefits  navigator to
connect individuals from priority populations to workforce programs and to increase  access for such
individuals to services and benefits made available under those workforce programs.
(3) The commission shall establish  criteria and standards by which local workforce development
boards may submit proposals to receive a grant under this section.
(4) The commission may adopt any rules necessary  for carrying out the provisions of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 660.410 is amended to read:
[14]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
660.410. (1) As used in this section, “community-based  organization” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 660.390.
(2)(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in consultation with the State Workforce
and Talent Development Board, shall establish a program to  convene statewide industry consortia
that represent the health care, manufacturing and technology  industry sectors and other key sec-
tors that are  consistent with and responsive to critical workforce shortages and strategic
workforce opportunities as identified by the State Workforce  and Talent Development Board
under ORS 660.324 . Each individual consortium established under this section shall represent a
single targeted industry sector.
(b) The purpose of the program is to:
(A) Establish strategic partnerships  to align workforce development activities that aim to in-
crease participation in workforce programs by individuals from priority populations;
(B) Develop structured  processes to address mutual goals and promote consensus in decision-
making;
(C) Identify industry-specific workforce needs in this state, including the need for high-value
credentials, to inform the  development and implementation of culturally and linguistically diverse
workforce education and training curricula;
(D) Develop targeted recruitment  strategies to increase equitable participation by individuals
from priority populations in statewide workforce programs;
(E) Promote workforce development programs and activities in  the targeted industry sectors;
and
(F) Establish wage rate standards, varied  by locality, for each skilled occupation within each
of the sectors specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) Once every two years, each industry consortium established under this section shall:
(a) Recalculate the wage rate standards described in subsection  (2)(b)(F) of this section using
relevant economic and employment data made available by the Employment Department. If  there is
no such data  available, the consortium shall recalculate the wage rate standards using relevant
economic and employment data made available  from other resources, as identified by the commission
by rule.
(b) Submit a statement to the commission summarizing the methodology used to recalculate  the
wage rate standards and the date on which the new wage rate standards shall take effect.
(4)(a) An industry consortium established under this  section shall operate under the direction
of a leadership team composed of the following representatives from the consortium’s  targeted in-
dustry sector:
(A) A representative who is a business leader.
(B) A representative of  a community-based organization that administers one or more workforce
programs.
(C) One or more representatives of workforce education and training providers.
(D) A representative of a labor organization.
(b) To the extent practicable, members of the leadership team shall include individuals who  are
representative of priority populations.
(c) The membership of an industry consortium established under  this section must include, in
addition to the members of the leadership team, the following:
(A) One or more representatives from the State Workforce and Talent Development Board.
(B) One or more representatives of the Racial Justice  Council within the Office of the Governor.
[15]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) One or more representatives of employers.
(D) One or more representatives of an industry association.
(E) One or more representatives of labor organizations.
(F) One or more representatives of local workforce development boards.
(G) One or more representatives of economic developers.
(5) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board, or any other neutral entity designated
by the board, shall serve as the  convener of or intermediary between the industry consortia mem-
bers.
(6) The commission shall, in collaboration with the State Workforce and  Talent Devel-
opment Board and industry consortia described  under this section, coordinate with relevant
state agencies and other workforce partners to:
(a) Identify and prioritize select occupations within a targeted industry for assessment;
(b) Identify education and training assets that are available  to help meet workforce
needs, including enrollment capacity and any barriers impacting enrollment capacity; and
(c) Integrate workforce supply and demand forecasting data to inform  the board’s iden-
tification of critical workforce shortages and strategic workforce opportunities.
[(6)] (7) The commission may adopt any rules  necessary to carry out the provisions of this sec-
tion.
YOUTH WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
SECTION 11.
 ORS 418.650 is amended to read:
418.650. (1) The Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon finds and declares that:
(a) It is the policy of the State of Oregon to maintain a strong economy in  order to provide its
citizens  a  stable and plentiful job market, and to conserve and protect its natural resources, scenic
beauty, historical and cultural sites and other community facilities;
(b) The development and maintenance of a  healthy economy for Oregon depends substantially
upon a strong work ethic among Oregon’s [ disadvantaged and at-risk ] youth and young adults;
(c) Many public lands and environmental resources, including parks, rangelands, forests,  wildlife
habitats, fisheries, soils and waters are and will  continue to be subject to resource production de-
mand and public uses;
(d) In order to instill and preserve  superior work attitudes among Oregon’s [ disadvantaged and
at-risk] youth and young adults and to maintain, protect and conserve the valuable resources of  the
State of Oregon, programs need to be  implemented which will assure continued economic produc-
tivity and scenic beauty, as well as the public health, safety and social benefit;
(e) To these ends, conservation work programs may prove successful and cost-effective both  in
providing jobs for [ disadvantaged and at-risk ] youth and young adults and in assisting land preser-
vation and management agencies to conserve and protect natural and urban facilities; and
(f) As a result of such employment opportunities, benefits will  redound to the state’s environ-
mental maintenance and productivity, the state’s economy and to the [ disadvantaged and  at-risk ]
youth and young adult participants who benefit from the exposure to and respect for the work ethic
in the context of safeguarding and improving the environmental resources of the state.
(2) The general purposes of ORS 418.650 to 418.663 are:
[(a) To establish a disadvantaged and at-risk youth  work program in order to perform conservation
work of public value in the most cost-effective manner; ]
[16]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) To establish an education and work program for youth and young  adults to perform
community-based work of public value in the most cost-effective manner;
(b) To utilize such a program as a means of needed assistance to  protect, conserve, rehabilitate
and improve the natural, historical , community  and cultural resources of the state; [ and]
(c) To utilize such a program to increase educational, training  and employment opportunities for
[disadvantaged and at-risk ] youth and young adults  for the purpose of  improving work skills, in-
stilling a work ethic and increasing employability[ .]; and
(d) To use an  equity lens in awarding grants by identifying and supporting populations
and with greater vulnerability, including, but not limited to, communities of color, indigenous
communities, communities with members who have limited proficiency in English and com-
munities with lower-income members.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 418.653 is amended to read:
418.653. (1) Subject to the  availability of funds, there is created within the Oregon Youth Em-
ployment Program established under ORS 660.353 an Oregon Youth Corps that :
(a) Shall provide emergency services, public conservation, rehabilitation and [ improvement pro-
grams] community service activities throughout the state for a  broad cross-section of youth
and young adults.
(b) May provide education and job training programs for youth and young adults.
(2) The  corps shall [ be headed by a program director, and shall ] be administered through the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission. The [ program director ] commission shall operate the
corps in consultation with the Oregon Youth Works Advisory Board created under ORS 660.320.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 418.657 is amended to read:
418.657. (1) Under the administration of  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,
in consultation with the Oregon Youth Works Advisory Board created under ORS 660.320  [ and the
executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, or the designee of  the executive
director], the [ program director of the ] Oregon Youth Corps shall:
(a) Establish eligibility criteria  for participants. Such criteria shall not render the program in-
eligible for federal funds. [ Participants shall be lawful permanent residents of this state. ]
(b) Establish criteria in order  to make the required determination that enrollment in the corps
was not the reason that an individual ceased attendance at a secondary school.
[(c) Assume that application of the eligibility and participation criteria results in  enrollment of at
least 75 percent disadvantaged and at-risk youth among the total number of participants. ]
(2) The [ program director,  in consultation with the executive director, or the designee of the exec-
utive director, ] commission may take the following actions, including but not limited to:
(a) Applying for and accepting grants or contributions of funds  from any public or private
source;
(b) Making agreements  or entering into contracts or other agreements with any local, state or
federal agency, or with  any private or public organization or tribal government, to utilize, pay for
or support any service, material or property of any such entity, where such agreements  are consid-
ered reasonable and necessary; and
(c) Purchasing, contracting or making payment for necessary services, awards,  equipment, ma-
terials and property where such are  needed to carry out the projects approved for and undertaken
by the corps.
(3) The commission may adopt all necessary rules to carry out the purposes  and objectives of
the program and to regulate the standards of conduct and other operating guidelines for  corps
[17]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
members and other personnel.
(4) Corps members are exempt from:
(a) State Personnel Relations Law; and
(b) ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 418.660 is amended to read:
418.660. [(1)] The programs established under ORS 418.650 to 418.663 may include, but shall not
be limited to, projects such as:
[(a)] (1) Rangeland conservation, rehabilitation and improvement;
[(b)] (2) Endangered  species and other wildlife habitat conservation, rehabilitation and im-
provement;
[(c)] (3) Urban revitalization;
[(d)] (4) Historical and cultural site preservation and maintenance;
[(e)] (5) Recreational area development, maintenance, improvement and beautification;
[(f)] (6) Road and trail maintenance and improvement;
[(g)] (7) Soil conservation work, including erosion control;
[(h)] (8) Flood, drought and storm damage assistance and relief;
[(i)] (9) Stream, lake, waterfront harbor and port improvement and pollution control;
[(j)] (10) Fish culture and habitat maintenance and improvement;
[(k)] (11) Insect, disease, rodent and other pestilence control;
[(L)] (12) Improvement of abandoned railroad land and right of way;
[(m)] (13) Land reclamation and  improvement, including strip-mined lands, public landscape work
and tree planting programs;
[(n)] (14) Energy conservation projects including assistance in  the performance of energy effi-
ciency audits, weatherization and renewable resource enhancement;
(15) Clean energy projects and other projects aimed at addressing the adverse impacts
of climate change;
[(o)] (16) Emergency assistance in times of natural or other disaster;
[(p) Recycling projects; and ]
[(q)] (17) Garden, greenhouse and farming programs[ .];
(18) Child care services;
(19) Elderly and disabled care services;
(20) Literacy education programs;
(21) Recycling and other waste reduction services;
(22) Wildlife community risk reduction projects; and
(23) Construction and trades projects.
[(2) In consultation with the Oregon Youth Works Advisory Board  created under ORS 660.320 and
the executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, or the designee of  the execu-
tive director, the program director of the Oregon  Youth Corps shall ensure that projects selected under
ORS 418.650 to 418.663 shall be consistent with all other provisions of applicable state  and federal law
relating to the management, oversight and administration of affected public lands. ]
SECTION 15.
 ORS 660.318 is amended to read:
660.318. (1) To implement and  oversee state implementation of the federal Workforce Innovation
and Opportunity Act, the Higher Education Coordinating Commission may:
(a) Receive federal youth activities funds allotted to this state by the Secretary  of Labor pur-
suant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and allocate those funds that  are
[18]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
not reserved according to  an allocation formula recommended by the State Workforce and Talent
Development Board and approved by the Governor.
(b) Receive federal adult employment and training activities funds allotted to this  state by the
Secretary of Labor pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and allocate
those funds that are not reserved according to an allocation formula recommended by  the State
Workforce and Talent Development Board and approved by the Governor.
(c) Receive federal dislocated worker funds  allotted to this state by the Secretary of Labor
pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act  and allocate those funds that are
not reserved according to  an allocation formula recommended by the State Workforce and Talent
Development Board and approved by the Governor.
(d) Establish a procedure for use by local workforce  development boards to identify eligible
providers of training services according to section 3174 of the federal Act and to  maintain the list
of providers identified as eligible by the boards in all  local workforce development areas in this
state.
(e) Receive the comprehensive strategic plan developed and implemented by  each local
workforce development board and review  the plan, with input from representatives of state and local
workforce programs, to determine if the plan  meets the requirements of section 3123 of the federal
Act and state policy.
(f) Approve the plans, after review by the State Workforce  and Talent Development Board, that
are found to meet the requirements of the federal Workforce Innovation  and Opportunity Act and
review and approve any amendments to the plans.
(g) Carry out the required and allowable activities  described in section 3174 of the federal Act
with the advice of the Education and Workforce Policy Advisor.
(h) Pursuant to  ORS 660.339, establish procedures to maintain the confidentiality of the names
and records of participants  in workforce programs for which the commission is responsible, includ-
ing circumstances under which the names and records may be disclosed.
(i) Establish a  method to set performance standards for the Secretary of Labor as required under
section 3141 of the federal Act.
(j) Perform planning functions related to programs and performance reporting under  the federal
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.
(2)(a) Subject to the availability of funds  from the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity
Act,  the  commission shall create and operate a summer youth employment program that reestab-
lishes meaningful summer work experience for  persons between the ages of 14 and 24 and that meets
the requirements for funding under the federal Act.
(b) Programs funded under this subsection:
(A) Must include representatives of the business community in  the planning, implementation and
evaluation of the program.
(B) May provide for private and public sector employment opportunities.
(C) Shall be managed by local workforce development boards in a  manner that coordinates re-
gional state-sponsored youth work experience programs.
(c) Local workforce development  boards responsible for managing programs created under this
subsection shall provide training for business, labor and education leaders in use  of best practices
that ensure positive summer work experiences for participants.
(3) The commission shall collaborate with  the State Workforce and Talent Development Board
and local workforce development boards to collect  data on summer work experience programs that
[19]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
identify successful summer  work experiences and allow for the identification and dissemination of
promising practices.
(4) The commission, in consultation with the Oregon Youth  Works Advisory Board cre-
ated under ORS 660.320, shall ensure that  the following are consistent with all other pro-
visions of applicable state and federal  law relating to the management, oversight and
administration of affected public lands:
(a) Projects selected under ORS 418.650 to 418.663.
(b) Youth workforce development programs for  which the commission is responsible, in-
cluding but not limited to:
(A) Grant programs established under ORS 660.349;
(B) The Oregon Youth Employment Program created under ORS 660.353; and
(C) The Oregon Conservation Corps Program established under ORS 476.694.
[(4)] (5) The commission, in consultation with the [ State Workforce and Talent  Development
Board] Oregon Youth Works Advisory Board created  under ORS 660.320 , may adopt rules pur-
suant to ORS chapter 183 to implement this section.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 418.663 is amended to read:
418.663. (1) [ Projects selected under ORS 418.650 to 418.663 shall: ] The  following projects and
programs must meet the requirements under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Projects selected under ORS 418.650 to 418.663.
(b) Youth workforce development programs for which the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission is responsible, including but not limited to:
(A) Grant programs established under ORS 660.349;
(B) The Oregon Youth Employment Program created under ORS 660.353; and
(C) The Oregon Conservation Corps Program established under ORS 476.694.
(2) A project or program described in subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Result in an increase in employment opportunities for [ disadvantaged and at-risk ] youth and
young adults over those opportunities which would otherwise be available;
(b) Not result in the displacement of currently employed workers, including  partial displacement
such as reduction in the hours of nonovertime work or wages or employment benefits;
(c) Not impair existing contracts for services or result in the substitution of  state for other
funds in connection with work that would otherwise be performed;
(d) Not substitute jobs assisted under [ ORS 418.650 to 418.663 ] the project or  program  for ex-
isting federally assisted jobs;
(e) Not employ any person when any other person is on layoff by an employer from the  same
or any substantially equivalent job in the same area; and
(f) Not be used to employ any person to fill a job opening created by the act of an employer  in
laying off or terminating employment of any regular  employee, otherwise reducing the regular
workforce not supported under [ ORS 418.650 to 418.663 ] the project or program , in anticipation
of filling  the vacancy so created by hiring a person to be supported under [ ORS 418.650 to 418.663 ]
the project or program .
[(2)] (3) Where a labor organization represents employees who  are engaged in similar work or
a workers’ cooperative is engaged  in work in the same area to that proposed to be performed under
the project or  program for which an application is being developed, the organization  or cooperative
shall be notified and shall be afforded a reasonable period of  time prior to the submission of the
application in which to make comments to the applicant and to the [ program director of  the Oregon
[20]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Youth Corps ] commission .
SECTION 17.
 ORS 476.694 is amended to read:
476.694. (1) The Oregon Conservation Corps Program is established for the purposes of:
(a) Reducing the risk wildfire poses to communities and critical infrastructure.
(b) Helping to create fire-adapted communities.
(c) Engaging youth and young adults in workforce training.
(2) Youth and young adults between  16 years of age and 26 years of age [ who have been qualified
by a youth development organization ] may participate in projects undertaken by the corps.
(3) Notwithstanding any contrary provision  of law, participants in projects undertaken by the
corps:
(a) Are not employees of the corps.
(b) Are exempt from prevailing wage laws.
(c) Must  receive compensation for their participation of at least minimum wage or an allowance
or stipend that, when combined with other sources of payment  the participant is eligible to receive,
including academic credit or an AmeriCorps education award, is equivalent to  the value of minimum
wage.
(4) The Oregon Youth Works Advisory Board created under ORS 660.320 may, in collab-
oration with a qualified nonprofit foundation, actively seek  and source private donations to
support the Oregon Conservation Corps Program.
(5) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may direct the expenditure of moneys
from the Oregon Conservation Corps Fund established under ORS 476.698  for implementation
of a grant process that:
(a) Provides funding to support the work  conducted by the Oregon Conservation Corps
Program.
(b) Defines and uses an equity lens in awarding grants by identifying  and supporting
populations with greater vulnerability, including communities of color, indigenous communi-
ties, communities with  members who have limited proficiency in English and communities
with lower-income members.
(c) Awards grants to eligible organizations.
(d) Ensures that grant awards support activities described in this section.
(e) Establishes guidelines for  prioritizing grant-supported projects to reduce community
fire risks,  promote youth and young adult workforce development and educational experi-
ences and reduce hazardous fuels.
(6) The commission shall consult with the State Forestry Department and the  Depart-
ment of the State Fire  Marshal to ensure that the grant process awards funds to proposals
that:
(a) Protect  at-risk communities and infrastructure within the wildland-urban interface,
as described in ORS 477.503.
(b) Meet standards for fuel treatment established by the State Forestry Department  and
the Department of the State Fire Marshal.
(7) The commission shall biennially submit a report, on  the timeline described in ORS
293.640, to an appropriate  committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly, as
described in ORS 192.245, and to the State Wildfire Programs Director and Wildfire Programs
Advisory Council, regarding the expenditure of moneys deposited in the  Oregon Conservation
Corps Fund.
[21]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(8) As used in this section, “eligible organization”  includes Oregon-based nonprofit youth
development organizations, federally recognized Indian tribes  in this state, nonprofit associ-
ations engaged in workforce development and public  entities that provide programs of job
training, skill development and forest-related or rangeland-related career path training.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 660.320 is amended to read:
660.320. (1) There is created in  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission the Oregon
Youth Works Advisory Board. The purpose of the advisory board is  to provide advice on and over-
sight of the implementation and alignment  of youth workforce development programs for which the
commission is responsible, including but not limited to:
(a) The Oregon Youth Corps created under ORS 418.653;
(b) The Oregon Conservation Corps Program established under ORS 476.694; and
(c) The Oregon Youth Employment Program created under ORS 660.353.
(2) The Governor, in consultation with the commission, shall determine the  number of members
on the advisory board.  In determining the number of members on the advisory board, the Governor
shall ensure that membership consists of at least seven but not more than 12 members.
(3) The Governor shall appoint the members of the advisory board. The members must be resi-
dents of this state who reflect the geographic, racial, ethnic and gender diversity of this  state and
who have necessary  experience that will enable the advisory board to meaningfully advise the
commission on topics including, but not limited to:
(a) Career-connected learning that  provides learners with career awareness, exploration, prepa-
ration and training in connection with professional and industry-based expectations;
(b) Development of career pathways;
(c) Youth education programs;
(d) Workforce development programs;
(e) Rural workforce needs; and
(f) Workforce issues affecting underrepresented communities.
(4) The advisory board must include representation from:
(a) The forestry or wildfire sector;
(b) The natural resources sector;
(c) Workforce sectors that are experiencing workforce demands;
(d) Communities in which the wildland-urban interface faces a high risk of wildfire exposure;
(e) Underrepresented  communities, including communities of color, rural communities and com-
munities that have faced generational poverty or other communities that have  been historically
underrepresented in youth employment as determined by the commission by rule;
(f) Tribal communities; and
(g) Local workforce development boards.
(5)(a) Except as provided in paragraph  (b) of this subsection, to accomplish staggered
expiration dates of the  terms to be filled,  members of the advisory board serve for a term of  ei-
ther three or  four years at the pleasure of the Governor. To the  extent practicable, the Gover-
nor shall specify that one-half of the membership appointments  must be fixed at a term of
three years and  all other remaining position appointments must be fixed at a term of four
years.
(b) Upon the expiration of a term, the Governor shall appoint a successor  to assume the
membership position. The term of the successor’s appointment shall be four years.
(6) Members may not receive compensation for service on the  advisory board, but, subject to
[22]
HB 3029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
any applicable laws regulating travel and  other expenses of state officers and employees, may be
reimbursed for actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in  the performance of offi-
cial duties, as provided in ORS 292.495, with moneys available to the advisory board for  the purpose
of reimbursing members.
(7) The commission shall provide the advisory board with necessary staff support.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 418.658 and 476.696 are repealed.
SECTION 20.  The amendments to ORS 660.320 by section 18 of this 2025 Act apply to ad-
visory board appointments made on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 21.  The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[23]