Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on the Prioritized List of Health Services is established.
(2) The task force consists of 24 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate  shall appoint two members who are not members of the
same political party from among members of the Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint  two members who are not
members of the same political party from among members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall  appoint 20 members who reflect the geographic diversity of this
state, as follows:
(A) One representative of the Oregon Health Authority;
(B) One representative of the Department of Human Services;
(C) One health care advisor to the Governor;
(D) Two representatives of the disability community;
(E) One representative of the nine federally recognized Indian tribes in this state;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2567
HB 2212
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(F) One representative of a dental care organization;
(G) One representative of a statewide association representing behavioral  health provid-
ers;
(H) Five representatives of  coordinated care organizations, as defined in ORS 414.025,
including at least one from a rural service area and one from an urban service area;
(I) Two representatives with expertise in actuarial data;
(J) Two representatives with expertise in medical management;
(K) One representative with expertise in claims adjudication; and
(L) Two community members who currently receive medical assistance, as defined  in
ORS 414.025.
(3) The task force shall study the potential impacts of eliminating the  prioritized list of
health services compiled by the Health Evidence Review Commission under  ORS 414.690, in-
cluding:
(a) The  transition to determining coverage of health services in the state’s medical as-
sistance program without  use of the prioritized list of health services, including how “med-
ical necessity” will be defined;
(b) The future role of the Health Evidence  Review Commission, including with regard to
state plan amendments;
(c) Impacts to the use of sustainability in the  Oregon Integrated and Coordinated Health
Care Delivery System established in ORS 414.570; and
(d) Impacts to  the claims adjudication process in the state’s medical assistance program.
(4) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at least quarterly until June 30, 2027, and at any  other
times and places specified by the call of the chairperson or of a majority of  the voting
members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for addressing the impacts  of eliminating the use of the pri-
oritized list of health services  in the state’s medical assistance program, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health no later than March 15, 2026.
(11)(a) The Legislative Policy and Research Director, in collaboration with  the Oregon
Health Authority, shall provide staff support to the task force.
(b) The director may  contract with third parties to study the potential impacts described
in subsection (3) of this section.
(12) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
[2]
HB 2212
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Legislative Policy and Research Committee, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2025, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $500,000, which may be expended for the pur-
pose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[3]