Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Justice shall review every state  statute and administra-
tive rule  that was in effect at any time from January 1, 2018, until the effective date of this
2025 Act, and determine whether each statute or rule is likely to  be found unconstitutional
under the reasoning and  interpretation of the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States
Constitution set forth in  Students for Fair Admissions, Inc. v. President and Fellows of
Harvard College, 600 U.S. 181, 143 S. Ct. 2141,  216 L.Ed.2d 857 (2023). The department shall
report on its findings, including a list of statutes and rules likely to  be found unconstitu-
tional, to a committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly relating to the ju-
diciary no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 814