Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 91.010 to 91.110.
SECTION 2. (1) A landlord may not, as  a condition of entering into a tenancy, or as a
term of the tenancy, discriminate  against a tenant based on a tenant’s viewpoint or tenant’s
expression of that viewpoint privately or within the leased premises.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Viewpoint” includes any religious, political or ideological belief.
(b) “Viewpoint” does not include any expression of:
(A) Explicit support for violent, criminal or antisocial behavior; or
(B) Animus toward other persons, relating to their  race, color, religion, gender identity,
sexual orientation, disability or national origin.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2545