Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  State Department of Energy shall apply to the Environmental Res-
toration Council, established under ORS 541.861,  for grant moneys from the State Agency
Program Fund, established  under ORS 541.867, and may also apply for moneys from other
sources, for the purpose of covering:
(a) The department’s costs and expenses in  carrying out subsection (2) of this section;
and
(b) The organizational, startup and administrative costs of the founding board, convened
under subsection (2) of this section, in carrying out subsection (3) of this section.
(2) If the department secures grant moneys in a sufficient  amount, but not less than $2
million, the department shall carry out pre-startup activities to include recruiting  and con-
vening a  founding board. The founding board must consist of at least seven members as fol-
lows:
(a) The Director of the State Department of Energy;
(b) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department or  the director’s
designee;
(c) The Director of the  Housing and Community Services Department or the director’s
designee; and
(d) Four members who:
(A) Represent nongovernmental organizations;
(B) Have expertise in one or more of the following subjects:
(i) Financing at a local government, community development  financial institution, credit
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 226
SB 1526
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
union, community bank or similar institution;
(ii) Energy utilities;
(iii) Clean energy projects, energy efficiency, zero-emissions transportation and  technol-
ogies;
(iv) State infrastructure, community development and  resilience and extreme weather
events;
(v) Investment fund management; or
(vi) Clean energy and resilience programs and the deployment of clean energy technolo-
gies; and
(C) Have a diverse range of perspectives, lived experiences and expertise that represent:
(i) The different geographical regions of this state;
(ii) Lower income, tribal, rural or underserved communities;
(iii) Commercial enterprises in the clean energy or resiliency sector; or
(iv) Labor and workforce development.
(3) The founding board, convened under subsection (2) of  this section, shall form a
nonprofit entity for  the purpose of financing clean energy and resilience projects that facili-
tate:
(a) The generation, transmission, production or storage of clean energy or clean fuels;
(b) The conservation or efficient use of energy or fuels;
(c) A reduction in greenhouse gas emissions; or
(d) Improvements  in the resilience of infrastructure, natural and working lands, buildings
or communities, with priority given to lower  income, tribal, rural or underserved communi-
ties.
(4) The nonprofit entity formed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section must:
(a) Have a charter that requires a supermajority of the entity’s board to change  or
amend.
(b) Be able to receive capital in any form from public and private sources.
(c) Report annually to the appropriate committees or interim committees of the  Legis-
lative Assembly on the entity’s activities, results and financial status.
(5) The Oregon Business Development Department shall work with the  nonprofit entity
formed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section to explore potential  agreements to provide
capitalization or financing to the  nonprofit entity, including through the use of the
department’s bonding authority.
(6) The State Department of Energy shall work with the nonprofit entity formed pursu-
ant to subsection (3) of this section to explore  potential contractual relationships and areas
of collaboration.
(7) All state agencies shall assist the State Department of Energy and founding board  in
the performance of the  department’s and the founding board’s duties and functions under
this section.
[2]