Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
POWERED MICROMOBILITY DEVICES AND MOTOR ASSISTED SCOOTERS
SECTION 1.
Sections 2, 3 and 4  of this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of the
Oregon Vehicle Code.
SECTION 2. Definition of “powered  micromobility device.”  (1) “Powered micromobility
device” means a vehicle that:
(a) Is designed to transport a person;
(b) Has a propulsion system;
(c) Has a maximum speed of 30 miles per hour; and
(d) Has an unloaded weight of less than 100 pounds.
(2) A “powered micromobility device” does not include:
(a) Devices exclusively powered by human power; or
(b) The following devices or vehicles:
(A) Electric assisted bicycles;
(B) Electric personal assistive mobility devices;
(C) Motor assisted scooters; or
(D) Motorized wheelchairs.
SECTION 3.
Application of vehicle laws to powered micromobility devices. (1) A powered
micromobility device is not a motor vehicle for purposes of the Oregon Vehicle Code,  except
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 713
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
when specifically provided by statute.
(2) A person operating a powered micromobility device  on a bicycle lane, bicycle path or
any part of a highway is subject to any provisions applicable to and has  the same rights and
duties as the driver of a bicycle when operating on a  bicycle lane, bicycle path or any part
of a highway, except when otherwise specifically provided by statute.
(3) Subject to the  provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, for purposes of the
vehicle code:
(a) A powered micromobility device is a vehicle; and
(b) When the term “vehicle” is used the  term shall be deemed to be applicable to powered
micromobility devices, except those provisions that by their very  nature can have no appli-
cation to the devices.
(4) The provisions of the vehicle code relating to  the operation of a powered micromo-
bility device do not relieve an operator or motorist from the duty to exercise due care.
SECTION 4.
Local government and state agency regulation of  the operation of powered
micromobility devices. Local governments and  state agencies having jurisdiction over public
highways, sidewalks, alleys, bridges, trails, recreational roads and other ways of public  pas-
sage may regulate by ordinance or rule and by traffic control device  the time, place and
manner of the operation of powered micromobility devices,  including prohibiting their use
entirely.
SECTION 5.  ORS 803.030 is amended to read:
803.030. This section establishes exemptions from  the requirements under ORS 803.025 to obtain
title issued by this state. The exemptions  are subject to ORS 803.040. The exemptions are in addition
to any exemptions under ORS 801.026. Vehicles exempted by this section from the requirements to
be titled by this state are not prohibited from being titled by this state if titling is permitted under
ORS 803.035. The exemptions are partial or complete as provided in the following:
(1) Title from this state is not required for a vehicle  unless the vehicle is operated on a highway
in this state.
(2) Title from this state is not required unless a vehicle is operated under a registration number
of this state.
(3) Snowmobiles and Class I, Class III and Class IV all-terrain vehicles are  not subject to the
requirements under ORS 803.025. The requirements and procedures  for titling snowmobiles are as
provided under ORS 821.060 and 821.070.
(4) Road rollers, farm tractors and traction engines are exempt from the requirements for title.
(5) Trolleys are exempt from the requirements for title.
(6) Bicycles are exempt from the requirements for title.
(7) United States Government owned  and operated motor vehicles and trailers are exempt from
the requirements for title.
(8) Implements of husbandry, well  drilling machinery, emergency fire apparatus providing public
fire protection and wheelchairs are exempt from the requirements for title.
(9) Except as  provided in subsection (23) of this section, fixed load vehicles are exempt from the
requirements for title while operated within the immediate construction project,  as described in the
governmental  agency  contract, in the construction or reconstruction of state or county roads,
highways or city streets.
(10) Motor vehicles designed to operate  at a loaded weight over 8,000 pounds, trailers and
equipment are exempt from requirements for title while:
[2]
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Owned, leased, contracted or requisitioned by the State Forester, State Board of  Forestry,
their contractors under ORS chapter 477, or the federal government; and
(b) Being used for the purposes of  forest protection and fire suppression under ORS chapter 477
or a similar federal statute, including movement of the vehicles to and from the work area.
(11) Farm trailers are exempt  from requirements for title when the operation or movement of
the vehicle upon the highways is incidental to its use in an agricultural operation.
(12) Golf carts operated under an ordinance adopted under ORS  810.070 are exempt from re-
quirements for title.
(13) Golf carts or similar vehicles are exempt from requirements for title when:
(a) They have not less than three wheels in contact with the ground;
(b) They have an unloaded weight of less than 1,300 pounds;
(c) They are designed to be and are operated at not more than 15 miles per hour; and
(d) They are operated by persons with disabilities.
(14) The  nonresident owners of vehicles currently registered and titled in any other country,
state or territory  may operate such vehicles over the highways of this state without complying with
the titling requirements under ORS 803.025. All of the following apply to this subsection:
(a) This subsection only provides  an exemption so long as the owner satisfactorily shows that
the owner is not a resident of this state or has been a resident of this state for  less than 30 days.
For the purpose of this paragraph, a person is a  resident of this state if the person meets the resi-
dency requirements described in ORS 803.200.
(b) The exemption under this subsection applies to vehicles  granted exemptions under ORS
802.500, 802.520 or 826.005, unless otherwise provided under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a vehicle operated over the  highways of this
state for compensation or profit must comply with the titling requirements  under ORS 803.025 in the
same manner as required  of nontitled vehicles. The following vehicles are not subject to this para-
graph:
(A) Vehicles  operated under reciprocal registration exemptions established under ORS 802.500
or 826.005.
(B) Vehicles operated under an exemption established under ORS 802.520.
(C) Vehicles that  are proportionally registered under an agreement established under ORS
826.007, and according to the procedures established under ORS 826.009 or 826.011.
(D) Any  vehicle if duly registered and titled under the laws of the state or country of which the
owner is a bona fide resident to the extent that in the foreign country, state, territory or  federal
district where the owner  resides like exemptions and privileges are granted vehicles duly registered
and titled under the laws of this state and owned by residents of this state.
(d) If no exemptions from titling requirements are  in effect under ORS 802.500, 802.520, 826.005
or 826.007 with respect to another  jurisdiction, any vehicle properly registered and titled in such
other jurisdiction and for which evidence of compliance is  supplied shall receive, when operated in
this state, the same exemptions, benefits  and privileges granted by such other jurisdictions to vehi-
cles properly registered and titled in  this state. Reciprocity extended under this paragraph shall
apply to commercial vehicles only when engaged exclusively in interstate commerce.
(e) Any vehicle operated under  dealer registration plates issued by another state, country,
province, territory or the District of Columbia is subject to this subsection.
(15) Vehicle dealers issued certificates under ORS 822.020 may use and  operate untitled vehicles
as provided under ORS 822.040.
[3]
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(16) Towing businesses issued certificates  under ORS 822.205 may tow untitled vehicles as pro-
vided under ORS 822.210.
(17) Vehicle transporters issued certificates under ORS 822.310 may transport  untitled vehicles
as provided in ORS 822.310.
(18) Untitled vehicles may be operated under trip permits described under ORS 803.600 or  under
permits described under ORS 803.610 to 803.625.
(19) Vehicles that are registered by the United States  Department of State and that are owned
or operated by foreign  nationals with diplomatic immunity are exempt from the requirements for
title.
(20)(a) Vehicles that are registered under the proportional registration  provisions of ORS chap-
ter 826 and are titled in a jurisdiction  other than Oregon are exempt from the requirements for title.
(b) A trailer that is registered under  the proportional registration provisions of ORS chapter 826
and titled in a jurisdiction other than Oregon  shall remain exempt from the requirements for title
in Oregon if the trailer is registered when the other jurisdiction removes its exception to propor-
tional registration requirements for the trailer.
(21) Converter dollies and tow dollies are exempt from the requirements for title.
(22) Electric personal assistive mobility devices are exempt from the requirements for title.
(23) Road machinery that is operated at the  direction of a road authority is exempt from the
requirements for title. The exemption under this subsection also applies when  the operation of road
machinery upon a highway or an alley is incidental to its use in a highway maintenance operation.
(24) Special mobile equipment is exempt from the requirements for title.
(25) Powered micromobility devices are exempt from the requirements for title.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 803.305 is amended to read:
803.305. This section establishes  exemptions from the requirements under ORS 803.300. The ex-
emptions under this  section are in addition to any exemptions under ORS 801.026. Vehicles exempted
by this section from the requirements to be registered by this  state are not prohibited from being
registered by this state if registration is permitted under  ORS 803.310. The following are exempt,
either partially or completely as described, from the registration requirements under ORS 803.300:
(1) Road rollers, farm tractors, trolleys and traction engines are exempt from registration.
(2) Bicycles are exempt from registration.
(3) A vehicle is exempt from registration if it has registration issued for the vehicle by the
Armed Forces of the United States where the registration is issued in a foreign country  to a vehicle
owned by a member of the Armed Forces. The exemption granted by this subsection applies only for
a period of 45 days from the time the vehicle is returned to the United States.
(4) A vehicle is exempt from registration if it is not operated on the highways of this state.
(5) A trailer is exempt from registration if  it is equipped with pneumatic tires made of elastic
material and is not operated in this state  with a loaded weight of more than 1,800 pounds. A trailer
for hire, travel trailer or camper is not exempt by this subsection.
(6) Vehicles owned and operated by the United States  Government are exempt from registration.
(7) Snowmobiles are subject to the requirements for registration provided under  ORS 821.080 to
821.110.
(8) Implements of husbandry, well  drilling machinery, emergency fire apparatus providing public
fire protection and wheelchairs are exempt from registration.
(9) Road graders, farm tractors and farm trailers on highways are exempt from registration when
the operation of the vehicle upon the highway is incidental to its use in an agricultural operation.
[4]
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(10) Except as provided in subsection (26) of this section, fixed load vehicles are exempt  from
registration while the vehicles are operated:
(a) In the construction or reconstruction of state or county  roads, highways or city streets; and
(b) Within the immediate construction projects, as  described in the governmental agency con-
tract under which the work is being performed.
(11) Motor vehicles designed to operate  at a loaded weight over 8,000 pounds, trailers and
equipment are exempt from registration while being used for the purposes of forest  protection and
fire suppression under ORS chapter 477 or a  similar federal statute. The exemption under this sub-
section applies to the vehicles or equipment described while being moved  to or from the work area.
The exemption under this  subsection only applies to vehicles or equipment owned, leased, contracted
for or  requisitioned by the State Forester or State Board of Forestry, a contractor of the State
Forester or State Board of Forestry under ORS chapter 477 or the United States Government.
(12) Vehicles being used for the purposes of forest protection and fire  suppression are exempt
if the vehicles are necessary in order to comply with ORS 477.615 or 477.650 or a similar  federal
statute. The exemption under this subsection also applies to the vehicles  described being moved to
or from the work area.
(13) Golf cart exemptions from registration are as provided in ORS 820.210.
(14) Vehicles currently registered and titled in any other country, state or territory are  not re-
quired to be registered by this state. All of the following apply to this subsection:
(a) This subsection only provides an exemption as long as the owner  of the vehicle satisfactorily
shows that the owner is not a resident of this state or has been a resident of this state  for less than
30 days. For the purpose of this paragraph, a person is a resident of  this state if the person meets
the residency requirements described in ORS 803.200.
(b) The exemption under this  subsection applies to vehicles granted exemptions under ORS
802.500, 802.520 or 826.005 unless otherwise provided for under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a vehicle operated over the  highways of this
state for compensation or profit must comply with the registration requirements under  ORS 803.300
in the same manner as  vehicles owned by persons in this state. The following vehicles are not sub-
ject to this paragraph:
(A) Vehicles operated under reciprocal registration exemptions established under ORS  802.500
or 826.005.
(B) Vehicles operated under an exemption established under ORS 802.520.
(C) Vehicles that are proportionally registered under an agreement established  under ORS
826.007 and according to the procedures established under ORS 826.009 and 826.011.
(D) Any  vehicle if duly registered and titled under the laws of the state or country of which the
owner is  a bona fide resident to the extent that in the foreign country, state, territory or federal
district where the owner  resides like exemptions and privileges are granted vehicles duly registered
and titled under the laws of this state and owned by residents of this state.
(d) If  no exemption from registration requirements is in effect under ORS 802.500, 802.520,
826.005 or 826.007 with respect to another jurisdiction, any vehicle  properly registered and titled in
such other jurisdiction and for which evidence  of compliance is supplied shall receive, when oper-
ated in this state, the same exemptions, benefits and privileges granted by such other  jurisdictions
to vehicles properly registered and titled in this state. Reciprocity extended under this paragraph
shall apply to commercial vehicles only when engaged exclusively in interstate commerce.
(e) Any vehicle operated under  dealer registration plates issued by another state, country,
[5]
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
province, territory or the District of Columbia is subject to this subsection.
(15) Vehicles operated or used by vehicle dealers may be operated or  used without registration
as provided under ORS 822.040.
(16) Vehicles towed by towing businesses may be  towed without registration as provided under
ORS 822.210.
(17) Vehicles without registration  may be transported by vehicle transporters as provided under
ORS 822.310.
(18) Vehicles that are not registered may be operated under trip permits  described under ORS
803.600 or under permits described under ORS 803.610 to 803.625.
(19) If trailers that are part of a fleet of trailers for hire  are properly registered in this state
under an agreement entered into pursuant to ORS 802.500,  all trailers that are identified as being
a part of the same fleet and that are currently  registered in any state, territory, province, country
or the District of Columbia shall be  permitted to operate in this state in both interstate and intra-
state commerce without being registered by this state.
(20) Vehicles that are registered by the United  States Department of State and that are owned
or operated by foreign nationals with diplomatic immunity are exempt from registration.
(21) Tow dollies and converter dollies are exempt from registration.
(22) Class I, Class III and Class IV all-terrain vehicles are exempt from registration.
(23) Motor assisted scooters are exempt from registration.
(24) Electric personal assistive mobility devices are exempt from registration.
(25) A  racing activity vehicle that is being operated for the purposes of a test drive within a
30-mile radius of the location where the vehicle is manufactured is exempt from registration.
(26) Road machinery that is operated at the direction of a  road authority is exempt from regis-
tration. The exemption under this subsection also applies when the operation  of road machinery
upon a highway or an alley is incidental to its use in a highway maintenance operation.
(27) Powered micromobility devices are exempt from registration.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 806.020 is amended to read:
806.020. This section provides exemptions from the necessity for  compliance with or proof of
compliance with financial responsibility requirements in accident reports under ORS 811.725,  when
applying for vehicle  registration under ORS 803.370 or 803.460 and for operating a vehicle under
ORS 806.010. The owner or operator of a vehicle is exempt, as provided by this section, from finan-
cial responsibility  requirements if the vehicle involved in the accident, sought to be registered or
operated is any of the following:
(1) An antique vehicle issued permanent registration under ORS 805.010.
(2) A farm trailer.
(3) A farm tractor.
(4) An implement of husbandry.
(5) A vehicle of special interest that is maintained as a collector’s item and  used for exhibitions,
parades, club activities and similar uses, but not  used primarily for the transportation of persons
or property.
(6) A snowmobile or a Class I, Class III or Class IV all-terrain vehicle, unless the  vehicle is
operating on an all-terrain vehicle highway access route  that is designated by the Oregon Trans-
portation Commission as open to all-terrain vehicles.
(7) Any motor vehicle  not operated on any highway or premises open to the public in this state.
(8) A motor assisted scooter.
[6]
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9) An electric personal assistive mobility device.
(10) A powered micromobility device.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 807.020, as amended by section 3, chapter 12, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
807.020. A person who is  granted a driving privilege by this section may exercise the driving
privilege described without violation of the requirements under ORS 807.010. A grant  of driving
privileges to operate a motor vehicle under this section is subject to suspension  and revocation the
same as other driving privileges granted under the vehicle code. This section is in addition  to any
exemptions from the vehicle  code under ORS 801.026. The following persons are granted the de-
scribed driving privileges:
(1) A person who is not a resident of this  state or who has been a resident of this state for less
than 30 days may operate a motor vehicle without an Oregon license or driver permit  if the person
holds a current out-of-state license issued to the person. For the purpose of this subsection, a  person
is a resident  of this state if the person meets the residency requirements described in ORS 807.062.
To qualify under this subsection, the person  must have the out-of-state license or driver permit in
the person’s possession. A person is not granted driving privileges under this subsection:
(a) If the person  is under the minimum age required to be eligible for driving privileges under
ORS 807.060;
(b) During a period of suspension or revocation by this state or any other jurisdiction of  driving
privileges or of the right to apply for  a license or driver permit issued by this state or any other
jurisdiction; or
(c) That exceed the driving privileges granted  to the person by the out-of-state license or driver
permit.
(2) A person who is a member  of the Armed Forces of the United States or a member of the
commissioned corps of the National  Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration may operate a motor
vehicle without an Oregon license or  driver permit if the person is operating a motor vehicle in the
course of the person’s duties in the Armed Forces or the National  Oceanic and Atmospheric Ad-
ministration.
(3) A person without a license or driver permit may operate a  road roller or road machinery
that is not required to be registered under the laws of this state.
(4) A person without a license or  driver permit may temporarily operate, draw, move or propel
a farm tractor or implement of husbandry.
(5) A person without a license or driver permit may operate a motor  vehicle to demonstrate
driving ability during the course of  an examination administered under ORS 807.070 for the purpose
of qualifying for a license or driver permit. This subsection only  applies when an authorized exam-
iner is in a seat beside the driver of the motor vehicle.
(6) Driving privileges for snowmobiles are exclusively as provided in ORS 821.150.
(7) Driving privileges for Class  I all-terrain vehicles are exclusively as provided in ORS 821.170,
unless a person is operating a Class I all-terrain vehicle on an all-terrain vehicle  highway access
route that is designated by the Oregon Transportation Commission as open to all-terrain vehicles.
(8) Driving privileges for Class III all-terrain vehicles are exclusively as provided in ORS
821.172, unless a person is  operating a Class III all-terrain vehicle on an all-terrain vehicle highway
access route that is designated by the commission as open to all-terrain vehicles.
(9) Driving privileges for Class IV all-terrain vehicles are exclusively as provided in ORS
821.176, unless a person is  operating a Class IV all-terrain vehicle on an all-terrain vehicle highway
[7]
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
access route that is designated by the commission as open to all-terrain vehicles.
(10) A person without a license or driver permit may operate a golf cart in  accordance with an
ordinance adopted under ORS 810.070.
(11) The spouse of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States on active duty or the
spouse of a member of the commissioned corps of the National  Oceanic and Atmospheric Adminis-
tration who  is accompanying the member on assignment in this state may operate a motor vehicle
if the spouse has a current out-of-state  license or driver permit issued to the spouse by another state
in the spouse’s possession.
(12) A person who is a member of the Armed Forces of  the United States on active duty or a
member of the commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and  Atmospheric Administration may
operate a motor vehicle if the person  has a current out-of-state license or driver permit in the
person’s possession that is issued to the  person by the person’s state of domicile or by the Armed
Forces of the United States in a foreign country. Driving privileges described  under this subsection
that are granted by the Armed Forces  apply only for a period of 45 days from the time the person
returns to the United States.
(13) A person who does not  hold a motorcycle endorsement may operate a motorcycle if the
person is:
(a) Within an enclosed cab;
(b) Operating a vehicle designed to travel  with three wheels in contact with the ground at
speeds of less than 15 miles per hour; or
(c) Operating an autocycle.
(14) Except  as provided in subsection (15) of this section, a person may operate a bicycle without
any grant of driving privileges.
(15) A person may operate the following without any grant of driving  privileges if the person is
[16 years of age or older ] operating:
(a) A Class 1 electric assisted bicycle and is 12 years of age or older ;
(b) A Class 2 electric assisted bicycle and is 12 years of age or older ; or
(c) A Class 3 electric assisted bicycle and is 16 years of age or older .
(16) A person may operate a motor assisted scooter without [ a driver license or driver  permit ]
any grant of driving privileges  if the person is [ 16] 12 years of age or older.
(17) A person who is not a resident of this state or who has been  a resident of this state for less
than 30 days may operate a motor vehicle without an Oregon license or driver permit  if the person
is at least 15 years of age  and has in the person’s possession a current out-of-state equivalent of a
Class C instruction driver permit issued to the person. For the purpose of this subsection, a person
is a resident  of this state if the person meets the residency requirements described in ORS 807.062.
A person operating a motor  vehicle under authority of this subsection has the same privileges and
is subject to the same  restrictions as a person operating under the authority of a Class C instruction
driver permit issued as provided in ORS 807.280.
(18) A person may operate an electric personal assistive mobility device without any grant of
driving privileges if the person is [ 16] 12 years of age or older.
(19) A person may operate a powered micromobility device without any grant  of driving
privileges if the person is 12 years of age or older.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 811.050 is amended to read:
811.050. (1) A person commits the offense of failure  of a motor vehicle operator to yield to a
rider on a bicycle lane if the person is operating a motor vehicle and the person does  not yield the
[8]
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
right of way to a person operating a bicycle, electric assisted bicycle, electric  personal assistive
mobility device, moped, motor assisted scooter , powered micromobility device  or  motorized
wheelchair upon a bicycle lane.
(2) This section does not require a  person operating a moped to yield the right of way to a bi-
cycle or a motor assisted scooter if the moped is operated  on a bicycle lane in the manner permitted
under ORS 811.440.
(3) The offense described in this section, failure of a motor  vehicle operator to yield to a rider
on a bicycle lane, is a Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 811.440 is amended to read:
811.440. This section provides exemptions from the prohibitions under ORS  811.435 and 814.210
against operating motor vehicles on bicycle lanes and paths. The following vehicles are not  subject
to ORS 811.435 and 814.210 under the circumstances described:
(1) A person may operate a moped  on a bicycle lane that is immediately adjacent to the roadway
only while the moped is being exclusively powered by human power.
(2) A person may operate a motor vehicle upon a bicycle lane when:
(a) Making a turn;
(b) Entering or leaving an alley, private road or driveway; or
(c) Required in the course of official duty.
(3) An implement of husbandry may momentarily cross into a bicycle lane to permit other vehi-
cles to overtake and pass the implement of husbandry.
(4) A person may operate a motorized wheelchair on a bicycle lane or path.
(5) A person may operate a motor assisted scooter on a bicycle lane or path.
(6) A person may operate an electric personal assistive mobility device on a bicycle lane or path.
(7) A person may operate a powered micromobility device on a bicycle lane or path.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 814.512 is amended to read:
814.512. (1) A person  operating a motor assisted scooter commits the offense of unlawful opera-
tion of a motor assisted scooter if:
(a) The person is under [ 16] 12 years of age; or
(b) The person operates a motor assisted scooter at a rate of speed exceeding 15 miles per  hour.
(2) The offense described  in this section, unlawful operation of a motor assisted scooter, is a
Class D traffic violation.
PROTECTIVE HEADGEAR REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 12.  ORS 814.485 is amended to read:
814.485. (1) A person commits the offense of failure [ of a bicycle  operator or rider ] to wear pro-
tective headgear if the person is under 16  years of age, operates , uses  or rides on a [ bicycle] vehicle
on a highway or on premises open to the public and  is not wearing protective headgear of a type
approved under ORS 815.052.  This section applies to the following:
(a) Bicycles;
(b) Motor assisted scooters;
(c) Electric personal assistive mobility devices;
(d) Powered micromobility devices; or
(e) Skateboards, nonmotorized scooters or in-line skates.
[(2) Exemptions from this section are as provided in ORS 814.487. ]
[9]
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) A person is exempt from the protective  headgear requirement of subsection (1) of this
section if wearing the headgear would violate a religious belief or practice of the person.
(3) The offense described in  this section, failure [ of a bicycle operator or rider ] to wear protective
headgear, is a specific fine traffic violation. The presumptive fine for failure [ of a bicycle  operator
or rider ] to wear protective headgear is $25.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 814.486 is amended to read:
814.486. (1) A person commits the  offense of endangering a [ bicycle] vehicle  operator or pas-
senger if:
(a) The person is operating  or using  a [ bicycle] vehicle on a highway or on premises open to
the public and the person carries another person on the [ bicycle] vehicle who is under  16 years of
age and is not wearing protective headgear of a type approved under ORS 815.052; or
(b) The person is the parent, legal guardian or  person with legal responsibility for the safety
and welfare of a child under 16 years of age and the  child operates , uses  or rides on a [ bicycle]
vehicle on a highway or on premises open to the public without wearing protective headgear of  a
type approved under ORS 815.052.
[(2) Exemptions from this section are as provided in ORS 814.487. ]
(2) A person is exempt from the protective  headgear requirement of subsection (1) of this
section if wearing the headgear would violate a religious belief or practice of the person.
(3) This section applies to the following vehicles:
(a) Bicycles;
(b) Motor assisted scooters;
(c) Electric personal assistive mobility devices;
(d) Powered micromobility devices; or
(e) Skateboards, nonmotorized scooters or in-line skates.
[(3)] (4)  The offense described in this section, endangering a [ bicycle] vehicle operator  or pas-
senger, is a specific fine traffic violation. The  presumptive fine for endangering a [ bicycle] vehicle
operator or passenger is $25.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 814.489 is amended to read:
814.489. Evidence of violation of ORS 814.485 or 814.486 and evidence of lack of  protective
headgear [ shall] is  not [ be] admissible, applicable or effective to  reduce the amount of damages or
to constitute a defense to an action for damages brought  by or on behalf of an injured [ bicyclist or
bicycle passenger ] vehicle operator, vehicle user  or the  survivors of a deceased [ bicyclist] vehicle
operator, vehicle user  or passenger if the [ bicyclist] vehicle operator, vehicle user  or passenger
was injured or killed as a result in whole or in part of the fault of another.
SECTION 15.  ORS 814.488 is amended to read:
814.488. (1) If a child in violation  of ORS 814.485 is [ 11] under 16 years of age [ or younger ], any
citation issued shall be issued to the parent, legal guardian or  person with legal responsibility for
the safety and welfare of  the child for violation of ORS 814.486, rather than to the child for violation
of ORS 814.485.
[(2) If a child in violation  of ORS 814.485 is at least 12 years of age and is under 16 years of age,
a citation may be issued to the child for violation of ORS 814.485  or to the parent, legal guardian or
person with legal responsibility for the safety and welfare of the child for violation of ORS  814.486,
but not to both. ]
[(3)] (2)  The first time a person is convicted of an  offense described in ORS 814.485 or 814.486,
the person [ shall] is not [ be] required to pay a fine if the person proves to the satisfaction of the
[10]
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
court that the person has protective headgear of a type approved under ORS 815.052.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 815.052 is amended to read:
815.052. (1) The Department of Transportation  shall adopt and enforce rules establishing mini-
mum standards and specifications for safe protective headgear to  be worn by people operating , us-
ing or riding  [ bicycles, by passengers on bicycles  and by people riding on skateboards or scooters or
using in-line skates ] vehicles.
(2) This section applies to the following vehicles:
(a) Bicycles;
(b) Motor assisted scooters;
(c) Electric personal assistive mobility devices;
(d) Powered micromobility devices; or
(e) Skateboards, nonmotorized scooters or in-line skates.
(3) The rules shall conform, insofar as practicable, to national safety  standards and specifica-
tions for such headgear.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 815.281 is amended to read:
815.281. (1) A person commits the offense of selling noncomplying bicycle  equipment if the per-
son sells or offers for  sale any [ bicycle] protective  headgear that does not meet the standards es-
tablished by the Department of Transportation under ORS 815.052.
(2) A person commits the offense of unlawfully renting or leasing a bicycle to another if  the
person:
(a) Is in the business of renting or leasing bicycles; and
(b) Does not have [ bicycle] protective headgear  approved under ORS 815.052 available for rental
for use by persons under 16 years of age.
(3) The offenses described in this section are Class D traffic violations.
SECTION 18.
ORS 814.487, 814.534 and 814.600 are repealed.
BATTERY STANDARDS
SECTION 19.  ORS 815.280 is amended to read:
815.280. (1) A person  commits the offense of violation of [ bicycle] vehicle equipment require-
ments if the person does any of the following:
(a) Operates  on any highway a bicycle or powered micomobility device in violation of the re-
quirements of this section.
(b) Is the parent or guardian of a minor child or ward and authorizes or knowingly permits  the
child or ward to operate  a bicycle or powered micromobility device  on any highway in violation
of the requirements of this section.
(2) A bicycle or powered micomobility device  is operated in violation of the requirements of
this section if any of the following requirements are violated:
(a) A  bicycle must be equipped with a brake that enables the operator of the bicycle to stop the
bicycle within 15 feet from a speed of 10 miles per hour on dry, level, clean pavement.
(b) A person [ shall] may  not install or use any siren or whistle upon a  bicycle. This paragraph
does not apply to bicycles used by police officers.
(c) An electric assisted bicycle or  powered micromobility device must be equipped with
a battery or  electric drive system that has been tested by an accredited testing laboratory
for compliance with safety standards  for electric assisted bicycles or powered micromobility
[11]
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
devices the department has established by  rule. This paragraph applies to electric assisted
bicycles and powered micromobility devices manufactured on or after January 1, 2026.
[(c)] (d) At the times described in the  following, a bicycle or its rider must be equipped with
lighting equipment that meets the described requirements:
(A) The lighting equipment must be used during limited visibility conditions.
(B) The lighting equipment must show a  white light visible from a distance of at least 500 feet
to the front of the bicycle.
(C) The lighting equipment must have a red reflector or lighting  device or material of such size
or characteristic and so mounted as to be visible from all distances  up to 600 feet to the rear when
directly in front of lawful lower beams of headlights on a motor vehicle.
(3) Nothing contained in  this section shall be construed to prohibit the use of additional parts
and accessories on any bicycle consistent with this section.
(4) The offense described in this section, violation of  [ bicycle] vehicle equipment requirements,
is a Class D traffic violation.
PUBLIC EDUCATION
SECTION 20.
Section 21 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of  the Oregon Ve-
hicle Code.
SECTION 21. The Department of Transportation shall inform the public through its var-
ious driver education programs about vehicle safety for children  and adults, including but
not limited  to increasing knowledge and understanding about laws relating to protective
headgear, the age requirements and the rules of the road  when operating, riding or using the
following types of vehicles:
(1) Bicycles;
(2) Motor assisted scooters;
(3) Electric personal assistive mobility devices;
(4) Powered micromobility devices; or
(5) Skateboards, nonmotorized scooters or in-line skates.
SECTION 22.
In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out
of the General Fund, the amount  of $250,000, which may be expended for carrying out the
provisions of section 21 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 23.
Section 21 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 24.  ORS 153.633 is amended to read:
153.633. (1) In any criminal action in a circuit court in which a fine is imposed, the lesser  of the
following amounts is payable to the state before any other distribution of the fine is made:
(a) $65; or
(b) The amount of the fine if the fine is less than $65.
(2) In any criminal action in  a justice or municipal court in which a fine is imposed, the lesser
of the following amounts is payable to the state before any other distribution of the fine is made:
(a) $50; or
[12]
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The amount of the fine if the fine is less than $50.
(3) A justice or municipal court shall forward the amount prescribed under subsection  (2) of this
section to the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account.
(4)(a) The provisions of this section do not apply to fines imposed under ORS 339.990.
(b) The provisions of subsection (2)  of this section do not apply to fines imposed in justice and
municipal courts under ORS 811.590, 814.485, 814.486, [ 814.534,] 814.536[, 814.600] or 830.990 (1).
SECTION 25.
 ORS 153.645 is amended to read:
153.645. (1) If a justice court enters a judgment of conviction for a traffic offense and the  con-
viction resulted from a prosecution arising out  of an arrest or complaint made by an officer of the
Oregon State Police or by any other enforcement officer employed by  state government, as defined
in ORS 174.111:
(a) The amount prescribed by ORS 153.633 (2) is payable to the state and must be forwarded  to
the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account;
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of  this section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a)  of this subsection is payable to the county in which the justice court is
located;  and
(c) Subject to subsection (4) of this  section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection is payable to the state.
(2) If a justice court enters a judgment of conviction for a traffic offense and the  conviction
resulted from a prosecution  arising out of an arrest or complaint made by a sheriff, deputy sheriff
or any other enforcement officer employed by the county:
(a) The amount prescribed by ORS 153.633 (2) is payable to the state and must be forwarded  to
the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account; and
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the remaining amount of  the fine is payable to the
county in which the court is located.
(3) If a justice court enters a judgment of conviction for a traffic offense and the  conviction
resulted from a  prosecution arising out of an arrest or complaint made by an enforcement officer
employed by any other local government, as defined in ORS 174.116:
(a) The amount prescribed by ORS 153.633 (2) is payable to the state and must be forwarded  to
the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account;
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of  this section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection is payable to the  local government that employs the
enforcement officer; and
(c) Subject to subsection (4) of this  section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection is payable to the county in which the court is located.
(4) If the full amount of the fine imposed by a justice  court is collected, the last $16 of the
amount collected shall be paid to the county treasurer for the county in which the court is located
and may be used only for the  purposes specified in ORS 153.660. If the full amount of the fine im-
posed is not collected, the $16 payment required by this subsection shall be reduced by  one dollar
for every dollar of  the fine that is not collected. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to
fines imposed for violations of ORS 811.590, 814.485, 814.486, [ 814.534,] 814.536[, 814.600] or  830.990
(1).
SECTION 26.
 ORS 153.650 is amended to read:
153.650. (1) If a municipal court enters a judgment of conviction for  a traffic offense and the
conviction resulted from a prosecution arising out of an arrest or complaint made by  an officer of
[13]
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Oregon State Police or by any other enforcement officer employed by state government, as  de-
fined in ORS 174.111:
(a) The amount prescribed by ORS 153.633 (2) is payable to the state and must be forwarded  to
the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account;
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of  this section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by  paragraph (a) of this subsection is payable to the city in which the municipal court is
located;  and
(c) Subject to subsection (4) of this  section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection is payable to the state.
(2) If a municipal court enters a judgment of conviction for a traffic  offense and the conviction
resulted from a prosecution arising out of an arrest or complaint made by a  city police officer or
any other enforcement officer employed by the city:
(a) The amount prescribed by ORS 153.633 (2) is payable to the state and must be forwarded  to
the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account; and
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the remaining amount of  the fine is payable to the
city in which the court is located.
(3) If a municipal court  enters a judgment of conviction for a traffic offense and the conviction
resulted from a prosecution arising out of an arrest or complaint made by an  enforcement officer
employed by any other local government, as defined in ORS 174.116:
(a) The  amount prescribed by ORS 153.633 (2) is payable to the state and must be forwarded to
the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account;
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of  this section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this  subsection is payable to the local government that employs the
enforcement officer; and
(c) Subject to subsection (4) of this  section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection is payable to the city in which the court is located.
(4) If  the full amount of the fine imposed by a municipal court is collected, the last $16 of the
amount collected shall be paid to the county treasurer for the county in which the court is located
and may be used only for the purposes specified in ORS 153.660. If the  full amount of the fine im-
posed is not  collected, the $16 payment required by this subsection shall be reduced by one dollar
for every dollar of the fine that is not collected. The provisions of this subsection do  not apply to
fines imposed  for violations of ORS 811.590, 814.485, 814.486, [ 814.534,] 814.536[, 814.600] or 830.990
(1).
SECTION 27.
 ORS 153.660 is amended to read:
153.660. (1) If a justice or municipal court imposes a fine  for any offense other than a traffic
offense and the full amount of the fine imposed is  collected, the last $16 of the amount collected
shall be paid to the county treasurer for the county in which the court is located and may  be used
only for the purposes specified in this section. If the full amount of  the fine imposed is not collected,
the $16 payment required by this subsection shall be reduced by one dollar for every dollar of  the
fine that is not collected. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to fines imposed  for vio-
lations of ORS 811.590, 814.485, 814.486, [ 814.534,] 814.536[, 814.600] or 830.990 (1).
(2) Sixty percent of the amounts paid to  the county treasurer under this section and under ORS
153.645 (4) and  153.650 (4) shall be deposited by the treasurer in the county treasury and may be
used only for drug and alcohol  programs and for the costs of planning, operating and maintaining
county juvenile and adult corrections programs and facilities.
[14]
HB 3626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
(3) Forty  percent of the amounts paid to the county treasurer under this section and under ORS
153.645 (4) and 153.650 (4) shall be deposited by the treasurer in the  court facilities security account
established under ORS 1.182 for the county in which the court is located.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 28.
The unit and section captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory  law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[15]