Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 The Oregon Business Development Department shall conduct a study  of the
semiconductor industry in Oregon. The department  shall submit a report of the study to the
interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to economic development in the
manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3214