Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 243.105 to
243.285.
SECTION 2. (1) Benefit plans offered by  the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reim-
burse the cost of prescription drugs must include a pharmacy tourism program that  allows
an eligible employee or family member, who is not  enrolled in Medicare, to fill and refill in
Mexico or Canada 90-day supplies  of prescription drugs specified by the board. The program
must pay the costs of:
(a) The specified prescription drugs;
(b) Round-trip air travel to San Diego International Airport or Vancouver International
Airport;
(c) Transportation to and from a pharmacy designated by the board; and
(d) An overnight hotel stay, if necessary.
(2) The eligible employee or family member is responsible for the cost  of food and for
obtaining a passport or renewing a passport.
(3) The board shall coordinate  the travel for an eligible employee or family member par-
ticipating in the program.
(4) The board shall specify the prescription drugs that qualify for the program based on
anticipated net cost savings.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this  2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 243.860 to
243.886.
SECTION 4. (1) Benefit plans offered by the  Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reim-
burse the  cost of prescription drugs must include a pharmacy tourism program that allows
an eligible employee or family member, who is not  enrolled in Medicare, to fill and refill in
Mexico or Canada 90-day supplies of prescription drugs specified by  the board. The program
must pay the costs of:
(a) The specified prescription drugs;
(b) Round-trip air travel to San Diego International Airport or Vancouver  International
Airport;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1033
SB 12
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
(c) Transportation to and from a pharmacy designated by the board; and
(d) An overnight hotel stay, if necessary.
(2) The eligible employee or  family member is responsible for the cost of food and for
obtaining a passport or renewing a passport.
(3) The board shall coordinate the travel for an eligible employee  or family member par-
ticipating in the program.
(4) The board shall specify the prescription drugs that qualify for the program  based on
anticipated net cost savings.
[2]