Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CONTINGENCY PLANNING
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468B.300 is amended to read:
468B.300. As used in ORS 468.020, 468.095, 468.140 (3) and 468B.300 to 468B.500:
(1) “Bulk” means material stored or transported in loose, unpackaged  liquid, powder or granular
form capable of being conveyed by a pipe, bucket, chute or belt system.
(2) “Cargo vessel” means a self-propelled  ship in commerce, other than a tank vessel, of 300
gross tons or more. “Cargo vessel” does not include a vessel used solely for commercial fish  har-
vesting.
(3) “Commercial  fish harvesting” means taking food fish with any gear unlawful for angling un-
der ORS 506.006, or taking food  fish in excess of the limits permitted for personal use, or taking food
fish with the intent of disposing of such food  fish or parts thereof for profit, or by sale, barter or
trade, in commercial channels.
(4) “Contingency  plan” means an oil spill prevention and emergency response plan required un-
der ORS 468B.345.
(5) “Covered vessel” means a tank vessel, cargo vessel, passenger vessel or dredge vessel.
(6) “Damages” includes damages, costs, losses, penalties or  attorney fees of any kind for which
liability may exist under the laws of this  state resulting from, arising out of or related to the dis-
charge or threatened discharge of oil.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 465
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) “Discharge” means any emission other than natural seepage  of oil, whether intentional or
unintentional. “Discharge” includes but  is not limited to spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emit-
ting, emptying or dumping oil.
(8) “Dredge vessel” means a self-propelled vessel of 300 or more gross tons that is equipped for
regularly engaging in dredging of submerged and submersible lands.
(9) “Exploration facility” means a platform, vessel or other offshore  facility used to explore for
oil in the navigable waters of the state. “Exploration facility” does not include  platforms or vessels
used for stratigraphic drilling or other operations that are not authorized or intended to drill to  a
producing formation.
(10) “Facility”  means a pipeline or any structure, group of structures, equipment or device, other
than a vessel that transfers oil over navigable waters of the  state, that is used for producing, stor-
ing, handling, transferring, processing or transporting  oil in bulk and that is capable of storing or
transporting 10,000 or more gallons of oil. “Facility” does not include:
(a) A railroad car, motor vehicle or other rolling stock while transporting oil over the  highways
or rail lines of this state;
(b) An underground storage tank regulated by the Department  of Environmental Quality or a
local government under ORS 466.706 to 466.882 and 466.994; or
(c) A marina, or  a public fueling station, that is engaged exclusively in the direct sale of fuel,
or any other product used for propulsion, to a final user of the fuel or other product.
(11) “Federal  on-scene coordinator” means the federal official predesignated by the United
States Environmental Protection Agency or the  United States Coast Guard to coordinate and direct
federal responses or the official designated by the lead  agency to coordinate and direct removal
under the National Contingency Plan.
(12) “Hazardous material” has the meaning given that term in ORS 466.605.
(13) “High hazard train route” means a section of rail lines in this state over which trains
operate that, in a single train, transport:
(a) 20 or more tank railroad cars loaded with oil that are in a continuous block; or
(b) 35 or more tank railroad cars loaded  with oil that are spread throughout the entirety
of the rolling stock, not including the locomotive, that make up the train.
(14) “Listed sensitive area” means an area or  location listed as an area of special eco-
nomic or environmental importance in an Area Contingency Plan or  Sub-Area Contingency
Plan prepared and published pursuant to section 311(j) of the Federal Water Pollution Control
Act, 33 U.S.C. 1321(j), as amended by the Oil Pollution Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-380).
[(13)] (15) “Maritime association” means an association or cooperative of  marine terminals, fa-
cilities, vessel owners, vessel  operators, vessel agents or other maritime industry groups, that pro-
vides oil spill response planning and spill related communications services within the state.
[(14)] (16) “Maximum probable spill” means  the maximum probable spill for a vessel operating
in the navigable waters of the state considering the history of  spills of vessels of the same class
operating on the west coast of the United States.
(17) “National Contingency Plan” means the  plan prepared and published under section
311(d) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act,  33 U.S.C. 1321(d), as amended by the Oil
Pollution Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-380).
[(15)] (18) “Navigable waters” means the Columbia River, the Willamette River  up to Willamette
Falls, the Pacific Ocean and estuaries to the head of tidewater.
[(16) “National Contingency Plan” means the plan prepared and published under section 311(d) of
[2]
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Federal  Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. 1321(d), as amended by the Oil Pollution Act of
1990 (P.L. 101-380).]
[(17)] (19)  “Offshore facility” means any facility located in, on or under any  of the navigable
waters of the state.
[(18)] (20) “Oils” or “oil” means :
(a) Oil, including gasoline, crude oil, bitumen, synthetic crude oil, natural gas well
condensate, fuel  oil, diesel oil, lubricating oil, sludge, oil refuse and any other petroleum related
product ; and
(b) Liquefied natural gas.
[(19)] (21)  “Onshore facility” means any facility located in, on or under any land  of the state,
other than submerged land, that, because of its location, could reasonably be expected  to cause
substantial harm to the environment by discharging oil into or on the  navigable waters of the state
or adjoining shorelines.
[(20)] (22)  “Passenger vessel” means a ship of 300 or more gross tons carrying passengers for
compensation.
[(21)] (23) “Person” has the meaning given the term in ORS 468.005.
[(22)] (24)  “Person having control over oil” includes but is not  limited to any person using,
storing or transporting oil immediately prior to entry of such oil into  the navigable waters of the
state, and shall specifically include carriers and bailees of such oil.
[(23)] (25) “Pipeline” means a facility, including piping, compressors, pump  stations and storage
tanks, used to transport oil between facilities or between facilities and tank vessels.
[(24)] (26) “Region  of operation” with respect to the holder of a contingency plan means the area
where the operations of the holder that require a contingency plan are located.
[(25)] (27)  “Removal costs” means the  costs of removal that are incurred after a discharge of
oil has occurred or, in any case in which there is a  substantial threat of a discharge of oil, the costs
to prevent, minimize or mitigate oil pollution from the incident.
[(26)] (28)  “Responsible party” has the  meaning given under section 1001 of the Oil Pollution
Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-380) , 33 U.S.C. 2701 .
[(27)] (29) “Ship” means any boat, ship, vessel, barge or other floating craft of any kind.
[(28)(a)] (30)(a)  “State on-scene coordinator” means the state official appointed by  the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality to represent the department and the State of Oregon in response to
an oil or hazardous material spill or release or threatened spill  or release and to coordinate cleanup
response with state and local agencies.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(A) “Spill or release” means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling,  emitting, re-
leasing, leaking or placing of any  oil or hazardous material into the air or into or on any land or
waters of this state except as authorized by a permit issued  under ORS chapter 454, 459, 459A, 468,
468A, 468B or 469 or ORS  466.005 to 466.385, 466.990 (1) and (2) or 466.992 or federal law, or except
when being stored or used for its intended purpose.
(B) “Threatened spill or release” means oil or hazardous material is likely to  escape or be car-
ried into the air or into or on any land or waters of the state, including from a ship as  defined in
this section that is in imminent danger of sinking.
[(29)] (31)  “Tank  vessel” means a ship that is constructed or adapted to carry oil in bulk as
cargo or cargo residue. “Tank vessel” does not include:
(a) A vessel carrying oil in drums, barrels or other packages;
[3]
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A vessel carrying oil as fuel or stores for that vessel; or
(c) An oil spill response barge or vessel.
[(30)] (32) “Worst case spill” means:
(a) In the case of a vessel, a spill of the entire cargo and fuel of the tank  vessel complicated
by adverse weather conditions; [ and]
(b) In the case of an onshore or offshore facility,  the largest foreseeable spill in adverse weather
conditions[ .]; and
(c) In the case of a high hazard train route, the greater of:
(A) 300,000 gallons of oil from a single train; or
(B) 15 percent of the total lading of oil transported within the largest  single train rea-
sonably expected to transport oil over the high hazard train route.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 468B.340 is amended to read:
468B.340. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(a) Oil spills present a serious danger to the fragile natural environment of the state.
(b) Commercial vessel activity on the navigable waters of  the state is vital to the economic in-
terests of the people of the state.
(c) Recent studies conducted in the wake  of disastrous oil spills have identified the following
problems in the transport and storage of oil:
(A) Gaps in regulatory oversight;
(B) Incomplete cost recovery by states;
(C) Despite research in spill cleanup technology, it is unlikely that a large percentage of  oil can
be recovered from a catastrophic spill;
(D) Because response efforts cannot effectively reduce the impact of oil  spills, prevention is the
most effective approach to oil spill management; and
(E) Comprehensive oil spill prevention demands participation  by industry, citizens, environ-
mental organizations and local, state, federal and international governments.
(2) Therefore, the Legislative Assembly declares it is the intent of ORS 468B.345  to 468B.415 to
establish a program to promote:
(a) The prevention of oil spills especially on the large, navigable waters of the Columbia  River,
the Willamette River and the Oregon coast;
(b) The prevention of oil spills to listed sensitive areas,  such as inland rivers and streams
that serve as essential habitats for salmon and other wildlife or  as sources of water for
consumption, irrigation or other public use;
(c) The prevention of oil spills along high hazard train routes;
[(b)] (d)  Oil spill response preparedness, including  the identification of actions and content re-
quired for an effective contingency plan;
[(c)] (e)  A consistent west coast approach to oil spill prevention and response;
[(d)] (f)  The establishment, coordination and duties of safety committees as  provided in ORS
468B.415; and
[(e)] (g)  To the maximum extent possible, coordination of  state programs with the programs and
regulations of the United States Coast Guard and adjacent states.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 468B.305 is amended to read:
468B.305. (1) It shall be unlawful for oil to enter the waters of the state from any  ship  or high
hazard train route  or  from  any fixed or mobile facility or installation located offshore or onshore,
whether publicly or privately operated, regardless of  the cause of the entry or the fault of the per-
[4]
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
son having control over the  oil, or regardless of whether the entry of oil is the result of intentional
or negligent conduct, accident or other cause. Such entry constitutes pollution of the waters of  the
state.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not  apply to the entry of oil into the waters of the state
under the following circumstances:
(a) The person discharging the oil was  expressly authorized to do so by the Department of En-
vironmental Quality, having obtained a permit [ therefor] to do so  required by ORS 468B.050;
(b) Notwithstanding any  other provision of ORS 466.640, 468B.025 or 468B.050 or this section,
the person discharging the  oil was expressly authorized to do so by a federal on-scene coordinator
or the department in connection with activities related to the removal of or response  to oil that
entered the waters of the state; or
(c) The person having control over the oil can prove that the entry [ thereof] of oil into the  wa-
ters of the state was caused by:
(A) An act of war or sabotage or an act of God.
(B) Negligence on the part of the United States Government, or the State of Oregon.
(C) An act or omission of a third party without regard to whether any such act or omission was
or was not negligent.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 468B.345 is amended to read:
468B.345. (1)(a) Unless an oil spill prevention and emergency response plan has  been approved
by the Department  of Environmental Quality and has been properly implemented, [ no] a person
[shall] may not :
[(a)] (A)  Cause or permit the operation of an onshore facility in the state;
[(b)] (B)  Cause or permit the operation of an offshore facility in the state; or
[(c)] (C)  Cause or permit the operation of a covered  vessel within the navigable waters of the
state.
[(2)] (b)  It is not a defense to an action brought for a violation of this subsection [ (1) of this
section] that the person charged believed that a  current contingency plan had been approved by the
department.
[(3)] (c)  A contingency plan required under this subsection  shall be renewed at least once
every five years.
[(4) This section shall not apply to the operation of a cargo or passenger  vessel on Yaquina Bay
or on the navigable waters of  the state in the Pacific Ocean used by cargo or passenger vessels entering
or leaving Yaquina Bay until January 1, 1998. ]
(2)(a) A railroad that owns or operates a high hazard train route in this  state shall have
an oil spill prevention and emergency response plan that has been approved by the  depart-
ment.
(b) It is not a defense to an action brought for a violation of this subsection that  the
person charged believed that  a current contingency plan had been approved by the depart-
ment.
(c) A contingency plan required under this subsection  for a high hazard train route shall
be renewed at least once every five years.
(d) Failure by a railroad that owns or operates a high hazard train route to comply  with
this subsection or to  be in compliance with a contingency plan required under this subsection
does not preclude the railroad from operating the high hazard train route.
SECTION 5. Section 6 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 468B.345 to
[5]
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
468B.415.
SECTION 6. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission shall, by rule:
(a) Adopt standards for the preparation of contingency plans  for high hazard train routes
that:
(A) Reflect the requirements of subsection (2) of this section; and
(B) To the extent feasible and  appropriate, are equivalent to standards for the prepara-
tion of contingency plans for facilities and covered vessels adopted under ORS 468B.350.
(b) Identify oil spill response  zones along high hazard train routes and the amount of
equipment identified in a contingency plan that is required to be  regularly located in those
zones.
(c) Identify all navigable waters and listed sensitive areas within  the region of operation
of high hazard train routes. A listed sensitive area may be considered within the  region of
operation of a high hazard train route if the listed sensitive area is located  anywhere within
an area:
(A) Beginning at the probable  point of a spill of oil into waters of the state from a high
hazard train route; and
(B) Ending at the point that the oil could travel to, by water flowing  downstream, in a
time period and at a speed, measured in knots, established by the commission by rule.
(2) A contingency plan shall, at a minimum:
(a) Identify the high hazard train route for  which the contingency plan is prepared and
the specific type or types of oil transported over the high hazard train route.
(b) Demonstrate the capacity  of the railroad that owns or operates the high hazard train
route, both in material resources and finances, for the cleanup of a spill of oil and  for the
delivery of resources to the location of the spill within specified response times.
(c) Include the following information related to  specified personnel and equipment that
are available to respond to a spill of oil:
(A) The names, addresses, phone numbers and electronic mail addresses for  the primary
owner or operator of the high hazard  train route and for the local primary contacts for the
railroad that owns or operates the high hazard train route;
(B) A list of all personnel, equipment and services available to  respond to a spill, and a
timeline for the delivery of the personnel, equipment  and services to the spill location pur-
suant to a written contract between the railroad that  owns or operates the high hazard train
route and other entities;
(C) The contact information for all  personnel available to arrive on behalf of the railroad
that owns or operates the high hazard  train route and the timeline for the personnel to re-
spond to a spill or threatened spill;
(D) A description of the responsibilities of the personnel  specified in the contingency plan
for responding to a spill;
(E) The number, training  preparedness and fitness of all dedicated, prepositioned per-
sonnel assigned to direct and implement the contingency plan; and
(F) The amount and type of equipment and supplies available  or other approved means
to respond to a spill and a description of where the equipment and supplies are located.
(d) Describe how the contingency plan relates  to and is coordinated with the interagency
response plan developed by  the Department of Environmental Quality under ORS 468B.495
and 468B.500 and any relevant contingency  plan prepared by a cooperative, port, regional
[6]
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
entity, the state or the federal government in the same area of  the state covered by the
contingency plan.
(e) Include procedures and information that support the  early detection of an oil spill and
timely notification of appropriate federal, state, local, tribal  and other authorities about an
oil spill in accordance with applicable state and federal law, including but not limited to:
(A) Procedures for the initial detection of a spill;
(B) Procedures for the immediate notification  of qualified individuals at the railroad that
owns or operates the high hazard train route;
(C) Call-down lists for the notification of  appropriate federal, state, local, tribal and other
authorities;
(D) Information demonstrating that the railroad  that owns or operates the high hazard
train route has ownership of or access to an  emergency response communications network
covering the entire high hazard train route and that the emergency  response communi-
cations network also provides for immediate notification and  continual emergency commu-
nications during cleanup response;
(E) Procedures specifying the circumstances under which notifications will  be made and
the time frames for making notifications; and
(F) Requirements for follow-up notifications, provided for on a 24-hour basis.
(3) A railroad that owns or operates a high hazard train route shall develop  and conduct
an oil spill exercise program that  includes conducting an annual notification drill and annu-
ally conducting one of the following three types of exercises, on a three-year rotating basis:
(a) An incident management team table top drill;
(b) An oil spill containment and recovery equipment deployment drill; and
(c) A listed sensitive area protection exercise.
(4) The commission and  the department may not require the railroad that owns or op-
erates a high hazard train route to submit, as part of a contingency plan, information  con-
stituting sensitive security information provided for under 49 C.F.R. 1520.5(b)(12), (14) or (16).
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding ORS 468B.355 (2), if  operations of trains that cause a sec-
tion of rail lines to meet the definition of  a high hazard train route commence on or before
the date that the Environmental Quality Commission adopts  rules under section 6 of this
2019 Act, a contingency plan for the high hazard train route shall be submitted to the De-
partment of Environmental Quality no later  than 12 months after the date that the com-
mission adopts rules under section 6 of this 2019 Act. The department may adopt a  schedule
for submission of a contingency plan within the 12-month period.
SECTION 8.
Section 7 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2022.
SECTION 9.  ORS 468B.355 is amended to read:
468B.355. (1) A contingency plan for a facility or  covered vessel shall be submitted to the De-
partment of Environmental Quality within 12 months after the Environmental  Quality Commission
adopts rules under ORS 468B.350. The department may adopt  a schedule for submission of [ an oil ]
a contingency plan for a facility  or covered vessel  within the 12-month period. The schedule for
the Columbia River shall be coordinated with the State of Washington. The department may  adopt
an alternative schedule for the Oregon coast and the Willamette River.
(2) A contingency plan  for a high hazard train route shall be submitted to the department
no later than 90 days before operations of trains that cause a section of rail lines to meet
the definition of a high hazard train route commence.
[7]
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(2)] (3) The contingency plan for a  facility shall be submitted by the owner or operator of the
facility or by a qualified oil spill response cooperative in which  the facility owner or operator is a
participating member.
[(3)] (4) The contingency plan for a tank vessel shall be submitted by:
(a) The owner or operator of the tank vessel;
(b) The owner or operator of the facility at which the vessel will be  loading or unloading its
cargo; or
(c) A qualified oil spill response  cooperative in which the tank vessel owner or operator is a
participating member.
[(4)] (5) Subject to conditions imposed  by the department, the contingency plan for a tank vessel,
if submitted by the owner  or operator of a facility, may be submitted as a single plan for all tank
vessels of a particular class that will be loading or unloading cargo at the facility.
[(5)] (6)  The contingency plan for a cargo vessel  or passenger vessel may be submitted by the
owner or operator of the vessel, or the agent for the vessel resident in this state. Subject  to con-
ditions imposed by the department, the owner, operator, agent or a maritime  association may submit
a single contingency plan for cargo vessels or passenger vessels of a particular class.
(7) The contingency plan for a high hazard train  route shall be submitted by the railroad
that owns or operates the high hazard train route.
[(6)] (8) A person  that has contracted with a facility , [or] covered vessel  or railroad that owns
or operates a high hazard train route  to provide containment and cleanup services and that meets
the standards established by the commission under ORS  468B.350 or section 6 of this 2019 Act  may
submit the contingency plan for any facility , [ or] covered vessel  or high hazard train route  for
which the person is contractually  obligated to provide services. Subject to conditions imposed by the
department, the person may submit a single plan for more than one covered vessel.
[(7)] (9)  The requirements of submitting a contingency plan under this section  may be satisfied
by a covered vessel  by submission of proof of assessment participation by the vessel in a maritime
association. Subject to conditions imposed by the department, the association may  submit a single
plan for more than one facility  or covered vessel or may submit a single plan providing contingen-
cies to respond for different classes of covered vessels.
[(8)] (10) A contingency plan prepared for an agency of the federal government or an adjacent
state that satisfies the requirements of ORS 468B.345 to 468B.360 and  the rules adopted by the En-
vironmental Quality Commission may be accepted as a plan under ORS 468B.345. The commission
shall [ assure] ensure that to the greatest  extent possible, requirements for a contingency plan under
ORS 468B.345 to 468B.360 are consistent with requirements for a plan under federal law.
[(9)] (11) Covered vessels may satisfy the requirements of submitting a contingency plan under
this section through  proof of current assessment participation in an approved plan maintained with
the department by a maritime association.
[(10)] (12)  A maritime association may submit a  contingency plan for a cooperative group of
covered vessels. Covered vessels that have not previously obtained approval of a plan  may enter the
navigable waters of the state if, upon entering such waters, the vessel pays the  established assess-
ment for participation in the approved plan maintained by the association.
[(11)] (13) A maritime association  shall have a lien on the responsible vessel if the vessel owner
or operator  fails to remit any regular operating assessments and shall further have a lien for the
recovery for any direct costs provided to or for the vessel by the  maritime association for oil spill
response or spill related communications services. The lien shall be enforced  in accordance with
[8]
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
applicable law.
[(12)] (14)  Obligations incurred by a maritime association and any other liabilities or claims
against the association shall be enforced only against the assets of the association,  and no liability
for the  debts or action of the association exists against either the State of Oregon or any other
subdivision or instrumentality thereof, or against any member, officer, employee or  agent of the as-
sociation in an individual or representative capacity.
[(13)] (15) Except  as otherwise provided in ORS chapters 468, 468A and 468B, neither the mem-
bers of the association, its officers, agents or employees, nor the business entities by whom  the
members are regularly employed, may be  held individually responsible for errors in judgment, mis-
takes or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person or employee,  save
for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime.
[(14)] (16)  Assessment participation in a maritime association does not constitute a  defense to
liability imposed under ORS 468B.345 to 468B.415 or other state or federal law. Such assessment
participation  shall  not relieve a covered vessel from complying with those portions of the approved
maritime association contingency plan that may require vessel specific  oil spill response equipment,
training or capabilities for that vessel.
[(15)] (17)  A person providing  a contingency plan for a cargo or passenger vessel under this
section  shall  be exempt from liability as provided under ORS 468B.425 for any action taken or
omitted in the course of providing contingency planning service.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 468B.360 is amended to read:
468B.360. In reviewing the  contingency plan required by ORS 468B.345, the Department of En-
vironmental Quality shall consider at least the following factors:
(1) The adequacy of containment and cleanup equipment, personnel, communications  equipment,
notification procedures and  call-down lists, response time and logistical arrangements for coordi-
nation and implementation of response efforts to remove oil spills promptly and properly and  to
protect the environment;
(2) The nature and amount of vessel  or high hazard train  route traffic within the area covered
by the plan;
(3) The volume and type of oil being transported within the area covered by the plan;
(4) The existence of navigational hazards within the area covered by the plan;
(5) The history and circumstances surrounding prior spills of  oil within the area covered by the
plan;
(6) The sensitivity of fisheries and wildlife and other natural resources within the area covered
by the plan;
(7) Relevant information on previous spills contained in on-scene coordinator reports  covered
by the plan;
(8) The  extent to which reasonable, cost-effective measures to reduce the likelihood that a spill
will occur have been incorporated into the plan;
(9) The number of covered vessels calling in , and high hazard train routes  and [ the] facilities
located in , the geographic area  and the resulting ability of local agencies and industry groups to
develop, finance and maintain a contingency plan  and spill response system for those vessels , high
hazard train routes  and facilities; and
(10) The spill  response equipment and resources available to a person providing a contingency
plan for cargo and passenger vessels under contingency plans filed by the person under  state or
federal law for other covered vessels or facilities owned or operated by that person.
[9]
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 11.  ORS 468B.365 is amended to read:
468B.365. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall  approve a contingency plan only
if [ it] the department determines that :
(a)(A) The plan for a covered vessel or facility  meets the requirements of ORS 468B.345 to
468B.360 and[:]
[(a)] the covered vessel or facility  demonstrates evidence of compliance with ORS 468B.390;
[and] or
(B) The plan for a high hazard train route meets the requirements  of ORS 468B.345 to
486B.360; and
(b) If implemented, the plan is capable, to  the maximum extent practicable in terms of personnel,
materials and equipment, of removing oil promptly and properly  and minimizing any damage to the
environment.
(2) An owner or  operator of a covered vessel , high hazard train route  or facility shall notify
the department in writing immediately of any significant  change affecting the contingency plan, in-
cluding changes in any factor set forth in this section or in rules adopted by the Environmental
Quality Commission. The department may require the  owner or operator to update a contingency
plan as a result of these changes.
(3) A holder of an approved contingency plan does not violate the terms of the  contingency plan
by furnishing to another plan holder, after  notifying the department, equipment, materials or per-
sonnel to assist the other plan holder in a response to an oil discharge.  The plan holder shall re-
place or return the transferred equipment, materials and personnel as soon as feasible.
(4) The department may attach  any reasonable term or condition to its approval or modification
of a contingency plan that the department  determines is necessary to [ insure] ensure  that the ap-
plicant:
(a) Has access to sufficient  resources to protect environmentally sensitive areas and to prevent,
contain, clean up and mitigate  potential oil discharges from the facility or tank vessel  or along the
high hazard train route ;
(b) Maintains personnel levels sufficient to carry out emergency operations; and
(c) Complies with the contingency plan.
(5) The contingency plan must provide for the use by  the applicant of the best technology
available at the time the contingency plan was submitted or renewed.
(6) The department may require an applicant or  a holder of an approved contingency plan to
take steps necessary to demonstrate its ability to carry out the contingency plan, including:
(a) Periodic training;
(b) Response team exercises; and
(c) Verification of access to inventories of equipment, supplies and personnel identified as
available in the approved contingency plan.
(7) The department may consider evidence that oil discharge  prevention measures such as dou-
ble hulls or double bottoms on vessels or barges, secondary  containment systems, hydrostatic test-
ing, enhanced vessel traffic systems or enhanced crew  or staffing levels have been implemented and
in its discretion, may make exceptions to the requirements of this section to  reflect the reduced risk
of oil discharges from the facility or tank vessel , or  along the high hazard train route,  for which
the plan is submitted or being modified.
(8)(a) Before the department approves or modifies a  contingency plan required under ORS
468B.345, the department shall provide a copy of the  contingency plan to the State Department of
[10]
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Fish and Wildlife, the office of the  State Fire Marshal and the Department of Land Conservation
and Development for review.
(b) In addition to providing copies to the agencies listed in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section, before  approving or modifying a contingency plan for a high hazard train route, the
Department of Environmental  Quality shall provide a copy of the contingency plan to each
federally recognized Indian tribe that owns land or enjoys treaty-reserved hunting, fishing
or gathering rights that could be impacted by an oil discharge along any portion of  the high
hazard train route.
(c) [ The] Agencies  and tribes that receive copies of a  contingency plan under this sub-
section shall review the plan according to procedures and time limits established by rule  of the
[Environmental Quality ] commission.
(9) Upon  approval of a contingency plan, the department shall issue to the plan holder a certif-
icate stating that  the plan has been approved. The certificate shall include the name of the
facility , high hazard train route  or tank vessel for which the certificate  is issued, the effective
date of the plan and the date by which the plan must be submitted for renewal.
(10) The  approval of a contingency plan by the department does not constitute an express as-
surance regarding the adequacy of the plan or constitute a defense to  liability imposed under ORS
chapters 468, 468A and 468B or any other state law.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 468B.385 is amended to read:
468B.385. (1) Upon request of a  plan holder or on the initiative of the Department of Environ-
mental Quality, the  department, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may modify its approval
of a contingency plan if the department determines that a  change has occurred in the operation of
the facility , high hazard train route  or  tank vessel necessitating an amended or supplemental plan,
or that the operator’s discharge experience demonstrates a necessity for modification.
(2) The department, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may revoke its approval of  a con-
tingency plan if the department determines that:
(a) Approval was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation;
(b) The operator does not  have access to the quality or quantity of resources identified in the
plan;
(c) A term or condition of approval or modification has been violated; or
(d) The plan holder is not in compliance with the plan and the deficiency materially affects the
plan holder’s response capability.
(3) Failure of a holder of an approved or modified contingency plan to comply  with the plan or
to have access to the quality or quantity of resources identified in the  plan or to respond with those
resources  within  the shortest possible time in the event of a spill is a violation of ORS 468B.345 to
468B.415 for purposes of ORS 466.992, 468.140, 468.943 and any other applicable law.
(4) If the holder of an approved or modified contingency plan fails to respond to  and conduct
cleanup operations of  an unpermitted discharge of oil with the quality and quantity of resources
identified in the plan and in  a manner required under the plan, the holder is strictly liable, jointly
and severally, for the civil penalty assessed under ORS 466.992 and 468.140.
(5) In order to be considered in compliance with a contingency plan, the plan holder must:
(a) Establish and carry out procedures identified in  the plan as being the responsibility of the
holder of the plan;
(b) Have access to and have on hand the quantity and quality of  equipment, personnel and other
resources identified as being accessible or on hand in the plan;
[11]
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Fulfill the assurances espoused in the plan in the manner described in the plan;
(d) Comply with terms and  conditions attached to the plan by the department under ORS
468B.345 to 468B.380; and
(e) Successfully demonstrate the ability  to carry out the plan when required by the department
under ORS 468B.370.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 468B.495 is amended to read:
468B.495. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall develop an integrated, interagency
response plan for oil or hazardous material spills :
(a) In the Columbia River, the Willamette River up to Willamette  Falls and the coastal waters
and estuaries of the state[ .]; and
(b) In listed sensitive areas within the region of operation of high hazard train routes.
(2) In developing the response plan  under subsection  (1) of this section , the department shall
work with all affected local, state  and federal agencies and with any volunteer group interested in
participating in oil or hazardous material spill response.
[(2)] (3) The response plan developed under subsection (1) of this section shall be  consistent to
the extent practicable with the plan for a statewide hazardous material emergency  response system
established by the State Fire Marshal under ORS 453.374.
FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY
SECTION 14.
Section 15 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 468B.300 to
468B.500.
SECTION 15. (1) A railroad that owns or operates  a high hazard train route in this state
shall annually submit to the Department of Environmental Quality a statement that:
(a) Describes all insurance carried by  the railroad that covers any losses resulting from
a worst case  spill, as well as the coverage amounts, limitations and other conditions of the
insurance; and
(b) Identifies the capacity, measured in barrels, of the total lading of oil transported
within the average-sized train and the largest single  train that was operated on each high
hazard train route owned or operated by the railroad during the previous calendar year.
(2)(a) A statement required under subsection (1) of this  section must also contain addi-
tional information sufficient to  demonstrate the railroad’s ability to pay the cost to clean
up a worst case spill on each high hazard train route owned  or operated by the railroad
during the previous calendar year.  Additional information may include, but need not be lim-
ited to, proof of reserve  accounts, letters of credit or other financial instruments or re-
sources that the railroad can rely on to pay the cost to clean up a worst case spill.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, “cost to clean up a  worst case spill” means a dollar
amount equal to the number of barrels of oil that would constitute a worst case spill  on the
high hazard train route multiplied by $16,800.
(3) A railroad shall submit a statement  required by this section to the department upon
payment to the department of the annual assessment payable under section 17  of this 2019
Act.
RAILROAD SAFETY ASSESSMENTS AND USE
[12]
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 16. Section 17 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of  ORS 468B.300 to
468B.500.
SECTION 17. (1) The Department of  Environmental Quality shall levy and collect an an-
nual assessment from railroads  that own or operate high hazard train routes. The total as-
sessment under this section shall  equal $  per year, with each applicable railroad
assessed a proportional share of the total assessment that  is based on the total track miles
within this state that are part of high hazard train routes owned  or operated by the railroad.
(2) Moneys collected by the  department under this section shall be deposited in the State
Treasury to the credit of the High Hazard Train Route Oil Spill  Prevention Fund established
under section 20 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 18.  ORS 468B.410 is amended to read:
468B.410. (1) The Oil Spill Prevention  Fund is established separate and distinct from the General
Fund in the State Treasury. Interest earned on the fund shall be credited  to the fund. Moneys re-
ceived by the Department of Environmental  Quality for the purpose of oil and hazardous material
spill prevention and the fees collected under ORS  468B.405 shall be paid into the State Treasury and
credited to the fund.
(2) The State Treasurer shall invest and reinvest moneys in the Oil Spill Prevention Fund  in the
manner prescribed by law.
(3) The moneys in the Oil  Spill Prevention Fund are appropriated continuously to the depart-
ment [of Environmental Quality ] to  be used in the manner described in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The Oil Spill Prevention Fund may be used by the department [ of Environmental Quality ] to:
(a) Pay all costs of the department incurred to:
(A) Review the contingency plans submitted under ORS 468B.360;
(B) Conduct training, response exercises, inspection and tests in order to verify equipment in-
ventories and ability to prevent and respond to oil release emergencies  and to undertake other ac-
tivities intended to verify or establish the preparedness of the state, a municipality  or a party
required by ORS  468B.345 to 468B.415 to have an approved contingency plan to act in accordance
with that plan; and
(C) Verify or establish proof of financial responsibility required by ORS 468B.390.
(b) Review and revise the oil spill response plan required by ORS 468B.495 and 468B.500.
(5) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of subsection  (4) of this section, moneys in
the Oil Spill Prevention Fund may not  be used to pay the costs of the department that may
be paid with moneys deposited in the High Hazard Train Route Oil Spill Prevention Fund
established under section 20 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 19.
Section 20 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 468B.345 to
468B.415.
SECTION 20. (1) The High Hazard Train Route Oil Spill  Prevention Fund is established
in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the
High Hazard Train Route Oil Spill Prevention Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys deposited in the fund under section 17 of this 2019 Act;
(b) All other moneys placed in the fund as provided by law; and
(c) Any  gifts, grants, donations, endowments or bequests from any public or private
source.
(3) Moneys in the  fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Environ-
[13]
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mental Quality to be used only to pay the costs of the department incurred to:
(a) Review, under ORS 468B.360, contingency plans for high hazard train routes;
(b) Conduct training, response exercises, inspection and tests in order  to verify equip-
ment inventories and ability to prevent and respond to oil release emergencies related  to
high hazard train routes and to undertake other activities intended to  maintain the capabil-
ities for emergency response related to high hazard train routes of the state, a  municipality
or an owner or operator of  a high hazard train route required by ORS 468B.345 to 468B.415
to have an approved contingency plan;
(c) Verify proof of financial responsibility required by section 15 of this 2019 Act; and
(d) Develop, review and revise the portions of  the oil spill response plan required by ORS
468B.495 and 468B.500 that relate to high hazard train routes.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 468B.412 is amended to read:
468B.412. (1) By September 30 of each  year, the Department of Environmental Quality shall
publish a report for the  previous fiscal year, commencing on July 1 and ending on June 30, that
addresses:
(a) The fees assessed under ORS 468B.405 on  covered vessels and offshore and onshore facilities;
(b) The amount collected by  the department out of the assessment under section 17 of
this 2019 Act;
[(b)] (c)  The activities of the department under ORS 468B.410 (4);
[(c)] (d) The penalties recovered by the department under ORS 468B.450 (1); and
[(d)] (e)  The activities of the department under ORS 468B.455 (2).
(2)(a) The report published by the department under this section must be in  a format that allows
for the monitoring of [ fee] collection of fees or  assessments  and related activities by the depart-
ment and  for ensuring that adequate but not excessive fees or assessments  are collected to meet
the department’s budgetary needs.
(b) The department shall make the report available to those who paid fees under  ORS
468B.405, those who paid the assessment under section 17 of this 2019 Act  and [ to] the general
public.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 22. The unit captions used in this 2019 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2019 Act.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 23. (1) Sections 5 to 8, 14 to 17,  19 and 20 of this 2019 Act and the amendments
to statutes by sections 1 to 4, 9 to 13, 18 and 21  of this 2019 Act become operative on January
1, 2020.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission and  the Department of Environmental Qual-
ity may take any action before  the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section
that is necessary for the commission or the department to exercise, on and after the  oper-
ative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, any of the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the commission and the department by sections 5 to 8, 14 to 17, 19 and  20 of
[14]
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
this 2019 Act and the amendments to statutes by sections 1 to 4, 9 to  13, 18 and 21 of this
2019 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 24. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[15]