Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $12,000,000, which shall be expended to:
(1) Provide funding  to support five additional regional health equity coalitions for a
statewide total of 15;
(2) Provide funding to regional health  equity coalitions to enable each coalition to hire
two additional full-time staff; and
(3) Allocate $2,200,000 to regional health equity coalitions to be used for:
(a) Facility costs;
(b) Costs related to programs providing  child care, transportation and interpretation and
translation services; and
(c) Stipends paid for regional health equity coalition members attendance at meetings.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2641