Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Transit Funding Task Force is established.
(2) The task force consists of 21 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President  of the Senate shall appoint one nonvoting member from among mem-
bers of the Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one nonvoting  member
from among members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint 19 members as follows:
(A) One member who represents the City of Portland;
(B) One member who represents the Amalgamated Transit Union;
(C) One member who represents a workers’ union;
(D) One member who represents a mass transit provider;
(E) One member  who represents a business association representing the Portland met-
ropolitan area;
(F) One member who represents a business association representing businesses outside
the Portland metropolitan area;
(G) One member who represents a tribal transit provider;
(H) One member who represents a transit provider that provides services in a  city with
a population of less than 100,000;
(I) One member who represents a transit provider from an urban area;
(J) One member who represents a rural transit provider;
(K) One employee of the Department of Transportation who represents the department;
(L) One member who represents a transit provider that primarily serves  people with
disabilities and seniors;
(M) One member who represents Metro, as defined in ORS 197.015;
(N) One member who represents city governments in this state;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 257
HB 4008
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(O) One member who represents county governments in this state;
(P) One member who represents  an organization that advocates for transportation
safety;
(Q) One member who represents transit riders who utilize a  low-income transit pass
program;
(R) One member who represents an employer headquartered in Oregon  with over 100
employees; and
(S) One member who represents an  employer headquartered in Oregon with 100 employ-
ees or fewer.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Determine the level of funding needed to maintain adequate transit  service statewide
that is reliable, safe and accessible and allows for population growth over time; and
(b) Explore funding mechanisms to achieve the funding  needs determined in paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The Governor shall select one member  of the task force to serve as chairperson and
another to serve  as vice chairperson, for the terms and with the duties and powers necessary
for the performance of the functions of the offices as the Governor determines.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to transportation no later than December 1, 2026. The  report must include
recommended revenue  mechanisms including the following information about each recom-
mended mechanism:
(a) The amount of revenue the mechanism is projected to raise;
(b) Who would pay; and
(c) The likelihood of the revenue source being a reliable source of revenue in  the future.
(11) The Legislative Revenue Office shall provide staff support to the task force.
(12) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative Assembly serve
as volunteers  on the task force and, unless they are qualified members, as defined in ORS
292.495, are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses.
(14) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on December 31, 2027.
[2]
HB 4008
1
2
3
4
SECTION 3.
This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]