Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Fire Marshal shall enter into a grant  agreement with Eugene
Springfield Fire under which:
(1) The State Fire Marshall agrees to issue grants in an  aggregate amount of $1,210,040
to Eugene Springfield Fire for the purpose of enabling Eugene Springfield Fire  to develop
capabilities for urban search and rescue;
(2) Eugene Springfield Fire agrees to expend grant moneys only  for personnel, training
and equipment acquisition and maintenance related to urban search and rescue; and
(3) Eugene Springfield Fire agrees to conduct urban search and rescue  operations
throughout the state when  requested by the State Fire Marshal, subject to availability of
personnel, equipment and funding.
SECTION 2. (1) The State  Fire Marshal shall study and make recommendations regarding
current urban search and rescue capabilities in this state.
(2) The State Fire Marshal shall submit a report on the  findings of the study to an ap-
propriate interim committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2020.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Fire Marshal,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount  of $1,210,040, which may be expended for the purposes described in section
1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3826