Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 to
carry out the purposes set forth in section 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(a) Entrepreneurship is critical to the growth of Oregon economies,  especially in rural
areas;
(b) Entrepreneurs require access  to resources, including talent, capital and business
services, to grow jobs and revenues; and
(c) Business resources and assets throughout this state play a critical role  in starting
and growing new companies.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department shall  distribute the moneys appropri-
ated to the department under section 1 of  this 2019 Act to the Oregon Regional Accelerator
and Innovation Network, which shall retain $1,000,000 and distribute the remainder as fol-
lows:
(a) $400,000 to Oregon Entrepreneurs Network.
(b) $200,000 to Economic Development for Central Oregon.
(c) $200,000 to Strategic Economic Development Corporation.
(d) $200,000 to Southern Oregon Regional Economic Development, Inc.
(3) Moneys distributed under this section shall be used by the recipients for the  following
purposes:
(a) Building entrepreneurial capacity in rural regions of this state.
(b) Developing regional assets  to support entrepreneurial growth in rural regions of this
state.
(c) Building a network of statewide resources to leverage and accelerate  access to re-
sources regardless of location.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3310
SB 258
1
2
on its passage.
[2]