Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission and the Educator Ad-
vancement Council shall  jointly develop a strategic plan for nontraditional pathways to
licensure for educators in Oregon.
(2) The strategic plan must, at a minimum:
(a) Address grow your own programs, apprenticeship programs  and any other related
programs.
(b) Include recommendations, as  needed, regarding standards for the programs described
in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) Be updated by June 30 of each even-numbered year.
(3) No later than July 1 of  each even-numbered year, the commission and the council
shall jointly submit a report on the  plan required under subsection (1) of this section in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education.
SECTION 2.
No later than July 1, 2026, the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission
and the Educator Advancement Council shall jointly  submit the first report required under
section 1 of this 2025 Act in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, and may include recom-
mendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to
education.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1549