Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, for the purposes of:
(1) Conducting a comprehensive review of the methodology used to produce the  report
required by Article VIII, section 8, of the Oregon Constitution; and
(2) Updating the methodology to:
(a) Take into  consideration all moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly for
public education, including moneys continuously appropriated to the Department of Educa-
tion from the Fund for Student Success; and
(b) Ensure that the quality goals used for the report would, if met, adequately  prepare
students for careers or postsecondary education.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1097