Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall study the needs and  vulnerabilities
of county-regulated small community water systems, including but not limited to the fol-
lowing topics:
(a) Water supply reliability.
(b) Source and treated water quality.
(c) Utility board and operations management.
(d) Infrastructure.
(e) Droughts, floods and earthquakes.
(f) Water rates, funding and financial stability.
(g) Regulations and safe drinking water standards.
(2) The authority shall coordinate and  consult with county environmental health agencies
on the study and may provide funding to county governments to assist with the study.
(3) The  authority shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to water no later than December 31, 2024.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $2,000,000, for distribution to the Oregon
Association of Water Utilities for purposes of implementing section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. Moneys distributed to the Oregon Association of Water  Utilities by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services under section 2 of this 2023 Act shall be  ex-
pended to:
(1) Design and construct a water utility training center to provide technical, financial and
managerial support and resources to individuals, including support and resources related  to:
(a) Water supply reliability.
(b) Source and treated water quality.
(c) Utility board and operations management.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3186
HB 3321
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
(d) Infrastructure.
(e) Droughts, floods and earthquakes.
(f) Water rates, funding and financial stability.
(g) Regulations and safe drinking water standards.
(2) Hire and employ one training specialist and  one technical assistance provider to pro-
vide the support and resources described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 4.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
[2]