Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) It is the  policy of this state to enhance the available supply of water in this state from
Columbia River Basin sources for consumptive and in-stream uses  in order to promote the
economic welfare of the state.
(2) Columbia River Basin  water supports irrigated agriculture, which is a traded sector
export industry that generates revenue from outside the state, resulting  in substantial eco-
nomic benefits to residents of this state.
(3) An  increase in agricultural production will result in new jobs and economic activity
in this state, but  the ability to increase agricultural production is limited by a lack of avail-
able Columbia River Basin water during the summer irrigation season.
(4) During the dry  summer months, consumptive and in-stream needs in the Columbia
River Basin sometimes go unsatisfied.
(5) This state  must enhance its available water supplies by increasing the storage of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2304
HB 2581
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
Columbia River Basin waters outside of the irrigation season for use  in meeting consumptive
and in-stream needs during the dry summer months.
SECTION 2. (1) The Water Resources Department shall,  in cooperation with other state
agencies, aggressively pursue the development  of new water supplies for consumptive and
in-stream uses by the storage, conservation and reuse of Columbia River Basin  waters, in-
cluding but not limited to establishing a  goal of increasing the amount of new water available
for agricultural appropriation  within the Columbia River Basin by a minimum of 100,000
acre-feet above 2018 levels.
(2) In carrying out this section,  the department and the state agencies cooperating with
the department shall consider new mitigation options for new surface water diversions.
SECTION 3. (1) The Water Resources Department may  take all actions necessary and
proper to achieve the goal of a 100,000  acre-feet increase in new water available for agricul-
tural appropriation within the Columbia River Basin as described in section  2 of this 2019
Act by December 31, 2025.
(2) The department shall report annually to the Legislative Assembly regarding progress
toward meeting the goal of a 100,000 acre-feet increase  described in subsection (1) of this
section. The department shall make the  final report under this subsection in the year that
the department achieves the minimum 100,000 acre-feet increase or 2026, whichever  occurs
first.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]