Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 320.308 is amended to read:
320.308. The following are exempt from the state transient lodging tax:
(1) A dwelling unit in a hospital, health care facility, long term  care facility or any other resi-
dential facility that is licensed, registered or certified by the Department of Human Services  or the
Oregon Health Authority.
(2) A dwelling unit in a facility providing treatment for  drug or alcohol abuse or providing
mental health treatment.
(3) A  dwelling unit that is used by members of the general public for temporary human occu-
pancy for fewer than 30 days per year. The exemption  granted under this subsection does not apply
to a dwelling unit that is rented out as transient lodging using a platform of any kind provided in
any manner by a transient lodging intermediary.
(4) A dwelling unit, the consideration for which is funded through a contract with a  government
agency and the purpose of which is to provide emergency or temporary shelter.
(5) A dwelling unit at a  nonprofit youth or church camp, nonprofit conference center or other
nonprofit  facility.
(6) A dwelling unit that is leased or otherwise  occupied by the same person for a consecutive
period of 30 days or more during the year. The requirements of this subsection are  satisfied even
if the physical dwelling unit changes during the consecutive period, if:
(a) All dwelling units occupied are within the same facility; and
(b) The person paying  consideration for the transient lodging is the same person throughout the
consecutive  period.
(7) Barracks, quarters or other facilities or  space located on installations owned, operated or
controlled by the Oregon  Military Department that are used for temporary overnight human occu-
pancy by:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1603
HB 2171
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
(a) Active or retired members or service veterans of  the Armed Forces of the United States or
the National Guard or other reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States; or
(b) Employees or agents of the Oregon Military Department.
(8) A camping site, as  defined in ORS 94.953, situated on a county fairgrounds, as defined
in ORS 565.010,  that has not more than 50 camping sites with both direct electrical hookups
and individual sewer hookups.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]