Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Bureau of Labor and Industries shall study issues  related to safe-
guarding protected labor relations activities. The bureau shall submit  a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to business and labor no later than Septem-
ber 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4451