Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall study more  cost
effective ways for state agencies to procure  accessible and accurate translation services. The
study must examine  ways to use technology as a resource. The department shall submit a
report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legis-
lation, to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to general government
no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4115