Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Abortion” means the use or prescription of a  drug, medicine, instrument or other
substance or device in order to:
(a) Intentionally kill the unborn child of a pregnant person; or
(b) Terminate a person’s pregnancy with a purpose other than:
(A) To produce a live birth and preserve the life and health of the child; or
(B) To remove a dead unborn child.
(2) “Gender-affirming treatment” means a procedure, service,  drug, device or product
that a physical or behavioral health care provider prescribes  to treat a person for
incongruence between the person’s gender identity and the person’s sex assignment at birth.
(3) “Health care facility” means an entity involved in providing health care services, in-
cluding but  not limited to a hospital, clinic, medical center, ambulatory surgical center,
physician’s office, pharmacy, nursing home, medical school, nursing  school, medical training
facility or inpatient health care facility.
(4) “Health care practitioner” means a person who is  authorized by a health professional
regulatory agency in this state to engage in the practice of a health care discipline.
(5) “In vitro human embryo” means a human  organism that is derived by fertilization,
parthenogenesis, cloning or other means from one or more human gametes or  human diploid
cells, whether cryopreserved or not, and that lives outside of a pregnant person’s body.
(6) “Participate” means to perform, practice, engage in, assist in, recommend, counsel
in favor of, make  referrals for, prescribe, dispense or administer drugs or devices or other-
wise promote or encourage.
SECTION 2.
(1) An employer may not discriminate against an  employee or prospective
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1685
HB 3330
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
employee by refusing to  reasonably accommodate the ethical, moral or religious objection
of the employee or prospective employee, unless  the employer can demonstrate that the ac-
commodation would impose an undue hardship on the program or enterprise of the employer,
to any of the following procedures:
(a) An abortion, except in a medical emergency  as described in subsection (2) of this
section, and the employee is the only person available with the necessary skills and training
to carry out the abortion.
(b) An experimental or medical procedure that destroys  an in vitro human embryo or
uses cells or tissue derived from the destruction of an in vitro human embryo.
(c) An experimental or medical procedure performed on an in vitro human embryo  that
is not related to the beneficial treatment of the in vitro human embryo.
(d) An  experimental or medical procedure performed on a developing child in an artificial
womb, at any stage of  development, that is not related to the beneficial treatment of the
child.
(e) A procedure,  including a transplant procedure, that uses fetal tissue or organs from
a source other than a dead unborn child  who died as a result of natural causes in utero,
accidental trauma or a criminal assault on the pregnant person or the unborn child.
(f) An act that intentionally causes or assists in causing the death of a person who has
voluntarily requested medication for the purpose of ending the person’s life in a manner  de-
scribed in ORS 127.800 to 127.897.
(g) An act that intentionally causes or assists in causing the  death of a person by with-
holding from the person ordinary food and water.
(h) Gender-affirming treatment.
(2)(a) An abortion is a medical emergency for purposes  of subsection (1)(a) of this section
if, in the reasonable medical judgment  of the health care provider, failure to immediately
terminate the pregnancy:
(A) Is reasonably likely to result in the pregnant person’s death; or
(B) Creates a serious risk of substantial and  irreversible physical impairment of one or
more of  the pregnant person’s major bodily functions, not including psychological or emo-
tional functions.
(b) The likelihood that a pregnant person will engage in conduct  that would result in the
person’s death or in substantial and  irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily
function does not  constitute a medical emergency for the purposes of subsection (1)(a) of this
section.
(3) A health care facility,  employer or school may not discriminate against a person with
regard to admission, hiring or firing, tenure, terms,  conditions or privileges of employment,
student status or staff status on the grounds that  the person refuses, or expresses an in-
tention to refuse, to participate in a procedure described in subsection (1) of  this section if
the refusal is based on the person’s  ethical, moral or religious convictions. Except as pro-
vided in subsection (1) of this section, a person may not be required to:
(a) Participate in a procedure described in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) Make facilities under the person’s control available to another  person so that the
other person can participate in a procedure described in subsection (1) of this section; or
(c) Provide personnel under the person’s control who will participate in a procedure de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section.
[2]
HB 3330
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
SECTION 3.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 435.240, a health care facility is not required to:
(a) Admit a patient so that the patient may  undergo a procedure described in section 2
of this 2025 Act.
(b) Permit the use of  the health care facility for the purpose of the performance of a
procedure described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2)(a) A person who is a health care practitioner,  student, faculty member or other per-
son employed by or associated with a health care facility in which a procedure described in
section 2 of this 2025 Act is performed may state in writing, and submit  to the health care
facility in a manner determined by the health care  facility and consistent with ORS 435.225,
the person’s intention, based  on the person’s ethical, moral or religious objection, to refuse
to participate in the performance of the procedure.
(b) The health care facility may not:
(A) Require a person described in this subsection to participate in a procedure described
in section 2 of this 2025 Act; or
(B) Discipline a person described in this subsection for the person’s refusal  to participate
in a procedure described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(c) A health professional regulatory agency may not discipline a person described in this
subsection over whom the agency has regulatory authority for the person’s refusal  to par-
ticipate in a procedure described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
(1)(a) A person who alleges discrimination in violation of  section 2 of this
2025 Act may bring an action against the health care facility, employer or school accused  of
violating section 2 of this 2025 Act for damages and equitable relief.
(b) A person  who alleges a violation of section 3 of this 2025 Act may bring an action
against the health care facility member  or health professional regulatory agency accused of
violating section 3 of this 2025 Act for damages and equitable relief.
(c) An action described in this subsection may be brought  against the state or any
agency, association, authority, department, office  or other body of the state or local gov-
ernment established by the Oregon Constitution or laws of this state.
(2) A court shall award  attorney fees to a plaintiff who prevails in an action under this
section.
(3) An action under  this section must be commenced within one year of the date on
which the cause of action accrues.
[3]