Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Business” means any corporation, partnership, proprietorship,  firm, enterprise,
franchise, association, organization, self-employed individual and any other  legal entity op-
erated for economic gain in Oregon.
(b) “Public affiliate” means a  business that received 20 to 34 percent of its gross receipts
for the current and two preceding tax years combined from public contracts.
(c) “Public agent” means  a business that received 50 percent or more of its gross receipts
for the current and two preceding tax years combined from public contracts.
(d) “Public contract” means a sale or other disposal, or  a purchase, lease, rental or other
acquisition by a public body, as defined  in ORS 174.109, of personal property, services, in-
cluding personal services, public improvements, public works, minor alterations, or  ordinary
repair or maintenance necessary to preserve a public improvement.
(e) “Public partner” means a business that received  35 to 49 percent of its gross receipts
for the current and two preceding tax years combined from public contracts.
(2) Any business required  to file a tax return with the Department of Revenue under ORS
chapter 314, 316, 317, 317A or 318  that has received at least 20 percent of its gross receipts
from one or more public contracts during  the tax year for which the return is due must
submit a statement setting forth the amount so received with its return.
(3) In addition to the statement required under subsection (2) of this section, the  busi-
ness shall submit a statement setting forth the percentage  of gross receipts the business has
received from public contracts for the tax year for which the return is  filed combined with
the two preceding tax years. The  statement under this subsection shall include whether the
business is a public affiliate, public partner or public agent.
(4) The statements under subsections (2) and (3)  of this section shall be written in plain
language and certified by an officer, member,  manager or other person authorized to sign a
tax return on behalf of the business.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2068
HB 2871
1
2
3
4
5
6
(5) Notwithstanding any law relating to  the confidentiality of tax return information, the
department shall make any statements filed under subsection (2) or (3) of  this section pub-
licly available.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2028.
[2]