Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In any proceeding to establish or modify  a judgment providing for parenting
time with a child who is at least 5  years of age and less than 18 years of age, the court shall
order the parties to ensure that the child receive mental health therapy. If  the proceeding
involves parenting time with  a child under five years of age, the court may, at the court’s
discretion, require the parties to ensure that the child receive mental health therapy.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4351