Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Participating financial institution” means a bank, a  commercial bank, a national
bank, a savings bank,  a savings and loan, a thrift institution, a credit union, an insurance
company, a trust company, a  mutual fund, an investment firm or other similar entity au-
thorized to do business in this state, that allows  individuals to establish a universal savings
account.
(2) “Universal savings account”  means an account established under section 5 of this 2017
Act.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Universal Savings Account Board is established to administer
sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The board consists of five members as follows:
(a) The State Treasurer or a designee of the State Treasurer.
(b) A member appointed by the Senate President.
(c) A member appointed by the Senate Minority Leader.
(d) A member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(e) A member appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.
(3) The State Treasurer shall designate the chairperson from among  the members of the
board. The chairperson shall serve at the pleasure of the State Treasurer.
(4) The term of  office of each member of the board appointed under subsection (2)(b) to
(e) of this section is  four years, but a member serves at the pleasure of the appointing au-
thority. Vacancies shall be filled by the appointing authority by  appointment for the unex-
pired term.  A member shall hold the member’s office until the appointment and qualification
of a successor. A member is eligible for reappointment.
(5) A majority of the members of the board  constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 399
SB 623
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) The State Treasurer shall provide staff support to the board.
(7) A member of the board is entitled  to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS
292.495.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Universal Savings Account  Board shall establish and main-
tain the Oregon Universal  Savings Account Program in accordance with section 4 of this 2017
Act.
(2) The board has the following powers, duties and functions:
(a) To adopt rules for  the general administration of the program and to administer
sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act.
(b) To make and enter into any  and all contracts, agreements or arrangements necessary
or desirable for carrying out the purposes of sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act.
(c) To accept donations or receive funds for the purpose of  providing incentives to ac-
count owners and potential account owners or furthering any of  the purposes of sections 1
to 9 of this 2017 Act.
(d) To encourage increased participation in the program by providing or making  available
incentives to account  owners or potential account owners, or entering into promotional ar-
rangements with third parties as the board deems desirable.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Oregon Universal Savings Account Program established by the
Oregon Universal Savings Account Board under section 3 of this 2017 Act must:
(a) Allow account holders to establish a universal savings account at  a participating fi-
nancial institution and  make after-tax contributions to the account without restrictions
based on age or income.
(b) Allow account holders to withdraw funds from a universal savings account at  any
time without penalty or tax on earnings or principal.
(c) Allow  account holders to make all investment decisions for a universal savings ac-
count and place no restrictions on the types of investments an account holder may choose.
(2) The program may not require  account holders to withdraw funds from a universal
savings account at any time.
(3) The program, the board, each board member and the  State of Oregon may not insure
any account or guarantee any rate of return or  any interest rate on any contribution. The
program, the board, each board member and the State of  Oregon are not liable for any loss
incurred by any person as a result of participating in the program.
SECTION 5. (1) An individual may establish a universal savings account by making an
initial contribution to a universal savings account at a participating financial institution.
(2) Contributions to an account may be made only in cash.
(3) Total contributions to all accounts  established by one individual may not exceed $8,000
in any calendar year.
(4) A participating financial institution shall maintain separate records and  accounting
for each account and make reports no less frequently than annually to the account owner.
(5) The Oregon Universal Savings Account Board may collect application, account or ad-
ministrative fees to defray the costs of the program.
SECTION 6.
(1) A universal savings account and any interest in an account may not  be
assignable or pledged or otherwise used to secure or obtain a loan or other advancement.
(2) Moneys or property held within an account are exempt from garnishment and are  not
subject to  execution, attachment or any other process or to the operation of any bankruptcy
[2]
SB 623
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or insolvency law.
SECTION 7. Individual account information pertaining to universal savings accounts, in-
cluding but not limited  to names, addresses, telephone numbers, personal identification in-
formation, amounts contributed and earnings on amounts contributed,  is confidential and
must be maintained as confidential:
(1) Except to the extent necessary to administer the Oregon Universal Savings  Account
Program in a manner consistent with sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act, Oregon  tax laws and
the Internal Revenue Code; or
(2) Unless the person  who provides the information or is the subject of the information
expressly agrees in writing that the information may be disclosed.
SECTION 8. The State of Oregon has no proprietary interest in the contributions or
earnings of universal savings accounts.
SECTION 9. (1) The Oregon Universal Savings Account Program Fund is established in
the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Oregon Universal Savings Account Program Fund shall be credited to the fund.  All moneys
credited to the Oregon Universal Savings Account Program Fund are  continuously appro-
priated to the Oregon Universal Savings Account  Board for the purposes of sections 1 to 9
of this 2017 Act.
(2) The Oregon Universal Savings Account Program Fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys transferred to the  fund from the federal government, other state agencies
or local governments;
(c) Moneys from the payment of fees and the payment of other moneys due the board;
(d) Any gifts or donations made to the State of Oregon for deposit in the fund; and
(e) Earnings on moneys in the fund.
(3) The board may use the moneys in the fund to pay the administrative  costs and ex-
penses of the board  and the Oregon Universal Savings Account Program, to provide or make
available incentives to account owners and potential account owners and to  further any
other purpose of sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 10.
Notwithstanding the term of office specified  by section 2 of this 2017 Act,
of the members of the  Oregon Universal Savings Account Board who are first appointed to
the board under section 2 (2)(b) to (e) of this 2017 Act:
(1) One shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2018.
(2) One shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2019.
(3) Two shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2020.
SECTION 11.
Section 12 of this  2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 12. In addition to the other modifications to federal taxable  income contained
in this chapter, there shall be subtracted from federal taxable  income the amount of any
earnings on a  universal savings account established under section 5 of this 2017 Act, to the
extent includable in gross income for federal income tax purposes.
SECTION 13. The Oregon Universal  Savings Account Board shall establish the Oregon
Universal Savings Account Program under section 3 of this 2017 Act  so that individuals may
establish universal savings accounts beginning on January 1, 2019.
SECTION 14. Section 12 of this 2017 Act applies to tax years beginning on or  after Jan-
uary 1, 2019.
[3]
SB 623
1
[4]