Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 418.321 or 418.322, if there is reason  to know, as
described in ORS 419B.636, that a child is  an Indian child, the Department of Human Services
may place the child in an out-of-state placement  without requiring the placement to be li-
censed by or under contract  with the department or to be a qualified residential treatment
program if:
(a) The placement complies with the placement preferences under ORS 419B.654; and
(b)(A) The out-of-state placement is a youth regional treatment center operated  or
funded by the Indian Health Service and serves the needs of Indian children or youth; or
(B) The Indian child’s tribe has affirmatively requested that the child be  placed in the
out-of-state placement.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Indian child” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419B.603.
(b) “Qualified residential treatment program” means a program described  in ORS 418.323.
SECTION 2.
This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 236