Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 196.540 is amended to read:
196.540. The State Department of Fish and Wildlife,  State Fish and Wildlife Commission, State
Land Board and relevant state agencies shall, consistent with existing  statutory authority, imple-
ment:
(1) The November 29, 2008, recommendations from  the Ocean Policy Advisory Council on marine
reserves by adopting rules to establish, study, monitor, evaluate and enforce a pilot  marine reserve
at Otter Rock and a pilot marine reserve and a marine protected area at Redfish Rocks.
(2) The January 25, 2011, recommendations, limited to those related to boundaries  and allow-
ances, from the State Department of Fish and Wildlife on marine reserves by adopting rules to  es-
tablish, study, monitor, evaluate and enforce:
(a) A marine reserve and two marine protected areas at Cape Falcon;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 231
HB 2903
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A marine reserve and three marine protected areas at Cascade Head; and
(c) A marine reserve, two marine protected areas and a  seabird protection area at Cape
Perpetua.
(3) The March ____, 2023, recommendations from  the Ocean Policy Advisory Council to
develop for the marine reserves:
(a) An adaptive management plan that includes the development and implementation of:
(A) Specific, measurable, achievable, relevant, and time-oriented  objectives for ecological
and socioeconomic monitoring and research;
(B) Consistent measurable indicators of social impacts;
(C) Efficient long-term ecological  sampling protocols that remain consistent and respon-
sive to adaptive management;
(D) Assessment of the capacity for the marine reserves to enhance ecological resilience
to environmental disturbances, including data collection and evaluation over  long periods of
time and on how the reserves operate as a network; and
(E) Defined goals for outreach  and engagement, including engagement with federally re-
cognized Indian tribes, and assessments  to evaluate the effectiveness in achieving these
goals.
(b) A collaborative process through which social monitoring data on the  reserves can be
interpreted to  affect policy decisions. The process should include steps for decision-making
and conflict management.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 196.545 is amended to read:
196.545. (1) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife, in consultation with  members from the
scientific and technical advisory committee established under ORS 196.451, other  relevant marine
and fishery scientists, relevant state  agencies, ocean users and coastal communities shall implement
the activities described in ORS 196.540 by  developing and amending a work plan  and adaptive
management plan consistent with ORS 196.540 .
(2) The work plan shall contain the following elements regarding the marine  reserves described
in ORS 196.540:
(a) A biological assessment, including information  on habitat characterization, biological re-
sources, local knowledge and, for the established [ pilot] marine reserves, monitoring plans.
(b) A socioeconomic assessment, including a description of human  uses, net effects on sport and
commercial fisheries and communities and, for the  established [ pilot] marine reserves, monitoring
plans.
(c) Formation of community teams, with  diverse and balanced stakeholder representation that
includes local government, recreational fishing industry, commercial  fishing industry, nonfishing in-
dustry, recreationalists, conservation, coastal watershed councils, relevant marine and avian scien-
tists, to collaborate and develop recommendations  as needed for potential  changes to  marine
reserves, considering the biological and socioeconomic information developed under this
section.  Collaboration  may be facilitated by a neutral outside party hired through a  competitive
bidding process.
(d) Provision of information on the process and data gathered  to interested parties and made
available to the public.
(e) Development of scientifically based goals specific to each of the marine  reserve sites, incor-
porating continuity and cumulative outcomes, benefits and impacts.
[(f) Provision of baseline data on Oregon’s territorial sea, as defined in ORS 196.405. ]
[2]
HB 2903
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
[(g)] (f)  Development  of an enforcement plan in consultation with the Oregon State Police and
representatives from affected user groups.
[(h)] (g)  Use of communities and volunteers to assist in  implementing the work plan where fea-
sible and practical.
(h) Continued engagement of communities, including commercial and recreational  fishing
fleets, in order to ensure that marine reserve science is useful to communities and that the
department incorporates community and fishermen knowledge into ongoing  research and
monitoring efforts.
[(3) The data and recommendations produced from the  work plan and other available nearshore
data shall be used by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, in consultation with the Ocean  Policy
Advisory Council, to recommend the number, size, location and restriction limits of the  potential sites
for marine  reserve designation, consistent with Executive Order 08-07. If, through this process, it is
determined that other appropriate sites need to be considered or that potential  sites are not consistent
with Executive Order 08-07, then the data and recommendations produced shall be provided to  the
public, the State Department of Fish  and Wildlife and other relevant state agencies for future purposes
relevant to nearshore management. ]
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $800,000, to implement ORS 196.540 (3).
SECTION 4.  ORS 196.542 is amended to read:
196.542. [(1) The State Fish and Wildlife Commission may not impose  prohibitions on fishing by
rule pursuant to ORS 196.540 until  the baseline data specified in ORS 196.545 (2)(f) have been collected
consistent with scientifically based monitoring plans. ]
[(2)] In implementing the activities described  in ORS 196.540 pursuant to ORS 196.545, the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife shall use local resources where feasible and practical.
[3]