Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the  General Fund, the following amounts to be distributed to Oregon State Uni-
versity to  carry out, in partnership with the Human Access Project, efforts to mitigate
harmful algal blooms in the Ross Island lagoon:
(1) $315,000 for fish survey expenses.
(2) $485,000 for United States Geological Survey monitoring expenses.
(3) $950,000 for engineering and permitting expenses.
(4) $40,000 for Oregon State University project management expenses.
(5) $30,000 for Human Access Project project management expenses.
(6) $197,000 for contingency expenses.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3872