Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there are appro-
priated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  distribution to the following
entities for the following purposes:
(1) $4,813,200 to the Blue Mountain Early Learning  Hub to implement a child success
system of equitable development opportunities for children during  the first 1,000 days of life,
from conception through age two, for Umatilla, Union and Morrow Counties.
(2) $1,814,500 to the Yamhill  Community Care Early Learning Hub to implement a child
success system  of equitable development opportunities for children during the first 1,000 days
of life, from conception through age two, for Yamhill County.
(3) $835,000 to the Marion and Polk Early Learning Hub to implement a child  success
system of equitable development opportunities for children during  the first 1,000 days of life,
from conception through age two, for Marion and Polk Counties.
(4) $422,500 to the Early Childhood Hub of Lane County  to implement a child success
system of equitable development opportunities for children during  the first 1,000 days of life,
from conception through age two, for Lane County.
(5) $3,550,000 to  the Southern Oregon Education Service District for Southern Oregon
Success to implement a child success system of equitable  development opportunities for
children during the first 1,000 days of life, from conception through age  two, for Josephine
and Jackson Counties.
(6) $100,000 to the  Early Learning Hub of Linn, Benton and Lincoln Counties to imple-
ment a child success  system of equitable development opportunities for children during the
first 1,000 days of life, from conception  through age two, for Linn, Benton and Lincoln
Counties and to develop a strategy to scale child  success systems to other regions of Oregon.
(7) $273,000 to the Women’s Foundation of Oregon, as a fiscal sponsor,  to be distributed
to Black Futures for Perinatal  Health to develop a birthing village for the Portland metro-
politan area.
SECTION 2. (1) No later than  June 30, 2026, each entity that receives a distribution of
moneys from the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services under section 1 of this 2025
Act shall, in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245, submit a report to the Early Learning
Council and the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to early childhood.
[2]
SB 1167
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
The report must include:
(a) A description of how the moneys were used to support the  development of successful
children;
(b) A discussion of how objective metrics demonstrate that the use of  the moneys was
an effective means to support the development of successful children; and
(c) An evaluation of the benefits, opportunities and challenges experienced in  using the
moneys as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) The entities may elect to prepare and submit a joint  report under subsection (1) of
this section.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2025.
[3]