Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 84.052 is amended to read:
84.052. (1) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 84.034 (6), each governmental  agency of this
state shall [ determine whether, and the extent to which,  it will ], to the extent practicable,  send and
accept electronic records and electronic  signatures to and from other persons and otherwise create,
generate, communicate, store,  process, use and rely upon electronic records and electronic signa-
tures.
(2) To the extent that  a governmental agency uses electronic records and electronic signatures
under subsection (1) of this section, the governmental  agency, giving due consideration to security,
may specify:
(a) The manner and format in which the electronic records must be created, generated,  sent,
communicated, received and stored and the systems established for those purposes;
[(b) If electronic records must be signed by electronic  means, the type of electronic signature re-
quired, the manner and format in which  the electronic signature must be affixed to the electronic record
and the identity  of, or criteria that must be met by, any third party used by a person filing a document
to facilitate the process; ]
[(c)] (b)  Control processes and  procedures as appropriate to ensure adequate preservation, dis-
position, integrity, security, confidentiality and auditability of electronic records; and
[(d)] (c)  Any other required attributes for  electronic records that are specified for corresponding
nonelectronic records or reasonably necessary under the circumstances.
[(3) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 84.034 (6), ORS 84.001 to 84.061 do not  require a gov-
ernmental agency of this state to use or permit the use of electronic records or electronic signatures. ]
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, the  terms “electronic record,” “electronic sig-
nature” and “governmental agency” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 84.004.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1939
SB 240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) No later than July 1 of each even-numbered year,  each governmental agency of this
state shall submit a plan to the State Chief Information Officer for the use of electronic re-
cords and electronic signatures in an  effort to digitize government processes and work flows
and to promote the use of intuitive and adaptive electronic forms.
(3) No later than July 1  of each even-numbered year, each governmental agency of this
state shall submit to the State Chief Information Officer  a website modernization plan de-
tailing improvements to the governance of digital services, including modernizing websites
and enhancing the use of data analytics. Each governmental agency website  modernization
plan must:
(a) Demonstrate plans  for the effective delivery of digital services and the utilization of
data analytics and related tools to determine user goals, needs and behaviors.
(b) Include plans to ensure the effective  rendering of all publicly facing websites on mo-
bile devices.
(c) Include plans to increase the use of data analytics to improve website  operation and
enhance digital service delivery.
(d) Be posted on the agency’s publicly facing websites.
(4) The State Chief Information Officer may  adopt any rules necessary for implementa-
tion of this section.
SECTION 3.
 Section 2 of this 2019 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 2. (1) As  used in this section, the terms “electronic record,” “electronic signature” and
“governmental agency” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 84.004.
(2) Each governmental agency of this state shall  ensure that each of its websites in-
tended for use by the public is:
(a) Effectively renderable on mobile devices; and
(b) Accessible for persons with disabilities.
[(2)] (3)  No  later than July 1 of each even-numbered year, each governmental agency of this
state shall submit a plan to the State Chief Information Officer for the use of electronic  records and
electronic signatures in an effort to digitize government processes and  work flows and to promote
the use of intuitive and adaptive electronic forms.
[(3)] (4)  No  later than July 1 of each even-numbered year, each governmental agency of this
state shall submit to the State Chief Information Officer a website modernization  plan detailing im-
provements to the governance of digital  services, including modernizing websites and enhancing the
use of data analytics. Each governmental agency website modernization plan must:
(a) Demonstrate plans for the effective delivery of digital services and the utilization  of data
analytics and related tools to determine user goals, needs and behaviors.
(b) Include plans to  ensure the continuation of  effective rendering of all publicly facing
websites on mobile devices.
(c) Include plans to increase the use of data  analytics to improve website operation and enhance
digital service delivery.
(d) Be posted on the agency’s publicly facing websites.
[(4)] (5)  The State Chief Information Officer may adopt any rules  necessary for implementation
of this section.
SECTION 4.
The amendments to ORS 84.052 by section  1 of this 2019 Act apply to any
electronic record  or electronic signature created, generated, sent, communicated, received
or stored on or after July 1, 2020.
[2]
SB 240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
SECTION 5. The reports described in section 2  of this 2019 Act are first due no later than
July 1, 2020.
SECTION 6. (1) The amendments to ORS 84.052 by section 1 of  this 2019 Act become op-
erative on July 1, 2020.
(2) Section 2 of this 2019 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2020.
(3) The amendments to section 2  of this 2019 Act by section 3 of this 2019 Act become
operative on July 1, 2021.
SECTION 7.
This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]