Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 459A.715 is amended to read:
459A.715. (1) A dealer may refuse to accept from any person, and  a distributor or importer may
refuse to accept from a dealer, any empty beverage container that does  not state thereon a refund
value as established by ORS 459A.705.
(2) A dealer may refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of:
(a) Empty beverage containers if the place of business  of the dealer and the kind of empty
beverage containers are included  in an order of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission ap-
proving a full-service redemption center under ORS 459A.735.
(b) Any beverage container visibly containing or contaminated by a substance other than water,
residue of the original contents or ordinary dust.
(c)(A) More than 144 individual beverage containers returned by  any one person during one day,
if the dealer occupies a space of 5,000 or more square feet in a single area.
(B) More than 50 individual beverage containers returned by any one person during one day,  if
the dealer occupies a space of less than 5,000 square feet in a single area.
(d) Any beverage  container that is damaged to the extent that the brand appearing on the con-
tainer cannot be identified.
(3) The commission  shall develop and provide to dealers notices that describe the reasons a
dealer may refuse to accept and to pay the refund value for empty beverage  containers under sub-
section (2) of this section. The notices may contain additional information as determined by  the
commission.
(4) A dealer  must post in each area where beverage containers are received a notice provided
to the dealer under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) A dealer that holds a winery  license under ORS 471.223 may, at the premises of the
winery, refuse to accept and to  pay the refund value for any empty beverage container that
is of a kind, size and brand that the dealer does not sell at the winery.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3642