Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The provisions of the Audiology and  Speech-Language Pathology Interstate
Compact are as follows:
Audiology and Speech-Language
Pathology Interstate Compact
SECTION 1. PURPOSE
The practice of  audiology and speech-language pathology occurs in the state where the
patient/client/student is located at the  time of the patient/client/student encounter. This
Compact preserves the regulatory authority of states to protect public health  and safety
through the current system of state licensure.
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
1. Increase public access to audiology and  speech-language pathology services by provid-
ing for the mutual recognition of other member state licenses;
2. Enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health and safety;
3. Encourage the cooperation of  member states in regulating multistate audiology and
speech-language pathology practice;
4. Support spouses of relocating active duty military personnel;
5. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative and disciplinary  information between
member states;
6. Allow a remote state to hold a provider of services with a  compact privilege in that
state accountable to that state’s practice standards; and
7. Allow for  the use of telehealth technology to facilitate increased access to audiology
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3208
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and speech-language pathology services.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the  following definitions shall
apply:
A. “Active duty military” means full-time duty status in the  active uniformed service of
the United States, including members of the National  Guard and Reserve on active duty or-
ders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. chapters 1209 and 1211.
B. “Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable or  criminal action per-
mitted by a state’s laws which is imposed by a licensing board or other  authority against an
audiologist or speech-language pathologist, including actions against an individual’s  license
or privilege to practice such as revocation,  suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee
or restriction on the licensee’s practice.
C. “Alternative program” means a non-disciplinary monitoring  process approved by an
audiology or speech-language pathology licensing board to address impaired practitioners.
D. “Audiologist” means an individual who is licensed by a state to practice audiology.
E. “Audiology” means the care and services provided by a licensed  audiologist as set
forth in the member state’s statutes and rules.
F. “Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Compact Commission”  or “Commission”
means the national  administrative body whose membership consists of all states that have
enacted the Compact.
G. “Audiology and speech-language pathology licensing board,” “audiology  licensing
board,” “speech-language pathology licensing  board” or “licensing board” means the agency
of a state that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of audiologists  and/or speech-
language pathologists.
H. “Compact privilege” means the authorization granted by a remote state to  allow a
licensee from another member state to  practice as an audiologist or speech-language
pathologist in the remote state under its laws and rules. The practice  of audiology or
speech-language pathology occurs in the  member state where the patient/client/student is
located at the time of the patient/client/student encounter.
I. “Current significant investigative information” means  investigative information that
a licensing board,  after an inquiry or investigation that includes notification and an oppor-
tunity for the audiologist or speech-language pathologist to respond, if required by state law,
has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved  true, would indicate more than a minor
infraction.
J. “Data  system” means a repository of information about licensees, including, but not
limited to, continuing education, examination,  licensure, investigative, compact privilege and
adverse action.
K. “Encumbered license” means a license in  which an adverse action restricts the prac-
tice of audiology or speech-language pathology by the  licensee and said adverse action has
been reported to the National Practitioners Data Bank.
L. “Executive Committee” means a group of directors elected or appointed to  act on be-
half of, and within the powers granted to them by, the Commission.
M. “Home state” means the member state that is the  licensee’s primary state of resi-
dence.
N. “Impaired practitioner” means individuals  whose professional practice is adversely
[2]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
affected by substance abuse, addiction or other health-related conditions.
O. “Licensee” means an individual who currently holds  an authorization from the state
licensing board to practice as an audiologist or speech-language pathologist.
P. “Member state” means a state that has enacted the Compact.
Q. “Privilege to practice” means a legal authorization permitting the practice of
audiology or speech-language pathology in a remote state.
R. “Remote state” means a member state other than the home state where  a licensee is
exercising or seeking to exercise the compact privilege.
S. “Rule” means a regulation,  principle or directive promulgated by the Commission that
has the force of law.
T. “Single-state license” means an audiology or speech-language pathology  license issued
by a member  state that authorizes practice only within the issuing state and does not include
a privilege to practice in any other member state.
U. “Speech-language pathologist” means an individual who is  licensed by a state to
practice speech-language pathology.
V. “Speech-language pathology” means the care and services  provided by a licensed
speech-language pathologist as set forth in the member state’s statutes and rules.
W. “State” means  any state, commonwealth, district or territory of the United States
that regulates the practice of audiology and speech-language pathology.
X. “State practice laws” means a member state’s laws, rules and regulations that govern
the practice of audiology or speech-language pathology, define the scope of audiology  or
speech-language pathology practice and create the methods and grounds for imposing disci-
pline.
Y. “Telehealth” means the application of telecommunication technology to  deliver
audiology or speech-language pathology  services at a distance for assessment, intervention
and/or consultation.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. A license issued to an audiologist or speech-language  pathologist by a home state to
a resident in that state shall be recognized by  each member state as authorizing an
audiologist or speech-language pathologist to practice audiology or  speech-language
pathology, under a privilege to practice, in each member state.
B. A state must implement or utilize procedures for  considering the criminal history
records of applicants for initial privilege to practice. These procedures shall  include the
submission of  fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants for the pur-
pose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal  history record information from the Federal Bureau
of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state’s criminal records.
1. A member  state must fully implement a criminal background check requirement,
within a time frame established by rule, by receiving  the results of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation record search on criminal background checks and use the results in  making
licensure decisions.
2. Communication between a member state and the Commission and among member
states regarding the verification of eligibility  for licensure through the Compact shall not
include any information received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation relating  to a
federal criminal records check performed by a member state under Public Law 92-544.
C. Upon application for a privilege to practice,  the licensing board in the issuing remote
[3]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
state shall ascertain, through the data system, whether the applicant  has ever held, or is the
holder of, a license  issued by any other state, whether there are any encumbrances on any
license or privilege to practice held by the applicant and whether any adverse action has been
taken against any license or privilege to practice held by the applicant.
D. Each member state shall  require an applicant to obtain or retain a license in the home
state and meet the home state’s qualifications  for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well
as all other applicable state laws.
E. For an audiologist:
1. Must meet one of the following educational requirements:
a. On or before, December 31, 2007, has graduated with a master’s degree or doctorate
in audiology, or  equivalent degree regardless of degree name, from a program that is ac-
credited by an  accrediting agency recognized by the Council for Higher Education Accredi-
tation, or  its successor, or by the United States Department of Education and operated by
a college or university accredited by a regional or  national accrediting organization recog-
nized by the licensing board;
b. On  or after, January 1, 2008, has graduated with a Doctoral degree in audiology, or
equivalent degree, regardless  of degree name, from a program that is accredited by an ac-
crediting agency recognized by the Council  for Higher Education Accreditation, or its suc-
cessor, or  by the United States Department of Education and operated by a college or
university accredited by a regional or national accrediting organization recognized  by the li-
censing board; or
c. Has graduated from an audiology  program that is housed in an institution of higher
education outside of the United States:
(a) For which the program and institution have been approved by the  authorized ac-
crediting body in the applicable country; and
(b) The degree program has been verified by an independent credentials review  agency
to be comparable to a state licensing board-approved program;
2. Has  completed a supervised clinical practicum experience from an accredited educa-
tional institution or its cooperating programs as required by the Commission;
3. Has successfully passed a national examination approved by the Commission;
4. Holds an active, unencumbered license;
5. Has not been convicted or found guilty, and has not entered into  an agreed disposition,
of a felony related to  the practice of audiology, under applicable state or federal criminal law;
and
6. Has a valid United States Social  Security or National Practitioner Identification num-
ber.
F. For a speech-language pathologist:
1. Must meet one of the following educational requirements:
a. Has graduated with  a master’s degree from a speech-language pathology program that
is accredited by an organization recognized  by the United States Department of Education
and operated by a college or university accredited by a regional or national  accrediting or-
ganization recognized by the licensing board; or
b. Has graduated from a speech-language pathology  program that is housed in an insti-
tution of higher education outside of the United States:
(a) For which  the program and institution have been approved by the authorized ac-
[4]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
crediting body in the applicable country; and
(b) The  degree program has been verified by an independent credentials review agency
to be comparable to a state licensing board-approved program;
2. Has completed a supervised clinical practicum experience from an educational institu-
tion or its cooperating programs as required by the Commission;
3. Has completed  a supervised postgraduate professional experience as required by the
Commission;
4. Has successfully passed a national examination approved by the Commission;
5. Holds an active, unencumbered license;
6. Has not been convicted or found guilty, and has not entered into  an agreed disposition,
of a felony related to the practice of speech-language pathology, under  applicable state or
federal criminal law; and
7. Has a valid United States Social  Security or National Practitioner Identification num-
ber.
G. The privilege to practice is derived from the home state license.
H. An audiologist or speech-language  pathologist practicing in a member state must
comply with the state practice laws of the state in which the  client is located at the time
service is provided. The practice  of audiology and speech-language pathology shall include all
audiology and speech-language pathology practice as defined by the state  practice laws of the
member state in which the client is  located. The practice of audiology and speech-language
pathology in a member state under a privilege to practice  shall subject an audiologist or
speech-language pathologist to the jurisdiction of the licensing board, the courts and the laws
of the member state in which the client is located at the time service is provided.
I. Individuals not  residing in a member state shall continue to be able to apply for a
member state’s  single-state license as provided under the laws of each member state. How-
ever, the single-state license granted to  these individuals shall not be recognized as granting
the privilege to  practice audiology or speech-language pathology in any other member state.
Nothing in this  Compact shall affect the requirements established by a member state for the
issuance of a single-state license.
J. Member states may charge a fee for granting a compact privilege.
K. Member states must comply with the bylaws and rules  and regulations of the Com-
mission.
SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. To exercise  the compact privilege under the terms and provisions of the Compact, the
audiologist or speech-language pathologist shall:
1. Hold an active license in the home state;
2. Have no encumbrance on any state license;
3. Be eligible for a compact privilege in any member state in accordance with Section 3;
4. Have not had any adverse action against any license or compact privilege  within the
previous two years from date of application;
5. Notify the Commission that  the licensee is seeking the compact privilege within a re-
mote state(s);
6. Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the compact privilege; and
7. Report to the Commission adverse action taken by any non-member state within 30
days from the date the adverse action is taken.
[5]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
B. For  the purposes of the compact privilege, an audiologist or speech-language
pathologist shall only hold one home state license at a time.
C. Except as provided in Section 6, if  an audiologist or speech-language pathologist
changes primary state of residence by moving between two member states,  the audiologist
or speech-language pathologist must apply for licensure in the new home state, and the  li-
cense issued by the  prior home state shall be deactivated in accordance with applicable rules
adopted by the Commission.
D. The  audiologist or speech-language pathologist may apply for licensure in advance of
a change in primary state of residence.
E. A license shall  not be issued by the new home state until the audiologist or speech-
language pathologist provides satisfactory evidence of a change in primary state of residence
to the new home state and satisfies  all applicable requirements to obtain a license from the
new home state.
F. If an audiologist or speech-language pathologist  changes primary state of residence
by moving from a member state to a non-member state, the license  issued by the prior home
state shall convert to a single-state license, valid only in the former home state.
G. The compact privilege is valid until the expiration  date of the home state license. The
licensee must comply  with the requirements of Section 4A to maintain the compact privilege
in the remote state.
H. A licensee  providing audiology or speech-language pathology services in a remote state
under the  compact privilege shall function within the laws and regulations of the remote
state.
I. A  licensee providing audiology or speech-language pathology services in a remote state
is subject to  that state’s regulatory authority. A remote state may, in accordance with due
process and that state’s laws, remove a  licensee’s compact privilege in the remote state for
a specific period of time, impose fines and/or take any other necessary  actions to protect the
health and safety of its citizens.
J. If a home state license is encumbered, the licensee shall lose the compact privilege  in
any remote state until the following occur:
1. The home state license is no longer encumbered; and
2. Two years have elapsed from the date of the adverse action.
K. Once an encumbered license in the home state is restored to  good standing, the
licensee must meet the requirements of Section 4A to obtain  a compact privilege in any re-
mote state.
L. Once the requirements  of Section 4J have been met, the licensee must meet the re-
quirements in Section 4A to obtain a compact privilege in a remote state.
SECTION 5. COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE TELEHEALTH
Member states  shall recognize the right of an audiologist or speech-language pathologist,
licensed by a home state in accordance with Section 3 and  under rules promulgated by the
Commission, to practice audiology or speech-language pathology  in any member state via
telehealth under a privilege to practice as provided in this Compact and rules promulgated
by the Commission.
SECTION 6. ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY PERSONNEL OR THEIR SPOUSES
Active duty military personnel, or their spouse, shall designate a home  state where the
individual has a current license in good standing. The individual may retain the home state
[6]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
designation during the period the service member is on active duty. Subsequent to desig-
nating a home  state, the individual shall only change their home state through application
for licensure in the new state.
SECTION 7. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. In addition to  the other powers conferred by state law, a remote state shall have the
authority, in accordance with existing state due process law, to:
1. Take adverse action against an audiologist’s or speech-language  pathologist’s privilege
to practice within that member state.
2. Issue subpoenas for both  hearings and investigations that require the attendance and
testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas  issued by a licensing
board in a member state for the attendance and testimony  of witnesses or the production
of evidence from another member state shall be enforced in the latter state by any  court of
competent jurisdiction, according to the  practice and procedure of that court applicable to
subpoenas issued in proceedings  pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any wit-
ness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees required by the  service statutes of the
state in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
3. Only the home  state shall have the power to take adverse action against a audiologist’s
or speech-language pathologist’s license issued by the home state.
B. For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state  shall give the same priority and
effect to reported conduct  received from a member state as it would if the conduct had oc-
curred within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state  laws to
determine appropriate action.
C. The home state shall complete any  pending investigations of an audiologist or
speech-language pathologist who changes primary state of residence during  the course of the
investigations. The home  state shall also have the authority to take appropriate action(s) and
shall promptly report the conclusions of the investigations to the administrator of the data
system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall  promptly
notify the new home state of any adverse actions.
D. If otherwise permitted by state law, the member state may recover  from the affected
audiologist or speech-language pathologist the costs of  investigations and disposition of cases
resulting from  any adverse action taken against that audiologist or speech-language
pathologist.
E. The member state may take adverse action based on the factual findings of the remote
state, provided that the  member state follows the member state’s own procedures for taking
the adverse action.
F. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to  the authority granted to a member state by its respective audiology or
speech-language pathology practice act or other applicable state law,  any member state may
participate with other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
2. Member states shall share any  investigative, litigation or compliance materials in
furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under this Compact.
G. If adverse action  is taken by the home state against an audiologist’s or speech-
language pathologist’s license, the audiologist’s  or speech-language pathologist’s privilege to
practice in all  other member states shall be deactivated until all encumbrances have been
removed from the state license. All home state disciplinary orders  that impose adverse
[7]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
action against an audiologist’s or speech-language pathologist’s license shall include a state-
ment that the audiologist’s or speech-language  pathologist’s privilege to practice is deacti-
vated in all member states during the pendency of the order.
H. If a member state takes adverse action, it shall  promptly notify the administrator of
the data system. The administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the  home state
of any adverse actions by remote states.
I. Nothing in this Compact shall override a member state’s decision  that participation in
an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action.
SECTION 8. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE AUDIOLOGY AND  SPEECH-LANGUAGE
PATHOLOGY COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The Compact member  states hereby create and establish a joint public agency known
as the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Compact Commission:
1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact states.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall be brought
solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal  office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the
extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity.
B. Membership, Voting and Meetings
1. Each member state shall  have two delegates selected by that member state’s licensing
board. The delegates shall be current members of the licensing board. One shall be  an
audiologist and one shall be a speech-language pathologist.
2. An additional five delegates, who are either a public member or board  administrator
from a state licensing board, shall be chosen by the Executive Committee from  a pool of
nominees provided by the Commission at Large.
3. Any  delegate may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the
state from which the delegate is appointed.
4. The member state board shall fill any  vacancy occurring on the Commission, within
90 days.
5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote with regard to  the promulgation of rules
and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate  in the business
and affairs of the Commission.
6. A delegate shall vote in person or by other means as provided in the bylaws. The by-
laws may provide  for delegates’ participation in meetings by telephone or other means of
communication.
7. The Commission  shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional
meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish bylaws;
3. Establish a Code of Ethics;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take actions as are consistent with  the provisions of this Compact and the
bylaws;
6. Promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and  coordinate implementation and adminis-
[8]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tration of this Compact. The rules shall  have the force and effect of law and shall be binding
in all member states, except that only the rules adopted by  the State Board of Examiners for
Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology  shall have the force and effect of law and shall
be binding on the State of Oregon;
7. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of  the Commission,
provided that the standing of any state  audiology or speech-language pathology licensing
board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept or contract  for services of personnel, including, but not limited to,
employees of a member state;
10. Hire employees, elect  or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant indi-
viduals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this  Compact and to establish the
Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to  conflicts of interest, qualifications
of personnel and other related personnel matters;
11. Accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of  money, equipment, supplies,
materials and services and to receive, utilize and dispose of  the same; provided that at all
times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of interest;
12. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to  own, hold,
improve or use, any property, real, personal or mixed; provided that at all times the Com-
mission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety;
13. Sell convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise  dispose of any
property real, personal or mixed;
14. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
15. Borrow money;
16. Appoint committees, including standing committees  composed of members, and other
interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
17. Provide and receive information from,  and cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;
18. Establish and elect an Executive Committee; and
19. Perform other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve  the purposes
of this Compact consistent with the state regulation of audiology and  speech-language
pathology licensure and practice.
D. The Executive Committee
The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the Commission ac-
cording to the terms of this Compact:
1. The Executive Committee shall be composed of 10 members:
a. Seven voting members who are elected by the Commission from the current member-
ship of the Commission;
b. Two ex-officios,  consisting of one nonvoting member from a recognized national
audiology professional association and one  nonvoting member from a recognized national
speech-language pathology association; and
c. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from the recognized membership organization  of the
audiology and speech-language pathology licensing boards.
E. The ex-officio members shall be selected by their respective organizations.
1. The Commission may remove any member of the  Executive Committee as provided in
bylaws.
[9]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
2. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
3. The Executive Committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities:
a. Recommend to the entire Commission changes to the rules or bylaws,  changes to this
Compact legislation, fees paid by Compact member states  such as annual dues and any
commission Compact fee charged to licensees for the compact privilege;
b. Ensure Compact administration services are appropriately provided,  contractual or
otherwise;
c. Prepare and recommend the budget;
d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the Commission;
e. Monitor Compact  compliance of member states and provide compliance reports to the
Commission;
f. Establish additional committees as necessary; and
g. Other duties as provided in rules or bylaws.
4. Meetings of the Commission
All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be  given in
the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in Section 10.
5. The Commission or the  Executive Committee or other committees of the Commission
may convene in a closed, non-public meeting if the Commission  or Executive Committee or
other committees of the Commission must discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a member state with its obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or  other matters, practices or procedures
related to specific employees  or other matters related to the Commission’s internal person-
nel practices and procedures;
c. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation;
d. Negotiation of contracts  for the purchase, lease or sale of goods, services or real es-
tate;
e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
f. Disclosure  of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged
or confidential;
g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute  a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
i. Disclosure of information related to any investigative reports prepared  by or on behalf
of or  for use of the Commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investi-
gation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to this Compact; or
j. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state statute.
6. If a meeting, or portion of  a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the
Commission’s legal counsel or designee  shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall
reference each relevant exempting provision.
7. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and  clearly describe all matters dis-
cussed in a meeting and shall  provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefore,  including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered
in connection with an  action shall be identified in minutes. All minutes and documents of a
closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of  the Com-
mission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
[10]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
8. Financing of the Commission
a. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of
its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.
b. The Commission  may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources, donations and
grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services.
c. The Commission may  levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member
state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of  the
Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient  to cover its annual
budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources.  The ag-
gregate annual assessment  amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined
by the Commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.
d. An assessment levied, or any other financial obligation imposed, under  this Compact
is effective against the State of Oregon only to the extent  that moneys necessary to pay the
assessment or meet the financial obligations  have been deposited in an account established
by the State  Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology pursuant to
ORS 681.480.
9. The Commission shall not incur obligations of  any kind prior to securing the funds
adequate to meet the same; nor shall the  Commission pledge the credit of any of the member
states, except by and with the authority of the member state.
10. The Commission shall keep  accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be  subject to the audit and accounting
procedures established under  its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds
handled by the Commission shall be audited yearly by  a certified or licensed public account-
ant, and the  report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report
of the Commission.
F. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of  the Com-
mission shall be immune from suit and liability,  either personally or in their official capacity,
for any claim  for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability
caused by or arising  out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that
the person against whom the claim is made had a  reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or  responsibilities; provided that nothing
in this paragraph shall be construed  to protect any person from suit and/or liability for any
damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional or willful  or wanton misconduct
of that person.
2. The Commission  shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee or
representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising  out
of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made
had a  reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall  be construed to prohibit that
person from retaining their own counsel;  and provided further, that the actual or alleged act,
error or omission did not result from that person’s intentional  or willful or wanton miscon-
duct.
3. The  Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive di-
[11]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rector, employee or representative of the Commission for  the amount of any settlement or
judgment obtained against  that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or
omission that occurred within the scope of Commission  employment, duties or responsibil-
ities, or that the person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the  scope of
Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that the actual or alleged act,
error or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
SECTION 9. DATA SYSTEM
A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance and utilization  of a
coordinated database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse action and investi-
gative information on all licensed individuals in member states.
B. Notwithstanding any other  provision of state law to the contrary, a member state
shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all individuals to  whom this Compact
is applicable as required by the rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a license or compact privilege;
4. Non-confidential information related to alternative program participation;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s) for denial; and
6. Other information that may  facilitate the administration of this Compact, as deter-
mined by the rules of the Commission.
C. Investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any member state shall only be
available to other member states.
D. The Commission shall promptly notify all  member states of any adverse action taken
against a licensee or an individual  applying for a license. Adverse action information per-
taining to a licensee in any member state shall be available to any other member state.
E. Member states contributing information to  the data system may designate informa-
tion that may not be shared with the public without the express  permission of the contrib-
uting state.
F. Any information submitted to  the data system that is subsequently required to be
expunged by the laws of the member  state contributing the information shall be removed
from the data system.
SECTION 10. RULEMAKING
A. 1. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking  powers pursuant to the criteria set
forth in this Section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall  become
binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment.
2. Notwithstanding Section 10 A1, the State Board of  Examiners for Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology shall review the rules of  the Commission. The board may approve
and adopt the rules of the Commission as rules of the board. The State of Oregon is subject
to a rule of the Commission only if the rule of the Commission is adopted by the board.
B. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule, by  enactment of
a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt this Compact  within four years
of the date of adoption of the rule, the rule shall have no further force and effect in  any
member state.
C. Rules or amendments to the rules  shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of
[12]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Commission.
D. Prior to promulgation and adoption of  a final rule or rules by the Commission, and
at least 30 days in advance of the meeting at which the rule shall be considered  and voted
upon, the Commission shall file a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible platform; and
2. On the website of each member state audiology or speech-language pathology licensing
board or other publicly accessible platform or the publication in  which each state would
otherwise publish proposed rules.
E. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The proposed time, date and location of the  meeting in which the rule shall be con-
sidered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the proposed rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit  notice to the Commission of their
intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.
F. Prior to the adoption of a proposed  rule, the Commission shall allow persons to submit
written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
G. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a  public hearing before it adopts a rule
or amendment if a hearing is requested by:
1. At least 25 persons;
2. A state or federal governmental subdivision or agency; or
3. An association having at least 25 members.
H. If a hearing is held  on the proposed rule or amendment, the Commission shall publish
the place, time and date of the scheduled public  hearing. If the hearing is held via electronic
means, the Commission shall publish the mechanism for access to the electronic hearing.
1. All persons wishing to be  heard at the hearing shall notify the executive director of
the Commission or other designated member in writing of  their desire to appear and testify
at the hearing not less than five business days before the scheduled date of the hearing.
2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing  each person who wishes to com-
ment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing.
3. All hearings shall be recorded.  A copy of the recording shall be made available on re-
quest.
4. Nothing in this section  shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule.
Rules may be grouped  for the convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
section.
I. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business  on the scheduled
hearing date if  the hearing was not held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral
comments received.
J. If no written notice  of intent to attend the public hearing by interested parties is re-
ceived, the Commission may proceed with promulgation of the  proposed rule without a public
hearing.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members,  take final action on the pro-
posed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking
record and the full text of the rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency  exists, the Commission may consider and
[13]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
adopt an emergency  rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided
that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in this section shall  be
retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days
after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency  rule is
one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds; or
3. Meet a deadline for the  promulgation of an administrative rule that is established by
federal law or rule.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct  revisions
to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors,
errors in format, errors  in consistency or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions
shall be posted on the  website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge
by any person for  a period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on
grounds that  the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made
in writing and delivered to the chair of the Commission prior to the end of the notice period.
If no challenge is made, the revision shall take effect without further action. If  the revision
is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.
SECTION 11. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by  a member state, the Commission shall attempt to resolve disputes
related to the Compact that arise  among member states and between member and non-
member states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for  both mediation and binding
dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
B. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable  exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the pro-
visions and rules of this Compact.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal  action in the United States Dis-
trict Court for the District of Columbia  or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices against a  member state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions
of this Compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The  relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event  judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing
member state shall be awarded all costs of litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. The remedies  herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The
Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.
SECTION 12. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION  OF THE AUDIOLOGY AND
SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY COMPACT COMMISSION  AND ASSOCIATED RULES,
WITHDRAWAL AND AMENDMENT
A. This Compact shall  come into effect on the date on which the Compact statute is en-
acted into law in the 10th member state. The provisions, which become effective at that
time, shall be limited to the powers granted to the  Commission relating to assembly and the
promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the Commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking pow-
ers necessary to the implementation and administration of this Compact.
B. Any state that  joins the Compact subsequent to the Commission’s initial adoption of
[14]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the rules shall be subject to the rules as they exist on  the date on which this Compact be-
comes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the  Commission shall
have the full force and effect of law on the day this Compact becomes law in that state.
C. Any member state may withdraw from  this Compact by enacting a statute repealing
the same.
1. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until six  months after enactment
of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect  the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state’s
audiology or speech-language pathology licensing board to comply with the  investigative and
adverse action reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective  date of with-
drawal.
D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
audiology or speech-language pathology licensure agreement or other cooperative  arrange-
ment between a member state and a non-member state that does not  conflict with the pro-
visions of this Compact.
E. This Compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to  this Compact
shall become effective and binding upon any  member state until it is enacted into the laws
of all member states.
SECTION 13. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the  purposes thereof. The
provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase,  clause, sentence or provision
of this Compact is declared to be  contrary to the constitution of any member state or of the
United States or  the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance
is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof  to
any government, agency, person or  circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this Com-
pact shall be held contrary to the constitution  of any member state, the Compact shall re-
main in full force and effect as to the remaining member states and  in full force and effect
as to the member state affected as to all severable matters.
SECTION 14. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS
A. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of  any other law of a member state that is
not inconsistent with this Compact.
B. All laws in a  member state in conflict with this Compact are superseded to the extent
of the conflict.
C. All lawful actions of the  Commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by
the Commission and adopted by the  State Board of Examiners for Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology, are binding upon the member states.
D. All agreements between the Commission and the member  states are binding in ac-
cordance with their terms.
E. In  the event any provision of this Compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed
on the legislature of any member state, the provision shall be ineffective to the extent  of the
conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.
SECTION 2. The Legislative Assembly hereby ratifies the Audiology and Speech-Language
Pathology Interstate Compact set forth in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
[15]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
AMENDMENTS
SECTION 3.
 ORS 681.230 is amended to read:
681.230. (1) Without obtaining a  license under this chapter, a person may use a procedure in-
cluded in the practice of speech-language pathology  or audiology if the procedure is within the
person’s scope of practice and the person is:
(a) Licensed by a health professional regulatory board as defined in ORS 676.160;
(b) Performing basic audiometric testing under the supervision of a physician  licensed under
ORS chapter 677 or a  naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685 and representing that
the person is a medical assistant or audiology assistant;
(c) A teacher who is licensed by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission and  who
holds a hearing impaired endorsement issued by the commission;
(d) A student participating  in supervised field work or supervised course work in speech-
language pathology or audiology as part of a college or university  program approved by the State
Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology; or
(e) A student taking an undergraduate course in speech-language pathology approved by  the
board.
(2) A person practicing  speech-language pathology or audiology without a license under sub-
section (1) of this section may not represent or imply that the person  is a speech-language
pathologist, speech-language pathology assistant or audiologist.
(3) A person practicing  speech-language pathology or audiology without a license under sub-
section (1)(d) or (e) of this section:
(a) Must use a title that indicates that the person is a student trainee.
(b) May not be paid for speech-language pathology or audiology  services provided by the person,
except that the person may be provided a reasonable educational stipend.
(4) Without obtaining a license under this chapter, a person may:
(a) Consult with or disseminate the person’s research  findings and scientific information to an
accredited academic institution or a governmental agency; and
(b) Offer lectures to the public for a fee, monetary or otherwise.
(5) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not apply to a  person who is authorized to
practice as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist by compact privilege  as defined in
section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 681.250 is amended to read:
681.250. (1) A license shall be issued  to qualified persons either in speech-language pathology
or audiology. A person may be licensed  in both areas if the person meets the respective qualifica-
tions and in such instances the license fee shall be as though for one license.
(2) [ No person shall ] A person  may not  practice speech-language pathology or audiology or
purport to be a speech-language pathologist or audiologist in this state unless the person is licensed
in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
(3) Subsection (2) of  this section does not apply to a person who is authorized to practice
as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist by  compact privilege as defined in section 1
of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 681.480 is amended to read:
681.480. (1)(a) The State Board  of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology
Account is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
[16]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The board may establish  an additional account for the purpose of meeting financial
obligations imposed on the State of Oregon as a result of  this state’s participation in the
Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact established under  section 1
of this 2021 Act.
(2) All moneys received by the State Board of Examiners for Speech-Language  Pathology and
Audiology  under  this chapter shall be deposited into the [ account] accounts described in sub-
section (1) of this section  and are continuously appropriated  to the board for the administration
and enforcement of this chapter and ORS 676.850 and for the purpose of meeting financial obli-
gations imposed on the State of Oregon as a result of this state’s participation in  the
Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact .
(3) Any interest or other  income from moneys in the [ account] accounts described in sub-
section (1) of this section  shall be credited to the account on which the interest or other in-
come is earned .
SECTION 6.
 ORS 676.177 is amended to read:
676.177. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS  676.165 to 676.180, a health professional
regulatory board, upon a determination by the board that it possesses otherwise confidential  infor-
mation that reasonably relates to  the regulatory or enforcement function of another public entity,
may disclose that information to the other public entity.
(2) Any public entity that receives information pursuant to subsection (1) of this  section shall
agree to take  all reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of the information, except that the
public entity may use or disclose  the information to the extent necessary to carry out the regulatory
or enforcement functions of the public entity.
(3) For purposes of this section, “public entity” means:
(a) A board or agency  of this state, or a board or agency of another state with regulatory or
enforcement functions similar to the  functions of a health professional regulatory board of this state;
(b) A district attorney;
(c) The Department of Justice;
(d) A state or  local public body of this state that licenses, franchises or provides emergency
medical services; or
(e) A law enforcement agency of this state, another state or the federal government.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section[ ,]:
(a) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may disclose information described in  subsection (1)
of this section to the Physical Therapy Compact Commission established in ORS 688.240.
(b) The State Board of Examiners for  Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology may
disclose information described in  subsection (1) of this section to the Audiology and Speech-
Language Pathology Compact Commission established pursuant to  section 1 of this 2021 Act.
APPLICABILITY  DATES
SECTION 7.
(1) The amendments to ORS 681.230 and  681.250 by sections 3 and 4 of this
2021 Act apply to persons authorized  to practice speech-language pathology or audiology by
compact privilege on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 681.480 by section 5 of this 2021 Act apply to moneys received
by the State Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology on or  after
the effective date of this 2021 Act.
[17]
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
(3) The amendments to ORS 676.177 by section 6 of this 2021 Act apply to information
disclosed on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 8.
The unit and section captions used in this 2021 Act are provided only for the
convenience of the reader and do not become part of  the statutory law of this state or ex-
press any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[18]