Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Each community college operated under ORS chapter 341 shall pay part-
time faculty at the  same rate, on a per-hour basis, that the community college pays equally
experienced full-time faculty who teach comparable courses.
(2) In determining the number of hours worked by part-time faculty and full-time faculty
under this section, each community college must include all hours  spent working in the
normal course of teaching a course, including but not limited to time spent:
(a) In class;
(b) Preparing to teach each class;
(c) Conducting office hours for enrolled students; and
(d) Grading.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $ , which shall be allocated to the
Community College Support Fund  established in ORS 341.620 for the purpose of paying for
the cost to implement section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1563