Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Alternative education program” has the meaning given that term in ORS 336.615.
(b) “Eligible residential  alternative education program” means a residential alternative
education program that:
(A) Is provided under a contract  with the school district in which the residential alter-
native education program is located;
(B) Is approved by the Department of Education; and
(C) Receives  moneys under an agreement with the United States Department of Defense
for the purpose of providing an education to students.
(c) “Residential alternative education program” means an alternative education  program
that serves students from across this state and that requires students to reside  at or near
the location  where the alternative education program is provided for part or all of the du-
ration of the program.
(d) “Student” means a person who:
(A) Volunteers to enroll in an eligible residential alternative education program;
(B) Is at least 16 years of age but not older than 18  years of age on the date the person
enrolls in the eligible residential alternative education program;
(C) Is a resident of this state;
(D) Is academically at risk, not likely to graduate from high school or a dropout; and
(E) Otherwise qualifies for  participation in the eligible residential alternative education
program.
(2) The  Department of Education shall provide moneys for payment of the costs of edu-
cation of students in an eligible residential alternative education program as provided by ORS
343.243. The department  shall provide the moneys to the school district in which the eligible
residential alternative education program is located.
(3)(a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection, a  school district to which the depart-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 310
HB 2021
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment provides moneys as described in  subsection (2) of this section shall pay the moneys to
the eligible residential alternative education program.
(b) A school district to which the department provides moneys as described in  subsection
(2) of this section may keep a portion of the moneys as required by law or rule  or as agreed
to in a contract between the school district and the eligible  residential alternative education
program.
(4) The State Board of  Education may adopt rules that the board deems necessary for
administering this section.
SECTION 2.  ORS 327.008 is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private sources  for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by  the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Education Stability Fund and the Oregon Marijuana Account and
moneys received as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for  the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077,  327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961 and sections 1 to 3, chapter 735, Oregon Laws
2013, and section 1 of this 2019 Act .
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant, consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a  facility grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as pro-
vided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases to  operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of  termination or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to  each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s  general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be  apportioned from the State School Fund to each education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall  be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in  the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district may  not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of  the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed $9 million in any biennium. If  the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the  Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for facility
grants among  those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does not  exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
[2]
HB 2021
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125 (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of  $35 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $33 million from the State
School Fund to the Network of Quality Teaching and Learning Fund established under  ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $5 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $14 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $14 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified in  paragraph (b)(B) and (C) of this subsection shall
be adjusted by the same percentage  by which the amount appropriated to the State School Fund for
that biennium is  increased or decreased compared with the preceding biennium, as determined by
the Department of Education after consultation with the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language Learner  Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each  fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section and  ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend up to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration  of and support for the development of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend up to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of a program to increase  the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each fiscal year, the  Department of Education shall transfer the amount of $2.5 million from
the State School Fund to the Small School District Supplement Fund established in section 3, chap-
ter 735, Oregon Laws 2013.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 327.008, as  amended by section 22, chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2017, and sec-
tion 5, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private sources  for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by  the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Education Stability Fund and the Oregon Marijuana Account and
moneys received as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
[3]
HB 2021
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for  the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077,  327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961 and sections 1 to 3, chapter 735, Oregon Laws
2013, and section 1 of this 2019 Act .
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant, consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a  facility grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as pro-
vided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases to  operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of  termination or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to  each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s  general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be  apportioned from the State School Fund to each education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall  be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in  the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district may  not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of  the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed $7 million in any biennium. If  the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the  Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for facility
grants among  those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does not  exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125 (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of  $35 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium,  the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
[4]
HB 2021
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified in this subsection shall be  adjusted by the same
percentage  by  which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language Learner  Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each  fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section and  ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend up to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration  of and support for the development of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend up to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of a program to increase  the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each fiscal year, the  Department of Education shall transfer the amount of $2.5 million from
the State School Fund to the Small School District Supplement Fund established in section 3, chap-
ter 735, Oregon Laws 2013.
(18) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million from  the State School
Fund for  deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS 332.337.
Notwithstanding  ORS  332.337, the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy School
Facilities Fund under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing for  elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 327.008, as amended by section 7, chapter  735, Oregon Laws 2013, section 7,
chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2014, section 2, chapter 68, Oregon Laws 2015,  section 38, chapter 245,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 2, chapter 555, Oregon Laws  2015, section 11, chapter 604, Oregon Laws
2015, section 2, chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2015, section 8, chapter 783, Oregon Laws  2015, sections
22 and 23, chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2017, sections 5 and 6, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2017, and
section 34, chapter 725, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from  public and private sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School  Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Education Stability Fund and the Oregon Marijuana Account and
moneys received as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) The  State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077, 327.095, 327.099,  327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961 and section 1 of this 2019 Act .
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant, consisting  of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a facility grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as pro-
vided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
[5]
HB 2021
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) For the first school  year after a public charter school ceases to operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of termination or nonrenewal of a  charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to each school district that had sponsored  a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal  to the school district’s general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each education  service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All  figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average  daily membership used in the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district may  not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of  the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed $7 million in any biennium. If  the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the  Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for facility
grants among  those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does not  exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125 (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of  $35 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium,  the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified in this subsection shall be  adjusted by the same
percentage  by  which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language Learner  Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each  fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the State
[6]
HB 2021
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section and  ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development  of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration  of a program to increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million from  the State School
Fund for  deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS 332.337.
Notwithstanding  ORS  332.337, the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy School
Facilities Fund under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing for  elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
SECTION 5.  ORS 327.023 is amended to read:
327.023. In addition to those moneys  distributed through the State School Fund, the Department
of Education shall provide from state  funds appropriated therefor, grants in aid or support for spe-
cial and compensatory education programs including:
(1) The Oregon School for the Deaf.
(2) Medicaid match for administration  efforts to secure Medicaid funds for services provided to
children with disabilities.
(3) Hospital programs for education  services to children who are hospitalized for extended pe-
riods of time or who require hospitalization due to severe disabilities as described in ORS 343.261.
(4) Day treatment programs and residential treatment programs for  education services to chil-
dren who are in the treatment programs as described in ORS 343.961.
(5) Regional services provided to children  with low-incidence disabling conditions as described
in ORS 343.236.
(6) Early childhood special education provided to  preschool children with disabilities from age
three until age of eligibility for kindergarten as described in ORS 339.185, 343.035,  343.041, 343.055,
343.065, 343.157 and 343.455 to 343.534.
(7) Early  intervention services for preschool children from birth until age three as described in
ORS 339.185, 343.035, 343.041, 343.055, 343.065, 343.157 and 343.455 to 343.534.
(8) Evaluation services for children with disabilities  to determine program eligibility and needs
as described in ORS 343.146.
(9) Education services to children residing at state hospitals.
(10) Disadvantaged children program under ORS 343.680.
(11) Early childhood education under ORS 329.235.
(12) Child development specialist program under ORS 329.255.
(13) Youth care centers under ORS 420.885  that are not within a detention facility, as defined
in ORS 419A.004.
(14) Staff development and mentoring.
(15) Career and technical education grants.
(16) Special science education programs.
(17) Talented and Gifted children program under ORS 343.391 to 343.413.
(18) Pediatric nursing facility programs for educational services provided to  students who are
[7]
HB 2021
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(19) Residential alternative education programs under section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 343.243 is amended to read:
343.243. (1) Each school year, the Department of Education  shall receive an amount, as calcu-
lated under this section, from  the State School Fund to pay the costs of educating children in pro-
grams under ORS 343.261, 343.961 and 346.010  and section 1 of this 2019 Act .
(2) To meet the requirements of section 1 of  this 2019 Act, the department shall receive
from the State School Fund an amount that is equal to the product of the following:
(a) The average net operating  expenditure per student of all school districts during the
preceding school year; and
(b) The number of slots available for all students in eligible residential  alternative edu-
cation programs under section 1 of this 2019  Act, as determined by the Department of Edu-
cation based  on information received from school districts, the Department of Human
Services, the Oregon Health Authority, the Oregon Youth Authority  and eligible residential
alternative education programs.
[(2)] (3) To  meet the requirements of ORS 343.261, the Department of Education shall receive
from the State School Fund an amount that is equal to the product of the following:
(a) The average net operating expenditure per student of all school  districts during the preced-
ing school year; and
(b) The number of slots available for students in the  hospital programs under ORS 343.261, as
determined by the department for the school year.
[(3)] (4) To meet the requirements of ORS 343.961, the department shall receive  from the State
School Fund an amount that is equal to the product of the following:
(a) The average net operating expenditure per student of all school  districts during the preced-
ing school year; and
(b) The number of slots available for all students in eligible day  treatment programs and eligible
residential treatment programs under  ORS 343.961 for the school year, as determined by the De-
partment of  Education based on information received from the Department of Human Services, the
Oregon Health Authority,  the Oregon Youth Authority and eligible day treatment programs and el-
igible residential treatment programs.
[(4)] (5) To meet the requirements of ORS 346.010, the Department of  Education shall receive
from the State School Fund an amount that is equal to the product of the following:
(a) The average net operating  expenditure per student of all school districts during the preced-
ing school year; and
(b) The resident average  daily membership of students enrolled in a program under ORS 346.010
for one-half of the school day or more, exclusive of preschool children covered by ORS 343.533.
[(5)] (6) The children covered by this section shall be enumerated in the average daily member-
ship of the district providing the instruction but the  district may not accrue credit for days’ at-
tendance of such children for the purpose of distributing state school funds.
[(6)] (7) The liability of a district shall not exceed the amount established under this  section
even if the child is otherwise subject to ORS 336.575 and 336.580.
[(7)] (8) The department shall credit amounts received from the  State School Fund under this
section to the appropriate subaccount in the Special Education Account.
SECTION 7. Section 1 of  this 2019 Act and the amendments to ORS 327.008, 327.023 and
343.243 by sections 2 to 6 of this 2019 Act  apply to State School Fund distributions com-
[8]
HB 2021
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mencing with the 2019-2020 distributions.
SECTION 8.  ORS 343.247 is amended to read:
343.247. (1) There is established in the General Fund a separate account to  be known as the
Special Education Account. All moneys received by  the Department of Education under this section
shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the account and  appropriated continuously
for purposes of ORS 343.261, 343.961  and 346.010 and section 1 of this 2019 Act . The account shall
be divided into [ two] three subaccounts:
(a) A subaccount for education under ORS 343.261 and 343.961.
(b) A subaccount for education under ORS 346.010.
(c) A subaccount for education under section 1 of this 2019 Act.
(2) If the  amount credited under subsection (1)(a) of this section and the General Fund appro-
priation for these programs are not adequate to meet costs, the Department of  Education shall
submit a revised budget to the Legislative  Assembly or, if the Legislative Assembly is not in session,
the Emergency Board.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 339.137 is amended to read:
339.137. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a student described in ORS
336.580 shall be considered a resident of the  school district in which the student resides by reason
of the placement under ORS 336.580 for purposes of distribution of the State School Fund.
(2) For a child  described in ORS 336.580 (2)(b), the child shall receive educational services
through the Juvenile Detention Education Program as described in ORS 326.695.
(3) A student described in subsection  (1) of this section must be admitted to the public schools
of the school district where the student is placed pursuant to ORS 336.580.
(4) Except as provided in ORS 343.261,  343.941, 343.961 and 346.010  and section 1 of this 2019
Act, the school district shall provide or cause to be provided  appropriate education to any student
described in subsection (1) of this section, including the identification and  evaluation of the student
for purposes of  determining eligibility as a child with a disability to receive special education and
related services enumerated in ORS 343.035 and services related to a disadvantaged child as  defined
in ORS 343.650. Suspension or expulsion of a  student from the regular school program does not re-
lieve the district of the obligation to provide instruction in the residential program  in which the
child resides or in another appropriate facility.
SECTION 10.  ORS 326.575 is amended to read:
326.575. (1) Within 10 days of a student’s seeking initial enrollment in a public or private school
or when a student is placed in a state institution, other than  an institution of post-secondary edu-
cation, or a day treatment  program, residential treatment program, residential alternative educa-
tion program,  detention  facility or youth care center, the school, institution, program, facility or
center shall notify  the public or private school or the institution, program, facility or center in
which the student was formerly enrolled and shall request the student’s education records.
(2) Any public or private school, state institution, day treatment program, residential  treatment
program, residential alternative education  program,  detention facility or youth care center re-
ceiving the request described in subsection (1) of  this section shall transfer all student education
records relating to the particular student to the requesting school, institution, program, facility  or
center no later than 10 days after the receipt of the request. The education records shall include
any education records relating to the particular student retained by an education service district.
(3) Notwithstanding subsections  (1) and (2) of this section, for students who are in substitute
care programs:
[9]
HB 2021
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
(a) A school, institution,  program, facility or center shall notify the school, institution, program,
facility or center  in which the student was formerly enrolled and shall request the student’s educa-
tion records within five days of the student seeking initial enrollment; and
(b) Any school, institution, program, facility or center receiving a request for  a student’s edu-
cation records shall transfer all student education records  relating to the particular student to the
requesting school, institution,  program, facility or center no later than five days after the receipt
of the request.
(4) Each educational institution that has custody of the  student’s education records shall annu-
ally notify parents and eligible  students of their right to review and propose amendments to the
records. The State Board of Education shall specify by rule the  procedure for reviewing and pro-
posing amendments to a student’s education records.  If a parent’s or eligible student’s proposed
amendments to a student’s education records are rejected by the educational institution,  the parent
or eligible student shall receive a hearing on the matter. The State Board of Education  shall specify
by rule the procedure for the hearing.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Day treatment program” means a program described in ORS 343.961.
(b) “Detention facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419A.004.
(c) “Educational institution” means a public or private school, education service  district, state
institution, day treatment program, residential treatment program , residential alternative educa-
tion program or youth care center.
(d) “Residential alternative education program” means a program described in section 1
of this 2019 Act.
[(d)] (e) “Residential treatment program” means a program described in ORS 343.961.
[(e)] (f) “Substitute care  program” means family foster care, family group home care, parole
foster care, family shelter care, adolescent shelter care and professional group care.
[(f)] (g) “Youth care center” means a center as defined in ORS 420.855.
SECTION 11.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2019.
[10]