Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,700,000
for distribution to the Charleston Merchants  Association of Charleston, Oregon, an organ-
ization described in section 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code that is exempt  from tax-
ation under section 501(a) of the Internal  Revenue Code, for the purchase of the following
properties for the purpose of community development:
(1) Seaport RV Park, 63300 Boat Basin Road, Charleston, Oregon, 97420; and
(2) Huckleberry Hill Mobile and RV Park,  91047 Cape Arago Highway, Coos Bay, Oregon,
97420.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1424