Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this  section and section 2 of this 2021 Act, “wildland-urban
interface” mean a geographical area where structures and other human development  border
or interact with wildland vegetative fuels.
(2) The State Forestry Department shall oversee the development and maintenance  of a
comprehensive statewide map of wildfire risk. The map must display all boundaries of the
wildland-urban interface  as the boundaries exist within this state, must be consistent with
national standards and must be  sufficiently detailed to allow for an assessment of wildfire
risk at the property ownership level. The  department shall collaborate with the State Fire
Marshal, other state and  local governments and officials, other public bodies, insurance
companies and any other information sources that the department deems appropriate to de-
velop and maintain the map. The department shall make the map described in this section
accessible to the public in electronic form.
(3) The department, not later than February 1, 2022, shall  submit a report as provided in
ORS 192.245 to a committee of the Legislative Assembly related to natural  resource issues
that describes the development of the map described in this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The State Fire Marshal shall establish minimum defensible space re-
quirements for wildfire risk reduction on lands in areas identified on the  map described in
section 1 of this 2021 Act as within the wildland-urban interface.  In establishing the mini-
mum defensible space requirements, the State Fire Marshal shall consult  and select stan-
dards from the framework set forth in the 2018 edition of  the International Wildland-Urban
Interface Code published by the International Code Council. Subject to  additional local re-
quirements, a minimum  defensible space requirement that the State Fire Marshal establishes
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3259
HB 3308
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for a type of land shall apply statewide  for all lands of that type that are in areas identified
in the map described in section  1 of this 2021 Act. The State Fire Marshal shall periodically
reexamine the standards set forth in the International  Wildland-Urban Interface Code and
update the State Fire Marshal’s standards to reflect current best practices.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a local government shall admin-
ister and enforce the  minimum defensible space requirements the State Fire Marshal estab-
lishes under subsection  (1) of this section that are applicable to the lands within the
jurisdiction of the local government.
(3) A local government may adopt and  enforce local requirements for defensible space
on lands that are greater than the minimum defensible space requirements established by
the State Fire Marshal. In establishing the  local government’s minimum defensible space
requirements, the local government shall consult and select  standards from the framework
set forth in the 2018 edition  of the International Wildland-Urban Interface Code published
by the International Code Council.
(4) The State Fire  Marshal shall administer a community risk reduction program that
emphasizes education and methods of prevention with respect  to wildfire risk, defensible
space and community preparedness for wildfires. The program  must provide financial, ad-
ministrative, technical or other assistance to local governments to facilitate the adminis-
tration and enforcement of minimum defensible  space requirements within the jurisdiction
of the local government. A  local government that receives financial assistance under this
subsection shall give priority to the creation of defensible space on  lands owned by commu-
nities of color, indigenous communities, persons with limited proficiency in English and per-
sons of lower income as defined in ORS 456.055.
SECTION 3.
The Wildfire Community Preparedness Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Wildfire
Community Preparedness Fund must be credited to the fund. Moneys in  the fund are con-
tinuously appropriated to the State Fire Marshal for  the purpose of carrying out the local
government financial assistance program described in section 2 (4) of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) The Task Force on Building Codes in the Wildland-Urban Interface is
established.
(2) The task force consists of 10 members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(a) The State Forester or a designee;
(b) The State Fire Marshal or a designee;
(c) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services or a designee;
(d) One member who represents the Oregon Fire Chiefs Association;
(e) Two members with expertise in wildfire prevention;
(f) Three members who represent municipalities that administer building codes; and
(g) One member of the Construction Contractors Board or a designee.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Identify gaps in and needed updates  to the state building code that account for risks
of wildfire and that focus on wildfire prevention and the creation of  defensible space around
structures located within  the wildland-urban interface identified in the map prepared in ac-
cordance with section 1 of this 2021 Act; and
(b) Make recommendations to the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business
Services concerning changes needed to the state building code.
[2]
HB 3308
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
(4) The task force may conduct studies,  consult architects, construction contractors,
engineers and other experts and professionals concerning needed standards  and otherwise
perform any act that is necessary to carry out the purposes  identified in subsection (3) of
this section.
(5) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in  the manner provided in ORS 192.245 to an
interim committee of the Legislative Assembly  related to natural resources no later than
September 15, 2022.
(12) The State Forestry Department shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of the task  force are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for
expenses and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2022.
SECTION 6. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]