Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs  shall conduct a statewide study
regarding the status of small businesses owned by veterans in  Oregon. The study must
identify barriers to veteran-owned small business expansion and  capitalization and must
make recommendations to improve support and opportunities for the veteran-owned  small
businesses in this state.
(2) The department shall collaborate with  the Oregon Business Development Department
in conducting the study under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall submit a report on the study  conducted
under subsection (1) of this section in the manner provided by ORS  192.245, and may include
recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  re-
lated to veterans no later than November 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1354