Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 475B.759, as amended by  section 10, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate  and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available  in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section,  and [ after] before  making the transfer of moneys
required by [ subsection (7) of this  section ] paragraph (c) of this subsection , the department shall
transfer quarterly 20 percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to the  cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred  in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that is  not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population of  all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection  (4)(a) of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five  percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten  percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total  commer-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3312
HB 3210
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in  each county compared to the total commercially available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of  the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS  475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located  in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) After making the transfer of moneys required by paragraph  (b) of this subsection, the
department shall transfer quarterly to the  Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund es-
tablished in section 5, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), all  moneys
in the Oregon Marijuana Account in excess of $11,250,000.
[(c)] (d) After making the [ transfer] transfers of moneys  required by [ subsection (7) of this
section] paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection , eighty percent of the remaining moneys  in the
Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty  percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the  account must be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for  purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the  moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance  prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
(5)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection (4) of this section to  receive a transfer
of moneys  from the Oregon Marijuana Account during a given quarter but has received a transfer
of moneys for that quarter shall return the amount transferred to the Department of Revenue,  with
interest as described  under paragraph (f) of this subsection. An ineligible city or county may vol-
untarily transfer the moneys to the Department of Revenue immediately upon receipt of the ineligi-
ble transfer.
(b) If the Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services determines that a city
or county received a transfer of moneys under subsection (3)(b) of this section but was  ineligible to
receive that transfer under subsection (4) of this section, the director  shall provide notice to the
ineligible city or county and order the city or county to return the amount received to  the Depart-
ment of Revenue, with interest as  described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. A city or county
[2]
HB 3210
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
may appeal the order within 30 days of the date of  the order under the procedures for a contested
case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under paragraph  (b) of this subsection becomes final, the director shall
notify the Department of Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon  notification, the Depart-
ment of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have the  benefit of all laws of the state pertaining to the
collection of income and  excise taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts described in the no-
tice under paragraph (c) of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not necessary and  the collection
described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject to  an order to return moneys from an ineligible transfer, the
city or county shall  be denied any further relief in connection with the ineligible transfer on or after
the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at  the rate established in ORS 305.220 beginning on
the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys and  the interest collected from or returned by an ineligible city or county
shall be redistributed to the cities or counties that were eligible to  receive a transfer under sub-
section (3)(b) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(6)(a) Not later than July 1 of each year, each city  and county in this state shall certify with
the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services whether the city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required.  The certification shall be made concurrently with the
certifications under ORS 221.770, in a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon Department  of
Administrative Services.
(b) If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive transfers  of
moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A)  of this section. If a county fails to comply with this subsection,
the county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as provided  in ORS 475B.496 shall file an updated
certification with the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services in a form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, noting the effective date of  the change. A city or county that repeals an
ordinance as provided in ORS 475B.496 is  eligible to receive quarterly transfers of moneys under
this section for quarters where the repeal is effective for the entire quarter  and the updated certi-
fication was filed at least 30 days before the date of transfer.
[(7) Before making  the transfer of moneys required by subsection (3) of this section, the department
shall transfer quarterly to the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund all moneys  in the Oregon
Marijuana Account in excess of $11,250,000. ]
SECTION 2.
 Section 5, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  is amended
to read:
Sec. 5.  (1) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Drug Treatment and
Recovery Services Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys deposited into the fund pursuant to  section 6 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020));
(b) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(c) Moneys [ allocated] transferred from  the Oregon Marijuana Account, pursuant to ORS
[3]
HB 3210
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
475B.759 [(7)] (3); and[,]
(d) All other moneys deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund shall  be continuously appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority for
the purposes set forth in section 2 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
[(4) Unexpended moneys in the fund may not lapse and shall be carried forward  and may be used
without regard to fiscal year or biennium. ]
[(5)(a)] (4)(a) Pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this  section, the Legislative Assembly shall ap-
propriate or transfer to the fund an  amount sufficient to fully fund the grants program required by
section 2 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
(b) The total amount deposited and transferred into the fund shall not be less  than $57 million
for the  first year [ this Act ] chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  is in effect.
(c) In each subsequent year, [ that] the minimum transfer  amount set  forth in paragraph (b)
of this  subsection [ (5)(b) of this section ] shall be increased by not less than the sum of :
[(i)] (A) $57 million multiplied by  the percentage , if any,  [ (if any) ] by which the monthly av-
eraged U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending  [ December]
August 31 of  the prior calendar year exceeds the monthly index for the fourth quarter of the cal-
endar year 2020; and[ ,]
[(ii)] (B) [ An amount not less  than the increase ] The annual increase, if any,  in moneys dis-
tributed pursuant to ORS 475B.759 [ (7)] (3).
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 475B.759 and section 5,  chapter 2, Oregon Laws
2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), by sections 1 and 2 of this 2021 Act apply  to fiscal quarters
beginning on or after April 1, 2021.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]