Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Financial institution” means a bank, a commercial  bank, a national bank, a savings
bank, a savings and  loan association, a credit union or other similar entity authorized to do
business in this state.
(b) “Veteran” means:
(A) A veteran as defined in ORS 408.225;
(B) A person who is a member of the Oregon National Guard who has been  demobilized
after serving on federal active duty for more than 30 days; or
(C) A person who is an Oregon resident, is a member of the  reserves and has been de-
mobilized after serving on federal active duty for more than 30 days.
(2) The Department of Veterans’  Affairs shall develop a program under which the de-
partment, pursuant to a contract  with a financial institution, shall provide loan guarantees,
coinsurance in conjunction with other providers of loan  guarantee programs or other forms
of credit guarantees for qualified veterans for the purpose  of refinancing existing purchase-
money mortgages or similar mortgages of homes used primarily  as principal residences by
veterans. The financial institution with which the department contracts under the program
shall be selected through a competitive request for proposals process.
(3) In administering the program, the department shall consult and  cooperate with the
financial institution.  The program shall be administered so that administrative procedures
and application procedures are as responsive to  the needs of qualified veterans and the fi-
nancial institution as  practicable, consistent with prudent investment and lending practices
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1493
HB 2847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and criteria.
(4) The department shall prescribe by rule the loan or credit  guarantee application pro-
cedure for  the financial institution on behalf of a qualified veteran and the eligibility stan-
dards for  qualified veterans. At a minimum, the rules must provide that the negotiated
interest rate may not:
(a) Exceed  three percent above the prime lending rate at the time of entering into the
contract with the financial institution; and
(b) Change for the first five years of the loan contract.
(5) When the department approves a  loan or credit guarantee, the department shall enter
into a loan or credit guarantee agreement with the financial  institution. The agreement shall
specify:
(a) The fee to be charged to the financial institution, if any;
(b) The evidence of debt assurance of, and security for, the loan or credit guarantee;
(c) A loan or credit guarantee that does not exceed 15 years;
(d) That amounts that become due and payable,  including interest, under the agreement
are payable solely from amounts available  in the Veterans Refinancing and Reintegration
Services Fund established in section 2 of this 2017 Act;
(e) That amounts due and payable under the  agreement do not constitute a debt of the
state or a lending of the credit of the state  within the meaning of any constitutional or
statutory limitation, although nothing in this section or in  the terms of an agreement en-
tered into pursuant to this  section is intended to impair the rights of the financial institution
to exercise any rights granted to the financial institution against the security for the  loan
or credit guarantee; and
(f) Such other terms and conditions  considered necessary or desirable by the department.
(6) The department may not pay amounts due under a  loan or credit guarantee agree-
ment from any source other than  available funds in the Veterans Refinancing and Reinte-
gration Services  Fund. If there are insufficient available funds to pay amounts due under a
loan or credit guarantee agreement,  the financial institution may exercise any rights granted
to the financial institution in the agreement against the security for the loan or credit
guarantee and may apply amounts so received toward payments due under the agreement.
(7) The department, with due regard  for the possibility of losses and administrative costs,
shall set  fees and other terms at levels sufficient to reasonably ensure that the program is
self-financing.
SECTION 2.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Veterans Refinancing and Reintegration Services Fund. Interest earned
on the  Veterans Refinancing and Reintegration Services Fund must be deposited into the
fund. All moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Veterans’
Affairs for the following purposes:
(a) Payment of claims pursuant to contracts for loan or credit guarantees under section
1 of this 2017 Act.
(b) Payment of actual  and necessary expenses incurred by the department in adminis-
tering the fund and  establishing and maintaining the program developed under section 1 of
this 2017 Act.
(c) Repayment of transfers of funds required or authorized by law.
(d) Purchase or buyout of superior or prior liens, mortgages or security interests.
[2]
HB 2847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
(2) Moneys in the Veterans Refinancing and Reintegration Services Fund consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the department by the  Legislative Assembly for deposit in the
fund.
(b) Proceeds from collateral assigned to the department.
(c) Interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(d) Transfers of moneys to the fund from any source.
(e) Fees assessed for guarantees, as determined by the department by rule.
(f) Moneys from gifts.
(g) Moneys from any  grant made to the department by any federal agency for deposit in
the fund.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services shall include in the
Governor’s budget for each fiscal period amounts sufficient  to permit the payment of all
amounts that will be due on unpaid loan and credit guarantees  under section 1 of this 2017
Act during that fiscal period.
[3]