Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Public Employees’ Benefit Board  and the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board shall cooperate in studying ways to  transform delivery systems to contain costs. The
boards shall report to an appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly on the results of the study no later than September 15, 2022.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 411