Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
RECRIMINALIZING DRUG POSSESSION
(Restoring Misdemeanor Penalties)
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 61
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 1.
 ORS 475.752 is amended to read:
475.752. (1) Except as authorized by ORS 475.005 to 475.285  and 475.752 to 475.980, it is unlawful
for any person to  manufacture or deliver a controlled substance. Any person who violates this sub-
section with respect to:
(a) A controlled substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class A felony, except as otherwise  pro-
vided in ORS 475.886 and 475.890.
(b) A controlled substance in Schedule II, is guilty of a Class B  felony, except as otherwise
provided in ORS 475.878, 475.880, 475.882, 475.904 and 475.906.
(c) A controlled substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class C felony, except as  otherwise
provided in ORS 475.904 and 475.906.
(d) A controlled substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(e) A controlled substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(2) Except as authorized in ORS 475.005  to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, it is unlawful for any
person to create or deliver a counterfeit substance. Any person who violates this subsection with
respect to:
(a) A counterfeit substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class A felony.
(b) A counterfeit substance in Schedule II, is guilty of a Class B felony.
(c) A counterfeit substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class C felony.
(d) A counterfeit substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(e) A counterfeit substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(3) It is unlawful for any person  knowingly or intentionally to possess a controlled substance
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of,  a
practitioner while acting in the course of professional practice, or except as  otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980. Any person who  violates this subsection with re-
spect to:
(a) A controlled substance in Schedule  I, is guilty of a [Class E violation] Class A
misdemeanor, except as otherwise provided in ORS 475.854, 475.874 and 475.894 and  subsection (7)
of this section.
(b) A controlled substance in Schedule II, is guilty of a  [ Class E violation ] Class A
misdemeanor, except as otherwise provided in ORS 475.814,  475.824, 475.834 or 475.884 or sub-
section (8) of this section.
(c) A controlled substance in Schedule III,  is guilty of a [ Class E violation ] Class A
misdemeanor.
(d) A controlled substance in Schedule IV, is guilty  of a [ Class E violation ] Class A
misdemeanor.
(e) A controlled substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a violation.
(4) It is an affirmative defense in any prosecution under this section for  manufacture, possession
or delivery  of the plant of the genus Lophophora commonly known as peyote that the peyote is being
used or is intended for use:
(a) In connection with the good faith practice of a religious belief;
(b) As directly associated with a religious practice; and
(c) In a manner that is  not dangerous to the health of the user or others who are in the prox-
imity of the user.
(5) The  affirmative defense created in subsection (4) of this section is not available to any person
who has possessed  or delivered the peyote while incarcerated in a correctional facility in this state.
[2]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a person  who unlawfully manufactures or
delivers a controlled substance in Schedule IV and who thereby causes death to another person is
guilty of a Class C felony.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, causation is established when the controlled  substance plays
a substantial role in the death of the other person.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section[ :],
[(a) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule I  is a Class A misdemeanor if the
person possesses: ]
[(A) Forty or more user units of a  mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of lysergic
acid diethylamide; or ]
[(B) Twelve grams or more of a mixture or  substance containing a detectable amount of psilocybin
or psilocin. ]
[(b)] unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule I is a Class B felony if:
[(A)] (a)  The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
[(B)] (b) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b).
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(b) of this section[ :],
[(a) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule II is a  Class A misdemeanor if the
person possesses one gram or more or five  or more user units of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of fentanyl, or any substituted derivative of fentanyl  as defined by the rules of the
State Board of Pharmacy. ]
[(b)] unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule II is a Class C felony if:
[(A)] (a)  The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
[(B)] (b) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b).
SECTION 2.
 ORS 475.814 is amended to read:
475.814. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess hydrocodone un-
less the hydrocodone was obtained directly  from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of, a
practitioner while acting in the course of professional practice, or except as  otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)[(a)] Unlawful possession of hydrocodone is a [ Class E violation ] Class A misdemeanor .
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of hydrocodone is  a
Class A misdemeanor if: ]
[(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or ]
[(B) The person possesses 40 or more  pills, tablets, capsules or user units of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of hydrocodone. ]
SECTION 3.  ORS 475.824 is amended to read:
475.824. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally  to possess methadone unless
the methadone was obtained directly from,  or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of, a prac-
titioner  while  acting in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by
ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of methadone is a [ Class E violation ] Class A misdemeanor .
(b) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, [ unlawful possession of methadone is a
Class A misdemeanor if the person possesses 40 or more user units of a mixture or substance  con-
taining a detectable amount of methadone. ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, ] unlawful possession of methadone
is a Class C felony if the possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b).
[3]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 4.
 ORS 475.834 is amended to read:
475.834. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess oxycodone unless
the oxycodone was obtained  directly from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of, a practi-
tioner  while  acting in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by ORS
475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of oxycodone is a [ Class E violation ] Class A misdemeanor .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, [ unlawful possession of oxycodone is a Class
A misdemeanor if the person possesses 40 or more pills, tablets, capsules or user units of a mixture
or substance containing a detectable amount of oxycodone. ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, ] unlawful possession of oxycodone
is a Class C felony if the possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b).
SECTION 5.
 ORS 475.854 is amended to read:
475.854. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess heroin.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of heroin is a [ Class E violation ] Class A misdemeanor .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this  subsection, [ unlawful possession of heroin is a Class
A misdemeanor if the person possesses one gram or more of a mixture or  substance containing a de-
tectable amount of heroin. ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, ] unlawful  possession of heroin is
a Class B felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b).
SECTION 6.
 ORS 475.874 is amended to read:
475.874. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally  to possess
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a  [ Class E violation ] Class
A misdemeanor .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  [ unlawful possession of
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a Class A misdemeanor if the  person possesses one gram or
more or five or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or  substance containing a detectable amount
of:]
[(A) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;]
[(B) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or ]
[(C) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, ] unlawful possession of
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a Class B felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b).
SECTION 7.
 ORS 475.884 is amended to read:
475.884. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess cocaine unless
the substance was obtained  directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practi-
tioner  while  acting in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by ORS
475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of cocaine is a [ Class E violation ] Class A misdemeanor .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this  subsection, [ unlawful possession of cocaine is a Class
A misdemeanor if the person possesses two grams or more of a mixture  or substance containing a de-
[4]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tectable amount of cocaine. ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b)  of this subsection, ] unlawful possession of cocaine is
a Class C felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b).
SECTION 8.
 ORS 475.894 is amended to read:
475.894. (1) It is unlawful for  any person knowingly or intentionally to possess methamphetamine
unless the  substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a
practitioner while acting  in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine is a [ Class E violation ] Class A misdemeanor .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  [ unlawful possession of methamphetamine
is a Class A misdemeanor if the person possesses two grams or more of  a mixture or substance con-
taining a detectable amount of methamphetamine. ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this  subsection, ] unlawful possession of metham-
phetamine is a Class C felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b).
SECTION 9.
 ORS 161.570 is amended to read:
161.570. (1) As used in this section, “nonperson felony” has the meaning  given that term in the
rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(2) A district attorney may elect to treat a Class C nonperson  felony or a violation of ORS
475.752 [(7)(b)] (7) , 475.854 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b)  or 475.874 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b)  as a Class A misdemeanor. The
election must be  made by the district attorney orally or in writing at the time of the first appear-
ance of the defendant. If a district attorney elects to treat a Class C felony or a  violation of ORS
475.752 [(7)(b)] (7), 475.854 [(2)(c)] (2)(b) or 475.874 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b) as a Class A misdemeanor under this
subsection, the court shall  amend the accusatory instrument to reflect the charged offense as a
Class A misdemeanor.
(3) If, at some time after the first appearance of a defendant charged with a Class C nonperson
felony or a violation of ORS 475.752 [ (7)(b)] (7) , 475.854 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b)  or 475.874  [ (2)(c)] (2)(b) , the
district attorney and the defendant agree to treat the charged offense as a Class A misdemeanor,
the court  may allow the offense to be treated as a Class A misdemeanor by stipulation of the parties.
(4) If a Class C felony or a violation of ORS 475.752 [ (7)(b)] (7), 475.854 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b) or  475.874
[(2)(c)] (2)(b)  is treated as a  Class A misdemeanor under this section, the court shall clearly de-
nominate the offense as a Class A misdemeanor in any judgment entered in the matter.
(5) If no election or stipulation is made under this section, the case proceeds as a felony.
(6) Before a district attorney may  make an election under subsection (2) of this section, the
district attorney shall adopt written guidelines  for determining when and under what circumstances
the election may be made. The district attorney shall apply the guidelines uniformly.
(7) Notwithstanding ORS 161.635, the fine that a court may impose upon  conviction of a
misdemeanor under this section may not:
(a) Be less than the minimum fine established by ORS 137.286 for a felony; or
(b) Exceed the amount  provided in ORS 161.625 for the class of felony receiving Class A
misdemeanor treatment.
[5]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(Repealing Class E Violation Provisions)
SECTION 10.
 ORS 51.050 is amended to read:
51.050. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, in  addition to the criminal jurisdiction
of justice courts already conferred upon and exercised by them,  justice courts have jurisdiction of
all offenses committed or triable in their respective counties. The jurisdiction conveyed by  this
section is concurrent with any jurisdiction that may be exercised by a  circuit court or municipal
court.
(2) In any justice court that has not become a court of record under  ORS 51.025, a defendant
charged with a misdemeanor shall be notified immediately after entering a plea of not guilty  of the
right of the defendant to have the  matter transferred to the circuit court for the county where the
justice court is located. The election shall be made within 10 days  after the plea of not guilty is
entered, and the justice shall immediately transfer the case to the appropriate court.
(3) A justice court does not  have jurisdiction over the trial of any felony or a designated drug-
related misdemeanor as defined  in ORS 423.478. [ A justice court does not have jurisdiction over Class
E violations. ] Except as provided in ORS 51.037, a justice court does not have jurisdiction over  of-
fenses created by the charter or ordinance of any city.
SECTION 11.  ORS 137.300 is amended to read:
137.300. (1) The Criminal Fine Account is established in the General Fund.  Except as otherwise
provided by law, all amounts collected in state courts as monetary  obligations in criminal actions
shall be deposited by the courts in the account. All moneys  in the account are continuously appro-
priated to the Department of Revenue to be distributed by the  Department of Revenue as provided
in this section. The Department of Revenue shall keep a record of moneys  transferred into and out
of the account.
(2) The Legislative Assembly  shall first allocate moneys from the Criminal Fine Account for the
following purposes, in the following order of priority:
(a) Allocations for public safety standards, training and facilities.
(b) Allocations for criminal injuries compensation and assistance to victims of crime and chil-
dren reasonably suspected of being victims of crime.
(c) Allocations for the forensic services provided by the Oregon State Police, including, but  not
limited to, services of the Chief Medical Examiner.
(d) Allocations for the maintenance and operation of the Law Enforcement Data System.
(3) After making allocations under subsection (2) of this section, the Legislative Assembly  shall
allocate moneys from the Criminal Fine Account for the following purposes:
(a) Allocations to the Law Enforcement Medical Liability Account  established under ORS
414.815.
(b) Allocations to the State Court Facilities and Security Account established under ORS  1.178.
(c) Allocations to the Department of Corrections for the  purpose of planning, operating and
maintaining county juvenile  and adult corrections programs and facilities and drug and alcohol
programs.
(d) Allocations to the Oregon Health Authority  for the purpose of grants under ORS 430.345 for
the establishment, operation and maintenance of alcohol and drug abuse  prevention, early inter-
vention and treatment services provided through a county.
(e) Allocations to the Oregon State Police for the purpose of the enforcement of the laws relat-
ing to driving under the influence of intoxicants.
[6]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) Allocations to the Arrest and Return Account established under ORS 133.865.
(g) Allocations to the Intoxicated Driver Program Fund established under ORS 813.270.
(h) Allocations to the State Court Technology Fund established under ORS 1.012.
[(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the Legislative Assembly  shall allocate
all moneys deposited into the Criminal Fine Account as payment  of fines on Class E violations to the
Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund established under ORS 430.384. ]
[(5)] (4)  It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that allocations from the Criminal Fine
Account under subsection (3) of this section be consistent with historical funding of the  entities,
programs and accounts listed in subsection (3) of this section from monetary obligations imposed  in
criminal proceedings. Amounts that are allocated under subsection (3)(c) of this  section shall be
distributed to counties based on the amounts that were transferred to  counties by circuit courts
during the 2009-2011 biennium under the provisions of ORS 137.308, as in effect January 1, 2011.
[(6)] (5)  Moneys  in the Criminal Fine Account may not be allocated for the payment of debt
service obligations.
[(7)] (6) The Department of Revenue shall deposit in the General Fund all moneys  remaining in
the Criminal Fine Account after the distributions listed in subsections (2)[ ,] and (3) [ and (4)] of this
section have been made.
[(8)] (7) The Department of Revenue shall establish by rule  a process for distributing moneys in
the Criminal Fine Account. The department may not distribute more than one-eighth of  the total
biennial allocation to an entity during a calendar quarter.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 153.012 is amended to read:
153.012. Violations are classified for the purpose of sentencing into the following categories:
(1) Class A violations.
(2) Class B violations.
(3) Class C violations.
(4) Class D violations.
[(5) Class E violations. ]
[(6)] (5) Unclassified violations as described in ORS 153.015.
[(7)] (6) Specific fine violations as described in ORS 153.015.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 153.018 is amended to read:
153.018. (1) The penalty for committing a violation is a fine. The  law creating a violation may
impose other penalties in addition to a fine but may not impose a term of imprisonment.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, the maximum  fine for a violation committed by an in-
dividual is:
(a) $2,000 for a Class A violation.
(b) $1,000 for a Class B violation.
(c) $500 for a Class C violation.
(d) $250 for a Class D violation.
[(e) $100 for a Class E violation. ]
[(f)] (e) $2,000 for a specific fine violation, or the maximum amount  otherwise established by law
for the specific fine violation.
(3) If a special corporate fine is specified in the law creating the violation, the sentence to  pay
a fine shall be governed by the law creating the violation. Except  as otherwise provided by law, if
a special corporate fine is not  specified in the law creating the violation, the maximum fine for a
violation committed by a corporation is:
[7]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) $4,000 for a Class A violation.
(b) $2,000 for a Class B violation.
(c) $1,000 for a Class C violation.
(d) $500 for a Class D violation.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 153.019 is amended to read:
153.019. (1) Except as provided in ORS 153.020, [ 153.062 and 430.391,] the presumptive fines for
violations are:
(a) $440 for a Class A violation.
(b) $265 for a Class B violation.
(c) $165 for a Class C violation.
(d) $115 for a Class D violation.
[(e) $100 for a Class E violation. ]
(2) The presumptive fine for a specific fine violation is:
(a) The amount specified by statute as the presumptive fine for the violation; or
(b) An amount  equal to the greater of 20 percent of the maximum fine prescribed for the vio-
lation, or the minimum fine prescribed by statute for the violation.
(3) Any surcharge  imposed under ORS 1.188 shall be added to and made a part of the
presumptive fine.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 153.021 is amended to read:
153.021. (1) Unless a specific minimum fine is prescribed for a violation, and  except as otherwise
provided  by  law, the minimum fine a court shall impose for a violation that is subject to the
presumptive fines established by ORS 153.019 (1) or 153.020 are as follows:
(a) $225 for a Class A violation.
(b) $135 for a Class B violation.
(c) $85 for a Class C violation.
(d) $65 for a Class D violation.
[(e) $45 for a Class E violation. ]
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of  this section, a court may waive payment of the minimum
fine described in this section, in whole or in part, if the court determines that requiring payment
of the minimum fine would be inconsistent with justice in the  case. In making its determination
under this subsection, the court shall consider:
(a) The financial resources of the defendant and the burden that payment of the  minimum fine
would impose, with due regard to the other obligations of the defendant; and
(b) The extent to which that burden could be alleviated by allowing the defendant to pay the
fine in installments or subject to other conditions set by the court.
(3) This section does not affect the manner in which a court imposes or  reduces monetary obli-
gations other than fines.
(4) The Department  of Revenue or Secretary of State may audit any court to determine whether
the court is complying with the requirements  of this section. In addition, the Department of Revenue
or Secretary of State may audit any court to determine whether  the court is complying with the
requirements of ORS 137.145 to 137.159 and 153.640 to 153.680. The  Department of Revenue or Sec-
retary of State may file an action under ORS 34.105 to 34.240 to enforce the requirements  of this
section and of ORS 137.145 to 137.159 and 153.640 to 153.680.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 153.064 is amended to read:
153.064. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a warrant for arrest may  be is-
[8]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sued against a person who  fails to make a first appearance on a citation for a violation, or fails to
appear at any other subsequent time set for  trial or other appearance, only if the person is charged
with failure to appear in a violation proceeding under ORS 153.992.
(2) If a person fails to make a first appearance on a citation for a  violation [ other than a Class
E violation ], or fails to appear at any other subsequent time set for  trial or other appearance on a
violation [ other than a Class E violation ], the court may issue an order that requires the defendant
to appear and show cause why the defendant should not be held in  contempt. The show cause order
may be mailed to the defendant by  certified mail, return receipt requested. If service cannot be ac-
complished by mail, the defendant must be personally served. If the defendant is served and  fails to
appear at the time specified in the show cause order,  the court may issue an arrest warrant for the
defendant for the purpose of bringing the defendant before the court.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 153.992 is amended to read:
153.992. (1) A person commits the offense of failure to appear in a violation proceeding if the
person has been served with a citation issued under this chapter for a violation [ other than a  Class
E violation ] and the person knowingly fails to do any of the following:
(a) Make a first appearance in the manner required by ORS 153.061 within the time allowed.
(b) Make appearance at the time set for trial in the violation proceeding.
(c) Appear at any other time required by the court or by law.
(2) Failure to appear on a violation citation is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 221.339 is amended to read:
221.339. (1) A municipal court has concurrent jurisdiction with circuit courts  and justice courts
over all violations committed or triable in the city where the court is located.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, municipal courts have  concur-
rent jurisdiction with circuit courts and justice courts over misdemeanors committed  or triable in
the city. Municipal courts may exercise the jurisdiction conveyed by this section without  a charter
provision or ordinance authorizing that exercise.
(3) Municipal  courts have no jurisdiction over felonies[ ,] or  designated drug-related
misdemeanors as defined in ORS 423.478 [ or Class E violations ].
(4) A city may limit the exercise of jurisdiction  over misdemeanors by a municipal court under
this section by  the adoption of a charter provision or ordinance, except that municipal courts must
retain concurrent jurisdiction with circuit courts over:
(a) Misdemeanors created by the city’s  own charter or by ordinances adopted by the city, as
provided in ORS 3.132; and
(b) Traffic crimes as defined by ORS 801.545.
(5) Subject to the powers and duties  of the Attorney General under ORS 180.060, the city at-
torney has authority to prosecute a violation of any offense created by statute that is subject to the
jurisdiction of a municipal court, including any appeal, if the offense  is committed or triable in the
city. The  prosecution shall be in the name of the state. The city attorney shall have all powers of
a district attorney in prosecutions under this subsection.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 419C.370 is amended to read:
419C.370. (1) The juvenile court may enter an order directing that all cases involving:
(a) Violation of a law or ordinance relating to the use or operation of  a motor vehicle, boating
laws or game laws be waived to criminal or municipal court;
(b) An offense classified as a violation  [ other than a Class E violation ] under the laws of this
state or a political subdivision of this state be waived to  municipal court if the municipal court has
[9]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
agreed to accept jurisdiction; and
(c) A misdemeanor that entails theft, destruction, tampering with or vandalism of  property be
waived to municipal court if the municipal court has agreed to accept jurisdiction.
(2) Cases waived under subsection (1) of this section are subject to the following:
(a) That the criminal or municipal court prior  to hearing a case, other than a case involving a
parking violation, in which the defendant is or appears to be under 18 years of age notify the juve-
nile court of that fact; and
(b) That the juvenile court  may direct that any such case be waived to the juvenile court for
further proceedings.
(3)(a) When a person who has been waived under subsection (1)(c) of this  section is convicted
of a property offense, the municipal court may  impose any sanction authorized for the offense except
for incarceration. The municipal court shall notify the juvenile court of the disposition of the case.
(b) When a person has been waived under  subsection (1) of this section and fails to appear as
summoned or is placed on probation and is alleged to have violated  a condition of the probation, the
juvenile court may recall the case to the juvenile court for further  proceedings. When a person has
been returned to juvenile court under this paragraph,  the juvenile court may proceed as though the
person had failed to  appear as summoned to the juvenile court or had violated a juvenile court
probation order under ORS 419C.446.
(4) Records of cases waived under subsection (1)(c) of this  section are juvenile records for pur-
poses of expunction under ORS 419A.260 to 419A.271.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 475.235 is amended to read:
475.235. (1) It is not necessary for the state to negate any exemption or exception  in ORS
475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980 in any complaint, information,  indictment or other pleading
or in  any trial, hearing or other proceeding under ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
The burden of proof of any exemption or exception is upon the person claiming it.
(2) In the absence of  proof that a person is the duly authorized holder of an appropriate regis-
tration or order form issued under ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980,  the person is
presumed not to be the holder of the registration or form. The burden of proof is upon  the person
to rebut the presumption.
(3)(a) When  a controlled substance is at issue in a criminal proceeding before a grand jury, at
a preliminary hearing, in a proceeding on a district  attorney’s information[ , during a proceeding on
a Class E violation ] or for purposes of an early disposition program, it is prima facie evidence  of the
identity of the controlled substance if:
(A) A  sample of the controlled substance is tested using a presumptive test for controlled sub-
stances;
(B) The test is conducted by  a law enforcement officer trained to use the test or by a forensic
scientist;  and
(C) The test is positive for the particular controlled substance.
(b) When the identity of a controlled substance is  established using a presumptive test for pur-
poses of a criminal proceeding before a grand jury, a preliminary hearing, a  proceeding on a district
attorney’s information or an early disposition program, the defendant, upon notice to the district
attorney, may request that the controlled  substance be sent to a state police forensic laboratory for
analysis. [ The defendant  may not make a request under this paragraph concerning a controlled sub-
stance at issue in a proceeding on a Class E violation. ]
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, in all prosecutions in which an analysis of a
[10]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
controlled substance or sample  was conducted, a certified copy of the analytical report signed by
the director of a state police forensic laboratory or the analyst or forensic scientist conducting the
analysis shall be admitted as prima facie evidence of the results of the  analytical findings unless the
defendant has provided notice of an objection in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.
(5) If the defendant intends to object at trial  to the admission of a certified copy of an analytical
report as provided in subsection (4) of this section, not less than 15 days prior  to trial the defendant
shall file written notice of the objection with the court and serve a copy on the district attorney.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) “Analyst” means a person employed by the Department of State Police  to conduct analysis
in forensic laboratories established by the department under ORS 181A.150.
(b) “Presumptive test” includes, but  is not limited to, chemical tests using Marquis reagent,
Duquenois-Levine reagent, Scott reagent system or modified Chen’s reagent.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 670.280 is amended to read:
670.280. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “License” includes a registration, certification or permit.
(b) “Licensee” includes a registrant or a holder of a certification or permit.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 342.143 (3)  or 342.175 (3), a licensing board, commission or agency
may not deny, suspend or revoke an  occupational or professional license solely for the reason that
the applicant or  licensee has been convicted of a crime, but it may consider the relationship of the
facts which support the  conviction and all intervening circumstances to the specific occupational
or professional standards in determining  the fitness of the person to receive or hold the license.
[There is a rebuttable presumption as to each  individual applicant or licensee that an existing or prior
conviction for conduct that has been classified or reclassified as a Class E violation does not  make an
applicant for an occupational or professional license or  a licensee with an occupational or professional
license unfit to receive or hold the license. ]
(3) Except as provided in ORS 342.143 (3)  and 342.175 (3), a licensing board, commission or
agency may deny an occupational or professional license or impose discipline on a licensee based
on conduct that is not undertaken directly in the course of the licensed  activity, but that is sub-
stantially related to the fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to engage  in the activity for
which the license  is required. In determining whether the conduct is substantially related to the
fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to engage in the activity for which the  license is re-
quired, the licensing board, commission or  agency shall consider the relationship of the facts with
respect to the conduct and all intervening circumstances to  the specific occupational or professional
standards. [ There is  a rebuttable presumption as to each individual applicant or licensee that an ex-
isting or prior conviction for conduct that has been  classified or reclassified as a Class E violation is
not related to the fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to  engage in the activity for which the
license is required. ]
SECTION 22.
ORS 153.043, 153.062, 419C.460 and 475.237 are repealed.
RESTORATION OF STATE V. BOYD DELIVERY DEFINITION
SECTION 23.  ORS 475.005 is amended to read:
475.005. As used in ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752  to 475.980, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Abuse” means the repetitive excessive use of a drug  short of dependence, without legal or
[11]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
medical supervision, which may have a detrimental effect on the individual or society.
(2) “Administer” means the direct application of a controlled substance, whether  by injection,
inhalation, ingestion or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or an authorized agent thereof; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.
(3) “Administration”  means the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States Depart-
ment of Justice, or its successor agency.
(4) “Agent” means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction  of a man-
ufacturer, distributor or dispenser. It does not include a common  or contract carrier, public
warehouseman or employee of the carrier or warehouseman.
(5) “Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.
(6) “Controlled substance”:
(a) Means a drug or its immediate precursor classified in  Schedules I through V under the fed-
eral Controlled Substances Act, 21  U.S.C. 811 to 812, as modified under ORS 475.035. The use of the
term “precursor” in this  paragraph does not control and is not controlled by the use of the term
“precursor” in ORS 475.752 to 475.980.
(b) Does not include:
(A) The plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(B) Any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae, whether growing or not;
(C) Resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(D) The seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(E) Any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of a  plant, part of a
plant, resin or seed described in this paragraph; or
(F) Psilocybin or psilocin, but only if and to the extent that a person  manufactures, delivers, or
possesses  psilocybin,  psilocin, or psilocybin products in accordance with the provisions of ORS
475A.210 to 475A.722 and rules adopted under ORS 475A.210 to 475A.722.
(7) “Counterfeit substance” means a  controlled substance or its container or labeling, which,
without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark,  imprint, number
or device, or any likeness thereof, of  a manufacturer, distributor or dispenser other than the person
who in fact manufactured, delivered or dispensed the substance.
(8) “Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual  transfer , constructive  transfer  or attempted
transfer, or possession  with intent to transfer,  other than by administering or dispensing, from
one person to another of a controlled substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.
(9) “Device”  means instruments, apparatus or contrivances, including their components, parts
or accessories, intended:
(a) For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in  humans or
animals; or
(b) To affect the structure of any function of the body of humans or animals.
(10) “Dispense” means to deliver a controlled substance to an  ultimate user or research subject
by or pursuant  to the lawful order of a practitioner, and includes the prescribing, administering,
packaging, labeling or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery.
(11) “Dispenser” means a practitioner who dispenses.
(12) “Distributor” means a person who delivers.
(13) “Drug” means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United  States Pharmacopoeia, official
[12]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of  the United States or official National Formulary, or any supplement
to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for  use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of
disease in humans or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect  the structure or any function of the body of
humans or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any  article specified in paragraph (a), (b) or
(c) of this subsection; however, the term does not include devices or  their components, parts or ac-
cessories.
(14) “Electronically transmitted” or “electronic transmission” means  a communication sent or
received through technological apparatuses, including  computer terminals or other equipment or
mechanisms linked  by telephone or microwave relays, or any similar apparatus having electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
(15) “Manufacture” means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding,  conversion
or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from  substances
of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction
and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or  repackaging of the substance or labeling or
relabeling of its container, except  that this term does not include the preparation or compounding
of a controlled substance:
(a) By a practitioner as an incident to administering or  dispensing of a controlled substance in
the course of professional practice; or
(b) By a practitioner, or by  an authorized agent under the practitioner’s supervision, for the
purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(16) “Person” includes a government subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust or any
other legal entity.
(17) “Practitioner” means physician,  dentist, veterinarian, scientific investigator, licensed nurse
practitioner, physician assistant or other person  licensed, registered or otherwise permitted by law
to dispense,  conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course
of professional practice or research in this state but does not include a pharmacist or a pharmacy.
(18) “Prescription”  means a written, oral or electronically transmitted direction, given by a
practitioner for the preparation and use of a drug. When  the context requires, “prescription” also
means the drug prepared under such written, oral or electronically  transmitted direction. Any label
affixed to a drug prepared under written, oral  or electronically transmitted direction shall promi-
nently display a warning that the removal thereof is prohibited by law.
(19) “Production” includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing or harvesting of  a
controlled substance.
(20) “Research” means an activity conducted by  the person registered with the federal Drug
Enforcement Administration pursuant to a protocol approved by  the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(21) “Ultimate user” means a  person who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the use
of the person or for the use of  a member of the household of the person or for administering to an
animal owned by the person or by a member of the household of the person.
(22) “Usable quantity” means:
(a) An amount of a controlled substance  that is sufficient to physically weigh independent of its
packaging and that does not fall below the uncertainty of the measuring scale; or
[13]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) An amount of a controlled  substance that has not been deemed unweighable, as determined
by a Department  of State Police forensic laboratory, due to the circumstances of the controlled
substance.
(23) “Within 1,000 feet” means a straight line measurement  in a radius extending for 1,000 feet
or less in every direction from a specified location or from any point  on the boundary line of a
specified unit of property.
CREATION OF NEW DRUG OFFENSES
(Use of Controlled Substances in Public Places)
SECTION 24.
Section 25 of this 2024 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 475.752 to
475.980.
SECTION 25. (1) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly  or intentionally use a controlled
substance in a public place unless  the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to
a valid prescription or order of, a practitioner while acting in the course  of professional
practice, or except as otherwise authorized by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2) Violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) As used in this section, “public place” means a place to which  the general public has
access and includes, but is not limited to, hallways, lobbies and  other parts of apartment
houses and hotels not constituting rooms  or apartments designed for actual residence, and
highways, streets, schools, places  of amusement, parks, playgrounds, premises and vehicles
used in connection with public passenger transportation.
(Use of Controlled Substances in Enclosed Space)
SECTION 26.
Section 27 of this 2024 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 475.752 to
475.980.
SECTION 27. (1) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly  or intentionally use a controlled
substance in an  enclosed space that is open to the public in a manner that endangers another
person.
(2)(a) Violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, violation of this section is a Class
C felony if the person has a prior conviction under this section at the time of the offense.
(Drug Encapsulating, Tableting or Counterfeiting Equipment)
SECTION 28.
Section 29 of this 2024 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 475.752 to
475.980.
SECTION 29. (1) Except as authorized by a  registration under ORS 475.125, it is unlawful
for any person to possess, purchase, make, deliver, sell or  possess with intent to sell or de-
liver a tableting machine, an encapsulating machine or  controlled substance counterfeiting
materials, knowing,  intending or having reasonable cause to believe that the machine or
materials will be used to manufacture a controlled substance or a counterfeit substance.
(2) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a Class C felony.
(3) When the  court sentences a person under this section, the court shall use crime
[14]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
category 6 of the sentencing guidelines  grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, and
shall determine the sentence by  using the criminal history scale of the sentencing guidelines
grid.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Controlled substance counterfeiting material” means a punch, die,  plate, stone or
other item  designed to print, imprint or reproduce the trademark, trade name or other
identifying mark,  imprint or device of another or any likeness of any of the foregoing upon
a drug or container  or labeling thereof so as to render such drug a counterfeit controlled
substance.
(b) “Encapsulating machine” means equipment that can be used to fill shells or  capsules
with powdered or granular solids or semisolid material to produce coherent solid contents.
(c) “Tableting machine”  means equipment that can be used to compact, compress or
mold powdered or granular solids or semisolid material to produce coherent solid tablets.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 475.916 is amended to read:
475.916. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally:
(a) To deliver as a registrant a controlled substance classified in  Schedule I or II, except pur-
suant to an order form as required by ORS 475.175;
(b) To use in the course of manufacture or delivery of a  controlled substance a registration
number which is fictitious, revoked, suspended or issued to another person;
(c) To acquire or to attempt to acquire or obtain or attempt to obtain possession of a controlled
substance by misrepresentation, fraud, forgery, deception or subterfuge;  or
(d) To furnish false or fraudulent material  information in, or omit any material information from,
any application, report, record or other document required  to be kept or filed under ORS 475.005 to
475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980[ ; or ].
[(e) To make, deliver or possess any punch, die, plate, stone or other thing  designed to print, im-
print or reproduce  the trademark, trade name or other identifying mark, imprint or device of another
or any likeness of any of the foregoing upon any drug or container or labeling thereof so as  to render
the drug a counterfeit substance. ]
(2) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
INCREASED PENALTIES FOR CERTAIN DRUG CRIMES
(Repeat Offenders Convicted of Delivery or Manufacture)
SECTION 31.
 ORS 475.925 is amended to read:
475.925. When a person is convicted of  the unlawful delivery or manufacture of a controlled
substance, the court shall sentence the person to a term of incarceration  [ ranging from ] as
follows:
(1) 58 months to 130 months, depending on the person’s criminal history, if the delivery or
manufacture involves:
(a) 500 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;
(b) 500 grams  or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of metham-
phetamine, its salts, isomers or salts of its isomers;
(c) 100 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;
(d) 100 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of  fentanyl, or
any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules of the State Board of Pharmacy; or
[15]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) 100 grams or more or 500 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a  mixture or substance con-
taining a detectable amount of ecstasy.
(2) 34 months to 72 months, depending on the person’s criminal  history, if the delivery or man-
ufacture involves:
(a) 100 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;
(b) 100 grams  or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of metham-
phetamine, its salts, isomers or salts of its isomers;
(c) 50 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;
(d) 50 grams  or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of fentanyl, or
any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules of the State Board of Pharmacy; or
(e) 50 grams  or more or 250 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or substance con-
taining a detectable amount of ecstasy.
(3) 36 months,  or any longer term of incarceration required by law or prescribed by the
sentencing guidelines of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, if the person has a con-
viction for a previous  unlawful delivery or manufacture of a controlled substance, or at-
tempted delivery or manufacture of a controlled substance, within the previous five years.
(Taylor’s Law)
SECTION 32.
Section 34 of this  2024 Act shall be known and may be cited as Taylor’s
Law.
SECTION 33. Section 34 of this 2024 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 475.752 to
475.980.
SECTION 34. (1)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 475.752 to 475.980,  unlawful delivery of a con-
trolled substance that results in the death of another person  from the use of the controlled
substance is a Class A felony.
(b) Each person  who unlawfully delivers a controlled substance that results in the death
of another person from the use of the controlled substance is  criminally liable under this
subsection, regardless of whether the deceased person received the controlled substance di-
rectly from the person.
(c) An unlawful delivery of a controlled substance is considered to result in the  death of
another person from the use of the  controlled substance if the use of the controlled sub-
stance was a factor in causing the death of the other person.
(2)(a) When a person is convicted of the unlawful delivery of a controlled substance,  and
the unlawful delivery resulted in the death of another person from the use of  the controlled
substance, the court shall sentence  the person to a term of incarceration ranging from 58
months to 130 months, depending on the person’s criminal history.
(b) When the court sentences  a person under this section, the court shall use crime
category 10 of  the sentencing guidelines grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, and
shall determine the sentence by  using the criminal history scale of the sentencing guidelines
grid.
(c) In determining the criminal history for a person to be sentenced under this section,
a prior conviction for unlawful delivery of a controlled substance  is a person felony, as that
term is defined in the rules of the commission.
(d) Notwithstanding ORS 161.605, the court shall impose the  sentence described in this
[16]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
subsection, and may  not grant a downward dispositional departure or a downward durational
departure under the rules  of the commission, except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (d) of  this subsection, the court may impose a sentence
other than  the sentence described in this subsection if the court imposes a longer term of
incarceration that is otherwise required or authorized by law.
(f) A person sentenced under this subsection may not receive a reduction in the term of
incarceration for appropriate institutional  behavior that exceeds 20 percent of the sentence
imposed. The person is not eligible for transitional leave under ORS 421.168 or any other re-
duction in the term of imprisonment.
(3)(a) The court  shall grant a downward dispositional departure under the rules of the
commission, and impose as a sentence a term of supervised probation, if the court finds  by
clear and convincing evidence that:
(A) The other person whose death resulted from the use  of the controlled substance was
a family or household member or friend of, or cohabitating in a  nonintimate relationship
with, the person;
(B) There was no consideration; and
(C) The  person made good faith efforts to assist the state in identifying individuals from
whom the person  obtained the controlled substance and cooperate with the prosecution of
those individuals.
(b) The court may grant a downward dispositional  departure under the rules of the
commission, and impose as a sentence a term of supervised probation, if the court finds by
clear and convincing evidence that:
(A) The primary motivation of the delivery of the controlled substance  was to support
the person’s use of the controlled substance;
(B) The person made good faith efforts to assist the state in identifying individuals  from
whom the person  obtained the controlled substance and cooperate with the prosecution of
those individuals;
(C) The person has been diagnosed with  a substance use disorder by a court-approved
assessor; and
(D) At the time of sentencing, the person has no prior convictions for  delivery of a con-
trolled substance or for  a person felony, as that term is defined in the rules of the commis-
sion.
(c) A person sentenced to probation under this subsection  shall, in order to successfully
complete the probationary sentence, complete a treatment program at the assessed  level of
care recommended by a treatment provider approved by the court.
(d) If the court revokes  the probation of a person sentenced under this subsection, the
court shall impose the term of incarceration indicated by the person’s criminal  history as
described in subsection (2) of this section. The person may not receive a reduction  in the
term of incarceration for appropriate institutional behavior that exceeds  20 percent of the
sentence imposed. The person is not eligible for transitional leave  under ORS 421.168 or any
other reduction in the term of imprisonment.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Controlled substance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.924.
(b) “Family or household member” has the meaning given that term in ORS 135.230.
[17]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 35.
 ORS 475.935 is amended to read:
475.935. (1)  Except as provided in ORS 475.900, 475.907 or 475.925  or section 34 of this 2024
Act, when the  court sentences a person convicted of delivery of methamphetamine under ORS
475.890 or 475.892, the presumptive  sentence is 19 months of incarceration, unless the rules of the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission prescribe a longer presumptive sentence, if the person has two
or more previous convictions for any combination of the following crimes:
(a) Delivery or manufacture of methamphetamine under ORS 475.752, 475.886 or 475.890;
(b) Delivery or manufacture  of methamphetamine within 1,000 feet of a school under ORS
475.888, 475.892 or 475.904; or
(c) Possession of a precursor substance with intent to manufacture a controlled substance  under
ORS 475.967.
(2) The  court may impose a sentence other than the sentence provided by subsection (1) of this
section if the court imposes:
(a) A longer term of incarceration that is otherwise required or authorized by law; or
(b) An upward durational departure sentence that is authorized by law or  the rules of the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission based upon findings of substantial and  compelling reasons.
Unless otherwise authorized by law or rule  of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, the maxi-
mum departure allowed for a person sentenced under this subsection is double the  presumptive
sentence provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) As used in this section, “previous conviction” means:
(a) Convictions occurring before, on or after August 16, 2005; and
(b) Convictions entered in any other state or federal court for comparable offenses.
(4)(a) For a  crime committed on or after November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered to have
occurred upon the pronouncement of sentence in open court.  However, when sentences are imposed
for two or more convictions arising out of the same conduct  or criminal episode, none of the con-
victions is considered to have occurred prior to any of the other convictions arising out of  the same
conduct or criminal episode.
(b) For a crime committed prior to November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered to have  oc-
curred  upon  the pronouncement in open court of a sentence or upon the pronouncement in open
court of the suspended imposition of a sentence.
(5) For purposes of this section, previous convictions must be proven pursuant to ORS 137.079.
SUPERVISION CONDITIONS
SECTION 36.
 ORS 137.540 is amended to read:
137.540. (1) The court may sentence the defendant to probation subject to the following  general
conditions unless specifically deleted by the court. The probationer shall:
(a) Pay fines, restitution or fees ordered by the court.
(b) Submit to testing for controlled substance, cannabis or alcohol use  if the probationer has a
history of substance abuse or if there is a reasonable suspicion that  the probationer has illegally
used controlled substances.
(c) Participate in a substance abuse evaluation as  directed by the supervising officer and follow
the recommendations of the evaluator if there are reasonable grounds to believe there  is a history
of substance abuse.
(d) Remain in the State  of Oregon until written permission to leave is granted by the Depart-
[18]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment of Corrections or a county community corrections agency.
(e) Not change residence without  prior permission from the Department of Corrections or a
county community corrections agency and inform the parole and probation officer of any change  in
employment.
(f) Permit the parole and probation officer to  visit the probationer or the probationer’s work site
or residence and to conduct a walk-through of the common areas and of the  rooms in the residence
occupied by or under the control of the probationer.
(g) Consent to the search  of person, vehicle or premises upon the request of a representative
of the supervising officer if the supervising officer  has reasonable grounds to believe that evidence
of a violation will be found, and submit to  fingerprinting or photographing, or both, when requested
by the Department of Corrections or  a county community corrections agency for supervision pur-
poses.
(h) Obey all laws, municipal, county, state and federal[ , and in circumstances in which state and
federal law conflict, obey state law ].
(i) Promptly and truthfully answer all reasonable inquiries by the  Department of Corrections or
a county community corrections agency.
(j) Not possess weapons, firearms or dangerous animals.
(k) Report as required and abide by the direction of the supervising officer.
(L) If recommended by the  supervising officer, successfully complete a sex offender treatment
program approved by the  supervising officer and submit to polygraph examinations at the direction
of the supervising officer if the probationer:
(A) Is under supervision for a sex  crime as defined in ORS 163A.005 or harassment under ORS
166.065 (4)(a)(A);
(B) Was previously convicted of a sex crime as defined in ORS 163A.005; or
(C) Was previously convicted in another jurisdiction of an offense  that would constitute a sex
crime as defined in ORS 163A.005 if committed in this state.
(m) Participate in a mental health evaluation as directed by  the supervising officer and follow
the recommendation of the evaluator.
(n) If  required to report as a sex offender under ORS 163A.015, report with the Department of
State Police, a city police department, a county sheriff’s office or the supervising agency:
(A) When supervision begins;
(B) Within 10 days of a change in residence;
(C) Once each year within 10 days of the probationer’s date of birth;
(D) Within 10 days of the first day the person works at, carries on  a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(E) Within 10 days of a  change in work, vocation or attendance status at an institution of higher
education.
(o) Submit to a risk and needs  assessment as directed by the supervising officer and follow
reasonable recommendations resulting from the assessment.
(p) Not use or possess controlled substances except pursuant to a medical prescription.
(2) In addition to the general conditions, the court may  impose any special conditions of pro-
bation that are reasonably related to the crime of conviction or the needs of the probationer for  the
protection of the public or reformation of the probationer,  or both, including, but not limited to, that
the probationer shall:
(a) For crimes committed prior to November 1,  1989, and misdemeanors committed on or after
[19]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
November 1, 1989, be  confined to the county jail or be restricted to the probationer’s own residence
or to the premises thereof, or be subject to any combination  of such confinement and restriction,
such confinement or restriction  or combination thereof to be for a period not to exceed one year
or one-half of the maximum period of confinement that could be  imposed for the offense for which
the defendant is convicted, whichever is the lesser.
(b) For felonies committed on or after November 1, 1989:
(A) Be confined in the county jail, or be subject to other custodial sanctions  under community
supervision, or both, as provided by rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission; and
(B) Comply with any special conditions of probation that are imposed by  the supervising officer
in accordance with subsection (9) of this section.
(c) For crimes committed on or  after December 5, 1996, sell any assets of the probationer as
specifically ordered by the court in order to pay restitution.
(d) For crimes constituting delivery of a controlled substance,  as those terms are defined in ORS
475.005, or for telephonic harassment under ORS 166.090, or for crimes  involving domestic violence,
as defined in ORS 135.230, be prohibited from using Internet  websites that provide anonymous text
message services.
[(e) Not use or possess controlled substances except pursuant to a medical prescription. ]
(3)(a) If a person is released on probation following  conviction of stalking under ORS 163.732
(2)(b) or violating a court’s stalking protective order  under ORS 163.750 (2)(b), the court may include
as a special condition of the person’s probation reasonable residency restrictions.
(b) If the court imposes the special condition of probation described in this subsection and  if at
any time during the  period of probation the victim moves to a location that causes the probationer
to be in violation of the special condition of probation,  the court may not require the probationer
to change the probationer’s residence in order to comply with the special condition of probation.
(4) When a person who is a sex  offender is released on probation, the court shall impose as a
special  condition  of probation that the person not reside in any dwelling in which another sex
offender who is on probation, parole  or post-prison supervision resides, without the approval of the
person’s supervising parole and probation officer, or in which more than one other sex offender who
is on probation, parole or post-prison supervision resides, without the approval  of the director of the
probation agency that  is supervising the person or of the county manager of the Department of
Corrections, or a designee of the director  or manager. As soon as practicable, the supervising parole
and probation officer of  a person subject to the requirements of this subsection shall review the
person’s living arrangement with the person’s sex offender treatment provider to ensure that  the
arrangement supports the goals of offender rehabilitation and community safety. As used in  this
subsection:
(a) “Dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 469B.100.
(b) “Dwelling” does not include a residential treatment facility or a halfway house.
(c) “Halfway house” means a publicly or privately operated profit or nonprofit  residential facil-
ity that provides rehabilitative care and treatment for sex offenders.
(d) “Sex offender” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
(5)(a) If the person is released on probation following conviction of a sex crime, as  defined in
ORS 163A.005, or an assault, as defined in ORS 163.175 or 163.185, and the victim was under 18
years of age,  the court, if requested by the victim, shall include as a special condition of the person’s
probation that the person not reside within three miles of the victim unless:
(A) The victim resides in a county having a population of less than 130,000 and  the person is
[20]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
required to reside in that county;
(B) The person demonstrates to the court by a preponderance of the evidence  that no mental
intimidation or pressure was brought to bear during the commission of the crime;
(C) The  person demonstrates to the court by a preponderance of the evidence that imposition
of the  condition will deprive the person of a residence that would be materially significant in aiding
in the rehabilitation of the person or in the success of the probation; or
(D) The person  resides in a halfway house. As used in this subparagraph, “halfway house” means
a publicly or privately operated  profit or nonprofit residential facility that provides rehabilitative
care and treatment for sex offenders.
(b) A victim may request imposition of the  special condition of probation described in this sub-
section at the time of sentencing in person or through the prosecuting attorney.
(c) If the court imposes the special condition of probation described in this subsection and if  at
any time during the period of probation the victim moves to within three miles of the  probationer’s
residence, the court may not require the probationer  to change the probationer’s residence in order
to comply with the special condition of probation.
(6) When a person who is a  sex offender, as defined in ORS 163A.005, is released on probation,
the Department of Corrections or the county community corrections agency, whichever is appropri-
ate, shall notify the city police department,  if the person is going to reside within a city, and the
county sheriff’s office of the county in which the person is going  to reside of the person’s release
and the conditions of the person’s release.
(7) Failure to abide by all general and special conditions  of probation may result in arrest,
modification of conditions, revocation of probation or imposition of structured,  intermediate sanc-
tions in accordance with rules adopted under ORS 137.595.
(8) The court may order that probation be supervised by the court.
(9)(a) The court may at any time modify the conditions of probation.
(b) When  the court orders a defendant placed under the supervision of the Department of Cor-
rections or a community corrections agency,  the supervising officer may file with the court a pro-
posed modification to the special conditions of  probation. The supervising officer shall provide a
copy of the proposed modification to the district attorney  and the probationer, and shall notify the
probationer of the right to file an objection and have a hearing as described in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph. The notice requirement may be satisfied by providing the probationer  with a copy
of a form developed in accordance with rules adopted under ORS 137.595 (2)(b) that  describes the
right to a hearing. If the district attorney or probationer:
(A) Files  an objection to the proposed modification less than five judicial days after the proposed
modification was filed, the court shall schedule a hearing no later than 10 judicial days  after the
proposed modification was filed, unless the court finds good cause to schedule  a hearing at a later
time.
(B) Does not file an objection to the proposed modification less than  five judicial days after the
proposed modification was filed, the proposed modification becomes effective five  judicial days after
the proposed modification was filed.
(10) A court may not order revocation of probation as a result of the  probationer’s failure to
pay restitution unless the court determines from the  totality of the circumstances that the purposes
of the probation are not being served.
(11) If the court ordered as a special condition of probation that the  probationer find and
maintain employment, it is  not a cause for revocation of probation that the probationer failed to
[21]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
apply for or accept employment at any workplace where there is a labor dispute in progress. As used
in this subsection, “labor dispute” has the meaning for that term provided in ORS 662.010.
(12) As used in this  section, “attends,” “institution of higher education,” “works” and “carries
on a vocation” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
SECTION 37.
 ORS 144.102 is amended to read:
144.102. (1) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or local supervisory authority
responsible for correctional services for a person shall specify in writing the conditions  of post-
prison supervision imposed under ORS 144.096. A copy of the conditions  must be given to the person
upon release from prison or jail.
(2) The board or the supervisory authority shall determine, and may at any time modify,  the
conditions of post-prison supervision, which may include,  among other conditions, that the person
shall:
(a) Comply with the conditions of post-prison supervision as  specified by the board or supervi-
sory authority.
(b) Be under the supervision of the Department of Corrections  and its representatives or other
supervisory authority and abide by their direction and counsel.
(c) Answer all reasonable inquiries of the board, the department or the supervisory authority.
(d) Report to the parole officer as directed by the board, the department or the supervisory  au-
thority.
(e) Not own, possess or be in control of any weapon.
(f) Respect and obey all municipal, county,  state and federal laws[ , and in circumstances in which
state and federal law conflict, obey state law ].
(g) Understand that the board  or supervisory authority may, at its discretion, punish violations
of post-prison supervision.
(h) Attend a victim impact treatment session in a county that has a victim impact program.
(i) For crimes constituting delivery of a controlled substance, as those terms are defined in ORS
475.005, or for telephonic harassment under ORS 166.090, or for crimes  involving domestic violence,
as defined in ORS 135.230, be  prohibited from using Internet websites that provide anonymous text
message services.
(3) If the person is required to report as  a sex offender under ORS 163A.010, the board or su-
pervisory authority shall include as a condition of post-prison supervision that  the person report
with the Department of State Police, a city police department, a county sheriff’s office or the
supervising agency:
(a) When supervision begins;
(b) Within 10 days of a change in residence;
(c) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s date of birth;
(d) Within 10 days of the first  day the person works at, carries on a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(e) Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or attendance  status at an institution of higher
education.
(4)(a) The board or supervisory authority may establish special conditions that the board or su-
pervisory authority considers necessary because of the individual circumstances of the  person on
post-prison supervision.
(b) If the person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of a sex crime, as  defined in
ORS 163A.005,  the board or supervisory authority shall include all of the following as special con-
[22]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ditions of the person’s post-prison supervision:
(A) Agreement to comply with a curfew set by the board, the supervisory authority or the
supervising officer.
(B) A prohibition against contacting a person under 18  years of age without the prior written
approval of the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(C) A prohibition against being present more than one time, without the prior  written approval
of the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer, at a  place where persons under 18 years
of age regularly congregate.
(D) In addition to  the prohibition under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, a prohibition
against being present, without  the prior written approval of the board, supervisory authority or
supervising officer, at, or on  property adjacent to, a school, child care center, playground or other
place intended for use primarily by persons under 18 years of age.
(E) A prohibition against working or volunteering at a school, child  care center, park, play-
ground or other place where persons under 18 years of age regularly congregate.
(F) Entry into and completion of or successful discharge  from a sex offender treatment program
approved by the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer. The program  may include
polygraph and plethysmograph testing. The person is responsible  for paying for the treatment pro-
gram.
(G) A prohibition  against direct or indirect contact with the victim, unless approved by the
victim, the person’s treatment provider and the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(H) Unless otherwise indicated  for the treatment required under subparagraph (F) of this para-
graph, a prohibition against  viewing, listening to, owning or possessing sexually stimulating visual
or auditory materials that are relevant to the person’s deviant behavior.
(I) Agreement to consent to a search of the person  or the vehicle or residence of the person
upon the request of a representative of the board or supervisory authority  if the representative has
reasonable grounds to believe that evidence of a violation of a  condition of post-prison supervision
will be found.
(J) Participation in random polygraph examinations to obtain information for  risk management
and treatment. The person is responsible for paying the  expenses of the examinations. The results
of a  polygraph examination under this subparagraph may not be used in evidence in a hearing to
prove a violation of post-prison supervision.
(K) Maintenance of a driving log and  a prohibition against driving a motor vehicle alone unless
approved by the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(L) A prohibition against using a post-office box unless approved by the board, supervisory  au-
thority or supervising officer.
(M) A prohibition against residing in a dwelling  in which another sex offender who is on pro-
bation, parole or post-prison supervision resides unless approved by  the board, supervisory authority
or supervising officer, or in which more than one other sex offender who is on probation, parole or
post-prison supervision resides unless approved by the board or the director of the supervisory  au-
thority, or  a designee of the board or director. As soon as practicable, the supervising officer of a
person subject to the requirements of this subparagraph shall review the  person’s living arrange-
ment with  the person’s sex offender treatment provider to ensure that the arrangement supports the
goals of offender rehabilitation and community safety.
(c)(A) If the person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of a sex crime, as defined
in ORS 163A.005, or an assault, as defined in  ORS 163.175 or 163.185, and the victim was under 18
[23]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
years of age, the board or supervisory authority, if requested by the victim, shall include as a special
condition of the person’s post-prison supervision that the person not reside within three miles of the
victim unless:
(i) The victim resides in a county having a population of less  than 130,000 and the person is
required to reside in that county under subsection (7) of this section;
(ii) The  person demonstrates to the board or supervisory authority by a preponderance of the
evidence that no mental intimidation or pressure was brought to bear during the  commission of the
crime;
(iii) The person demonstrates  to the board or supervisory authority by a preponderance of the
evidence that imposition of the condition will deprive the person of  a residence that would be
materially significant in  aiding in the rehabilitation of the person or in the success of the post-prison
supervision; or
(iv) The person resides in a halfway house.
(B) A victim may request imposition of the special condition of  post-prison supervision described
in this paragraph at  the time of sentencing in person or through the prosecuting attorney. A victim’s
request may be included in the judgment document.
(C) If the board or supervisory authority imposes  the special condition of post-prison supervision
described in this paragraph and  if at any time during the period of post-prison supervision the victim
moves to within three miles of  the person’s residence, the board or supervisory authority may not
require the person to change the person’s  residence in order to comply with the special condition
of post-prison supervision.
(d)(A) If  a person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of stalking under ORS
163.732 (2)(b) or violating a court’s stalking protective order under ORS 163.750 (2)(b), the board  or
supervisory authority may include as a special condition of the person’s post-prison supervision
reasonable residency restrictions.
(B) If the board or supervisory authority imposes  the special condition of post-prison supervision
described in this paragraph and  if at any time during the period of post-prison supervision the victim
moves to a location that causes the person to be in violation of the special condition of post-prison
supervision, the board or supervisory authority may not require the person to change the  person’s
residence in order to comply with the special condition of post-prison supervision.
(5)(a) The board  or supervisory authority may require the person to pay, as a condition of
post-prison supervision, compensatory fines, restitution or attorney fees:
(A) As determined, imposed or required by the sentencing court; or
(B) When previously required as a condition of any type of supervision that is later revoked.
(b) The board may require a person to  pay restitution as a condition of post-prison supervision
imposed for an offense other than the offense for which the restitution was ordered if the person:
(A) Was ordered to pay restitution as a result of another conviction; and
(B) Has not fully paid the restitution by the time the person has completed the period of post-
prison supervision imposed for the offense for which the restitution was ordered.
(6) A person’s failure to apply for or accept employment at a workplace  where there is a labor
dispute in progress does not constitute a violation of the conditions of post-prison supervision.
(7)(a) When  a person is released from imprisonment on post-prison supervision, the board shall
order as a condition of  post-prison supervision that the person reside for the first six months after
release in the county that last supervised the person, if the person was on active supervision  as an
adult for a felony at the time of the offense that resulted in the imprisonment.
[24]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) If the person was not on active supervision as an adult  for a felony at the time of the offense
that resulted in the imprisonment, the board shall order  as a condition of post-prison supervision
that the person reside for the first six months after release in the county where the person  resided
at the time of the offense that resulted in the imprisonment.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (b) of this subsection:
(A) The board shall determine the county where the person resided at the  time of the offense
by examining records such as:
(i) An Oregon driver license, regardless of its validity;
(ii) Records maintained by the Department of Revenue;
(iii) Records maintained by the Department of State Police;
(iv) Records maintained by the Department of Human Services;
(v) Records maintained by the Department of Corrections; and
(vi) Records maintained by the Oregon Health Authority.
(B) If the person did not have an identifiable  address at the time of the offense, or the address
cannot be determined, the person is considered to have resided in the county where the  offense oc-
curred.
(C) If  the person is serving multiple sentences, the county of residence is determined according
to the date of the last arrest resulting in a conviction.
(D) In determining the person’s county of residence, the  board may not consider offenses com-
mitted by the person while the person was incarcerated in a Department of Corrections facility.
(d) Upon motion of the board, the supervisory authority, the person, a victim or a district at-
torney, the board may waive the residency condition under paragraph (b) of this subsection  only
after making a finding that one of the following conditions has been met:
(A) The person provides proof of employment with no set ending date  in a county other than the
county of residence determined under paragraph (c) of this section;
(B) The person is found to pose a significant danger to a victim of the person’s crime residing
in the county of residence, or a victim or victim’s family residing in  the county of residence is found
to pose a significant danger to the person;
(C) The person has a spouse or biological or adoptive family residing in a county other than  the
county of residence who will be materially significant in aiding in the  rehabilitation of the person
and in the success of the post-prison supervision;
(D) As another condition  of post-prison supervision, the person is required to participate in a
treatment program that is not available in the county of residence;
(E) The person requests release to another state; or
(F) The board finds other good cause for the waiver.
(e) The board shall consider eligibility  for transitional housing programs and residential treat-
ment programs when determining whether to waive the residency condition under paragraph  (b) of
this subsection, and the acceptance of the person into a  transitional housing program or a residen-
tial treatment program constitutes good cause as described in paragraph (d)(F) of this subsection.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Attends,” “carries  on a vocation,” “institution of higher education” and “works” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(b)(A) “Dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 469B.100.
(B) “Dwelling” does not mean a residential treatment facility or a halfway house.
(c) “Halfway house” means a residential facility that provides  rehabilitative care and treatment
[25]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for sex offenders.
(d) “Labor dispute” has the meaning given that term in ORS 662.010.
DESIGNATED DRUG-RELATED AND PROPERTY MISDEMEANORS
(Supervision Duty and Funding)
SECTION 38.
 ORS 423.478 is amended to read:
423.478. (1) The Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Operate prisons for offenders sentenced to terms of incarceration for more than 12 months;
(b) Provide central information and data services sufficient to:
(A) Allow tracking of offenders; and
(B) Permit analysis of correlations between sanctions, supervision, services  and programs, and
future criminal conduct; and
(c) Provide interstate compact administration and jail inspections.
(2) Subject to ORS 423.483, each county, in partnership with the department, shall assume  re-
sponsibility for community-based supervision, sanctions and  services for offenders convicted of felo-
nies, designated drug-related misdemeanors , [ or] designated person misdemeanors  or designated
property misdemeanors who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after January  1, 1997, by a court or the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision to 12 months or less incarceration for violation of a condition  of parole, pro-
bation or post-prison supervision; or
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(3) Notwithstanding the  fact that the court has sentenced a person to a term of incarceration,
when an offender is committed to the custody of the supervisory authority of a county  under ORS
137.124 (2) or (4),  the supervisory authority may execute the sentence by imposing sanctions other
than incarceration if deemed appropriate by  the supervisory authority. If the supervisory authority
releases a person from custody under this subsection and the  person is required to report as a sex
offender under ORS  163A.010, the supervisory authority, as a condition of release, shall order the
person to report to the Department of State Police, a city police department or a  county sheriff’s
office or to the supervising agency, if any:
(a) When the person is released;
(b) Within 10 days of a change of residence;
(c) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s birth date;
(d) Within 10 days of the first  day the person works at, carries on a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(e) Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or attendance  status at an institution of higher
education.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Attends,” “institution  of higher education,” “works” and “carries on a vocation” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” means:
[26]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Unlawful possession of  [ fentanyl] a controlled substance  under ORS 475.752 [ (8)(a)] (3)(a),
(b), (c) or (d) ;
(B) Unlawful possession of methadone under ORS 475.824 [ (2)(b)] (2)(a);
(C) Unlawful possession of oxycodone under ORS 475.834 [ (2)(b)] (2)(a);
(D) Unlawful possession of heroin under ORS 475.854 [ (2)(b)] (2)(a);
(E) Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine under ORS  475.874 [(2)(b)]
(2)(a);
(F) Unlawful possession of cocaine under ORS 475.884 [ (2)(b)] (2)(a) ; [ or]
(G) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine under ORS 475.894 [ (2)(b).] (2)(a); or
(H) Unlawful use of a controlled substance in a public place under section 25 of  this 2024
Act.
(c) “Designated person misdemeanor” means:
(A) Assault in  the fourth degree constituting domestic violence if the judgment document is as
described in ORS 163.160 (4);
(B) Menacing constituting domestic violence if the judgment document is as described  in ORS
163.190 (3); or
(C) Sexual abuse in the third degree under ORS 163.415.
(d) “Designated property misdemeanor” means any of the following offenses, when the
court designates in the judgment of conviction that the offense is related to the  defendant’s
substance abuse disorder:
(A) Theft in the third degree under ORS 164.043;
(B) Theft in the second degree under ORS 164.045;
(C) Criminal trespass in the second degree under ORS 164.245;
(D) Criminal trespass in the first degree under ORS 164.255;
(E) Unlawful entry into a motor vehicle under ORS 164.272;
(F) Criminal mischief in the second degree under ORS 164.354;
(G) An attempt to commit any of the following offenses:
(i) Theft in the first degree under ORS 164.055;
(ii) Unauthorized use of a vehicle under ORS 164.135;
(iii) Criminal mischief in the first degree under ORS 164.365; or
(iv) Identity theft under ORS 165.800.
SECTION 39.
 ORS 423.483 is amended to read:
423.483. (1)(a) The baseline funding for biennia beginning after June 30, 1999, is the current
service level for the expenses of providing management, support services,  supervision and sanctions
for offenders described in ORS 423.478 (2).  At a minimum, each biennium’s appropriation must be
established at this baseline.
(b) The baseline funding described in paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) May not be decreased as a result of a reduction under ORS 137.633.
(B) May  not be increased as a result of community-based sanctions, services and programs that
are funded under section 53, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013.
(2) If the total state community corrections  appropriation is less than the baseline calculated
under subsection  (1) of this section, a county may discontinue participation by written notification
to the director 180 days prior to implementation of the change. If a  county discontinues partic-
ipation, the responsibility for correctional services transferred to the  county and the portion of
funding made available to the county under ORS 423.530  revert to the Department of Corrections.
[27]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Responsibility for supervision of and provision of correctional services to misdemeanor  offenders
does not revert to the department under  any circumstances except those of offenders convicted of
designated drug-related misdemeanors , [or] designated person misdemeanors  or designated property
misdemeanors.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Current service level” means  the calculated cost of continuing current legislatively funded
programs, phased in programs and increased caseloads  minus one-time costs, decreased caseloads,
phased out programs and pilot programs with the remainder adjusted for inflation  as determined by
the Legislative Assembly in its biennial appropriation to the Department of Corrections.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
(c) “Designated person misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
(d) “Designated property misdemeanor”  has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
SECTION 40.
 ORS 423.483, as amended by section 22, chapter 649, Oregon  Laws 2013, section
3, chapter 140, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 2, chapter 341, Oregon Laws 2023, is  amended to
read:
423.483. (1)(a) The baseline funding for biennia beginning after June 30, 1999, is the current
service level for the expenses of providing management, support services,  supervision and sanctions
for offenders described in ORS 423.478 (2).  At a minimum, each biennium’s appropriation must be
established at this baseline.
(b) The baseline funding described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may  not be decreased as
a result of a reduction under ORS 137.633.
(2) If the total state community corrections  appropriation is less than the baseline calculated
under subsection  (1) of this section, a county may discontinue participation by written notification
to the director 180 days prior to implementation of the change. If a  county discontinues partic-
ipation, the responsibility for correctional services transferred to the  county and the portion of
funding made available to the county under ORS 423.530  revert to the Department of Corrections.
Responsibility for supervision of and provision of correctional services to misdemeanor  offenders
does not revert to the department under  any circumstances except those of offenders convicted of
designated drug-related misdemeanors , [or] designated person misdemeanors  or designated property
misdemeanors.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Current service level” means  the calculated cost of continuing current legislatively funded
programs, phased in programs and increased caseloads  minus one-time costs, decreased caseloads,
phased out programs and pilot programs with the remainder adjusted for inflation  as determined by
the Legislative Assembly in its biennial appropriation to the Department of Corrections.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
(c) “Designated person misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
(d) “Designated property misdemeanor”  has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 423.525 is amended to read:
423.525. (1) A county, group of counties  or intergovernmental corrections entity shall apply to
the Director of the Department of Corrections in a manner and form prescribed by  the director for
funding made  available under ORS 423.500 to 423.560. The application shall include a community
corrections plan. The  Department of Corrections shall provide consultation and technical assistance
to counties to aid in the development and implementation of community corrections plans.
(2)(a) From July 1, 1995, until June 30, 1999, a county, group of counties  or intergovernmental
[28]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
corrections entity may make  application requesting funding for the construction, acquisition, ex-
pansion or remodeling of correctional facilities to serve the county, group  of counties or intergov-
ernmental corrections entity. The department shall review the application  for funding of
correctional facilities in accordance with criteria that consider design, cost,  capacity, need, operat-
ing efficiency and viability based on the county’s, group  of counties’ or intergovernmental cor-
rections entity’s ability to provide for ongoing operations.
(b)(A) If the application is approved, the department shall present the application  with a request
to finance the facility with financing agreements to the  State Treasurer and the Director of the
Oregon Department of  Administrative Services. Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B)
of this paragraph, upon approval of the request by the State Treasurer and the Director  of the
Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, the facility may be financed with financing agree-
ments, and certificates of participation issued pursuant thereto, as provided in ORS 283.085 to
283.092. All decisions approving or denying applications and requests  for financing under this sec-
tion are final. No such decision is subject to judicial review of any kind.
(B) If requests to finance county correctional facility projects are  submitted after February 22,
1996, and the requests have not been approved by the department on  the date a session of the
Legislative Assembly convenes, the requests are also  subject to the approval of the Legislative As-
sembly.
(c) After approval but prior to the solicitation of bids or proposals for the  construction of a
project, the county, group of counties or intergovernmental corrections entity and  the department
shall enter into a written agreement that determines the procedures, and  the parties responsible, for
the awarding of contracts and the administration of the  construction project for the approved
correctional facility. If the  parties are unable to agree on the terms of the written agreement, the
Governor shall decide the terms of the agreement. The Governor’s decision is final.
(d) After approval of a construction project, the administration of the  project shall be conducted
as provided in the agreement required  by paragraph (c) of this subsection. The agreement must re-
quire at a  minimum that the county, group of counties or intergovernmental corrections entity shall
submit to the department any change order or alteration of the design  of the project that, singly or
in the aggregate, reduces the capacity of the correctional facility or materially changes  the services
or functions of the project. The change order or alteration is  not effective until approved by the
department. In reviewing the change order or alteration,  the department shall consider whether the
implementation of the change order or alteration  will have any material adverse impact on the
parties to any financing agreements or the holders of any certificates of participation issued to fund
county correctional facilities under this section. In  making its decision, the department may rely on
the opinions of the Department of Justice, bond counsel or professional financial advisers.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 283.085,  for purposes of this section, “financing agreement” means a
lease purchase agreement, an installment sale agreement, a loan  agreement or any other agreement
to finance a correctional facility described in this section,  or to refinance a previously executed fi-
nancing agreement  for the financing of a correctional facility. The state is not required to own or
operate a correctional facility in order to finance it under ORS 283.085 to  283.092 and this section.
The state,  an intergovernmental corrections entity, county or group of counties may enter into any
agreements, including, but not limited to, leases  and subleases, that are reasonably necessary or
generally accepted by the financial community for purposes of  acquiring or securing financing as
authorized by this section. In  financing county correctional facilities under this section, “property
rights” as used in ORS 283.085 includes leasehold mortgages of the state’s  rights under leases of
[29]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
correctional facilities from counties.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, county  charter or ordinance, a county may
convey or lease to the State of Oregon, acting by and through the  Department of Corrections, title
to interests in, or a lease of, any real property, facilities or personal property owned by  the county
for the purpose of financing  the construction, acquisition, expansion or remodeling of a correctional
facility. Upon the payment of all principal and  interest on, or upon any other satisfaction of, the
financing agreement used  to finance the construction, acquisition, expansion or remodeling of a
correctional facility, the state  shall reconvey its interest in, or terminate and surrender its leasehold
of, the property or facilities, including the financed construction, acquisition, expansion or remod-
eling, to the county.  In addition to any authority granted by ORS 283.089, for the purposes of ob-
taining financing, the state may enter into agreements under which the state may grant to  trustees
or lenders leases, subleases and other security interests in county property conveyed  or leased to
the state under this subsection and in the property or facilities financed by financing agreements.
(5) In connection with the financing of correctional facilities, the  Director of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services may  bill the Department of Corrections, and the Department
of Corrections shall pay the amounts billed, in the same manner as provided in ORS 283.089. As
required by ORS  283.091, the Department of Corrections and the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services shall include in the Governor’s  budget all amounts that will be due in each fiscal
period under financing agreements for correctional facilities. Amounts payable by  the state under
a financing agreement for the construction, acquisition, expansion or remodeling of  a correctional
facility are limited to available funds as defined in ORS 283.085, and no lender, trustee, certificate
holder or  county has any claim or recourse against any funds of the state other than available funds.
(6) The director shall adopt rules that may  be necessary for the administration, evaluation and
implementation of ORS 423.500 to 423.560. The standards shall be sufficiently flexible  to foster the
development of new and improved supervision  or rehabilitative practices and maximize local control.
(7) When a county assumes responsibility under ORS 423.500 to 423.560 for  correctional services
previously provided by the department, the county and the  department shall enter into an inter-
governmental agreement that includes a local community corrections plan consisting  of program
descriptions, budget allocation, performance objectives and methods of evaluating each  correctional
service to be provided by  the county. The performance objectives must include in dominant part
reducing future criminal  conduct. The methods of evaluating services must include, to the extent
of available information systems resources, the collection and  analysis of data sufficient to deter-
mine the apparent effect of the services on future criminal conduct.
(8) All community corrections plans shall comply with rules adopted pursuant to  ORS 423.500
to 423.560, and shall include but  need not be limited to an outline of the basic structure and the
supervision, services and local sanctions to be applied to offenders convicted  of felonies, designated
drug-related misdemeanors , [ and] designated person misdemeanors  and designated property
misdemeanors who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after January  1, 1997, by a court or the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision to 12 months or less incarceration for a violation of a condition of  parole, pro-
bation or post-prison supervision; and
[30]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(9) All community corrections plans shall designate a community  corrections manager of the
county or counties and shall provide that  the administration of community corrections under ORS
423.500 to 423.560 shall be under such manager.
(10) No amendment to or modification of a county-approved  community corrections plan shall
be placed  in effect without prior notice to the director for purposes of statewide data collection and
reporting.
(11) The obligation of the  state to provide funding and the scheduling for providing funding of
a project  approved under this section is dependent upon the ability of the state to access public
security markets to sell financing agreements.
(12) No later than January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Evaluate the community corrections policy established in ORS 423.475, 423.478,  423.483 and
423.500 to 423.560; and
(b) Assess the effectiveness of local revocation options.
(13) As used in this  section, “designated drug-related misdemeanor ,” [ and] “designated person
misdemeanor”  and “designated property misdemeanor”  have the meanings  given those terms in
ORS 423.478.
(Mandatory Drug Treatment)
SECTION 42.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 137.540, for a person  charged with or convicted
of a designated drug-related misdemeanor or  designated property misdemeanor, the following
must be ordered as  condition of probation or included as part of any conditional discharge
diversion agreement under section 43 of this 2024 Act:
(a) A requirement that the person be evaluated  to determine whether the person is a
drug-dependent person, and that the person provide written consent for such evaluation;  and
(b) A requirement that,  if the evaluation described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
indicates that the person is a drug-dependent person and that the person may  benefit from
treatment for drug dependence, the person  complete the course of treatment as directed by
the evaluator.
(2) When an evaluation and treatment is required under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The state shall fund the costs of the evaluation and  treatment, including supervision
related to the person’s compliance with evaluation and treatment requirements.
(b) The court may assess against the person a fee to offset the costs described in  para-
graph (a) of this subsection based on the person’s ability to pay.
(3) As used in this section, “designated drug-related  misdemeanor” and “designated
property misdemeanor” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 423.478.
(Conditional Discharge Diversion)
SECTION 43.
(1)(a) The district attorney  shall offer any person charged with a designated
drug-related misdemeanor who meets the eligibility requirements described in subsection  (5)
of this section the opportunity to enter into a conditional  discharge diversion agreement. If
the defendant enters into the  agreement within 30 days after arraignment, or at a later date
with the consent of  the district attorney, the court shall defer further proceedings and place
[31]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the person on probation. The terms of the probation shall be defined by the agreement.
(b) A conditional discharge diversion agreement described in this section carries  the
understanding that if the defendant fulfills the terms of the agreement, the criminal charges
filed against the defendant will be dismissed with prejudice.
(c) The agreement must contain  a waiver of the following rights of the defendant with
respect to each criminal charge:
(A) The right to a speedy trial and trial by jury;
(B) The right to present evidence on the defendant’s behalf;
(C) The right to confront and cross-examine witnesses against the defendant;
(D) The right to contest evidence presented against the defendant, including  the right to
object to hearsay evidence; and
(E) The right to appeal from a judgment of conviction resulting from an adjudication of
guilt entered under subsection (2) of this section, unless the  appeal is based on an allegation
that the sentence  exceeds the maximum allowed by law or constitutes cruel and unusual
punishment.
(d) The agreement must include a  requirement that the defendant pay any restitution
owed to the victim as determined by the court, and any fees for court-appointed counsel or-
dered by the court under ORS 135.050.
(e) The agreement may not contain a requirement that the defendant enter a plea  of
guilty or no contest on any charge in the accusatory instrument.
(f) Entering into  the agreement does not constitute an admission of guilt and is not
sufficient to warrant a finding or adjudication of guilt by a court.
(g) Police reports or other documents associated with the criminal  charges in a court file
other than the probation agreement may not  be admitted into evidence, and do not establish
a factual basis for finding the defendant  guilty, unless the court resumes criminal pro-
ceedings and enters an adjudication of guilt under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Upon violation of a term or  condition of the conditional discharge diversion agree-
ment, the court may resume the criminal proceedings and may find the defendant guilty  of
the offenses in the accusatory instrument in accordance with the waiver of rights  in the
agreement. The defendant may not contest the sufficiency of the  evidence establishing the
defendant’s guilt of the offenses in the accusatory instrument.
(3) Upon a determination by the court that the terms and  conditions of the conditional
discharge diversion agreement have been met, the  court shall discharge the person and dis-
miss the proceedings against the person. Discharge  and dismissal under this section shall
be without adjudication of guilt and is  not a conviction for purposes of this section or for
purposes of disqualifications or disabilities imposed by law upon conviction of a crime.
(4) In the event that the period of probation under  this section expires, but the terms
and conditions of the  conditional discharge diversion agreement have not been fulfilled and
no probation violation proceeding was initiated prior to the expiration  of the period of pro-
bation, the court may not discharge the person and  dismiss the proceedings against the
person. The court  shall instead issue an order requiring the person to appear and to show
cause why the court  should not enter an adjudication of guilt as described in subsection (2)
of this section due to  the failure of the person to fulfill the terms and conditions of the
agreement prior to expiration of the period  of probation. At the hearing on the order to show
cause, after considering any evidence or argument  from the district attorney and the person,
[32]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the court may:
(a) Order a new period of probation to  allow the person to fulfill the terms and conditions
of the agreement; or
(b) Enter an adjudication of guilt as described in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) A defendant is eligible for  a conditional discharge diversion agreement as described
in this section if the defendant meets all of the following conditions:
(a) On the date the defendant enters into the agreement, the defendant  has no charge,
other than the charge that is the subject of the agreement, pending.
(b) The defendant has not been convicted of manufacture  or delivery of a controlled
substance as described in  ORS 475.752 to 475.980, or a statutory counterpart in another ju-
risdiction, within the previous five years.
(c) The defendant has not, within the previous year:
(A) Participated in a  diversion program for possession of a controlled substances or
driving under the influence of intoxicants, or in any similar diversion program related to the
use of alcohol or controlled substances, in this state or in any other jurisdiction;
(B) Participated in  a previous conditional discharge diversion program, a conditional
postponement or a similar diversion program for a designated drug-related misdemeanor; or
(C) Been sentenced to probation for a designated drug misdemeanor.
(d) The defendant does not have a criminal history score of A or B on the  sentencing
guidelines grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(6) As used in this section, “designated  drug-related misdemeanor” has the meaning
given that term in ORS 423.478.
(Expungement)
SECTION 44.
 ORS 137.225 is amended to read:
137.225. (1)(a) At any time after the person becomes  eligible as described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, any person convicted of an offense who has fully complied  with and performed the sen-
tence of the court for the offense, and whose  conviction is described in subsection (5) of this section,
by motion may apply  to the court where the conviction was entered for entry of an order setting
aside the conviction. A person who is still under supervision as part of  the sentence for the offense
that is the subject of the motion has not fully complied with or performed the sentence of the court.
(b) A person is eligible to file a motion under paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) For  a Class B felony, seven years from the date of conviction or the release of the person
from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(B) For a Class C felony, five years from  the date of conviction or the release of the person from
imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(C) For a  Class A misdemeanor, three years from the date of conviction or the release of the
person from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(D) For a Class B or Class C  misdemeanor, a violation or the finding of a person in contempt
of court, one  year from the date of conviction or finding or the release of the person from
imprisonment for the conviction or finding sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(E) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) to (D)  of this paragraph, for possession of a
controlled substance constituting a Class A misdemeanor, or use of a controlled  substance
in a public place under section 25 of  this 2024 Act, immediately following the successful
[33]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
completion of all conditions of probation resulting  from the conviction sought to be set aside,
one year from the date of conviction or one  year from the release of the person from
imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever occurs latest.
(c) If no accusatory instrument is filed, at any time after 60 days from the  date the prosecuting
attorney indicates that the state has elected not to proceed with a prosecution or contempt pro-
ceeding, an arrested, cited or charged person may  apply to the court in the county in which the
person was arrested, cited or charged, for entry of an order setting aside the record of the  arrest,
citation or charge.
(d) At any time after an acquittal or  a dismissal other than a dismissal described in paragraph
(c) of this subsection, an  arrested, cited or charged person may apply to the court in the county in
which the person was arrested, cited or charged, for entry  of an order setting aside the record of
the arrest, citation or charge.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, a person whose sentence of probation  was
revoked may not apply to the court for entry of an order setting  aside the conviction for which the
person was sentenced to probation for a period of three years from the date  of revocation or until
the person becomes eligible as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, whichever occurs later.
(f) A person filing a  motion under this section is not required to pay the filing fee established
under ORS 21.135.
(2)(a) A copy of  the motion shall be served upon the office of the prosecuting attorney who
prosecuted the offense, or who had authority to prosecute the  charge if there was no accusatory
instrument filed. The prosecuting attorney may object to a motion  filed under subsection (1)(a) of
this section and shall  notify the court and the person of the objection within 120 days of the date
the motion was filed with the court.
(b) When a  prosecuting attorney is served with a copy of a motion to set aside a conviction
under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the  motion
and notice of the hearing date to the victim, if any,  of the offense by mailing a copy of the motion
and notice to the victim’s last-known address.
(c) When a person makes  a motion under this section, the person shall forward to the Depart-
ment of State Police a full set of the person’s fingerprints on a fingerprint card or in  any other
manner specified by the department.
(d) When a person makes a motion under subsection (1)(a) of this section,  the person must pay
a fee to the Department  of State Police for the purpose of the department performing a criminal
record check. The department shall establish a fee in an amount not to exceed the actual  cost of
performing the criminal record check. If the department  is required to perform only one criminal
record check for the person, the department may only charge one fee, regardless of the number of
counties in which the person is filing a  motion to set aside a conviction, arrest, charge or citation
under this section.  The department shall provide a copy of the results of the criminal record check
to the prosecuting attorney.
(e) The prosecuting attorney may not charge the person a fee for performing the  requirements
described in this section.
(3)(a) If  an objection is received to a motion filed under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the
court shall hold a hearing, and may require the filing of such affidavits and may require  the taking
of such proofs as the court deems proper.  The court shall allow the victim to make a statement at
the hearing. If the person is otherwise eligible for relief under this section, the  court shall grant the
motion and enter an order as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection unless the court  makes
[34]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
written findings, by clear and convincing evidence, that the circumstances and behavior  of the per-
son, from the date of the conviction the person is seeking  to set aside to the date of the hearing on
the motion, do not warrant granting  the motion due to the circumstances and behavior creating a
risk to public safety. When determining whether the person’s circumstances and behavior  create a
risk to public safety, the court may only consider criminal behavior,  or violations of regulatory law
or administrative rule enforced by civil penalty or other administrative sanction that relate to the
character of the conviction sought to be set aside. The court may not consider nonpunitive civil
liability, monetary obligations and motor vehicle violations.  Upon granting the motion, the court
shall enter an appropriate order containing the original arrest or citation charge, the  conviction
charge, if different from the original, the date of  charge, the submitting agency and the disposition
of the charge. Upon the entry of the order, the person for purposes of the  law shall be deemed not
to have been previously convicted, and the  court shall issue an order sealing the record of con-
viction and other official records in the case, including the records of arrest, citation or charge.
(b) The court shall grant a motion  filed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section, or under
subsection (1)(a) of this section if  no objection to the motion is received, and shall enter an appro-
priate order containing the  original arrest or citation charge, the conviction charge, if applicable
and different from the original, the date of charge, the submitting agency and  the disposition of the
charge. Upon the entry of the order, the person for purposes of the law shall be deemed not to have
been previously convicted, arrested, cited or charged, and the court shall issue an order sealing all
official records in the case, including the records of arrest, citation or charge, whether or  not the
arrest, citation or charge resulted in a further criminal proceeding.
(4) The  clerk of the court shall forward a certified copy of the order to such agencies as directed
by the  court. A certified copy must be sent to the Department of Corrections when the order con-
cerns a conviction. Upon entry of the order, the conviction,  arrest, citation, charge or other pro-
ceeding shall be deemed  not to have occurred, and the person may answer accordingly any questions
relating to its occurrence.
(5) The provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section apply to a conviction for:
(a) A Class B felony, except for a violation of ORS 166.429 or any  crime classified as a person
felony as defined in the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(b) Any misdemeanor,  Class C felony or felony punishable as a misdemeanor pursuant to ORS
161.705.
(c) An offense constituting a violation under state law or local ordinance.
(d) An  offense committed before January 1, 1972, that, if committed after that date, would qualify
for an order under this section.
(e) The finding of a person in contempt of court.
(6) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section, the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this sec-
tion do not apply to a conviction for:
(a) Criminal mistreatment  in the second degree under ORS 163.200 if the victim at the time of
the crime was 65 years of age or older.
(b) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree under ORS 163.205 if the victim at the  time of the
crime was  65 years of age or older, or when the offense constitutes child abuse as defined in ORS
419B.005.
(c) Endangering the welfare of a minor under ORS 163.575  (1)(a), when the offense constitutes
child abuse as defined in ORS 419B.005.
(d) Criminally negligent homicide under ORS 163.145, when  that offense was punishable as a
[35]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Class C felony.
(e) Assault in the third degree under ORS 163.165 (1)(h).
(f) Any sex crime, unless:
(A) The sex crime is listed in ORS 163A.140 (1)(a) and:
(i) The person has been relieved of the obligation  to report as a sex offender pursuant to a court
order entered under ORS 163A.145 or 163A.150; and
(ii) The person has not been  convicted of, found guilty except for insanity of or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the juvenile  court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; or
(B) The sex crime constitutes a Class C felony and:
(i) The person was under 16 years of age at the time of the offense;
(ii) The person is:
(I) Less than two years and 180 days older than the victim; or
(II) At least two years and 180 days older, but  less than three years and 180 days older, than
the victim and the court finds that setting aside the conviction is  in the interests of justice and of
benefit to the person and the community;
(iii) The victim’s  lack of consent was due solely to incapacity to consent by reason of being less
than a specified age;
(iv) The victim was at least 12 years of age at the time of the offense;
(v) The person has not been convicted of, found  guilty except for insanity of or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the juvenile  court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; and
(vi) Each conviction or finding described in this subparagraph involved the same victim.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection  (5) of this section, the provisions of subsection (1) of this section
do not apply to:
(a) A conviction for a state or municipal traffic offense.
(b) A person convicted, within the following applicable time period immediately  preceding the
filing of the motion pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, of any other offense, excluding  motor
vehicle violations, whether or not the other conviction is  for conduct associated with the same
criminal episode that caused the arrest, citation, charge or conviction that is sought to be  set aside:
(A) For a motion concerning a Class B felony, seven years.
(B) For a motion concerning a Class C felony, five years.
(C) For a motion concerning a Class A misdemeanor, three years.
(D) For a motion concerning a Class B or Class C misdemeanor a violation or a finding of  con-
tempt of court, one year.
(c) A single violation, other than a motor vehicle violation, within the time period specified in
paragraph (b) of this subsection is not a conviction under this  subsection. Notwithstanding sub-
section (1) of this section, a conviction  that has been set aside under this section shall be considered
for the purpose of determining whether paragraph (b) of this subsection is applicable.
(d) A person who at  the time the motion authorized by subsection (1) of this section is pending
before the court is under charge of commission of any crime.
(8) The provisions of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this  section do not apply to an arrest or citation
for driving while under the influence of intoxicants if the charge  is dismissed as a result of the
person’s successful completion of a diversion agreement described in ORS 813.200.
(9) The provisions of subsection (1)  of this section apply to convictions, arrests, citations and
[36]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
charges that occurred before, as well as those that occurred after, September  9, 1971. There is no
time limit for making an application.
(10) For purposes of any civil action in which truth is an element  of a claim for relief or affir-
mative defense, the provisions of subsection (3) of this section providing that  the conviction, arrest,
citation, charge or other proceeding be deemed not to have occurred do not apply and a party  may
apply to the court for an order requiring disclosure of the official records in  the case as may be
necessary in the interest of justice.
(11)(a) Upon motion of any prosecutor or defendant  in a case involving records sealed under this
section, supported by affidavit showing good cause, the court with jurisdiction may  order the reo-
pening and disclosure of any records sealed under this section  for the limited purpose of assisting
the investigation of the movant. However, such  an order has no other effect on the orders setting
aside the conviction or the arrest, citation or charge record.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, when  an arrest, citation or charge de-
scribed in subsection (1)(c) of this section is set  aside, a prosecuting attorney may, for the purpose
of initiating a criminal proceeding within the statute  of limitations, unseal the records sealed under
this section by notifying the court with jurisdiction  over the charge, record of arrest or citation.
The prosecuting attorney shall notify the person who is the subject  of the records of the unsealing
under this paragraph by sending written notification to the person’s last known address.
(12) The State Court Administrator shall create forms to be used throughout the state  for
motions and proposed orders described in this section.
(13) As used in this section:
(a) “Affidavit” includes a declaration under penalty of perjury.
(b) “Sex crime” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
OPIOID OVERDOSE RAPID RESPONSE GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 45.
(1) The Opioid Overdose Rapid  Response Grant Program is established to
assist cities and counties in establishing and supporting opioid overdose  rapid response
teams.
(2) The  Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall administer the grant program de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section and shall award the grants described in  this section.
(3) The commission shall  adopt rules to administer the grant program. Rules adopted
under this section must include:
(a) A methodology  for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants;
and
(b) A process for evaluating the efficacy of the services funded by the grant program.
(4) As used in  this section, “opioid overdose rapid response team” means a small team
of persons who respond as soon as possible, and within 72 hours, to reports of opioid overdose
events or reports of the administration of Naloxone, to offer person-centered services,  in-
cluding referrals to drug treatment programs, to the person  experiencing the overdose or to
whom the Naloxone is administered.  An opioid overdose rapid response team may consist of
a peace officer, a  firefighter or emergency medical technician, a peer recovery mentor and
a treatment professional.
SECTION 46.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2025,
[37]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
out of the General Fund, the  amount of $
, for the purposes of the grant program
described in section 45 of this 2024 Act.
HOLD DURATION FOR PERSONS UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF DRUGS OR ALCOHOL
SECTION 47.  ORS 430.399 is amended to read:
430.399. (1) Any person who is intoxicated or under the influence  of controlled substances in a
public place may be sent home or taken to a sobering facility or to a treatment facility by a police
officer. If the person is incapacitated,  the person shall be taken by the police officer to an appro-
priate treatment facility or sobering facility. If the health of the person appears to be in immediate
danger, or the police officer has reasonable cause to believe  the person is dangerous to self or to
any other person, the person shall be taken by the police officer  to an appropriate treatment facility
or sobering facility. A person shall be deemed  incapacitated when in the opinion of the police officer
the person is unable to make a rational decision as to acceptance of assistance.
(2) When a  person is taken to a treatment facility, the director of the treatment facility shall
determine whether the person shall be admitted  as a patient, referred to another treatment facility
or a  sobering facility or denied referral or admission. If the person is incapacitated or the health
of the person appears  to be in immediate danger, or if the director has reasonable cause to believe
the person is dangerous to self or to  any other person, the person must be admitted. The person
shall be discharged within [ 48] 72 hours  unless the person has applied for voluntary admission to the
treatment facility.
(3) When a person is taken to a  sobering facility, the staff of the sobering facility shall, con-
sistent with the facility’s comprehensive written policies and  procedures, determine whether or not
the person shall be admitted into the sobering facility. A person who  is admitted shall be discharged
from the sobering facility within 24 hours.
(4) In the absence of any  appropriate treatment facility or sobering facility, or if a sobering fa-
cility determines that a person should not be admitted to  the sobering facility, an intoxicated person
or a person under  the influence of controlled substances who would otherwise be taken by the police
officer to a treatment facility or sobering facility may be taken to the  city or county jail where the
person may be  held until no longer intoxicated, under the influence of controlled substances or in-
capacitated.
(5) An intoxicated person or person under  the influence of controlled substances, when taken
into custody by the police officer for a criminal offense, shall immediately be taken to  the nearest
appropriate treatment facility when the condition of the person requires emergency  medical treat-
ment.
(6) The records of a person at a treatment  facility or sobering facility may not, without the
person’s consent,  be revealed to any person other than the director and staff of the treatment fa-
cility or sobering facility. A person’s request that no disclosure be made  of admission to a treatment
facility or sobering facility shall  be honored unless the person is incapacitated or disclosure of ad-
mission is required by ORS 430.397.
ALCOHOL AND DRUG POLICY COMMISSION
(Funding for Evidence-Informed Services)
SECTION 48.
(1) As used in this section:
[38]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) “Commission” means the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission established  under ORS
430.221.
(b) “Community court program” means an evidence-informed program  that utilizes con-
tingency management to address addiction with incentives and swift,  certain and fair sanc-
tions for noncompliance.
(c) “Community harm reduction” means evidence-informed policies and  practices that
reduce harm to  the community caused by drug-dependent persons and persons unlawfully
distributing controlled substances.
(d) “Detoxification facility” means a facility approved by the Oregon  Health Authority
that provides emergency care or treatment for drug-dependent persons.
(e) “Drug-dependency related  offense” means an offense that is motivated by a depend-
ence on a controlled substance.
(f) “Drug-dependent person”  means an individual who has lost the ability to control the
personal use of controlled  substances with abuse potential, or who uses controlled sub-
stances to the extent that the health of the individual,  or the health of other individuals, is
substantially impaired or endangered, or the social or economic function  of the individual is
substantially disrupted. A drug-dependent person may or  may not be physically dependent,
a condition in which the body requires a continuing supply of a controlled substance to avoid
characteristic withdrawal symptoms, or psychologically  dependent, a condition characterized
by an overwhelming mental desire for continued use of a controlled substance.
(g) “Individual harm reduction” means evidence-informed policies and practices that re-
duce harm to drug-dependent persons, with or without the use of law enforcement.
(h) “Local planning  committee” means a local planning committee for alcohol and drug
prevention and treatment services appointed by  or designated by the county governing body
under ORS 430.342.
(i) “Police officer” means a member of a law enforcement unit who is employed on a
part-time or full-time  basis as a peace officer, commissioned by a city, a county or the De-
partment of State Police and responsible for enforcing the criminal laws  of this state, and
any person formally deputized by a law enforcement unit to take custody of a person  who is
intoxicated or under the influence of one or more controlled substances.
(j) “Prevention” means evidence-informed policies, procedures and  practices that reduce
the rate of persons that  become drug-dependent persons among the population that is the
target for the policies, procedures and practices.
(k) “Recovery” means the state of a person who was a drug-dependent person but who
is no longer drug-dependent.
(L) “Sobering center” means a facility that meets all of the following criteria:
(A) The facility  operates for the purpose of providing to individuals who are acutely
intoxicated a safe,  clean and supervised environment until the individuals are no longer
acutely intoxicated.
(B) The facility  contracts with or is affiliated with a treatment program or a provider
approved by the Oregon Health Authority to provide addiction  treatment and the contract
or affiliation agreement includes, but is not limited to, case consultation, training and  advice
and a plan for making referrals to addiction treatment.
(C) The facility, in consultation with the addiction  treatment program or provider, has
adopted comprehensive written policies and procedures incorporating  best practices for the
[39]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
safety of intoxicated individuals, employees of the facility and volunteers at the facility.
(D) The facility is registered with the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 430.262.
(m) “Treatment” means a program that  utilizes evidence-based methods to assist a
drug-dependent person to become a person in recovery, and that:
(A) Is based on published research in at  least two peer-reviewed journals that cite the
methods used in the program  as effective in treating drug-dependent persons by assisting the
persons to become persons in recovery;
(B) Is standardized so that the  program can be replicated with the same or similar effi-
cacy;
(C) Has been studied in more than one environment  and has provided consistent and ef-
fective results; and
(D) Is subject to ongoing evaluation to determine if implementation is adhering to  the
protocol for the method and delivering the desired results of assisting drug-dependent  per-
sons to become persons in recovery.
(n) “Treatment facility” includes outpatient facilities,  inpatient facilities and other facil-
ities that provide treatment services that also meet the minimum standards  established un-
der ORS 430.357, any of which  may also provide diagnosis and evaluation, medical care,
detoxification, social services or rehabilitation for drug-dependent persons  and which operate
in the form of a general hospital, state hospital, foster home, hostel, clinic or  other suitable
form approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) Using funds from the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund  established under
ORS 430.384 or from any other available source,  the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission
shall provide grants and funding to counties, federally recognized Indian  tribes in this state
and Behavioral Health Resource Networks to support the provision of the following
evidence-informed and evidence-based services:
(a) Prevention;
(b) Treatment;
(c) Recovery support; and
(d) Individual harm reduction.
(3) Using funds from the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund  established under
ORS 430.384 or from any other available source, the commission shall provide grants  and
funding to cities and counties to support enforcement related to community harm  reduction
services as described in subsection (6) of this section.
(4) Grants and funding provided by the commission under this section shall ensure  that
each region of this state receives funding in equitable  proportion to the region’s need, as
determined by the rules of the commission.
(5) The commission shall prioritize  the funding of detoxification facilities, sobering cen-
ters, treatment facilities and peer recovery support services, including  culturally-specific
programs, to all regions of the state on a formula grant basis as determined by the com-
mission by rule.
(6) The commission shall also prioritize the funding  of community harm reduction on a
competitive grant basis, including:
(a) Programs for diversion in lieu of arrest by a police officer;
(b) Community court programs to divert and assist drug-dependent persons that have
been charged with drug possession or other drug-dependent related offenses; and
[40]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Focused deterrence to eliminate overt drug markets.
(7) The commission shall by rule  specify the manner of applying for grants and funding
under this section. All grant and funding applications must be approved by  the local planning
committee for each county in which the program will operate.
(8) The chairperson of the commission shall request that the Legislative Assembly ap-
propriate an amount  of moneys each biennium to ensure that the funds available to the
commission for grants and funding under this section is not less than the total amount  de-
posited and transferred into the Drug  Treatment and Recovery Services Fund pursuant to
ORS 430.384 for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, adjusted for inflation each subsequent
biennium based on changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West
Region (All  Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States De-
partment of Labor.
(9) The commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
(Transfer of Duties from Oregon Health Authority and Oversight and
Accountability Council)
SECTION 49.
 ORS 430.384 is amended to read:
430.384. (1) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund  is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned by the Drug Treatment and Re-
covery Services Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund shall consist of:
[(a) Moneys deposited into the fund pursuant to ORS 305.231; ]
[(b)] (a)  Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative Assembly;
[(c)] (b) Moneys allocated from the Oregon Marijuana Account, pursuant to ORS  475C.726 (3)(b);
and
[(d) Moneys allocated from the Criminal Fine Account pursuant to ORS 137.300 (4); and ]
[(e)] (c)  All other moneys deposited into the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to  the [ Oregon Health Authority ] Al-
cohol and Drug Policy Commission  for the purposes set forth in ORS 430.389  and section 48 of
this 2024 Act .
(4)(a) Pursuant to subsection [ (2)(b)] (2)(a)  of this  section, the Legislative Assembly shall ap-
propriate or transfer to the fund an  amount sufficient to fully fund the grants program required by
ORS 430.389 and section 48 of this 2024 Act .
(b) The total amount  deposited and transferred into the fund shall not be less than $57 million
for the first year ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 are in effect.
(c) In each subsequent year, the minimum transfer amount set  forth in paragraph (b) of this
subsection shall be increased by not less than the sum of:
(A) $57 million multiplied  by the percentage, if any, by which the monthly averaged U.S. City
Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31 of the prior calendar
year exceeds the monthly index for the fourth quarter of the calendar year 2020; and
(B) The annual increase, if any, in moneys distributed pursuant to ORS 475C.726 (3)(b).
SECTION 50.
 ORS 430.387 is amended to read:
430.387. The [ Oregon Health Authority ] Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission  shall cause the
moneys in the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund to be distributed as follows:
[41]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) An amount necessary for the administration of ORS [ 430.388 to ] 430.389 and  430.390, ex-
cluding amounts necessary to establish and maintain the telephone hotline described in ORS  430.391
(1).
(2) After the distribution set forth in subsection (1)  of this section, the remaining moneys in the
fund shall be distributed to the grants program as set forth in ORS 430.389.
SECTION 51.
 ORS 430.389 is amended to read:
430.389. (1) The  [ Oversight and Accountability Council ] Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission
shall approve grants and funding [ provided by  the Oregon Health Authority in accordance with this
section] to  accomplish the following:
(a) Implement Behavioral Health Resource Networks and increase access to  community care.
A Behavioral Health Resource Network is an entity or collection of  entities that individually or
jointly provide some or all of the services described in subsection (2)(e) of this section[ .]; and
(b) Provide grants and funding as described in section 48 of this 2024 Act.
(2)(a) The [ authority] commission  shall establish an equitable:
(A) Process for applying for grants and funding by agencies  or organizations, whether govern-
ment or community based, to  establish Behavioral Health Resource Networks for the purposes of
immediately screening the acute  needs of individuals with substance use, including those who also
have a mental illness, and assessing and addressing any ongoing needs through  ongoing case man-
agement, harm reduction, treatment, housing and linkage to other care and services.
(B) Evaluation process to assess  the effectiveness of Behavioral Health Resource Networks that
receive grants or funding.
(b) Recipients of grants or funding must be licensed, certified or credentialed  by the state, in-
cluding certification under ORS 743A.168 (9), or meet criteria prescribed by rule by the [ authority]
commission under ORS  430.390. A recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection may not
use the grant or funding to supplant the recipient’s existing funding.
(c) The [ council and the authority ] commission  shall ensure that residents of  each county have
access to all of the services described in paragraph (e) of this subsection.
(d) Applicants for grants and  funding may apply individually or jointly with other network par-
ticipants to provide services in one or more counties.
(e) A network must have the  capacity to provide the following services and any other services
specified by the [ authority] commission  by rule but no individual participant in  a network is re-
quired to provide all of the services:
(A) Screening  by certified addiction peer support or wellness specialists or other qualified per-
sons designated by the [ council] commission  to determine a client’s need for immediate medical or
other treatment to determine what acute care is needed and where it  can be best provided, identify
other needs and link the  client to other appropriate local or statewide services, including treatment
for substance use and coexisting health problems,  housing, employment, training and child care.
Networks shall provide this service 24  hours a day, seven days a week, every calendar day of the
year through a telephone line or other means. Networks may rely on the statewide telephone
hotline established by the authority under ORS  430.391 for telephone screenings during nonbusiness
hours such  as evenings, weekends and holidays. Notwithstanding paragraph (c) of this subsection,
only one grantee  in each network within each county is required to provide the screenings described
in this subparagraph.
(B) Comprehensive behavioral health  needs assessment, including a substance use screening by
a certified alcohol and drug counselor or other credentialed addiction treatment professional.  The
[42]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
assessment shall prioritize the self-identified needs of a client.
(C) Individual intervention planning, case management and connection to services. If, after the
completion  of  a screening, a client indicates a desire to address some or all of the identified needs,
a case manager shall work with the client to design an individual intervention plan. The plan must
address the  client’s need for substance use treatment, coexisting health problems, housing, employ-
ment and training, child care and other services.
(D) Ongoing peer  counseling and support from screening and assessment through implementation
of individual intervention plans as well as peer  outreach workers to engage directly with
marginalized community members who could potentially benefit from the network’s services.
(E) Assessment of the need for, and provision of, mobile or virtual outreach services to:
(i) Reach clients who are unable to access the network; and
(ii) Increase public awareness of network services.
(F) Harm reduction services and information and education about harm reduction services.
(G) Low-barrier substance use treatment.
(H) Transitional and supportive housing for individuals with substance use.
(f) If an applicant for a grant or funding under this subsection is unable to provide all  of the
services described in paragraph (e) of this subsection, the applicant may identify  how the applicant
intends to partner with other entities to provide the services, and the [ authority and the  council ]
commission may facilitate collaboration among applicants.
(g) All services provided  through the networks must be evidence-informed, trauma-informed,
culturally  specific,  linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental. The goal shall be
to address effectively the client’s substance use and any other social determinants of health.
(h) The networks must be adequately staffed to address the needs  of people with substance use
within their regions as prescribed by the authority by rule, including, at a minimum, at least  one
person in each of the following categories:
(A) Alcohol and drug counselor certified by the authority or other credentialed addiction  treat-
ment professional;
(B) Case manager;
(C) Addiction peer support specialist certified by the [ authority] Oregon Health Authority ;
(D) Addiction peer wellness specialist certified by the authority;
(E) Recovery mentor, certified by the Mental Health and Addiction Certification Board of
Oregon or its successor organization; and
(F) Youth support specialist certified by the authority.
(i) Verification of a screening by a certified addiction peer support  specialist, wellness specialist
or other person in accordance with paragraph (e)(A)  of this subsection shall promptly be provided
to the client  by the entity conducting the screening. If the client executes a valid release of infor-
mation, the entity shall provide verification of the screening to the  authority or a contractor of the
authority  and  the authority or the authority’s contractor shall forward the verification to [ the court,
in the manner prescribed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, to satisfy the conditions  for dis-
missal under ORS 153.062 or 475.237 ] any entity the client has authorized to receive the ver-
ification.
[(3)(a) If moneys remain in the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund after the council has
committed grants and funding to establish behavioral  health resource networks serving every county
in this state, the council shall authorize grants  and funding to other agencies or organizations, whether
government or community based, and to the nine federally recognized tribes  in this state and service
[43]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
providers that are affiliated with the nine federally recognized tribes in this state to  increase access to
one or more of the following: ]
[(A) Low-barrier substance use treatment that  is evidence-informed, trauma-informed, culturally
specific, linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental; ]
[(B) Peer support and recovery services; ]
[(C) Transitional, supportive and permanent housing for persons with substance use; ]
[(D) Harm reduction  interventions including, but not limited to, overdose prevention education, ac-
cess to short-acting opioid antagonists, as defined in ORS 689.800, and  sterile syringes and stimulant-
specific drug education and outreach; or ]
[(E) Incentives and supports  to expand the behavioral health workforce to support the services de-
livered by behavioral health resource networks and entities  receiving grants or funding under this
subsection.]
[(b) A recipient of a grant or funding  under this subsection may not use the grant or funding to
supplant the recipient’s existing funding. ]
[(4)] (3)  In awarding grants and funding  under [ subsections (1) and (3) ] subsection (1)  of this
section  and section 48 of this 2024 Act , the [ council] commission  shall:
(a) Distribute grants and funding to ensure access to:
(A) Historically underserved populations; and
(B) Culturally specific and linguistically responsive services.
(b) Consider any inventories or surveys of currently available behavioral health services.
(c) Consider available regional data related to the substance  use treatment needs and the access
to culturally specific and linguistically responsive services in communities in this state.
(d) Consider the needs of residents  of this state for services, supports and treatment at all ages.
(e) Consider data regarding the geographic location  and rates of overdose incidents and
deaths and the rates of crime committed by drug-dependent persons as defined in section  48
of this 2024 Act.
[(5)] (4) The [ council] commission  shall require any government entity  that applies for a grant
to specify in the application details regarding subgrantees and how the  government entity will fund
culturally specific organizations and culturally specific services. A government entity receiving a
grant must make an explicit commitment not to supplant or decrease any  existing funding used to
provide services funded by the grant.
[(6)] (5) In determining grants and funding to be  awarded, the [ council] commission may consult
the comprehensive addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan  established by the [ Alcohol
and Drug Policy Commission ] commission  under ORS 430.223 and the advice of any other  group,
agency, organization or individual that  desires to provide advice to the [ council] commission  that
is consistent with the terms of this section.
[(7)] (6)  Services provided by grantees, including services provided by a Behavioral Health  Re-
source Network, shall be free  of charge to the clients receiving the services. Grantees in each net-
work shall seek  reimbursement from insurance issuers, the medical assistance program or any other
third party responsible for the cost  of services provided to a client and grants and funding provided
by the  [ council or the authority ] commission  under this section may be used for copayments,
deductibles or other out-of-pocket costs incurred by the client for the services.
[(8)] (7)  Subsection [ (7)] (6)  of this section  does not require the medical assistance program to
reimburse the cost of services for which another third party is responsible in violation of 42  U.S.C.
1396a(25).
[44]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 52.
 ORS 430.390 is amended to read:
430.390. (1)[(a) The Oregon Health Authority ] The Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission  shall
adopt rules that establish a grant application process, a process  to appeal the denial of a grant and
general criteria and requirements for the Behavioral Health  Resource Networks and the grants and
funding required by ORS 430.389, including rules requiring recipients of grants and funding  to col-
lect and report information necessary for the Secretary of State to conduct the financial  and per-
formance audits required by ORS 430.392.
[(b) When adopting or amending  rules under this subsection, the authority shall convene an advi-
sory committee in accordance with ORS 183.333 in which members of the Oversight  and Accountability
Council compose a majority of the membership. ]
(2) The [ council] commission  shall have and retain the authority to oversee the Behavioral
Health Resource Networks established under ORS 430.389  and approve the grants and funding under
ORS 430.389.
(3) The [ authority] commission  shall administer and provide all necessary support to  ensure the
implementation of ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, and that recipients of grants or  funding
comply with all applicable rules regulating the provision of behavioral health services.
(4)(a) The [ authority, in consultation with the council, ] commission  may enter into interagency
agreements to ensure proper distribution of funds for the grants required by ORS 430.389.
(b) The [ authority] commission  shall encourage and take  all reasonable measures to ensure that
grant recipients cooperate, coordinate and act jointly with one another to offer the services  de-
scribed in ORS 430.389.
(c) The [ authority] commission  shall post to the [ authority’s] commission’s  website,  at the time
a grant or funding is awarded:
(A) The name of the recipient of the grant or funding;
(B) The names of any subgrantees or  subcontractors of the recipient of the grant or funding; and
(C) The amount of the grant or funding awarded.
[(5) The authority shall provide requested technical, logistical and other support to the  council to
assist the council with the council’s duties and obligations. ]
[(6)] (5)  The Department of Justice shall provide legal  services to the [ council] commission  if
requested to assist the [ council] commission  in carrying out the [ council’s] commission’s  duties
and obligations.
SECTION 53.
 ORS 430.391 is amended to read:
430.391. (1) The [ Oregon Health  Authority ] Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission  shall estab-
lish a Behavioral Health Resource Network statewide  telephone hotline to provide screenings de-
scribed in ORS 430.389 (2)(e)(A) to any caller who is a resident of this state.
(2) The telephone hotline shall be staffed 24 hours a day, seven days a  week, every calendar day
of the year.  Following a screening, at the request of a caller, the telephone hotline shall promptly
provide the verification set forth in ORS 430.389 (2)(i).
SECTION 54.  ORS 430.392 is amended to read:
430.392. (1) The  Division of Audits of the office of the Secretary of State shall conduct per-
formance audits and  financial reviews as provided in this section, regarding the uses of the Drug
Treatment and Recovery Services Fund and the effectiveness  of the fund in achieving the purposes
of the fund and the policy objectives of ORS 430.383. Recipients of grants or funds  under ORS
430.389 shall keep accurate books, records and accounts that are  subject to inspection and audit by
the division.
[45]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The division shall monitor and report  on the progress in implementing any recommendations
made in the audit or financial review. The division shall follow  up on recommendations as part of
recurring audit work or as  an activity separate from other audit activity. When following up on
recommendations, the division may request from the appropriate agency evidence  of implementation.
(3) The audits set forth  in this section shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of ORS
chapter 297, except to the extent any provision of ORS chapter 297  conflicts with any provision of
ORS [ 293.665 and 305.231 and] 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, in which case the provisions of ORS
[293.665 and 305.231 and] 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 shall control.
(4) No later than December 31, 2023, the division shall perform a:
(a) Real-time audit,  as prescribed by the division, which shall include an assessment of [ the re-
lationship between  the Oversight and Accountability Council and the Oregon Health Authority, ] the
relationship between the  [ council] Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission  and recipients of grants
or funding and the structural integrity of ORS [ 293.665 and 305.231 and ] 430.383  to 430.390 and
430.394, including but not limited to assessing:
(A) Whether  the organizational structure of the [ council] commission  contains conflicts or
problems.
(B) Whether the rules adopted by the [ council] commission  are clear and functioning properly.
(C) Whether the [ council] commission  has sufficient authority and independence  to achieve the
[council’s] commission’s  mission.
(D) Whether the [ authority] commission  is  fulfilling the [ authority’s] commission’s  duties under
ORS 430.384, 430.387, 430.390 and 430.391.
(E) Whether there are conflicts of interest in the process of awarding grants or funding.
(F) Whether there are opportunities to expand  collaboration between the [ council] commission
and state agencies.
(G) Whether barriers exist in data collection and evaluation mechanisms.
(H) Who is providing the data.
(I) Other areas identified by the division.
(b) Financial review, which shall include an assessment of the following:
(A) Whether grants  and funding are going to organizations that are culturally responsive and
linguistically specific, including an assessment of:
(i) The barriers that  exist for grant and funding applicants who are Black, Indigenous or People
of Color.
(ii) The applicants that were denied and why.
(iii) Whether grants and other funding  are being disbursed based on the priorities specified in
ORS 430.389.
(iv) For government entities receiving grants or funding under ORS 430.389, the government
entities’ subgrantees  and whether the governmental entity supplanted or decreased any local funding
dedicated to the same services after receiving grants or funds under ORS 430.389.
(v) What proportion of grants or funds received by grantees  and others under ORS 430.389, was
devoted to administrative costs.
(B) The organizations and agencies receiving grants or funding under ORS 430.389 and:
(i) Which of the organizations and agencies are Behavioral Health Resource Network entities.
(ii) The amount each organization and agency received.
(iii) The total number of organizations and agencies that applied for grants or funding.
(iv) The amount of moneys from the fund that were used to administer  the programs selected
[46]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by the [ council] commission .
(v) The moneys that remained in the Drug  Treatment and Recovery Services Fund after grants
and funding were disbursed.
(5) No later than December 31, 2025, the division shall conduct a  performance audit, which must
include an assessment of the following:
(a) All relevant  data regarding the implementation of ORS [ 153.062 and] 430.391[, including de-
mographic information on individuals who receive citations subject to ORS 153.062 and  430.391 and
whether the citations resulted in connecting the individuals with treatment ].
(b) The functioning of:
[(A) Law enforcement and the courts in relation to Class E violation citations; ]
[(B)] (A)  The telephone hotline operated by the [ authority] commission ;
[(C)] (B)  Entities providing verification of screenings under ORS 430.389; and
[(D)] (C)  The grants and funding systems between  the [ council, the authority ] commission  and
recipients of grants or funding, including  by gathering information about which entities are receiv-
ing grants or funding and what the grants or  funding are used for, the process of applying for grants
or funding and whether the process is conducive to  obtaining qualified applicants for grants or
funding who are from communities of color.
(c) Disparities shown by demographic data and whether the citation data reveals  a dispropor-
tionate use of citations in communities most impacted by the war on drugs.
(d) Whether ORS [ 153.062,] 430.389 and 430.391 reduce the involvement in the criminal  justice
system of individuals with substance use.
(e) Training opportunities  provided to law enforcement officials regarding services that are
available and how to connect individuals to the services.
(f) The efficacy of issuing citations as a method of connecting individuals to services.
(g) The role of the implementation of ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 in reducing  overdose
rates.
(h) Outcomes for individuals receiving  treatment and other social services under ORS 430.389,
including, but not limited to, the following:
(A) Whether access to  care increased since December 3, 2020, and, if data is available, whether,
since December 3, 2020:
(i) The number of drug and alcohol treatment service providers increased.
(ii) The number of culturally specific providers increased.
(iii) Access to harm reduction services has increased.
(iv) More individuals are accessing treatment than they were before December 3, 2020.
(v) Access to housing for individuals with substance use has increased.
(B) Data on Behavioral Health Resource  Networks and recipients of grants and funding under
ORS 430.389, including:
(i) The outcomes of each network or recipient, including but  not limited to the number of clients
with substance use receiving services from each network or recipient,  the average duration of client
participation and client outcomes.
(ii) The number  of individuals seeking assistance from the network or recipients who are denied
or not connected to substance use treatment and other services, and the reasons for the denials.
(iii) The average time it takes for clients to access services and fulfill their individual  inter-
vention plan and the reason for any delays, such as waiting lists at referred services.
(iv) Whether  average times to access services to which clients are referred, such as housing or
[47]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
medically assisted treatment, have decreased over time since December 3, 2020.
(v) Demographic data on clients served by Behavioral Health Resource Networks,  including
self-reported demographic data on race, ethnicity, gender and age.
(i) Each recipient of a grant or funding.
(j) Other areas identified by the division for ascertaining best practices for overdose prevention.
(6) The division shall conduct periodic performance audits and financial reviews pursuant to the
division’s annual audit plan and taking into consideration the risks of the program.
SECTION 55.
 ORS 430.392, as amended by  section 11, chapter 248, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
430.392. (1) The  Division of Audits of the office of the Secretary of State shall conduct per-
formance audits and  financial reviews as provided in this section, regarding the uses of the Drug
Treatment and Recovery Services Fund and the effectiveness  of the fund in achieving the purposes
of the fund and the policy objectives of ORS 430.383. Recipients of grants or funds  under ORS
430.389 shall keep accurate books, records and accounts that are  subject to inspection and audit by
the division.
(2) The division shall monitor and report  on the progress in implementing any recommendations
made in the audit or financial review. The division shall follow  up on recommendations as part of
recurring audit work or as  an activity separate from other audit activity. When following up on
recommendations, the division may request from the appropriate agency evidence  of implementation.
(3) The audits set forth  in this section shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of ORS
chapter 297, except to the extent any provision of ORS chapter 297  conflicts with any provision of
ORS [ 293.665 and 305.231 and] 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, in which case the provisions of ORS
[293.665 and 305.231 and] 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 shall control.
(4) The division shall conduct periodic performance audits and financial reviews pursuant to the
division’s annual audit plan and taking into consideration the risks of the program.
SECTION 56.  ORS 430.393 is amended to read:
430.393. No later than January 1,  2022, and at the beginning of each calendar quarter thereafter,
the [ Oregon Health Authority ] Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission shall report to the Legislative
Assembly, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, how funds from the Drug Treatment and Recovery
Services Fund were spent in the preceding calendar quarter.
SECTION 57.
 ORS 430.394 is amended to read:
430.394. If approved by the [ Oversight and Accountability Council ] Alcohol and Drug  Policy
Commission, the Oregon Health Authority  may implement an education campaign to inform the
public about the availability of Behavioral Health Resource  Networks, the statewide hotline de-
scribed in ORS 430.391 and any other information  the authority believes would benefit the public in
accessing behavioral health services.
SECTION 58. (1) The Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission shall conduct an  analysis of
the most effective ways to address substance abuse  within this state. The analysis must in-
clude an assessment of the availability and funding of substance abuse  treatment programs,
the identification of any gaps in  current practices and identification of the best practices to
fund and support treatment services and other methods of addressing substance abuse.
(2) No later than September 15, 2025, the commission shall provide a report to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health and the  judiciary, in the manner
described in ORS 192.245, containing the findings of the commission.
(3) The commission shall provide a copy of the report described  in subsection (2) of this
[48]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section to each county.
SECTION 59.
 ORS 244.050 is amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file  with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission  a verified statement of economic interest as required under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor,  Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal judges,  except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
Legislative Policy and Research Director, the  Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the House
of Representatives and the Legislative Equity Officer.
(g) The  president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
[49]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(BB) Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) State Fire Marshal.
(EE) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) Executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs  the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan service  district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial  officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards, commissions and councils:
(A) Governing board of the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
[50]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
[(FF) The Oversight and Accountability Council. ]
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to 777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of the  board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the district school board of a common school district or union  high school
district.
(w) Every member of the board  of directors of an authority created under ORS 465.600 to
465.621.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a board or commission listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file  with the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics  Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate  described
in subsection  (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Not later than the 40th day before the date of the statewide general election,  each candidate
described in subsection (1)  of this section who will appear on the statewide general election ballot
and who was not required to file a statement  of economic interest under subsections (1) to (3) of this
section  shall  file with the commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS
244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (3)  of this section apply only to persons who are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April 15.
[51]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) If a statement required to be filed under this section has not been received by  the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement is  due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply with  the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set by  the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 60.
 ORS 244.050, as amended by  section 12, chapter 220, Oregon Laws 2023, and
section 48, chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file  with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission  a verified statement of economic interest as required under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor,  Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal judges,  except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
Legislative Policy and Research Director, the  Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the House
of Representatives and the Legislative Equity Officer.
(g) The  president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
[52]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) State Fire Marshal.
(EE) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) Executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs  the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan service  district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial  officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards, commissions and councils:
(A) Governing board of the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
[53]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
[(FF) The Oversight and Accountability Council. ]
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to 777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of the  board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the district school board of a common school district or union  high school
district.
(w) Every member of the board  of directors of an authority created under ORS 465.600 to
465.621.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a board or commission listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file  with the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics  Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate  described
in subsection (1) of this section who will appear  on a primary election ballot shall file with the
commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Not later than the 40th day before the date of the statewide general election,  each candidate
described in subsection (1)  of this section who will appear on the statewide general election ballot
[54]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and who was not required to file a statement  of economic interest under subsections (1) to (3) of this
section  shall  file with the commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS
244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (3)  of this section apply only to persons who are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April 15.
(6) If a statement required to be filed under this section has not been received by  the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement is  due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply with  the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set by  the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 61.
 ORS 316.502 is amended to read:
316.502. (1) The net revenue from the tax imposed by this chapter, after  deducting refunds and
amounts described in ORS 285B.630[ ,] and 285C.635 [ and 305.231], shall be paid over to the State
Treasurer and held  in the General Fund as miscellaneous receipts available generally to meet any
expense or obligation of the State of Oregon lawfully incurred.
(2) A working balance of unreceipted revenue from  the tax imposed by this chapter may be re-
tained for the payment of refunds, but such working balance shall not at the close of  any fiscal year
exceed the sum of $1 million.
(3) Moneys are continuously appropriated to the Department of Revenue to make:
(a) The refunds authorized under subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) The refund  payments in excess of tax liability authorized under ORS 315.133, 315.174, 315.262,
315.264, 315.266, 315.273, 315.519 and 316.090 and section 3, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 62.
 ORS 413.017 is amended to read:
413.017. (1) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall establish the committees described in sub-
sections (2) to (5) of this section.
(2)(a) The Public Health  Benefit Purchasers Committee shall include individuals who purchase
health care for the following:
(A) The Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(B) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board.
(C) Trustees of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(D) A city government.
(E) A county government.
(F) A special district.
(G) Any private nonprofit organization  that receives the majority of its funding from the state
and requests to participate on the committee.
(b) The Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee shall:
(A) Identify and make  specific recommendations to achieve uniformity across all public health
benefit plan designs based on the best available clinical evidence, recognized best practices  for
health promotion and disease management, demonstrated  cost-effectiveness and shared demographics
among the enrollees within the pools covered by the benefit plans.
(B) Develop an action plan for ongoing collaboration to implement the benefit design alignment
described in subparagraph (A) of  this paragraph and shall leverage purchasing to achieve benefit
uniformity if practicable.
(C) Continuously review and report to the  Oregon Health Policy Board on the committee’s
progress in aligning benefits while minimizing the cost shift to individual purchasers of  insurance
[55]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
without shifting costs to the private sector or the health insurance exchange.
(c) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall work with  the Public Health Benefit Purchasers
Committee to identify uniform provisions for state and  local public contracts for health benefit plans
that achieve maximum quality and  cost outcomes. The board shall collaborate with the committee
to develop steps to implement joint contract provisions. The committee shall identify  a schedule for
the implementation of contract  changes. The process for implementation of joint contract provisions
must include a review process to protect against unintended cost shifts to enrollees or agencies.
(3)(a) The Health Care Workforce Committee  shall include individuals who have the collective
expertise, knowledge and experience in a broad range  of health professions, health care education
and health care workforce development initiatives.
(b) The Health Care Workforce Committee shall coordinate efforts to recruit and  educate health
care professionals and retain a quality workforce to meet the demand that will be created  by the
expansion in health care coverage, system transformations and an increasingly diverse population.
(c) The Health Care  Workforce Committee shall conduct an inventory of all grants and other
state resources available for addressing the need to expand the health care workforce to meet the
needs of Oregonians for health care.
(4)(a) The  Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee shall include the following members appointed
by the Oregon Health Policy Board:
(A) An individual representing the Oregon Health Authority;
(B) An individual representing the Oregon Educators Benefit Board;
(C) An individual representing the Public Employees’ Benefit Board;
(D) An individual representing the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(E) Two health care providers;
(F) One individual representing hospitals;
(G) One individual representing insurers, large employers or multiple employer welfare  ar-
rangements;
(H) Two individuals representing health care consumers;
(I) Two individuals representing coordinated care organizations;
(J) One individual with expertise in health care research;
(K) One individual with expertise in health care quality measures; and
(L) One individual with expertise in mental health and addiction services.
(b) The committee shall work  collaboratively with the Oregon Educators Benefit Board, the
Public Employees’ Benefit Board, the  authority and the department to adopt health outcome and
quality measures that are focused on specific goals and provide value to the state, employers,
insurers, health care providers and consumers. The committee shall  be the single body to align
health outcome and quality measures used in  this state with the requirements of health care data
reporting to ensure that the measures and  requirements are coordinated, evidence-based and focused
on a long term statewide vision.
(c) The committee shall use a public process that includes an opportunity for public comment
to identify  health outcome and quality measures. The health outcome and quality measures identified
by the committee,  as updated by the authority under paragraph (g) of this subsection, may be applied
to services provided by coordinated care organizations or paid for by health  benefit plans sold
through the health insurance exchange or offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit  Board or the
Public Employees’ Benefit Board. The authority, the department, the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board and the Public Employees’ Benefit Board are not required to adopt all  of the health outcome
[56]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and quality measures identified by the committee but may not adopt any health outcome  and quality
measures that are different from the measures identified by the  committee. The measures must take
into account the health outcome and  quality measures selected by the metrics and scoring subcom-
mittee created in ORS 413.022 and the differences in the populations served  by coordinated care
organizations and by commercial insurers.
(d) In identifying health  outcome and quality measures, the committee shall prioritize measures
that:
(A) Utilize existing state and  national health outcome and quality measures, including measures
adopted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid  Services, that have been adopted or endorsed
by other state or national organizations and have a relevant state or national benchmark;
(B) Given the context  in which each measure is applied, are not prone to random variations
based on the size of the denominator;
(C) Utilize existing data systems,  to the extent practicable, for reporting the measures to mini-
mize redundant reporting and undue burden on the state, health benefit plans  and health care pro-
viders;
(D) Can be meaningfully adopted for a minimum of three years;
(E) Use a common format in the collection of the data and facilitate the  public reporting of the
data; and
(F) Can be reported in  a timely manner and without significant delay so that the most current
and actionable data is available.
(e) The  committee shall evaluate on a regular and ongoing basis the health outcome and quality
measures identified under this section.
(f) The committee may convene subcommittees to focus on gaining expertise in particular  areas
such as data collection, health  care research and mental health and substance use disorders in order
to aid the committee in the  development of health outcome and quality measures. A subcommittee
may include stakeholders and  staff from the authority, the Department of Human Services, the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services, the Early Learning Council or any  other agency staff
with the appropriate expertise in the issues addressed by the subcommittee.
(g) The authority shall update annually, if necessary, the health outcome  and quality measures
identified by the committee to utilize the latest sets of core quality measures published by  the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1320b-9a and 1320b-9b.
(h) This subsection does not prevent the authority, the Department  of Consumer and Business
Services, commercial insurers, the  Public Employees’ Benefit Board or the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board from establishing programs that provide financial  incentives to providers for meeting specific
health outcome and quality measures adopted by the committee.
(5)(a) The Behavioral Health Committee shall include the following members appointed by the
Director of the Oregon Health Authority:
(A) The chairperson of the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee;
(B) The chairperson of the committee appointed by the board to address health equity, if any;
(C) A behavioral health director for a coordinated care organization;
(D) A representative of a community mental health program;
(E) An individual with expertise in data analysis;
(F) A member of the  Consumer Advisory Council, established under ORS 430.073, that represents
adults with mental illness;
(G) A representative of the System of Care Advisory Council established in ORS 418.978;
[57]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(H) A member [ of the Oversight  and Accountability Council, described in ORS 430.389, ] who re-
presents adults with addictions or co-occurring conditions;
(I) One member representing a system of care, as defined in ORS 418.976;
(J) One consumer representative;
(K) One representative of a tribal government;
(L) One representative of  an organization that advocates on behalf of individuals with intellec-
tual or developmental disabilities;
(M) One representative of providers of behavioral health services;
(N) The director of the division of the authority responsible for  behavioral health services, as
a nonvoting member;
(O) The  Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission appointed under ORS 430.220, as
a nonvoting member;
(P) The authority’s Medicaid director, as a nonvoting member;
(Q) A representative of the Department of Human Services, as a nonvoting member; and
(R) Any other member that the director deems appropriate.
(b) The board may modify the membership of the committee as needed.
(c) The division of the authority responsible  for behavioral health services and the director of
the division shall staff the committee.
(d) The committee, in collaboration with the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee, as needed,
shall:
(A) Establish quality metrics for  behavioral health services provided by coordinated care or-
ganizations, health care providers, counties and other government entities; and
(B) Establish incentives to improve the quality of behavioral health services.
(e) The quality metrics and incentives shall be designed to:
(A) Improve timely access to behavioral health care;
(B) Reduce hospitalizations;
(C) Reduce overdoses;
(D) Improve the integration of physical and behavioral health care; and
(E) Ensure individuals are supported in the  least restrictive environment that meets their be-
havioral health needs.
(6) Members of the committees described in subsections (2) to  (5) of this section who are not
members of the Oregon Health  Policy Board may receive compensation in accordance with criteria
prescribed by the authority by rule  and shall be reimbursed from funds available to the board for
actual and necessary  travel and other expenses incurred by them by their attendance at committee
meetings, in the manner and amount provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 63.
 Section 6, chapter 63, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  Opioid Settlement Prevention, Treatment and Recovery Board.  (1) The Opioid Settlement
Prevention, Treatment and Recovery  Board is created in the Oregon Health Authority for the pur-
pose of determining the allocation  of funding from the Opioid Settlement Prevention, Treatment and
Recovery Fund established in section 5 of this 2022 Act. The board consists of:
(a) The following members appointed by the Governor:
(A) A policy advisor to the Governor;
(B) A representative of the Department of Justice;
(C) A representative of the Oregon Health Authority; and
(D) A representative of the Department of Human Services;
[58]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission or the director’s designee;
[(c) The chairperson of the  Oversight and Accountability Council established in ORS 430.388 or
the chairperson’s designee; ]
[(d)] (c)  The following members appointed by the Governor from a list  of candidates provided
by the Association of Oregon Counties and the League  of Oregon Cities or the successor organiza-
tions to the Association of Oregon Counties and the League of Oregon Cities:
(A) An individual representing Clackamas, Washington or Multnomah County;
(B) An  individual representing Clatsop, Columbia, Coos, Curry, Jackson, Josephine, Lane or
Yamhill County;
(C) An individual representing the City of Portland;
(D) An  individual representing a city with a population above 10,000 residents as of July 21,
2021;
(E) An individual representing a city with a population at or below 10,000 residents  as of July
21, 2021; and
(F) A representative of the Oregon Coalition of Local Health Officials or its successor  organ-
ization;
[(e)] (d)  The following members appointed by  the Governor from a list of candidates provided
by the members described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection:
(A) A representative of a community mental health program;
(B) An individual who has experienced a substance use disorder or a representative of  an or-
ganization that advocates on behalf of individuals with substance use disorders; and
(C) An individual representing law enforcement, first responders or  jail commanders or wardens;
[(f)] (e)  A member of  the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, who shall be a nonvoting member of the board;
[(g)] (f)  A member of the Senate appointed  by the President of the Senate, who shall be a non-
voting member of the board; and
[(h)] (g)  The State Court Administrator or the administrator’s  designee, who shall be a nonvot-
ing member of the board.
(2) The Governor shall select from the members described in subsection  (1)(a)[ ,] and  (b) [ and
(c)] of this  section one cochairperson to represent state entities, and the members described in sub-
section [ (1)(d)] (1)(c)  of this section  shall select from one of their members a cochairperson to rep-
resent cities or counties.
(3) The term of each member of  the board who is not an ex officio member is four years, but a
member serves at  the pleasure of the appointing authority. Before the expiration of a member’s term,
the appointing authority shall appoint  a successor whose term begins on January 1 next following.
A member is eligible for reappointment. If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority
shall make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) Decision-making by the board  shall be based on consensus and supported by at least a ma-
jority of the members. The board shall document all objections to board decisions.
(5) The board  shall conduct at least four public meetings in accordance with ORS 192.610 to
192.690 [series became 192.610 to 192.705], which shall be publicized to facilitate attendance  at the
meetings and during which the board shall receive  testimony and input from the community. The
board shall also establish a process for the public to provide written comments and proposals  at
each meeting of the board.
(6) In determining  the allocation of moneys from the Opioid Settlement Prevention, Treatment
[59]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and Recovery Fund:
(a) No more than five percent of the moneys may be spent on administering  the board and the
fund.
(b) A portion of the moneys shall be  allocated toward a unified and evidence-based state system
for collecting, analyzing and publishing data about  the availability and efficacy of substance use
prevention, treatment and recovery services statewide.
(c) Moneys remaining after allocations in accordance with paragraphs  (a) and (b) of this sub-
section shall be allocated for  funding statewide and regional programs identified in the Distributor
Settlement Agreement, the Janssen  Settlement Agreement and any other judgment or settlement
described in section 5  (1)(c),  [ of this 2022 Act ] chapter 63, Oregon Laws 2022 , including but not
limited to:
(A) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to treat opioid  use disor-
ders and any co-occurring substance use disorders or mental health conditions;
(B) Programs that use evidence-based or  evidence-informed strategies to support individuals in
recovery from opioid use disorders and any co-occurring substance  use disorders or mental health
conditions;
(C) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to  provide connections to
care for individuals who have or are at risk of developing opioid use disorders and any co-occurring
substance use disorders or mental health conditions;
(D) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to address the  needs of
individuals with opioid use disorders and  any co-occurring substance use disorders or mental health
conditions and who are involved in, at risk of becoming involved in, or in transition from, the
criminal justice system;
(E) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to address the needs of
pregnant or parenting  women with opioid use disorders and any co-occurring substance use disor-
ders or mental health conditions, and the needs of  their families, including babies with neonatal
abstinence syndrome;
(F) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to support  efforts to pre-
vent over-prescribing of opioids and ensure appropriate prescribing and dispensing of opioids;
(G) Programs that use evidence-based or  evidence-informed strategies to support efforts to dis-
courage or prevent misuse of opioids;
(H) Programs that  use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to support efforts to pre-
vent or reduce overdose deaths or other opioid-related harms;
(I) Programs to educate law enforcement or other  first responders regarding appropriate prac-
tices and precautions when dealing with users of fentanyl or other opioids;
(J) Programs to provide  wellness and support services for first responders and others who ex-
perience secondary trauma associated with opioid-related emergency events;
(K) Programs  to support efforts to provide leadership, planning, coordination, facilitation,
training and technical assistance to abate the opioid epidemic through activities, programs or
strategies; or
(L) Funding to support opioid abatement research.
(d) The board shall be guided and informed by:
(A) The comprehensive addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan developed  by the
Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission in accordance with ORS 430.223;
(B) The board’s ongoing evaluation of the efficacy of the funding allocations;
[60]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Evidence-based and evidence-informed strategies and best practices;
(D) Input the board receives from the public;
(E) Equity considerations for underserved populations; and
(F) The terms of the settlement agreements.
(7) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff support to the board.
SECTION 64.
 ORS 430.383 is amended to read:
430.383. (1)(a) The people of Oregon find that drug addiction and overdoses  are a serious prob-
lem in Oregon and that Oregon needs to expand access to drug treatment.
(b) The people of Oregon further find that a health-based  approach to addiction and overdose is
[more] effective, humane  and cost-effective [ than criminal punishments. Making people criminals be-
cause they suffer  from addiction is expensive, ruins lives and can make access to treatment and recov-
ery more difficult ].
(2)(a) The purpose of the Drug Addiction Treatment and Recovery Act of 2020 , as further
amended, is to  make screening, health assessment, treatment and recovery services for drug ad-
diction available to all those  who need and want access to those services and to [ adopt a health
approach] enhance assessment, treatment and recovery services  to  address drug addiction [ by
removing criminal penalties for low-level drug possession ].
(b) It is the policy of the State of Oregon:
(A) That screening, health assessment,  treatment and recovery services for drug addiction are
available to all those who need and want access to those services; and
(B) To encourage treatment and recovery for people struggling with substance use.
(3) The provisions of ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 shall be interpreted consistently  with
the findings, purposes and policy objectives stated in this section and shall not be limited by  any
policy set forth in Oregon law that could conflict with or be interpreted to conflict with the  pur-
poses and policy objectives stated in this section.
(4) As used in ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, “recovery” means a process of change
through which individuals improve their health and wellness, live a self-directed life  and strive to
reach their full potential.
SECTION 65.
ORS 293.665, 305.231, 430.388 and section 6, chapter 248, Oregon Laws 2023,
are repealed.
LOTTERY BONDS FOR TREATMENT FACILITY INFRASTRUCTURE
SECTION 66. (1) For the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with a recipient  local
government, the State Treasurer is authorized to  issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $  in net proceeds for the pur-
poses described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the
State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds  of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  Economic De-
velopment Distributions Fund established  under ORS 461.553, for distribution to a recipient
local government for purchase or renovation of physical infrastructure for substance abuse
treatment and recovery.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
[61]
HB 4036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
further economic development, finance public  education or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that
reducing substance abuse will enhance the economic viability of the state through increased
workforce, job creation and improved quality of life for the community.
(4) As used in  this section, “local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS
174.116.
LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS CONCERNING SPECIALTY COURT FUNDING
SECTION 66a.
The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Specialty courts, particularly  those that serve populations with substance abuse dis-
orders, have been shown to increase involvement in treatment, improve treatment outcomes,
foster accountability and reduce recidivism; and
(2) The grant program for specialty courts established and administered by the  Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission must be adequately funded to  ensure the success of the spe-
cialty courts operating within this state, and to allow the  establishment of new specialty
courts wherever they are needed.
APPLICABILITY
SECTION 67. Sections 24 to 29, 32 to  34, 42 and 43 of this 2024 Act, the amendments to
ORS 51.050, 137.300, 153.012, 153.018, 153.019, 153.021, 153.064, 153.992, 161.570, 221.339, 419C.370,
423.478, 475.005, 475.235, 475.752, 475.814, 475.824, 475.834,  475.854, 475.874, 475.884, 475.894,
475.916, 475.925 and 475.935 by sections 1 to 20,  23, 30, 31, 35, 38 and 41 of this 2024 Act and
the repeal of ORS 153.043, 153.062, 419C.460 and 475.237 by section 22 of this 2024 Act apply
to conduct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 68.
The unit and section captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory  law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 69. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[62]