Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “special education” means education  and related
services that are provided to students by a public education provider  under the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 291.345,  if revenues received by the General Fund from the
corporate income and excise taxes during the 2021-2023 biennium  exceed the amount esti-
mated to be received from such taxes for the biennium by two  percent or more, the Legis-
lative Assembly shall  appropriate an amount equal to the total amount of the excess as
follows:
(a) Eighty-nine percent to the State School Fund established by ORS 327.008 for  appor-
tionment as provided in ORS 327.008.
(b) Eleven percent for appropriation to  the Department of Education to be used for spe-
cial education support as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The Department of Education shall use the amount appropriated to the  department
under subsection (2)(b) of this section for special education support as follows:
(a) To distribute funding to school districts for incentives to retain public education em-
ployees who provide special education, including:
(A) Student loan forgiveness for special education teachers who  commit to teaching
special education in this state for at least 10 years.
(B) A minimum wage of $25 per hour for  classified employees who support students re-
ceiving special education services.
(C) Retirement and family benefits  for classified employees who have provided special
education for 15 or more years through a public  education provider. Retirement and family
benefits may include increased  contributions to retirement plans, child care stipends, tuition
assistance for employees and employees’ children and cash payments.
(D) A one-year, paid sabbatical with  benefits to full-time special education teachers after
every seven years of providing special education.
(E) Paid, summer professional development for special education, general education and
classified staff that focuses on:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2783
SB 578
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Literacy instruction for students  with dyslexia and students with intellectual and de-
velopmental disabilities;
(ii) Inclusive educational practices;
(iii) Use of assistive technology;
(iv) Strategies for providing positive behavior support; and
(v) Other training identified by special  education classified employees and teachers to
improve their effectiveness and satisfaction at work.
(F) Pay for teachers and classified staff who participate in  individualized education pro-
gram meetings or assessment meetings during hours not covered by a collective  bargaining
agreement.
(G) A $250 bonus each month for self-contained classroom special  education teachers for
every five special education students in the classroom for which the teacher is responsible.
(b) To provide support at the state  level to improve access to the general education
curriculum, including:
(A) The development of training and materials  by inclusion specialists that will support
the inclusion of students with intellectual and developmental disabilities, sensory disabilities
and orthopedic disabilities into the general curriculum. The training and materials may in-
clude:
(i) The development of alternate  format textbooks and other instructional materials that
are aligned with state standards;
(ii) The conversion of assessments and assignments into electronic format;
(iii) The provision of training for teachers about how to provide  differentiated instruc-
tion; and
(iv) The purchase of accessible  manipulatives and alternate formats of printed materials.
(B) The purchase of assistive technology, including  augmentative communication devices
and adaptive tools for specialty courses such as science, music, art, and  career and technical
education, to ensure accessibility to all subjects for all students.
(C) The provision of high quality training to school districts to  enable the school districts
to have at least one inclusion specialist for every 25 students in the  district who have intel-
lectual, sensory or orthopedic disabilities.
(D) The creation of an office of  inclusive supports at the Department of Education,
staffed with at least three inclusion specialists to support school districts in providing:
(i) Inclusive classroom instruction for students with significant disabilities; and
(ii) Inclusive participation in extracurricular activities.
(E) The investment in adequate reading specialists at the state and district  levels to fully
implement evidence-based reading services to students with intellectual and developmental
disabilities, dyslexia and sensory disabilities.
(c) To increase efficiencies in providing special education, including the development  and
implementation of a statewide, electronic individualized education program system.
(4) The State  Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the administration
of this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[2]
SB 578
1
[3]