Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Office of  Emergency Management shall create and maintain a data-
base of community emergency response teams in Oregon.
(2) For each community emergency response team, the database  must contain informa-
tion, stored in a searchable format, including:
(a) The physical location where the team is based;
(b) Contact information for one or more team members;
(c) Specialized training or skills related to emergency response that team members have;
and
(d) Vehicles  or equipment that team members are willing to permit use of for emergency
response.
(3) The database must be accessible to emergency  management agencies and emergency
program managers described in ORS  401.305. The office may make the database accessible
to any other persons or entities if the office determines that providing such access will en-
hance public safety.
(4) The office shall establish procedures for communicating with emergency management
agencies or  other appropriate entities for the purposes of gathering information for the da-
tabase and regularly updating the information.
(5) The office may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
(6) As used in this section, “community emergency response team” means a  group of
volunteers who are trained in accordance with guidelines adopted by  the Federal Emergency
Management Agency to provide certain emergency services  within a community, neighbor-
hood or other locality.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 168