Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, for  the purposes of carrying out
Oregon’s Open Educational Resources (OER) Program established in ORS 348.748 to 348.757.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Basic needs programming”  means a program established by a public institution of
higher education to help students at the public institution apply for and receive assistance
from benefits programs as defined in ORS 350.262.
(b) “Public institution of higher education” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; and
(B) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341.
(2) When the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  determines that sufficient
moneys are  available, the commission shall administer a grant program to provide funding
for basic needs programming.
(3) Each public institution of higher  education may submit an application to the com-
mission in accordance with subsections (4) and (5)  of this section for the purpose of receiving
a grant to support basic needs programming at that public institution.
(4) The commission shall by rule establish a  process for public institutions of higher ed-
ucation to apply for grant moneys under this section.
(5) The commission  shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration of this section,
including:
(a) Specifying the form and timelines for submitting an application for a  grant under this
section;
(b) Calculating the amount to award to grant recipients under this section; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 137
HB 4162
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
(c) Collecting data required to evaluate program effectiveness.
(6) The commission shall prioritize the  awarding of grants under this section based on
the following:
(a) The amount of funding requested;
(b) A description of how the funds requested would support the expansion and enhance-
ment of basic needs programming at the public institution of higher education;
(c) Any potential impact on students without the requested funding;
(d) A proposed mechanism for the distribution of any funding received;
(e) A proposed timeline, including any benchmarks, for funding distribution;
(f) The public institution’s anticipated costs necessary  for the operation of the public
institution;
(g) The number of students served through basic needs programming at the public in-
stitution, including those students who  are in a historically underrepresented population; and
(h) The number of students at the public institution who are recipients of an award from
the Oregon Opportunity Grant program established under ORS 348.205.
(7) The commission  shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to  higher education no later than
September 15, 2025. The report submitted under this subsection must include an  assessment
of how the  awarding of grants under this section impacted the basic needs programming at
each public institution.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, to fund the grant program described
in section 2 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 5. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]