Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Aligning for Health Pilot Program is established to be administered
by the Oregon Health Authority. The goals of the program are to:
(a) Establish more predictable, aligned payment  models, metrics and other expectations
for providers regardless of the payer;
(b) Increase the number of  providers receiving population-based payments that are tied
to health outcomes;
(c) Reward health systems for keeping people healthy and containing costs;
(d) Give health  systems and providers flexibility to be more innovative in how they de-
liver care and address the complex drivers of health;
(e) Provide more equitable and meaningful  access to quality health services and better
health outcomes; and
(f) Ensure that the program is consistent with the legislative intent expressed in  ORS
414.018 and the system design described in ORS 414.570 (1).
(2) In the first phase of implementing the Aligning for Health Pilot Program, the  au-
thority shall plan for the launch of the program by:
(a) Hiring program staff and working collaboratively with the  Public Employees’ Benefit
Board and the Oregon Educators Benefit Board in creating external contracts;
(b) Conducting legal, actuarial and regulatory analyses;
(c) Engaging with payers, purchasers, community-based organizations and providers to
gauge interest in participation in the program; and
(d) Identifying one or more potential geographic regions where the program may begin.
(3) In the second phase of implementing the program, the authority shall:
(a) Finalize the risk mitigation strategies  to be used in the program, including by estab-
lishing a health equity fund. The  program must phase in the implementation of downside risk
for safety net providers and smaller  organizations serving vulnerable populations consistent
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 32
HB 4069
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
with the principles of the Value-Based Payment Compact. Other risk  mitigation strategies
may include, but are not limited to, one or more of the following:
(A) Use of the Oregon Reinsurance Program or stop-loss;
(B) Risk corridors; and
(C) A risk stabilization fund.
(b) Engage providers in target geographic regions by providing technical support funded
by the authority for financial and actuarial  simulation of the potential financial risk to pro-
viders if they choose to participate in the Aligning  for Health Pilot Program, prioritizing
providers with value-based payment experience.
(c) Open a request for proposal developed in partnership with purchasers that includes:
(A) Standardized quality and outcome performance measures;
(B) Features to address and reduce health inequities in the geographic regions; and
(C) A requirement  for a meaningful demonstration of interested parties’ intents to com-
mit to participate at the community and system levels.
(d) Solicit employer groups and other payers, especially those that are  signatories to the
Value-Based Payment Compact.
(4) In the third phase of implementing the program, the authority:
(a) Shall award individual three-year contracts  to include Public Employees’ Benefit
Board members, Oregon Educators Benefit Board members and one or  more commercial
payers;
(b) Shall launch the program; and
(c) May add additional regions and participants following the launch of the program.
(5)(a) Payers participating in the program shall:
(A) Sign on to the Value-Based Payment Compact;
(B) Stay within  the global budget established by the authority and share risk with pro-
viders using mutually negotiated value-based payment agreements;
(C) Agree to a fixed rate of growth in the global budget; and
(D) Partner with community-based organizations operating in the pilot regions.
(b) Payers participating in the  program may be required to invest a set percentage of
total revenue toward social determinants  of health and annually report how the moneys were
spent.
(c) Payers participating in the program  are exempt from the requirements of ORS 415.501
while they are participating.
(6) Providers participating in the program:
(a) Generally assume accountability for a defined group of patients;
(b) Bear financial risk for spending targets;
(c) Are eligible for bonuses for quality;
(d) Must agree to participate in a value-based payment  agreement consistent with the
goals of the Value-Based Payment Compact; and
(e) Are  subject to the health outcome and quality measures and benchmarks established
by the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee and  the metrics and scoring subcommittee in
accordance with ORS  413.017 (4) and 413.022, and the Behavioral Health Committee in ac-
cordance with ORS 413.017 (5).
(7) Purchasers participating in  the program select their own benefit packages and may
adjust the benefit packages as desired. Benefit packages must include  medical, pharmacy
[2]
HB 4069
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and behavioral health benefits and may include dental or vision benefits.
(8) All participating payers and purchasers must agree to include in the program  all of
their enrollees, members or beneficiaries who reside in the pilot region.
(9) All payers, purchasers and  providers, except nonemployer individual purchasers of
insurance, must agree to:
(a) Adhere to the health care cost growth targets established under ORS 442.386; and
(b) Not reduce access to care or reduce benefits to achieve cost savings.
(10) The authority shall:
(a) Be responsible for procurement and contracting processes.
(b) In collaboration with the Department of Consumer and Business Services,  set global
budgets based on  per member per month rates and on quality measures that are risk-
adjusted specifically for each payer’s benefit packages, enrollee health status and other  rel-
evant adjustments. In areas with substantial and  disproportionate numbers of high-risk or
vulnerable patients, the authority shall adjust per member per month rates to account for
the differing levels of need.
(c) Establish a process for payers to appeal rates.
(d) Establish a model process that payers may use to set provider rates and to risk-adjust
provider rates to avoid penalizing providers that care for higher need patient populations.
(e) Ensure that costs are not excessively shifted to enrollees.
(f) Subject  to subsection (12) of this section, provide regulatory relief for payers and
providers and give payers and providers sufficient flexibility from state regulations to provide
incentives for innovation.
(g) Offset administrative burdens, especially on providers, with  the development of and
state investment in a centralized infrastructure to allow for complete and  transparent re-
porting of data.
(h) Apply equity-related performance measures and tie earning incentives  to the meas-
ures.
(i) Establish a monitoring system with requirements for participant reporting.
(j) Collect data that pilot program  participants and the authority mutually agree upon for
cost and quality measures to ensure that participation in the program does not reduce access
to care or benefits for individuals residing in a pilot region.
(k) Construct a comparison group representing patients or providers that are  not par-
ticipating in the program to determine the program’s impact.
(L) During the  early stages of the program, collect and share information on a regular
and timely basis with  participants so that participants can make improvements during the
initial stages.
(11) To  the extent practicable, the Public Employees’ Benefit Board and the Oregon Ed-
ucators Benefit Board must be assured the  ability, using risk mitigation strategies or other
means, to maintain their single risk pools,  statewide rating approaches and 3.4 percent an-
nual cost growth targets.
(12) The authority may not provide regulatory relief  under subsection (10)(f) of this sec-
tion that:
(a) Impacts workforce requirements such as patient to staff  ratios and staffing commit-
tees; or
(b) Is likely to endanger the health or safety of patients or providers.
[3]
HB 4069
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(13)(a) The  authority shall convene a pilot region advisory group for each region partic-
ipating in the pilot to make recommendations to the authority regarding the health  equity
fund described in subsection (3) of this section. The recommendations must include a formula
or process for determining payers’ contributions to the  fund and criteria for distributions to
the community from the fund.
(b) A majority of the membership of  a pilot region advisory group must consist of indi-
viduals representing:
(A) Communities of color;
(B) Tribal communities;
(C) Immigrants and refugees;
(D) Participating purchasers; and
(E) Rural, frontier or underserved areas.
(c) Membership on a pilot region advisory group  must ensure to the greatest extent
practicable proportional geographic representation across the entire region.
(d) Members of a  pilot region advisory group described in paragraph (b)(A), (B) and (C)
of this subsection must accurately represent the high social needs and substantial  health
inequities of the groups in the region that are represented.
(14) Any investments in the regional health equity fund  described in subsection (3) of this
section must  align to the greatest extent practicable with other community investment
strategies used by the pilot program participants.
(15) As used in this section:
(a) “Global budget”  means a financial arrangement that establishes an annual, predeter-
mined total cost of health care for a defined  population, calculated based on the health of the
population, defined provider reimbursement rates, covered benefits, geographic location and
priorities for addressing social determinants of health. A global budget is not recalculated
based on the prior year’s actual spending but increases at a defined rate of growth.
(b) “Health equity fund” means a program in which multiple  payers invest collectively in
a fund that  finances community-based interventions targeting social issues such as food in-
security, housing instability, transportation and structural racism.
(c) “Payer” includes:
(A) Insurance carriers.
(B) Coordinated care organizations, as defined in ORS 414.025.
(C) Third party administrators.
(D) Individuals purchasing insurance on or off of the health insurance exchange.
(E) Government insurance programs including Medicaid and Medicare.
(d) “Purchaser” includes:
(A) Purchasers of commercial health insurance.
(B) Private employer groups.
(C) The Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(D) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board.
(e) “Risk-adjust” means to make a modification to a payment to account for the provision
of care to populations with higher needs and the expected utilization of the populations.
(f) “Risk corridor” means an established floor for  losses and a cap on gains to protect
against inaccurate rate setting.
(g) “Risk stabilization fund” means a multiyear  risk pool that allows provider gains above
[4]
HB 4069
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
a certain threshold to be placed in a reserve account to be retained for future  periods when
the provider experiences unfavorable financial results.
(h) “Stop-loss” means a process for providing  payments to payers or providers for
treatment costs that exceed a certain threshold.
(i) “Value-based payment” means a reimbursement methodology  that makes
performance-based adjustments to a base payment  to hold health care providers financially
accountable for improving quality and lowering health care costs.
SECTION 2.
During the first five years of  the Aligning for Health Pilot Program estab-
lished in section 1 of this 2024 Act, the fixed rate of growth  in the global budgets under
section 1 (6)(a)(C) of this 2024 Act shall be:
(1) At the medical rate of inflation during the first 12-month period of the program.
(2) Decreased by 0.5 percent for each subsequent 12-month period of the program through
the fifth year of the program.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority  shall adopt rules for the timing of each
phase of implementing the Aligning for Health Pilot Program established in section 1 of  this
2024 Act. The authority may align the timing of implementation with the  timing of new
provider or network contract discussions.
(2) The authority shall conduct an  interim assessment of the program following the
completion of the first  phase of the program and make appropriate adjustments to the pro-
gram.
(3) Upon the close of the request for proposal period, the authority shall  submit to the
committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to health a report of
the responses that the authority received to the request for  proposal issued for the program.
(4) Following the implementation of  the third phase of the program, the authority shall
complete a formal evaluation of the pilot program and report to the committees or  interim
committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to health, in the manner provided in ORS
192.245, the success of the program in achieving the goals described in section 1  of this 2024
Act and recommendations for continuing or expanding the pilot program in the future.
SECTION 4. Sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act are repealed on January 2, 2035.
[5]