Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 634.
SECTION 2. (1) The State Department of  Agriculture, in consultation with the Pesticide
Analytical and Response  Center, shall establish a farmworker outreach program. The pur-
poses of the program are to:
(a) Conduct outreach and distribute to farmworkers educational materials related  to safe
pesticide use, health and environmental incidents  involving pesticides and procedures for
reporting pesticide incidents; and
(b) Coordinate actions among the public  bodies represented by the public officials listed
in ORS 634.550 to improve  the effectiveness of farmworker pesticide incident reporting,
tracking and responses.
(2) Outreach under the program shall be conducted:
(a) At locations that are at or near  the places where farmworkers work or ordinarily
gather; and
(b) In a culturally sensitive manner.
(3) The department and center shall collaborate with Oregon State University to develop
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2364
HB 3098
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
culturally sensitive education  and training for pesticide applicators who are nonnative Eng-
lish speakers or members of a minority group. Materials  developed under this section shall
include clear instructions for pesticide incident reporting.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the  General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, which may be expended for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]