Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Concept or design of promise” means intellectual property of any kind with the  po-
tential to be patented or copyrighted.
(b) “Student inventor” means a student who  develops a concept or design of promise
while participating in a career or technical education program.
(2) The Department of Education shall establish a program to assist:
(a) Student inventors in developing concepts or designs of promise; and
(b) Education service districts in the acquisition of interests in intellectual  property de-
veloped by student inventors.
(3)(a) The program established under  this section shall assist education service districts
to enter into agreements under ORS 332.745 and 332.750 with student inventors  to acquire
interests in concepts or designs of promise.
(b) Under the terms  of an agreement entered into under this subsection, an education
service district shall agree to:
(A) Provide the student inventor with coaching and mentorship, or  similar advice, and
assistance in developing a concept or design of promise; and
(B) Pay to the  student inventor a share of any moneys received on account of the own-
ership, management, use or disposition of the intellectual property.
(4) The department shall deposit moneys received as  a result of the ownership, manage-
ment, use or disposition of intellectual property described in  this section in the Oregon In-
vents Partnership Fund established under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(5) The department shall  convene an advisory board to advise the department in the im-
plementation of the program established under this section. The advisory board shall  assist
the department in the establishment of:
(a) Eligibility criteria for concepts or designs of promise;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3521
HB 2648
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
(b) Standard terms for agreements described in subsection (3) of this section; and
(c) Standard terms for agreements described in subsection (6) of this section.
(6) The department  may enter into an agreement with any person for the deposit of
moneys into the Oregon Invents Partnership Fund established  under section 2 of this 2025
Act in exchange for  a pro rata share of moneys received by the department pursuant to
agreements under subsection  (3) of this section. A person that enters into an agreement with
the department under this subsection must agree to deposit moneys into the Oregon Invents
Partnership Fund for a term of 20 years and agree  that the return of any funds after the
expiration of the 20-year term  shall be conditioned on the continued sustainability of the
fund.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Invents Partnership Fund is established  in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Oregon Invents
Partnership Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Oregon Invents Partnership Fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys deposited in the fund  pursuant to agreements entered into by the Department
of Education under section 1 (6) of this 2025 Act; and
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in  the Oregon Invents Partnership Fund are continuously appropriated to the
Department of Education for the purposes of carrying out  the program described in section
1 of this 2025 Act.
[2]