Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “law enforcement agency” means the  sheriff for
a county or the chief of police for a city.
(2) A property owner or their authorized agent may request of a law enforcement agency
the immediate removal of any person  or persons unlawfully occupying a residential dwelling
or commercial building. The request must be made  as a declaration under penalty of perjury
in substantially the following form:
DECLARATION IN SUPPORT OF REMOVAL OF
UNLAWFUL OCCUPANTS
1. I am the owner or the authorized agent of the owner of real  property, commonly
known as  (address).
2. The property includes a residential dwelling or commercial building.
3. One or more individuals are currently unlawfully occupying the property.
4. The property was not open to the public at the time of the unlawful occupants’  entry.
5. No unlawful occupants are current or former tenants.
6. No unlawful occupants are immediate family members of the property owner.
7. No pending litigation exists between the property owner and any unlawful occupant.
8. The property owner has directed the unlawful occupants to leave.
9. The property owner hereby requests that the law enforcement agency  take any action
necessary to remove all unlawful occupants from the property.
10. I agree to indemnify any law enforcement  agency and its agents for any claims based
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 623
HB 2440
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
on the agency’s good faith conduct based upon this declaration.
11. I  hereby declare that the above statement is true to the best of my knowledge and
belief, and that I understand it is made for use as evidence in court and is subject to penalty
for perjury.
Signature Date
(3) Upon receipt of a declaration in support of removal of unlawful  occupants under this
section and receipt of any fees established by the law enforcement  agency, the agency shall
conduct fact-finding, which may include  reviewing any alleged lease agreement, talking to
neighbors and other relevant inquiries to ascertain the validity of the complaint.
(4) If the fact-finding indicates probable cause of  the factors set forth in the declaration,
the law enforcement  agency shall serve a notice to immediately vacate upon the unlawful
occupants and shall use reasonable force to put the  property owner in possession of the real
property.
(5) The property owner may request that  the law enforcement agency stand by to keep
the peace while changing locks and removing personal property of the unlawful occupants.
(6) The property owner and any authorized agent who submits a  declaration under this
section shall indemnify the law enforcement agency and  its agents for any damages awarded
based on the good faith conduct that was based on the declaration.
(7) A person who was removed from the property based on a material misstatement in
a declaration made under this section has  a cause of action against the property owner and
the declarant for wrongful removal and is entitled to injunctive relief of restoration of pos-
session of the real property plus damages, costs and attorney fees.
(8) This section does not limit other rights of a property owner or  authority of law
enforcement.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 164.255 is amended to read:
164.255. (1) A person commits the crime of criminal trespass in the first degree if the person:
(a) Enters or remains unlawfully in a dwelling;
(b) Enters or remains unlawfully in a building when the building is not open to the  public
for the purposes of using the building for sleeping or otherwise as a dwelling;
[(b)] (c)  Having been denied future entry to  a building pursuant to a merchant’s notice of tres-
pass, reenters the building during hours when the building is open to the  public with the intent to
commit theft therein;
[(c)] (d) Enters or remains unlawfully upon railroad yards, tracks, bridges or rights of way; or
[(d)] (e)  Enters or remains unlawfully in or upon premises that have been determined to be  not
fit for use under ORS 453.855 to 453.912.
(2) Subsection [ (1)(d)] (1)(e) of this section does not apply  to the owner of record of the premises
if:
(a) The owner notifies  the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the premises that
the owner intends to enter the premises;
(b) The owner enters or remains on the premises for the  purpose of inspecting or decontam-
inating the premises or lawfully removing items from the premises; and
[2]
HB 2440
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
(c) The owner has not been arrested for, charged with or convicted  of a criminal offense that
contributed to the determination that the premises are not fit for use.
(3) Criminal trespass in the first degree :
(a) Is a Class A misdemeanor[ .]; or
(b) Is a Class C felony if while trespassing under  subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section
the person causes more than $1,000 in damages to the dwelling or building.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 165.013 is amended to read:
165.013. (1) A person commits the crime of forgery in the first degree if the person violates ORS
165.007:
(a) And the written instrument is or purports to be any of the following:
(A) Part of an issue of money,  securities, postage or revenue stamps, or other valuable instru-
ments issued by a government or governmental agency;
(B) Part of an issue of stock, bonds  or other instruments representing interests in or claims
against any property or person;
(C) A deed, will, codicil, contract or assignment;
(D) A check for $1,000 or more, a credit card purchase slip for $1,000 or more, or a combination
of checks and  credit card purchase slips that, in the aggregate, total $1,000 or more, or any other
commercial instrument or other  document that does or may evidence, create, transfer, alter, termi-
nate or otherwise affect a legal right, interest, obligation or status; [ or]
(E) A public record; or
(F) A listing or other advertisement for the  sale or rent of any dwelling or commercial
building; or
(b) By falsely making, completing or altering, or  by uttering, at least 15 retail sales receipts,
Universal Product Code labels,  EAN-8 labels or EAN-13 labels or a combination of at least 15 retail
sales receipts, Universal Product Code labels, EAN-8 labels or EAN-13 labels.
(2) The value of  single check or credit card transactions may be added together under sub-
section (1)(a)(D) of this section if the transactions were committed:
(a) Against multiple victims within a 30-day period; or
(b) Against the same victim within a 180-day period.
(3) Forgery in the first degree is a Class C felony.
[3]