Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Legislative Administrator  shall pay costs of a member of the Legis-
lative Assembly who is afforded rights and protections as  a person with disabilities under
Title II of the Americans With Disabilities  Act (42 U.S.C. 12131 to 12165) and ORS chapter
659A that are incurred implementing reasonable accommodations to  enable the member to
fully perform their duties as a member of the Legislative Assembly,  including but not limited
to:
(a) Costs  incurred for accessible transportation to and from the State Capitol, district
meetings or other legislative activities;
(b) Costs  incurred for staff necessary to ensure that the member can participate in all
legislative functions and activities and perform all  of the duties imposed on a member of the
Legislative Assembly;
(c) Costs  incurred in acquiring assistive technology needed to allow a member to fully
participate in all legislative activities and fully perform all legislative duties; and
(d) Costs incurred to access or modify temporary housing used by a member during  a
legislative session.
(2) The Legislative Administration Committee shall adopt processes to implement the
provisions of this section, including an interactive process to determine the reasonable  ac-
commodations that are entitled to payment under this section.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Legislative Administration Committee, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of  the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for the purpose of
making payments described in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 189
HB 2422
1
[2]