Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.535 is amended to read:
327.535. (1) As used in this section, “eligible  student” means a student who is eligible for free
or reduced price [ lunches] meals under the United  States Department of Agriculture’s [ current In-
come Eligibility Guidelines ] National School Lunch Program or School Breakfast Program .
(2) A school district may make breakfast accessible at any school  site and shall make breakfast
accessible if required by this section.
(3) Subject to subsections (4) and (5)  of this section, a school district that provides lunch at any
school site shall make breakfast accessible as part  of a breakfast program if 25 percent or more of
the students at the school site are eligible students or the school site qualifies  for assistance under
Chapter I of Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965.
(4) A school district that makes breakfast accessible as provided under subsection (3) of  this
section  may  apply to the Department of Education for a waiver for all or for particular grade levels
if the school district is financially unable to implement a breakfast program.  The department may
grant a waiver to the school district for a period not  to exceed two years, after which the school
district must reestablish its claim of financial hardship if the waiver is to be extended.
(5) If the per meal federal reimbursement for the breakfast program  falls below the 1991 re-
imbursement levels, a school district may elect to discontinue the program until  federal funding is
restored to those levels. No waiver is required for such election.
(6) A school district that  makes breakfast accessible at any school site shall make breakfast
accessible at that school site at no charge to all eligible students. For each breakfast  that a school
district provides free of charge to a student who is eligible for a reduced price lunch, the department
shall provide reimbursement to the school district for the actual amount that a student would have
been required to pay for the reduced price breakfast.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 30
SB 1520
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7)(a) Except as provided by subsection (8) of this section, a school district that makes  breakfast
accessible at a  school site may choose to make breakfast accessible at that school site after the
beginning of the school day.
(b) Time spent by students consuming breakfast is considered instructional time  when students
consume breakfast in the students’ classroom  and instruction is being provided while students are
consuming breakfast. No more than 15 minutes may be considered instructional time  when students
are consuming breakfast.
(8)(a) If 70 percent or more  of the students at a school site are eligible students, the school
district must make breakfast accessible at that school site after the beginning of the school day.
(b) A school district that is required to make breakfast accessible as  prescribed by paragraph
(a) of this subsection must ensure that breakfast is:
(A) Accessible to all students after the beginning of the school day,  regardless of grade or ar-
rival time; and
(B) Provided free of charge to all students, regardless of whether a student is an eligible student.
(c) The department  shall provide technical assistance to school districts to meet the require-
ments of  this subsection. Technical assistance may include the development of breakfast delivery
models.
(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, if a school district can demonstrate  that
70 percent or  more of the eligible students at a school site regularly receive breakfast at the school
site without the  school district complying with paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school district
is not required to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(9) The State  Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the implementation of this
section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.545 is amended to read:
327.545. (1) For school districts with schools that provide United States Department  of Agricul-
ture reimbursable meals to students  as described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the De-
partment of Education shall reimburse the school districts for costs  incurred by the school districts
in providing the meals. The amounts of the reimbursements may not exceed the amounts  prescribed
by subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) For schools that offer reimbursable breakfast and lunch free of charge to all  students of the
school based on the school’s  or school district’s categorical eligibility to provide reimbursable
breakfast and lunch free of charge  without consideration of individual eligibility for free or reduced
price meals, the amount of reimbursements provided under this section may not exceed  the differ-
ence  between:
(a) The reimbursement rate established by the United States Department of  Agriculture for
reimbursable meals; and
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
(3) For schools that are not eligible to offer reimbursable breakfast and lunch free  of charge as
described in subsection  (2) of this section but that provide reimbursable breakfast or lunch free of
charge to students from households with incomes that do not exceed 300  percent of the federal
poverty guidelines, the amount of reimbursements provided under this section may  not exceed the
difference  between:
[(a) The actual amount that a student would have been required to pay for the  breakfast or lunch,
taking into consideration if the student qualified for a free or reduced price lunch; and ]
(a) The reimbursement rate established by the United  States Department of Agriculture
[2]
SB 1520
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
for reimbursable meals; and
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
(4) The State Board of Education  may adopt any rules necessary for making reimbursements
under this section.
SECTION 3.
 Section 44, chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 44.  Notwithstanding [ section 43 of this  2019 Act ] ORS 327.341, the Department of Education
may not award any grants as provided under [ section 43 of this 2019 Act ] ORS 327.341 prior to  [July
1,] May 15, 2020.
SECTION 4. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]