Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 497.
SECTION 2. (1) The electors of a county may, at any  countywide election, approve a
measure to allow the use of one or more dogs to hunt, pursue or take cougars.
(2) If the electors of a county approve a measure described in  subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife may issue to  a person residing within the
county a special cougar tag that allows the person to use  one or more dogs for the purpose
of hunting, pursuing or taking cougars within the county.
SECTION 3.  ORS 498.164 is amended to read:
498.164. (1) Except as provided in [ subsections (2) and (3) ] subsection (2)  of this section, a per-
son may not use bait to attract or take black bears or use  one or more dogs to hunt or pursue black
bears or cougars.
(2) [Nothing in ] Subsection (1) of this section [ prohibits] does not apply to:
(a) The use of bait or one  or more dogs by employees or agents of county, state or federal
agencies while acting in their official capacities.
[(3)] (b) [Nothing in subsection (1) of this section prohibits ] The use of bait or  dogs by persons for
the taking of black  bears or cougars in accordance with the provisions of ORS 498.012 relating to
taking wildlife that is causing damage.
(c) The use of dogs for the  purpose of hunting, pursuing or taking cougars under a spe-
cial cougar tag issued under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[(4)] (3)  [ Any ] A  person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a  Class A
misdemeanor and, upon  conviction, shall in addition to appropriate criminal penalties have the
person’s privilege to apply for any hunting license suspended for a period of five years  for a first
offense and permanently suspended for any subsequent offense.
[(5)] (4) [ For the purposes of ] As used in  this section, “bait” means any material placed for  the
purpose of attracting or attempting to attract bears.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1420
SB 349
1
[2]