Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall purchase one cyanotoxin
autoanalyzer system instrument to be used to analyze  water samples for cyanotoxins. The
department shall acquire any services and supplies necessary for the operation of the  in-
strument described in this subsection.
(2) The department shall create,  fill and utilize at least one seasonal position within the
department to assist with  the analysis of water samples for cyanotoxins and to collect water
samples during peak periods.
SECTION 2. (1) As  used in this section, “institution of higher education” has the meaning
given that term in ORS 238.005.
(2) Subject to the  conditions described in subsection (3) of this section, the Department
of Environmental Quality shall make the cyanotoxin autoanalyzer system  instrument pur-
chased under section 1 of  this 2021 Act available to institutions of higher education for pur-
poses of education, training or research. The department may assist with or participate  in
the education,  training or research activities conducted by institutions of higher education
under this section.
(3) The department shall make the instrument purchased under section  1 of this 2021 Act
available to institutions of higher education if:
(a) The instrument is not needed by the department  to analyze water samples for
cyanotoxins at that time; and
(b) It is reasonably practicable for the department to make the instrument available.
SECTION 3.
(1) As  used in this section, “institution of higher education” has the meaning
given that term in ORS 238.005.
(2) No later than November 30,  2021, the Department of Environmental Quality shall
provide a report to an interim  committee of the Legislative Assembly related to water, in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, describing:
(a) Preparations by the department to  coordinate the use of the cyanotoxin autoanalyzer
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2223
HB 3102
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
system instrument by institutions of higher education, as described  in section 2 of this 2021
Act;  and
(b) Actions that may be taken  by the department or the Legislative Assembly to coordi-
nate state government agencies  in their preparation for and response to harmful algal
blooms.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department  of Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,
out of the General Fund, the following amounts:
(1) $  for the purpose of carrying  out the provisions of section 1 (1) of this 2021
Act; and
(2) $  for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of  section 1 (2) of this 2021
Act.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]