Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 759.400 is amended to read:
759.400. As used in ORS 759.400 to 759.455:
(1) “Basic telephone service” means  local exchange telecommunications service defined as basic
by rule of the Public Utility Commission.
(2) “Commercial mobile radio service”  has the meaning given that term in 47 C.F.R. 20.3.
(3) “Interconnected voice over internet protocol service” has the meaning  given the term
“interconnected VoIP service” in 47 C.F.R. 9.3.
[(2)] (4)  “Retail telecommunications service” means a telecommunications service  provided for
a fee to customers. “Retail  telecommunications service” does not include a service provided by one
telecommunications carrier to another telecommunications carrier, unless the carrier  receiving the
service is the end user of the service.
[(3)] (5) “Telecommunications carrier”  means any provider of retail telecommunications services,
except a call aggregator as defined in ORS 759.680.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 759.425 is amended to read:
759.425. [(1) For purposes of  this section, “retail telecommunications service” does not include radio
communications service, radio paging service, commercial mobile radio service,  personal communi-
cations service or cellular communications service. ]
[(2)(a)] (1)(a)  The Public Utility Commission  shall establish and implement a competitively neu-
tral and nondiscriminatory universal service fund. [ Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this  sub-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section,] The [ Public Utility ] commission shall :
(A) Use the universal service fund to  ensure basic telephone service is available at a reasonable
and affordable rate ; and
(B) Transfer from the universal service fund to the  Oregon Business Development De-
partment for deposit in the  Broadband Fund established under section 4 of this 2020 Act an
amount per year that is equal to the lesser of:
(i) $5 million; or
(ii) The remainder of moneys deposited in the universal service fund that are  unobligated
after making the designation required in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The commission shall designate the amount of moneys deposited annually in the uni-
versal service fund to be used to ensure basic telephone service. The  amount designated
under this paragraph may not exceed $28 million per year .
(c) The [ Public Utility ] commission may :
(A) Adopt rules to conform the universal service fund to section 254 of the federal Telecommu-
nications Act of  1996 [ (Public Law 104-104) ] (P.L. 104-104) , and to related regulations adopted by
the Federal Communications Commission, to the extent that the Public Utility Commission deter-
mines conforming the rules is appropriate[ .]; and
[(b)] (B)  In addition  to using the universal service fund to ensure basic telephone service, [ the
Public Utility Commission may ] use the universal  service fund to encourage broadband service
availability and to provide support to telecommunications carriers that provide :
(i) Both basic telephone service and broadband service[ .]; or
(ii) Both commercial mobile wireless cellular voice service and broadband service.
[(3)(a)] (2)(a)  The [ Public Utility ] commission shall establish the price a telecommunications
utility may charge its customers for basic telephone service.  The commission shall periodically re-
view and evaluate the status of telecommunications services in the  state and designate the services
included in basic telephone service. The commission  shall periodically review and adjust as neces-
sary the price a telecommunications utility may charge for basic telephone service.
(b) The provisions of this  subsection do not apply to the basic telephone service provided by a
telecommunications utility described in ORS 759.040.
[(4)(a)] (3)(a)  The commission shall establish  a benchmark for basic telephone service as neces-
sary for the administration and distribution of the universal service  fund. The universal service fund
shall provide explicit support  to an eligible telecommunications carrier that is equal to the differ-
ence between the cost of providing basic  telephone service and the benchmark, less any explicit
compensation received by the telecommunications  carrier from federal sources specifically used to
recover local loop costs and less any  explicit support received by the telecommunications carrier
from a federal universal service program.
(b) The commission shall periodically  review the benchmark established under paragraph (a) of
this subsection and adjust the benchmark as necessary to reflect:
(A) Changes in competition in the telecommunications industry;
(B) Changes in federal universal service support; and
(C) Other relevant factors as determined by the commission.
(c) Except for a telecommunications utility described in ORS  759.040, the commission shall seek
to limit the difference between the price  a telecommunications utility may charge for basic tele-
phone service and the benchmark.
[(5)] (4)(a)  [ There is imposed on  the sale of all retail telecommunications services sold in this state
[2]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a universal service surcharge. ] There is imposed a universal service surcharge on the sale in
this state of all:
(A) Retail telecommunications services;
(B) Retail commercial mobile radio services; and
(C) Retail interconnected voice over internet protocol services.
(b) A retail commercial  mobile radio service provider shall identify the intrastate reven-
ues subject to the universal service surcharge based  on the inverse of the percentage of
interstate revenues utilized for  purposes of federal universal service contributions or based
on any other method approved by the  Public Utility Commission. A retail commercial mobile
radio service provider may rely upon the sourcing rules set forth  in the Mobile Telecommu-
nications Sourcing Act (P.L. 106-252) to identify revenues attributable to Oregon.
(c) A retail interconnected voice over  internet protocol service provider may identify, in
accordance with federal guidelines, the  intrastate revenues subject to the universal service
surcharge based on any one of the following:
(A) The  inverse of the interstate safe harbor percentage established by the Federal
Communications Commission for interconnected voice over internet  protocol service for
federal universal service contribution purposes, as the interstate safe harbor percentage may
be revised from time to time;
(B) A traffic study specific to the  interconnected voice over internet protocol service
provider that allocates revenues between federal and state jurisdictions; or
(C) Another methodology for accurately apportioning interconnected voice  over internet
protocol service revenues between federal and state jurisdictions.
(d) For any service provider subject to  the universal service surcharge that provides, to
multiple locations, shared simultaneous voice channel capacity configured to  provide local
dial in different states, the revenue subject to the surcharge shall be  only the portion of the
shared capacity in this state as identified:
(A) By information itemizing, on the  billing statements provided to customers, the
charges subject to the surcharge, as may be identified by  individual end-user location, the
total number of end users and the number of end users at each end-user location; or
(B) If information described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph  does not exist, by the
service provider’s billing system books and records.
(e) Unless otherwise provided by the Public Utility Commission by rule, the universal  service
surcharge must be a uniform percentage of the sale of [ retail telecommunications ] services subject
to the surcharge  in an amount sufficient to support the purposes of  the universal service fund es-
tablished under subsection [ (2)] (1)  of this section, provided that the percentage does not exceed
[8.5] six percent of the sale of [ retail telecommunications ] services  subject to the surcharge .
(f) The universal  service surcharge may be listed by a telecommunications carrier  as a sep-
arate line item in billing statements provided  to customers  [ by all telecommunications carriers ],
as prescribed by the commission by rule or order. The commission may not prescribe  whether,
or the manner by which, a  commercial mobile radio services provider or an interconnected
voice over internet protocol  services provider may list the surcharge in billing statements
provided to customers.
(g) A [ telecommunications carrier ] service provider  required to collect the universal service
surcharge shall :
(A) Transmit amounts collected pursuant  to this section to the commission in accordance with
[3]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a schedule adopted by the commission ; and
(B) Provide the commission with information  requested by the commission as necessary
for the commission to implement this section .
(5) The commission shall deposit moneys transmitted to the commission pursuant to [ this sub-
section] subsection  (4) of this section  in the universal service fund established under subsection
[(2)] (1) of this section.
(6) The universal service fund  established under subsection [ (2)] (1)  of this section is separate
and distinct from the General Fund.  The universal service fund shall consist of all universal service
surcharge moneys collected by [ telecommunications carriers ] service  providers required to collect
the surcharge  and transmitted to the commission for deposit  in the universal service fund. The
universal service fund  may be used only for the purposes described in this section and for payment
of expenses incurred by the commission or a third party appointed by  the commission to administer
this section. All moneys in the universal service fund are continuously appropriated to the  commis-
sion to carry out the provisions of this  section. Interest on moneys deposited in the universal ser-
vice fund shall accrue to the universal service fund.
[(7) A person that  primarily provides radio communications service, radio paging service, com-
mercial mobile radio service, personal communications service  or cellular communications service may
request designation as an eligible telecommunications  carrier by the commission for purposes of this
section if the person imposes the universal service surcharge described in subsection (5) of this  section
and transmits the moneys collected to  the commission for deposit in the universal service fund estab-
lished under subsection (2) of this section for at  least one year immediately prior to requesting the
designation.]
[(8)] (7)  A pay telephone provider may apply to the commission, on a  form developed by the
commission, for a refund of the universal service surcharge imposed  on the pay telephone provider
under subsection [ (5)] (4) of this section for the provision of pay telephone service.
(8) Nothing in this section is intended to grant the commission the  authority to impose
any requirement or condition, or to  exercise any regulatory authority, with respect to com-
mercial mobile radio services or interconnected voice over internet protocol services other
than as expressly provided for in this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 759.425, as amended by section 2 of this 2020 Act, is amended to read:
759.425. (1)(a) The  Public Utility Commission shall establish and implement a competitively
neutral and nondiscriminatory universal service fund. The commission shall[ :]
[(A)] use the universal service fund to ensure basic telephone service is  available at a reason-
able and affordable rate .[; and ]
[(B) Transfer from the universal service fund to the Oregon  Business Development Department for
deposit in the Broadband Fund established under section 4 of this 2020 Act an amount  per year that
is equal to the lesser of: ]
[(i) $5 million; or ]
[(ii) The remainder of  moneys deposited in the universal service fund that are unobligated after
making the designation required in paragraph (b) of this subsection. ]
(b) The commission shall designate the  amount of moneys deposited annually in the universal
service fund to be used to ensure basic telephone service. The amount designated under this  para-
graph may not exceed $28 million per year.
(c) The commission may:
(A) Adopt rules to conform the  universal service fund to section 254 of the federal Telecommu-
[4]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
nications Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-104), and to related regulations adopted by the Federal Communi-
cations Commission, to the extent that the Public Utility  Commission determines conforming the
rules is appropriate; and
(B) In addition to using the universal service fund to  ensure basic telephone service, use the
universal service fund to encourage broadband service availability and to provide support to tele-
communications carriers that provide:
(i) Both basic telephone service and broadband service; or
(ii) Both commercial mobile wireless cellular voice service and broadband service.
(2)(a) The commission shall establish the price a telecommunications  utility may charge its
customers for basic telephone  service. The commission shall periodically review and evaluate the
status of telecommunications services in the state and  designate the services included in basic
telephone  service. The commission shall periodically review and adjust as necessary the price a
telecommunications utility may charge for basic telephone service.
(b) The provisions of this subsection do not apply to the basic telephone  service provided by a
telecommunications utility described in ORS 759.040.
(3)(a) The  commission shall establish a benchmark for basic telephone service as necessary for
the administration and  distribution of the universal service fund. The universal service fund shall
provide explicit support to  an eligible telecommunications carrier that is equal to the difference
between the cost of providing basic telephone  service and the benchmark, less any explicit com-
pensation received by the telecommunications carrier from federal sources specifically used to  re-
cover local loop costs and less any explicit support received by the  telecommunications carrier from
a federal universal service program.
(b) The commission shall periodically review the benchmark established  under paragraph (a) of
this subsection and adjust the benchmark as necessary to reflect:
(A) Changes in competition in the telecommunications industry;
(B) Changes in federal universal service support; and
(C) Other relevant factors as determined by the commission.
(c) Except for a telecommunications utility described in ORS  759.040, the commission shall seek
to limit the difference between the price a telecommunications  utility may charge for basic tele-
phone service and the benchmark.
(4)(a) There is imposed a universal service surcharge on the sale in this state of all:
(A) Retail telecommunications services;
(B) Retail commercial mobile radio services; and
(C) Retail interconnected voice over internet protocol services.
(b) A retail commercial mobile radio service provider  shall identify the intrastate revenues
subject to the universal service surcharge based on the inverse  of the percentage of interstate re-
venues utilized for purposes of federal universal service contributions or based on any other method
approved by the Public Utility Commission. A retail commercial mobile  radio service provider may
rely upon the sourcing rules set forth in the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act (P.L.  106-252)
to identify revenues attributable to Oregon.
(c) A retail interconnected  voice over internet protocol service provider may identify, in ac-
cordance with federal guidelines, the intrastate revenues subject to the universal service  surcharge
based on any one of the following:
(A) The inverse of the interstate safe harbor percentage established by the Federal Communi-
cations Commission for interconnected voice over  internet protocol service for federal universal
[5]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
service contribution purposes, as the interstate safe harbor percentage may be  revised from time to
time;
(B) A traffic study specific  to the interconnected voice over internet protocol service provider
that allocates revenues between federal and state jurisdictions; or
(C) Another methodology for accurately apportioning interconnected voice over internet  proto-
col service revenues between federal and state jurisdictions.
(d) For any service provider subject to  the universal service surcharge that provides, to multiple
locations, shared simultaneous voice channel capacity configured to provide local dial in different
states, the revenue subject to the surcharge shall be only the portion of  the shared capacity in this
state as identified:
(A) By information itemizing, on the  billing statements provided to customers, the charges sub-
ject to the surcharge, as may be identified by  individual end-user location, the total number of end
users and the number of end users at each end-user location; or
(B) If information  described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph does not exist, by the service
provider’s billing system books and records.
(e) Unless otherwise provided by  the Public Utility Commission by rule, the universal service
surcharge  must  be a uniform percentage of the sale of services subject to the surcharge in an
amount sufficient to support  the purposes of the universal service fund established under subsection
(1) of this section, provided that the percentage does not  exceed six percent of the sale of services
subject to the surcharge.
(f) The universal service surcharge may  be listed by a telecommunications carrier as a separate
line item in billing statements provided to customers, as prescribed by the commission  by rule or
order. The commission may not prescribe whether,  or the manner by which, a commercial mobile
radio services provider or an interconnected voice over internet  protocol services provider may list
the surcharge in billing statements provided to customers.
(g) A service provider required to collect the universal service surcharge shall:
(A) Transmit amounts collected pursuant to this section to the commission in accordance  with
a schedule adopted by the commission; and
(B) Provide the commission with information requested by the  commission as necessary for the
commission to implement this section.
(5) The  commission shall deposit moneys transmitted to the commission pursuant to subsection
(4) of this section in the universal service fund established under subsection (1) of this section.
(6) The universal service fund  established under subsection (1) of this section is separate and
distinct from  the General Fund. The universal service fund shall consist of all universal service
surcharge  moneys  collected by service providers required to collect the surcharge and transmitted
to the commission for deposit in the universal service fund.  The universal service fund may be used
only for the purposes described in this section and for payment of expenses incurred  by the com-
mission or a third party appointed by the commission to  administer this section. All moneys in the
universal service fund are continuously appropriated to the commission  to carry out the provisions
of this section. Interest on moneys  deposited in the universal service fund shall accrue to the uni-
versal service fund.
(7) A pay  telephone provider may apply to the commission, on a form developed by the com-
mission, for  a refund of the universal service surcharge imposed on the pay telephone provider under
subsection (4) of this section for the provision of pay telephone service.
(8) Nothing in this section is intended to grant  the commission the authority to impose any re-
[6]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
quirement or condition, or to exercise any regulatory  authority, with respect to commercial mobile
radio services or  interconnected voice over internet protocol services other than as expressly pro-
vided for in this section.
SECTION 4.
The Broadband Fund is established, separate and distinct from  the General
Fund. Interest earned by  the Broadband Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the
Broadband Fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon  Business Development De-
partment to be used only for providing grants or loans through, or for administering,  the
Oregon Broadband Office and the program established by rule  under section 5 of this 2020
Act. The fund shall consist of moneys deposited in the fund pursuant to ORS 759.425.
SECTION 5. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Underserved area” means, based on the most recent  broadband deployment data
published by the Federal Communications Commission, other  federal agencies or the State
of Oregon, a geographic area within one or more census  blocks, within which there is no
service provider offering residential wireline or wireless broadband service at a  speed of at
least 25 megabits per second for downloads and three megabits per second for uploads.
(b) “Unserved area” means, based on the most recent  broadband deployment data pub-
lished by the Federal Communications Commission,  other federal agencies or the State of
Oregon, a geographic area within one or more census blocks, within which there is no service
provider offering residential wireline or wireless broadband service at a speed of at least 10
megabits per second for downloads and one megabit per second for uploads.
(2)(a) The Oregon Business Development  Department shall establish by rule a program
for providing grants or loans to assist eligible applicants with projects for:
(A) The planning and development of broadband service infrastructure;
(B) Digital literacy including cybersecurity;
(C) Digital inclusion; and
(D) Digital adoption.
(b) In establishing the program required by this section, the department shall  take into
consideration all  federal funding opportunities for the planning and development of
broadband service infrastructure and shall endeavor to administer the program in  a manner
that serves to maximize the total available state and federal support  for broadband develop-
ment and related planning.
(3) Rules adopted under this section shall include but need not be limited to rules estab-
lishing:
(a) Criteria for applications and for establishing the eligibility of  applicants and proposed
projects for a grant or loan under the program;
(b) A process for:
(A) Identifying broadband service providers that provide  service within or near the ge-
ographic area that would be benefited by a project proposed by an eligible applicant; and
(B) Notifying the identified broadband service providers of the pending application;
(c) Standards for the department to evaluate applications from eligible applicants;
(d) Criteria and procedures for broadband service providers to engage  in a competitive
bidding process for contracts to complete projects pursuant to a grant or loan awarded under
the program;
(e) Reporting requirements by grant or loan award recipients on the broadband service
infrastructure developed or planned for using grant or  loan moneys and the locations served
[7]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or that will be served by the broadband service infrastructure;
(f) A public process for interested persons to submit comments on pending applications;
(g) A process for appealing grant or loan decisions by the department; and
(h) Procedures to ensure that any records or data submitted to the department  pursuant
to administration of the program that relate to broadband,  voice connections or sub-
scriptions and that  are confidential, privileged or otherwise protected from disclosure are
not disclosed, except as permitted by state and federal law.
(4) In making grant or loan award decisions under the program, the department shall:
(a) Give first preference to proposed projects that are eligible to  receive funds from the
Connecting Oregon Schools Fund established under ORS 276A.424;
(b) Give second preference to proposed projects that will provide broadband  service ac-
cess to public libraries; and
(c) Give additional preferences to the following:
(A) Proposed projects that will serve unserved areas;
(B) Proposed projects that will serve underserved areas; and
(C) Proposed projects that will provide broadband service access to residential customers.
(5) The department shall, as part of the program,  establish procedures for distributing
grant or loan  funds awarded for the purpose of providing broadband access to schools. Pro-
cedures established under this subsection shall  include procedures for transferring not more
than 20 percent of the moneys deposited in the Broadband Fund each biennium from the
Broadband Fund to the Connecting Oregon Schools Fund established under ORS 276A.424.
(6) The department may not award a grant or loan under the program  for a proposed
project to:
(a) Develop broadband service infrastructure to serve residential locations that,  at the
time the application for the proposed project is received by the  department, have access to
terrestrial wireline or wireless  broadband service at a speed of at least 25 megabits per sec-
ond for downloads and three megabits per second for uploads; or
(b) Develop broadband service infrastructure that will serve two or fewer residential lo-
cations.
(7)(a) If the department awards a grant or loan for  a proposed project to develop
broadband service infrastructure that will serve nonresidential  locations that, at the time
the application for the proposed project was received by the department,  were served by
terrestrial wireline or wireless broadband service at a speed of at least 25  megabits per sec-
ond for downloads and three megabits per second for uploads, the broadband service provid-
ers identified pursuant to rules adopted under subsection (3)(b) of this section shall  be
afforded a right of first refusal to contract for the development of broadband  service
infrastructure as part of the project. If a broadband  service provider exercises the right of
first refusal, the  provider shall be awarded the contract to develop broadband service
infrastructure as part of the project, subject  to the requirement that the provider must offer
access to the completed broadband service infrastructure:
(A) Beginning no later  than one year after the date that the department awards the
grant or loan to develop the proposed project;
(B) At demonstrated download and upload speeds equal  to or faster than the speeds in-
dicated in the application for the proposed project; and
(C) At a cost that is equal to or less than the cost indicated in the  application for the
[8]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
proposed project.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a grant or loan  award for a proposed project de-
scribed in subsection (4)(b) of this section.
SECTION 6.
(1) Not later than  September 15 of each year, the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department shall report, in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, to an interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly related to  telecommunications on the status of the
Broadband Fund. The report required by this section shall include a description of:
(a) All loans and grants provided  through the program adopted under section 5 of this
2020 Act; and
(b) The status of the projects funded by the loans and grants.
(2) In addition to the information required in the report under subsection (1) of this
section, the report submitted on or before September 15,  2024, by the department pursuant
to this section shall include  an evaluation of the continuing need for the Broadband Fund,
including but not limited to recommendations regarding the repeal, by  section 9 of this 2020
Act, of the Broadband Fund and the program adopted under section 5 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding the amount provided for  in ORS 759.425 (1)(b) and the per-
centage provided for in ORS 759.425 (4)(e), until  December 31, 2021, the amount of moneys
deposited annually in the universal service fund to be  used to ensure basic telephone service
shall be as provided  for in Appendix A to Public Utility Commission Order No. 16-093, as
corrected by Public Utility Commission Order No. 16-102.
SECTION 8.  ORS 285A.160 is amended to read:
285A.160. The Oregon Broadband  Advisory Council , in consultation with the Oregon
Broadband Office, shall submit a report by November  1 of each even-numbered year to the Joint
Legislative Committee on Information Management and Technology on the following subjects:
(1) The affordability and accessibility of broadband technology in all areas of this state;
(2) The extent of broadband technology use in this state  in business, health care, energy man-
agement, education and government; and
(3) The  role of broadband technology in local, state and regional economies and economic de-
velopment.
SECTION 9.
(1) Sections 4, 5 and 6 of this 2020 Act are repealed on January 2, 2030.
(2) Any moneys in the Broadband Fund that are unexpended and  unobligated on January
2, 2030, revert to the universal service fund established under ORS 759.425.
SECTION 10. The amendments to  ORS 759.425 by section 3 of this 2020 Act become op-
erative on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 11. (1) Sections 4 to 7 of  this 2020 Act and the amendments to ORS 285A.160,
759.400 and 759.425 by sections 1, 2 and 8 of this 2020 Act become operative on January 1,
2021.
(2) The Public Utility Commission and the Oregon Business Development Department
may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section that
is necessary to enable the commission and the department  to exercise, on and after the op-
erative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the commission and the department by sections 4 to 7 of this 2020 Act and the
amendments to ORS 285A.160, 759.400 and 759.425 by sections 1, 2 and 8 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 12.
This 2020 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2020
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[9]
HB 4079
1
[10]