Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall establish an anti-
poaching awareness program to:
(a) Increase public awareness of the impacts of poaching;
(b) Increase reporting of poaching and poaching-related activity;
(c) Increase law enforcement detection of poaching; and
(d) Promote consistent prosecution and punishment for poaching.
(2) The State  Fish and Wildlife Commission may adopt rules to implement the anti-
poaching awareness program.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended  for the anti-
poaching awareness program established in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4222