Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Member of a military organization” means a person who makes a financial donation
to a military organization during the tax year.
(b) “Military organization” means a  charitable organization that is established to provide
services to veterans and active duty members of the  Armed Forces of the United States and
that is certified as tax exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) A credit against taxes that are otherwise due under ORS  chapter 316 or, if the tax-
payer is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317 or 318 is allowed to a taxpayer that is  a
member of a  military organization that contributes financial resources to the Veterans’ Ed-
ucational Aid Account under ORS 408.090 prior to dissolving under ORS 65.621 or 65.624.
(3) The credit allowed under this section  applies to amounts donated by the taxpayer
within the same tax year that the military organization dissolves under ORS 65.621 or 65.624.
(4) In order to qualify for the credit allowed under this section, the taxpayer must  obtain
written certification from the Department of Veterans’ Affairs.
(5) A taxpayer may not qualify for this credit for more than one tax year.
(6) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax  liability of the taxpayer
for the tax year.
(7) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this section that is not  used by the taxpayer
in a particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax  liability
for the next succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused in  the next succeeding tax
year may be carried forward and used in the second succeeding tax year, and likewise any
credit not used in that second succeeding  tax year may be carried forward and used in the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1570
HB 2913
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
third succeeding tax year but may not be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(8) A nonresident shall be allowed the credit under this section. The credit  shall be
computed in the same manner and be subject to the same limitations as the credit granted
to a resident. However, the credit shall be prorated using the proportion provided  in ORS
316.117.
(9) If a change in the  taxable year of the taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085,
or if the Department of Revenue  terminates the taxpayer’s taxable year under ORS 314.440,
the credit allowed by  this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with
ORS 314.085.
(10) If a change in  the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from non-
resident to resident occurs, the credit allowed by this section shall be determined in  a man-
ner consistent with ORS 316.117.
(11) The  Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall adopt rules for the purposes of this sec-
tion, including rules establishing policies and procedures for  providing written certification
to taxpayers eligible for  the credit allowed under this section, as required by subsection (4)
of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the amount of the
credit allowed under section 2 of this 2025 Act shall be 300 percent of  the amount donated
to the military organization during the tax year, but may not exceed $40,000.
(2) For  any donation made to the military organization during a tax year ending after
July 1, 2031, the amount of the credit may not  exceed $30,000 for the tax year and shall be
the sum of:
(a) 300 percent of the amount donated to the military organization  on or before July 1,
2031; and
(b) 150 percent of the amount donated to the military organization after July 1, 2031.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 314.772 is amended to read:
314.772. (1) Except  as provided in ORS 314.766 (5)(b), the tax credits allowed or allowable to a
C corporation for purposes  of ORS chapter 317 or 318 shall not be allowed to an S corporation. The
business tax credits  allowed or allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 316 shall be allowed or are
allowable to the shareholders of the S corporation.
(2) In determining the tax imposed under ORS chapter 316, as provided under ORS 314.763, on
income of the shareholder of an S corporation, there shall be taken into account  the shareholder’s
pro rata share of  business tax credit (or item thereof) that would be allowed to the corporation (but
for subsection (1) of this section) or recapture or recovery thereof.  The credit (or item thereof), re-
capture or recovery shall be passed through to shareholders in pro rata shares as determined in the
manner prescribed under section 1377(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) The character of any  item included in a shareholder’s pro rata share under subsection (2)
of this section shall be determined as if such item were realized  directly from the source from which
realized by the corporation, or incurred in the same manner as incurred by the corporation.
(4) If the shareholder is a nonresident and there is a requirement applicable  for the business tax
credit that in the case of a  nonresident the credit be allowed in the proportion provided in ORS
316.117, then that provision shall apply to the nonresident shareholder.
(5) As used in this section, “business tax credit”  means the following credits: ORS 315.104
(forestation and reforestation), ORS 315.124 (small forest option), ORS 315.133 (agricultural overtime
pay), ORS 315.138 (fish screening, by-pass devices, fishways),  ORS 315.141 (biomass production for
[2]
HB 2913
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
biofuel), ORS  315.156 (crop gleaning), ORS 315.164 and 315.169 (agriculture workforce housing), ORS
315.176 (bovine manure), ORS 315.204 (dependent care assistance), ORS 315.208 (dependent care fa-
cilities), ORS 315.213 (contributions for child  care), ORS 315.237 (employee and dependent scholar-
ships), ORS 315.271 (individual development accounts), ORS 315.283 (affordable housing  sales), ORS
315.304 (pollution control facility), ORS 315.326 (renewable energy  development contributions), ORS
315.331 (energy conservation projects), ORS 315.336 (transportation projects),  ORS 315.341
(renewable energy resource equipment manufacturing facilities), ORS 315.354  and 469B.151 (energy
conservation facilities), ORS 315.506 (tribal taxes on reservation enterprise zones  and reservation
partnership zones), ORS 315.507 (electronic commerce), ORS 315.514 (film production development
contributions), ORS 315.518 (semiconductors), ORS 315.523 (employee  training programs), ORS
315.533 (low income community jobs  initiative), ORS 315.593 (short line railroads), ORS 315.640
(university venture development funds), ORS 315.643 (Opportunity Grant Fund contributions), ORS
315.675 (Trust for Cultural Development Account contributions), ORS 317.097 (loans for affordable
housing), ORS 317.124 (long  term enterprise zone facilities), ORS 317.147 (loans for agriculture
workforce housing), ORS 317.152  (qualified research expenses) and ORS 317.154 (alternative qualified
research expenses) and section 9, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2013 (alternative fuel vehicle  contribu-
tions), and section 2 of this 2025 Act (donations by dissolved military organizations) .
SECTION 5.
 ORS 318.031 is amended to read:
318.031. It being the intention of the Legislative Assembly that this chapter and ORS chapter
317 shall be administered as uniformly as  possible (allowance being made for the difference in im-
position of the taxes), ORS 305.140  and 305.150, ORS chapter 314 and the following sections are in-
corporated into and made a part of this chapter: ORS 315.104, 315.124, 315.133, 315.141,  315.156,
315.176, 315.204, 315.208, 315.213, 315.283, 315.304, 315.326, 315.331, 315.336, 315.506, 315.507, 315.523,
315.533, 315.593 and 315.643 and section 2 of this 2025 Act (all only  to the extent applicable to a
corporation) and ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 6. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act  apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]