Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Correctional facility” means any  place used for the confinement of persons charged
with or convicted of a crime or  otherwise confined under a court order and includes but is
not limited to a  youth correction facility or a state hospital, as those terms are defined in
ORS 162.135.
(b) “Gender-affirming care” means a procedure, service, drug, device or product that a
physical or behavioral health care provider prescribes to treat  an individual for incongruence
between the individual’s gender identity and the individual’s sex assignment at birth.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 435.210 or 659A.142 or any other provision of law, the De-
partment of Corrections, Oregon Youth Authority or Oregon Health Authority  may not pay
for or provide, directly or indirectly, gender-affirming care to  any individual in the custody
of a correctional facility in this state.
(b) This section does not apply to individuals receiving treatment  at a state hospital or
intensive community inpatient facility if the patients were admitted voluntarily or through
a civil commitment proceeding under ORS 426.070 to 426.170, 426.701 or 427.235 to 427.292.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3236