Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Innovative  Housing Strategies for Veterans is estab-
lished, consisting of 11 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one  member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Director of  the Housing and Community Services Department shall appoint three
members to represent the Housing and Community Services Department, at  least two of
whom shall have expertise in housing options and programs for veterans.
(d) The Director of Veterans’ Affairs shall appoint three members, at least one of  whom
shall represent the Department of Veterans’ Affairs and one of whom shall represent
veterans’ advocates.
(e) The Governor shall appoint three members, at least one  of whom must have expertise
in lending for, and development of, housing for veterans and one of whom shall represent
housing advocates for veterans.
(2) The task force shall study and make findings regarding the following:
(a) Innovative housing strategies to provide housing for homeless and  low income veter-
ans and veterans’ families in this state, including but not limited to the following:
(A) Establishment of a housing purchasing authority to  acquire housing for the purpose
of providing housing options for veterans; and
(B) Purchase by the state of  vacant housing developments during times of recession or
other economic downturn for the purpose of providing housing options for veterans; and
(b) For each of the strategies under paragraph (a)  of this subsection, a viable plan for
implementation, including designation of the state  agency or entity that will be responsible
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1683
HB 2906
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
for administration of the strategy, identification  of barriers and possible outcomes, the
amount and nature of available and  required financial resources, standards for veteran el-
igibility and any other factor or consideration that is  relevant to evaluating the feasibility
and appropriateness of the strategy.
(3) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(4) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(5) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(6) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(7) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(8) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(9) The task force shall  submit a report, which may include recommendations for legis-
lation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative Assembly with subject matter jurisdic-
tion over housing and veterans’ affairs no later than September 15, 2026.
(10) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs and the Housing and Community Services  De-
partment shall jointly provide staff support to the task force.
(11) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(12) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to  compensation, but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel and other
expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official  duties in the manner and
amounts provided for in ORS 292.495.  Claims for expenses incurred in performing functions
of the task force shall be paid out of funds appropriated to the Department of  Veterans’
Affairs and the Housing and Community Services Department for purposes of the task  force.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of its duties and, to the extent permitted  by laws relating
to confidentiality, to furnish such information and advice as the members of the task force
consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]