Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 329.
SECTION 2. (1) Each school district board shall ensure that:
(a) All schools of  the school district with any grade from kindergarten through grade
eight offer computer science  education and computational thinking experiences at all grade
levels; and
(b) All schools of the school  district with any grade from grade 9 through 12 offer at least
two computer science courses, at least one  of which is a foundational computer science
course.
(2) The Department of Education shall develop and maintain programming to:
(a) Support current teachers  in expanding their capacity to teach computer science
courses and to integrate computational  thinking experiences into existing classes and cur-
ricula; and
(b) Support and expand equitable access to culturally responsive and  sustainable com-
puter science education for all students.
(3) The department may hire  permanent staff for the purpose of carrying out the
department’s duties specified in this section.
(4) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 329.025 is amended to read:
329.025. It  is the intent of the Legislative Assembly to maintain a system of public elementary
and secondary schools that allows students,  parents, teachers, administrators, school district boards
and the State Board of Education to be accountable for the  development and improvement of the
public school system. The public school system shall have the following characteristics:
(1) Provides equal  and open access and educational opportunities for all students in the state
regardless of their linguistic background, culture, race, gender, capability or geographic location;
(2) Assumes that all students can learn  and establishes high, specific skill and knowledge ex-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 791
SB 541
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
pectations and recognizes individual differences at all instructional levels;
(3) Provides  each student an education experience that supports academic growth beyond profi-
ciency in established academic content standards and encourages  students to attain aspirational
goals that are individually challenging;
(4) Provides special  education, compensatory education, linguistically and culturally appropriate
education and other specialized programs to all students who need those services;
(5) Supports the physical and cognitive growth and development of students;
(6) Provides students with a solid foundation in the skills of reading, writing, problem  solving
and communication;
(7) Provides opportunities for students  to learn, think, reason, retrieve information, use tech-
nology and work effectively alone and in groups;
(8) Provides for rigorous academic content  standards and instruction in mathematics, science,
language arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education  and career path skills, per-
sonal financial education, physical education, health, the arts [ and], world languages  and computer
science;
(9) Provides increased learning time;
(10) Provides students an educational background to the end that they will function successfully
in a constitutional republic, a participatory democracy and a multicultural nation and world;
(11) Provides students with the knowledge and skills that will  provide the opportunities to suc-
ceed in the world of work, as members of families and as citizens;
(12) Provides students with the knowledge and skills that lead to an active, healthy lifestyle;
(13) Provides students with the knowledge  and skills to take responsibility for their decisions
and choices;
(14) Provides opportunities for students to learn through a variety of teaching strategies;
(15) Emphasizes involvement of parents and the community in the total education of students;
(16) Transports children safely to and from school;
(17) Ensures that the funds allocated to schools reflect the uncontrollable differences in costs
facing each district;
(18) Ensures  that local schools have adequate control of how funds are spent to best meet the
needs of students in their communities; and
(19) Provides for a safe, educational environment.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 329.045 is amended to read:
329.045. (1)(a) In order to achieve the goals contained in ORS 329.025, the State Board of Edu-
cation shall regularly  and periodically review and revise its Common Curriculum Goals, performance
indicators and diploma requirements.
(b) The review and revision conducted under this section shall:
(A) Include Essential Learning Skills and rigorous academic content  standards in mathematics,
science, language arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education  and career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the  arts [ and], world languages  and
computer science.
(B) Involve teachers and other educators, parents of students and other citizens and  shall pro-
vide ample opportunity for public comment.
(C) Encourage increased learning time. As used in this subparagraph, “increased  learning
time” means a schedule that  encompasses a longer school day, week or year for the purpose of in-
creasing the total number of school hours available to provide:
[2]
SB 541
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Students with instruction  in core academic subjects, including mathematics, science, language
arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education and career path skills, personal finan-
cial education, the arts [ and], world languages and computer science ;
(ii) Students with instruction in subjects other than the  subjects identified in sub-subparagraph
(i) of this subparagraph, including health and physical education;
(iii) Students with the opportunity to participate in enrichment activities  that contribute to a
well-rounded education,  including learning opportunities that may be based on service, experience
or work and that may be provided through partnerships with other organizations; and
(iv) Teachers with the opportunity  to collaborate, plan and engage in professional development
within and across grades and subjects.
(c) Nothing in this subsection prevents a school district or  public charter school from main-
taining control over course content, format, materials and teaching methods.
(2) The State Board of Education shall continually review and revise all adopted academic con-
tent standards necessary for students to successfully transition to the next phase of their education.
(3)(a) School  districts and public charter schools must offer students instruction in mathematics,
science, language arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education  and career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the  arts [ and], world languages and
computer science.
(b) Instruction required under paragraph (a) of this subsection must:
(A) Meet the academic content standards adopted by the State Board of Education; and
(B) Meet the  requirements adopted by the State Board of Education and the board of the school
district or public charter school.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 329.045, as amended by section 1, chapter  202, Oregon Laws 2019, section 6,
chapter 178, Oregon Laws 2021, section 1, chapter 328, Oregon Laws 2023, and section 7,  chapter
564, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
329.045. (1)(a) In order to achieve the goals contained in ORS 329.025, the State Board of Edu-
cation shall regularly  and periodically review and revise its Common Curriculum Goals, performance
indicators and diploma requirements.
(b) The review and revision conducted under this section shall:
(A) Include Essential Learning Skills and rigorous academic content  standards in mathematics,
science, language arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education  and career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the  arts [ and], world languages  and
computer science.
(B) Ensure that the academic content standards for history, geography,  economics and civics
include sufficient instruction on the histories, contributions and perspectives of individuals who:
(i) Are Native American;
(ii) Are of African, Asian, Pacific Island, Chicano, Latino, Middle Eastern or Jewish descent;
(iii) Are women;
(iv) Have disabilities;
(v) Are immigrants or refugees; or
(vi) Are lesbian, gay, bisexual or transgender.
(C) Involve teachers  and other educators, parents of students and other citizens and shall pro-
vide ample opportunity for public comment.
(D) Encourage increased learning  time. As used in this subparagraph, “increased learning
time” means a schedule that encompasses a longer school day, week or year for  the purpose of in-
[3]
SB 541
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
creasing the total number of school hours available to provide:
(i) Students with instruction  in core academic subjects, including mathematics, science, language
arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education and career path skills, personal finan-
cial education, the arts [ and], world languages  and computer science ;
(ii) Students with instruction in subjects other than the  subjects identified in sub-subparagraph
(i) of this subparagraph, including health and physical education;
(iii) Students with the opportunity to participate in enrichment activities  that contribute to a
well-rounded education,  including learning opportunities that may be based on service, experience
or work and that may be provided through partnerships with other organizations; and
(iv) Teachers with the opportunity  to collaborate, plan and engage in professional development
within and across grades and subjects.
(c) Nothing in this subsection prevents a school district or  public charter school from main-
taining control over course content, format, materials and teaching methods.
(2) The State Board of Education shall continually review and revise all adopted academic con-
tent standards necessary for students to successfully transition to the next phase of their education.
(3)(a) School  districts and public charter schools must offer students instruction in mathematics,
science, language arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education  and career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the  arts [ and], world languages  and
computer science.
(b) Instruction required under paragraph (a) of this subsection must:
(A) Meet the academic content standards adopted by the State Board of Education; and
(B) Meet the  requirements adopted by the State Board of Education and the board of the school
district or public charter school.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 329.485 is amended to read:
329.485. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Content-based  assessment” means testing of the understanding of a student of a predeter-
mined body of knowledge.
(b) “Criterion-referenced assessment” means testing of the knowledge or ability of a student with
respect to some standard.
(c) “Performance-based assessment”  means testing of the ability of a student to use knowledge
and skills to create a complex or multifaceted product or complete a complex task.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall implement statewide a valid and reliable  assessment
system for all students that meets technical adequacy standards. The assessment system shall  in-
clude criterion-referenced assessments including performance-based assessments, content-based as-
sessments, and other valid methods to measure the  academic content standards and to identify
students who meet or exceed the standards.
(b) The department shall develop the statewide assessment system in mathematics,  science, lan-
guage arts, history, geography, economics [ and], civics  and computer science .
(3) In addition  to the assessment system implemented under subsection (2) of this section, the
department may make available to school districts and public  charter schools an assessment system
that uses  criterion-referenced assessments, including performance-based assessments and content-
based assessments to:
(a) Measure a student’s progress toward mastery of  the knowledge and skills of the student’s
current grade level or course content level;
(b) Determine the student’s level of mastery, which shall be  determined regardless of the actual
[4]
SB 541
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
grade level of the student and may be determined by adapting the assessment during the assessment
process as a result of the performance of the student;
(c) Track  and provide reports on the progress of a student based on the information provided
under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection; and
(d) Provide predictions of anticipated student  progress that are based on the information pro-
vided under this subsection and not on the current grade level of the student.
(4)(a) School districts and public  charter schools shall implement the statewide assessment sys-
tem in mathematics, science and language arts. In addition,  school districts and public charter
schools may implement  the statewide assessment system in history, geography, economics [ and],
civics  and computer science .
(b) School districts and public charter schools may  choose to implement the assessment system
described in subsection (3) of this section.
(5)(a) Each year the resident school district shall be accountable for  determining the student’s
progress toward achieving the academic content standards. Progress toward the academic  content
standards:
(A) Shall clearly show the student and parents whether the student is  making progress toward
meeting or exceeding the academic content standards at  the student’s current grade level or course
content  level;
(B) Shall be based on the student’s progress toward mastery  of a continuum of academic
knowledge and skills; and
(C) May be based on the  student’s progress in a continuum of knowledge and skills that are not
academic and that may include student behaviors that are defined by the school district.
(b) School districts shall determine the method and format for showing student  progress toward
achieving the academic content standards. Communications on student progress shall include a
reasonable number, as determined by the school district, of  academic knowledge and skills in a
content area to  enable parents and students to understand a student’s progress toward meeting or
exceeding the academic content standards. No more  than three indicators of academic knowledge
and skills per content area reporting category shall be required as provided  by this section. A
school district may use more  than three indicators of academic knowledge and skills per content
area reporting category if the school district implements a proficiency education system as provided
by ORS 329.119.
(6) In addition to  the requirements described in subsection (5) of this section, the school district
shall adopt and implement a reporting system based  on the school district board adopted course
content of the school district’s curriculum. The reporting system:
(a) Shall clearly show the student and parents whether the student is achieving course require-
ments at the student’s current grade level or course content level;
(b) Shall be based on the student’s progress toward mastery of a continuum of academic knowl-
edge and skills; and
(c) May be based on the student’s progress in a continuum of  knowledge and skills that are not
academic and that may include student behaviors that are defined by the school district.
(7) If a student has not met or has exceeded all of the academic content standards, the  school
district shall make additional services or alternative educational  or public school options available
to the student.
(8) If the student to whom additional services  or alternative educational options have been made
available  does  not meet or exceed the academic content standards within one year, the school dis-
[5]
SB 541
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
trict, with the consent of the parents, shall make an appropriate placement, which may include an
alternative education program or the transfer of the student to another  public school in the school
district or to a public school in another school district that  agrees to accept the student. The school
district that receives the student shall be entitled to payment. The payment shall consist of:
(a) An amount equal to the school district’s expenses  from its local revenues for each student
in average daily membership, payable by the resident school district in the same year; and
(b) Any state and federal funds the attending school  district is entitled to receive payable as
provided in ORS 339.133 (2)(b).
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding section 2 (1) of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS
329.025, 329.045 and 329.485 by sections 3 to 6  of this 2025 Act, a school district is not required
to first offer computer science courses until the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000, for  the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[6]