Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 338.155 is amended to read:
338.155. (1)(a) Students of a public charter school shall be considered to be residents of  the
school district in which  the public charter school is located for purposes of distribution of the State
School  Fund.
(b) All amounts to be distributed from the  State School Fund for public charter schools shall
first be distributed to the school district in which the public charter school is located.
(c) For the purpose of determining the amounts  to be distributed to a school district from the
State School Fund for  a public charter school, the district extended ADMw described in ORS 327.013
shall be calculated:
(A) Except as provided by subparagraph (B) or (C) of this paragraph, as though the  students
enrolled at a public charter school are students enrolled at the public schools  of the school district
in which the public charter school is located.
(B) By  not including any portion of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year if  the public charter school ceased to operate because of dissolution or closure or because of
termination or nonrenewal of a charter.
(C) By calculating the current school year’s ADMw separately for  a virtual public charter
school and for the school district if  the school district, without consideration of the ADM of the
virtual public charter school, had a decrease in ADM or ADMw compared to the previous  school
year.
(2) A school district shall contractually establish,  with any public charter school within
the boundaries of the school district, payment for provision of educational services to the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3756
HB 3444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
public charter school’s students.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and  (5) of this section and ORS 338.165, the
payment required under subsection (2) of this section shall equal an amount per weighted
average daily membership (ADMw) of the public charter school that is at least equal to:
(a) Ninety-five percent of the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant  per
ADMw as calculated under  ORS 327.013 for the sponsor if the sponsor is the board of a school
district; or
(b) Ninety-five percent of the General Purpose Grant per ADMw as  calculated under ORS
327.013 for the school district where  the public charter school is located if the sponsor is the
State Board of Education.
[(2)] (4) A school district shall contractually establish, with any virtual public charter school
that is sponsored by the board of  the school district, payment for provision of educational services
to the virtual public charter school’s students. The payment  shall equal an amount per weighted
average daily membership (ADMw) of the virtual public charter school that is at least equal to:
(a) Eighty percent of the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 for students  who are enrolled in kindergarten through grade eight;
and
(b) Ninety-five percent of the amount of the school district’s General  Purpose Grant per ADMw
as calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
[(3)] (5) A school district shall contractually establish, with any virtual public charter school
that is sponsored by the State Board of Education and that is within the boundaries  of the school
district, payment for provision of educational services to the virtual public charter school’s stu-
dents. The payment shall equal an amount per weighted average daily  membership (ADMw) of the
virtual public charter school that is at least equal to:
(a) Ninety percent of the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant per  ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 for students  who are enrolled in kindergarten through grade eight;
and
(b) Ninety-five percent of the amount of the school district’s General  Purpose Grant per ADMw
as calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
[(4)] (6) The estimated amount of each school district’s  General Purpose Grant per ADMw shall
be determined each year by the Department of  Education and made available to all school districts.
[(5)] (7) The school district in which [ the] a public  charter school sponsored by the State
Board of Education  is located shall transfer an amount per weighted average daily membership
(ADMw) of the public charter school that is equal to 50 percent of the amount of the  school
district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as calculated under ORS 327.013 that is not paid to  the
public charter school through a contract created  pursuant to subsection [ (3)] (2) or (5)  of this sec-
tion to the Department of Education.
(8)(a) A sponsor may  retain any amounts that are not paid to a public charter school as
provided by subsection (3), (4) or (5) of this  section. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of
this subsection, any amounts retained by the sponsor as provided  by this subsection must
be used for administrative costs incurred by the sponsor in relation to public charter schools.
[(6)] (b) The department may use any moneys received under this section for  activities related
to public charter schools.
[(7)] (9) A school district and a public charter  school may negotiate to establish a payment for
the provision of educational services to the public charter  school’s students that is more than the
[2]
HB 3444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
minimum [amounts] amount specified in subsection [ (2) or ] (3), (4) or (5)  of this section.
(10)(a) In addition to payments received by a public charter  school under subsection (3),
(4) or (5) of this section and  except as provided by ORS 338.165, the public charter school is
entitled to receive:
(A) Any  local, state or federal moneys that are for the benefit of the public charter
school and that are  received by a sponsor or by the school district in which the public
charter school is located.
(B) Any local, state or federal  moneys that are for the benefit of public schools in the
school district and that are received by a sponsor or  by the school district in which the
public charter school is located. Moneys described in this subparagraph must  be distributed
to public charter schools on the same basis as moneys  are distributed to nonchartered public
schools in the school district.
(C) Any local revenues,  as described in ORS 327.011, that are available to the nonchar-
tered public schools in the school district. Moneys described  in this subparagraph must be
distributed to  public charter schools based on the number of students who attend the
schools.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(C) of this subsection,  a virtual public charter school
is not entitled to receive a portion of local revenues, as described in ORS 327.011, but a school
district may choose to distribute a portion of local  revenues to the virtual public charter
school.
[(8)] (11) A school district shall send payment to a public charter school based  on a contract
negotiated under this section within 10 days after receiving  payments from the State School Fund
pursuant to ORS 327.095  or after receiving moneys pursuant to subsection (10) of this
section.
[(9)(a)] (12)(a) A  public charter school may apply for any grant that is available to school dis-
tricts or nonchartered public schools from the Department of Education. The  department shall con-
sider the application of the public charter  school in the same manner as an application from a
school district or nonchartered public school.
(b) The department shall  award any grant that is available to school districts based solely on
the weighted average daily membership (ADMw)  of the school district directly to the public charter
school. This paragraph does not apply to any grant from the State School Fund.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 338.155 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to mon-
eys received by a school district or sponsor on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 327.185 is amended to read:
327.185. (1) As used in this section, “eligible applicant” means any of the following entities:
(a) Common school districts and union high school districts.
(b) The Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program.
(c) Public charter schools that are not virtual public charter schools, as defined in  ORS
338.005[, and that have a student population of which: ].
[(A) At least 35 percent of the student population is composed of students from the following  stu-
dent groups: ]
[(i) Economically disadvantaged, as described in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(A); ]
[(ii) Racial or ethnic groups that have historically experienced  academic disparities, as described
in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(B); or ]
[(iii) Students with disabilities, as described in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(C); and ]
[3]
HB 3444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(B) The percentage of the students from student groups identified under subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph is greater than or equal to: ]
[(i) The percentage of all students in the school district who are economically disadvantaged,  if
eligibility is determined based on the percentage of students who are economically disadvantaged; ]
[(ii) The percentage of all students in the school district who are  from racial or ethnic groups that
have historically  experienced academic disparities, if eligibility is determined based on the percentage
of students who are from those racial or ethnic groups; or ]
[(iii) The percentage of all students  in the school district who are disabled, if eligibility is deter-
mined based on the percentage of students who are disabled. ]
(2)(a) Eligible applicants may apply for a grant from  the Student Investment Account to receive
a distribution under ORS 327.190.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 338.155 [ (9)] (12), a public charter school that is not an eligible appli-
cant may not apply for a grant under this section.
(3) Prior to preparing a grant application, an eligible applicant must:
(a) If the eligible applicant is a school district, determine whether the school  district will allow
public charter schools sponsored by, or located within, the school district  to participate in the grant
application and the grant agreement.
(b) If the  eligible applicant is a public charter school, determine whether the public charter
school intends to apply for a grant and provide notice of that intent to the school district in  which
the public charter school is located and to the Department of Education.
(4)(a) If an eligible applicant is a school district and  decides to include public charter schools
in the grant application and grant agreement, the school district must provide all  public charter
schools sponsored by, or located within, the school district the  opportunity to participate in the
grant application and grant agreement.
(b)(A) A public charter school is  not required to participate in the grant application and grant
agreement of a school district.
(B) If a public charter school does not participate  in a grant application and grant agreement
under this subsection:
(i) The ADMw of  the public charter school may not be used in the calculation of the school
district ADMw for grants distributed under ORS 327.195; and
(ii) The public charter school is not entitled to any  grant moneys distributed under ORS 327.195.
(C) If a public charter school participates in a grant application and grant agreement  under this
subsection:
(i) The public charter school and school district shall enter into an agreement  for the distrib-
ution of moneys or the provision of services, including any accountability  measures required of the
public charter school by the school district;
(ii) The ADMw of the  public charter school shall be used in the calculation of the school district
ADMw for grants distributed under ORS 327.195; and
(iii) The public charter school is entitled to any grant moneys or services provided for in  the
agreement entered into under this subparagraph.
(5)(a) For the purpose of preparing a grant application, an eligible applicant must determine:
(A) Which of the allowed uses identified in ORS 327.180 (3) the  eligible applicant will fund with
grant moneys; and
(B) Which of the eligible uses identified  under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph the eligible
applicant will designate to meeting student mental and behavioral health needs.
[4]
HB 3444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) An eligible  applicant shall make the determinations required under paragraph (a) of this
subsection by:
(A) Engaging in strategic planning; and
(B) Considering the recommendations of the Quality Education  Commission established under
ORS 327.500 and recommendations from the advisory groups formed by  the Department of Education
for the purposes of the statewide education plans developed and implemented by the department.
(6)(a) The strategic planning required under subsection (5) of this section must include:
(A) A completed needs assessment, as described in ORS 329.095;
(B) An analysis of the potential academic impact, both for the students of the  eligible applicant
and for student groups  identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b), from the allowed uses that would be funded
by grant moneys; and
(C) The creation of budgets for the allowed uses that would be funded by grant moneys.
(b) The strategic planning required under subsection (5) of this section must take into  consid-
eration:
(A) Input from the community of the eligible applicant, including school employees,  students
from student groups identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b) and parents of those students; and
(B) Data collected by the eligible applicant to enable the eligible applicant  to make equity-based
decisions.
(7) Based on the strategic planning described in subsection (6) of this section, the eligible ap-
plicant shall develop a four-year plan for the use of grant moneys. The plan must be  updated every
two years and must:
(a) Identify which  allowed uses identified in ORS 327.180 (3) will be funded with grant moneys
and which of those uses will be designated to meet student mental and behavioral health needs.
(b) Describe how the allowed uses identified under paragraph (a)  of this subsection will be used
to:
(A) Meet students’ mental and behavioral health needs;
(B) Increase academic achievement for students of the eligible applicant; and
(C) Reduce academic  disparities for student groups identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b) who are
served by the eligible applicant, and identify which of those student groups will  benefit from the
allowed uses that are being funded with grant moneys.
(c) Include the budgets for the allowed uses to be funded with grant moneys.
(d) Be approved by the governing body of the eligible applicant at an open meeting, following:
(A) Provision of the plan at the main office  of the eligible applicant and on the eligible
applicant’s website;
(B) Oral presentation of the  plan by an administrator of the eligible applicant to the governing
body of the eligible applicant; and
(C) Opportunity for the public to comment on the plan at an open meeting.
(e) Be a part of the local district continuous improvement plan described in ORS 329.095, if  the
eligible applicant is a school district.
(8) To apply for a grant, an  eligible applicant must submit an application every two years in a
format and according to timelines prescribed by  the Department of Education. The application must
include:
(a) A completed needs assessment, as described in ORS 329.095;
(b) The plan developed under subsection (7) of this section; and
(c) Budget estimates for each of the allowed uses identified in the plan  developed under sub-
[5]
HB 3444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section (7) of this section that will be funded by grant moneys.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 327.297 is amended to read:
327.297. (1) In addition to those moneys distributed through  the State School Fund, the Depart-
ment of Education shall award grants to school districts, education service  districts, the Youth
Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile  Detention Education Program for activities that
relate to increases in student achievement, including:
(a) Early childhood support including establishing, maintaining or expanding quality
prekindergarten programs;
(b) Class size reduction with an emphasis on the reduction of kindergarten through  grade three
class sizes;
(c) Increases in instructional time including summer  programs and before- and after-school pro-
grams;
(d) Mentoring, teacher retention and professional development;
(e) Remediation, alternative learning and student retention;
(f) Services to at-risk youth;
(g) Programs to improve a  student achievement gap between student groups identified by cul-
ture, poverty, language and race and other student groups;
(h) Vocational education programs;
(i) Literacy programs;
(j) School library programs; and
(k) Other research-based student improvement strategies approved by the State Board  of Edu-
cation.
(2)(a) Each school district, each education service  district, the Youth Corrections Education
Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program may apply to  the Department of Education
for a grant.
(b) The department shall review and  approve applications based on criteria established by the
State Board  of Education. In establishing the criteria, the State Board of Education shall consider
the recommendations of the Quality Education Commission established under ORS 327.500.
(c) The applications shall include the activities to be funded and the goals  of the district or
program for increases in student performance. The  applications shall become part of the local dis-
trict continuous improvement plan described in ORS 329.095.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 338.155 [ (9)] (12) , the  Department of Education may not award a
grant under this section directly to a public charter school.
(b) A school district that receives  a grant for a public charter school  under this section
[may] shall transfer a portion of the grant to [ a] the public charter school based on the  criteria
used to transfer grants to any nonchartered  public school in the school district or based on
the charter of the school or any other agreement between the school district and the public  charter
school.
(c) A public charter school  that receives grant funds under this subsection [ shall] must use
those funds for the activities specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(4)(a) The amount of each grant for a  program or school district = the program’s or school
district’s ADMw ×  (the total amount available for distribution to programs  and school districts as
grants in each fiscal  year ÷  the total ADMw of all programs and school districts that receive a
grant).
(b) The amount of each grant for an education service district =  the education service district’s
[6]
HB 3444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ADMw ×  (the total amount available for distribution to education service  districts as grants in
each fiscal year ÷  the total ADMw of all education service districts that receive a grant).
(c) As used in this subsection, “ADMw” means:
(A) For a school district, the extended weighted average daily  membership as calculated under
ORS 327.013, 338.155 (1) and 338.165 (2);
(B) For  the Youth Corrections Education Program, the extended weighted average daily mem-
bership as calculated under ORS 327.026;
(C) For the Juvenile Detention Education  Program, the extended weighted average daily mem-
bership as calculated under ORS 327.026; and
(D) For an education service  district, the sum of the ADMw of the school districts located
within the territory of the education service district.
(5) Each district or  program shall deposit the grant amounts it receives under this section in a
separate account, and shall apply amounts in that  account to pay for activities described in the
district’s or program’s application.
(6) The State Board of Education may adopt  any rules necessary for the administration of the
grant program.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 327.331 is amended to read:
327.331. (1) In addition to moneys distributed  through the State School Fund, the Department
of Education shall award grants to school districts as provided by subsections (5) and (6) of  this
section for up to 50 percent of student transportation costs described in subsection (2)  of this sec-
tion.
(2) A school district may receive a grant  under this section only for student transportation
costs:
(a) For which the school district does not receive any amount  in distributions from the State
School Fund under ORS 327.013 or any amount related to transit activities.
(b) That are incurred by the school district for  the provision of transportation to students in
grades 9 through 12 on:
(A) A school bus, as defined in ORS 801.460; or
(B) A school activity vehicle, as defined in ORS 801.455.
(3)(a) Each school district may apply to the department for a grant under this section.
(b) The department shall review and  approve applications based on criteria established by the
State Board of Education and shall award  grants as provided by subsections (5) and (6) of this sec-
tion.
(c) The applications must include  the total amount of the student transportation costs described
in subsection (2)  of this section and the purposes for which the student transportation costs were
incurred.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 338.155 [ (9)] (12), the department may not award a grant under  this
section directly to a public charter school.
(b) A school district that receives  a grant for a public charter school  under this section
[may] shall transfer a portion of the grant to [ a] the public charter school based on the  criteria
used to transfer grants to any nonchartered  public school in the school district or based on
the charter of the school or any other agreement between the school district and the public  charter
school.
(c) A public charter school  that receives grant funds under this subsection [ shall] must use
those funds for the student transportation costs described in subsection (2) of this section.
[7]
HB 3444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5)(a) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the amount of each  grant for a school district
= the school district’s ADMw ×  (the total amount available for distribution to school districts  as
grants in each fiscal year ÷  the total ADMw of all school districts that receive a grant).
(b) As used in this subsection, “ADMw” means the extended  weighted average daily membership
as calculated under ORS 327.013, 338.155 (1) and 338.165 (2).
(6) If the total amount of grants applied for under  subsection (3) of this section exceeds the total
amount available for distribution to school districts under this section, the department:
(a) Shall prioritize school districts that did not receive any  public moneys in the previous school
year for student transportation costs described in subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) May otherwise prioritize school districts or prorate distributions  based on rules adopted by
the board.
(7) Each school district shall deposit the grant funds it receives under this section in a separate
account and shall apply amounts in that account to pay for student transportation  costs described
in the school district’s grant application.
(8) The board may adopt any rules necessary for the administration of the grant program.
(9) Nothing in this section affects a school district’s eligibility to receive a  waiver as provided
by ORS 327.043.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 338.145 is amended to read:
338.145. (1) The public charter school shall be responsible for providing transportation  to stu-
dents who reside within the school district and who attend the  public charter school. The public
charter school may negotiate with a school district for  the provision of transportation to students
attending the public charter school.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the school district within which the public
charter school is located shall  be responsible for the transportation of students attending the public
charter  school  pursuant to ORS 327.043 in the same manner as students attending nonchartered
public schools if the student is a  resident of the school district. [ However,] A school district may
not be required to add or extend existing bus routes or other transportation services pursuant  to
this subsection.
(3) Students who attend public charter schools and who reside outside of  the school district may
use existing bus routes and transportation services of the school  district in which a public charter
school is located.
(4)(a) Any transportation costs incurred by a school district  under this section shall be consid-
ered approved transportation costs for purposes of ORS 327.013 in the same manner as  transporta-
tion costs incurred by the school district  for transporting students who attend nonchartered public
schools are considered approved transportation costs for purposes of ORS 327.013.
(b) Any transportation costs incurred by a public charter school for  providing transpor-
tation to students who reside within the school district  and who attend the public charter
school shall be considered approved transportation costs for purposes of ORS 327.013 in the
same manner as transportation costs incurred by a school  district for transporting students
are considered approved transportation costs for purposes of ORS 327.013.  A school district
shall pay the public  charter school the total amount received by the school district for
transportation costs incurred by the public charter school within 10 days after  the school
district receives the amount.
SECTION 7.
The amendments to ORS 327.185, 327.297, 327.311, 338.145 and 338.155 by
sections 1 and 3 to  6 of this 2025 Act apply to State School Fund distributions and other
[8]
HB 3444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
distributions of moneys made to school districts  commencing with the 2025-2026 distrib-
utions.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 327.362 is amended to read:
327.362. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “ADMw” means weighted average daily membership, as calculated under ORS 327.013.
(b) “Eligible public charter school” means a public charter school that is not a virtual public
charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005, and that has a student population of which at least  65
percent of the total  student population is composed of students from the following combined student
groups:
(A) Racial or ethnic groups that have historically experienced  academic disparities, as described
in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(B); and
(B) Students with disabilities, as described in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(C).
(2) In addition to those moneys distributed through the State School Fund, the Department of
Education shall award  grants under this section to eligible public charter schools from the State-
wide Education Initiatives Account.
(3) The amount of a grant awarded to an eligible public charter school under this section = the
public charter school’s ADMw ×  the difference between:
(a) The amount of the General Purpose Grant per ADMw  for the school district that has
contractually established payment for the provision of educational services  to the public charter
school’s students under ORS 338.155 [ (2) or (3) ]; and
(b) The amount of the General Purpose Grant  per ADMw that the public charter school receives
under a contract for the provision of educational services to the  public charter school’s students
under ORS 338.155 [ (2) or (3) ].
(4) The purpose of grants distributed under this section shall be to increase academic achieve-
ment, including reducing academic disparities, for:
(a) Students from racial or ethnic groups that have historically experienced academic disparities,
as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education; and
(b) Students with disabilities.
(5) Any eligible  public charter school may apply for and receive a grant as provided by this
section. A grant application must:
(a) Describe how grant moneys will be used to advance  the purpose described in subsection (4)
of this section.
(b) Specify the supports that will be:
(A) Provided to students with a disability; or
(B) Used to  enhance special education and related services that are provided by a school district
under ORS 338.165 to the students of the public charter school.
(c) Identify any applicable longitudinal performance growth targets for the  public charter school
that have been established:
(A) Under contract between the public charter school and the sponsor of  the public charter
school; or
(B) By the public charter school or the school district in which the  public charter school is lo-
cated for purposes of grants from the Student Investment Account, as provided by ORS 327.190.
(d) Be submitted based on the timelines and forms prescribed by the department.
(6)(a) If  the department determines that a grant application complies with the requirements
prescribed under this section,  the department shall enter into a grant agreement with the eligible
[9]
HB 3444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
public charter school.
(b) A grant agreement must include longitudinal performance  growth targets for the public
charter school. If the grant application identified longitudinal performance growth targets, those
targets shall be included  in the grant agreement. If the grant application did not identify longitudi-
nal performance growth targets, the public charter school  shall collaborate with the department to
develop longitudinal performance growth targets. Longitudinal performance growth targets must:
(A) Be based on data available for longitudinal analysis; and
(B) Use the following applicable metrics:
(i) Third-grade reading proficiency rates, as defined in ORS 327.190;
(ii) Regular attendance rates, as defined in ORS 327.190; and
(iii) Any  other metrics identified by the department in collaboration with the public charter
school.
(7) After the department and the public charter school have entered into a grant agreement,  the
department shall award a grant to the  public charter school in the amount calculated under sub-
section (3) of this section. A grant recipient shall deposit grant moneys  received under this section
into a separate account and shall apply the amounts in that account as provided by the grant
agreement.
(8)(a) Each year, each grant recipient must submit to the department a description of:
(A) How grant moneys received under this section were used to advance  the purpose described
in subsection (4) of this section and to  meet performance growth targets in the grant agreement; and
(B) Progress made by  the grant recipient toward meeting the performance growth targets in the
grant agreement.
(b) A grant recipient shall provide the  information required under this subsection based on the
timelines and forms prescribed by  the department. To the greatest extent practicable, the depart-
ment shall accept the information described in this subsection in the manner that  it is made avail-
able by a public charter school to the sponsor of the public charter school.
(9) To  the greatest extent practicable, any requirements prescribed by the department or the
board under this section in relation to an application, a grant agreement or the submission of in-
formation under subsection (8) of this section shall reduce any redundancies between  a grant
awarded under this section and a grant awarded from the  Student Investment Account. Reduction
in redundancies includes accepting for the purposes of grants awarded under  this section any ap-
plicable forms or information submitted by the  public charter school to the department or a school
district for the purposes of a grant awarded from the Student Investment Account.
(10) A  public charter school and a school district may not consider moneys received by the
public charter school under this section when establishing payment for the  provision of educational
services to the public charter school’s students under ORS 338.155 [ (2) or (3) ].
(11) Prior  to February 1 of each year, the department shall submit to the appropriate interim
legislative committees a  report related to the grants awarded under this section. The report must
describe:
(a) The public  charter schools that applied for the grants and the public charter schools that
received the grants;
(b) The  longitudinal performance growth targets included in grant agreements, as provided by
subsection (6)(b) of this section; and
(c) Progress made toward meeting longitudinal performance growth targets, as reported under
subsection (8)(a) of this section.
[10]
HB 3444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
(12) The State Board of Education shall adopt  any rules necessary for the distribution of grants
under this section.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 340.073 is amended to read:
340.073. (1) A  public charter school may elect to participate in the Expanded Options Program
by amending its charter under ORS 338.065.
(2) Actual instructional costs  associated with participating eligible students shall be negotiated
and paid directly to the eligible post-secondary institution by the public charter school.
(3) The participating public charter school may not require funding from the sponsor  of the
school for payment of Expanded Options  Program costs that is in addition to funding that already
has been contractually established pursuant to ORS 338.155 [ (2)(b) or (3)(b) ] or 338.165 [ (2)(b)] for
students enrolled in grades 9 through 12 .
SECTION 10. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[11]