Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 366.483 is amended to read:
366.483. (1) In accordance with ORS 374.329, the Department of Transportation shall transfer
jurisdiction of the following state highways to the following cities:
(a) Pacific Highway West, State Highway 99, from the department to the City of Eugene.  The
department shall transfer the following two portions:
(A) The portion beginning where  the highway intersects with the Beltline Highway and ending
where the highway intersects with Washington Street, but excluding the bridge at milepost 121.42.
(B) The portion beginning where the  highway intersects with Walnut Street and ending where
the highway intersects with Interstate 5, but excluding the bridge at milepost 126.02.
(b) Springfield Highway, State Highway 228 to the City of Springfield.
(c) Hall Boulevard, State Highway 141 to the City of Tigard.
(d) Hood River Highway, Oregon Route 281 to the City of Hood River. The department
shall transfer  the portion beginning where the highway intersects with Pacific Avenue and
ending where the highway intersects with Oak Street.
(2) Notwithstanding section 71d (4), chapter 750, Oregon Laws  2017, the department shall use
the funds described in section 71d, chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2017, for the transfer  of Powell Bou-
levard to upgrade the  portion of Southeast Powell Boulevard beginning where the highway inter-
sects with Interstate 205 and ending where the  highway intersects with the city limits. After the
upgrades are completed, in accordance with ORS 374.329, the department shall transfer  jurisdiction
of the upgraded portion to the City of Portland. The department may upgrade and  transfer portions
of the highway in phases.
(3) In accordance with ORS 366.290:
(a) The department shall  transfer jurisdiction of the portion of Territorial Highway, State
Highway 200, that is located within Lane County from the department to the county.  The depart-
ment may transfer portions of the highway in phases. The department shall retain  jurisdiction of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2675
HB 2161
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
bridges on Territorial Highway located at milepoints 4.59, 7.07,  17.92, 18.72, 18.98, 19.28 and 25.49.
The department shall transfer the jurisdiction of the bridges after the bridges are replaced.
(b) The department shall transfer  jurisdiction of the portion of the Springfield-Creswell Highway,
State Highway 222, beginning where it intersects with Jasper-Lowell Road and ending  where it
intersects with Emerald Parkway to Lane County. The  department shall retain jurisdiction of
bridges on Springfield-Creswell Highway located at mileposts 5.20, 5.41, 5.64 and 13.36.  The depart-
ment shall transfer the jurisdiction of a bridge after the bridge is replaced.
(c) Lane County shall  transfer jurisdiction of the portion of Delta Highway beginning where the
highway intersects with Interstate 105 and  ending where the highway intersects with the Randy
Pape Beltline from the county to the department.
(d) Multnomah County and Washington  County shall transfer jurisdiction of the portion of
Cornelius Pass Road beginning where the highway intersects with U.S. Highway 30 and ending
where the highway intersects with U.S. Highway 26 from the counties to the department.  The
counties may transfer portions of the highway in phases.
[2]