Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 311.670 is amended to read:
311.670. (1) Property is not eligible for tax deferral under ORS 311.666 to 311.701 unless,  at the
time a claim is filed and during the period for which deferral is claimed, the  property meets the
requirements of this section.
(2)(a) The property for which the claim is filed must have been the homestead  of the individual
or individuals who file the claim for deferral for at least [ five] three years preceding April 15 of  the
year in which the claim is filed.
(b) The [ five-year] three-year requirement under paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply
to a homestead that meets all  other requirements of this section, if the individual or individuals
filing the claim for deferral:
(A) Are required to be absent from the homestead by reason of health;
(B)(i) Moved to the homestead for which the claim is filed from a homestead that  was granted
deferral under ORS 311.666 to 311.701 and was of greater  real market value than the homestead for
which the claim is filed;
(ii) Sell the prior homestead  within one year of purchasing the homestead for which the claim
is filed;
(iii) Satisfy any lien created under ORS 311.673 or  311.679 and attached to the prior homestead;
and
(iv) Provide a written attestation that the individual or individuals incurred debt  for not more
than 80 percent of the purchase price of the homestead for which the claim is filed; or
(C) Are a surviving spouse or disabled heir claiming continuation  of deferral under ORS 311.688.
(3) The individual claiming the deferral, individually or jointly, must own the fee simple  estate
under a recorded instrument of sale, or two or more individuals together  must own the fee simple
estate with rights of survivorship under a recorded instrument of sale  if all owners live in the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 304
HB 2340
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
property and if all owners apply for the deferral jointly.
(4)(a) The homestead must be insured for fire and other casualty.
(b) If  the homestead meets all other requirements of this section and is insurable for fire and
other casualty but not insured, the Department of Revenue may  purchase insurance for the home-
stead and add the cost of the insurance coverage to a lien created under ORS 311.679.
(5) There may be no prohibition to the deferral of property  taxes contained in any provision of
federal law, rule or regulation  applicable to a mortgage, trust deed, land sale contract or conditional
sale contract for which the homestead is security.
(6) A homestead is not eligible  for deferral under ORS 311.666 to 311.701 unless the real market
value of the homestead entered on the certified assessment and tax roll for  the property tax year
immediately preceding  the property tax year for which the taxes will be deferred is less than the
greater of $250,000 or:
(a) 100 percent of county median RMV if, as  of April 15 of the year in which a claim is filed,
the taxpayers have continuously owned and occupied the homestead less than seven years.
(b) 110 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of  the year in which a claim is filed,
the taxpayers have continuously  owned and occupied the homestead at least seven years but less
than nine years.
(c) 120 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15  of the year in which a claim is filed,
the taxpayers have  continuously owned and occupied the homestead at least nine years but less than
11 years.
(d) 130 percent of county median RMV if, as  of April 15 of the year in which a claim is filed,
the taxpayers have continuously owned and occupied the homestead at least 11 years but  less than
13 years.
(e) 140 percent of county median RMV if, as of  April 15 of the year in which a claim is filed,
the taxpayers have continuously owned and occupied the homestead at least 13 years but  less than
15 years.
(f) 150 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of the year in which a claim  is filed, the
taxpayers  have  continuously owned and occupied the homestead at least 15 years but less than 17
years.
(g) 160 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of  the year in which a claim is filed,
the taxpayers have  continuously owned and occupied the homestead at least 17 years but less than
19 years.
(h) 170 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of the  year in which a claim is filed,
the taxpayers have  continuously owned and occupied the homestead at least 19 years but less than
21 years.
(i) 200 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of the year in which a claim  is filed, the
taxpayers have continuously owned and occupied the homestead at least 21 years but less than  23
years.
(j) 225 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of the year in which a claim  is filed, the
taxpayers  have  continuously owned and occupied the homestead at least 23 years but less than 25
years.
(k) 250 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of the  year in which a claim is filed,
the taxpayers have continuously owned and occupied the homestead for 25 years or more.
(7)(a) For each tax year beginning on or after July  1, 2022, the Department of Revenue shall
recompute the $250,000 minimum cap on allowable  real market value provided under subsection (6)
[2]
HB 2340
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
of this section as follows:
(A) Divide the average  Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region, for the
first six months of the current  calendar year by the average Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers, West Region, for the first six months of 2021.
(B) Recompute the  minimum cap on allowable real market value by multiplying $250,000 by the
appropriate indexing factor determined under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(b) Any change in the minimum cap on allowable real market value  determined under paragraph
(a) of this subsection shall be rounded to the nearest multiple of $500.
(8) For purposes of subsection (6) of this section, a surviving spouse  or disabled heir who is el-
igible to claim continuation of deferral under  ORS 311.688 is considered to have owned and occupied
the homestead from the date on which the deceased individual or individuals who filed the claim for
deferral first owned and occupied the homestead.
SECTION 2.
The amendments  to ORS 311.670 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to
property tax years beginning on or after July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]