Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Parks and Recreation Department shall study:
(a) The availability of state campgrounds within 25 miles of the Oregon  coast, including
spaces for camping or recreational vehicles.
(b) The feasibility  of expanding the size of existing state campgrounds within 25 miles of
the Oregon coast, including spaces for camping or recreational vehicles.
(c) The feasibility of establishing  new state campgrounds within 25 miles of the Oregon
coast, including spaces for camping or recreational vehicles.
(2) The department shall submit  a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to state parks no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1178