Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the  amount of $_______, which may be expended for participation by the
background check unit of the  department in the Rap Back program, as defined in ORS
181A.205.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount of  $_______, which may be expended for subsidizing the costs
to employees of criminal records checks.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for implementing the Rap
Back program, as defined in ORS 181A.205.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1583