Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 469.590 to
469.619.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community energy resilience” means the ability of a specific community  to maintain
the availability of energy needed to support the provision of energy-dependent critical  public
services to the community  following nonroutine disruptions of severe impact or duration to
the state’s broader energy systems.
(b) “Small modular reactor” means an advanced nuclear reactor:
(A) With a nameplate capacity of 300 electrical megawatts or less;
(B) That is made up of components that are  factory fabricated and transported to lo-
cation for on-site assembly; and
(C) That may be constructed and operated in combination with similar reactors  at a
single site.
(c) “Small modular reactor energy facility” means an energy facility that  produces power
from using one or more small modular reactors at a single site.
(2) The Energy Facility Siting Council may issue a site certificate  for a small modular
reactor energy facility demonstration project located  within the geographical area subject to
the jurisdiction of Umatilla County if the council finds that:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1725
HB 2410
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The demonstration  project will utilize microgrid enabling technologies, including
microgrid controllers and any other related technologies needed to electrically isolate  the
demonstration project from the electric grid, so that the demonstration project is capable
of operating independently from the electric grid; and
(b) Use  of microgrid enabling technologies by the demonstration project will support
community energy resilience.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding the definition of a “waste disposal facility” under  ORS 469.300, no
high-level radioactive waste should be stored at the site of  the demonstration project after
termination of the operating license  issued to the demonstration project by the United States
Nuclear Regulatory Commission.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a person  operating the demon-
stration project under a license issued by the United States Nuclear Regulatory  Commission
shall remain responsible for proper temporary storage of high-level  radioactive materials at
the site of the demonstration  project after termination of the license and until such mate-
rials are removed from the site for consolidated interim storage or permanent storage.
(c) The State Department of Energy and the operators of the  demonstration project shall
pursue agreements with the United States Department of Energy and  the United States
Nuclear Regulatory Commission to fulfill the provisions of this subsection.
(4) ORS 469.594, 469.595, 469.597, 469.599 and 469.601 do not  apply to a small modular re-
actor demonstration project described in this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used  in this section, “demonstration project” and “small modular re-
actor energy facility demonstration project” mean a small modular reactor  energy facility
demonstration project in Umatilla County as described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The State Department of Energy, in cooperation with the Department of  Land Con-
servation and Development, the Public Utility Commission and any other  interested state
agency, shall prepare a report that:
(a) Identifies existing statutes or rules that may need to be modified, or new rules that
may need to be adopted, to enable the Energy Facility Siting Council to:
(A) Establish siting standards and effectively undertake a  siting process for a small
modular reactor energy facility demonstration project; and
(B) Provide state regulatory oversight for a demonstration project and  for the temporary
storage of high-level radioactive waste at the site of a demonstration project,  that is con-
sistent with federal law;
(b) Describes the anticipated  application of state and local land use requirements to the
siting of a demonstration project,  and identifies any potential gaps, opportunities for clarifi-
cations or modifications to state or local land use requirements  necessary to clarify the ap-
plication of state and local land use requirements to a demonstration project; and
(c) Identifies existing statutes applicable to the Public  Utility Commission and rules and
orders of the Public Utility Commission that may be applicable to a demonstration project.
(3) The State  Department of Energy shall submit the report required by this section, in
the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the interim  committees or committees of the Leg-
islative Assembly  related to energy no later than one year after the effective date of this 2025
Act.
(4) The report required by this section may include recommendations for legislation.
(5) The State Department of Energy may contract with third  parties for assistance in
[2]
HB 2410
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
performing the department’s duties under this section.
(6) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed, to the ex-
tent permitted by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish  such information and advice to
the State Department of Energy as the  department considers necessary to perform the
department’s duties under this section.
(7) The State Department  of Energy may accept, for purposes of completing the report
required by this section, contributions of moneys  and assistance from the United States
government or its agencies or from any other  source, public or private, and agree to condi-
tions placed on the moneys not inconsistent with the duties described in this section.
SECTION 4.
The Umatilla County SMR Demonstration Project Report Fund is established
in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the
Umatilla County SMR Demonstration Project  Report Fund shall be credited to the fund. All
moneys in the Umatilla County SMR  Demonstration Project Report Fund are continuously
appropriated to the State Department of Energy for the purposes of  carrying out the duties
described in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) Sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
(2) Any moneys remaining in  the Umatilla County SMR Demonstration Project Report
Fund on January 2, 2027, that are  unexpended, unobligated and not subject to any conditions
shall revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 6. (1) This 2025 Act shall be submitted to the people  of Umatilla County for
their approval or rejection at the next regular general election held throughout this state.
(2) The financial estimate committee created under ORS 250.125 shall prepare estimates
for the measure as described and pursuant to the  procedures established under ORS 250.125
and 250.127.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act takes effect upon  its approval by a majority of the registered
electors of Umatilla County  voting on the ballot measure presented under section 6 of this
2025 Act.
[3]