Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Local Markets Small Business Capital Loan Program is  hereby es-
tablished for the purpose of making interest-only loans  from the Local Markets Small Busi-
ness Capital Loan Fund established under section 2 of this 2025 Act to businesses  employing
not more than 50 employees.
(2)(a) A business described in subsection (1) of this section may submit a  loan application
to the Oregon Business Development Department in  the manner prescribed by the depart-
ment by rule and containing or accompanied by such  information and documentation as the
department requires.
(b) The department may charge fees for submission of an application under this  section
and, if the application is approved, for processing and administering a loan agreement en-
tered into pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. Fees collected must be  deposited in the
Local Markets Small Business Capital Loan Fund and may be used solely to  pay the admin-
istrative costs  and expenses of the department for administering the program established
under this section and the fund established under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(3)(a) Upon receipt of an application submitted under subsection (2) of  this section, the
department shall determine the applicant’s eligibility for a loan under this section.
(b) The department may approve an  application only if, after investigation, the depart-
ment finds that:
(A) The applicant operates a business with 50 or fewer employees;
(B) The applicant has  reasonably committed to meet the employment requirements under
subsection (5) of this section;
(C) The applicant has a reasonable prospect of making all required payments; and
(D) There is or  will be a sufficient amount of moneys in the Local Markets Small Busi-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2127
HB 2862
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ness Capital Loan Fund to make a loan to the applicant.
(c) Employees to be  hired pursuant to a loan agreement executed under this section may
not be counted toward the 50-employee limit on eligibility for a loan.
(4) If the department approves  an application for a loan under this section, the depart-
ment and the applicant shall enter into a loan agreement that, at a minimum:
(a) Includes a covenant that the business will use the loan proceeds solely to meet  the
employment requirements under subsection (5)  of this section or to pay business operating
expenses connected with those requirements.
(b) Includes a plan for repayment of the loan proceeds, which must  include any terms
of repayment the  department designates as mandatory. The department shall designate as
mandatory, at a minimum,  the term of the loan, the collateral required to secure the re-
payment of the loan, the rate of interest to be charged on the principal amount  of the loan,
the schedule of payments and the manner of determining when payments are delinquent.
(c) Provides that, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the amount of any
payment shall include only the amount  of interest due for the payment period and no amount
of the amortized principal.
(5) The Director of the Oregon  Business Development Department, or the director’s
designee, may approve loans only in the following amounts:
(a) $10,000 for a binding commitment by the applicant to hire and retain at least  one
full-time employee for a period  of not less than two years after the date on which the loan
proceeds are paid to the applicant.
(b) $20,000 for a binding commitment by the applicant to hire and retain at least two
full-time employees for a period of  not less than two years after the date on which the loan
proceeds are paid to the applicant.
(c) $30,000 for a binding commitment by the applicant to hire and retain  at least three
full-time employees for a period of  not less than two years after the date on which the loan
proceeds are paid to the applicant.
(6)(a) If a business that receives a loan under this section meets  the employment and
retention requirements  under subsection (5) of this section for the entire minimum two-year
period, the principal amount of  the loan shall be forgiven and the remaining interest-only
payments shall continue to the end of the term of the loan agreed to in the loan contract.
(b)(A) If at any time during  the minimum two-year period required under subsection (5)
of this section, a loan recipient  fails to meet the employment and retention requirements
under subsection (5) of this section,  all payments of amortized principal that, but for the
provisions of subsection  (4)(c) of this section, would have been payable by the business for
the period from the date of execution of the loan agreement up to  and including the date of
the most recent loan payment, plus a penalty in an amount equal to 10 percent of the original
principal amount of the loan, shall become due immediately and each following loan payment
for the remaining term  of the loan shall include an amount for amortization of the remaining
principal due on the loan.
(B) Subparagraph (A) of this paragraph does not apply if the  business cures the failure
within three weeks after the date on which the  failure began. The term of the loan shall be
extended by the number of days from the date of failure through the  date immediately pre-
ceding the date of cure.
(7) The department, after consulting with a representative of  an association that re-
[2]
HB 2862
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
presents the banking industry in this state, may adopt  rules to implement the provisions of
this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Local Markets Small  Business Capital Loan Fund is established in
the State Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. All moneys in the Local
Markets Small Business Capital  Loan Fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon
Business Development Department for the following purposes:
(a) Making loans under the Local Markets  Small Business Capital Loan Program estab-
lished under section 1 of this 2025 Act; and
(b) Reimbursing the  department for the costs and expenses actually incurred by the de-
partment in administering the loan program and the fund.
(2) The Local Markets Small Business Capital Loan Fund consists of:
(a) Fees collected by the department under section 1 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Loan payments, including  interest, principal and penalties, required under section 1
of this 2025 Act;
(c) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(d) Income earned on moneys in the fund;
(e) Moneys transferred to the fund from the  federal government, other state agencies
or local governments; and
(f) Any gifts or donations made to the State of Oregon for deposit in the fund.
SECTION 3.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $  for the
purposes of administering and implementing the Local Markets Small Business Capital  Loan
Program established under section 1 of this 2025  Act and the Local Markets Small Business
Capital Loan Fund established under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[3]