Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 279C.533 is amended to read:
279C.533. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship agreement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(d) “Apprenticeship  training program” means the total system of apprenticeship that a particular
local joint committee, as defined in ORS  660.010, operates, including the local joint committee’s
registered standards and all other terms and conditions for qualifying, recruiting,  selecting, em-
ploying and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(e) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(f)(A) “Qualifying agency” means:
[(A)] (i) A state contracting agency; [ and]
[(B)] (ii) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission[ ,];
(iii) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 ; [ and]
(iv) A community college district, as defined in ORS 341.005[ ,];
(v) A school district, as defined in ORS 330.003;
(vi) An education service district, as defined in ORS 334.003; and
(vii) A public charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005, other than a virtual public char-
ter school, as defined in ORS 338.005.
(B) A commission, university, school or district listed in subparagraph (A)  of this para-
graph is a qualifying agency only  to the extent that the commission, [ the] university , school  or
[the] district uses funds paid directly or indirectly from the State  Treasury for all or a portion of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 846
HB 3881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
construction costs of a public improvement.
(g) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(h) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(2)(a) A qualifying agency  shall provide in each public improvement contract for which the
contract price exceeds $3 million that the contractor shall:
[(a)] (A)  Employ apprentices to perform 12 percent or more of the work hours that  workers in
apprenticeable occupations perform for each contract on the public improvement; and
[(b)] (B)  Require in each subcontract with a contract  price of $750,000 or more that the sub-
contractor  employ  apprentices to perform 12 percent or more of the work hours that workers in
apprenticeable occupations perform on the subcontract.
(b) A qualifying agency shall require as part of the qualifying agency’s determination of
a contractor’s responsibility  under ORS 279C.375 that the contractor demonstrate a history
during the three years before receiving an award of the public improvement contract de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection or, if the contractor is a new business, during as
much of the previous three years for which the contractor has an available history,  of ma-
terial compliance with federal and state laws that specify:
(A) Wage rates and hours of work,  including requirements to pay a prevailing rate of
wage; and
(B) Occupational safety and health requirements.
(3) A contractor or subcontractor shall pay an apprentice for work on the public improvement
at the hourly rate to which the apprentice is entitled under  an apprenticeship agreement or that the
apprenticeship training program specifies.
(4)(a) A qualifying agency shall require as  a material provision of a public improvement contract
that the contractor establish and implement a plan for outreach to and recruitment  and retention
of women, minority individuals and veterans to perform work under the public  improvement con-
tract, with an  aspirational target of having individuals in one or more of these groups to compose
at least 15 percent of the total number  of workers who perform work under the public improvement
contract. A contractor’s plan for outreach, recruitment and retention must  require the contractor
to, at a minimum:
(A) Advertise employment opportunities available under the  public improvement contract in
general circulation publications, trade association publications and publications  that serve an audi-
ence or readership that consists primarily of minority individuals, women or veterans;
(B) Follow up on the contractor’s initial solicitations of interest by contacting minority individ-
uals, women or veterans who expressed interest in or responded  to the initial solicitation to deter-
mine with certainty whether the minority individual, woman or  veteran is interested in the
opportunities described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;
(C) Provide  all persons who express continued interest with adequate information about hiring
qualifications, pay rates, benefits, the expected  duration of employment, work hours and other con-
ditions of employment under the public improvement contract;
(D) Make  efforts to encourage minority individuals, women and veterans to seek employment
under the public improvement contract that the contractor may  reasonably expect will produce a
level of participation that meets the aspirational target described in this paragraph; and
(E) Use the services of minority community  organizations, local, state, federal and tribal gov-
ernments or other organizations that have recruiting, training and otherwise assisting  minority in-
dividuals, women and veterans as  the organization’s primary purpose or mission to assist the
[2]
HB 3881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
contractor with outreach, recruitment and retention.
(b) A contractor shall demonstrate adequate good faith efforts to comply with the  requirements
of paragraph (a) (A) to (E)  of this subsection.
(c) A contractor shall require any subcontractor with which the contractor has  a subcontract
with a contract price of $750,000 or more to  comply with the requirements set forth for the con-
tractor in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5)(a) A contractor shall report the extent of the contractor’s  compliance with this section and
the compliance of a subcontractor  described in subsection (4)(c) of this section to the qualifying
agency on forms, in a format and with contents the Commissioner  of the Bureau of Labor and In-
dustries specifies by rule, and at regular intervals that the qualifying agency specifies  in the public
improvement contract.
(b) A qualifying agency shall require the contractor to submit  for each contract and subcontract
the report described in paragraph (a) of this subsection as part of, or as a  supplement to, certified
statements required under ORS 279C.845, shall require [ contractors] the  contractor  to preserve the
reports as provided for certified statements in ORS 279C.845 (5), may  disclose the reports as pro-
vided in ORS 279C.845 (6) and may enforce a failure to submit a report as provided  in ORS 279C.845
(7). The reports described in this subsection must include, at a minimum, for each  contract or sub-
contract related to the public improvement contract:
(A) The name of or other identification for the public improvement project;
(B) The city or county in which the public improvement project is located;
(C) A detailed accounting of:
(i) The total number of hours of work that workers performed under each contract  and subcon-
tract;
(ii) The total number of hours of work that workers  performed in each apprenticeable trade or
craft for each contract and subcontract on the public improvement;
(iii) The total number of hours  of work that apprentices performed for each contract and sub-
contract on the public improvement; and
(iv) The total number of hours of work that apprentices in  each trade or craft performed for
each contract and subcontract on the public improvement; and
(D) The total number of workers who performed construction work and the total  numbers of
minority individuals, women and  veterans who performed construction work under the public im-
provement contract. A report under this subparagraph  must separately list for each worker the
worker’s race, ethnicity, gender, veteran status and, as applicable, trade, craft or job category.  The
Commissioner of the Bureau  of Labor and Industries by rule may specify a method for identifying,
collecting and reporting the information  required under this subparagraph, which may consist of
methods the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission prescribes in regulations the
United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission adopts under Title VII of  the Civil Rights
Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. 2000e et seq.
(6) At least 30 days before making any final payment to a contractor under  a public improve-
ment contract, a  qualifying agency shall determine the extent of the contractor’s compliance with
the requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section. The qualifying agency shall base  the
determination on the ratio between the actual number of work hours that workers  in apprenticeable
occupations performed for each contract and subcontract on the public  improvement and the actual
number of work hours that apprentices performed for each contract and subcontract on the  public
improvement, as shown in reports  the qualifying agency receives under subsection (5) of this section.
[3]
HB 3881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7)(a) Not later than 30 days after making a final payment to a contractor under a public  im-
provement contract, a qualifying agency shall  report to the Bureau of Labor and Industries the in-
formation the qualifying agency collected from the contractor under subsection  (5) of this section,
together with the qualifying agency’s determination under subsection (6) of  this section as to
whether the contractor and any subcontractor met the requirements  for employing and paying ap-
prentices set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this  section. The bureau may specify the form and
contents of a report under  this paragraph and may require the qualifying agency to also report ag-
gregated data.
(b) Not later than  January 2 of each odd-numbered year, the bureau shall report to a committee
of the Legislative Assembly that considers matters related to apprenticeship and apprenticeship
utilization on public improvement contracts the following data concerning each public  improvement
contract and subcontract that each qualifying agency completed within the previous two years:
(A) The total number  of hours of work that workers performed for each contract or subcontract
on all public improvement projects;
(B) The  total number of hours of work that workers performed in each apprenticeable trade and
craft for each contract and subcontract on all public improvement projects;
(C) The total number  of hours of work that apprentices performed for each contract and sub-
contract on all public improvement projects;
(D) The total number of hours of work that apprentices in each apprenticeable trade  or craft
performed for each contract and subcontract on all public improvement projects;
(E) The total number of minority individuals, women and veterans who performed work on the
public improvement projects; and
(F) Any additional information the bureau determines is necessary to carry out the  purposes of
this section.
(8)(a) A  qualifying agency shall reduce the payment due under a public improvement contract
to a contractor that does not meet the requirements set forth under subsections (2) and (3) of  this
section. The amount of the  reduction must be equivalent to the difference between the total number
of work  hours that apprentices in apprenticeable occupations should have performed on the public
improvement project to meet the requirement set forth in subsection (2) of this section less  the total
number of work hours that apprentices in apprenticeable occupations  actually performed on the
public improvement project, multiplied by $15 per hour.
(b) The qualifying agency shall pay the amount of the reduction  under paragraph (a) of this
subsection to the State Treasury to the credit of the Bureau of Labor and Industries Account es-
tablished under ORS 651.160. The bureau shall use the amount deposited to fund expansions of ap-
prenticeship training programs, with a focus on  programs in areas of this state where contractors
did not meet the targets specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(c) A contractor, in a subcontract related to the contractor’s public improvement  contract, may
provide to the same extent described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection for a reduction in the
amount due to the subcontractor if the subcontractor fails to perform the  subcontract in accordance
with the contractor’s requirements under subsections  (2) and (3) of this section. The contractor may
also provide in the contract for a reduction in the amount due a subcontractor that fails to  comply
with subsection (4)(c) of this section.
(9) This section does not apply to :
(a) A public contract that a qualifying agency enters into under ORS 279B.080[ .]; or
(b) A contractor that enters into a project labor agreement, as defined in 48 C.F.R.
[4]
HB 3881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
52.222-34, as in effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act, in connection  with, and as a
condition of receiving an award of, a public improvement contract for  a school district, as
defined in ORS 330.003, an education service district, as defined in ORS  334.003, or a public
charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005, other than a virtual public charter school, as de-
fined in ORS 338.005.
SECTION 2.
 ORS  279C.533, as amended by section 2, chapter 504, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
279C.533. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship agreement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(d) “Apprenticeship  training program” means the total system of apprenticeship that a particular
local joint committee, as defined in ORS  660.010, operates, including the local joint committee’s
registered standards and all other terms and conditions for qualifying, recruiting,  selecting, em-
ploying and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(e) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(f)(A) “Qualifying agency” means:
[(A)] (i) A state contracting agency; [ and]
[(B)] (ii) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission[ ,];
(iii) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 ; [ and]
(iv) A community college district, as defined in ORS 341.005[ ,];
(v) A school district, as defined in ORS 330.003;
(vi) An education service district, as defined in ORS 334.003; and
(vii) A public charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005, other than a virtual public char-
ter school, as defined in ORS 338.005.
(B) A commission, university, school or district listed in subparagraph (A)  of this para-
graph is a qualifying agency only  to the extent that the commission, [ the] university , school  or
[the] district uses funds paid directly or indirectly from the State  Treasury for all or a portion of the
construction costs of a public improvement.
(g) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(h) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(2)(a) A qualifying agency  shall provide in each public improvement contract for which the
contract price exceeds $3 million that the contractor shall:
[(a)] (A)  Employ apprentices to perform 15 percent or more of the work hours that  workers in
apprenticeable occupations perform for each contract on the public improvement; and
[(b)] (B)  Require in each subcontract with a contract  price of $750,000 or more that the sub-
contractor  employ  apprentices to perform 15 percent or more of the work hours that workers in
apprenticeable occupations perform on the subcontract.
(b) A qualifying agency shall require as part of the qualifying agency’s determination of
a contractor’s responsibility  under ORS 279C.375 that the contractor demonstrate a history
during the three years before receiving an award of the public improvement contract de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection or, if the contractor is a new business, during as
much of the previous three years for which the contractor has an available history,  of ma-
terial compliance with federal and state laws that specify:
(A) Wage rates and hours of work,  including requirements to pay a prevailing rate of
[5]
HB 3881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
wage; and
(B) Occupational safety and health requirements.
(3) A contractor or subcontractor shall pay an apprentice for work on the public improvement
at the hourly rate to which the apprentice is entitled under  an apprenticeship agreement or that the
apprenticeship training program specifies.
(4)(a) A qualifying agency shall require as  a material provision of a public improvement contract
that the contractor establish and implement a plan for outreach to and recruitment  and retention
of women, minority individuals and veterans to perform work under the public  improvement con-
tract, with an  aspirational target of having individuals in one or more of these groups to compose
at least 15 percent of the total number  of workers who perform work under the public improvement
contract. A contractor’s plan for outreach, recruitment and retention must  require the contractor
to, at a minimum:
(A) Advertise employment opportunities available under the  public improvement contract in
general circulation publications, trade association publications and publications  that serve an audi-
ence or readership that consists primarily of minority individuals, women or veterans;
(B) Follow up on the contractor’s initial solicitations of interest by contacting minority individ-
uals, women or veterans who expressed interest in or responded  to the initial solicitation to deter-
mine with certainty whether the minority individual, woman or  veteran is interested in the
opportunities described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;
(C) Provide  all persons who express continued interest with adequate information about hiring
qualifications, pay rates, benefits, the expected  duration of employment, work hours and other con-
ditions of employment under the public improvement contract;
(D) Make  efforts to encourage minority individuals, women and veterans to seek employment
under the public improvement contract that the contractor may  reasonably expect will produce a
level of participation that meets the aspirational target described in this paragraph; and
(E) Use the services of minority community  organizations, local, state, federal and tribal gov-
ernments or other organizations that have recruiting, training and otherwise assisting  minority in-
dividuals, women and veterans as  the organization’s primary purpose or mission to assist the
contractor with outreach, recruitment and retention.
(b) A contractor shall demonstrate adequate good faith efforts to comply with the  requirements
of paragraph (a) (A) to (E)  of this subsection.
(c) A contractor shall require any subcontractor with which the contractor has  a subcontract
with a contract price of $750,000 or more to  comply with the requirements set forth for the con-
tractor in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5)(a) A contractor shall report the extent of the contractor’s  compliance with this section and
the compliance of a subcontractor  described in subsection (4)(c) of this section to the qualifying
agency on forms, in a format and with contents the Commissioner  of the Bureau of Labor and In-
dustries specifies by rule, and at regular intervals that the qualifying agency specifies  in the public
improvement contract.
(b) A qualifying agency shall require the contractor to submit  for each contract and subcontract
the report described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection as part of, or as a supplement to, certified
statements required under ORS 279C.845, shall require [ contractors] the  contractor  to preserve the
reports as provided for certified statements  in ORS 279C.845 (5), may disclose the reports as pro-
vided in ORS 279C.845 (6) and may enforce a failure to submit a report as provided  in ORS 279C.845
(7). The reports described  in this subsection must include, at a minimum, for each contract or sub-
[6]
HB 3881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
contract related to the public improvement contract:
(A) The name of or other identification for the public improvement project;
(B) The city or county in which the public improvement project is located;
(C) A detailed accounting of:
(i) The total  number of hours of work that workers performed under each contract and subcon-
tract;
(ii) The total number of hours of  work that workers performed in each apprenticeable trade or
craft for each contract and subcontract on the public improvement;
(iii) The total number of hours of work that apprentices performed  for each contract and sub-
contract on the public improvement; and
(iv) The total number of hours of  work that apprentices in each trade or craft performed for
each contract and subcontract on the public improvement; and
(D) The total  number of workers who performed construction work and the total numbers of
minority individuals, women and veterans who performed construction work under  the public im-
provement contract. A report under this subparagraph must  separately list for each worker the
worker’s race, ethnicity, gender, veteran status and, as applicable, trade, craft or job category.  The
Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries by rule may specify a  method for identifying,
collecting and reporting the information required under this subparagraph,  which may consist of
methods the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission prescribes in regulations the
United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission adopts under Title VII of  the Civil Rights
Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. 2000e et seq.
(6) At least 30 days before making any final payment to a contractor under  a public improve-
ment contract, a  qualifying agency shall determine the extent of the contractor’s compliance with
the requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section. The qualifying agency shall base  the
determination on the ratio between the actual number of work hours that workers  in apprenticeable
occupations performed for each contract and subcontract on the public  improvement and the actual
number of work hours that apprentices performed for each contract and subcontract on the  public
improvement, as shown in reports  the qualifying agency receives under subsection (5) of this section.
(7)(a) Not later than 30 days after making a final payment to a contractor under a public  im-
provement contract, a qualifying agency shall  report to the Bureau of Labor and Industries the in-
formation the qualifying agency collected from the contractor under subsection  (5) of this section,
together with the qualifying agency’s determination under subsection (6) of  this section as to
whether the contractor and any subcontractor met the requirements  for employing and paying ap-
prentices set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this  section. The bureau may specify the form and
contents of a report under  this paragraph and may require the qualifying agency to also report ag-
gregated data.
(b) Not later than  January 2 of each odd-numbered year, the bureau shall report to a committee
of the Legislative Assembly that considers matters related to apprenticeship and apprenticeship
utilization on public improvement contracts the following data concerning each public  improvement
contract and subcontract that each qualifying agency completed within the previous two years:
(A) The total number  of hours of work that workers performed for each contract or subcontract
on all public improvement projects;
(B) The total number of hours of work  that workers performed in each apprenticeable trade or
craft for each contract and subcontract on all public improvement projects;
(C) The total number of hours of work that apprentices performed for each  contract and sub-
[7]
HB 3881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
contract on all public improvement projects;
(D) The total  number of hours of work that apprentices in each apprenticeable trade or craft
performed for each contract and subcontract on all public improvement projects;
(E) The total number of minority individuals, women and veterans who performed work on the
public improvement projects; and
(F) Any additional  information the bureau determines is necessary to carry out the purposes of
this section.
(8)(a) A qualifying agency shall reduce the payment due under a public improvement  contract
to a  contractor that does not meet the requirements set forth under subsections (2) and (3) of this
section. The amount of the  reduction must be equivalent to the difference between the total number
of work hours that apprentices in apprenticeable occupations should have performed on the  public
improvement project to meet the requirement set forth in subsection (2) of this section less  the total
number of work hours that  apprentices in apprenticeable occupations actually performed on the
public improvement project, multiplied by $15 per hour.
(b) The qualifying agency shall pay the amount of the reduction  under paragraph (a) of this
subsection to the State Treasury to the credit of the Bureau of Labor and Industries Account es-
tablished under ORS 651.160. The bureau shall use the amount deposited to fund expansions of ap-
prenticeship training programs, with a focus on  programs in areas of this state where contractors
did not meet the targets specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(c) A contractor, in a subcontract related to the contractor’s public improvement  contract, may
provide to the same extent described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection for a reduction in the
amount due to the subcontractor if the subcontractor fails to perform the  subcontract in accordance
with the contractor’s requirements under subsections  (2) and (3) of this section. The contractor may
also provide in the contract for a reduction in the amount due a subcontractor that fails to  comply
with subsection (4)(c) of this section.
(9) This section does not apply to :
(a) A public contract that a qualifying agency enters into under ORS 279B.080[ .]; or
(b) A contractor that enters into a project labor agreement, as defined in 48 C.F.R.
52.222-34, as in effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act, in connection  with, and as a
condition of receiving an award of, a public improvement contract for  a school district, as
defined in ORS 330.003, an education service district, as defined in ORS  334.003, or a public
charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005, other than a virtual public charter school, as de-
fined in ORS 338.005.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 279C.533 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act apply
to a procurement for a public improvement that a qualifying agency  solicits, or if the quali-
fying agency does not solicit the procurement,  to a public improvement contract into which
the qualifying agency enters on or after the operative dates specified in section 4 of this  2025
Act.
SECTION 4. (1) The amendments  to ORS 279C.533 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act
become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Attorney General, the Commissioner of the  Bureau of Labor and Industries, the
Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the Director of Transporta-
tion and a qualifying agency, as defined in ORS 279C.533, as amended by sections 1  and 2 of
this 2025 Act, that adopts rules under ORS 279A.065 or 279A.070, or  under another provision
of law that provides  for adopting rules related to public contracting, may adopt rules and
[8]
HB 3881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
take any other action before the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this section that
is necessary to enable the Attorney General, the commissioner, the directors or the  quali-
fying agency, on and after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, to
undertake and exercise all of  the duties, functions and powers conferred on the Attorney
General, the commissioner, the directors or the qualifying agency under the  amendments to
ORS 279C.533 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[9]