Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 565.447 is amended to read:
565.447. (1) Subject only to the availability  of unobligated net lottery proceeds,  in each fiscal
year there is allocated from the Administrative  Services Economic Development Fund to the County
Fair Account created under ORS 565.445 an amount equal to one  percent of the net proceeds from
the Oregon State Lottery .[, but not to exceed $1.53 million annually, adjusted biennially pursuant to
an inflation factor determined by dividing the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,  West
Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department  of
Labor, for January  1 immediately preceding commencement of the biennium, by the Consumer Price
Index for All Urban Consumers of the Portland, Oregon, Standard  Metropolitan Statistical Area, as
compiled by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for January 1, 2001. ]
(2) The allocation of moneys from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund un-
der this section is subject to the requirements in section 4,  Article XV of the Oregon Constitution,
for deposit of specified amounts of  the net proceeds from the Oregon State Lottery into the Educa-
tion Stability Fund and into the Parks and Natural Resources Fund and shall  be made only after
satisfaction or payment of:
(a) Amounts allocated to Westside lottery bonds issued  under ORS 391.140 or to the reserves
or any refunding related to the Westside lottery bonds in  accordance with the priority for allocation
and disbursement established by ORS 391.130;
(b) All liens, pledges or other obligations relating to lottery  bonds or refunding lottery bonds
due or payable during the year for which an allocation is to be made; and
(c) Amounts required by any other pledges of, or liens on, net proceeds from  the Oregon State
Lottery.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1680