Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 498.825 is amended to read:
498.825. (1) There is established the Oregon Hatchery Research Center Board within  the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife. The  board shall consist of 15 members, including 12 voting mem-
bers appointed by the State Fish and Wildlife Director under subsection [ (3)] (5) of this  section and
three nonvoting members specified in subsection [ (4)] (6) of this section.
(2) Members of the board must :
(a) Be residents of this state who are well informed on matters related to fish management
policy and scientific research [ and who ].
(b) Demonstrate an interest in research related to the propagation of fish in hatcheries.
(3) In addition to meeting the requirements described in subsection (2)  of this section,
voting members of the board may not have been employed by the department.
[(2)] (4) In making appointments under subsection [ (3)] (5) of this section, the director shall :
(a) Consult with organizations that represent or that are engaged in the same  interests as those
interests that appointees to the board are required to represent[ , and shall ].
(b) Consult with the Director of the Oregon Hatchery Research Center.
(c) Take into  consideration nominations or recommendations of persons for appointment as
members of the board that are received in  the course of the consultation required by  paragraphs
(a) and (b) of  this subsection.
[(3)] (5)  The 12 voting members appointed by the State Fish  and Wildlife  Director shall be
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3978
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
representative of each of the following interests:
(a) One member shall represent the Oregon Salmon Commission established under ORS 576.062.
(b) One  member shall represent the Columbia River gillnet salmon fishery established under ORS
508.775 to 508.796.
(c) Two members shall represent [ wild fish advocacy organizations ] interests in the conserva-
tion of native fish populations that reproduce naturally .
(d) Two members shall represent statewide sport angling organizations.
(e) One member shall represent the agricultural industry.
(f) One member shall represent coastal ports.
(g) One member shall represent the forest products industry.
(h) One member  shall represent the independent scientific community and have scientific back-
ground related to fish management and the propagation of fish in hatcheries.
(i) One member shall represent fish habitat restoration interests and have experience in the
management or implementation of habitat restoration projects.
(j) One member shall represent Oregon Indian tribes, to be appointed by the director  after con-
sultation with the Commission on Indian Services.
[(4)] (6) In addition to the  members appointed under subsection [ (3)] (5) of this section, the State
Fish and Wildlife  Director shall:
(a) Appoint the following two nonvoting members of  the board who have a background in fish
management and the propagation of fish in hatcheries:
(A) One member to represent the State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(B) One member to represent Oregon State University.
(b) Invite a representative of agencies of the federal government related to  fish management to
serve as a nonvoting member of the board.
(7) The State Fish and Wildlife Director shall:
(a) Remove a member from the board upon the member’s second unexcused absence from
a board meeting.
(b) Not more than 30 days after the removal, make  an appointment to become imme-
diately effective for the unexpired term.
[(5)] (8)  The term of office of each member is four years, but a member serves  at the pleasure
of the director. Before the expiration of the  term of a member, the director shall appoint a successor
whose term begins on July 1 next following. A member is eligible for reappointment.  If there is a
vacancy for any cause, the director shall make an appointment to become immediately  effective for
the unexpired term.
(9) When appointing successors as described in subsections (7) and (8)  of this section, the
State Fish and Wildlife Director shall consult with the chairperson of  the board and the
member described in subsection (6)(a)(A) of this section.
[(6)] (10)  A member of the  board is not entitled to compensation under ORS 292.495. At the
discretion of the board, board members may be reimbursed from funds available to the board  for
actual and necessary travel and other expenses  incurred by members of the board in the perform-
ance of their official duties, subject to the limits described in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 498.827 is amended to read:
498.827. (1) The Oregon Hatchery Research Center Board shall report to the Director of the
Oregon Hatchery Research Center and shall:
[(1)] (a) Establish strategic directions and operational objectives for the Oregon Hatchery Re-
[2]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
search Center located on Fall Creek, near Alsea, [ consistent with ] that further the purposes de-
scribed in ORS 496.275.
[(2)] (b) Develop, after consultation with the Director  of the Oregon Hatchery Research Center,
Oregon State University and the State Department of  Fish and Wildlife, the proposed operating
budget for the center.
[(3)] (c) Recommend research projects for the Oregon  Hatchery Research Center and issue re-
quests for research proposals as needed to carry out the  activities of the Oregon Hatchery Research
Center specified in ORS 498.831.
[(4)] (d) Review and prioritize all  research proposals submitted to the Oregon Hatchery Re-
search Center before research takes place and prioritize  the research according to whether the re-
search is consistent with the strategic directions and  operational objectives specified in [ subsection
(1) of this section ] paragraph (a) of this subsection  and with the activities of the Oregon Hatchery
Research Center specified in ORS 498.831.
[(5)] (e) Make recommendations, as needed, regarding how  the research projects at the Oregon
Hatchery Research Center may be enhanced to meet the strategic directions and operational objec-
tives specified in [ subsection (1) of this section ] paragraph (a) of this subsection  and the activities
specified in ORS 498.831.
[(6)] (f) On or before February 1 of each calendar year, report  to the Legislative Assembly in
the manner required by  ORS 192.245, and to the State Fish and Wildlife Director and the State Fish
and Wildlife Commission, regarding the  findings of research projects carried out by the Oregon
Hatchery Research Center and  any recommendations regarding current hatchery management
practices based on the research projects. The Director  of the Oregon Hatchery Research Center
shall post the report on the center’s website for public access.
(2) The State Fish and Wildlife Director shall:
(a) Consider recommendations in the report described in  subsection (1)(f) of this section.
(b) On or before September 15 of the calendar year  in which the report under subsection
(1)(f) of this section was  made, report to the Legislative Assembly in the manner required
by ORS 192.245 on how recommendations could be implemented.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 498.829 is amended to read:
498.829. (1) The Oregon Hatchery Research  Center Board shall select one of its members as
chairperson and another as vice chairperson, for such  terms and with duties and powers necessary
for the performance of the functions of such offices as the board determines.
(2) A majority of the voting members of the board constitutes a quorum  for the transaction of
business.
(3) The board  shall meet at least once every three months at a place, day and hour determined
by the board. The board may also meet at other times and places specified by the call of the chair-
person or of a majority of the members of the board.
(4) A member of the board shall:
(a) Attend board meetings in person.
(b) If the member is unable to attend a board meeting, request in  advance of the meeting
that the Director of the Oregon Hatchery Research Center or the chairperson  of the board
excuse the absence of the member. Prior to the meeting, the director or chairperson shall
notify the member regarding approval or disapproval of the request to excuse the absence.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4)(a) of  this section, a member of the board may attend
a board meeting online if exigent  circumstances exist and the member’s online attendance
[3]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
is approved in advance of the board  meeting by the Director of the Oregon Hatchery Re-
search Center or the chairperson of the board.
(6)(a) If a member of the board is absent  from a board meeting without having been ex-
cused, as described in subsection (4)(b) of this  section, the chairperson of the board shall
notify the member and the State Fish and Wildlife Director of the member’s unexcused  ab-
sence.
(b) Upon the  member’s second unexcused absence, the State Fish and Wildlife Director
shall remove the member from the board, as described in ORS 498.825 (7).
SECTION 4.
 ORS 498.831 is amended to read:
498.831. (1) The hatchery research center located on Fall Creek, near Alsea, is  named the
Oregon Hatchery Research Center.
(2) Pursuant to the strategic  directions and operation objectives established by the Oregon
Hatchery Research Center Board under ORS 498.827,  the center shall carry out the following ac-
tivities:
[(a) Conduct research that assists  in the implementation and advancement of native fish population
recovery as well as viable fisheries. ]
[(b) Conduct research on methods to minimize  the genetic and ecological risks to naturally
produced native fish when hatchery produced fish are  released in the waters of this state for population
recovery or consumptive fishery objectives. ]
[(c) Conduct research to  determine the genetic and ecological risk to naturally produced native fish
when wild native broodstock hatchery produced native fish are released into the waters of this state. ]
[(d) Conduct research to determine the effect of  hatchery operations on naturally produced native
fish and the habitat of naturally produced native fish. ]
[(e) Provide educational and research  opportunities for undergraduate students, graduate students
and post-graduate students. ]
(a) Conduct research,  and synthesize existing research, to provide guidance for improving
the ability of hatcheries and  hatchery programs to achieve the goals described in ORS
496.012.
(b) Conduct research, and synthesize existing research, to support:
(A) The development of hatchery management policies.
(B) Actions  that restore, enhance and maintain fish abundance for harvest opportunity
while simultaneously identifying any risks or benefits to  naturally reproducing native fish
populations.
(c) Synthesize existing research on the adaptive  capacity and fitness of salmon originat-
ing from a hatchery, with an emphasis on:
(A) Recent research related to salmonid species that are native to Oregon.
(B) Research on hatchery programs  that have employed best management practices
identified in hatchery report reviews and initiatives.
(d) Make recommendations for hatchery management policies based on  the synthesis of
existing research described in paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(e) Synthesize research that:
(A) Is specific to species and populations.
(B) Documents  hatchery programs that use best management practices, identifying
whether the hatchery  programs have caused measurable impacts on naturally reproducing
salmon populations.
[4]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) Synthesize  existing scientific literature to provide recommendations for designing a
new hatchery or modifying existing hatchery facilities  to increase hatchery fish survival and
fitness.
(g) Conduct research on  how communities can contribute to hatchery programs, includ-
ing by using in-stream and streamside salmon incubators.
(h) Conduct research on the  potential ecological, social or economic value of reestab-
lishing chum salmon populations in coastal river ecosystems through the use of salmon
incubators.
(i) Conduct research in cooperation with volunteers and federally recognized Indian tribes
in this state to establish chum salmon fisheries.
(j) Conduct a study on the effectiveness of using salmon incubators to increase fish
harvest opportunities.
(k) Conduct a study of the benefits of fish carcasses to ecosystems.
(L) Conduct research on whether freshwater, estuary or marine habitats can  provide vi-
able fisheries.
[(f)] (m)  Provide educational opportunities for the public  and for students in grades 1 through
12.
[(g)] (n)  Consider any recommendations made by the  Oregon Hatchery Research Center Board
pursuant to ORS 498.827.
(3) The Director of  the Oregon Hatchery Research Center shall post information about the re-
search specified in subsection (2) of this section on the center’s website for public access.
[(4) As used in this section, “waters of this  state” has the meaning  given  that term in ORS
196.800.]
(4) As used in this section, “abundance” means a salmonid biomass that  occurred in the
1970s or 1980s.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Oregon Hatchery Research Center shall undertake the activities de-
scribed in ORS 498.831 (2)(f) on or before June 30, 2028.
(2) The center shall undertake the activities described in  ORS 498.831 (2)(c) on or before
June 30, 2029.
(3) The center shall undertake the activities  described in ORS 498.831 (2)(e) on or before
December 31, 2029.
SECTION 6.  ORS 498.833 is amended to read:
498.833. The State Fish and Wildlife Director, after consultation with  and  having received
recommendations from  the  chairperson of a department related to fish and wildlife at Oregon
State University and the Oregon Hatchery  Research Center Board established under ORS 498.825,
shall appoint a Director of the Oregon Hatchery Research Center.
SECTION 7.  Section 1, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section  1, chapter 120,
Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) The  Oregon Hatchery Research Center Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Hatchery Research
Center Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the  fund are continuously appropriated to the
State Department of Fish and Wildlife. The fund shall consist of:
(a) All moneys received from the surcharge on angling licenses imposed by section 3,  chapter
734, Oregon Laws 2015; and
(b) All moneys received from the  ad valorem fee imposed by section 4, chapter 734, Oregon Laws
[5]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
2015.
(2) Moneys in the fund may be expended only on :
(a) Research projects recommended by the Oregon Hatchery Research Center Board.
(b) Operational costs of the board.
SECTION 8.
 Section 3, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by  section 52, chapter 779,
Oregon Laws 2015, and section 7, chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Notwithstanding any  other provision of the wildlife laws and during the period beginning
January 1, 2016, and ending December 31, [ 2026] 2034, of the moneys received from  the sale of the
following licenses, the following amounts shall be deposited  in the Oregon Hatchery Research Cen-
ter Fund:
(1) Resident annual combination license issued under ORS 497.132, [ $1] $1.50.
(2) Resident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(a), [ $1] $1.50.
(3) Angling and shellfish license to angle and  take shellfish for one day issued under ORS
497.121 (1)(d), [$0.50] $1.
(4) Nonresident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(b), [ $1.50] $2.
(5) Nonresident angling license to angle for seven consecutive days issued under ORS  497.121
(1)(c), [ $1.50] $2.
SECTION 9. The amendments to section 3,  chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, by section 8
of this 2025 Act apply to licenses issued on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 10.  Section 4, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) In addition to the ad valorem fee  prescribed by law, during the period beginning
January 1, 2016, and ending December 31, [ 2026] 2034, there shall be paid for each fish species re-
ferred to in ORS 508.505 (1)(a), an additional  fee of [ four] 14 cents per pound. The ad valorem fee
referred to in this section is subject to ORS 508.505 to 508.540.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 506.306, all  moneys received by the State Fish and Wildlife Commission
pursuant to subsection  (1) of this section shall be deposited in the Oregon Hatchery Research Center
Fund.
SECTION 11. The amendments to section 4, chapter  734, Oregon Laws 2015, by section
10 of this 2025 Act apply to fish caught on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 12. Section 8, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended  by section 53, chapter 779,
Oregon Laws 2015, and section 3, chapter 120, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1)(a) [ Sections 4 and ] Section  7, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, [ are] is  repealed on
January 2, [ 2027] 2035.
(b) Section  3, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section 52, chapter 779, Oregon
Laws 2015, section 7, chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2022,  and section 8 of this 2025 Act,  is repealed
on January 2, [ 2027] 2035.
(c) Section 1, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section 1 [ of this 2017 Act ],
chapter 120, Oregon Laws 2017, and section 7 of this 2025 Act,  is repealed on January 2, [ 2027]
2035.
(d) Section 4, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended  by section 10 of this 2025 Act,
is repealed on January 2, 2035.
(2) Any balance in the  Oregon Hatchery Research Center Fund that is unexpended and unobli-
gated on the date of the repeal of section 1, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015,  and all moneys that
would have been deposited in the Oregon Hatchery Research Center  Fund had section 1, chapter
734, Oregon Laws 2015, remained in effect,  shall be transferred to and deposited in the Hatchery
[6]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Construction Fund, and are appropriated for expenditure as in  the case of other moneys in the
Hatchery Construction Fund.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 496.303 is amended to read:
496.303. (1) The Fish and Wildlife Account is established in the State  Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. All moneys in the  account are continuously appropriated to the
State Fish and Wildlife Commission. The Fish and  Wildlife Account shall consist of the moneys in
its various subaccounts and any moneys transferred to the  account by the Legislative Assembly.
Unless otherwise specified by law, interest earnings on moneys in the account shall be paid into  the
State Treasury and credited to the State Wildlife Fund.
(2)(a) The Fish Screening Subaccount is established in the Fish and Wildlife  Account. The sub-
account shall consist of:
(A) All penalties recovered under ORS 536.900 to 536.920.
(B) All moneys received pursuant to ORS 498.306.
(C) All gifts, grants and other moneys from whatever source that may be used to  carry out the
provisions of ORS 498.306.
(D) All moneys received from the sale of angling licenses dedicated by ORS 497.124.
(b) All moneys in the subaccount  shall be used to carry out the provisions of ORS 315.138,
498.306 and 509.620. However,  moneys received from the sale of angling licenses dedicated by ORS
497.124 shall be expended only to carry out the provisions of  law relating to the screening of water
diversions.
(3) The Fish Endowment Subaccount is established in the  Fish and Wildlife Account. The sub-
account shall consist of transfers of moneys authorized  by the Legislative Assembly from the State
Wildlife Fund and gifts and grants of moneys from whatever source for the purpose  of paying the
expense of maintaining fish hatcheries operated by the department.
(4) The Migratory Waterfowl Subaccount is established in the Fish and  Wildlife Account. All
moneys received by  the commission from the sale of art works and prints related to the migratory
waterfowl stamps shall be deposited in the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount  may be expended
only for activities that promote the propagation, conservation and recreational uses of migratory
waterfowl and for activities related to the design, production, issuance and arrangements  for sale
of the migratory waterfowl stamps and related art works and prints. Expenditures of moneys  in the
subaccount may be made within this state, in other  states or in foreign countries, in such amounts
as the commission determines appropriate.  Expenditures in other states and foreign countries shall
be on  such terms and conditions as the commission determines will benefit most directly the mi-
gratory waterfowl resources of this state.
(5) The Halibut Research Subaccount is established in the Fish and Wildlife Account.  Based on
the annual number of recreational halibut  anglers, a portion of the moneys derived from the sale
of the salmon, steelhead trout, sturgeon and halibut tag pursuant to ORS 497.121 shall be credited
to the subaccount. Moneys in  the subaccount may be expended only for halibut population studies
and other research.
(6) The Upland Bird Subaccount is established in the Fish  and Wildlife Account. All moneys
received by the State Fish and Wildlife Commission from the sale  of upland bird stamps, from the
sale of any art  works and prints related to the upland bird stamps and from private hunting preserve
permit fees shall be deposited in the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may be expended only
for promoting the propagation and conservation  of upland birds and the acquisition, development,
management, enhancement, sale or exchange of  upland bird habitat, and for activities related to the
[7]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
design, production, issuance and  arrangements for sale of the upland bird stamps and related art
works and prints. Expenditures of moneys in the subaccount shall be made for the benefit of pro-
grams within this state  in such amounts and at such times as the commission determines appropriate
to most directly benefit the upland bird resources of the state.
(7) The Access  and Habitat Board Subaccount is established in the Fish and Wildlife Account.
The subaccount shall consist of moneys transferred to the subaccount  pursuant to ORS 496.242.
Moneys in the subaccount may be used for the purposes specified in ORS 496.242.
(8) The Marine Shellfish Subaccount is established in the Fish  and Wildlife Account. Interest
earnings on moneys in the subaccount shall  be credited to the subaccount. All moneys received by
the commission from the sale of resident  and nonresident shellfish licenses pursuant to ORS 497.121
shall be  deposited in the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount shall be used for the protection and
enhancement of shellfish for recreational purposes,  including shellfish sanitation costs and the cost
of enforcement of wildlife laws pertaining to the  taking of shellfish. The State Fish and Wildlife
Director,  or  a designee, the Director of Agriculture, or a designee, and the Superintendent of State
Police, or a designee, shall  jointly make a recommendation to the Governor for inclusion in the
Governor’s budget beginning July 1 of each odd-numbered year.
(9)(a) The Mountain Sheep Subaccount is established in  the Fish and Wildlife Account, consist-
ing of moneys collected under ORS 497.112 (2)(a) to (c).
(b) All moneys in  the subaccount shall be used for the propagation and conservation of mountain
sheep, for research, development, management, enhancement and sale or  exchange of mountain
sheep habitat and for programs within the state that in the discretion of the commission most di-
rectly benefit mountain sheep resources of this state.
(10)(a) The Antelope Subaccount is  established in the Fish and Wildlife Account, consisting of
moneys collected under ORS 497.112 (2)(a) to (c).
(b) All moneys in the subaccount shall be  used for the propagation and conservation of antelope,
for research, development,  management, enhancement and sale or exchange of antelope habitat and
for programs within the state that in the discretion of the commission most  directly benefit antelope
resources of this state.
(11)(a) The Mountain Goat Subaccount is established in  the Fish and Wildlife Account, consist-
ing of moneys collected under ORS 497.112 (2)(a) to (c).
(b) All moneys in  the subaccount shall be used for the propagation and conservation of mountain
goats for research, development, management, enhancement  and sale or exchange of mountain goat
habitat and for programs within the state that in the discretion of  the commission most directly
benefit mountain goat resources of this state.
(12) The commission shall keep  a record of all moneys deposited in the Fish and Wildlife Ac-
count. The record shall indicate  by separate cumulative accounts the sources from which the mon-
eys are derived and the individual activity or programs against which each withdrawal is charged.
(13) The Oregon Conservation Strategy Subaccount is established in the  Fish and Wildlife Ac-
count. All moneys received by the  commission from the sale of habitat conservation stamps and from
the sale of any art works and prints related to the  habitat conservation stamp shall be deposited in
the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may be  expended only to promote and implement habitat
and species restoration, enhancement and viewing activities identified in the “Oregon  Conservation
Strategy,” 2006, by the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife, and for activities related to the de-
sign, production, issuance and arrangements for sale of  the habitat conservation stamps and related
art works and prints.
[8]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(14)(a) The Rogue-South Coast  Research and Monitoring Subaccount is established in the Fish
and Wildlife Account, consisting of moneys collected under ORS 497.121 (1)(r) and (s).
(b) All moneys in the subaccount shall be used for research and monitoring  that is consistent
with the Rogue-South Coast Multi-Species Conservation  and Management Plan the commission
adopted in December 2021, as subsequently amended by the commission.
(c) The commission may amend the plan as needed.
(d) The commission shall make the  current version of the plan publicly available on a website
of the commission or of the State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(15) The Chum Subaccount is established in the  Fish and Wildlife Account, consisting of
moneys collected under ORS 497.121 (1)(t). Moneys in the  subaccount shall be distributed as
follows:
(a) Fifty percent of  the moneys to the Coquille Indian Tribe for purposes related to chum.
(b) Thirty percent to the Oregon Hatchery Research Center Fund  established under sec-
tion 1, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, for purposes related to chum.
(c) Ten  percent to the Fish Endowment Subaccount established under subsection (3) of
this section for purposes related to chum.
(d) Five percent to the Millicoma River STEP Association for purposes related to chum.
(e) Five percent to the Coquille River STEP Association for purposes related to chum.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 496.303, as amended by section 13 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
496.303. (1) The Fish and Wildlife Account is established in the State  Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. All moneys in the  account are continuously appropriated to the
State Fish and Wildlife Commission. The Fish and  Wildlife Account shall consist of the moneys in
its various subaccounts and any moneys transferred to the  account by the Legislative Assembly.
Unless otherwise specified by law, interest earnings on moneys in the account shall be paid into  the
State Treasury and credited to the State Wildlife Fund.
(2)(a) The Fish Screening Subaccount is established in the Fish and Wildlife  Account. The sub-
account shall consist of:
(A) All penalties recovered under ORS 536.900 to 536.920.
(B) All moneys received pursuant to ORS 498.306.
(C) All gifts, grants and other moneys from whatever source that may be used to  carry out the
provisions of ORS 498.306.
(D) All moneys received from the sale of angling licenses dedicated by ORS 497.124.
(b) All moneys in the subaccount  shall be used to carry out the provisions of ORS 315.138,
498.306 and 509.620. However,  moneys received from the sale of angling licenses dedicated by ORS
497.124 shall be expended only to carry out the provisions of  law relating to the screening of water
diversions.
(3) The Fish Endowment Subaccount is established in the  Fish and Wildlife Account. The sub-
account shall consist of transfers of moneys authorized  by the Legislative Assembly from the State
Wildlife Fund and gifts and grants of moneys from whatever source for the purpose  of paying the
expense of maintaining fish hatcheries operated by the department.
(4) The Migratory Waterfowl  Subaccount is established in the Fish and Wildlife Account. All
moneys received by the commission from the sale of art works and prints related to  the migratory
waterfowl stamps shall be deposited in the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount  may be expended
only for activities that promote the propagation, conservation and recreational uses of migratory
waterfowl and for  activities related to the design, production, issuance and arrangements for sale
[9]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the migratory waterfowl stamps and related art works and prints. Expenditures of moneys  in the
subaccount may be made within this state, in other  states or in foreign countries, in such amounts
as the commission determines appropriate. Expenditures in other states  and foreign countries shall
be on such terms and conditions as the commission determines will benefit most directly the  mi-
gratory waterfowl resources of this state.
(5) The Halibut  Research Subaccount is established in the Fish and Wildlife Account. Based on
the annual number of recreational halibut anglers, a portion of the  moneys derived from the sale
of the salmon, steelhead trout, sturgeon and halibut tag pursuant to ORS 497.121 shall be credited
to the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may be expended  only for halibut population studies
and other research.
(6) The Upland Bird Subaccount is  established in the Fish and Wildlife Account. All moneys
received by the State Fish and Wildlife  Commission from the sale of upland bird stamps, from the
sale of any art  works and prints related to the upland bird stamps and from private hunting preserve
permit fees shall be deposited in the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may be expended only
for promoting the propagation and conservation of upland  birds and the acquisition, development,
management, enhancement, sale or exchange of  upland bird habitat, and for activities related to the
design, production, issuance and arrangements for sale of the upland bird stamps  and related art
works and prints. Expenditures of moneys in the subaccount shall be made for the benefit of pro-
grams within this state  in such amounts and at such times as the commission determines appropriate
to most directly benefit the upland bird resources of the state.
(7) The Access  and Habitat Board Subaccount is established in the Fish and Wildlife Account.
The subaccount shall consist of moneys transferred to the subaccount  pursuant to ORS 496.242.
Moneys in the subaccount may be used for the purposes specified in ORS 496.242.
(8) The Marine Shellfish Subaccount is established in the Fish  and Wildlife Account. Interest
earnings on moneys in the subaccount shall  be credited to the subaccount. All moneys received by
the commission from the sale of resident  and nonresident shellfish licenses pursuant to ORS 497.121
shall be  deposited in the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount shall be used for the protection and
enhancement of shellfish for recreational purposes,  including shellfish sanitation costs and the cost
of enforcement of wildlife laws pertaining to the  taking of shellfish. The State Fish and Wildlife
Director,  or  a designee, the Director of Agriculture, or a designee, and the Superintendent of State
Police, or a designee, shall  jointly make a recommendation to the Governor for inclusion in the
Governor’s budget beginning July 1 of each odd-numbered year.
(9)(a) The Mountain Sheep Subaccount is established in  the Fish and Wildlife Account, consist-
ing of moneys collected under ORS 497.112 (2)(a) to (c).
(b) All moneys in  the subaccount shall be used for the propagation and conservation of mountain
sheep, for research, development, management, enhancement and sale or  exchange of mountain
sheep habitat and for programs within the state that in the discretion of the commission most di-
rectly benefit mountain sheep resources of this state.
(10)(a) The Antelope Subaccount is  established in the Fish and Wildlife Account, consisting of
moneys collected under ORS 497.112 (2)(a) to (c).
(b) All moneys in the subaccount shall be  used for the propagation and conservation of antelope,
for research, development,  management, enhancement and sale or exchange of antelope habitat and
for programs within the state that in the discretion of the commission most  directly benefit antelope
resources of this state.
(11)(a) The Mountain Goat Subaccount is established in  the Fish and Wildlife Account, consist-
[10]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ing of moneys collected under ORS 497.112 (2)(a) to (c).
(b) All moneys in  the subaccount shall be used for the propagation and conservation of mountain
goats for research, development, management, enhancement  and sale or exchange of mountain goat
habitat and for programs within the state that in the discretion of  the commission most directly
benefit mountain goat resources of this state.
(12) The commission shall keep  a record of all moneys deposited in the Fish and Wildlife Ac-
count. The record shall indicate  by separate cumulative accounts the sources from which the mon-
eys are derived and the individual activity or programs against which each withdrawal is charged.
(13) The Oregon Conservation Strategy Subaccount is established in the  Fish and Wildlife Ac-
count. All moneys received by the  commission from the sale of habitat conservation stamps and from
the sale of any art works and prints related to the  habitat conservation stamp shall be deposited in
the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may be  expended only to promote and implement habitat
and species restoration, enhancement and viewing activities identified in the “Oregon  Conservation
Strategy,” 2006, by the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife, and for activities related to the de-
sign, production, issuance and arrangements for sale of  the habitat conservation stamps and related
art works and prints.
(14)(a) The Rogue-South Coast  Research and Monitoring Subaccount is established in the Fish
and Wildlife Account, consisting of moneys collected under ORS 497.121 (1)(r) and (s).
(b) All moneys in the subaccount shall be used for research and monitoring  that is consistent
with the Rogue-South Coast Multi-Species Conservation  and Management Plan the commission
adopted in December 2021, as subsequently amended by the commission.
(c) The commission may amend the plan as needed.
(d) The commission shall make the  current version of the plan publicly available on a website
of the commission or of the State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(15) The Chum Subaccount is established in the Fish and Wildlife Account, consisting of moneys
collected under ORS 497.121 (1)(t). Moneys in the subaccount shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Fifty percent of the moneys to the Coquille Indian Tribe for purposes related to chum.
[(b) Thirty percent to the Oregon Hatchery  Research Center Fund established under section 1,
chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, for purposes related to chum. ]
[(c)] (b)  [ Ten] Forty  percent  to the Fish Endowment Subaccount established under subsection
(3) of this section for purposes related to chum.
[(d)] (c)  Five percent to the Millicoma River STEP Association for purposes related to chum.
[(e)] (d) Five percent to the Coquille River STEP Association for purposes related to chum.
SECTION 15.
The amendments to ORS  496.303 by section 14 of this 2025 Act become op-
erative on January 2, 2035.
SECTION 16.  ORS 497.061 is amended to read:
497.061. (1) Except as otherwise provided by law, the State Fish and  Wildlife Commission shall
charge the fees  listed in the fee schedule under this section for the issuance of the specified licenses,
tags and permits.
(2) Fee Schedule:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Prices shown include agent fees
under ORS 497.022 and dedications
of funds collected as otherwise
[11]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
prescribed by law. Resident Nonresident Statutory
Fee Fee Reference
HUNTING LICENSES
ANNUAL HUNTING LICENSE $34.50 $172.00 497.102
RESIDENT SENIOR HUNTING LICENSE $22.00 - 497.102
RESIDENT DISABLED VET HUNTER LICENSE FREE - 497.102
RESIDENT UNIFORMED SERVICES
HUNTER LICENSE $17.00 - 497.102
NONRESIDENT THREE-DAY BIRD LICENSE - $32.50 497.102
HUNTING TAGS/VALIDATIONS
DEER TAG $28.50 $443.50 497.112
ELK TAG $49.50 $588.00 497.112
SPECIAL ELK TAG (DV/PIONEER) $26.00 - 497.112
BLACK BEAR TAG $16.50 $16.50 497.112
TURKEY TAG $26.50 $90.00 497.112
ANTELOPE TAG $51.50 $395.50 497.112
MOUNTAIN SHEEP TAG $142.00 $1,513.50 497.112
COUGAR TAG $16.50 $16.50 497.112
MOUNTAIN GOAT TAG $142.00 $1,513.50 497.112
RESIDENT UPLAND BIRD STAMP $10.00 - 497.153
RESIDENT WATERFOWL STAMP $13.50 - 497.151
NONRESIDENT BIRD-WATERFOWL STAMP - $44.50 497.156
FISHING LICENSES/VALIDATIONS
ANNUAL ANGLING LICENSE $44.00 $110.50 497.121
RESIDENT SENIOR ANGLING LICENSE $29.00 - 497.121
RESIDENT DISABLED VET ANGLER LICENSE FREE - 497.121
ONE-DAY ANGLING AND SHELLFISH LICENSE $23.00 $23.00 497.121
TWO-DAY ANGLING LICENSE $42.00 $42.00 497.121
THREE-DAY ANGLING LICENSE $59.50 $59.50 497.121
NONRESIDENT SEVEN-DAY ANGLING LICENSE - $93.50 497.121
ANNUAL COMBINED ANGLING TAG $46.00 $66.00 497.121
HATCHERY HARVEST TAG $33.00 $33.00 497.121
TWO-ROD ANGLING LICENSE $28.00 $28.00 497.121
SHELLFISH LICENSES
ANNUAL SHELLFISH LICENSE $10.00 $28.00 497.121
NONRESIDENT THREE-DAY SHELLFISH LICENSE - $19.00 497.121
RESIDENT DISABLED VET SHELLFISH LICENSE FREE - 497.121
COMBINATION LICENSE $73.00 - 497.132
RESIDENT SPORTSPAC LICENSE $196.50 - 497.132
RESIDENT SENIOR COMBINATION LICENSE $47.50 - 497.132
[12]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
RESIDENT PIONEER COMBINATION LICENSE $6.00 - 497.132
YOUTH LICENSES/VALIDATIONS (ages 12-17)
YOUTH LICENSE $10.00 $10.00 497.127
RESIDENT YOUTH SPORTSPAC LICENSE $55.00 - 497.132
YOUTH ANNUAL COMBINED ANGLING TAG $5.00 $5.00 497.121
YOUTH UPLAND BIRD STAMP $4.00 $4.00 497.153
YOUTH WATERFOWL STAMP $4.00 $4.00 497.151
YOUTH TURKEY TAG $10.50 $10.50 497.112
YOUTH HUNT/TRAP FUR-BEARERS LICENSE $17.00 $17.00 497.142
MISCELLANEOUS
DUPLICATE CERTIFICATE FILING $25.50 $25.50 497.032
GUIDE TAG — DEER - $575.00 497.112
GUIDE TAG — ELK - $848.00 497.112
RESIDENT HUNT/TRAP FUR-BEARERS LICENSE $54.50 - 497.142
NONRESIDENT FUR-TAKERS HUNT/TRAP LICENSE - $407.00 497.142
RESIDENT HUNT FUR-BEARERS LICENSE $26.00 - 497.142
PRIVATE HUNTING PRESERVE PERMIT $6.50 $14.00 497.102
OUTDOOR CLUB LICENSE $100.00 $100.00 498.418
LOP REGISTRATION $35.00 $35.00 496.146
LOP TAG REDISTRIBUTION $17.00 $17.00 496.146
RSC STEELHEAD VALIDATION $2.00 $4.00 497.121
RSC WILD STEELHEAD HARVEST CARD $10.00 $20.00 497.121
CHUM ENHANCEMENT VALIDATION $10.00 $10.00 497.121
OCCUPATIONAL LICENSES/PERMITS
FUR DEALER LICENSE $111.00 - 497.258
TAXIDERMIST LICENSE $111.00 - 497.258
WILDLIFE PROPAGATION LICENSE $58.00 - 497.258
FISH PROPAGATION LICENSE $151.50 - 497.258
PRIVATE HUNTING PRESERVE LICENSE $232.00 - 497.258
STURGEON PROPAGATION PERMIT $3,573.00 $3,573.00 497.325
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 17.
 ORS 497.061, as amended by  section 61, chapter 779, Oregon Laws 2015, and
section 2, chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
497.061. (1) Except as  otherwise provided by law, the State Fish and Wildlife Commission shall
charge the fees  listed in the fee schedule under this section for the issuance of the specified licenses,
tags and permits.
(2) Fee Schedule:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Prices shown include agent fees
under ORS 497.022 and dedications
[13]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of funds collected as otherwise
prescribed by law. Resident Nonresident Statutory
Fee Fee Reference
HUNTING LICENSES
ANNUAL HUNTING LICENSE $34.50 $172.00 497.102
RESIDENT SENIOR HUNTING LICENSE $22.00 - 497.102
RESIDENT DISABLED VET HUNTER LICENSE FREE - 497.102
RESIDENT UNIFORMED SERVICES
HUNTER LICENSE $17.00 - 497.102
NONRESIDENT THREE-DAY BIRD LICENSE - $32.50 497.102
HUNTING TAGS/VALIDATIONS
DEER TAG $28.50 $443.50 497.112
ELK TAG $49.50 $588.00 497.112
SPECIAL ELK TAG (DV/PIONEER) $26.00 - 497.112
BLACK BEAR TAG $16.50 $16.50 497.112
TURKEY TAG $26.50 $90.00 497.112
ANTELOPE TAG $51.50 $395.50 497.112
MOUNTAIN SHEEP TAG $142.00 $1,513.50 497.112
COUGAR TAG $16.50 $16.50 497.112
MOUNTAIN GOAT TAG $142.00 $1,513.50 497.112
RESIDENT UPLAND BIRD STAMP $10.00 - 497.153
RESIDENT WATERFOWL STAMP $13.50 - 497.151
NONRESIDENT BIRD-WATERFOWL STAMP - $44.50 497.156
FISHING LICENSES/VALIDATIONS
ANNUAL ANGLING LICENSE $43.00 $109.00 497.121
RESIDENT SENIOR ANGLING LICENSE $29.00 - 497.121
RESIDENT DISABLED VET ANGLER LICENSE FREE - 497.121
ONE-DAY ANGLING AND SHELLFISH LICENSE $23.00 $23.00 497.121
TWO-DAY ANGLING LICENSE $42.00 $42.00 497.121
THREE-DAY ANGLING LICENSE $59.50 $59.50 497.121
NONRESIDENT SEVEN-DAY ANGLING LICENSE - $92.00 497.121
ANNUAL COMBINED ANGLING TAG $46.00 $66.00 497.121
HATCHERY HARVEST TAG $33.00 $33.00 497.121
TWO-ROD ANGLING LICENSE $28.00 $28.00 497.121
SHELLFISH LICENSES
ANNUAL SHELLFISH LICENSE $10.00 $28.00 497.121
NONRESIDENT THREE-DAY SHELLFISH LICENSE - $19.00 497.121
RESIDENT DISABLED VET SHELLFISH LICENSE FREE - 497.121
COMBINATION LICENSE $72.00 - 497.132
RESIDENT SPORTSPAC LICENSE $196.50 - 497.132
[14]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
RESIDENT SENIOR COMBINATION LICENSE $47.50 - 497.132
RESIDENT PIONEER COMBINATION LICENSE $6.00 - 497.132
YOUTH LICENSES/VALIDATIONS (ages 12-17)
YOUTH LICENSE $10.00 $10.00 497.127
RESIDENT YOUTH SPORTSPAC LICENSE $55.00 - 497.132
YOUTH ANNUAL COMBINED ANGLING TAG $5.00 $5.00 497.121
YOUTH UPLAND BIRD STAMP $4.00 $4.00 497.153
YOUTH WATERFOWL STAMP $4.00 $4.00 497.151
YOUTH TURKEY TAG $10.50 $10.50 497.112
YOUTH HUNT/TRAP FUR-BEARERS LICENSE $17.00 $17.00 497.142
MISCELLANEOUS
DUPLICATE CERTIFICATE FILING $25.50 $25.50 497.032
GUIDE TAG — DEER - $575.00 497.112
GUIDE TAG — ELK - $848.00 497.112
RESIDENT HUNT/TRAP FUR-BEARERS LICENSE $54.50 - 497.142
NONRESIDENT FUR-TAKERS HUNT/TRAP LICENSE - $407.00 497.142
RESIDENT HUNT FUR-BEARERS LICENSE $26.00 - 497.142
PRIVATE HUNTING PRESERVE PERMIT $6.50 $14.00 497.102
OUTDOOR CLUB LICENSE $100.00 $100.00 498.418
LOP REGISTRATION $35.00 $35.00 496.146
LOP TAG REDISTRIBUTION $17.00 $17.00 496.146
RSC STEELHEAD VALIDATION $2.00 $4.00 497.121
RSC WILD STEELHEAD HARVEST CARD $10.00 $20.00 497.121
CHUM ENHANCEMENT VALIDATION $10.00 $10.00 497.121
OCCUPATIONAL LICENSES/PERMITS
FUR DEALER LICENSE $111.00 - 497.258
TAXIDERMIST LICENSE $111.00 - 497.258
WILDLIFE PROPAGATION LICENSE $58.00 - 497.258
FISH PROPAGATION LICENSE $151.50 - 497.258
PRIVATE HUNTING PRESERVE LICENSE $232.00 - 497.258
STURGEON PROPAGATION PERMIT $3,573.00 $3,573.00 497.325
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 18.
 ORS 497.121 is amended to read:
497.121. (1) The  State Fish and Wildlife Commission may, upon application and payment of the
applicable fees established by  the fee schedule under ORS 497.061, issue the following licenses and
tags to persons desiring to angle for fish or take shellfish:
(a) Resident annual angling license.
(b) Nonresident annual angling license.
(c) Nonresident angling license to angle for seven consecutive days.
(d) Angling and shellfish license to angle and take shellfish for one day.
(e) Angling license to angle for two days.
[15]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) Angling license to angle for three days.
(g) Resident annual shellfish license.
(h) Nonresident annual shellfish license.
(i) Nonresident three-day shellfish license.
(j) Two rod angling license for anglers who also hold a valid annual angling license.
(k) Resident annual senior citizen angling  license for persons 70 years of age or older who have
resided in the state for not less than five years prior to the date of application.
(L) Resident disabled veteran angling license for a person who files  with the commission written
proof that the last official certification of record by the United States Department of Veterans Af-
fairs or by  any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States shows the person to be at least
25 percent disabled.
(m) Resident disabled veteran  shellfish license for a person who files with the commission writ-
ten proof that the last  official certification of record by the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs or by  any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States shows the person to be at least
25 percent disabled.
(n) Resident annual combined  angling tag to angle for salmon, steelhead trout, sturgeon and
halibut.
(o) Nonresident annual combined angling tag to angle for salmon, steelhead trout,  sturgeon and
halibut.
(p) Annual youth combined angling tag  for persons under 18 years of age to angle for salmon,
steelhead trout, sturgeon and halibut.
(q) Renewable tag to angle for hatchery salmon and steelhead.
(r) Rogue-South Coast steelhead validation.
(s) Rogue-South Coast wild steelhead harvest card.
(t) Chum enhancement validation.
(2) Any person who  holds a valid permanent angling license for persons who are blind or a
permanent angling license  for persons in a wheelchair issued by the commission before January 1,
2000, need not obtain a resident annual angling license under this section.
(3) The annual combined angling tags to  angle for salmon, steelhead trout, sturgeon and halibut
referred to in subsection (1)(n), (o), (p) and (q) of this section [ and], the  Rogue-South Coast steelhead
validation and Rogue-South  Coast wild steelhead harvest card [ referred to ] described in subsection
(1)(r) and (s) of this section  and the  chum enhancement validation described in subsection (1)(t)
of this section  are in addition to and not in lieu of the angling licenses required by the wildlife
laws. However, an annual combined angling tag to angle for salmon, steelhead trout, sturgeon  and
halibut is not required of a person who holds a valid angling license referred  to in subsection (1)(c)
to (f) of this section.
(4) The commission  shall adopt rules concerning issuance of, and requirements related to, the
Rogue-South Coast steelhead validation  and the Rogue-South Coast wild steelhead harvest card de-
scribed in subsection (1)(r) and (s) of this section  and the chum enhancement validation  de-
scribed in subsection (1)(t) of  this section . The rules must address when the [ validation]
validations and harvest  card are required, relative to licenses, tags and permits that are required
under the wildlife laws.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of the wildlife laws, the moneys received from the  sale
of:
(a) The Rogue-South Coast steelhead validation and the Rogue-South  Coast wild steelhead har-
[16]
HB 3674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
vest card described in subsection (1)(r) and (s) of this section shall be credited to the Rogue-South
Coast Research and Monitoring Subaccount established under ORS 496.303.
(b) The chum enhancement  validation described in subsection (1)(t) of this section shall
be credited to the Chum Subaccount established under ORS 496.303.
SECTION 19.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[17]