Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $10,000,000, to provide grants, in coordination
with the Department of Land Conservation and Development, to promote the  development
of innovative and cost-effective housing types for needed housing, as defined in ORS 197.303.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3862