Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used  in this section and section 4 of this 2017 Act, “school nurse” has
the meaning given that term in ORS 342.455.
(2) The Department of  Education, in collaboration with the State School Nursing Con-
sultant, shall establish a program to develop and maintain statewide school  nursing services
to:
(a) Meet the student to school nurse ratios set forth  in section 5, chapter 843, Oregon
Laws 2009;
(b) Assist school districts in funding school nurse positions; and
(c) Create a school nurse sustainability plan with each school district.
SECTION 2.
The Department of Education, in collaboration with the  State School Nurs-
ing Consultant described in ORS 413.084, shall  develop statewide nursing standards of prac-
tice that include outcome measures for  school health transformation and academic
performance, and shall create an integrated  school health services delivery model to foster
and promote a noncompetitive and collaborative strategy.
SECTION 3. The State Board of Education may adopt rules to  carry out the provisions
of sections 1 and 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall amend the state plan  for medical as-
sistance or take any other  steps necessary to secure federal financial participation in the
cost of  care provided by school nurses to students enrolled in the state medical assistance
program.
(2) The authority shall establish  a process for a school district to submit a claim for re-
imbursement for care services provided by school nurses to  students enrolled in the medical
assistance program.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2182
HB 2223
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
General Fund, the amount of $ , which may be expended for the purposes of sections
1 and 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) Sections 1 to 4 of this 2017 Act become operative on January 1, 2018.
(2) The Department of Education, the State Board of Education  and the Oregon Health
Authority may take any action before the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this
section that is necessary to enable the department, the board and the authority to exercise,
on or after the operative  date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the  department, the board and the authority by sections
1 to 4 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 7.
 This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]