Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 350.285 is amended to read:
350.285. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child” means  a child, adopted child or stepchild of either a service member or a Purple
Heart recipient.
(b) “Eligible post-secondary institution” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; and
(B) The Oregon Health and Science University.
(c) “Purple Heart recipient” means a person, alive or deceased, who:
(A) Was relieved or discharged from service in the Armed Forces  of the United States with ei-
ther an honorable discharge or a general discharge under honorable conditions; and
(B) Was awarded the Purple Heart in 2001 or thereafter for wounds received in combat.
(d) “Qualified student” means a child, a spouse or an unremarried  surviving spouse of a service
member or a child of a Purple Heart recipient.
(e) “Service member” means a person who:
(A) As a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, died on active duty;
(B) As a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, died as  a result of a military service
connected disability; or
(C) Is 100 percent disabled as the result of a military service  connected disability, as certified
by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs  or any branch of the Armed Forces of the
United States.
(2) Subject to subsections (3) to (7) of this section, an  eligible post-secondary institution shall
waive tuition for a qualified student for courses that may lead to a baccalaureate degree or a
master’s degree. A qualified student who  received a tuition waiver for a baccalaureate degree may
also qualify for a tuition waiver for a master’s degree.
(3)(a) The maximum waiver granted under this section shall be as follows:
(A) For a baccalaureate degree, the total number  of credit hours that equals four years of full-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 243
HB 2441
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
time attendance at an eligible post-secondary institution.
(B) For a master’s degree, the total number of credit hours that equals two  years of full-time
attendance at an eligible post-secondary institution.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a  waiver may not exceed the total number
of credit hours the qualified student needs to graduate with a baccalaureate degree or  a master’s
degree.
(4) A waiver may be granted under this  section only for credit hours for courses that are offered
by an eligible post-secondary institution and are available for enrollment.
(5) A qualified student may receive a waiver under this section if the student:
(a) At the time of application  for a waiver, is considered a resident of this state for the purpose
of determining tuition to be paid at an eligible post-secondary institution; and
(b) Has been admitted to  an eligible post-secondary institution for a baccalaureate degree pro-
gram or has been admitted to a master’s degree program at an eligible post-secondary institution.
(6)(a) A child who applies for a waiver under this section must  be 23 years of age or younger
at the time the child applies for a waiver.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a child who is older  than 23 years of age
is eligible for a waiver for a master’s degree if the child:
(A) Applied for and received  a waiver for a baccalaureate degree when the child was 23 years
of age or younger; and
(B) Applied for a  waiver for a master’s degree within 12 months of receiving a baccalaureate
degree.
(7)(a) The amount of tuition waived under this section may  not be reduced by the amount of any
federal aid scholarships or grants, awards from  the Oregon Opportunity Grant program established
under ORS 348.205, or any other aid from the eligible post-secondary institution, received by the
qualified student.
(b) The  amount of tuition waived under this section may not be reduced by the amount of any
Survivors’ and Dependents’ Educational  Assistance under 38 U.S.C. chapter 35 paid to a qualified
student.
[2]