Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Employment Department shall study issues  related to leave benefits
under the  paid family and medical leave insurance program. The department shall submit a
report in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legis-
lation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to  business and labor
no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3271