Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management shall  develop and
implement a program to reimburse eligible entities, as described in  subsection (2) of this
section, for costs described in subsection (3) of this section, in whole or in part.  The de-
partment shall  pay for such reimbursements from the Disaster Volunteer Assistance Fund
created under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) Nongovernmental entities that are responsible for disaster response  and recovery
within a locality are eligible for reimbursement under  this section. Entities that are eligible
under this subsection include, without limitation, community organizations active  in disaster
and long-term recovery groups.
(3) The department may reimburse the following costs under  this section, if the costs are
incurred during a disaster or in response to a disaster:
(a) Payments to volunteers for mileage, other transportation costs, per  diem, lodging,
childcare and supplies; and
(b) Acquisition of volunteer liability coverage.
(4) The department shall adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
SECTION 2.
The Disaster Volunteer Assistance Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. The Disaster Volunteer Assistance Fund
consists of moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or  transferred to the fund by the Leg-
islative Assembly or otherwise. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Department of Emergency  Management to make reimbursement payments under
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $___ for deposit in the  Disaster Volunteer
Assistance Fund created under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2464
HB 2760
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
ated to the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $___ to carry out the provisions of section
1 of this 2025 Act, including program development, outreach, administration and reporting.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]