Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall conduct a  study re-
garding education outcomes for students who attend the public schools of  this state in
kindergarten through grade 12. The study shall review:
(a) The relationship between funding and student education outcomes;
(b) The effect of the educational structure  and policy decisions of this state on student
education outcomes; and
(c) The effect of the educational structure and policy decisions in  other states on student
education outcomes.
(2) When conducting the study under this section, the director:
(a) Shall use academic, peer-reviewed studies on education policy; and
(b) May enter into a contract with a public, private or nonprofit  research entity for the
purpose of conducting the study. When entering into a contract, the director shall give
preference, to the greatest extent practicable, to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(3) All agencies of  state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
director, and any entity working under contract with the director, in  conducting the study
and, to the  extent permitted by laws related to confidentiality, to furnish information and
advice necessary for the director or contractor to complete the study.
(4) The  director shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to education no later than September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1255