Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Early Learning  and Care, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the  General Fund, the amount of $4,900,000, to be distributed to Relief Nursery pro-
grams for the purpose of providing services to children  and families in accordance with ORS
417.788.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4775