Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 401.094 is amended to read:
401.094. (1)(a) The Department of State  Police shall maintain a system for the notification and
interagency coordination of state resources in response  to emergencies involving multijurisdictional
cooperation between the various levels of government , [ and] private business entities , community-
based organizations and faith-based organizations. Multijurisdictional cooperation developed
under this paragraph must include organizations that represent black, indigenous and people
of color (BIPOC) communities, individuals  of Middle Eastern descent, members of lesbian,
gay, bisexual, transgender, queer or questioning (LGBTQ) communities, immigrants, refu-
gees, members of tribal communities and persons with disabilities .
(b) The department shall provide the Office of  Emergency Management with a service level
agreement that describes the continued daily  operations and maintenance of the system, the services
and supplies needed to maintain the system 24 hours a day, every day of  the year, and the policies
and procedures that support the overall notification system.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 471
SB 288
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The notification system shall be managed by the Office  of Emergency Management as a
continuously available communications network and  a component of the state’s emergency oper-
ations center.
(3) The notification system shall be the primary  point of contact by which any public agency
provides the state notification  of an emergency or disaster, or requests access to state and federal
resources.
(4) Each department of state  government, and those agencies of state government identified in
the statewide  emergency management plan prepared under ORS 401.052 as having emergency service
or administrative responsibilities, shall appoint an  emergency management coordinator as their
representative to work with the  Office of Emergency Management on the development and imple-
mentation of emergency plans and procedures.
(5) The  Office of Emergency Management shall adopt rules relating to the planning, adminis-
tration and operation of the notification system maintained under this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 401.305 is amended to read:
401.305. (1) As used in this section, “tribal government” means a  federally recognized sovereign
tribal government operating  within the borders of this state or an intertribal organization formed
by two or more federally recognized sovereign tribal governments operating within this state.
(2) Each county of this  state shall, and each city or tribal government may, establish an emer-
gency management agency that is directly responsible to the executive officer or governing  body of
the county, city or tribe.
(3) The executive officer  or governing body of each county, and any city or tribe that partic-
ipates, shall appoint an emergency program manager who is responsible for the  organization, ad-
ministration and operation of the emergency management agency,  subject to the direction and
control of the county, city or tribe.
(4) When a  city or tribal government has an emergency management agency, the city or tribal
government, as applicable, and the counties within  which the city or tribal government operates
shall jointly establish policies that:
(a) Provide direction and identify and define the purpose and  roles of the individual emergency
management programs;
(b) Specify the responsibilities of the emergency program managers and staff; and
(c) Establish lines  of communication, succession and authority of elected officials for an effective
and efficient response to emergency conditions.
(5) Each emergency management agency shall  perform emergency program management func-
tions within the territorial limits of the county, city or tribal government  and may perform the
functions outside the territorial limits as required under any  mutual aid or cooperative assistance
agreement or as requested and authorized by  the county , [ or] city or tribal government  in whose
territorial limits the emergency functions are performed.
(6) The emergency management functions include, at a minimum:
(a) Coordination of  the planning activities necessary to prepare and maintain a current emer-
gency operations plan, management and  maintenance of emergency operating facilities from which
elected and appointed  officials can direct emergency and disaster response activities , including
planning activities designed to enhance emergency and disaster response activities for black,
indigenous and people of color (BIPOC) communities, individuals of Middle Eastern descent,
members of lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer or questioning (LGBTQ)  communities,
immigrants, refugees,  persons with disabilities and members of tribal communities, whether
[2]
SB 288
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
within or outside of tribal governments ;
(b) Establishment  of an incident command structure for management of a coordinated response
by all local emergency service agencies; and
(c) Coordination  with the Office of Emergency Management to integrate effective practices in
emergency preparedness and response as provided in the National Incident Management System es-
tablished by the Homeland Security Presidential Directive 5 of February 28, 2003.
SECTION 3.
ORS 401.358 is amended to read:
401.358. As used in ORS 401.358 to 401.368:
(1) “Emergency service activities” means:
(a) The provision of emergency services; and
(b) Engaging in training under the direction of  a public body, whether by reason of the training
being conducted or approved by a public  body, for the purpose of preparing qualified emergency
service volunteers to perform emergency services.
(2) “Qualified emergency service volunteer” means a person who is:
(a) Registered with the Office of Emergency Management  or other public body to perform
emergency service activities;
(b) Acknowledged  in writing as a qualified emergency service volunteer, at the time the person
offers to  volunteer during an emergency, by the Office of Emergency Management or by another
public body;
(c) A member of the Oregon Civil Defense Force; [ or]
(d) A building evaluator certified under the  Oregon Safety Assessment Program established un-
der ORS 401.256[ .]; or
(e) Any  other volunteer from a nonprofit organization who is providing emergency ser-
vice activities at the direction of a public body or at the direction of a community-based  or
faith-based organization that represents black, indigenous and people  of color (BIPOC) com-
munities, individuals of Middle Eastern  descent, members of lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender, queer or questioning (LGBTQ) communities, immigrants, refugees, members
of tribal communities and persons with disabilities.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 401.368 is amended to read:
401.368. (1) Except as provided in  subsection (2) of this section,  the Office of Emergency
Management shall provide workers’ compensation coverage for qualified  emergency service volun-
teers who are injured in the course and scope of performing emergency service  activities under the
direction of a public body if the injury occurs:
(a) While  the volunteer is performing emergency service activities under the direction of the
public body during  a state of emergency declared under this chapter, or during a state of public
health emergency proclaimed under ORS 433.441; or
(b) While  the volunteer is engaged in training being conducted or approved by a public body for
the purpose of preparing the volunteer to perform emergency services.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide workers’ compensation coverage for
emergency health care providers  registered under ORS 401.654 who are injured while per-
forming emergency service activities under the direction of the authority and  within the
course and scope of that direction:
(a) During a state of emergency declared under ORS 401.165;
(b) During a state of public health emergency declared under ORS 433.441;
(c) While rendering assistance pursuant to a request pursuant to the  Emergency Man-
[3]
SB 288
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
agement Assistance Compact adopted under ORS 402.105 or the Pacific Northwest Emer-
gency Management  Arrangement adopted under ORS 402.250, including Annexes A and B to
the Pacific Northwest Emergency Management Arrangement; or
(d) While engaged in training described in ORS 401.358 (1)(b) that is conducted or ap-
proved by the authority.
[(2)] (3)  Workers’ compensation coverage  shall be provided under this section in the manner
provided by ORS 656.039.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 401.667 is amended to read:
401.667. (1) If the Governor declares  a state of emergency under ORS 401.165, or proclaims a
state of public health emergency under ORS  433.441, emergency health care providers registered
under ORS 401.654 and other  health care providers who volunteer to perform health care services
under ORS 401.651 to 401.670 are agents of the state under  ORS 30.260 to 30.300 for the purposes
of any claims arising out of services  that are provided under ORS 401.651 to 401.670 pursuant to
directions from a public body and that are within the course and scope of the health care  provider’s
duties, without regard to whether the health care provider is compensated for the services.
(2) If the Governor declares a state of emergency under ORS 401.165, or  proclaims a state of
public health emergency under ORS 433.441, health care facilities  designated under ORS 401.657 and
other persons operating emergency health care centers designated under ORS 401.657 are  agents of
the state under ORS 30.260 to 30.300 for the purposes of any claims arising  out of services that are
provided through those centers or facilities under ORS 401.651 to  401.670 pursuant to directions
from a  public body and that are within the course and scope of the duties of the health care facility
or other person, without regard to whether the health care facility  or other person is compensated
for the services.
(3) An emergency health  care provider registered under ORS 401.654 participating in training
authorized by the Oregon Health Authority under  ORS 401.651 to 401.670 is an agent of the state
under ORS 30.260 to 30.300 for the purposes of any claims arising out of that training.
(4) The provisions of  subsection (2) of this section apply only to emergency health care centers
or health care facilities that have adopted emergency operations plans and credentialing plans that
govern the use of emergency health care providers registered under ORS 401.654 and  other health
care providers who volunteer to perform health care services under ORS 401.651 to 401.670.  An
emergency operations plan and a credentialing plan must comply with rules  governing those plans
adopted by the authority.
(5) If the Governor receives a request for assistance from another party state to the
Emergency Management Assistance Compact  adopted under ORS 402.105 and the Oregon
Health Authority directs an emergency health care  provider registered under ORS 401.654 to
that state to render assistance, the emergency  health care provider is considered an officer
or employee of the Oregon Health Authority for purposes of Article VI of  the Emergency
Management Assistance Compact.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 401.109 is amended to read:
401.109. (1) The Oregon Homeland Security Council is created  within the Office of Emergency
Management. The council shall:
(a) Receive briefings on security matters:
(A) For which the office is responsible at least annually from state agencies and organizations
as determined by the council; and
(B) Relating to catastrophic disasters declared by the Governor pursuant to Article X-A,  section
[4]
SB 288
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
1, of the Oregon Constitution, or  states of emergency declared by the Governor pursuant to ORS
401.165.
(b) Advise state agencies with responsibility for  security matters on the future direction of the
office’s planning, preparedness, response and recovery activities.
(2) The membership of the council consists of:
(a) Four members from the Legislative Assembly appointed as follows:
(A) Two members from the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate; and
(B) Two members from the House of Representatives  appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives;
(b) The Governor;
(c) The Adjutant General;
(d) The Superintendent of State Police;
(e) The Director of the Office of Emergency Management; [ and]
(f) A representative of the Department of Justice appointed by the Attorney General ; and
(g) The State Resilience Officer .
(3) Each  member appointed to the council under subsection (2) of this section serves at the
pleasure of the appointing authority. The membership of a public official  ceases upon termination
of the office held by the official at the time of appointment to the council.
(4) The Governor is the chairperson of the council.
(5) The Adjutant General is the vice chairperson  of the council and serves as the chairperson
in the absence of the Governor.
(6) Members of the council are  not entitled to compensation under ORS 292.495. The director,
in the director’s discretion, may reimburse  members of the council as provided in ORS 292.495 for
actual and necessary  travel or other expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as mem-
bers of the council.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 401.913 is amended to read:
401.913. (1) The office of State Resilience  Officer is created in the office of the Governor. The
office of State Resilience Officer shall direct, implement and  coordinate [ seismic] disaster and
hazard safety and resilience goal setting and state agency planning and preparation to improve
[seismic] disaster and  hazard  safety and resilience , including but not limited to planning and
preparation for safety and resilience during  and after earthquake, tsunami, wildfire, flooding
and other natural or manmade events .
(2) The State  Resilience Officer shall lead statewide mitigation efforts that address
findings from the Oregon Resilience Plan.
(3) The  State Resilience Officer shall lead executive branch agencies on continuity of
operations planning and continuity of government planning training and exercises.
(4) The State Resilience Officer shall support  government response to actual events as
a member of the Governor’s disaster cabinet.
[(2)] (5) The Governor shall appoint  an individual to serve as the State Resilience Officer, sub-
ject to confirmation by the Senate pursuant to Article III, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution.
[(3)] (6)  The  legislative branch of government and the judicial branch of government shall each
select an individual  to monitor the effectiveness of [ seismic] disaster and hazard  safety and
resilience planning in their branch.
SECTION 8. Section 9 of this  2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 401.358 to
401.368.
[5]
SB 288
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 9. 
(1) The Office of Emergency  Management shall establish an outreach pro-
gram to work directly with  nonprofit organizations that represents black, indigenous and
people of color (BIPOC) communities, individuals of  Middle Eastern descent, members of the
lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender,  queer or questioning (LGBTQ) communities, immigrants,
refugees, members of tribal communities and persons with disabilities, to facilitate en-
hancement of volunteer organization capabilities to provide emergency service activities.
(2) The office shall dedicate at least one full-time equivalent  position to performing the
duties described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 10.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Office of Emergency Management, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, out
of the General  Fund, the amount of $ , which may be expended for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of section 9 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 11. The Housing and Community Services  Department, in consultation with the
Oregon Health Authority, shall establish a grant program to provide funding to  nonprofit
health and community organizations to  provide to nonprofit staff and volunteers all-hazard
continuity of operations plan templates  and preparedness equipment and training for building
resiliency to support communities during and following disaster and hazard occurrences.
SECTION 12. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $
, which may be expended for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 11 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 13. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Eligible costs” means:
(i) Demolition, restoration  of similar architectural finishes, work on electrical, plumbing
and mechanical systems and other direct structural costs of seismic retrofitting; and
(ii) Architectural, engineering, project management,  insurance, testing and other service
costs related to seismic retrofitting.
(B) “Eligible costs” does not mean:
(i) Remodeling or refurbishing  costs intended to enhance aesthetics, functionality or
marketability without extending seismic life safety; or
(ii) Relocation costs or  loss of rent during improvement of the seismic safety, stability
or resiliency of an eligible property.
(b) “Eligible property” means improvements to real property:
(A) Constructed before January 1, 1993;
(B) Having exteriors constructed primarily of unreinforced masonry, unreinforced con-
crete or other building materials declared seismically dangerous by city  or county ordinance
or by a city or county governing body resolution; and
(C) Serving or having the capacity to serve as  a facility providing food, shelter, health
care or other necessary services during  an emergency declared under ORS 401.165 or a public
health emergency declared under ORS 433.441.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department shall  administer a program, to be
known as the Unreinforced Masonry Seismic Safety Program, for the purpose  of awarding
grants on an annual competitive basis from the Oregon Unreinforced Masonry Seismic Safety
Fund established under section 14 of this 2021 Act. The department shall award and disburse
grants under the program for the purposes of:
[6]
SB 288
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Improving, on a statewide basis, the seismic safety, stability and  resiliency of eligible
properties; and
(b) Promoting improvements in seismic safety, stability  and resiliency that will lead to
private investment, job creation or  retention, the establishment or expansion of viable busi-
nesses or the creation of a stronger tax base.
(3) Applications for grants under the  program described in subsection (2) of this section
must state with specificity the proposed improvements to the seismic safety, stability  and
resiliency of the eligible property. The proposed  improvements must be sufficient to meet
or exceed the seismic performance level for eligible properties established by the department
by rule.
(4) In awarding grants under the program, the department shall  give priority to grants
for:
(a) Eligible property owned by, or primarily benefitting, a nonprofit corporation  as de-
fined in ORS 65.001 that primarily serves members of black,  indigenous and people of color
(BIPOC) communities, individuals of Middle Eastern  descent, members of lesbian, gay,
bisexual, transgender, queer or questioning (LGBTQ) communities, immigrants,  refugees,
members of tribal communities and persons with disabilities; and
(b) Categories of eligible property identified by the department by rule.
(5) Subject to subsection  (6) of this section, an annual grant awarded to an applicant
under this section may not exceed the lesser of:
(a) Thirty-five percent of the total eligible costs expended on eligible properties; or
(b) $
 for each eligible property.
(6) The department shall reduce the grant for an eligible  property by the amount of any
tax credits or  grants received from Oregon state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, in
connection with the  property. A grant under this section may not exceed the difference be-
tween the eligible  cost and the total amount received to pay for the eligible cost from all
other sources, such as tax credits or grants.
(7) The department shall adopt a formula for making grants under  the program that re-
serves a minimum of 25 percent of available grant funds for  projects outside of the Portland
metropolitan area urban growth boundary.
(8) The department shall:
(a) Develop criteria for determining  the eligibility of grant applicants and proposed
projects;
(b) Provide project oversight and monitoring for grant recipients;
(c) Provide regular updates to other state agencies that have an interest in  the carrying
out of the program;
(d) Adopt rules for the purpose of carrying out the program; and
(e) Appoint an advisory group of individuals  qualified to review grant applications, advise
on the carrying out of the  program and perform other program-related duties as determined
by the department.
(9) The department shall require each grant recipient to file upon completion of the eli-
gible project a sworn statement identifying the amounts and types of moneys  received for
the eligible project and the source of those moneys.
(10) In adopting rules under this section, the department may consult with  other state
agencies having an interest in the carrying out of the program.
[7]
SB 288
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
SECTION 14.
The Oregon Unreinforced Masonry Seismic  Safety Fund is established in
the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the
Oregon Unreinforced Masonry Seismic Safety Fund shall be credited  to the fund. Moneys in
the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department for
the purpose of carrying out  the Unreinforced Masonry Seismic Safety Program described in
section 13 of this 2021  Act. The fund shall consist of any moneys designated for deposit in
the fund or for  carrying out the program, including but not limited to appropriations or
other provisions of moneys by the Legislative Assembly, bond  proceeds and public or private
moneys from gifts, grants or donations.
SECTION 15. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of bonds authorized pursuant to  ORS
286A.035, for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to  issue lottery bonds pursuant to
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $  in net proceeds and interest
earnings for the  purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional
amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred  to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the Oregon Unreinforced Masonry
Seismic Safety Fund established under section 14 of this 2021 Act.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that  the use of lottery bond proceeds for the purpose
of carrying out the Unreinforced Masonry Seismic Safety Program described in  section 13
of this 2021 Act will create jobs, further  economic development and enhance the economic
vitality of Oregon communities, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Masonry and concrete buildings are an integral  part of the commercial, industrial and
nonprofit infrastructure of this state.  Unreinforced masonry and unreinforced concrete
buildings pose a significant risk to that infrastructure in the event of an earthquake.
(b) Improvements  to the seismic safety, stability and resiliency of unreinforced masonry
and unreinforced concrete buildings will create jobs and promote economic development
within this state.
SECTION 16.
The Oregon Business Development Department  shall report regarding the
Unreinforced Masonry Seismic Safety Program to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly relating to  emergency preparedness, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, no
later than September 15, 2023. The report shall include, but need not be  limited to, informa-
tion concerning applications received  and grants issued under the program and concerning
the distribution of applications and grants between the  Portland metropolitan area urban
growth boundary and the rest of this state.
SECTION 17.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[8]