Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 456.548 to
456.725.
SECTION 2. For programs operated by the Housing  and Community Services Department
under ORS 456.515 to 456.725 or ORS chapter 458, funds may not be used by  the department,
a qualified housing sponsor or a recipient of program funds  to provide direct assistance, in-
cluding rental assistance, housing, housing subsidies,  loans or tax credits, to a noncitizen
who is not lawfully admitted to, or present in, the United States.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4396