Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall  provide grants
to one or more nonprofit organizations for the purpose  of providing housing services to low
income individuals who are homeless or at risk of becoming  homeless and are engaged in
ongoing HIV case management services.
(2) A nonprofit organization eligible for grants under this section shall:
(a) Provide services including direct assistance to cover,  on an emergency basis, housing
application fees, rental deposits,  rent, utility payments, mortgage payments, property taxes
or other property-related costs or debts, and provide housing information, resources and
referrals to other resource providers;
(b) Have no fewer than 15 years of experience providing health  care, employment and
housing assistance for individuals undergoing HIV case management services;
(c) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of  the department the ability to provide the services;
and
(d) Deliver reports to the department no less than semi-annually showing the  use of
funds received under this section and the services provided by those funds.
(3) Grants made by the department under this section shall be paid to eligible  nonprofit
organizations no more frequently than quarterly. The  first payment made under this section
shall be made no later than March 30, 2020. Eligible organizations who have received a prior
grant are not required to reapply for subsequent grants unless required by the department.
(4) No later than September 15, 2021, the department shall  provide a report to the Leg-
islative Assembly in the manner provided under ORS  192.245 on the expenses of and services
provided through grants made under this section.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, for administering and funding
grants under section 1 of this 2019 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2595