Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act:
(a) “Emergency medical services” has the meaning given that term in ORS 682.400.
(b) “Reimbursable governmental services” means:
(A) Fire protection.
(B) Police, law enforcement and other forms of public safety protection.
(C) Emergency medical services.
(c) “State agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 291.227.
(d) “Subject state-owned land” means land owned  by the State of Oregon, other than
highways owned by the Department of Transportation.
(2)(a) On or before April 15 of each year, the Oregon Department of  Administrative Ser-
vices shall provide to the governing body of the City  of Salem a report showing the number
of acres of subject state-owned land situated within the city as of January 1 of the current
calendar year.
(b) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may consult  with the Department
of State Lands and the State Parks and Recreation Department when  compiling the report
required under this subsection.
(3)(a) As soon as practicable after receipt of the report,  the governing body shall perform
the following computations:
(A) Subtract from the total number of acres of land within the city boundaries  the total
number of acres of subject state-owned land within the city boundaries.
(B) Divide the  total number of acres of subject state-owned land within the city bounda-
ries by the difference determined under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) Multiply the budgeted amount for reimbursable governmental services adopted  by the
city for the current year by the quotient determined under  subparagraph (B) of this para-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 101
HB 4072
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
graph.
(b) The governing body shall submit an invoice to the Oregon  Department of Adminis-
trative Services for payment of a dollar amount equal to the least of:
(A) The product determined under paragraph (a)(C) of this subsection;
(B) 
 percent of the budgeted amount; or
(C) $ .
(c) All computations shall be carried to two decimal places.
(4)(a) Within 60 days of receipt, the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall
pay to the governing body of the City of Salem, out of the Governmental Services  Revolving
Fund established under section 3 of this 2024 Act, the amount reflected on the invoice.
(b) Fee amounts received  by the governing body are intended to supplement and not
supplant other state moneys that the city receives.
(5)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may recoup the  amount paya-
ble under subsection (4) of this section from state agencies  based on the agencies’ use of
subject state-owned land within the city to which the fee relates.
(b) In addition to the recouped amounts, the  Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices may collect from  state agencies a proportional share of the department’s actual costs
in administering sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act.
(c) All amounts received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services under
this subsection shall  be credited to the Governmental Services Revolving Fund established
under section 3 of this 2024 Act.
(6) The Oregon  Department of Administrative Services may adopt rules to administer
sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) Upon request, the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall
provide to the governing body of any  city in this state other than the City of Salem that
wishes to introduce within its boundaries the fee program established under sections 1 to 4
of this 2024 Act the information  necessary for the governing body to make the computations
required under section 1 (3) of this 2024 Act.
(2)(a) The governing body of a city may adopt an  ordinance or resolution under which the
fee program shall apply to subject state-owned land situated within the boundaries of the city
on the same terms as set forth in section 1 of this 2024 Act for the City of Salem.
(b) An ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this  section shall not become opera-
tive before the next succeeding September 1 of an odd-numbered year that occurs not less
than 60 days following the effective date of the ordinance or resolution.
(c) As soon as practicable after adoption, the governing body shall provide the  depart-
ment with a copy of the ordinance or resolution.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Governmental Services Revolving Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Governmental
Services Revolving Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Governmental Services Revolving Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts appropriated or otherwise  transferred or credited to the fund by the Legis-
lative Assembly;
(b) Amounts received from state agencies under section 1 (5) of this 2024 Act;
(c) Interest and other earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(d) Other moneys or proceeds of property from any public or private source  that are
[2]
HB 4072
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
transferred, donated or otherwise credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys in  the Governmental Services Revolving Fund are continuously appropriated
to the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services for the purposes of sections 1 to 4 of
this 2024 Act.
(4) Moneys in the Governmental Services Revolving  Fund at the end of a biennium shall
be retained in the fund and used for the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) On or before September 15 of each year, the  Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services shall submit, in  the manner provided under ORS 192.245, a report to
the interim  committees of the Legislative Assembly relating to revenue that sets forth in
detail the cumulative experience of the fee program established under sections 1 to 4  of this
2024 Act.
(2) The department  shall provide to the League of Oregon Cities a copy of the report
submitted under this section  to be made available upon request to the governing body of any
city in this state.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $10,000,000 for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act.
[3]