Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to ______, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $______ for ______.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $______
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the ______.
SECTION 3
. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $______
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses for ______ from federal funds collected or received by the ______.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Note: For budget, see 2025-2027 Biennial Budget
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 9551