Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Except as  otherwise provided in a city’s charter, a city councillor may
not seek reelection to the city council at any  election held prior to the last election before
the expiration of the councillor’s current term of office.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply in a city  in which councillors are elected
by districts according to residency if the  councillor has changed residence from one district
to another in time to  establish eligibility for an election held prior to the last election before
the expiration of the councillor’s current term of office.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3966