Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Public Safety Standards  and Training shall study the
Oregon State Police and report to an appropriate committee or  interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2487