Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of State Police shall study  whether the process for con-
ducting criminal background checks for firearm transfers can be made more efficient. The
department shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may  include
recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  re-
lated to the judiciary no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2940