Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 836.085 is amended to read:
836.085. Except as provided in ORS 836.080,  the Oregon Department of Aviation as authorized
by the State Aviation  Board shall provide for the approval of proposed airport sites and the issuance
of certificates of such approval. The following apply to this section:
[(1) A  nonrefundable fee of $75, together with an amount not to exceed $300 established by the
department for the cost of inspecting and approving an airport site for potential approval, shall  ac-
company the application for site approval. ]
(1) A person submitting an application for approval of an  airport site shall pay an appli-
cation fee, established by the department by rule, to  cover the cost of inspecting and ap-
proving an airport site for potential approval.
(2) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, and  each biennium thereafter, the depart-
ment may adjust for inflation by modifying the amount of the fee described under  subsection
(1) of this section, based on the Consumer Price  Index for All Urban Consumers, West Re-
gion (All Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the  United States De-
partment of Labor.
(3) The adjusted fees under subsection (2) of this section take effect on January 1 of the
year following the adjustment and apply for two years.
[(2)] (4) The department shall determine  approval of airport sites under this section based on the
conditions under ORS 836.095.
SECTION 2.  ORS 836.105 is amended to read:
836.105. Except as provided in ORS 836.080, the Oregon Department of Aviation is  authorized
to provide  for the licensing of airports and the annual renewal of such licenses. The following apply
to this section:
(1) The department may [ charge] establish by rule  license fees for each original license and for
each renewal. [ The fee to be paid for each original license and each renewal is as follows: ]
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 288
SB 792
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
AIRPORT CLASSIFICATION
AND FEE SCHEDULE
Category I Airport
- Commercial Service ................................$ 150
Category II Airport
- Urban General Aviation .......................$ 100
Category III Airport
- Regional General Aviation ...................$ 75
Category IV Airport
- Local General Aviation .........................$ 50
Category V Airport
- Remote Access .........................................$ 30
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
(2) Upon the adoption of a rule providing for such licensing, the  department shall with reason-
able dispatch,  upon receipt of an application for an original license and the payment of the required
fee, issue an appropriate license if it is satisfied  that the airport conforms to minimum standards
of safety and that safe air traffic patterns can  be worked out for such airport and for all existing
airports and approved airport sites in its vicinity.
(3) All licenses shall be renewable annually upon payment of the required fees.
(4) Licenses and renewals may be issued subject to  any reasonable conditions that the depart-
ment may deem necessary to effectuate the purposes of ORS 836.085 to 836.120.
(5) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, and  each biennium thereafter, the depart-
ment may  adjust for inflation by modifying the amount of the fees described under sub-
section (1)  of this section, based on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,
West Region (All Items), as  published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States
Department of Labor.
(6) The adjusted fees under subsection (5) of this section take effect on January 1 of the
year following the adjustment and apply for two years.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 837.045 is amended to read:
837.045. (1) The registration fee to be paid under ORS 837.040, and the fee to be paid upon re-
newal of registration under  ORS 837.060, shall be in accordance with the fee schedule estab-
lished by the Oregon Department of Aviation by rule. [is as follows: ]
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
AIRCRAFT CLASSIFICATION
AND FEE SCHEDULE
Single engine fixed wing, piston $ 65
Single engine fixed wing, turboprop 250
Multiengine fixed wing, piston 150
Multiengine fixed wing, turboprop 300
[2]
SB 792
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Turbojet fixed wing 700
Helicopter piston engine 65
Helicopter turbine engine 175
Lighter than air, home built,
sailplane, experimental or gyrocopter 55
Ultralight aircraft 55
Ex-military multiengine or turbojet/
ex-air carrier 300
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
(2) Any registration fees  and penalties due in a previous year but not paid remain due and
payable and may be collected by the [ Oregon Department of Aviation ] department prior to renewal
of registration of the aircraft in the current year.
(3) For the biennium beginning July  1, 2027, and each biennium thereafter, the depart-
ment may adjust for inflation by modifying the amount of the fees described under  sub-
section (1) of this section, based on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban  Consumers,
West Region (All Items), as  published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States
Department of Labor.
(4) The adjusted fees under subsection (3) of this section take effect on January 1 of the
year following the adjustment and apply for two years.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 837.055 is amended to read:
837.055. (1) Upon receipt of an application for registration of any aircraft and payment  of the
required license  fee, the Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation shall assign to the appli-
cation and the aircraft to be registered a distinctive number and register the facts stated in  the
application and the number in an index to be kept for that purpose.
(2) A certificate of registration,  bearing the same number assigned to the application, and in a
form and design to be determined by the Oregon Department of Aviation, shall  be delivered to the
owner of the aircraft without further expense to such applicant.
(3) The following apply to the use and display of certificates of registration and other  signs de-
noting registration for aircraft:
(a) The certificate of registration shall be carried in the aircraft at all times.
(b) No sign to denote registration of aircraft  by the State of Oregon, other than those furnished
by the director, shall be used.
(4) Duplicate certificates of registration may be obtained, upon proof of loss or destruction of
the original, by application therefor to  the department and the payment of [ $15] a fee for each ad-
ditional certificate.  The department shall establish by rule the amount of the fee.
(5) The facts stated in any application for registration  shall be a public record and open to in-
spection by the public during reasonable office hours.
[(5)] (6)  Registration  of an aircraft does not require, nor does it constitute, evidence of legal
ownership of the aircraft.
(7) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, and  each biennium thereafter, the depart-
ment may  adjust for inflation by modifying the amount of the fees described under sub-
section (4)  of this section, based on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,
West Region (All Items), as  published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States
Department of Labor.
[3]
SB 792
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(8) The adjusted fees under subsection (7) of this section take effect on January 1 of the
year following the adjustment and apply for two years.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 837.060 is amended to read:
837.060. (1) All registrations under ORS 837.040 expire  annually on the anniversary of the date
the aircraft is originally registered with the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(2) The owner of an  aircraft subject to renewal of registration shall renew the registration on
or before the date of expiration by filing a form provided by the department and  paying the fee for
renewal of registration established  [ in] by the department by rule pursuant to  ORS 837.045. The
department may impose a late fee on  a person who fails to renew registration within the time re-
quired in the same manner and in the same amounts as late fees imposed under ORS 837.040.
SECTION 6.  ORS 837.070 is amended to read:
837.070. (1) Upon the purchase of any aircraft registered in accordance  with ORS 837.040, title
to the certificate of registration assigned thereto shall vest in the purchaser. Within 10  days after
the date of:
(a) Purchase, the purchaser shall file  with the Oregon Department of Aviation an application to
transfer the registration, stating the name and  business address of the purchaser, the name of the
seller, the registration number assigned to the aircraft, and a brief description of the aircraft as
required for an original registration.
(b) Sale, the seller shall notify the Director of the Oregon  Department of Aviation of the sale
with the name and address of the purchaser, registration number  assigned to the aircraft and a brief
description of the aircraft as required for an original registration.
(2) Upon the receipt of the application and  the payment of a fee [ of $15 ] established by the
department by rule , the director shall transfer the license and registration number to  the pur-
chaser, and shall record the transfer.
(3) [No] The sale or transfer of any aircraft registered under ORS 837.040 [ shall be ] is not valid
without compliance with the provisions of  this section. If an aircraft is not registered at the time
of purchase, even  though the aircraft may have been purchased within the state, new or used, the
purchaser shall register it in accordance with ORS 837.040 and 837.045.
(4) For the biennium beginning July  1, 2027, and each biennium thereafter, the depart-
ment may adjust for inflation by modifying the amount of the fees described under  sub-
section (2) of this section, based on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban  Consumers,
West Region (All Items), as  published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States
Department of Labor.
(5) The adjusted fees under subsection (4) of this section take effect on January 1 of the
year following the adjustment and apply for two years.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 837.075 is amended to read:
837.075. (1) Any dealer in new or used aircraft, or both, shall apply to  the Oregon Department
of Aviation for a dealer’s license. Upon such application, the department  shall issue an aircraft
dealer’s license to the applicant for an annual fee [ of $250 ] established by the department  by
rule. The dealer’s license shall be in lieu  of all other licenses or registration required by ORS
837.040 upon the dealer’s aircraft within this state, so  long as they are kept for resale and are not
used in commercial operations within this state.
(2) This section does not prohibit the registering of a dealer’s aircraft under ORS 837.040.
(3) Upon the sale by a dealer  of an aircraft which is not registered under ORS 837.040, the
dealer shall advise  the purchaser of the registration requirements under ORS 837.040 to 837.070 and
[4]
SB 792
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
furnish the purchaser with the proper application forms.
(4) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, and  each biennium thereafter, the depart-
ment may  adjust for inflation by modifying the amount of the fees described under sub-
section (1)  of this section, based on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,
West Region (All Items), as  published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States
Department of Labor.
(5) The adjusted fees under subsection (4) of this section take effect on January 1 of the
year following the adjustment and apply for two years.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 837.040 is amended to read:
837.040. (1) Except as provided in subsection  (2) of this section, the following are required to
register civil aircraft with the Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) The owner of a civil aircraft that is capable of flight and that is based in this state.
(b) The owner of a civil aircraft that is used for commercial operations in this state.
(2) An owner need not register a civil aircraft that is:
(a) Exempted by the provisions of ORS 837.005; or
(b) Subject to assessment and taxation under ORS 308.558.
(3) An owner who is otherwise required to comply with subsection  (1) of this section is not ex-
empt from compliance because the aircraft has an appropriate, effective permit or license issued  by
the United States.
(4) An owner applying for registration of an aircraft under this section shall file an application
form supplied by the department. The State Aviation Board may adopt rules specifying  the infor-
mation that may be required on the application form.
(5)(a) The owner of a civil aircraft that is based in Oregon shall  register the aircraft within 60
days of the date the aircraft becomes subject to registration. The  owner of a civil aircraft that is
not based in Oregon but that is used in Oregon for commercial operations shall register the aircraft
prior to the first time the aircraft is used in Oregon for commercial operations.
(b) The department may impose a late fee on a person  who fails to register an aircraft within
the time required by this subsection. The board may determine by rule the amount of late  fees that
may be imposed under this paragraph. The board may adopt a graduated schedule of late fees,  but
the maximum amount of a late fee may not be more than the amount of the registration fee.
(6) An application  for registration must be accompanied by the registration fee specified [ in ORS
837.045] by rule  and, if a late fee is imposed under subsection (5) of this section, by the late fee.
(7) Registration under this section is not complete until the  owner receives a notice of regis-
tration from the department.
SECTION 9.
The amendments to ORS 836.085, 836.105, 837.040, 837.045, 837.055,  837.060,
837.070 and 837.075 by sections 1 to 8 of this 2025 Act apply to amounts collected  on or after
July 1, 2026.
[5]