Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Court Administrator shall study issues  facing the court system
and report on the results of the study to an appropriate committee or interim committee
of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2023.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2022 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 100