Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 332.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Procurement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
(b) “Public contract” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
(2) Before extending, renewing or entering a new  public contract with a third party for
the procurement of substitute teacher services:
(a) A school district shall conduct the cost analysis required under ORS 279B.030.
(b) A district  school board shall make publicly available on its website copies of the cur-
rent contract, proposed contract and cost analysis.
(3) Upon extending, renewing or entering into a new public contract with a third party
for the procurement of substitute teacher services, a district school board shall:
(a) Address the matter as an agenda item at its next regular  meeting and provide notice
and an opportunity for members of the public to testify.
(b) Make publicly available on its website copies of the extended, renewed or new contract
and cost analysis.
(4)(a) No later than June 30 of each year,  a district school board that extends, renews
or enters a  new public contract with a third party for the procurement of substitute teacher
services shall submit  any extended, renewed or new contract and cost analysis to the De-
partment of Education.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2696
SB 323
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
(b) No  later than September 15 of each year, the Department of Education shall submit
a report on the implementation of this section in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to education and to the Legislative Administration Committee.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 334.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Procurement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
(b) “Public contract” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
(2) Before extending, renewing or entering a new  public contract with a third party for
the procurement of substitute teacher services:
(a) An education service district shall  conduct the cost analysis required under ORS
279B.030.
(b) An education service  district board shall make publicly available on its website copies
of the current contract, proposed contract and cost analysis.
(3) Upon extending, renewing or entering into a new public contract with a third party
for the procurement of  substitute teacher services, an education service district board shall:
(a) Address the matter as an agenda item at its next regular  meeting and provide notice
and an opportunity for members of the public to testify.
(b) Make publicly available on its website copies of the extended, renewed or new contract
and cost analysis.
(4)(a) No later than June 30 of each year, an education service district  board that ex-
tends, renews or enters a new public contract with a third party for the procurement  of
substitute teacher services shall submit any extended, renewed or new  contract and cost
analysis to the Department of Education.
(b) No  later than September 15 of each year, the Department of Education shall submit
a report on the implementation of this section in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to education and to the Legislative Administration Committee.
SECTION 5.
Sections 2 and 4  of this 2025 Act apply to procurements that a school district
or education service district first advertises or otherwise solicits or, if  the school district
or education service district  does not advertise or solicit the procurement, to procurements
that the school district or education service district first conducts on or after the  operative
date specified in section 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) Sections 2 and 4 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) A district school  board or an education service district board may take any action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the school district or education service district to undertake and exercise, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section, all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the  school district or education service district by sections 2 and 4 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]