Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Wildfire” means a wildfire as defined in ORS 477.089, that started on or after July
5, 2020, and before December 1, 2020, and:
(A) Is the subject of a state of emergency declared by the Governor;
(B) Occurs in an area subject to an executive order of the Governor invoking the  Emer-
gency Conflagration Act under ORS 476.510 to 476.610; or
(C) Is a federally declared disaster, as defined  in section 165 of the Internal Revenue
Code, whether located within Oregon or elsewhere.
(b) “Wildfire-related litigation” means litigation through which a plaintiff  seeks compen-
sation for losses, expenses or damages found to be caused by a wildfire.
(2) A public utility may not increase or apply to the Public Utility Commission to increase
the public utility’s rates or schedules  of rates, if the public utility has, for a period of three
or more years, any outstanding or contingent liabilities  arising out of wildfire-related liti-
gation.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2036.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3686