Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Court Administrator shall study  methods for improving court-
houses and report to an appropriate committee or interim committee  of the Legislative As-
sembly no later than September 1, 2018.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3416