Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 1, chapter 370, Oregon Laws 2023, and section 2, chapter 78, Oregon
Laws 2024, are repealed.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1429