Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon School Activities Association shall study the availability of
competition-size swimming  pools at public and private secondary schools throughout this
state.  The association shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and must
include recommendations for legislation to support construction,  maintenance and operation
of competition-size swimming pool facilities  at all accredited secondary schools within this
state, to the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to education no later
than September 15, 2023.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $_______ for
distribution to the Oregon School Activities  Association for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1309