Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Forestry Department shall establish not fewer than  two and
not more than  five demonstration projects designed to reduce wildfire danger on forestland
and rangeland through the restoration of landscape resiliency and the reduction of hazardous
fuel levels.  The department shall identify, design and oversee the implementation, adminis-
tration, maintenance and evaluation of  the demonstration projects. In carrying out its
functions regarding the demonstration projects,  the department shall, to the extent practi-
cable, consult and cooperate with forestland  and rangeland stakeholders, which may include,
but need not be limited to:
(a) The United States Department of Agriculture;
(b) The United States Forest Service;
(c) The Bureau of Land Management;
(d) The Natural Resources Conservation Service;
(e) The Oregon State University Extension Service;
(f) The Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board;
(g) Counties, cities, municipal corporations, rural fire protection districts, forest pro-
tection districts, rangeland protection associations and other units of local government;
(h) The American Forest Foundation;
(i) Community-based organizations and associations; and
(j) Public and private forestland and rangeland owners.
(2) The State Forestry Department shall:
(a) In collaboration with other entities, identify strategic landscapes that are ready for
treatment under the demonstration projects, giving priority to lands that are:
(A) Currently approved for treatment projects under the National Environmental Policy
Act (42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq.); and
(B) Within areas identified as  high fire risk areas in the Governor’s Council on Wildfire
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 225
SB 1514
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
Response November 2019: Report and Recommendations;
(b) Identify, and to the extent practicable  remove, disincentives to the use of prescribed
burning to accomplish mitigation objectives;
(c) To the extent practicable, design the demonstration projects to:
(A) Evaluate varying types of  fuel treatment, which may include, but need not be limited
to, controlled use of fire, mechanical treatments and  biological and chemical treatments; and
(B) Leverage  the collective power of public-private partnerships, federal funding and
state funding;
(d) Design the demonstration projects to involve existing  forest-based workforce devel-
opment programs, giving emphasis to workforce programs for youth;
(e) Affirmatively seek, and enhance  opportunities for, collaboration from stakeholders
holding a wide variety of perspectives regarding forest management and opportunities  for
significant involvement by communities in proximity to demonstration project sites; and
(f) Engage in careful monitoring of the demonstration project sites to produce useful in-
formation on which to base recommendations to the Legislative Assembly.
(3) The department shall report its findings and recommendations  regarding wildfire
danger reduction on forestland and rangeland, based on information obtained from the  dem-
onstration projects described in this section, to the Governor  and to an interim committee
of the Legislative Assembly  related to natural resources, in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, no later than January 1, 2021.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out  of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, which may be expended for purposes related  to the
demonstration projects described in section 1 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2020 Act is repealed January 2, 2024.
SECTION 4. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]