Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Education shall study  the adequacy of public education
in this state for kindergarten through  grade 12. The department shall submit a report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the
interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly related to education no later than September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 781