Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, to  provide grants to provide air
conditioning, and electrical and HVAC repairs and improvements to support air conditioning,
in multifamily affordable housing within this state.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3857