Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 2. (1) Each school district, education service district and public charter  school
shall ensure that state moneys received  by the district or school are used to educate the
student for which the moneys are received, as provided by this section.
(2)(a) When a school district, an education service district or a public charter school re-
ceives additional moneys based on  the characteristics of a student, as described in ORS
327.013 (1)(c)(A)(i), (ii) or  (v), the school district, education service district or public charter
school shall ensure that the additional moneys were used to improve  the educational out-
comes of the students described in ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A)(i), (ii) or (v).
(b) The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection apply to:
(A) Distributions of the State School Fund to school districts under ORS 327.013;
(B) Distributions of the State  School Fund to education service districts under ORS
327.019;
(C) Distributions of the State School Fund  to public charter schools as provided by ORS
327.362, 338.155, 338.157 and 338.165;
(D) Distributions of the Student Investment Account to  school districts and public
charter schools as provided by ORS 327.195;
(E) Distributions of the Statewide Education  Initiatives Account to education service
districts as provided by ORS 327.254; and
(F) Any other distributions of state moneys by  the Department of Education to school
districts, education service districts and public charter schools, as identified by the State
Board of Education by rule.
(3) In addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, each school district,
education service district and public charter school shall:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3208
SB 660
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
(a) Calculate the average amount of moneys received by the district or school that, mi-
nus any administrative costs of the district or school, is attributable to  the direct education
of a student; and
(b) Ensure that the amount calculated under paragraph (a) of  this subsection is used for
the benefit of each student, which may include ensuring  that the amount attributable to the
student is made available to the school in which the student is enrolled.
(4) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for  the administration
of this section, including  prescribing any auditing requirements necessary to ensure compli-
ance with the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act first applies to the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on July 1, 2026.
[2]