Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 329.494, as amended by section 4, chapter 253, Oregon Laws 2019,  is amended
to read:
329.494. (1) The State Board of Education, in consultation with a local organization that has the
primary purpose of providing education about the Holocaust, shall  develop academic content stan-
dards for Holocaust and genocide studies that comply with the requirements of  this section. School
districts must provide [ instruction on  the ] Holocaust and genocide studies based on standards
adopted by the board under this section.
(2) Instruction required under this section must be designed to:
(a) Prepare students to confront the immorality of  the Holocaust[ ,] and other historical and
ongoing acts of  genocide and [ other acts of ] mass violence [ and];
(b) Provide students the opportunity  to reflect  on the causes of [ related historical events ]
historical events related to the Holocaust and of historical and  current events related to
other historical and ongoing acts of genocide and mass violence ;
[(b)] (c) Develop students’ respect for cultural diversity and  help students gain insight into the
importance of the protection of international human rights for all people;
[(c)] (d) Promote  students’ understanding of how the Holocaust contributed to the need for the
term “genocide” and led to international legislation that recognized genocide as a crime;
[(d)] (e) Stimulate students’ reflection on the roles and responsibilities of citizens  in democratic
societies to combat misinformation, indifference and discrimination through tools of resistance  such
as protest, reform and celebration;
[(e)] (f) Provide students with opportunities to  contextualize and analyze patterns of human be-
havior by individuals  and groups who belong in one or more categories, including perpetrator,
collaborator, bystander, victim and rescuer;
[(f)] (g) Enable students to understand the ramifications of prejudice, racism and stereotyping;
[(g)] (h) Preserve the memories of survivors of genocide and provide  opportunities for students
to discuss and honor survivors’ cultural legacies;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4724
HB 3919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
[(h)] (i) Provide students  with a foundation for examining the history of discrimination in this
state; and
[(i)] (j) Explore the various mechanisms of transitional and restorative justice that help human-
ity move forward in the aftermath of genocide  and other acts of mass violence .
(3) The Department of Education shall provide technical assistance to  school districts for the
purpose of providing instruction required by this section.
SECTION 2.
 Section 5, chapter 253, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section  1, chapter 588,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  (1) The amendments to ORS 329.494 by section 4, chapter 253, Oregon  Laws 2019, and
section 1 of this 2025 Act  become operative on September 30, 2026.
(2) The amendments to ORS 329.494 by section 4, chapter 253,  Oregon Laws 2019, and section
1 of this 2025 Act  first apply to the 2026-2027 school year.
(3)(a) A school district must first offer instruction that  meets the academic content standards
of ORS 329.494 (1), as amended by section 4, chapter 253, Oregon Laws 2019, and section 1 of this
2025 Act,  no later than the 2026-2027 school year.
(b) Nothing in paragraph (a) of this subsection prevents a school district from first  offering in-
struction that meets the academic  content standards of ORS 329.494 (1), as amended by section 4,
chapter 253, Oregon Laws 2019, and section 1 of this 2025 Act,  at any time from the  beginning of
the social sciences instructional materials cycle adopted by the State  Board of Education until the
school year set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 3.  Section 5,  chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 3, chapter 588,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  (1) The Department of Education shall provide professional development to teachers and
administrators relating to:
(a) Academic content standards developed pursuant  to ORS 329.494 (1), as amended by section
4, chapter  253, Oregon Laws 2019, and section 1 of this 2025 Act,  to ensure that school districts
are able to offer instruction that meets the  academic content standards of ORS 329.494 (1), as
amended by section  4, chapter 253, Oregon Laws 2019, and section 1 of this 2025 Act,  no later than
the 2026-2027 school year.
(b) Academic content standards adopted pursuant to ORS 329.045  (1)(b)(B), as amended by sec-
tion 1, chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2019, and to the selection  of textbooks under ORS 337.260, as
amended by section 3, chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2019, to ensure that school districts are  able to
offer instruction that meets the academic content  standards of ORS 329.045 (1)(b)(B), as amended by
section 1, chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2019, no later than the 2026-2027 school year.
(2) The department  may contract for the provision of professional development required by this
section.
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules that  establish standards and any other cri-
teria for the professional development required under this section.
[2]