Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 317A.125 is amended to read:
317A.125. (1) The corporate activity tax imposed  under ORS 317A.116 for each tax year shall
equal $250 plus the product of the taxpayer’s taxable  commercial activity in excess of [ $1 million]
the amount described in  subsection (2) of this section  for the tax year multiplied by 0.57 per-
cent.
(2) The exemption amount applicable to subsection (1) of this section shall be:
(a) $10 million  for amounts received from homebuilding contracts by a person holding a
construction contractor’s license; and
(b) $1 million for all other taxpayers.
[(2)] (3) A  tax is not owed under this section if the person’s taxable commercial activity does
not exceed [ $1 million] the applicable amount in subsection (2) of this section .
SECTION 2.
 ORS 317A.137 is amended to read:
317A.137. (1) For purposes of the corporate activity tax imposed under ORS 317A.116, every
person doing  business in this state with commercial activity for the tax year in excess of [ $1
million] the exemption amount provided in ORS 317A.125 (2) shall file an annual return not  later
than the 15th day of the fourth month following the  end of the tax year. If the 15th day of the fourth
month falls on a Saturday,  Sunday or legal holiday, including any legal holiday in the District of
Columbia, the return is  due on the next business day following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holi-
day. The return must be filed with the Department of Revenue in a form prescribed  by the depart-
ment.
(2) The corporate activity  tax imposed under ORS 317A.116 is due and estimated tax payments
for the previous quarter are payable to  the department on or before the last day of the 4th, 7th and
10th months of the tax year and of the first month immediately following the end of the tax year.
(3) The department may by rule extend the time for making any return. If  the time for filing a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1016
SB 440
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
return is extended, interest on any unpaid tax at the rate established under ORS  305.220 from the
time the return was originally required to be filed to the time of payment, shall be added and paid.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 317A.125 and 317A.137 by sections 1 and  2 of this
2025 Act apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]