Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of the State Fire Marshal, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $300,000  for the Oregon Safety Assessment Program
established under ORS 401.256.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $250,000 for  distribution to the Nesika Beach Ophir Water
District for the purpose of funding fire protection infrastructure.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of the State Fire Marshal, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General  Fund, the amount of $25,000 to study and develop recommendations re-
garding ways to develop, enhance or expand the ability  of rural fire protection districts to
use district assets to facilitate community development efforts following a natural disaster.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,126,040 to fund 10  additional positions in
the department.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2111