Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Judicial Department shall study options for  simplifying estate adminis-
tration proceedings in this state. The department shall submit a report  in the manner pro-
vided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary no later  than September 15,
2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3060