Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 6 of this 2025 Act are added to and made  a part of ORS 97.810
to 97.865.
SECTION 2. As used in ORS 97.810 to 97.865:
(1) “Average fair market value” means:
(a) The average of the fair market value of endowment  care fund assets on the last day
of the  current business year and the last day of each of the two preceding business years;
or
(b) If there  are fewer than two preceding business years, the average of the fair market
value as of the last day of all business years for the entire term of the trust fund.
(2) “Net income  distribution” means the distribution of interest and dividend income
earned by an endowment care fund minus permissible fees and taxes.
(3) “Total return distribution” means the distribution of funds  from an endowment care
fund based on the average fair market value of fund assets multiplied by the total return
percentage.
(4) “Total return percentage” means the  annual percentage set by the cemetery author-
ity under section 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) Distributions from endowment  care funds may be made using the net
income distribution method or the total return distribution method.
(2)(a) A cemetery authority shall elect a distribution method by delivering written  in-
structions to the trustee of the fund no later than 30 days prior to the beginning of the cal-
endar year in which the authority will begin using the distribution method.
(b) If the trustee does not receive written notice from the cemetery authority  of the
distribution method elected, the trustee shall calculate and make  distributions using the net
income distribution method.
(3) A cemetery authority must notify the Department of  Consumer and Business Ser-
vices, in accordance with section 4 of this 2025 Act, of its intent to begin using the total  re-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3804
HB 3344
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
turn distribution method.
(4) The distribution method  and, if applicable, the total return distribution rate shall re-
main in effect unless the cemetery authority notifies the trustee  and the department of the
authority’s intent to change the method.
(5) A cemetery authority that has converted  to using the total return distribution
method may elect to reconvert to the net  income distribution method by submitting notifi-
cation of  the election to the trustee and the department with documents and other infor-
mation supporting the reconversion, including a  copy of the trust agreement and the
proposed effective date of the reconversion.
SECTION 4.
(1) A cemetery authority intending to use the total return  distribution
method must notify the Department of Consumer and Business Services on  or before No-
vember 1 of the year prior to the year in which  the authority intends to begin using the
method.
(2) The cemetery authority or the trustee  of the endowment care fund shall provide the
department with the following:
(a) A written investment policy whose investment goals are:
(A) First, to  achieve principal growth through permissible investments under law for
endowment care funds; and
(B) Second, to achieve current income.
(b) An amended endowment  care trust agreement that clearly shows the election of the
total return distribution method.
(c) A written distribution  policy establishing the total return percentage and initial esti-
mated average fair market  value, using the most recent month end balances as the estimate
for the current year, signed by the cemetery authority or trustee.
SECTION 5.
(1)(a) A cemetery authority that has elected to use the total  return distrib-
ution method shall set a total return percentage that does not exceed  four percent of the
average fair market value of the endowment care fund assets.
(b) The cemetery authority may reduce the total return percentage but  may not increase
it unless the authority provides to the trustee of the endowment  care fund documentation
demonstrating a rate of return of the endowment care  fund assets over the prior three years
that supports the increase.
(2) Expenses that could be deducted from income under this chapter if the trust were
not a unitrust may not be deducted from a total return distribution.
(3) In  accordance with ORS 129.225, the trustee may, in the trustee’s discretion, deter-
mine:
(a) The manner in which the total return distribution  will be prorated for a year in which
a trust’s right to payments begins or ends;
(b) The effect  on trust asset valuation of distributions or other payments from, or con-
tributions to, the trust;
(c) Whether or how to estimate the value of nonliquid assets; and
(d) Any other matters necessary for the proper administration of the trust.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services may take corrective
measures, including, but not limited to, reducing  a cemetery authority’s total return per-
centage, or requiring a distribution of only net income, under any of the  following circum-
stances:
[2]
HB 3344
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The average fair market value of the trust fund for the current three-year period  has
declined by 10 or more percentage points compared to the previous three-year period.
(b) The fair market value of the  trust fund assets at the end of a business year is less
than 80 percent of the sum of the  fair market value of the trust fund, as of the first day of
the calendar year in which the endowment care fund began making distributions using the
total return distribution method, plus  all deposits made to the trust fund since the first day.
(c) After review of the annual trust fund report or an on-site examination, the depart-
ment determines  that there is an uncorrected financial or investment related endowment
care fund deficiency.
(d) The department determines that the trustee of the endowment care  fund is not able
to demonstrate sufficient knowledge and  expertise regarding the effective implementation
of distributing income for the maintenance of the cemetery using this method.
(2) The department may decide not  to impose corrective measures under the circum-
stances described in subsection (1) of this section if it finds that:
(a) The circumstances are due  to unusual or temporary factors that are not within the
control of the  cemetery authority or the trustee and that could not have been reasonably
anticipated;
(b) The current investment policy for  the trust fund is reasonably designed to protect the
trust fund from further declines in fair market value; or
(c) The exception appears to be both necessary and appropriate for the  continued pro-
tection of the endowment care fund.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 97.825 is amended to read:
97.825. (1)(a) If the cemetery authority fails to remit to the trustee or trustees, in accordance
with the law, the funds herein provided for endowment and  special care, or fails to expend the net
income or total  return distribution from the funds and generally care for and maintain any portion
of a cemetery entitled to endowment care, any of the following may bring an  action for a mandatory
injunction or for an appointment of a receiver  to sue for, take charge of and expend the net income
or total return distribution :
(A) Any  three lot owners, or a lot owner’s next of kin, heir or personal representative whose
lots are entitled to endowment care;
(B) Any one lot owner, or the lot owner’s next of kin, heir or personal representative, whose lot
is entitled to special care;
(C) The district attorney of the county where a lot described in this subsection is located; or
(D) A local government with jurisdiction over the county or municipality where a lot described
in this subsection is located.
(b) The suit may be filed in the circuit  court of the county where the cemetery is located in
order to compel the cemetery authority or the appointed receiver to make the expenditure  of the
net income or total return distribution  from the endowment care fund for the purposes  set out in
ORS 97.010 to 97.040, 97.110 to 97.450, 97.510 to 97.730, 97.810 to 97.920 and 97.990.
(2) When the Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services has reason to be-
lieve that a cemetery endowment care fund does not conform  to the requirement of law, or when the
director has reason to  believe that any cemetery is operating in violation of ORS 97.810 or 97.820,
or when the director has sent an  endowment care cemetery a notice of delinquency to make any
report to the director  required by ORS 97.810, the director shall, as soon thereafter as reasonable,
give notice of the foregoing to the trustee or trustees of  the cemetery endowment care fund, the
[3]
HB 3344
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cemetery authority, the Attorney General of Oregon and the State Mortuary and Cemetery Board.
(3) Within 120 days after the receipt of such notice, the Attorney  General shall institute suit in
the circuit court of any county of this state in which such cemetery is located, for a mandatory  in-
junction against further sales of graves, plots,  crypts, niches, burial vaults, markers or other ceme-
tery merchandise by such  cemetery or for the appointment of a receiver to take charge of the
cemetery, unless the Attorney General shall prior to that time be notified  by the director that such
failure to conform to the requirements of the law or to report has been corrected.
(4) The Attorney  General may delay instituting any suit brought under subsection (3) of this
section  for  no more than an additional 30 days if, in the discretion of the Attorney General after
consulting with the director, it appears to the Attorney General:
(a) That  the failure to conform to the requirements of the law or to report will be corrected;
and
(b) That no harm to the public will occur during the additional 30 days.
(5) If a trustee fails to perform the duties  of the trustee under ORS 97.810 to 97.920, the trustee
shall be liable for  any damage resulting from that failure to any lot owners or the next of kin, heirs
at law or personal representatives of such lot owners.
(6) The court may award reasonable attorney fees, costs and disbursements to  the prevailing
party in an action under this section.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 97.830 is amended to read:
97.830. (1) (a) The principal of all funds for endowed care shall be invested, from time to time
reinvested and kept invested.
(b) If a trust agreement imposes upon the trustee or custodian the duty to  direct the investment
or reinvestment of endowed care funds, the trustee or custodian shall perform this duty  governed
by ORS 130.750 to 130.775.
(c) [ Otherwise] If a trust agreement does not impose upon  the trustee or custodian the
duty described in paragraph (b) of  this subsection , the cemetery authority, governed by ORS
130.750 to 130.775, shall direct the investment and reinvestment of endowed care funds in  the time
or savings deposits of the custodian bank or savings association.
(2)(a) Except where a cemetery authority has elected to use the  total return distribution
method, the principal of invested endowed care funds shall never be voluntarily  reduced, but shall
be maintained separate and distinct by the trustee or custodian from all other funds [ except that  it
shall be proper to commingle ].
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  endowment  care funds may be
commingled with special care funds.
(c) The payment of charges chargeable against principal  under ORS chapter 129 or of other
expenses necessarily incurred in the administration of the trust in accordance with subsection (1)
of this section shall not constitute a voluntary reduction of principal.
(3)(a) The  net income earned or total return distribution  shall be used solely for the general
care and maintenance of the cemetery property entitled  to endowment care, as stipulated in the
resolution, bylaw and other action or instrument by which the fund  was established, and in such
manner as the cemetery authority may from time to time determine to be in the best interests  of
such endowed property.
(b) Such net  income or total return distribution  shall never be used for the improvement or
embellishment of undeveloped property offered for sale.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 97.835 is amended to read:
[4]
HB 3344
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
97.835. (1) The trustee shall have no duty whatsoever to :
(a) Operate, maintain or [ to] supervise the general maintenance of any endowment fund
cemetery[ , and the trustee shall have no duty whatsoever to ];
(b) Enforce collection of any of the trust funds either from the purchasers of lots, or from  the
cemetery authority[ , and the trustee shall have no duty whatsoever to ]; or
(c) See to the application of the net income or total return  distribution after payment of the
net income or total return distribution  to the cemetery authority.
(2) The trustee shall be entitled to rely without  liability upon the affidavit of the cemetery au-
thority showing the amount payable to the trustee as endowment care funds.
[5]