Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for the purposes of:
(1) Not later  than September 1, 2021, awarding a grant under ORS 454.779 in an amount
of not less than $1,950,000; and
(2) Covering administrative costs necessary to implement ORS 454.779.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1570
HB 3090
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]