Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall study barriers  to the
development of industrially zoned lands and shall report to an appropriate  committee or in-
terim committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 1, 2018.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3673