Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Corrections shall  study community corrections. The de-
partment shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include
recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  re-
lated to the judiciary no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3043