Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The following types of  mechanical restraints may not be used on a youth,
adjudicated youth or young person, as those terms are defined in ORS  419A.004, in a de-
tention facility established under ORS 419A.010 to 419A.020 and 419A.050 to 419A.063, or youth
correction facility, as defined in ORS 420.005:
(1) A straitjacket;
(2) A restraint that involves attaching an individual’s  hands, feet or other body parts to
a fixed object such as a chair, bed or bolt in the wall or on the floor;
(3) A device that wraps around the body for the purpose of immobilizing  a person’s arms,
legs or both, including a blanket wrap device;
(4) A combination of a locking shoulder harness, leg restraint and ankle strap;
(5) A device that removes the ability of an individual to see, hear or speak;
(6) A device that  places an individual in a pain compliance position or leads to the
hyperextension of limbs or joints;
(7) A device that interferes with an individual’s ability to breathe; or
(8) A device that affixes to an individual’s neck or throat.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1466