Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 469.504, as amended by section 4, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
469.504. (1) A proposed facility shall be found in compliance with the statewide planning  goals
under ORS 469.503 (4) if:
(a) The facility has received local land use approval under the acknowledged  comprehensive
plan and land use regulations of the affected local government; or
(b) The Energy Facility Siting Council determines that:
(A) The facility complies with applicable substantive  criteria from the affected local
government’s acknowledged comprehensive plan and land use  regulations that are [ required by the
statewide planning goals ] recommended by the special advisory group established under ORS
469.480 and in effect on the date the application is submitted, and with any Land  Conservation and
Development Commission administrative rules  and goals and any land use statutes that apply di-
rectly to the facility under ORS 197.646; or
[(B) For an energy facility or  a related or supporting facility that must be evaluated against the
applicable substantive criteria pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, that the  proposed facility does
not comply with one or more of  the applicable substantive criteria but does otherwise comply with the
applicable statewide planning goals, or that an exception  to any applicable statewide planning goal is
justified under subsection (2) of this section; or ]
[(C)] (B) For a facility that the council elects to evaluate  against the statewide planning goals
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, that the proposed facility complies with the  applicable
statewide planning goals or  that an exception to any applicable statewide planning goal is justified
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The council may find goal compliance for  a facility that does not otherwise comply with one
or more statewide planning  goals by taking an exception to the applicable goal. Notwithstanding
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1669
SB 1034
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the requirements of ORS 197.732, the  statewide planning goal pertaining to the exception process
or any rules of the Land Conservation and Development Commission pertaining to  an exception
process goal, the council may take an exception to a goal if the council finds:
(a) The land subject to the exception  is physically developed to the extent that the land is no
longer available for uses allowed by the applicable goal;
(b) The land subject to the exception is  irrevocably committed as described by the rules of the
Land Conservation and Development Commission to uses not allowed by  the applicable goal because
existing adjacent uses and other relevant factors  make uses allowed by the applicable goal imprac-
ticable; or
(c) The following standards are met:
(A) Reasons justify why the state policy embodied in the applicable goal should not apply;
(B) The significant environmental, economic, social and energy  consequences anticipated as a
result of the proposed facility have been identified and adverse impacts will be mitigated in ac-
cordance with rules of the council applicable to the siting of the proposed facility; and
(C) The proposed facility is compatible with other adjacent uses or will  be made compatible
through measures designed to reduce adverse impacts.
(3) If compliance with applicable substantive local criteria and  applicable statutes and state
administrative rules would result in conflicting conditions  in the site certificate or amended site
certificate, the council shall resolve the conflict consistent with the public interest. A  resolution
may not result in a waiver of any applicable state statute  or applicable substantive criterion .
(4) An applicant for  a site certificate shall elect whether to demonstrate compliance with the
statewide planning goals under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section. The applicant shall make  the
election on or before the date specified by the council by rule.
(5) Upon request by the State Department of Energy, the special advisory group  established
under ORS 469.480  shall recommend to the council, within the time stated in the request, the ap-
plicable substantive criteria under subsection (1)(b)(A) of this  section. If the special advisory group
does not recommend applicable substantive criteria within  the time established in the department’s
request, the council may either determine and apply  the applicable substantive criteria under sub-
section [ (1)(b)] (1)(b)(A)  of this section or determine compliance with the statewide planning goals
under subsection (1)(b)(B) [ or (C) ] of this section. If the special advisory group recommends applica-
ble substantive criteria for an energy facility  described in ORS 469.300 or a related or supporting
facility [ that does not pass through more  than one local government jurisdiction or more than three
zones in any one jurisdiction ], the council shall apply the criteria recommended by the special  advi-
sory group. [ If the special advisory group recommends applicable substantive criteria for an energy
facility as defined in ORS  469.300 (12)(a)(C) to (E) or a related or supporting facility that passes
through more  than one jurisdiction or more than three zones in any one jurisdiction, the council shall
review the recommended criteria and determine whether to evaluate the  proposed facility against the
applicable substantive criteria  recommended by the special advisory group, against the statewide plan-
ning goals or against a combination  of the applicable substantive criteria and statewide planning goals.
In making its determination, the council shall consult with the  special advisory group and shall con-
sider:]
[(a) The number of jurisdictions and zones in question; ]
[(b) The degree to which the applicable substantive criteria reflect local government consideration
of energy facilities in the planning process; and ]
[(c) The level  of consistency of the applicable substantive criteria from the various zones and ju-
[2]
SB 1034
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
risdictions.]
(6) The council is not subject to ORS 197.180 and a state  agency may not require an applicant
for a site certificate to comply with any rules or programs adopted under ORS 197.180.
(7) On or before its next periodic review, each affected local  government shall amend its com-
prehensive plan and land use  regulations as necessary to reflect the decision of the council per-
taining to a site certificate or amended site certificate.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 34.020 or 197.825 or  any other provision of law, the affected local
government’s land use approval of a proposed facility  under subsection (1)(a) of this section and the
special advisory group’s recommendation  of applicable substantive criteria under subsection (5) of
this section shall be subject to judicial review only as provided in ORS  469.403. If the applicant
elects to comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section, the provisions of this subsection shall apply
only to proposed projects for which the land use approval of the local  government occurs after the
date a notice of intent or an application for expedited  processing is submitted to the State Depart-
ment of Energy.
(9) The State Department of Energy,  in cooperation with other state agencies, shall provide, to
the extent possible, technical assistance and information about the siting process to  local govern-
ments that request such assistance or that anticipate having a  facility proposed in their jurisdiction.
[3]