Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Data Modernization is established.
(2) The  task force consists of nine members appointed by the Administrator of the
Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Review how state agencies currently report demographic data;
(b) Review enacted legislation about demographic data,  including but not limited to ORS
413.161, 413.162, 413.163, 413.164, 413.166 and 413.167, and consider updating and expanding that
legislation to other parts of government;
(c) Review legislation about demographic data enacted in other states;
(d) Recommend ways to revise the granular ethnicity data collection  methods to better
highlight the hidden disparities within the ethnic minority subgroups currently not covered;
(e) Recommend updates to the  data collection methodology, following the United States
Office of Management and Budget’s Standards for Maintaining, Collecting,  and Presenting
Federal Data on Race and Ethnicity; and
(f) Seek community input and incorporate that input into the task  force’s findings and
final recommendations.
(4) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2666
HB 3002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee of  the Legislative Assem-
bly related to general government no later than December 15, 2026.
(11) The Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office  shall provide staff support to the task
force.
(12) Members of the task  force are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for
expenses and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(13) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]