Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 181A.790 is amended to read:
181A.790. (1) As used in this section, “involved officer” means:
(a) A police officer whose official conduct, or  official order to use deadly physical force, was a
cause in fact of the  death of a person. As used in this paragraph, “order to use deadly physical
force” means an order issued to another officer to use  deadly physical force in a specific incident
or an order or directive establishing rules  of engagement for the use of deadly physical force for a
specific incident.
(b) A police officer whose official conduct was not a cause in fact  of the death of a person but
whose official  involvement in an incident in which the use of deadly physical force by a police offi-
cer resulted in the death of a person:
(A) Began before or during the use of the deadly physical force; and
(B) Was reasonably likely to have exposed the police officer to greater stresses or trauma than
other police officers experienced as a result of their involvement in the incident before or  during
the use of the deadly physical force.
(2) A law enforcement agency shall adopt a policy dealing  with the use of deadly physical force
by its police  officers. At a minimum, the policy must include guidelines for the use of deadly physical
force.
(3)(a) For each involved officer employed by a  law enforcement agency, the law enforcement
agency shall pay the costs of at least two sessions with a mental health professional  that are at-
tended by  the officer. The sessions must be held within six months after the incident in which the
officer was involved.
(b) An involved officer shall attend at least one  of the sessions described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3451
SB 582
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Sessions with a mental health professional  under this subsection may not be substituted for
a fitness for duty examination required or requested as a condition  of employment by the law
enforcement agency that employs the involved officer.
(4) For at least 72 hours immediately following an incident in  which the use of deadly physical
force by a police officer resulted in the death of a person, a law enforcement agency  may not return
an involved officer  to duties that might place the officer in a situation in which the officer has to
use deadly physical force. A law enforcement agency may not reduce an involved officer’s  pay or
benefits as a result of the law enforcement agency’s compliance with  this subsection.
Notwithstanding ORS 181A.805 (1), a personnel cost incurred in complying with  this subsection by
a law enforcement agency employing 40 or fewer police officers is  an expense for purposes of ORS
181A.805.
(5) An involved officer shall  be prohibited from viewing or listening to audio and video
recordings of the incident  in which deadly physical force was used that were obtained from
cameras worn on the involved officer’s  or another officer’s person until the involved officer
has completed an interview concerning the incident.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a)  A law  enforcement agency employing an involved officer shall include at least one
police officer from a different  law enforcement agency in the investigation of the incident in which
the involved officer was involved.
(b) The failure  of a law enforcement agency to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection is
not grounds for suppressing evidence obtained in the investigation.
[(6)(a)] (7) A law enforcement agency shall collect at least the following  information relating to
incidents in which a police officer’s use of deadly physical force resulted in the death of a person:
(A) The name, gender, race, ethnicity and age of the decedent.
(B) The date, time and location of the incident.
(C) A brief description of the circumstances surrounding the incident.
(b) A law enforcement agency  shall promptly submit the information collected under paragraph
(a) of this subsection to the Department of Justice.
[(7)] (8)  The department  shall compile and periodically publish information submitted under
subsection [ (6)] (7)  of this section. The department,  by rule, may specify a form to be used by law
enforcement agencies in submitting information under subsection [ (6)] (7) of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 181A.785 is amended to read:
181A.785. In the plan required by  ORS 181A.780 (4), a deadly physical force planning authority
shall, at a minimum:
(1)(a) Address, under ORS 181A.780 (4)(a), the manner  in which each law enforcement agency
within the county will comply with ORS 181A.790 (2); and
(b) Attach a copy of each policy adopted under ORS 181A.790 (2) to the plan.
(2) Address, under ORS 181A.780 (4)(b), the manner in  which each law enforcement agency
within the county will comply with ORS 181A.790 (3)(a) and (4).
(3) Address, under ORS 181A.780 (4)(c), the  manner in which each law enforcement agency
within the county will comply with ORS 181A.790 [ (5)(a)] (5) and (6)(a) .
(4) Address, under ORS 181A.780 (4)(d), the manner in which the district  attorney of the county
will exercise discretion to resolve issues of potential criminal responsibility.
(5) Address, under ORS 181A.780 (4)(e), the manner  in which each law enforcement agency
within the county will comply with ORS 181A.790 [ (6)] (7).
SECTION 3.
 ORS 181A.800 is amended to read:
[2]
SB 582
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
181A.800. Notwithstanding ORS 181A.780, 181A.785 and 181A.790 (3) and (6), if  sufficient moneys
are not appropriated to the Department of  Justice for purposes of making grants under ORS
181A.805, a deadly  physical force planning authority created by ORS 181A.780 or a law enforcement
agency is not required to comply with any requirement of ORS 181A.780, 181A.785  or 181A.790 (3)
or [ (6)] (7) for which the law enforcement agency  is entitled to reimbursement under ORS 181A.805.
SECTION 4.
Section 5 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 192.311 to
192.478.
SECTION 5. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 192.415, when a person seeking to inspect or receive
a copy of a public record described in ORS 192.345 (40) is denied access  to the record, and the
record pertains to the use of  deadly physical force by a police officer, in lieu of petitioning
the district attorney under ORS  192.415 the person seeking the record may directly file the
petition in the circuit court for the county in which the public body is located requesting that
the court order the public record to be made available for inspection or to be produced.
(2) A petition under this section shall be in substantially  the same form as the petition
described in ORS 192.422. A copy of the petition shall be served on the district attorney of
the county in which the public body is located.
(3) When a petition is filed under this section, the court shall  hold a hearing. The district
attorney may appear at the hearing to oppose the petition. The court has  jurisdiction to or-
der the production  of any records improperly withheld from the person seeking disclosure.
The court, on its own motion, may view the records in controversy in  camera before reach-
ing a decision. Any noncompliance with the order of the court may be  punished as contempt
of court.
(4) A filing fee is not required for a proceeding described in this section.
SECTION 6.
Section 7 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS  181A.355 to
181A.689.
SECTION 7. The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training shall develop uni-
form technical standards for law enforcement units for  the maintenance, retention and se-
cure storage of audio and video recordings from cameras worn on a police officer’s person.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]