Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 660.300 to
660.364.
SECTION 2. (1) The Prosperity 1,000 Pilot Program is  established to provide career
coaching, occupational training and job placement services for at least 1,000 low-income job
seekers who reside in areas of concentrated poverty.
(2) The goals of the pilot program are to:
(a) Include at least 1,000 total participants;
(b) Ensure that 100 percent of the participants are individuals who receive:
(A) Supplemental nutrition assistance under ORS 411.806 to 411.845; or
(B) Temporary assistance for needy families under ORS 412.001 to 412.069;
(c) Ensure that individuals who are historically underserved are included;
(d) Ensure that at least 50 percent of the participants are women;
(e) Ensure that individuals who are in offender reentry programs are included;
(f) Ensure that at least 80 percent of the participants  successfully complete the program;
(g) Ensure that at least 75 percent of the participants successfully  obtain employment;
and
(h) Ensure  that at least 75 percent of the participants who successfully obtain employ-
ment earn at least $15 per hour.
(3) The pilot  program shall be administered by local workforce development boards. The
boards shall:
(a) Coordinate with  nonprofit community-based organizations and educational insti-
tutions to provide career coaching, occupational training and job placement services to pilot
program participants;
(b) Distribute available funds to nonprofit community-based organizations and educa-
tional institutions that provide services to pilot program participants; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2485
HB 2310
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
(c) Identify and conduct outreach to target sector businesses and industry organizations
regarding participation in the pilot program.
(4)(a) As used in this subsection, the “SNAP Employment and Training Program”  means
the employment and training component of the  federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program under 7 U.S.C. 2015(d)(4).
(b) The Department of Human Services shall:
(A) Incorporate the  pilot program into the statewide plan for the SNAP Employment and
Training Program;
(B) Seek federal reimbursement of 50 percent of the pilot program’s costs; and
(C) Refer individuals who  receive supplemental nutrition assistance under ORS 411.806
to 411.845 to participate in the pilot program.
(5)(a) The board and the department shall establish a joint steering committee to:
(A) Oversee the progress of the pilot program;
(B) Ensure that pilot program goals are met; and
(C) Coordinate necessary support  services, including child care, for participants of the
pilot program.
(b) The board shall provide staff support for the steering committee.
SECTION 3.
The Department of Human Services  shall compile information from each
local workforce development board on the progress each board is making in carrying out the
Prosperity 1,000 Pilot Program established under section  2 of this 2019 and submit an annual
report to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to workforce develop-
ment no later than December 31 of each calendar year,  in the manner provided in ORS
192.245.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human  Services, to be distributed in consultation with the State
Workforce and Talent Development Board, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,  out of
the General Fund,  the amount of $5,000,000, for distribution to local workforce development
boards for the purpose of implementing the  pilot program established under section 2 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 5. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2019 Act are repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]