Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 650.005 to
650.100.
SECTION 2. An agreement between a franchisor  and a franchisee may not require hours
or days of operation for the franchisee’s business  that the franchisee deems unprofitable or
unsafe or that require the franchisee to conduct operations on a religious holiday.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of  this 2025 Act applies to agreements that franchisors and
franchisees enter into or renew on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 153