Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “cannabis” includes hemp and marijuana.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture shall advance the design of standards and iden-
tification of pilot sites for the implementation of a cannabis business certification program.
(3) The cannabis business  certification program must promote market-based approaches
that create incentives for cannabis  business operations to use low-carbon cultivation tech-
niques that use energy and water efficiently.
(4) The department may contract  with a third-party nonprofit organization that has
technical expertise in the measurement of and best  practices associated with energy and
water usage in cannabis businesses.
SECTION 2. The Oregon Liquor Control  Commission shall allocate to the State Depart-
ment of Agriculture, for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, out of the Marijuana Control and
Regulation Fund established under ORS 475B.296, the  amount of $300,000 for the purposes
described in section 1 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2020 Act takes effect on July 1, 2020.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 192