Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 475.916 is amended to read:
475.916. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally:
(a) To deliver as a registrant a controlled substance classified in  Schedule I or II, except pur-
suant to an order form as required by ORS 475.175;
(b) To use in the course of manufacture or delivery of a  controlled substance a registration
number which is fictitious, revoked, suspended or issued to another person;
(c) To acquire or to attempt to acquire or obtain or attempt to obtain possession of a controlled
substance by misrepresentation, fraud, forgery, deception or subterfuge;
(d) To furnish false or fraudulent material  information in, or omit any material information from,
any application, report, record or other document required  to be kept or filed under ORS 475.005 to
475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980; or
(e) To make,  deliver or possess any punch, die, plate, stone or other thing designed to print,
imprint or reproduce the  trademark, trade name or other identifying mark, imprint or device of an-
other or any likeness of  any of the foregoing upon any drug or container or labeling thereof so as
to render the drug a counterfeit substance.
[(2) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. ]
(2)(a) Violation of subsection (1)(a) to (d) of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Violation of subsection (1)(e) of this section is a Class C felony.
SECTION 2.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 163