Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon  Health Authority shall partner with a nonprofit organization
in this state with expertise in school nursing services to study and  develop recommendations
on health care and health services provided in kindergarten through grade  12 schools oper-
ated by school districts, as defined in ORS 330.005, or that are provided by  education service
districts, as defined in ORS 334.003.
(2) The purposes of the study and recommendations are to:
(a) Develop a uniform framework for standards, best practices and scope of health care
and health services delivered in public schools by a school district or education  service dis-
trict, but not  through a contracted third-party provider of health care or health services;
and
(b) Address issues involving:
(A) Proper protocols for medical health management plans;
(B) Student mental health needs;
(C) Health care and health services needs of students in an individualized education  pro-
gram or on a 504 Plan;
(D) Medication dispensing procedures;
(E) Procedures for delegating health services to nonnursing school personnel;
(F) Billing procedures  for submitting claims to health benefit plans, Medicaid or other
sources of reimbursement for costs of provided services; and
(G) Any other issue that  the authority and the nonprofit organization determine to be
of assistance  in fostering standardization, effectiveness and efficiency in the provision of
comprehensive health services in public schools and public charter schools.
(3) The authority shall make a preliminary report to the interim  committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to health and education on or before January 15, 2020.
(4) The authority shall, on or before September 1, 2020:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3157
HB 2720
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(a) Make a final report to the Legislative Assembly  on the issues described in subsection
(2) of this  section, including any requests for legislation needed to implement recommen-
dations; and
(b) Adopt administrative rules to implement those recommendations for which the au-
thority already possesses statutory authority to adopt rules.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $250,000, which  may be expended on grants to a nonprofit or-
ganization with expertise in  school nursing services, for the purpose of assisting the au-
thority in studying and making the recommendations described in section 1 of  this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]