Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Human Services shall  study existing laws and rules
governing the transition  of individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities from
youth residential settings  to adult residential settings. The department shall submit a report
in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation
designed to improve  the transition process, to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to human services no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2651