Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 285B.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall establish a revolving
loan program to provide loans with interest rates below market  rates to cities or tribal
councils of federally recognized  Indian tribes in this state for infrastructure projects that
will primarily support the development of housing within a city’s  urban growth boundary. A
project under this section may include:
(a) The development or improvement  of transportation, water, wastewater and
stormwater infrastructure; or
(b) Site development, including the development of privately owned  sites, necessary for
the improvement of transportation, water, wastewater and stormwater infrastructure.
(2) In making loans under this section, the department shall give preference  to projects
in areas that:
(a) Are designated as climate-friendly areas by the  Department of Land Conservation and
Development;
(b) Are within an  overlay zone designated as a climate-friendly area as mapped by the
department;
(c) Incorporate standards that comply with or exceed any requirements of the model code
within the department’s 2025 Walkable Design Standards Guidebook; or
(d) Are designated for residential infill or redevelopment.
(3) Moneys received from  loans that are repaid to the Oregon Business Development
Department under this section must be deposited into  the Climate-Friendly Housing
Infrastructure Revolving Fund under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4303
SB 1103
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
SECTION 3.
(1) The Climate-Friendly Housing Infrastructure Revolving Fund  is estab-
lished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Climate-Friendly Housing Infrastructure Revolving Fund consists  of moneys ap-
propriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly  or
otherwise and payments received under section 2 (3) of this 2025 Act.
(3) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department to implement the loan program under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) On or before July  1, 2026, the Oregon Business Development Department
shall adopt initial rules to implement the loan  program under section 2 of this 2025 Act and
shall begin accepting loan applications.
(2) In adopting the initial rules under this  section, the department shall, to the extent
practicable, use loan  terms and program features from the United States Environmental
Protection Agency’s Clean Water State Revolving Fund program  under 33 U.S.C. 1381 et seq.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $300,000,000, for deposit into the Climate-
Friendly Housing Infrastructure Revolving Fund under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]