Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Economic Development is established.
(2) The task force consists of seven members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall  appoint one member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from  among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint three  members to represent Oregon businesses in diverse
areas of this state.
(d) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department  shall appoint two
members with expertise in business and economic development.
(3) The task force shall research and study  the status of economic development in
Oregon, identify barriers to  economic development and business expansion and capitalization
and make recommendations to improve opportunities  for the expansion of economic devel-
opment in this state.
(4) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to business and economic development no later than September 15, 2018.
(11) The Oregon Business Development Department shall provide staff  support to the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3621
HB 2752
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
task force.
(12) Notwithstanding ORS 171.072, members of the task force who are members of the
Legislative Assembly  are not entitled to mileage expenses or a per diem and serve as volun-
teers on the task force. Other members of the  task force are not entitled to compensation
or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of the task force’s duties and, to  the extent permitted by
laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice  the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on December 31, 2018.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]