Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 161.365 is amended to read:
161.365. (1) When the court has reason to doubt the defendant’s fitness to proceed by  reason of
incapacity as described in ORS  161.360, the court may call any witness to its assistance in reaching
its decision and shall order that a community mental health program director or the director’s
designee consult with the defendant to determine whether services and supervision necessary to
safely restore the defendant’s fitness to proceed are available in the community.  After the consul-
tation, the program director or the director’s designee shall provide to  the court a copy of the
findings resulting from the consultation. If the court determines the assistance of a psychiatrist  or
psychologist would be helpful, the court may:
(a) Order that a psychiatric or psychological examination of the defendant be conducted  by a
certified evaluator as defined in ORS 161.309 and a report of the examination be prepared; or
(b) Order the  defendant to be committed for the purpose of an examination for a period not ex-
ceeding 30 days to a state mental hospital or other facility designated  by the Oregon Health Au-
thority if the defendant is at least 18 years of age, or  to a secure intensive community inpatient
facility designated by the authority if the defendant is under 18 years of age.
(2) If  the defendant is in custody at the time that the court orders an examination under
subsection (1) of this section, and remains in custody or is  committed for the examination,
the examination must occur, and the  report described in subsection (3) of this section must
be completed and filed as  described in subsection (6) of this section, within 14 days of the
court order for the examination.
[(2)] (3)  The report of an examination  described in this section must include, but is not neces-
sarily limited to, the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
(b) A statement of the mental condition of the defendant;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1946
SB 378
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) If the defendant suffers  from a qualifying mental disorder, an opinion as to whether the de-
fendant is incapacitated within the description set out in ORS 161.360; and
(d) If the defendant is incapacitated within the description set out  in ORS 161.360, a recom-
mendation of treatment and services necessary to restore capacity.
[(3)] (4) Except when the defendant and the court both request to the  contrary, the report may
not contain any findings  or conclusions as to whether the defendant as a result of a qualifying
mental disorder was subject to the provisions of ORS 161.295 or 161.300 at the time of the criminal
act charged.
[(4)] (5)  If the examination by the psychiatrist or psychologist cannot be conducted by reason
of the unwillingness of the defendant to participate in the examination, the report must so state  and
must include,  if possible, an opinion as to whether the unwillingness of the defendant was the result
of a qualifying mental disorder affecting capacity to proceed.
[(5)] (6)  The report must  be filed with the clerk of the court, who shall cause copies to be de-
livered to the district attorney and to counsel for defendant.
[(6)(a)] (7)(a)  When upon motion of the  court or a financially eligible defendant, the court has
ordered a psychiatric or psychological examination of the defendant, a  county or justice court shall
order the county to pay, and a  circuit court shall order the public defense services executive di-
rector to pay from funds available for the purpose:
(A) A reasonable fee if the examination of the defendant  is conducted by a psychiatrist or psy-
chologist in private practice; and
(B) All costs including transportation of the defendant if the examination is conducted by  a
psychiatrist or psychologist in the  employ of the Oregon Health Authority or a community mental
health program established under ORS 430.610 to 430.670.
(b) When an examination is ordered  at the request or with the acquiescence of a defendant who
is determined not to be financially eligible, the examination shall be performed at the defendant’s
expense. When an examination is ordered at the request of the prosecution, the county shall pay for
the expense of the examination.
[(7)] (8)  The Oregon Health Authority  shall establish by rule standards for the consultation de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(9) The community mental health program  director in each county, in consultation with
the district attorney of the county and  defense counsel practicing within the county, shall
establish and maintain a panel of psychiatrists and psychologists who:
(a) Hold valid certification under ORS 161.392; and
(b) Are generally  available to perform an examination ordered under subsection (1) of
this section within the time period required by subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 2.
Beginning September 15, 2020, and no later than March  15 and September
15 of each year thereafter, the presiding judge of the circuit court  in each judicial district
shall report  to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary,
in the manner provided under ORS 192.245:
(1) The total number of  examinations ordered under ORS 161.365 (1) within the previous
six months; and
(2) The number of reports of examinations described in subsection (1) of  this section that
were filed within the time period required by ORS 161.365 (2).
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
[2]