Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 341.522, as amended by section 18, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2022,  is amended
to read:
341.522. (1) The [ Office of Student Access and Completion ] Higher Education  Coordinating
Commission shall administer the Oregon Promise program as provided by this section.
(2) Subject to subsections (7) to (10) of this section, the [ office] commission shall provide a grant
[for community college courses ] to a person  who meets the criteria described in subsections (3) to (6)
of this section. The grant shall be limited as provided by subsections (7) to (10) of this section.
(3) A grant shall be awarded under this section to a person who meets the following criteria:
(a) Is enrolled in courses that are:
(A) Offered at an eligible post-secondary institution as defined in ORS 348.180  [a community
college in this state ]; and
(B) Determined by the [ office] commission , in accordance  with rules adopted by the [ Higher
Education Coordinating ] commission, to be required for completion of:
(i) A one-year curriculum for students who plan to  transfer to another post-secondary institution
of education;
(ii) An associate degree; [ or]
(iii) A bachelor’s degree; or
[(iii)] (iv) A program in career and technical education;
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, has been a resident  of this state for at
least 12 months prior to enrolling in the courses described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 425
HB 3566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Attained the person’s highest level of education, except as provided in subsection (5)  of this
section, in this state prior to:
(A) Receiving a diploma under ORS 329.451;
(B) Receiving a certificate for passing an approved  high school equivalency test such as the
General Educational Development (GED) test as provided by ORS 350.175;
(C) Completing grade 12 in compliance with the requirements of ORS 339.035; or
(D) Completing grade 12 at a private or parochial school, as described in ORS 339.030 (1)(a);
(d) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section,  attained the person’s highest
level of education as described in paragraph (c) of this subsection within  six months from the date
that the person first enrolls in courses described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection for the purpose
of receiving a grant under this section;
[(e) Earned a cumulative grade point average of 2.0 or better in high school  or otherwise demon-
strated an equivalent academic ability, as determined by the office according to rules adopted  by the
commission;]
[(f)] (e)  Completed and submitted the Free Application for Federal Student  Aid , or an equiv-
alent form designated by the commission  by rule,  for each academic year and accepted all state
and federal aid grants available to the person, if eligible to file the application; and
[(g)] (f)  Has not completed either of the following:
(A) More than a total of [ 90 credit hours ] two years of full-time coursework , or the equivalent,
at a post-secondary institution of education , excluding coursework taken as part  of an acceler-
ated learning program while enrolled in high school ; or
(B) A curriculum, degree or program, as described in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(4)(a) If a person otherwise meets the required criteria and has been awarded  a grant under
subsection (3) of this  section, but the person enters into service with a career and technical student
organization relating to agriculture or  farming that is approved by the Department of Education
under ORS 344.077 within six months  after the person attained the person’s highest level of educa-
tion as described in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the person will continue to be eligible to receive
the grant if the person first enrolls in courses  described in subsection (3)(a) of this section within
six months of finishing the person’s service with the career and technical student organization.
(b) In addition to the situation  described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the commission may
waive the requirement set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section for a person who shows  that the
person was unable to timely enroll in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section due to a
significant hardship. The commission may adopt rules to implement this paragraph.
(5)(a) A member of the  Oregon National Guard who has completed initial active duty training
is not required to comply with the criteria set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section in order to
receive a grant, provided that the member first enrolls in  courses described in subsection (3)(a) of
this section within six  months after completing initial active duty training, as evidenced by an offi-
cial form issued by the United States Department of Defense.
(b)(A) A  person who completes the highest level of education as described in subsection (3)(c)
of this section while confined in a correctional facility, either serving a  sentence of incarceration
or as a young person, youth or adjudicated youth, is not required to comply with the criteria set
forth in subsection (3)(d) of this  section in order to receive a grant, provided that the person first
enrolls in courses described  in subsection (3)(a) of this section within six months after the date on
which the person is first released from a  correctional facility following completion of the highest
level of education described in subsection (3)(c) of this section.
[2]
HB 3566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The eligibility requirements described in subsection (6)(a)(C) of this section  may be waived
by the [ office] commission according to rules adopted  by the commission for a person who receives
a grant under this section in the manner described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) As used in this paragraph:
(i) “Adjudicated youth,” “detention facility,” “young person” and “youth” have the  meanings
given those terms in ORS 419A.004.
(ii) “Correctional facility” means any place used  for the confinement of young persons, youths
or adjudicated youths or persons charged with or convicted of a crime or otherwise confined  under
a court order, including a:
(I) Youth correction facility;
(II) Detention facility;
(III) Department of Corrections institution;
(IV) Local correctional facility; or
(V) State hospital or a secure intensive community inpatient facility, with respect to  persons
detained therein who are youths or  adjudicated youths, who are charged with or convicted of a
crime or who are detained therein after  having been found guilty except for insanity of a crime
under ORS 161.290 to 161.373 or having  been found responsible except for insanity under ORS
419C.411.
(iii) “Department of Corrections institution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 421.005.
(iv) “Local correctional facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 169.005.
(v) “Youth correction facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 420.005.
(c)(A) If a person was a foster child:
(i) The person shall be treated as meeting the residency criteria for eligibility  under subsection
(3)(b) of this  section if, but for the person’s placement in out-of-state foster care, the person other-
wise meets the requirements of subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(ii) The person shall be treated as attaining the person’s highest  level of education in this state
under subsection (3)(c) of this section if the person  attained the person’s highest level of education
while placed in out-of-state foster care and the person’s highest  level of education substantially
meets the requirements under subsection (3)(c) of this section.
(iii) The person is not required to comply with the  criteria set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this
section in order to receive a grant provided that the  person completes the highest level of education
as described in subparagraph (A)(ii) of this paragraph while in a treatment program and the  person
first enrolls in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section within 12 months  after the date
on which the person is released from the treatment program.
(B) Upon request from the commission, the Department of Human Services  shall provide doc-
umentation of the placement status of a person described in paragraph (c)(A) of this subsection.
(C) As used in this paragraph:
(i) “Foster care” means substitute care for children placed  by the Department of Human Ser-
vices  or  a tribal child welfare agency away from the child’s parents and for whom the department
or agency  has placement and care responsibility, including placements in foster family homes, foster
homes of  relatives, group homes, emergency shelters, residential facilities, child care institutions and
preadoptive homes.
(ii) “Foster child” means a child over whom the Department of Human Services retained juris-
diction under ORS 417.200 for the duration of the child’s placement in foster care outside the  State
of Oregon.
[3]
HB 3566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6)(a) A person continues to remain eligible  to receive a grant under this section if the person,
in addition to satisfying the criteria specified in subsection (3) of  this section, meets the following
criteria:
(A) Maintains at least the minimum cumulative grade point average prescribed by the  commis-
sion based on federal aid grant requirements;
(B) Makes satisfactory academic  progress toward a curriculum, degree or program, as described
in subsection (3)(a)(B) of this section, as prescribed by the commission based on federal  aid grant
requirements; and
(C) Enrolls in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section :
(i) As a part-time or full-time student; and
(ii) For a sufficient number of credit hours to be considered at least a half-time  student during
each academic term , excluding summer terms,  [ for at  least three terms ] in each consecutive aca-
demic year.
(b) A person who fails to meet  an eligibility requirement described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection becomes ineligible to receive a grant under this section  for the term after which the
person fails to meet the eligibility requirement, unless the eligibility requirement  is waived by the
[office] commission according to rules adopted by the commission.
(7)(a) The  total amount of a grant awarded under this section shall be based on each term that
a person is  enrolled in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section. Except as provided in
subsections (9) and (10) of this  section, after the amount of tuition for the person for the term is
reduced by any amounts received by the person in state and federal aid grants, the person shall  be
eligible for a grant under this section in an amount that equals:
(A) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, not less than the greater of:
(i) $2,000, adjusted for inflation based on the  increase of the average cost of tuition at a com-
munity college operated under ORS chapter 341 in  a manner determined by the commission by rule;
and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
(B) Not more than the lesser of:
(i) The average cost of tuition at a community college in this  state, as determined by the
[office] commission ; and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
(b)(A) If the [ office] commission determines both that the person’s  actual cost for tuition ex-
ceeds the amount set forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i) of this subsection and that the person’s actual  cost
for tuition exceeds the average cost  of tuition at a community college in this state, the person shall
be eligible for a grant in an amount that equals the average cost of tuition at a community  college
in this state.
(B) If the [ office] commission determines that the person’s actual cost  for tuition is less than
the amount set forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i) of this subsection, the person shall be  eligible for a grant
in an amount that equals the amount set forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i) of this subsection.
(c) The minimum amount of a grant, as calculated under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this sub-
section, may be prorated  for a person who is enrolled in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this
section for a sufficient number  of credit hours to be considered at least a half-time student but not
a full-time student.
(d) The commission may prescribe by rule whether to include fees,  and any limitations related
to the inclusion of  fees, when determining the actual cost of tuition or the average cost of tuition
[4]
HB 3566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under this subsection.
(8) The commission may adopt by rule the priority by which grants are awarded, which  may
allow for preference to be  given to persons enrolled in school districts or high schools that meet
specified criteria.
(9) Prior to the  start of the fall term of each academic year, the commission shall determine
whether there are sufficient  moneys to award a grant under this section to each person who meets
the criteria described in subsections (3) to (6) of this section. When making a  determination under
this subsection, the commission  may consider both projected resources and statutory modifications
that will take effect during the  current biennium. On the basis of this determination the commission
may:
(a) Limit eligibility to receive a grant under this section to a person whose  financial resources,
as determined by the commission by rule, are at or below the level the commission  determines is
necessary to allow the commission to operate the Oregon Promise program with available moneys;
or
(b) Reduce or eliminate any limitation on eligibility previously  imposed by the commission under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(10)(a) If at any  time the commission determines that there are insufficient moneys to provide
a grant to each  person who has been awarded a grant under this section, the commission may de-
crease the total amount of the grant awarded.
(b) If at any time the commission determines that the amount  of moneys available to operate the
Oregon Promise program exceeds the amount determined under  subsection (9) of this section, the
commission may reduce or eliminate  any limitation on eligibility to receive a grant under this sec-
tion that was previously imposed by the commission under subsection (9)(a) of this section.
(c) The commission shall promptly notify  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
responsible for higher education each time the commission takes any action under paragraph (a) or
(b) of this subsection.
(11) The commission shall adopt  any rules necessary for the administration of this section, in-
cluding any requirements related to:
(a) Specifying the form and timelines for submitting an application for a grant under this section;
(b) Determining whether a person is eligible for a grant under  this section, including whether
the person shall be given priority as allowed under subsection (8) of this section;
(c) Implementing programs or  policies that improve the academic success or completion rates for
persons who receive a grant under this section;
(d) Prescribing eligibility requirements and grant calculations for persons dually enrolled in a
community college and a public university; and
(e) Evaluating the impact of the program established under this section, including any  require-
ments for reporting data needed for evaluations.
(12) No later than December 31 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall submit  to an
interim legislative committee related to  education a report that summarizes the commission’s
findings on the impact of the program established under this section. The report shall include:
(a) Student completion rates of curricula, degrees and programs described in subsection (3)(a)(B)
of this section;
(b) The  amount of federal aid grants received by persons who received a grant under this sec-
tion;
(c) The financial impact of the program  on school districts that had students receive a grant
[5]
HB 3566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under this section;
(d) The financial impact and the  enrollment impact of the program on [ community colleges and
public universities in  this state ] eligible post-secondary institutions as defined in ORS 348.180 ;
and
(e) The overall success rate of the program and financial impact of the program.
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 348.
SECTION 3. (1) In addition to any other form of student financial aid authorized by law,
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission may award moneys from the Oregon Promise
program to students who qualify to receive grants  under the program to reward student
persistence and encourage completion of degree programs at eligible post-secondary insti-
tutions.
(2) Awards made under this section are not subject to the  minimum or maximum Oregon
Promise program grant amounts established under ORS 341.522.
(3) The commission shall establish by rule eligibility criteria for awards made under  this
section. These criteria shall include, but not  be limited to, whether the student is attending
an eligible post-secondary institution on a full-time or less than full-time basis.
(4)(a) The  commission shall administer, and determine the size of, awards made under
this section.
(b) In determining the  size of awards made under this section, the commission shall
consider basing the size of the awards on a percentage of the maximum Oregon Promise
program grant amount authorized under ORS 341.522.
(5) As used in this section, “eligible post-secondary institution” has  the meaning given
that term in ORS 348.180.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 348.180 is amended to read:
348.180. As used in this section and ORS 348.205, 348.250, 348.260 and 348.263:
(1) “Cost of education” includes but is not limited to, tuition, fees and living expenses.
(2) “Eligible post-secondary institution” means:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(b) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; or
(d) An Oregon-based, generally accredited, not-for-profit institution of higher education.
(3) “Qualified  student” means any [ resident] student [ , or student exempted from paying nonresi-
dent tuition under ORS 352.287,  who plans to attend ] who has been a resident of this state for
at least 12 months prior to enrolling at  an eligible post-secondary institution and who:
(a) Has not achieved a baccalaureate or higher degree from any post-secondary institution;
(b) Is enrolled in an eligible program as defined by rule of the  Higher Education Coordinating
Commission; [and]
(c) Is making satisfactory academic progress as defined by rule of the commission ; and
(d) Has not been admitted to the United States for the sole purpose of enrolling in a
higher education program of study .
SECTION 5.
 ORS 348.205 is amended to read:
348.205. (1) The Oregon Opportunity Grant program is established within  the Higher Education
Coordinating  Commission.
(2) Under the  program, the cost of education of a qualified student shall be shared by the stu-
dent, the family of the student, the federal government and the state.
[6]
HB 3566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The [ Director of the  Office of Student Access and Completion ] commission shall determine the
cost  of  education of a qualified student based on the type of eligible post-secondary institution the
student is attending. The cost of education equals:
(a) For a student attending a community college, the  average cost of education of attending a
community college in this state;
(b) For a student attending a public university listed  in ORS 352.002, the average cost of edu-
cation of attending a public university;
(c) For a student attending  a two-year Oregon-based, generally accredited, not-for-profit institu-
tion of higher education, the average cost of education of attending a  community college in this
state; and
(d) For a student  attending the Oregon Health and Science University or a four-year Oregon-
based, generally accredited, not-for-profit institution  of higher education, the average cost of edu-
cation of attending a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(4)(a) The [ director] commission  shall determine the amount of the student share. The student
share shall be based on:
(A) The type of eligible post-secondary institution the student is attending;
(B) The number of hours of work that the [ director] commission  determines may  be reasonably
expected from the student; and
(C) The amount of loans that the [ director] commission  determines would constitute a manage-
able debt burden for the student.
(b) The student shall determine how to cover  the student share through income from work,
loans, savings and scholarships.
(c) The student share  for a student who attends a community college may not exceed the amount
that the [ director] commission determines a student may earn based on the number of hours of work
reasonably expected from the student under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d) The student share for a student who attends an eligible post-secondary  institution that is not
a community college may  not exceed the sum of the amount that the [ director] commission  deter-
mines a student may receive as loans plus  the amount a student may earn based on the number of
hours of work reasonably expected from the student under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5) The [ director] commission  shall determine the amount of  the family share. The family share
shall be based on the resources of the family.
(6) The [ director] commission  shall determine the amount of the federal share  based on how
much the student or the student’s family is expected to receive from the federal government.
(7)(a) The [ director] commission  shall determine the amount  of the state share. The state share
shall be equal to the cost of education reduced by the  student share, family share and amount re-
ceived by the student from the federal government.
(b) The  [ director] commission  shall establish a minimum amount that a student may receive as
a state share. If the [ director] commission  determines that the amount of the state share of a stu-
dent is below the minimum amount, the student may not receive the state share.
(c) The [ director] commission  may not reduce the amount of the state  share of a student based
on amounts available to the student by virtue of  being the designated beneficiary of a college
savings network account established under ORS 178.300 to 178.360.
(8) Subject to  subsection (9) of this section, if the [ director] commission  determines that there
are insufficient moneys to award the state share to all qualified students, the [ director]
commission:
[7]
HB 3566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) May establish  the maximum amount that a student may receive as a state share. This amount
may vary based  on whether the student is attending an eligible post-secondary institution on a
[half-time or] full-time or less than full-time  basis.
(b) May establish procedures that prioritize  awarding Oregon Opportunity Grants to qualified
students with the greatest financial need or whose circumstances  would enhance the promotion of
equity guidelines published by the [ Higher Education Coordinating ] commission.
(c) May not reduce the amount of the state share awarded to students in the low  income range
in a greater proportion than the amount that the state share for students in other  income ranges
is reduced.
(9)(a) The [ Higher Education Coordinating ] commission shall adopt rules  that prioritize current
foster children  and former foster children for receiving Oregon Opportunity Grants when the Oregon
Opportunity Grant program does not have sufficient funding to serve all eligible Oregon students.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection,  “former foster child” has the meaning given that term
in ORS 350.300.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 348.250 is amended to read:
348.250. (1) Grants established under ORS 348.260 shall be awarded by the  Higher Education
Coordinating Commission in the manner provided in this section.
(2) Persons interested in obtaining a  grant established under ORS 348.260 may apply to the
[Director of the Office of Student Access and Completion ] commission  for a grant.
(3) The [ director] commission  shall screen or cause to be screened the applications and shall
determine for each available grant the person best qualified to receive that grant. A  qualified ap-
plicant is eligible to receive a grant established under ORS 348.260 if:
(a) The applicant’s financial need is such that  in the opinion of the [ director] commission  fi-
nancial aid is warranted; and
(b) The applicant plans to be a student at the  eligible post-secondary institution where the grant
is to be used.
(4) The [ director] commission  shall not discriminate for or against any applicant for a grant.
(5) Nothing in this section or ORS  348.260, 348.505 to 348.615, 348.696 or 348.992 shall be con-
strued to  require any institution to admit a grant recipient or to attempt to control or influence the
policies of the institution.
(6) Whenever funds are not available to award  grants to all qualified students, the [ director]
commission may give priority to applicants who are or plan to be full-time students at  the eligible
post-secondary institution where the grant  is to be used. A student shall be considered to be a
full-time student  if the combination of credit hours at more than one eligible post-secondary insti-
tution equals full-time attendance, according to the institution disbursing the grant funds.
(7) As used in this  section, “discriminate” has the meaning given “discrimination” in ORS
659.850.
SECTION 7.  ORS 348.260 is amended to read:
348.260. (1) In addition to any other form of student financial aid authorized  by law, the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission may award Oregon Opportunity Grants to qualified students.
(2) The amount of a grant shall  equal the state share of a qualified student’s cost of education
as determined by the [ Director of the  Office of Student Access and Completion ] commission  and
comply with applicable rules and procedures described in ORS 348.205.
(3) Grant funds necessary to meet matching requirements for federal funds may also be  used to
award grants to qualified students in any eligible post-secondary institution approved by the com-
[8]
HB 3566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mission.
(4) Grants may be awarded under this  section to qualified students enrolled for any term, in-
cluding summer term. The commission  may prescribe the method and date or dates by which a stu-
dent must apply to the commission to qualify for a grant.
(5)(a) A qualified student who receives a grant under this section may apply  for renewal of the
grant on an annual basis. The commission may not renew the grant if the qualified student has not
made a timely application for renewal of the grant.
(b) The commission shall by  rule establish academic standards and benchmarks that a qualified
student must meet to have the student’s grant renewed.
(c) If a qualified student who receives a grant under  this section makes a timely application for
renewal of the  grant, meets the academic standards and benchmarks established by the commission
under this subsection and continues to meet all other grant eligibility criteria, the  grant shall be
renewed for a second year of attendance at an eligible post-secondary institution.
(d) Upon timely application by a qualified student who meets the academic  standards and
benchmarks established by the commission under this subsection and  who continues to meet all
other grant eligibility criteria, the commission may continue to renew the grant  until the qualified
student has received  the equivalent of four full-time undergraduate years of grant funding for an
eligible program as defined by the commission.
(6)(a) The  [ Director of the Office of Student Access and Completion ] commission  shall inform el-
igible post-secondary institutions of the identity of qualified  students who attend the institution and
who receive a grant under this section for more than one academic year.
(b) To the extent possible, eligible  post-secondary institutions shall ensure that qualified stu-
dents identified under this subsection are  made aware of the academic guidance and counseling
services available at the institution.
(7) A qualified student who receives a  grant under this section must attend the eligible post-
secondary institution upon which  the grant application is based unless the [ Director of the Office of
Student Access  and Completion ] commission  authorizes the grant to be used at a different eligible
post-secondary institution. A qualified student who  receives a grant under this section may attend
more than one eligible post-secondary institution if  the grant application was based on the qualified
student attending more than one eligible post-secondary institution.
(8) The commission may not make a grant award to any qualified student enrolled in  a course
of study required for and leading to a degree in theology, divinity or religious education.
(9)(a) The commission shall report annually on or before February 1 to committees of the Leg-
islative Assembly related to higher education regarding the  academic success and performance of
qualified students who receive grants under this section.
(b) In order to meet the reporting requirements set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) The commission shall by rule design a method for  evaluating the academic success and
performance of students who receive a grant under this section; and
(B) Upon a request from the commission, eligible post-secondary institutions  must provide the
commission with the data necessary for the commission to conduct its analysis.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 348.263 is amended to read:
348.263. (1) In addition to any other form of student financial aid authorized  by law, the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission may award moneys from  the Oregon Opportunity Grant pro-
gram to qualified  students to reward student persistence and encourage completion of degree pro-
grams at eligible post-secondary institutions.
[9]
HB 3566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Awards  made under this section are not subject to the maximum Oregon Opportunity Grant
amount established under ORS 348.205.
(3) The commission shall establish by  rule eligibility criteria for awards made under this section.
These criteria shall include, but not be limited to, whether the  qualified student is attending an el-
igible post-secondary institution on a full-time or [ half-time] less than full-time  basis.
(4)(a) The [ Director of the Office of Student  Access and Completion ] commission shall administer,
and determine the size of, awards made under this section.
(b) In  determining the size of awards made under this section, the [ director] commission  shall
consider basing the size of the awards on a percentage  of the maximum Oregon Opportunity Grant
amount established under ORS 348.205.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 327.108 is amended to read:
327.108. (1) As used in this section, “post-graduate scholar” means a student who:
(a) Has been in grades 9 through 12 for more than a total of four school years; and
(b) Has satisfied the requirements for a high school diploma or a  modified diploma as provided
in ORS 329.451.
(2) A school district may establish a program under this section to allow:
(a) A post-graduate scholar who satisfies the requirements of subsection (3) of this section to:
(A) Enroll in courses at  a community college that are part of a course of study approved by the
school district and that may lead to a certificate or diploma;
(B) Enroll in the courses  described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph for one school year
after the post-graduate scholar has satisfied the requirements for a high school diploma  or a modi-
fied diploma as provided in ORS 329.451; and
(C) Have  the school district pay the costs incurred for the courses described in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph, including tuition, fees and books.
(b) A school district that satisfies the requirements  of subsection (4) of this section to receive
and expend moneys distributed from the State School Fund under ORS 327.013  for the purpose of
paying the costs described in paragraph (a)(C) of this subsection.
(3) A post-graduate scholar qualifies to participate in a program established under this section
if the post-graduate scholar:
(a) Has completed and submitted the Free  Application for Federal Student Aid, if eligible to file
the application;
(b) [ Is not eligible for a grant under the  Oregon Promise program described in ORS 341.522 be-
cause of failure to earn  the minimum cumulative grade point average, or ] Submitted a complete ap-
plication for a grant under the Oregon Promise program by the  established deadline but did not
receive a grant;
(c) Is not eligible for  a federal aid grant that is equal to or more than the average cost of tuition
and fees at a community college, as determined by the Department of  Education after consultation
with the Director of the Office of Student Access and Completion; and
(d) Retains a legal residence within the boundaries of the school district through which the
post-graduate scholar satisfied the requirements for a high school diploma or a modified diploma.
(4) A school  district may receive and expend moneys distributed from the State School Fund
under ORS  327.013 for a program established under this section if the school district meets all of
the following criteria:
(a) Has a policy  for the program that is adopted by the school district board and that describes:
(A) The goals of the program, including target high school graduation rates  for underserved
[10]
HB 3566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
students;
(B) Minimum requirements  for grade point average, attendance and participation in regular in-
person meetings with school district staff to monitor student progress;
(C) The manner by which the results of the program will be measured and monitored; and
(D) The courses of study that are approved by the school district for the  purpose of this section.
(b) Enters into a written agreement with the  community college that has a service area within
which the school district is located.
(c) Has dedicated staff to provide support services to post-graduate  scholars, including regular
in-person meetings to monitor student progress that occur at least twice each month.
(d) Ensures that a majority of students from the school district who are enrolled in  courses at
a community college meet at least one of the criteria identified in this paragraph. The student:
(A) Is not a post-graduate scholar;
(B) Has received an extended diploma or a certificate for passing  an approved high school
equivalency test such as the General Educational Development (GED) test;
(C) Was enrolled in an alternative high school program within the preceding 12 months;
(D) Is, or will be, a first-generation graduate of high school;
(E) Is, or has been, a child in a foster home;
(F) Is, or has been, placed in a facility or an education program by a court;
(G) Is homeless;
(H) Is a parent; or
(I) Was identified as eligible for free or reduced price lunches within the preceding 12 months.
(5) Notwithstanding ORS 327.013, the weighted  average daily membership assigned for each
post-graduate scholar shall be adjusted as follows:
(a) By  subtracting 0.25 from the average daily membership assigned for each post-graduate
scholar participating in the program established under this section; and
(b) Without adding any amounts identified in ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A).
(6) For purposes of this section,  a school district may not counsel or assist a student to delay
receiving a high school diploma or  a modified diploma for the purpose of participating in a school-
sponsored, post-secondary education program.
(7) Nothing in this section:
(a) Prohibits a school district from receiving or expending moneys related to the  education of
post-graduate scholars that  are not received or expended for purposes of this section, as long as the
school district does not receive or expend State School  Fund distributions under ORS 327.013 for
those purposes.
(b) Requires a post-graduate scholar to accept or  use any federal grant moneys to offset costs
of tuition, fees or books incurred by a post-graduate scholar at a community college.
(c) Requires a school district to add or extend existing bus routes or  other transportation ser-
vices for post-graduate scholars. Any transportation costs incurred by a  school district to add or
extend existing bus routes or other transportation services are  not considered approved transpor-
tation costs for the purposes of ORS 327.013. Nothing in this paragraph  prohibits post-graduate
scholars from using existing bus routes or transportation services provided by the school district.
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, a post-graduate scholar may not  accept or use
any federal grant moneys to offset costs of tuition,  fees or books incurred by a post-graduate scholar
at a community college.
(9) A school district may receive or expend  moneys distributed from the State School Fund un-
[11]
HB 3566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
der ORS  327.013 for post-graduate scholars who enroll in courses at a community college only if the
post-graduate scholars are enrolled in the courses as part of a program established under  this sec-
tion.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 348.520 is amended to read:
348.520. The Director of the Office of Student Access and Completion shall:
(1) Make available to qualified persons financial aid from financial sources available to the di-
rector.
(2) Determine qualifications of persons to receive financial aid.
(3) Maintain reports and records on persons applying for and receiving financial aid from  the
director.
(4) Withhold any financial aid if the recipient thereof fails to maintain the standards established
for receipt of that aid.
(5) Recommend to  the Legislative Assembly not less than once every biennium matters relating
to the establishment, administration, modification, transfer, reduction or cancellation of financial
aid.
[(6) Prior  to implementing changes to the Oregon Opportunity Grant program, report to the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission and the Legislative Assembly or the Emergency Board  any pro-
posed change: ]
[(a) That increases or decreases  the total amount awarded as Oregon Opportunity Grants that was
approved as part of the  budget enacted by the Legislative Assembly for the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission; and ]
[(b) To the  methodology used to determine the student share, family share or state share under
ORS 348.205.]
[(7)] (6) Encourage the establishment of financial aid programs by private agencies.
[(8)] (7) Collect and disseminate information pertaining to all types of available financial aid.
[(9)] (8)  Review the administrative practices and evaluate the effectiveness of all public  and
private post-secondary financial aid programs in Oregon.
[(10)] (9) Disburse state appropriations for financial  aid in such a manner as to maximize its role
in cooperative coordination of financial aid programs.
SECTION 11.
Section 3 of this 2023  Act and the amendments to ORS 327.108, 341.522,
348.180, 348.205, 348.250, 348.260 and 348.263 by sections 1 and 4 to 9 of this 2023 Act first apply
to grants, awards and other financial aid for the 2024-2025 academic year.
[12]