Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 8 of this 2017  Act are added to and made a part of ORS 757.600
to 757.689.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in  this section, “ADMw” means the weighted average daily
membership of a school district as calculated under ORS 327.013.
(2) The State Department of Energy shall distribute moneys to school districts for facility
energy conservation upgrades and other energy efficiency projects from the School Energy
Conservation Fund established under section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(3) Each calendar year, the State Department of Energy shall distribute $100,000 to each
school district that has jurisdiction over an area that is entirely  or partially served by an
electric company or Oregon Community Power.
(4)(a) After distributing all of the moneys under  subsection (3) of this section, the State
Department of Energy shall distribute any moneys remaining  in the fund available for the
calendar year to school districts that are eligible to receive distributions under  this section,
and that have a ratio determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection that is  within the
lower two-thirds of school districts in this state, in an  amount that is equal to the school
district’s ADMw multiplied by an amount that is equal to  the total amount of moneys in the
fund after all  distributions are made under subsection (3) of this section, divided by the total
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2347
SB 539
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ADMw of all school districts that qualify for a distribution under this subsection.
(b) The State Department of Energy shall determine each school district’s ratio of  as-
sessed value of taxable property to  ADMw for the prior fiscal year on the basis of the total
assessed value of taxable property of school districts for the prior  fiscal year, as reported
to the State Department of Energy by the Department of Revenue.
(5) The State Department of Energy may adopt rules necessary for the  administration
of this section.
(6) On or before February 1 of each calendar year, each school  district receiving moneys
under this section shall submit a report to the State Department of Energy documenting  the
expenditures made with the  moneys during the previous calendar year for the purpose of
verifying that the school  district spent the moneys on facility energy conservation upgrades
and other energy efficiency projects.
SECTION 3. The School Energy Conservation  Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Interest earned by the School Energy Conser-
vation Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated
to the State Department of Energy for the purpose of making distributions under section  2
of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) The State Department of Energy shall distribute moneys to cities  for
facility energy  conservation upgrades and other energy efficiency projects from the City
Energy Conservation Fund established under section 5 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Each  calendar year, the department shall distribute $50,000 to each city that has ju-
risdiction over an area that is entirely or partially served by an electric company or  Oregon
Community Power.
(3) After distributing all of the moneys under subsection (2)  of this section, the depart-
ment shall distribute any moneys remaining in  the fund that are available for the calendar
year to cities that  are eligible to receive distributions under this section in an amount that
is equal to the city’s population multiplied by an amount that is equal  to the total amount
of moneys in the fund after all of the distributions  are made under subsection (2) of this
section, divided by the total population of  all cities that qualify for a distribution under this
section.
(4) The department may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
(5) On or before  February 1 of each calendar year, each city receiving moneys under this
section shall submit a report  to the department documenting the expenditures made with the
moneys during the previous  calendar year for the purpose of verifying that the city has spent
the moneys on facility energy conservation upgrades and other energy efficiency projects.
SECTION 5.
The City Energy Conservation Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the City Energy Conserva-
tion Fund shall be credited to the  fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated
to the  State Department of Energy for the purpose of making distributions under section 4
of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) The State Department of Energy shall distribute moneys  to counties for
facility energy conservation upgrades and other energy  efficiency projects from the County
Energy Conservation Fund established under section 7 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Each calendar year, the department shall distribute the moneys to counties that  have
jurisdiction over an  area that is entirely or partially served by an electric company or
[2]
SB 539
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Oregon Community Power.
(3) The department shall distribute moneys to each county  that is eligible to receive a
distribution under this section in an amount that is equal to  the total amount of moneys in
the fund divided by the number of counties  that qualify for a distribution under this section.
(4) The department may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
(5) On or before February 1 of each calendar year, each county receiving moneys  under
this section shall submit a report to the department documenting  the expenditures made
with the moneys during the previous calendar year for  the purpose of verifying that the
county has spent  the moneys on facility energy conservation upgrades and other energy ef-
ficiency projects.
SECTION 7.
The County Energy Conservation Fund is established in the  State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the County Energy Con-
servation Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropri-
ated to the State Department of Energy for the purpose of making  distributions under
section 6 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 8. The State Department of Energy shall review the reports  submitted to the
department under sections 2, 4 and 6 of this 2017 Act. On or  before September 15 of each
even-numbered year, the department shall report its findings in  the manner provided by ORS
192.245 to the interim  committee of the Legislative Assembly related to energy and business.
As part of the report, the department may  make recommendations for legislation to ensure
compliance with sections 2, 4 and 6 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 9.  ORS 757.612 is amended to read:
757.612. (1) There is established  an annual public purpose expenditure standard for electric
companies and Oregon Community Power to fund new cost-effective local energy conservation,  new
market transformation  efforts, the above-market costs of new renewable energy resources and new
low-income weatherization. The public  purpose expenditure standard shall be funded by the public
purpose charge described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) Beginning on the date an  electric company or Oregon Community Power offers direct ac-
cess to [ its] retail electricity consumers, except residential electricity consumers, the  electric com-
pany or Oregon Community Power shall collect a public purpose charge from all  of the retail
electricity consumers located within [ its] the electric company’s or  Oregon Community Power’s
service area until January 1, 2026. Except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, the public
purpose charge shall be equal to  three percent of the total revenues collected by the electric com-
pany, Oregon Community Power or the electricity service supplier  from [ its] retail electricity con-
sumers for electricity services, distribution  services , ancillary services, metering and billing,
transition charges and other types of costs included in electric rates on July 23, 1999.
(b) For an aluminum plant that averages more than  100 average megawatts of electricity use
per year, [ beginning on March 1, 2002, ] the electric  company or Oregon Community Power [ whose],
whichever serves  territory  that  abuts the greatest percentage of  the site of the aluminum plant ,
shall collect from the aluminum company a public purpose charge equal to one percent of  the total
revenue from the sale of electricity [ services ] to the aluminum plant [ from any source ].
(3)(a) The Public Utility  Commission shall establish rules implementing the provisions of this
section relating to electric companies and Oregon Community Power.
(b) [ Subject to paragraph (e) ] Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, funds
collected [ by an electric company or Oregon Community Power ] through public purpose charges  un-
[3]
SB 539
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
der subsection (2) of this section  shall be allocated as follows:
[(A) Sixty-three percent for new cost-effective conservation, new market transformation. ]
(A) Forty-eight percent for deposit in the School  Energy Conservation Fund established
under section 3 of this 2017 Act for the purpose of making distributions  under section 2 of
this 2017 Act.
(B) Nineteen percent for  new cost-effective  local energy conservation, new market trans-
formation efforts and the above-market costs of constructing and operating new renewable energy
resources with a  nominal electric generating capacity, as defined in ORS 469.300, of 20 megawatts
or less.
(C) Thirteen percent for new low-income weatherization.
(D) Nine percent for  deposit in the City Energy Conservation Fund established under
section 5 of this 2017 Act for the purpose of making distributions under section 4 of this  2017
Act.
(E) Six percent for deposit in the County Energy Conservation Fund  established under
section 7 of this 2017 Act for the purpose of making distributions under section 6 of this  2017
Act.
[(D)] (F) Five percent [ shall be transferred to ] for deposit in  the Housing and Community Ser-
vices Department Electricity Public Purpose Charge  Fund established by ORS 456.587 (1) [ and
used] for the purpose of providing grants as described in ORS 458.625 (2).
(c) The costs of administering subsections (1) to (6) of this section for  an electric company or
Oregon Community Power  shall be paid out of the funds collected through public purpose charges.
The commission may require [ that] an electric company or  Oregon Community Power to direct funds
collected through public  purpose charges to [ the] state agencies responsible for implementing sub-
sections  (1)  to (6) of this section in order to pay the costs of [ administering such responsibilities ]
implementation.
(d) The commission  shall direct the manner in which public purpose charges are collected and
spent by an electric company or Oregon Community  Power and may require an electric company
or Oregon Community Power to expend funds through  competitive bids or other means designed to
encourage competition, except that funds dedicated for new low-income weatherization shall be  di-
rected to the Housing and Community Services Department [ as provided in subsection (7)  of this
section] for purposes related to new low-income weatherization . The commission  [may also direct
that] may also require  funds collected [ by an electric company or Oregon Community Power ] through
public purpose charges to be paid to  a nongovernmental entity for investment in public purposes
described in subsection (1) of this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection:
(A) If an electric company collected the funds, at least 80 percent of the funds allocated for
new cost-effective local energy  conservation shall be spent  within the service area of the electric
company [ that collected the funds ]; or
(B) If Oregon Community  Power collected the funds, at least 80 percent of the funds allocated
for new cost-effective local energy  conservation shall be spent within the service area  of Oregon
Community Power.
(e)(A) The first  10 percent of [ the] funds collected [ annually] each year by an electric company
or Oregon Community Power under subsection (2)  of this section shall be distributed to school dis-
tricts that are located in the service territory of the electric company or Oregon  Community Power.
The funds shall be distributed to  individual school districts according to the weighted average daily
membership (ADMw) of  each school district for the prior fiscal year as calculated under ORS
[4]
SB 539
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
327.013. The commission shall establish by rule a methodology for distributing a  proportionate share
of funds under this paragraph to school districts that are only partially located in  the service ter-
ritory of the electric company or Oregon Community Power.
(B) A school district that receives funds under this paragraph shall use the funds  first to pay
for energy audits for schools located within the school district. A  school district may not expend
additional funds received under this  paragraph on a school [ facility] until an energy audit has been
completed for that school  [facility]. To the extent practicable, a school district shall coordinate with
the State Department  of Energy and incorporate federal funding in complying with this paragraph.
Following completion of an energy audit for an individual school, the school district  may expend
funds received under this paragraph to implement the energy audit. Once an energy audit has been
conducted  and  completely implemented for each school within the school district, the school district
may expend funds received under this paragraph for any of the following purposes:
(i) Conducting additional energy audits. A school district shall conduct an energy audit  prior
to expending funds on any other purpose authorized under this paragraph unless the  school district
has performed an energy audit within the three years immediately prior to receiving the funds.
(ii) [ Weatherization ] Weatherizing school district facilities  and upgrading  the energy effi-
ciency of school district facilities.
(iii) Energy conservation education programs.
(iv) Purchasing electricity from [ environmentally focused ] sources that protect the environ-
ment. [and]
(v) Investing in renewable energy resources.
(f) The commission may not establish a different public purpose charge than the  public purpose
charge described in subsection (2) of this section.
(g) If the commission [ directs] requires funds collected through public purpose charges to be
paid to a nongovernmental entity,  the entity shall , pursuant to an agreement entered into or
renewed between the commission and the entity :
(A) Include on the entity’s board of directors an ex officio member designated  by the commis-
sion, who shall also serve on the entity’s nominating committee for filling board vacancies.
(B) Require  the entity’s officers and directors to provide an annual disclosure of economic in-
terest to be filed  with the commission on or prior to April 15 of each calendar year for public review
in a form similar to the statement of economic interest required for  public officials under ORS
244.060.
(C) Require  the entity’s officers and directors to declare actual and potential conflicts of interest
at regular meetings of the entity’s governing body when such conflicts arise, and require an  officer
or director to abstain from participating in any discussion  or [ vote] voting on any item where that
officer or director has an actual conflict of interest. For the purposes of this subparagraph,  “actual
conflict of interest” and “potential conflict of interest” have the meanings given those terms  in ORS
244.020.
(D) Annually, arrange for an independent auditor to audit the entity’s  financial statements
[annually,] and direct the auditor to file an audit opinion with the commission for public review.
(E) Annually file with the commission  [ annually] the entity’s budget, action plan and quarterly
and annual reports for public review.
(F) At least once  every five years, contract for an independent management evaluation to review
the entity’s operations,  efficiency and effectiveness, and direct the independent reviewer to file a
report with the commission for public review.
[5]
SB 539
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) The commission  may remove from the board of directors of a nongovernmental entity an of-
ficer or director who fails to provide an annual disclosure of economic interest or who fails to  de-
clare an actual or potential conflict of interest, as described  in paragraph (g)(B) and (C) of this
subsection, [ in connection with ] if the failure is connected to  the allocation or expenditure of funds
collected through public purpose charges and [ directed] paid to the entity.
(4)(a) An electric company that satisfies its obligations under this section [ shall have ]:
(A) Has  no further obligation to invest in new cost-effective local energy  conservation, new
market transformation or new low-income weatherization , or to provide a commercial energy con-
servation services program ; and
(B) Is not subject to ORS 469.631 to 469.645 and 469.860 to 469.900.
(b) Oregon Community Power, for any period during which Oregon Community  Power collects
a public purpose charge under subsection (2) of this section:
(A) [ Shall have ] Has no [ other] further obligation to invest in new cost-effective local energy
conservation, new market transformation or new low-income weatherization , or to provide a com-
mercial energy conservation services program; and
(B) Is not subject to ORS 469.631 to 469.645 and 469.860 to 469.900.
[(5)(a)] (5)(a)(A) A retail electricity consumer that uses more  than one average megawatt of
electricity at any site in the prior year shall receive a  credit against public purpose charges billed
by an electric company or Oregon Community Power for that  site. The amount of the credit shall
be equal  to the total amount of qualifying expenditures for new cost-effective local  energy con-
servation, not to exceed 68 percent of the annual public purpose charges, and the above-market costs
[of purchases ] of new renewable energy  resources incurred by the retail electricity consumer, not
to exceed 19 percent of the annual public purpose  charges, less administration costs incurred under
this [ subsection] paragraph. The credit may not exceed, on an annual basis, the lesser of:
[(A)] (i) The amount of the retail electricity consumer’s qualifying expenditures; or
[(B)] (ii) The portion of the public purpose charge billed to  the retail electricity consumer that
is dedicated to new  cost-effective local  energy conservation, new market transformation or  the
above-market costs of new renewable energy resources.
[(b)] (B) To  obtain a credit under this [ subsection] paragraph, a retail electricity consumer
shall file with the State Department of Energy a description of the proposed conservation project
or new renewable energy resource and a declaration that the retail electricity consumer plans  to
incur the qualifying expenditure. The State Department of Energy shall issue a notice of precertif-
ication within 30 days of receipt of the filing, if such  filing is consistent with this [ subsection] par-
agraph. The credit may be taken after a retail electricity consumer provides a letter from a certified
public accountant to the State Department of Energy verifying that the  precertified qualifying ex-
penditure has been made.
[(c)] (C) Credits earned by a retail electricity consumer as a result of  qualifying expenditures
that are not used in one year may be carried forward for use in subsequent years.
[(d)(A)] (b)(A) A retail electricity consumer that uses more than one average megawatt  of
electricity at any site in the prior year may  request that the State Department of Energy hire an
independent auditor to assess the potential for conservation investments at the site. If  the inde-
pendent auditor determines there is no  available conservation measure at the site that would have
a simple payback of one to 10 years, the  retail electricity consumer shall be relieved of 54 percent
of its payment obligation for public purpose charges related to the site. If the independent  auditor
determines that there are potential conservation measures available at  the site, the retail electricity
[6]
SB 539
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
consumer shall be entitled to  a credit against public purpose charges related to the site equal to
54 percent  of the public purpose charges less the estimated cost of available conservation measures.
(B) A retail electricity consumer shall  be entitled each year to the credit described in this
[subsection] paragraph  unless a subsequent independent audit determines that  new conservation
investment opportunities are available. The State Department of  Energy may require that a new
independent audit be performed on the site to determine  whether new conservation measures are
available, provided that the independent audits [ shall] occur no more than once every two years.
(C) The retail electricity consumer shall pay the cost of the independent audits  described in this
[subsection] paragraph.
(6) Electric utilities and retail electricity consumers  shall receive a fair and reasonable credit
for the public purpose expenditures of  their energy suppliers. The State Department of Energy shall
adopt rules to determine eligible expenditures and the [ methodology] method by which such  credits
are accounted for and used. The [ rules] State Department of Energy  also shall adopt methods to
account for eligible public purpose expenditures made through consortia or collaborative projects.
(7)(a) In addition to the public purpose charge provided  under subsection (2) of this section, an
electric company or Oregon Community Power shall collect funds  for low-income electric bill pay-
ment assistance in an amount determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The commission shall establish the amount to  be collected by each electric company in cal-
endar year 2008 from retail electricity consumers served by the company, and the  rates to be
charged to retail electricity consumers served by the company,  so that the total anticipated col-
lection for low-income electric bill payment assistance by all electric  companies in calendar year
2008 is $15 million. In calendar year 2009 and subsequent calendar years, the commission  may not
change the rates  established for retail electricity consumers, but the total amount collected in a
calendar year for low-income electric  bill payment assistance may vary based on electricity usage
by retail electricity consumers  and changes in the number of retail electricity consumers in this
state. In no event shall a retail  electricity consumer be required to pay more than $500 per month
per site for low-income electric bill payment assistance.
(c) Funds collected [ by] through the low-income electric  bill payment assistance charge shall
be paid into the  Housing and Community Services Department Low-Income Electric Bill Payment
Assistance Fund established by ORS 456.587 (2). Moneys  deposited in the fund under this paragraph
shall be used by the Housing and Community Services  Department solely for [ the purpose of
funding] purposes related to  low-income electric bill payment assistance[ .] and for  the Housing
and Community Services  Department’s cost of administering this  subsection . [ shall be paid out of
funds collected by the  low-income electric bill payment assistance charge. Moneys deposited in the fund
under this paragraph shall be expended solely for low-income electric bill payment assistance. ] Funds
collected [ from] by an electric company or Oregon Community Power under this subsection  shall
be expended in the service area of the  electric company or Oregon Community Power from which
the funds are collected.
(d)(A) The Housing and Community Services Department shall determine  the manner in which
funds collected under this subsection will be  allocated by the Housing and Community Services
Department to  energy assistance program providers for the purpose of providing low-income bill
payment [ and crisis ] assistance.
(B) The Housing and Community Services  Department , in consultation  with electric com-
panies, shall investigate and may implement  alternative delivery models [ in consultation with electric
companies] to effectively reduce service disconnections and related costs to retail  electricity con-
[7]
SB 539
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
sumers and electric utilities.
(C) Priority assistance shall be directed to low-income electricity consumers who  are in danger
of having their electricity service disconnected.
(D) The Housing and Community Services  Department shall maintain records and provide
those records upon request to an electric company, Oregon  Community Power and the Citizens’
Utility Board established under ORS chapter 774 on a  quarterly basis. Records maintained must
include the numbers of low-income electricity  consumers served, the average amounts paid to low-
income electricity consumers  and the type of assistance provided to low-income electricity
consumers. Electric companies and Oregon Community Power shall,  if requested, provide the
Housing and Community Services  Department with aggregate data  relating to  low-income elec-
tricity consumers served on a quarterly basis to support program development.
(e) Interest on moneys deposited in the Housing  and Community Services Department Low-
Income Electric Bill Payment Assistance  Fund established by ORS 456.587 (2) may be used to pro-
vide bill payment [ and crisis ] assistance to electricity consumers whose primary source of  heat is
not electricity.
(f) Notwithstanding ORS 757.310, the commission may allow an electric company or  Oregon
Community Power to provide  reduced rates or other  bill payment [ or crisis ] assistance or low-income
program assistance to a low-income household eligible for assistance under the federal Low Income
Home Energy Assistance Act of 1981, as amended and in effect on July 23, 1999.
(8) For purposes of this section, “retail electricity consumers” includes any direct service  in-
dustrial consumer that purchases electricity without purchasing distribution services from the  elec-
tric  utility.
(9) For purposes of this section, [ amounts] funds collected  by Oregon Community Power through
public purpose charges are not considered moneys received from electric utility operations.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 456.587 is amended to read:
456.587. (1) The Housing  and Community Services Department Electricity Public Purpose Charge
Fund is established in the  State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest
earned by the Housing and  Community Services Department Electricity Public Purpose Charge Fund
shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Housing and
Community Services Department to be used for purposes  specified in ORS 757.612 [ (3)(b)(D)]
(3)(b)(F).
(2) The Housing  and Community Services Department Low-Income Electric Bill Payment As-
sistance Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General  Fund.
Interest earned  by the Housing and Community Services Department Low-Income Electric Bill Pay-
ment Assistance Fund shall be credited to the  fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropri-
ated to the Housing  and Community Services Department for purposes described in ORS 757.612 (7).
SECTION 11. The amendments to ORS 757.612 by section 9 of this 2017 Act apply to public
purpose charge moneys collected on or after January 1, 2018.
SECTION 12. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[8]