Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 496.146 is amended to read:
496.146. In addition to any other duties or powers  provided by law, the State Fish and Wildlife
Commission:
(1) May accept, from whatever  source, appropriations, gifts or grants of money or other property
for the purposes of wildlife management, and use such money or  property for wildlife management
purposes.
(2) May sell or exchange property owned by the state  and used for wildlife management pur-
poses when the commission determines that such sale  or exchange would be advantageous to the
state wildlife policy and management programs.
(3) May acquire, introduce, propagate and stock  wildlife species in such manner as the com-
mission determines will carry out the state wildlife policy and management programs.
(4) May by rule authorize the issuance of such  licenses, tags and permits for angling, taking,
hunting and trapping and may prescribe such tagging and sealing procedures as the  commission
determines necessary to carry out the provisions of the wildlife laws or to obtain  information for
use in wildlife  management. Permits issued pursuant to this subsection may include special hunting
permits for  a person and immediate family members of the person to hunt on land owned by that
person in  areas where permits for deer or elk are limited by quota. As used in this subsection,
“immediate family members” means spouses in a marriage,  parents, brothers, brothers-in-law, sisters,
sisters-in-law, sons,  sons-in-law, daughters, daughters-in-law, stepchildren and grandchildren. A
landowner who is qualified  to receive landowner preference tags from the commission may request
two additional tags for providing public  access and two additional tags for wildlife habitat programs.
This request shall be made to the Access and Habitat Board with  supporting evidence that the ac-
cess is significant and the habitat programs benefit wildlife. The  board may recommend that the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3364
HB 3347
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
commission  grant  the request. When a landowner is qualified under landowner preference rules
adopted by the  commission and receives a controlled hunt tag for that unit or a landowner prefer-
ence tag for the landowner’s property and does not use the tag during the  regular season, the
landowner may use that tag to take an antlerless animal, when approved by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife, to alleviate damage that is presently occurring to the landowner’s property.
(5) May by rule prescribe procedures requiring  the holder of any license, tag or permit issued
pursuant to the wildlife laws to keep records and  make reports concerning the time, manner and
place of taking wildlife, the quantities taken and such other information as the commission deter-
mines necessary for proper enforcement of the wildlife laws or to  obtain information for use in
wildlife management.
(6) May establish special  hunting and angling areas or seasons in which only persons less than
18 years of age or over 65 years of age are permitted to hunt or angle.
(7) May acquire by purchase, lease, agreement or gift real property  and all appropriate interests
therein for wildlife management and wildlife-oriented recreation purposes.
(8) May acquire  by purchase, lease, agreement, gift, exercise of eminent domain or otherwise
real property and all interests therein and establish, operate and maintain thereon public  hunting
areas.
(9) May establish and develop  wildlife refuge and management areas and prescribe rules gov-
erning the use of  such areas and the use of wildlife refuge and management areas established and
developed pursuant to any other provision of law.
(10) May by rule prescribe fees for licenses, tags, permits and  applications issued or required
pursuant to the wildlife laws, and  user charges for angling, hunting or other recreational uses of
lands owned or managed by the commission, unless such fees or user charges are otherwise pre-
scribed by law. No  fee or user charge prescribed by the commission pursuant to this subsection shall
exceed $250.
(11) May enter into contracts with any  person or governmental agency for the development and
encouragement of wildlife research and management programs and projects.
(12) May perform such  acts as may be necessary for the establishment and implementation of
cooperative wildlife management programs with agencies of the federal government.
(13) May offer and pay rewards for the arrest and conviction of any person who  has violated
any of the wildlife laws. No such reward shall exceed $1,000 for any one arrest and conviction.
(14) May by rule prescribe fees for  falconry licenses issued pursuant to the wildlife laws, unless
such fees are otherwise prescribed by law. Fees prescribed by the commission pursuant to this sub-
section shall be based on actual or  projected costs of administering falconry regulations and shall
not exceed $250.
(15) May establish special fishing and hunting  seasons and bag limits applicable only to persons
with disabilities.
(16) May adopt optimum populations for deer and elk consistent with ORS 496.012.  These popu-
lation levels shall be reviewed at least once every five years.
(17) Shall establish a preference system so  that individuals who are unsuccessful in controlled
hunt permit drawings for deer and elk hunting have reasonable assurance  of success in those
drawings in subsequent years. In establishing the preference system,  the commission shall consider
giving additional preference points to  persons who have been issued a resident annual pioneer
combination  license  pursuant to ORS 497.132 or resident disabled veteran hunting license under ORS
497.102.
[2]
HB 3347
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(18) May sell advertising in State  Department of Fish and Wildlife publications, including annual
hunting and angling regulation publications.
(19) May, notwithstanding the fees required  by ORS 497.112, provide free hunting tags to an
organization that sponsors hunting trips for terminally ill children.  Except as provided under ORS
497.116, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife may not issue more than 15 tags annually  under
this subsection.
(20) Shall, after consultation with the State Department of Agriculture, adopt rules  prohibiting
the use of the World Wide Web, other  Internet protocols or broadcast or closed circuit media to
remotely control a weapon for the purpose of hunting any game bird, wildlife,  game mammal or
other mammal. The rules may exempt the State Department of Fish and Wildlife or  agents of the
department from the prohibition.
(21) May adopt rules establishing a schedule of civil  penalties, not to exceed $6,500 per vio-
lation, for violations  of provisions of the wildlife laws or rules adopted by the commission under the
wildlife laws.  Civil penalties established under this subsection must be imposed in the manner pro-
vided by ORS 183.745 and must be deposited in the State Wildlife Fund established  under ORS
496.300.
(22) May by rule impose a surcharge not to exceed $25 for the renewal of  a hunting license on
any person who fails to comply  with mandatory hunting reporting requirements. Amounts collected
as surcharges under this subsection must be deposited in the State Wildlife  Fund established under
ORS 496.300.
(23) May by  rule establish annual and daily Columbia Basin salmon, steelhead and sturgeon
recreational fishing endorsements with a fee not to exceed $9.75 per annual  license and $1 per day
per daily license.  An endorsement is required to fish for salmon, steelhead or sturgeon in portions
of the Columbia Basin as designated  by rule and is in addition to and not in lieu of angling licenses
and tags required under the wildlife laws. Amounts collected as  fees under this subsection must be
deposited in the Columbia River Fisheries Enhancement Fund  established under section 7, chapter
672, Oregon Laws 2013.
(24) May by rule establish annual and daily Willamette River salmon, steelhead and
sturgeon recreational fishing endorsements with a fee not to exceed $9.75  per annual license
and $1 per day per daily license.  An endorsement is required to fish for salmon, steelhead
or sturgeon in portions of the Willamette River as designated by rule and is in  addition to
and not in lieu of angling licenses and tags required  under the wildlife laws. Amounts col-
lected as fees under this subsection must be deposited  in the Willamette River Fisheries
Enhancement Fund established by section 3 of this 2021 Act.
[(24)] (25)  May by rule establish multiyear licenses and may prescribe fees for such  licenses.
Fees prescribed  by the commission for multiyear licenses may provide for a discount from the annual
license fees that would otherwise be payable for the period of  time covered by the multiyear license.
[(25)] (26)  May by rule establish a program to offer unique fishing opportunities through
drawings, raffles or auctions and charge application and participation fees for the program.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 496.146, as amended by section 10, chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2013, section
52, chapter 629, Oregon Laws  2015, section 8, chapter 779, Oregon Laws 2015, section 4, chapter 100,
Oregon Laws 2018, and section 2, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
496.146. In addition to any other duties or powers  provided by law, the State Fish and Wildlife
Commission:
(1) May accept, from whatever  source, appropriations, gifts or grants of money or other property
[3]
HB 3347
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for the purposes of wildlife management, and use such money or  property for wildlife management
purposes.
(2) May sell or exchange property owned by the state  and used for wildlife management pur-
poses when the commission determines that such sale  or exchange would be advantageous to the
state wildlife policy and management programs.
(3) May acquire, introduce, propagate and stock  wildlife species in such manner as the com-
mission determines will carry out the state wildlife policy and management programs.
(4) May by rule authorize the issuance of such  licenses, tags and permits for angling, taking,
hunting and trapping and may prescribe such tagging and sealing procedures as the  commission
determines necessary to carry out the provisions of the wildlife laws or to obtain  information for
use in wildlife  management. Permits issued pursuant to this subsection may include special hunting
permits for  a person and immediate family members of the person to hunt on land owned by that
person in  areas where permits for deer or elk are limited by quota. As used in this subsection,
“immediate family members” means spouses in a marriage,  parents, brothers, brothers-in-law, sisters,
sisters-in-law, sons,  sons-in-law, daughters, daughters-in-law, stepchildren and grandchildren. A
landowner who is qualified  to receive landowner preference tags from the commission may request
two additional tags for providing public  access and two additional tags for wildlife habitat programs.
This request shall be made to the Access and Habitat Board with  supporting evidence that the ac-
cess is significant and the habitat programs benefit wildlife. The  board may recommend that the
commission  grant  the request. When a landowner is qualified under landowner preference rules
adopted by the  commission and receives a controlled hunt tag for that unit or a landowner prefer-
ence tag for the landowner’s property and does not use the tag during the  regular season, the
landowner may use that tag to take an antlerless animal, when approved by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife, to alleviate damage that is presently occurring to the landowner’s property.
(5) May by rule prescribe procedures requiring  the holder of any license, tag or permit issued
pursuant to the wildlife laws to keep records and  make reports concerning the time, manner and
place of taking wildlife, the quantities taken and such other information as the commission deter-
mines necessary for proper enforcement of the wildlife laws or to  obtain information for use in
wildlife management.
(6) May establish special  hunting and angling areas or seasons in which only persons less than
18 years of age or over 65 years of age are permitted to hunt or angle.
(7) May acquire by purchase, lease, agreement or gift real property  and all appropriate interests
therein for wildlife management and wildlife-oriented recreation purposes.
(8) May acquire  by purchase, lease, agreement, gift, exercise of eminent domain or otherwise
real property and all interests therein and establish, operate and maintain thereon public  hunting
areas.
(9) May establish and develop  wildlife refuge and management areas and prescribe rules gov-
erning the use of  such areas and the use of wildlife refuge and management areas established and
developed pursuant to any other provision of law.
(10) May by rule prescribe fees for licenses, tags, permits and  applications issued or required
pursuant to the wildlife laws, and  user charges for angling, hunting or other recreational uses of
lands owned or managed by the commission, unless such fees or user charges are otherwise pre-
scribed by law. No  fee or user charge prescribed by the commission pursuant to this subsection shall
exceed $250.
(11) May enter into contracts with any  person or governmental agency for the development and
[4]
HB 3347
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
encouragement of wildlife research and management programs and projects.
(12) May perform such  acts as may be necessary for the establishment and implementation of
cooperative wildlife management programs with agencies of the federal government.
(13) May offer and pay rewards for the arrest and conviction of any person who  has violated
any of the wildlife laws. No such reward shall exceed $1,000 for any one arrest and conviction.
(14) May by rule prescribe fees for  falconry licenses issued pursuant to the wildlife laws, unless
such fees are otherwise prescribed by law. Fees prescribed by the commission pursuant to this sub-
section shall be based on actual or  projected costs of administering falconry regulations and shall
not exceed $250.
(15) May establish special fishing and hunting  seasons and bag limits applicable only to persons
with disabilities.
(16) May adopt optimum populations for deer and elk consistent with ORS 496.012.  These popu-
lation levels shall be reviewed at least once every five years.
(17) Shall establish a preference system so  that individuals who are unsuccessful in controlled
hunt permit drawings for deer and elk hunting have reasonable assurance  of success in those
drawings in subsequent years. In establishing the preference system,  the commission shall consider
giving additional preference points to  persons who have been issued a resident annual pioneer
combination  license  pursuant to ORS 497.132 or resident disabled veteran hunting license under ORS
497.102.
(18) May sell advertising in State  Department of Fish and Wildlife publications, including annual
hunting and angling regulation publications.
(19) May, notwithstanding the fees required  by ORS 497.112, provide free hunting tags to an
organization that sponsors hunting trips for terminally ill children.  Except as provided under ORS
497.116, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife may not issue more than 15 tags annually  under
this subsection.
(20) Shall, after consultation with the State Department of Agriculture, adopt rules  prohibiting
the use of the World Wide Web, other  Internet protocols or broadcast or closed circuit media to
remotely control a weapon for the purpose of hunting any game bird, wildlife,  game mammal or
other mammal. The rules may exempt the State Department of Fish and Wildlife or  agents of the
department from the prohibition.
(21) May adopt rules establishing a schedule of civil  penalties, not to exceed $6,500 per vio-
lation, for violations  of provisions of the wildlife laws or rules adopted by the commission under the
wildlife laws.  Civil penalties established under this subsection must be imposed in the manner pro-
vided by ORS 183.745 and must be deposited in the State Wildlife Fund established  under ORS
496.300.
(22) May by rule impose a surcharge not to exceed $25 for the renewal of  a hunting license on
any person who fails to comply  with mandatory hunting reporting requirements. Amounts collected
as surcharges under this subsection must be deposited in the State Wildlife  Fund established under
ORS 496.300.
(23) May by rule establish annual and daily Willamette River salmon, steelhead and
sturgeon recreational fishing endorsements with a fee not to exceed $9.75  per annual license
and $1 per day per daily license.  An endorsement is required to fish for salmon, steelhead
or sturgeon in portions of the Willamette River as designated by rule and is in  addition to
and not in lieu of angling licenses and tags required  under the wildlife laws. Amounts col-
lected as fees under this subsection must be deposited  in the Willamette River Fisheries
[5]
HB 3347
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
Enhancement Fund established by section 3 of this 2021 Act.
[(23)] (24)  May by rule establish multiyear licenses and may prescribe fees for such  licenses.
Fees prescribed  by the commission for multiyear licenses may provide for a discount from the annual
license fees that would otherwise be payable for the period of  time covered by the multiyear license.
[(24)] (25)  May by rule establish a program to offer unique fishing opportunities through
drawings, raffles or auctions and charge application and participation fees for the program.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Willamette River Fisheries  Enhancement Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Willamette River Fisheries Enhancement Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in  the
fund are continuously appropriated to the State Department of  Fish and Wildlife to imple-
ment measures that enhance fisheries, optimize the economic  benefits of fisheries and ad-
vance native fish conservation. The Willamette River Endorsements Board established within
the department by section 4 of this 2021 Act shall determine the uses of the moneys.
(2) The State Fish  and Wildlife Commission may accept grants, donations, contributions
or gifts from any source for deposit in the Willamette River Fisheries Enhancement Fund.
(3) The Willamette River Fisheries Enhancement Fund shall consist of:
(a) Any  moneys accepted by the commission pursuant to subsection (2) of this section;
and
(b) Any fees  collected by the commission for annual and daily Willamette River salmon,
steelhead and sturgeon recreational fishing endorsements.
SECTION 4.
(1) There is established within the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife the
Willamette River Endorsements Board. The board shall determine the  use of moneys in the
Willamette River Fisheries Enhancement Fund established by  section 3 of this 2021 Act,
subject to the purposes described in section 3 (1) of this 2021 Act.
(2) The  State Fish and Wildlife Commission shall appoint to the board members who
represent anglers.
(3) A member of the board shall receive no compensation for serving as a member.
(4) The term of office of a member is four years. A member is eligible  for reappointment.
(5) An official action of the board may be taken  only upon the affirmative vote of a ma-
jority of the members.
(6) The board shall select such officers for such terms and with  such duties and powers
as the board considers necessary for the performance of those offices.
(7) The board shall meet at  such times and at such places as may be determined by the
chairperson of the board or by the majority of the members.
[6]