Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Facility” means:
(A) A residential treatment facility;
(B) A residential treatment home;
(C) A secure residential treatment facility; or
(D) A secure residential treatment home.
(b) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “Residential treatment facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.400.
(d) “Residential treatment home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.400.
(e) “Secure residential treatment facility” means a facility described in ORS 443.465.
(f) “Secure residential treatment home” means a home described in ORS 443.465.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Study potential allowable alternatives or exceptions to current  nurse staffing re-
quirements in secure residential treatment  facilities to address workforce challenges while
balancing the safety of providers and consumers.
(b) Assess all methodologies permitted by federal law for reimbursing facilities. The  au-
thority shall consider alternatives to the current reimbursement  rate methodology used by
the authority and recommend a methodology that considers:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4699
SB 1195
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Staffing costs for a facility;
(B) The need to incentivize a facility  to hold open a resident’s room when a resident is
removed from the facility for a brief period of time;
(C) The need to pay facility staff a professional wage;
(D) The need to incentivize a  facility to operate, develop and staff as large of a program
as is possible and safe; and
(E) The need to encourage facilities to serve residents with similar levels of care needs.
(c) Determine whether the authority may, under federal law, administer residential be-
havioral health services  to medical assistance recipients through options other than through
the state’s Home and Community-Based Services waiver,  under 42 U.S.C. 1396n(c), or a state
plan amendment under 42 U.S.C. 1396n(i). To the extent that alternative models  of adminis-
tering residential behavioral health services to medical assistance recipients  are permissible
under federal law, the authority shall:
(A) Analyze alternative models that  have been approved by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services for use in other states;
(B) Evaluate the cost of any alternative models; and
(C) Develop recommendations about:
(i) Alternative options that would allow the  authority to increase reimbursement rates
for facilities;
(ii) Alternative options that  would not subject facilities to a requirement that facilities
provide an eviction process that is as protective as state landlord-tenant law;
(iii) How alternative models may support facilities  in serving residents with high acuity
behavioral health needs and what protections are available to ensure that residents with high
acuity behavioral health  needs are not prematurely or inappropriately discharged for prob-
lematic behaviors;
(iv) A discharge process for residents who decline  to participate in treatment and are
therefore not suited for continued services by a facility; and
(v) An appeal process for both facilities and residents.
(d) Determine the feasibility of supporting the direct discharge of  a resident, when
deemed medically necessary and clinically prudent, from  a facility to other types of housing
without requiring a third-party referral.
(e) Evaluate options for providing, and develop recommendations for funding,  capacity
payments to facilities when a resident is hospitalized or  temporarily absent due to a law
enforcement encounter.
(3) No later than September 15, 2026, the authority shall  report its findings and recom-
mendations from the studies conducted under this section, in the manner provided in ORS
192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Facility” means:
(A) A residential treatment facility;
(B) A residential treatment home;
(C) A secure residential treatment facility; or
(D) A secure residential treatment home.
(b) “Residential treatment facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.400.
(c) “Residential treatment home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.400.
[2]
SB 1195
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
(d) “Secure residential treatment facility” means a facility described in ORS 443.465.
(e) “Secure residential treatment home” means a home described in ORS 443.465.
(f) “Transition aged youth residential treatment home” means a residential  treatment
home for young adults between the ages of 17.5 and 25 years of age who experience  complex
behavioral health challenges.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules to:
(a) Allow a new residential treatment facility or residential treatment home  to accept a
conditional referral of a prospective resident before the licensure process has been  com-
pleted, subject to a requirement that the  prospective resident may not be placed in the new
residential treatment facility or residential treatment  home until the licensure process has
been completed.
(b) Support facilities in developing early transition plans for residents.
(c) Establish a separate licensing  process for transition aged youth residential treatment
homes.
(3) No later than September 15, 2025, the authority shall submit an interim report, in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to health, about the authority’s progress in carrying out the  provisions of this section
and any recommendations for needed legislative changes.
(4) No later than September 15, 2026, the authority  shall submit a final report, in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to health, about the  authority’s progress in carrying out the provisions of this section
and any recommendations for needed legislative changes.
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]