Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 118.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding ORS 118.010 (4), no tax  is due under this chapter with re-
spect to the estates of  decedents who die on or after January 1, 2026, unless the value of the
Oregon taxable estate exceeds $13.99 million.
SECTION 3.  ORS 118.160 is amended to read:
118.160. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) An inheritance tax return is not required with respect to the  estates of decedents who die
on or after January 1, 1987, and before January 1, 2003, unless  a federal estate tax return is re-
quired to be filed;
(b) An inheritance tax return is not required with respect to the  estates of decedents who die
on or after:
(A) January 1, 2003, and before January 1, 2004,  unless the value of the gross estate is $700,000
or more;
(B) January 1, 2004, and before January 1, 2005, unless the  value of the gross estate is $850,000
or more;
(C) January 1, 2005, and before January 1, 2006, unless the  value of the gross estate is $950,000
or more; or
(D) January 1,  2006, and before January 1, 2012, unless the value of the gross estate is $1 million
or more; and
(c) An estate tax return is not required with  respect to the estates of decedents who die on or
after:
(A) January 1, 2012, and before January 1, 2026,  unless the value of the gross estate is $1
million or more[ .]; or
(B) January 1, 2026, unless the value of the gross estate exceeds $13.99 million.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 144
HB 2058
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
(2) In every estate, whether or not subject to administration and whether or  not a federal estate
tax return is required to be filed, the executor shall  at such times and in such manner as required
by rules of the Department of Revenue, file with the department a  return in a form provided by the
department setting forth a list and description of all transfers of property, in trust or otherwise,
made by the decedent in the lifetime of the decedent as a division or  distribution of the estate of
the decedent and any further  data that the department requires to determine estate tax under this
chapter.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]