Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $_______, for distribution to Portland State
University to  fund recruitment and retention payments to child care providers working in
Oregon through the Oregon Center for Career Development in Childhood Care and  Educa-
tion.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, for distribution to United We Heal
Training Trust to provide health care benefits to child care providers.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______,  for distribution to child care
workforce training programs.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2153