Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Affiliate” means  a person that controls, is controlled by or is under common control
with another person.
(b) “Environmental marketing claim” means a public representation in a label,  adver-
tisement, promotion, symbol, logo, brand name  or other communication that a person pub-
lishes in selling or offering for sale a product or service and in which  the person states that
the product or service benefits the natural environment or offsets or  reduces an imbalance,
harm or other negative effect on the natural environment.
(c) “Net zero balance” means an equilibrium between the amount of  greenhouse gas
emissions a person causes or  produces overall and the amount of greenhouse gas emissions
reductions the person achieves, by whatever method.
(d) “Net zero claim” means an  environmental marketing claim that specifically repres-
ents that a person, product or service:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1542
SB 680
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Achieves or contributes to achieving a balance between the amount of  greenhouse
gases the person, or the production, distribution or use  of the product or service, emits into
the natural environment and the amount of  greenhouse gases the person, or the production,
distribution or use of the product or service, removes from the natural environment; or
(B) Offsets or reduces the amount  of greenhouse gases that already exist in the natural
environment.
(e) “Reasonable resident” means a resident who acts with prudence, care,  ordinary in-
telligence and reason in weighing and evaluating an assertion or claim.
(f) “Reputational advertising”  means a public representation that a person publishes or
causes to be published for the purpose of creating a  positive public perception of the person,
or of products or services the person  makes, distributes or sells, even if the person does not
make the representation in direct connection with an  offer or sale of a particular product
or service.
(g) “Resident” means a natural person who resides in this state.
(2)(a) A person may not publish or cause to  be published an environmental marketing
claim or  net zero claim, or publish or cause to be published reputational advertising, that is
materially false, misleading, deceptive or fraudulent.
(b) An environmental marketing claim is materially false, misleading, deceptive or
fraudulent if the person intends for a recipient of the claim to rely on the  claim, or if a
reasonable resident would otherwise rely on the claim in a decision  to patronize the person,
or purchase the person’s products or services, and the claim:
(A) Consists of or includes material information that is provably false;
(B) Omits or conceals material facts about the person or the person’s products  or ser-
vices that substantially contradict or disprove the  claim or that, if accurately and completely
stated, would add context  necessary for a reasonable resident to reliably evaluate the truth
or falsity of the claim;
(C) Is not supported by  competent and reliable scientific evidence, if the person asserts
that a scientific basis exists for the claim;
(D) Is so overly broad and general that the person cannot substantiate the claim;
(E) Fails to qualify the claim with clear, prominent, specific and  significant benefits to
the natural environment, if the claim is general in nature; or
(F) Fails to mention or discuss  potential costs or tradeoffs, if the claim asserts that a
special attribute of the  person or the person’s products or services benefits the natural en-
vironment.
(c) A net zero claim is materially false, misleading, deceptive or fraudulent if the  person
intends for a recipient  of the claim to rely on the claim, or if a reasonable resident would
otherwise rely on the claim in a decision to patronize the  person, or purchase the person’s
products or services, and the claim:
(A) Consists of or includes material information that is provably false;
(B) Omits or conceals material facts about the person or the person’s products  or ser-
vices that substantially contradict or disprove the  claim or that, if accurately and completely
stated, would add context  necessary for a reasonable resident to reliably evaluate the truth
or falsity of the claim;
(C) Is not supported by competent and reliable scientific evidence;
(D) Does  not use appropriate or reliable accounting methods to measure greenhouse gas
[2]
SB 680
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
emissions or reductions in emissions;
(E) Is based  primarily on the person’s purchase of greenhouse gas offsets that will not
result in greenhouse gas emissions reductions for two or more years into the future;
(F) Does not specify the  method by which the person, or the person’s product or service,
achieves a net zero balance if the person is not  achieving significant and measurable actual
reductions in greenhouse gas emissions and is instead primarily purchasing greenhouse  gas
emission reduction credits from another person or is divesting from or selling another per-
son and is claiming greenhouse gas emission reductions or claiming a net zero balance  solely
on the basis of the divestment or sale;
(G) Does not specify where in the person’s supply chain or production process greenhouse
gas emission reductions occur or  whether the person has direct responsibility for greenhouse
gas emission reductions or that an affiliate of the person has direct responsibility,  if the
claim asserts only that the person has achieved a net zero balance while a part of the
person’s supply chain or production process, or an affiliate of the person, has actually in-
creased greenhouse gas emissions;
(H) Is not substantiated by  implementing actions or a plan for imminent implementing
actions; or
(I) Does not disclose that the person, or the person’s product  or service, does no more
than comply with an applicable  existing legal requirement if the person, product or service
does not in fact do more than comply with the applicable existing legal requirement.
(d) Reputational advertising is materially false,  misleading, deceptive or fraudulent if the
person intends for a  recipient of the reputational advertising to rely on the reputational ad-
vertising, or if a reasonable resident would otherwise rely on the reputational advertising in
a decision to patronize the person, or  purchase the person’s products or services, and the
reputational advertising:
(A) Consists of or includes material information that is provably false;
(B) Omits or conceals material facts about the person or the person’s products  or ser-
vices that substantially contradict or disprove the  claim or that, if accurately and completely
stated, would add context  necessary for a reasonable resident to reliably evaluate the truth
or falsity of the claim; or
(C) Fails to mention or conceals instances or incidents in which the person has knowingly
or intentionally  violated or failed to comply with state or federal environmental laws that
applied to the person or the person’s products or  services, and the violation or failure to
comply was adjudicated and resulted in a fine, civil penalty or criminal prosecution.
(3)(a) A person that publishes or causes to be published an environmental marketing
claim or net zero  claim or that publishes or causes to be published reputational advertising
that is materially false, misleading, deceptive or fraudulent:
(A) Engages in an unlawful trade practice under ORS 646.607; and
(B) Is liable for damages in an amount that does not  exceed $200 to a plaintiff that brings
an action in a court of this state in which the plaintiff asserts and proves with appropriate
evidence that:
(i) The plaintiff was a recipient of the claim or the reputational advertisement; and
(ii) The plaintiff purchased a product or service from the person based on a reliance  on
the materially false, misleading, deceptive or fraudulent claim or reputational advertising.
(b) A  person’s liability under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection does not limit the
[3]
SB 680
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
person’s liability under other applicable law or limit a cause of action a plaintiff might oth-
erwise have against the person.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 646.607 is amended to read:
646.607. A person engages in an unlawful  trade practice if in the course of the person’s business,
vocation or occupation the person:
(1) Employs any unconscionable  tactic in connection with selling, renting or disposing of real
estate, goods or services, or collecting or enforcing an obligation.
(2) Fails to deliver all or  any portion of real estate, goods or services as promised, and at a
customer’s request, fails to refund money that the customer gave to the person to purchase the
undelivered real estate, goods or services and that the person does not retain pursuant to  any right,
claim or defense  the person may assert in good faith. This subsection does not create a warranty
obligation and does not apply  to a dispute over the quality of real estate, goods or services delivered
to a customer.
(3) Violates ORS 401.965 (2).
(4) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.725 to 646A.750.
(5) Violates ORS 646A.530.
(6) Employs a collection practice that is unlawful under ORS 646.639.
(7) Is a beneficiary that violates ORS 86.726 (1)(a) or (2), 86.729 (4) or 86.732 (1) or (2).
(8) Violates ORS 646A.093.
(9) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.600 to 646A.628.
(10) Violates ORS 646A.808 (2).
(11) Violates ORS 336.184.
(12) Publishes on a website related to the person’s business, or in a consumer agreement  related
to a consumer transaction, a statement or representation of fact in which the person asserts  that
the person, in  a particular manner or for particular purposes, will use, disclose, collect, maintain,
delete or dispose of information that the person requests, requires or  receives from a consumer and
the person uses, discloses, collects, maintains, deletes or disposes of  the information in a manner
that is materially inconsistent with the person’s statement or representation.
(13) Violates ORS 646A.813 (2).
(14) Violates ORS 137.930 (1).
(15) Violates section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]