Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1)(a) The Oregon  Health Authority shall develop and implement a program
to award grants  to local workforce development boards for the purpose of creating pilot
programs in collaboration with the entities specified under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The pilot programs  must provide training opportunities for high school students to
receive the necessary education and training to enter into the behavioral health workforce.
(2)(a) Local workforce development boards shall establish partnerships with one or  more
of the following entities to administer the pilot programs:
(A) Education service districts, as defined in ORS 334.003.
(B) Coordinated care organizations, as defined in ORS 414.025.
(C) Local public health organizations.
(D) Local school districts.
(b) Pilot programs funded by grants awarded under this section shall be  based on
collaborative partnerships and efforts  between the entities described under paragraph (a) of
this subsection. The local workforce development boards shall distribute  funds to an entity
that partners with the local workforce development board to facilitate the administration  of
a pilot program.
(3) Grants awarded under this section may be used only for the purposes of:
(a) Developing, facilitating or sponsoring the pilot programs  described under subsection
(1) of this section.
(b) Providing scholarships  to students who participate in a pilot program established
under this section.
(c) Providing for wraparound supports, based on demonstrated  need, for students who
participate in a pilot program, including but not limited to:
(A) Technology resources;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 672
SB 527
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
(B) Licensing or certification fees; and
(C) Course materials.
(d) Collecting data and reporting measurable  outcomes for the activities supported
through awarded grants.
(4) The  authority shall prescribe the form and process by which a local workforce devel-
opment board may apply for and be awarded grants under the program.
(5) The authority shall require recipients of grants under this section to report  annually
to the authority on the progress of the pilot programs funded by the grants.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,500,000 for  awarding grants
to local  workforce development boards for carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]