Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 357.740 is amended to read:
357.740. (1) As used in ORS 357.740 to 357.780, “youth”  means individuals from birth
through 17 years of age.
(2) The state shall provide financial  assistance [ for public library service to public libraries es-
tablished pursuant to law from funds specifically  appropriated therefor by annual grants to units of
local government. The grants shall be expended  to develop public library services for children, with
emphasis on preschool children. ] to legally established public libraries to be used for public li-
brary services. The financial assistance must be provided in the form of annual  grants to
units of local government from funds specifically appropriated for public library services  by
the Legislative Assembly. The grants  must be expended to develop public library services for
youth, with emphasis on underserved youth.
(3) The State Library Board may request that the appropriation  under subsection (2) of
this section be based on:
(a) The estimated total population of youth in this state; or
(b) Another method determined by the board.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 357.780 is amended to read:
357.780. (1) The State Library Board shall [ disburse moneys under this section based on the esti-
mated total population of children, from birth to 14 years of age,  in the state. For those areas of the
state not served by local public  libraries, the moneys available shall be reallocated to qualifying public
libraries. A public library that begins providing library service to previously  unserved population shall
be eligible for grants from the  moneys appropriated for purposes of this section. Upon satisfactory ap-
plication therefor, the State Library Board shall cause the appropriate amount  to be paid to the public
library] distribute the funds appropriated by the Legislative Assembly pursuant  to ORS
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 684
SB 75
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
357.740 in the manner described in  this section to legally established public libraries that
submit applications meeting grant criteria prescribed by the board .
(2) The State Library Board shall distribute 80 percent of  the funds [ specifically appropriated by
the Legislative Assembly on a per child basis for public library services ] proportionally to successful
applicant public libraries based on the number of youth in  each library’s service area, cal-
culated in the following manner to ensure that the same population is not counted more than once:
(a) There shall  be [ paid] distributed to each consolidated county library that is the primary
provider of public library services to all persons in a county, or to  each library district that is the
primary provider of public library services in  a county, a per capita amount for each [ child] youth
residing in the county.
(b) Where public library services are  provided by a public library for which the governing au-
thority has jurisdiction in more than one county, there shall be [ paid] distributed to that library a
per capita amount for each [ child] youth residing [ therein] within the jurisdiction .
(c) Where public library  services are not provided as described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this
subsection, but by a library of which the governing authority is the primary  provider of public li-
brary services to a jurisdiction less  than [ county wide ] countywide, there shall be [ paid] distributed
to the library  a per capita amount for [ children] youth residing [ therein] within the jurisdiction .
In addition, a public library having a valid contract with a unit of local government  to provide
public library services to a population beyond its governing authority’s jurisdiction  shall [ be paid ]
receive a per  capita amount for the population of [ children] youth served if specified in the con-
tract. The number of [ children] youth residing within a jurisdiction that is less than a county shall
be estimated using the percentage of [ children] youth in the total population of the county.
(d) Where public library services are  not provided as described in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this
subsection, but are  provided by a county or district library that has a valid contract with one or
more libraries to provide  persons in their jurisdiction with library services, there shall be [ paid]
distributed to the county  or district library a per capita amount for each [ child] youth residing
[therein] within the jurisdiction , exclusive of the  populations served by libraries eligible for grants
under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(3) The State Library Board shall distribute 20 percent of  the funds [ specifically appropriated by
the Legislative Assembly for public library services on  an area basis ] proportionally to successful
applicant public libraries based on the number of  square miles in each library’s service
area.
(4) The State Library Board may not make a grant that  is less than [ $1,000] $1,200 to a [ quali-
fying] successful applicant  public library for public library services for [ children] youth.
SECTION 3.  ORS 357.750 is amended to read:
357.750. (1) The State  Library Board may make annual establishment and development
grants, from funds appropriated by the Legislative Assembly for that purpose, to  units of local
government and counties [ may] that apply to the [ State Library Board for annual  establishment and
development grants ] board in a manner prescribed by the board .
(2) Successful applicant local governments and counties must  use the grants [ may be made
from funds specifically appropriated for that purpose and are to be used ] for the following purposes,
singly or in any combination:
(a) To establish, develop or improve :
(A) Public library early literacy services for children from birth to six years of age [ and]; or
(B) Programs for students in kindergarten through high school; or
[2]
SB 75
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
(b) To provide the  statewide summer reading program, as defined [ by rule of ] in rules adopted
by the State Library Board, for [ children from birth to 14 years of age ] youth.
SECTION 4. The amendments to ORS 357.740 and 357.780 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2017
Act apply to grants made on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]