Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “coordinated care organization” and  “medical
assistance” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 414.025.
(2) The Oregon Health  Authority shall study alternative payment methodologies to im-
prove access to behavioral health care in  federally qualified health centers in this state. In
conducting the study, the authority shall identify  strategies for increasing reimbursement
rates for behavioral  health services provided by federally qualified health centers to medical
assistance recipients to rates that are no  less than the rates paid by coordinated care or-
ganizations.
(3) The authority shall submit a report,  in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the  Legislative As-
sembly related to health no later than September 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2168