Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 197.
SECTION 2. (1) Within an urban growth boundary,  a local government may not deny an
application for a variance from land use  regulations for the construction of a residential
development on lands zoned for residential uses, unless:
(a) The denial is necessary to address a health, safety or habitability issue;
(b) The variance request relates to the density,  height or floor-to-area ratio of the de-
velopment.
(2) A local  government that denies a request for a variance under subsection (1)(a) of this
section shall adopt findings  supported by substantial evidence in the record demonstrating
the necessity of the denial.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Department of Land Conservation and Development and the De-
partment of Consumer and Business  Services shall enter into an interagency agreement to
establish and administer the Housing Accountability and  Production Office. Each department
is authorized to take any action that may be  taken by the office under this section or section
4 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The Housing Accountability and Production Office shall:
(a) Provide technical assistance to local jurisdictions to  comply with housing laws and to
reduce permitting and land use barriers to housing production;
(b) Serve as a resource for housing developers experiencing permitting and land use
barriers related to housing production, including by responding to requests  for technical as-
sistance regarding housing laws; and
(c) Investigate and respond  to complaints of violations of housing law under section 4 of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4079
HB 3414
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
this 2023 Act.
(3) The Land Conservation and Development Commission and the Department of  Con-
sumer and Business Services may jointly or separately adopt, amend or repeal rules for:
(a) Carrying out the responsibilities of the departments and the office  under this section
and section 4 of this 2023 Act; and
(b) Establishing model codes, procedures and practices by which local  governments may
comply with any housing law.
(4) The office shall prioritize assisting jurisdictions voluntarily undertaking  changes to
come into compliance with housing laws.
(5) As used in this section and  section 4 of this 2023 Act, “housing law” means ORS 92.010
to 92.192,  92.830 to 92.845, 197.286 to 197.314, 197.360 to 197.380, 197.475 to 197.490, 197.505 to
197.540, 197.660 to 197.670, 197.748, 197.758, 215.402 to 215.438, 227.160 to  227.186, 455.148,
455.150, 455.152, 455.153, 455.154, 455.155,  455.156, 455.157, 455.158, 455.165, 455.170, 455.175,
455.180, 455.185 to 455.198, 455.200, 455.202 to 455.208, 455.210, 455.220, 455.465,  455.467 and
455.610 and section 2 of this 2023 Act and administrative rules  implementing those laws, to
the extent that the law or rule creates  a mandatory duty on a local government or its agent
and the application of the law or rule relates to residential development or pertains to a
permit for a residential use or division of land for residential purposes.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Housing Accountability and Production Office established under
section 3 of this 2023 Act shall establish a form or format through which the  office receives
allegations of local governments’ violations of housing laws.
(2) The office may investigate suspected or alleged violations of housing laws.
(3) If the office has a reasonable basis to conclude that a  violation has been committed,
the office shall deliver written warning notice  to the local government specifying the vio-
lation, and any authority under this section that the office intends to invoke if the violation
continues or is not remedied.
(4) No earlier than 60 days after a warning notice is delivered  under subsection (3) of this
section, the office may:
(a) Request an enforcement order under ORS 197.320 (14) without first complying with
ORS 197.319 (1) and (2). Notwithstanding ORS 183.635 (2) and 197.328 (1), a request under this
paragraph must be assigned to an administrative law judge  appointed under ORS 183.635
unless the  Land Conservation and Development Commission has previously appointed a
hearing officer or a pool of hearing officers to review petitions filed under this section.
(b) Seek a  court order against a local government as described under ORS 455.160 (3)
without being adversely affected or serving the demand as described in ORS 455.160 (2).
(c) Notwithstanding ORS 197.090 (2)(b) to (e), participate in and seek review  of a matter
under ORS 197.090 (2)(a) that pertains to housing laws without the notice or consent of the
commission. No less than once every two years, the office shall report to the  commission
on the matters in which the office participated under this paragraph.
(d) Apply to any circuit court for  an order compelling compliance with any housing law.
If the court finds that  the defendant is not complying with a housing law, the court may
grant an injunction requiring compliance.
(5) The actions authorized under  this section are in addition to and may be exercised in
conjunction with any other investigative or enforcement authority that may be exercised by
the Department  of Land Conservation and Development, the Land Conservation and Devel-
[2]
HB 3414
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
opment Commission or the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
SECTION 5.
On or before September 15, 2024, the Housing Accountability and Production
Office established under section 3 of this 2023 Act shall:
(1) Contract with an organization possessing relevant expertise  to produce a report
identifying improvements in the  local building plan approval, land use, zoning and permitting
processes, including but not limited to plan approval  timelines, process efficiency, local best
practices and other ways  to accelerate and improve the efficiency of the development process
for construction, with a focus on increasing housing production; and
(2) Provide the report under subsection (1) of this section to  an appropriate interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in ORS 192.245.
SECTION 6.  ORS 197.320 is amended to read:
197.320. The Land Conservation  and Development Commission shall issue an order requiring a
local government, state  agency or special district to take action necessary to bring its comprehen-
sive plan, land use regulation, limited land use decisions or other  land use decisions or actions into
compliance with the goals, acknowledged comprehensive plan provisions, land use regulations  or
housing production strategy if the commission has good cause to believe:
(1) A comprehensive plan or land use regulation adopted by a local government not on a  com-
pliance schedule is not in compliance with the goals by the date set in ORS 197.245  or 197.250 for
such compliance[ ;].
(2) A plan, program, rule  or regulation affecting land use adopted by a state agency or special
district  is  not in compliance with the goals by the date set in ORS 197.245 or 197.250 for such
compliance[ ;].
(3) A local  government is not making satisfactory progress toward performance of its compliance
schedule[ ;].
(4) A state agency is not making satisfactory progress in carrying  out its coordination agree-
ment or the requirements of ORS 197.180[ ;].
(5) A local government has no comprehensive plan or  land use regulation and is not on a com-
pliance schedule directed to developing the plan or regulation[ ;].
(6) A local government has engaged in a pattern or  practice of decision making that violates
an acknowledged comprehensive  plan or land use regulation. In making its determination under this
subsection, the commission shall  determine whether there is evidence in the record to support the
decisions made. The commission shall not judge the issue solely upon adequacy of  the findings in
support of the decisions[ ;].
(7) A local government has failed to comply with a commission order entered under  ORS
197.644[;].
(8) A special  district has engaged in a pattern or practice of decision-making that violates an
acknowledged comprehensive plan or cooperative agreement adopted pursuant to ORS 197.020[ ;].
(9) A  special district is not making satisfactory progress toward performance of its obligations
under ORS chapters 195 and 197[ ;].
(10) A local  government’s approval standards, special conditions on approval of specific devel-
opment proposals or procedures for approval do not comply with ORS 197.307 (4) or (6)[ ;].
(11) A local government is not making satisfactory progress toward meeting its obligations  un-
der ORS 195.065[ ;].
(12) A local government within the  jurisdiction of a metropolitan service district has failed to
make changes to the comprehensive plan or land  use regulations to comply with the regional
[3]
HB 3414
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
framework plan of the district or has  engaged in a pattern or practice of decision-making that vio-
lates a requirement of the regional framework plan[ ; or ].
(13) A city is not making  satisfactory progress in taking actions listed in its housing production
strategy under ORS 197.290.
(14) A local government is not complying with a housing law, as  defined in section 3 of
this 2023 Act, except for a housing law that pertains to building codes or the  administration
of building codes.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 197.335 is amended to read:
197.335. (1)  An order issued under ORS 197.328 and the copy of the order mailed to the local
government, state agency or special district shall set forth:
(a) The  nature of the noncompliance, including, but not limited to, the contents of the compre-
hensive plan or land use  regulation, if any, of a local government that do not comply with the goals
or the contents of a plan, program or  regulation affecting land use adopted by a state agency or
special district that do  not comply with the goals. In the case of a pattern or practice of decision-
making which violates the goals, comprehensive plan or land use regulations, the order  shall specify
the decision-making which constitutes the pattern or practice,  including specific provisions the Land
Conservation and Development Commission believes are being misapplied;
(b) The specific lands, if any, within a local government for which the  existing plan or land use
regulation, if any, does not comply with the goals; and
(c) The corrective action  decided upon by the commission, including the specific requirements,
with which the local government, state agency  or special district must comply. In the case of a
pattern or practice of decision-making that violates an acknowledged  comprehensive plan or land
use regulation, the commission may require revisions to  the comprehensive plan, land use regu-
lations or local procedures which the commission  believes are necessary to correct the pattern or
practice. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, except as provided in  subsection (3)(c) of
this section, an enforcement order does not affect:
(A) Land use applications filed with a  local government prior to the date of adoption of the
enforcement order unless specifically identified by the order;
(B) Land  use approvals issued by a local government prior to the date of adoption of the
enforcement order; or
(C) The time limit  for exercising land use approvals issued by a local government prior to the
date of adoption of the enforcement order.
(2) Judicial review of a final order  of the commission shall be governed by the provisions of ORS
chapter 183 applicable to contested cases except as otherwise stated  in this section. The
commission’s final order shall include a clear  statement of findings which set forth the basis for the
order. Where a  petition to review the order has been filed in the Court of Appeals, the commission
shall transmit to the  court the entire administrative record of the proceeding under review.
Notwithstanding ORS 183.482 (3) relating to a stay of enforcement of an agency order, an  appellate
court, before it may stay an order of the  commission, shall give due consideration to the public in-
terest in the continued enforcement of the commission’s  order and may consider testimony or affi-
davits thereon. Upon review, an  appellate court may affirm, reverse, modify or remand the order.
The court shall reverse, modify or remand the order only if it finds:
(a) The order to be unlawful in substance  or procedure, but error in procedure shall not be
cause for  reversal, modification or remand unless the court shall find that substantial rights of any
party were prejudiced thereby;
[4]
HB 3414
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The order to be unconstitutional;
(c) The order is invalid because it exceeds the statutory authority of the agency; or
(d) The order is not supported by substantial evidence in the whole record.
(3)(a) If the commission finds that in the interim period during which  a local government, state
agency or special district would be bringing itself into compliance with  the commission’s order un-
der ORS 197.320 or subsection (2)  of this section it would be contrary to the public interest in the
conservation or sound development of land  to allow the continuation of some or all categories of
land use decisions or limited land use decisions, it shall, as part  of its order, limit, prohibit or re-
quire the approval by the  local government of applications for subdivisions, partitions, building
permits, limited land use decisions or land  use decisions until the plan, land use regulation or sub-
sequent land  use decisions and limited land use decisions are brought into compliance. The com-
mission may issue an order that requires review of local  decisions by a hearings officer or the
Department of Land Conservation and Development before the local decision becomes final.
(b) Any requirement under  this subsection may be imposed only if the commission finds that the
activity, if continued, aggravates  the goal, comprehensive plan or land use regulation violation and
that the requirement is necessary to correct the violation.
(c) The limitations on enforcement orders  under subsection (1)(c)(B) of this section shall not be
interpreted to affect the commission’s authority to limit, prohibit or require application of  specified
criteria to subsequent land use decisions involving land use  approvals issued by a local government
prior to the date of adoption of the enforcement order.
(4) As part of its order under ORS 197.320  or subsection (2) of this section, the commission may
withhold grant funds from the local government to which the order is directed. As part of an  order
issued under this section, the commission may notify the officer  responsible for disbursing state-
shared revenues to withhold that portion of state-shared revenues to which the local  government is
entitled under ORS 221.770, 323.455, 366.762 and 366.800 and ORS chapter 471 which represents  the
amount of state planning grant moneys previously provided  the local government by the commission.
The officer responsible for disbursing state-shared revenues shall withhold state-shared  revenues as
outlined in this section and shall release funds to the local government or department when notified
to so do by the commission or its designee. The commission may retain a portion of the  withheld
revenues to cover costs of providing services incurred under the order,  including use of a hearings
officer or staff resources to monitor land  use decisions and limited land use decisions or conduct
hearings. The remainder of the funds withheld under  this provision shall be released to the local
government upon completion of requirements of the commission order.
(5)(a) As part of its order under this section,  the commission may notify the officer responsible
for disbursing funds from any grant or loan  made by a state agency to withhold such funds from a
special  district  to which the order is directed. The officer responsible for disbursing funds shall
withhold funds as outlined in this section and shall release funds  to the special district or depart-
ment when notified to do so by the commission.
(b) The commission may retain a portion of the funds withheld to cover costs  of providing ser-
vices incurred under the order, including use of a hearings officer or staff resources  to monitor land
use decisions and limited land use  decisions or conduct hearings. The remainder of the funds with-
held under this provision shall be released to  the special district upon completion of the require-
ments of the commission order.
(6) As part of its order under this section, upon finding a local government  has failed to
comply as described in ORS 197.320 (14), the  commission may require the local government
[5]
HB 3414
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to adopt models that have been developed by the Housing Accountability and Production  Of-
fice under section 3  (3)(b) of this 2023 Act that are suitable to address the basis for the order.
[(6)] (7)  The  commission may institute actions or proceedings for legal or equitable remedies in
the Circuit Court for Marion County or in the circuit court  for the county to which the
commission’s order is  directed or within which all or a portion of the applicable city is located to
enforce compliance with the provisions of any order issued under this section or to restrain vio-
lations thereof. Such actions or proceedings  may be instituted without the necessity of prior agency
notice, hearing and order on an alleged violation.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 455.770 is amended to read:
455.770. (1) In addition to any  other authority and power granted to the Director of the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services  under ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285,
446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.995 and 480.510 to 480.670 and [ this chapter and ] ORS
chapters 447, 455, 460 and 693  and sections 3 and 4 of this 2023 Act , with respect to munici-
palities, building officials and inspectors, if the  director has reason to believe that there is a failure
to enforce or a violation of any provision of the state building code or ORS 446.003 to  446.200,
446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510  to 479.945, 479.995 or 480.510 to 480.670 [ or this
chapter] or ORS chapter 447, 455, 460 or 693 or any rule adopted under those statutes, the director
may:
(a) Examine building code activities of the municipality;
(b) Take sworn testimony; and
(c) With the authorization  of the Office of the Attorney General, subpoena persons and records
to obtain testimony on official actions  that were taken or omitted or to obtain documents otherwise
subject to public inspection under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(2) The investigative authority authorized in subsection (1) of  this section covers the violation
or omission by a municipality related to enforcement of codes or  administrative rules, certification
of inspectors or financial transactions dealing with  permit fees and surcharges under any of the
following circumstances when:
(a) The duties are clearly established by law, rule or agreement;
(b) The duty involves procedures for which the means and methods are clearly established by
law, rule or agreement; or
(c) The duty is described by clear performance standards.
(3) Prior to starting an investigation under subsection (1) of this section, the director shall notify
the municipality in writing setting  forth the allegation and the rules or statutes pertaining to the
allegation and give the municipality 30 days to respond to the  allegation. If the municipality does
not satisfy the director’s concerns, the director may then commence an investigation.
(4) If the Department of Consumer and Business Services or the director directs  corrective
action, the following shall be done:
(a) The corrective action  shall be in writing and served on the building official and the chief
executive officers of all municipalities affected;
(b) The corrective action shall identify  the facts and law relied upon for the required action; and
(c) A reasonable time shall be provided to the municipality for compliance.
(5) The director  may revoke any authority of the municipality to administer any part of the state
building code or ORS  446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945,
479.995 or 480.510 to 480.670 [ or this chapter ] or ORS  chapter 447, 455, 460 or 693 or any rule
adopted under those statutes if  the director determines after a hearing conducted under ORS 183.413
[6]
HB 3414
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
to 183.497 that:
(a) All of the requirements of this section and ORS 455.775 and 455.895 were met; and
(b) The municipality did not comply with the corrective action required.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 455.230 is amended to read:
455.230. (1) Except as otherwise provided  by law, all moneys appropriated or credited to the
Consumer and Business Services Fund and received under this  chapter, ORS 447.010 to 447.156,
447.992, 460.005 to 460.175, 460.310 to 460.370, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.995, 480.510 to 480.670 and ORS
chapter 693 hereby are appropriated continuously for and shall be  used by the director for the
purpose of  carrying out the duties and responsibilities imposed upon the department under this
chapter, ORS 446.566 to 446.646, 446.661 to 446.756, 447.010 to 447.156,  447.992, 460.005 to 460.175,
460.310 to 460.370, 479.510  to 479.945, 479.995 and 480.510 to 480.670 and ORS chapter 693  and
sections 3 and 4 of this 2023 Act .
(2) Except  as otherwise provided by law, all moneys appropriated or credited to the Consumer
and Business Services Fund  and received under ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395
to 446.420, 446.566 to 446.646, 446.661 to 446.756 and 455.220 (1) hereby are  appropriated contin-
uously for and shall be used by the director  for the purpose of carrying out the duties and respon-
sibilities imposed upon the department under ORS 446.003 to 446.200,  446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to
446.420, 446.566 to 446.646 and 446.661 to  446.756, and education and training programs pertaining
thereto.
SECTION 10. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund:
(1) To the Department of Land Conservation and Development, the amount of $1,100,000,
to perform the duties of the department under sections 3 to 5 of this 2023 Act; and
(2) To the Department of Consumer and Business Services, the amount of  $1,100,000, to
perform the duties of the department under sections 3 to 5 of this 2023 Act.
[7]