Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “small business” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 183.310.
(2) The Department of Environmental Quality shall study the economic effects on small
businesses of the prohibitions on:
(a) The use of polystyrene foam containers under ORS 459.468;
(b) The sale of polystyrene foam containers and polystyrene  foam packaging peanuts
under ORS 459.471; and
(c) The sale of foodware containers containing intentionally  added perfluoroalkyl or
polyfluoroalkyl substances under ORS 459.474.
(3) The study must include the costs  to small businesses of acquiring replacement
foodware containers and packaging and any other  costs necessary for small businesses to
comply with ORS 459.465 to 459.474.
(4) No later than September 15, 2026, the department shall submit the findings  of the
study in a report to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the en-
vironment in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245. The report may include recommendations
for legislation.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2711