Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 279A.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Covered entity” means a domestic corporation or foreign corporation, both  as de-
fined in ORS 65.001, that:
(A) Receives at least 20 percent of the corporation’s total revenues from  public re-
sources, including but not limited to:
(i) Grants;
(ii) Public contracts;
(iii) Tax abatements or tax benefits;
(iv) Loans or loan subsidies at rates of interest  below the current market rate of interest
for loans of a similar amount, class or purpose; or
(v) Other moneys or public expenditures that directly benefit the corporation;
(B) Has annual revenues of $10 million or more; and
(C) Employs at least five individuals in full-time permanent positions.
(b) “Total compensation” means the total amount of salary, wages, commissions, bene-
fits, bonuses and  any other form of remuneration or compensation that a covered entity pays
to an employee for services the employee performs for the covered entity.
(2)(a) A contracting agency may not accept a bid or proposal for a  public contract from
a covered entity for  which the ratio between the highest amount of total compensation and
the lowest amount of total compensation that the covered entity pays to  the covered entity’s
employees exceeds 100 to 1.
(b) A contracting agency shall disclose the prohibition set forth in paragraph (a) of  this
subsection in any advertisement or solicitation that the contracting agency issues for a
procurement.
(c) A  contracting agency shall provide in all public contracts that maintaining the ratio
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1236
HB 2886
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
described in paragraph (a) of this  subsection at or below 100 to 1 during the term of the
public contract is  a material element of the public contract and that a failure to comply
subjects the covered entity to:
(A) Termination of the public contract; and
(B) Debarment under ORS 279B.130  (2)(d) or disqualification under ORS 279C.440 (2)(d),
as appropriate.
(3) A contracting agency shall require a covered entity that submits a bid or proposal  for
a public contract to:
(a) Declare in the bid or proposal that  the covered entity has, and will maintain during
the term of the public contract  for which the covered entity has submitted the bid or pro-
posal, the ratio described in subsection (2)(a) of this section; and
(b) Substantiate the declaration described in paragraph (a) of this subsection with  evi-
dence that shows the actual current ratio for the covered entity.
(4) A  contracting agency shall periodically, during the term of a public contract with a
covered entity, require the covered entity to reaffirm the declaration described in subsection
(3)(a) of  this section and to substantiate the declaration as described in subsection (3)(b) of
this section.
(5) The Attorney General,  the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services and a contracting agency that  adopts rules under ORS 279A.065 or 279A.070 may
adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act applies to public contracts that a contracting
agency advertises or otherwise solicits or, if the contracting agency does not advertise or
otherwise solicit the public  contract, to public contracts into which a contracting agency
enters on or after the operative date specified in section 4 (1) of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) Section 2 of this 2021 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Attorney General, the Director of the Oregon  Department of Administrative
Services and a contracting agency that adopts rules under  ORS 279A.065 or 279A.070 may
adopt rules and take any other  action before the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section that is  necessary to enable the Attorney General, the director or the con-
tracting agency, on and after the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this section,
to exercise or undertake all of the duties, functions and powers conferred  on the Attorney
General, the director or the contracting agency by section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]