Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall conduct a  study and develop recom-
mendations for:
(a) A classification system for traumatic  brain injuries that could be used to evaluate
eligibility for disability benefits and for insurance coverage of treatment  for traumatic brain
injuries; and
(b) Training for first responders and law enforcement officers in identifying symptoms
of traumatic brain injuries, acquired brain injuries and post-traumatic stress  syndrome and
training on appropriate referrals for services and treatment.
(2) No later than September 15, 2024,  the authority shall report, in the manner provided
in ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to health the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1495
SB 539
1
2
3
4
results of  the study and recommendations, including recommendations for legislative
changes if needed.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
[2]