Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “family child care home” has the meaning given
that term in ORS 329A.440.
(2) The Department of Early  Learning and Care shall administer a program to provide
grants, using funds from the Tenant Family Child Care Home  Fund established under section
2 of this 2025 Act, to tenants for costs of modifications necessary or desirable for  the
tenant’s use, certification or registration of the dwelling as a family child care home in ac-
cordance with ORS 90.358.
(3) On or  before December 1 of each year, the department shall report on the status of
the grant program described in this section to the  interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to child care.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of  this section, including
rules governing the:
(a) Eligibility criteria for tenants to receive a grant.
(b) Parameters for determining the size of a grant award.
(c) Restrictions on permissible uses of a grant.
(d) Form and process for grant applications.
SECTION 2.
The Tenant Family  Child Care Home Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The Tenant Family Child Care Home
Fund consists of moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to  the fund by the
Legislative Assembly or otherwise. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the
Department of Early Learning and Care to carry out the provisions of  section 1 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 3. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2045.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Tenant Family Child  Care Home Fund established under
section 2 of this 2025 Act on the date specified in  subsection (1) of this section that are un-
expended, unobligated and not subject to any conditions shall revert to the General Fund.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1358
SB 962
1
2
3
4
SECTION 4.
There is appropriated to the  Department of Early Learning and Care, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $ , for deposit
in the Tenant Family Child Care Home Fund established under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[2]