Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 90.323 is amended to read:
90.323. (1) If a tenancy is a week-to-week tenancy, the landlord may not increase the rent with-
out giving the tenant written notice  at least seven days prior to the effective date of the rent in-
crease.
(2) During any tenancy other than week-to-week, the landlord may not increase the rent:
(a) During the first year after the tenancy begins.
(b) At any time after the  first year of the tenancy without giving the tenant written notice at
least 90 days prior to the effective date of the rent increase.
(c) More than once in any 12-month period.
(d) Except as  permitted under subsection (5) of this section, by a percentage greater than the
maximum calculated under ORS 90.324 (1).
(3) The notices required under this section must specify:
(a) The amount of the rent increase;
(b) The amount of the new rent;
(c) Facts supporting the exemption authorized by subsection  (5) of this section, if the increase
is above the amount allowed in subsection (2)(d) of this section; and
(d) The date on which the increase becomes effective.
(4) A landlord terminating a tenancy  with a 30-day notice without cause as authorized by ORS
90.427 (3) or (4) during the first year of a tenancy may not charge rent for the  next tenancy in an
amount greater than the maximum amount the landlord could have charged the terminated  tenancy
under this section.
(5) A landlord is not subject to subsection (2)(d) or (4) of this section if:
(a) The first certificate of occupancy for  the dwelling unit was issued less than 15 years from
the date of the notice of the rent increase; or
(b) The dwelling unit is regulated or certified as  affordable housing by a federal, state or local
government and the change in rent:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1656
HB 2070
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Does not increase the tenant’s portion of the rent; or
(B) Is required by program eligibility requirements or by a change in the tenant’s income.
(6) A landlord that increases rent in violation of subsection (2)(d) or (4) of this section  is liable
to the tenant in an amount equal to three months’ rent plus actual damages suffered by  the tenant.
(7) Except as provided in ORS  90.300 (5), a landlord may not increase the rent or charge
to a tenant a one-time, monthly or other periodic amount based on the  tenant’s possession
of a pet.
[(7)] (8) This section does not apply to tenancies governed by ORS 90.505 to 90.850.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 90.323 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply  only to
those tenancies that are based on a rental agreement that was entered into  or modified on
or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 90.100 is amended to read:
90.100. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Accessory building or structure” means any portable, demountable or permanent structure,
including but not limited to cabanas, ramadas, storage sheds,  garages, awnings, carports, decks,
steps, ramps, piers and pilings, that is:
(a) Owned and used solely by a tenant of a manufactured dwelling or floating home; or
(b) Provided pursuant to a written rental agreement for  the sole use of and maintenance by a
tenant of a manufactured dwelling or floating home.
(2) “Action” includes recoupment, counterclaim, setoff, suit in equity  and any other proceeding
in which rights are determined, including an action for possession.
(3) “Applicant screening charge”  means any payment of money required by a landlord of an
applicant prior to entering into a rental agreement with that applicant for  a residential dwelling
unit, the purpose of which  is to pay the cost of processing an application for a rental agreement for
a residential dwelling unit.
(4) “Attorney” includes an associate member of the Oregon State Bar practicing  law within the
member’s approved scope of practice.
(5) “Bias crime” has the meaning given that term in ORS 147.380.
(6) “Building and housing  codes” includes any law, ordinance or governmental regulation con-
cerning fitness for habitation,  or the construction, maintenance, operation, occupancy, use or ap-
pearance of any premises or dwelling unit.
(7) “Carbon monoxide alarm” has the meaning given that term in ORS 105.836.
(8) “Carbon monoxide source” has the meaning given that term in ORS 105.836.
(9) “Conduct” means the commission of an act or the failure to act.
(10) “DBH” means the diameter at breast height, which is measured as the  width of a standing
tree at four and one-half feet above the ground on the uphill side.
(11) “Dealer” means any person in the business of selling, leasing  or distributing new or used
manufactured dwellings or  floating homes to persons who purchase or lease a manufactured dwelling
or floating home for use as a residence.
(12) “Domestic violence” means:
(a) Abuse between family or household members, as those terms are defined in ORS 107.705; or
(b) Abuse, as defined in ORS 107.705, between partners in a dating relationship.
(13) “Drug and alcohol free housing” means a dwelling unit described in ORS 90.243.
(14) “Dwelling  unit” means a structure or the part of a structure that is used as a home, resi-
dence or  sleeping place by one person who maintains a household or by two or more persons who
[2]
HB 2070
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
maintain a common household. “Dwelling unit” regarding  a person who rents a space for a manu-
factured dwelling or recreational vehicle or regarding a person who rents moorage  space for a
floating home as defined in ORS 830.700, but does not rent  the home, means the space rented and
not the manufactured dwelling, recreational vehicle or floating home itself.
(15) “Essential service” means:
(a) For a tenancy not consisting of rental space for a manufactured dwelling, floating home or
recreational vehicle owned by the tenant and not otherwise subject to ORS 90.505 to 90.850:
(A) Heat, plumbing, hot and cold running water, gas, electricity, light  fixtures, locks for exterior
doors, latches for windows and  any cooking appliance or refrigerator supplied or required to be
supplied by the landlord; and
(B) Any other service  or habitability obligation imposed by the rental agreement or ORS 90.320,
the lack or violation of which  creates a serious threat to the tenant’s health, safety or property or
makes the dwelling unit unfit for occupancy.
(b) For a tenancy consisting of rental space  for a manufactured dwelling, floating home or rec-
reational vehicle owned by the tenant or that is otherwise subject to ORS 90.505 to 90.850:
(A) Sewage disposal,  water supply, electrical supply and, if required by applicable law, any
drainage system; and
(B) Any other service  or habitability obligation imposed by the rental agreement or ORS 90.730,
the lack or violation of which creates a serious threat to the tenant’s  health, safety or property or
makes the rented space unfit for occupancy.
(16) “Facility” means a manufactured dwelling park or a marina.
(17) “Fee” means a nonrefundable payment of money.
(18) “First class mail” does not include certified or registered mail,  or any other form of mail
that may delay or hinder actual delivery of mail to the recipient.
(19) “Fixed term  tenancy” means a tenancy that has a fixed term of existence, continuing to a
specific ending date and terminating on that date without requiring further notice to effect the ter-
mination.
(20) “Floating home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 830.700. “Floating home”  includes
an accessory building or structure.
(21) “Good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct of the transaction concerned.
(22) “Hazard tree” means a tree that:
(a) Is located on a rented space in a manufactured dwelling park;
(b) Measures at least eight inches DBH; and
(c) Is considered, by an arborist licensed as a landscape  construction professional pursuant to
ORS 671.560 and certified by the International Society of Arboriculture, to pose an unreasonable
risk of causing serious physical harm or damage to individuals or property in the near future.
(23) “Hotel or motel” means “hotel” as that term is defined in ORS 699.005.
(24) “Informal dispute resolution” includes voluntary consultation between the landlord  or
landlord’s agent and one or more  tenants or voluntary mediation utilizing the services of a third
party, but does not include mandatory mediation or arbitration.
(25) “Landlord” means the owner,  lessor or sublessor of the dwelling unit or the building or
premises of  which it is a part. “Landlord” includes a person who is authorized by the owner, lessor
or sublessor to manage the premises or to enter into a rental agreement.
(26) “Landlord’s agent” means a person who has oral or  written authority, either express or
implied, to act for or on behalf of a landlord.
[3]
HB 2070
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(27) “Last month’s rent deposit” means a type of security deposit, however designated,  the pri-
mary function of which is to secure the payment of rent for the last month of the tenancy.
(28) “Manufactured  dwelling” means a residential trailer, a mobile home or a manufactured
home as those terms are defined in  ORS 446.003 or a prefabricated structure. “Manufactured
dwelling” includes an accessory building or structure.
(29) “Manufactured dwelling  park” means a place where four or more manufactured dwellings
are located, the primary purpose of which is to rent space or keep space for rent to  any person for
a charge or fee.
(30) “Marina” means a moorage of contiguous dwelling units that may be legally transferred  as
a single unit  and are owned by one person where four or more floating homes are secured, the pri-
mary purpose of which is to rent space or keep space for rent to any person for a charge or fee.
(31) “Marina purchase association” means a group of three or more tenants  who reside in a
marina and have organized for the purpose of eventual purchase of the marina.
(32) “Month-to-month tenancy” means a  tenancy that automatically renews and continues for
successive monthly periods on the same terms and conditions originally agreed to, or  as revised by
the parties, until terminated by one or both of the parties.
(33) “Organization” includes a corporation, government,  governmental subdivision or agency,
business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, two or more persons having a joint or  com-
mon interest, and any other legal or commercial entity.
(34) “Owner” includes  a mortgagee in possession and means one or more persons, jointly or se-
verally, in whom is vested:
(a) All or part of the legal title to property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership and a right to present use and enjoyment of the
premises.
(35) “Person” includes an individual or organization.
(36) “Prefabricated structure” means a structure that  is substantially constructed or assembled
using closed construction at an off-site location in compliance  with the state building code and that
is sited and occupied by the owner in compliance with local codes.
(37) “Premises” means:
(a) A dwelling unit and the structure of which it is a part and facilities and appurtenances
therein;
(b) Grounds, areas and facilities held out for the use of  tenants generally or the use of which
is promised to the tenant; and
(c) A facility for manufactured dwellings or floating homes.
(38) “Prepaid rent” means any payment of money to the  landlord for a rent obligation not yet
due. In addition, “prepaid rent” means rent paid for a period extending beyond a termination date.
(39) “Recreational vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.101.
(40) “Recreational vehicle park” has the meaning given that term in ORS 197.492.
(41)(a) “Rent” means any payment to be made to the landlord under the rental agreement, peri-
odic or otherwise, in exchange for the right of a tenant [ and any permitted pet ] to occupy a dwelling
unit to the exclusion of others and to use the premises.
(b) “Rent” does not include security deposits, fees or utility or service charges  as described in
ORS 90.315 (4) and 90.562.
(42) “Rental agreement” means all agreements,  written or oral, and valid rules and regulations
adopted under ORS 90.262 or 90.510 (6) embodying the terms  and conditions concerning the use and
[4]
HB 2070
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
occupancy of a dwelling unit and premises. “Rental  agreement” includes a lease. A rental agreement
is either a week-to-week tenancy, month-to-month tenancy or fixed term tenancy.
(43) “Roomer” means a person occupying a dwelling unit that does not include a toilet and ei-
ther a bathtub or a shower and a refrigerator, stove and kitchen,  all provided by the landlord, and
where one or more of these facilities are used in common by occupants in the structure.
(44) “Screening or admission criteria” means a  written statement of any factors a landlord
considers in deciding whether  to accept or reject an applicant and any qualifications required for
acceptance. “Screening or admission criteria” includes, but is not  limited to, the rental history,
character references, public records, criminal records, credit reports, credit references and  incomes
or resources of the applicant.
(45) “Security deposit” means a  refundable payment or deposit of money, however designated,
the primary function of which is to  secure the performance of a rental agreement or any part of a
rental agreement. “Security deposit” does not include a fee.
(46) “Sexual assault” has the meaning given that term in ORS 147.450.
(47) “Squatter” means a person occupying a dwelling unit who is not so entitled under a  rental
agreement or who is not authorized  by the tenant to occupy that dwelling unit. “Squatter” does
not include a tenant who holds over as described in ORS 90.427 (11).
(48) “Stalking” means the behavior described in ORS 163.732.
(49) “Statement of policy” means the summary explanation of information and  facility policies
to be provided to prospective and existing tenants under ORS 90.510.
(50) “Surrender” means an agreement, express or  implied, as described in ORS 90.148 between
a landlord and tenant to terminate a rental agreement that gave  the tenant the right to occupy a
dwelling unit.
(51) “Tenant”:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection:
(A) Means a person, including a roomer, entitled under a rental agreement to occupy a dwelling
unit to the exclusion  of others, including a dwelling unit owned, operated or controlled by a public
housing authority.
(B) Means a minor, as defined and provided for in ORS 109.697.
(b) For purposes of ORS 90.505 to 90.850, means only  a person who owns and occupies as a
residence a manufactured dwelling or a floating home in a facility and persons residing  with that
tenant under the terms of the rental agreement.
(c) Does not mean a guest or temporary occupant.
(52) “Transient lodging” means a room or a suite of rooms.
(53) “Transient occupancy” means occupancy in transient lodging that has  all of the following
characteristics:
(a) Occupancy is charged on a daily basis and is not collected more than six days in advance;
(b) The lodging operator provides maid and linen service daily or every two  days as part of the
regularly charged cost of occupancy; and
(c) The period of occupancy does not exceed 30 days.
(54) “Vacation occupancy” means occupancy in a dwelling unit, not including transient  occu-
pancy in a hotel or motel, that:
(a) Has all of the following characteristics:
(A) The occupant rents the unit for vacation purposes only, not as a principal residence;
(B) The occupant has a principal residence other than at the unit; and
[5]
HB 2070
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(C) The period of authorized occupancy does not exceed 45 days; or
(b) Is for the rental of  a space in a recreational vehicle park on which a recreational vehicle
owned by the occupant will be located and for which:
(A) The occupant rents the unit for vacation purposes only, not as a principal residence;
(B) The occupant has a principal residence other than at the space;
(C) The period of authorized occupancy does not exceed 90 days;
(D) The recreational vehicle is  required to be removed from the park at the end of the occu-
pancy period before a new occupancy may begin; and
(E) A written agreement is  signed by the occupant that substantially states: “Your occupancy
of this recreational vehicle park is a vacation occupancy and is NOT subject  to the Oregon Resi-
dential Landlord and Tenant Act (ORS chapter 90).”
(55) “Victim” means:
(a) The person against whom an incident related to domestic violence,  sexual assault, bias crime
or stalking is perpetrated; or
(b) The parent or guardian of a minor household  member against whom an incident related to
domestic violence, sexual assault,  bias crime or stalking is perpetrated, unless the parent or guard-
ian is the perpetrator.
(56) “Week-to-week tenancy” means a tenancy that has all of the following characteristics:
(a) Occupancy is  charged on a weekly basis and is payable no less frequently than every seven
days;
(b) There is a written rental agreement that defines the landlord’s  and the tenant’s rights and
responsibilities under this chapter; and
(c) There are no fees or security deposits, although the  landlord may require the payment of an
applicant screening charge, as provided in ORS 90.295.
[6]