Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Public Employees Retirement Board shall study options for allowing
retired members of the Public Employees Retirement System to be reemployed by a  partic-
ipating public employer and for the member and  participating public employer to make con-
tributions to the system to be applied against the unfunded liabilities of the system.
(2) The board shall report on the results of the study to an  appropriate committee or
interim committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1388