Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2020 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 458.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible entity” means a local government, local housing authority, nonprofit organ-
ization, federally recognized Indian tribe in this state, regional or  statewide nonprofit hous-
ing assistance organization or community action agency.
(b) “Grant program recipient” means an eligible entity that has been awarded  a grant
from the Housing and Community Services Department under this section.
(c) “Homeownership assistance program” means a program  established, implemented and
operated by an eligible entity  whereby the entity provides housing-related assistance to per-
sons in low income households.
(d) “Low income household” means a household having an income equal to or below  80
percent of the area median  family income as determined by the Housing and Community
Services Department.
(e) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization or group of organizations that  is de-
scribed in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue  Code and is exempt from income tax
under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(f) “Repair and rehabilitation” includes actions that:
(A) Maximize energy efficiency of residences;
(B) Extend the usable life of the residences; or
(C) Improve the health and safety of the occupants of the residences.
(g)(A) “Residence” means a single family residence that is  intended for occupation by a
single family unit and is occupied by an individual who is a member  of a low income house-
hold as the individual’s principal residence.
(B) “Residence” includes  a site-built home, manufactured home, residential trailer, mo-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 95
SB 1532
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
bile home or condominium unit.
(2) The Homeownership Repair and Rehabilitation Pilot Program is  established within the
Housing and Community Services Department. The purpose of the program is to  provide
grants to eligible entities with  homeownership assistance programs that provide financial
assistance to persons in low income households for the  repair and rehabilitation of their
residences.
(3) To be eligible to receive grants from the pilot program, an eligible entity  must es-
tablish that it:
(a) Is operating, or will operate, a homeownership assistance program;
(b) Has the capacity to administer grant funds received under this section; and
(c) Is able to comply with the requirements of all state and federal laws, rules and reg-
ulations.
(4)(a) The department shall provide grants to eligible entities to provide loans,  grants or
other financial assistance to eligible low income households for the repair and rehabilitation
of their residences.
(b) The department may establish by rule the nature and extent of  the repair and reha-
bilitation that may be funded by eligible entities under the program.
(c) The department may give preference to eligible entities whose service recipients  are
largely minorities, as defined in ORS  458.610, or that market services to minority communi-
ties.
(5) The department shall establish by rule processes for eligible entities to apply to  re-
ceive grants from the program. The processes may include a request for proposals.
(6) Upon being awarded a  grant under this section, the grant program recipient shall
enter into an agreement with the department that contains provisions that:
(a) Indicate the purposes for which the grant funds may be used;
(b) Include the repayment provisions set forth in subsection (7) of this section;
(c) Permit the department to conduct audits and  investigations of the grant program
recipient regarding the purposes for which grant funds have been used; and
(d) Require the  grant program recipient to report on the use of funds to the department.
(7)(a) A  grant program recipient must repay to the department, in whole or in part, grant
funds received under this section to the extent that:
(A) The grant program recipient does not  use the grant funds in accordance with the
provisions of the grant agreement executed between the department  and the grant program
recipient under subsection (6) of this section; or
(B) The Director of the Housing and Community Services  Department determines that
the grant program recipient must repay all or part of the  grant funds on grounds of misap-
propriation, fraud  or similar reasons after auditing or investigating the grant program
recipient’s operations and conducting an administrative hearing under ORS 183.413 to 183.470.
(b) Funds received by the department under this subsection are paid to the  State Treas-
urer and credited to the General Housing Account created under ORS 458.620.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2020 Act is repealed on January 2, 2022.
SECTION 4. No later than September 15,  2021, the Housing and Community Services
Department shall provide a report to  an appropriate interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 on the  Homeownership Repair and Re-
habilitation Pilot Program established under section 2 of this 2020 Act, including the amounts
[2]
SB 1532
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
expended and information reported by grant recipients.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2021, out of the General Fund:
(1) $2,000,000, for administering and awarding grants under  the Homeownership Repair
and Rehabilitation Pilot Program under section 2 of this 2020 Act; and
(2) $2,000,000 to be distributed to community action agencies in proportion to the  dis-
tribution by the department of funds received from the federal weatherization program under
42 U.S.C. 6863 for their use  as an eligible recipient under a Homeownership Repair and Re-
habilitation Pilot Program contract.
SECTION 6.
This 2020 Act takes effect on July 1, 2020.
[3]