Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 238.320 is amended to read:
238.320. [(1) Whenever an employee who is a member of the Public Employees Retirement System
is found, after being examined by one or more physicians selected by  the Public Employees Retirement
Board, to be  mentally or physically incapacitated for an extended duration, as determined by medical
examination, and thereby unable to perform any work  for which qualified, by injury or disease sus-
tained while in actual performance of duty  and not intentionally self-inflicted, the member shall receive
a disability retirement allowance consisting of: ]
(1)(a)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph  (B) of this paragraph, an employee who is
a member of the Public Employees Retirement System is considered to be disabled  if the
employee is found, after being examined by one or more physicians selected by the Public
Employees Retirement Board, to be mentally or  physically incapacitated for an extended
duration, as determined by medical  examination, and thereby unable to perform any work for
which qualified, by injury or disease sustained  while in actual performance of duty and not
intentionally self-inflicted.
(B) An employee who is a member  of the Public Employees Retirement System and who
is employed as a police officer or firefighter is considered to be disabled if the employee is
found, after being examined by one or  more physicians selected by the Public Employees
Retirement Board, to be mentally or physically incapacitated for an extended  duration, as
determined by medical examination, and thereby  unable to perform the work the member
performed at the time the member became disabled, by injury or disease sustained while in
actual performance of duty and not intentionally self-inflicted.
(b) When a member is found to be disabled under this subsection, the member shall re-
ceive a disability retirement allowance consisting of:
[(a)] (A) A disability retirement refund  annuity based on the contributions under this chapter,
if any, credited to the member account of the member.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4425
SB 1128
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(b)] (B) A current  service pension provided by the contributions of employers and, for benefits
that accrue on or after July 1, 2020, amounts in the employee pension  stability account established
for the member under ORS 238A.353, equal to:
[(A)] (i) For a police officer or firefighter, the pension to which the member  would have been
entitled if the member had worked continuously until attaining the age of 55,  or if the member has
attained the age of 55,  the pension which the member would receive were the member to retire for
service, as provided in this chapter.
[(B)] (ii) For a member other than a police officer or firefighter, the pension to  which the
member would have been entitled if the member had  worked continuously until attaining the age
of 58, or if the member has attained the age of 58, the pension which the member would receive were
the member to retire for service, as provided in this chapter.
[(c)] (C) The same prior  service pension the member would have received had the member
worked until normal retirement age.
(2) As used in subsection  (1) of this section, “injury” means bodily injury causing the disability
directly and independently of all other causes and effected solely through accidental means.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, whenever  an employee who is
a member of the system and who  has been an employee for 10 years or more of an employer par-
ticipating in the system is found, after being examined by one or more physicians selected  by the
board, to be mentally or  physically incapacitated for an extended duration, as determined by medical
examination, and thereby unable  to perform any work for which qualified, from cause other than
injury or disease sustained while in actual performance of duty or intentionally self-inflicted, the
member shall receive a disability retirement allowance as provided in subsection (1) of  this section.
(b) Whenever an  employee who is a member of the system, who is employed as a police
officer or firefighter and who has been an employee  for 10 years or more of an employer
participating in the system is found, after  being examined by one or more physicians selected
by the board, to be mentally or physically incapacitated for an extended duration,  as deter-
mined by medical examination, and thereby unable to perform  the work the member per-
formed at  the time the member became disabled, from cause other than injury or disease
sustained while in actual performance of duty or intentionally self-inflicted, the member shall
receive a disability retirement allowance as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Payments under a  disability retirement allowance provided for in subsection (1) or (3) of this
section for the first 90-day period of incapacity shall be  withheld until such 90-day period has
elapsed.
(5) An inactive member is not  eligible for disability benefits referred to in subsection (1) or (3)
of this section unless the member applies for such disability benefits  within five calendar years after
the date of separation  from service with a participating public employer if the disability is contin-
uous from such separation date or within six months after the date of such separation from service
if disability occurs after such separation date.
(6) In computing years of employment for the purpose of subsection (3) of  this section, the fol-
lowing  schedule  shall be used: For employment before the employee established membership in the
Public Employees Retirement System, a member shall be considered to have  been employed for one
year for each year of  prior service credit allowed, and for any minor fraction of a year of continuous
service as certified by the  employer for which no prior service credit was granted. After having
established membership in  the Public Employees Retirement System a member shall be considered
to have  been employed one year for each 12-month period or major fraction thereof during which
[2]
SB 1128
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
time the member received compensation for employment which entitled the member to membership
in the system, as evidenced by payroll records. For  the purpose of determining a member’s eligibility
for disability  benefits, no leave of absence after a member ceases to work for any participating em-
ployer shall be considered other  than accumulated sick leave not in excess of 90 days. The effective
date of the disability shall not in any event be determined by the board as prior to the  last day for
which the disabled member performed services for a  participating employer. No benefits may be paid
for any month in which  the member received salary or sick leave benefits from the participating
employer.
(7) For the purposes of subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a member of  the system shall be
considered to be mentally or physically incapacitated for an extended  duration if the mental or
physical incapacity can be expected to result in death or has lasted or can be  expected to last for
a continuous period of not less than 90 days.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 238.340 is amended to read:
238.340. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, when a member retired be-
cause of disability is determined by the Public Employees  Retirement Board to be not incapacitated
to the extent that  the member is disabled from the performance of any work for which the member
is qualified, the disability retirement shall be canceled forthwith, the member shall be eligible  for
reemployment and the member account of the member shall be credited with the amount  that stood
to the credit in the member  account of the member in the fund at the time of retirement for disa-
bility. [ Any such person who for any reason is not reinstated in the service of an employer participating
in the  system shall receive separation benefits or service retirement benefits as provided in this
chapter.]
(2) When a member retired because of disability who was employed as a police officer  or
firefighter at the time the member became  disabled is determined by the Public Employees
Retirement Board to be not incapacitated to the extent  that the member is disabled from the
performance of the work the member performed at the time the member became disabled,
the disability retirement shall be canceled forthwith, the member shall  be eligible for reem-
ployment and the member account of the member shall be credited with the amount  that
stood to the credit in the member account of  the member in the fund at the time of retire-
ment for disability.
(3) A member retired because of  disability who for any reason is not reinstated in the
service of an employer participating in the system shall receive separation benefits or service
retirement benefits as provided in this chapter.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 238A.235 is amended to read:
238A.235. (1) An active  member of the pension program described in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion who becomes disabled  shall receive a disability benefit in the amount of 45 percent of the salary
of the member determined as of the last full month of employment before the disability commences.
(2) The provisions of this section apply only to:
(a) A member, other than a school employee as defined by  ORS 238A.140, who has accrued 10
years or more of retirement credit before the member becomes disabled;
(b) A member who is a school employee as defined by ORS 238A.140 and who was  an active
member in 10 or more calendar years before the member becomes disabled; or
(c) A member who becomes disabled by reason of injury or disease sustained while in the actual
performance of duty.
(3) A disability benefit under this section shall be paid until:
[3]
SB 1128
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The member is no longer disabled;
(b) The member attains normal retirement age under ORS 238A.160; or
(c) The member retires on or after the earliest normal  retirement date for the member under
ORS 238A.165.
(4)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a member is considered to be
disabled for the purpose of this section if the member is found, after being examined by one or more
physicians selected by  the Public Employees Retirement  Board, to be mentally or physically in-
capacitated for an extended duration and unable to perform any work for which qualified, by reason
of injury or disease that was not intentionally self-inflicted.
(b) A member who is employed as a police  officer or firefighter is considered to be disa-
bled for  the purpose of this section if the member is found, after being examined by one or
more physicians selected by the board, to be mentally or physically  incapacitated for an ex-
tended duration and unable to  perform the work the member performed at the time the
member became disabled, by reason of injury or disease that was not intentionally  self-
inflicted.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 238A.155 is amended to read:
238A.155. (1) Notwithstanding any  other provision of ORS 238A.100 to 238A.250, an active
member of the pension program who  becomes disabled shall accrue retirement credit and hours of
service credit for vesting purposes for the period during which the member is disabled.
(2) Retirement credit accrues under  this section only for as long as the member remains disabled
or until the member reaches the normal retirement age under ORS 238A.160.
(3) If a disabled  member does not return to employment with a participating public employer
after the period of disability, the member shall receive  a pension under ORS 238A.180, 238A.185 or
238A.190 upon retirement based on an adjusted salary. The adjusted salary shall be the  salary paid
to the disabled member on the date the member left active employment with the  participating public
employer by reason of disability, adjusted for each year after the member left employment and before
the member’s effective  date of retirement to reflect cost-of-living changes, based on the Consumer
Price  Index  for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United  States Department of Labor. Adjustments under this subsection may not
exceed a two percent increase or  decrease for any year. An adjustment shall be made under this
subsection only for calendar years in which the member is disabled for  at least six months during
the year.
(4) Retirement credit for the period of disability under this section  shall be classified the same
as the member’s last qualifying position prior to the disability.
(5) A pension program member is considered to be disabled for the purpose of this section if:
(a)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph,  the member is found,  after
being examined by one or more physicians selected by the Public  Employees Retirement Board, to
be mentally or physically incapacitated for an extended duration and unable to  perform any work
for which qualified, by reason of injury or disease that was not intentionally self-inflicted; or
(B) If the member was employed as a police officer or firefighter at the  time the member
became disabled, the member is found, after being  examined by one or more physicians se-
lected by the board, to be  mentally or physically incapacitated for an extended duration and
unable to perform the work the member performed at  the time the member became disabled,
by reason of injury or disease that was not intentionally self-inflicted; or
(b) The member receives workers’ compensation benefits by reason of injury or disease that was
[4]
SB 1128
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sustained while in actual performance of duty with a participating public employer  and that was not
intentionally self-inflicted and returns to employment with a participating public employer after  the
period of disability.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 238.325 is amended to read:
238.325. (1) At any time after establishing membership, but before the  expiration of 90 days after
the Public Employees Retirement  Board makes its finding that the employee is disabled, an employee
who is a member of the Public Employees Retirement System may elect to convert  the disability
retirement allowance otherwise payable on the member  account of the member into a disability re-
tirement annuity of equivalent actuarial value, by selecting one of the optional forms named below.
The election of Option 2, 2A, 3 or 3A shall be effective immediately upon the effective date of the
member’s disability, and in the event of  death within the first 90-day period of incapacity, payment
to the beneficiary of the member shall be made in accordance with the option selected.
Option 1. (a) A life annuity (nonrefund) payable during the member’s life only, which shall be
the actuarial equivalent of the accumulated contributions under this chapter and  interest thereon
credited to the member at the time the member retires (if death occurs before  the first payment is
due, the member account  of the member shall be treated as though death had occurred before re-
tirement); (b) a life pension (nonrefund) provided by the contributions of  employers and, for benefits
that accrue on or  after July 1, 2020, amounts in the employee pension stability account established
for the member under ORS  238A.353 as provided in ORS 238.320 [ (1)(b)] (1)(b)(B) ; (c) an additional
nonrefund pension for prior service credit, including  military service, credited to the member at the
time the member first becomes a member  of the system, as elsewhere provided in this chapter, which
pension shall be provided by the contributions of the employer; or
Option 2. A reduced disability retirement allowance payable during the  period of incapacity,
with the provision that after death, if death  shall occur after the effective date of the disability and
during the period  of incapacity, it shall continue for the life of the beneficiary whom the member
has designated in writing duly acknowledged and filed with the board at the time of  election, should
the beneficiary survive the member; or
Option 2A. A reduced disability retirement  allowance payable during the period of incapacity
which, unless modified under subsection (3) of this section, continues after death, if death shall occur
after the effective date of the disability and during the period of incapacity,  for the life of the ben-
eficiary whom the  member nominates by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the
board at the time of election, should the beneficiary survive the member; or
Option 3. A reduced  disability retirement allowance payable during the period of incapacity,
with the provision that after death, if death  shall occur after the effective date of the disability and
during the period of incapacity, such  allowance shall continue at one-half the rate paid to the
member and be paid for the life of the beneficiary  whom the member has designated in writing duly
acknowledged and filed with the board at the time of election, should  the beneficiary survive the
member; or
Option 3A. A reduced disability retirement  allowance payable during the period of incapacity
which, unless modified under subsection (3) of this section, continues after death, if death shall occur
after the effective date of the disability and during the  period of incapacity, at one-half the rate paid
to the member and is paid for the life of the beneficiary whom the member  nominates by written
designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board at the  time of election, should the benefi-
ciary survive the member; or
Option 4. A reduced  disability retirement allowance payable during the period of incapacity,
[5]
SB 1128
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
with the  provisions that if the member dies during the period of incapacity and before a total of 180
monthly payments is made, the remainder of  the 180 monthly payments shall be paid monthly to the
beneficiary  the  member nominates by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the
board at any time before the member’s death; and that if the  member designates no beneficiary to
receive the monthly payments or no such beneficiary is able to receive the monthly  payments, an
amount equal to the actuarial value, on the date of the member’s death, of the total of the  monthly
payments not made  to the member shall be paid according to ORS 238.390 for disposal of an amount
credited to the member account of a member at the time of death; and that  if the beneficiary re-
ceiving monthly payments dies before the total number of monthly payments  to which the benefici-
ary is entitled is made, an amount equal to the actuarial  value, on the date of the beneficiary’s
death, of  the total of the monthly payments not made to the member and beneficiary shall be paid
according to ORS  238.390 for disposal of an amount credited to the member account of a member
at the time of death and as if the beneficiary had been a member.
(2) The beneficiary designated by a member to receive any benefit under this section  shall be
the same as designated  under ORS 238.390 (1). The designation of a beneficiary or the election of
an option may be changed by a member within 60 days after the date of the first benefit  payment,
except that the designation of a beneficiary under Option 4 may  be changed by the member at any
time before the member’s death.
(3) If a retired member has elected to  receive a disability retirement allowance under Option
2A or Option 3A as provided in subsection (1)  of this section, and if the beneficiary under that op-
tion dies after the expiration of the  time within which the member could change the election of an
option or if the beneficiary is  the spouse of the member and the marriage relationship is terminated
as provided by law after the expiration of the time within which  the member could change the
election of an option, the member may elect to  receive, in lieu of the optional form of allowance
previously elected, the allowance that the member would  have received on the effective date of re-
tirement under Option 1 as provided  in subsection (1) of this section and adjusted by the actual
amount of any cost-of-living or  other post-retirement adjustments made to the original allowance
since the effective date of retirement. Notice of  election under this subsection must be in a form
approved by the board.  If an election is made under this subsection, the Option 1 payment amount
is applicable to the  first full month after the death of the beneficiary, or the first full month after
entry of the judgment of divorce, and payable the first  day of the month thereafter. If the increased
amount is not paid in any month in which the increased amount is due, the  board shall make a lump
sum payment to the retired member that is equal to the difference  between the amount paid to the
member for that month and the amount that should have  been paid under the provisions of this
subsection.
(4) The cost to the system  of a disability retirement allowance in any optional form may not
exceed the cost to the system of a  nonrefund disability retirement allowance payable to, and on
account of, the member making such election.
(5) The obligation for payment of any benefit in force prior to April 8,  1953, may not be altered
by subsections (1) to (4) of this section. However, the beneficiary of  a retired member who prior to
July 1, 1953, elected an  option but died prior to the effective date of such election, shall have a right
to repay, before December 31, 1953, the amount  of the lump sum refund made in lieu of the monthly
life benefit  elected and receive payment of such benefit, computed as of the date of the member’s
death and payable from such date.
(6) If a member who would have qualified for  disability benefits makes preliminary application
[6]
SB 1128
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
for such benefits but dies prior to being found by  the board to be disabled or prior to electing a plan
of benefit  payments, and the records of the board indicate that the member had designated the sur-
viving spouse as beneficiary under ORS 238.390 (1), such surviving spouse may, not  more than 90
days after the board makes its finding that the member would have qualified  for disability benefits
if living:
(a) Elect to receive the amount referred to in ORS 238.395 if such benefit would have been
available if the member had not applied for disability benefits;
(b) If not eligible for benefits under ORS  238.395, elect to receive benefits under ORS 238.390 (1);
or
(c) Elect Option  2 or 3 under subsection (1) of this section and designate the surviving spouse
as beneficiary  thereunder with the same force and effect as if the election and designation had been
properly made by the deceased member.
(7) The board may deny an election to  convert a disability retirement allowance under this
section, a change of beneficiary under this section or  a change in benefit options under this section
if that denial is required to maintain the status of the system  and the Public Employees Retirement
Fund as a qualified governmental retirement plan and trust under the Internal  Revenue Code and
under regulations adopted pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code.
SECTION 6.
The amendments to ORS 238.320, 238.325, 238.340, 238A.155 and 238A.235 by
sections 1 to 5 of  this 2025 Act apply to members of the Public Employees Retirement System
who are considered disabled under  ORS 238.320 or 238A.235 on the effective date of this 2025
Act, or who become disabled on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[7]