Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 254.
SECTION 2.  (1) The county clerk of each county shall:
(a) Develop a ballot tracking program that uses electronic mail  and telephone text mes-
sages to inform each elector of that county who signs up to participate in the program:
(A) When the elector’s ballot has been mailed to the elector;
(B) When the elector’s completed ballot has been received by the county clerk; and
(C) Whether  the elector’s completed ballot that has been received by the county clerk
has a nonmatching signature or other defect that requires further action  by the elector in
order for the elector’s vote to be counted.
(b) Regularly inform each elector in the county of:
(A) The existence of the program developed under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(B) How the elector can sign up to participate in the program developed under paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(2) A county clerk may not charge  an elector a fee to participate in a program developed
under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2017 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2018.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $_____, to be allocated to county clerks for the purpose of  carrying out
the provisions of section 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3830
SB 1010
1
[2]