Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall  establish the
percentage by  which a district school board shall annually increase the total amount of
moneys used to pay for the salary and benefits of  the employees of a school district who are
employed under a collective  bargaining agreement. The district school board shall use the
percentage as described in ORS 332.075.
(2) For the purpose of establishing the percentage  under subsection (1) of this section,
the department shall:
(a) Calculate the percentage by which the total amount  of moneys available for distrib-
ution from the  State School Fund for the fiscal year increased as compared to the greatest
total amount of moneys that were available for distribution  for a fiscal year from the State
School Fund during the previous biennium;
(b) If necessary, adjust the percentage calculated under paragraph  (a) of this subsection
as follows:
(A) If the percentage exceeds five percent, reduce the percentage to five percent; and
(B) If the total amount of moneys available for distribution from  the State School Fund
for the fiscal year did not increase, establish the percentage at zero percent; and
(c) Use the percentage calculated under paragraph (a)  of this subsection after making
any adjustments required under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(3) The  State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the implementation
of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 332.075 is amended to read:
332.075. (1) Any district school board may:
(a) Fix the days of the year and the hours of the day when schools shall be in session.
(b) Adopt textbooks and other instructional materials as provided in ORS  337.120 and 337.141
and courses of study for the use of such schools as provided in ORS 336.035.
(c) Authorize the use of the  schools for purposes of training students of an approved educator
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3158
HB 3379
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
preparation provider, as defined in ORS 342.120, and for such purposes  may enter into contracts
with the  approved educator preparation provider on such terms as may be agreed upon. Such con-
tracts as they  relate to student teachers shall have the same effect and be subject to the same
regulations as a contract between a licensed teacher and a district school board.
(d) Develop and operate with other  school districts or community college districts secondary
career and technical education programs for  pupils of more than one district and fix by agreement
the duration  of the district’s obligation to continue such activity, subject to the availability of funds
therefor.
(e) Authorize the  school district to be a member of and pay fees, if any, to any voluntary or-
ganization that administers interscholastic activities or that  facilitates the scheduling and pro-
gramming of interscholastic activities.
(f) Accept money or property donated for the use or  benefit of the school district and, consistent
with the laws of this state, use such money or property for the purpose for which it was donated.
(g) Enter into an approved  written agreement with the governing body of a federally recognized
Native American tribe in Oregon to allow the use of a mascot that represents, is  associated with
or is significant to  the Native American tribe entering into the agreement. An agreement entered
into under this paragraph must:
(A) Describe the acceptable uses of the mascot;
(B) Comply with rules adopted by the State Board of Education that:
(i) Are  adopted after consultation with the federally recognized tribes in Oregon pursuant to
ORS 182.164 (3); and
(ii) Prescribe the requirements for approval; and
(C) Be approved by the State Board of Education, which the board must provide if the agreement
meets the requirements of this paragraph and the rules adopted under this paragraph.
(2) All contracts of the school district must be  approved by the district school board before an
order can be drawn for payment. If a contract is made without the authority of  the district school
board, the individual making such contract shall be personally liable.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a  district school board may, by resolution or
policy,  authorize  its superintendent or the superintendent’s designee to enter into and approve pay-
ment on contracts for products, materials, supplies, capital  outlay, equipment and services that are
within appropriations made by the district school board  pursuant to ORS 294.456. A district school
board may not authorize its  superintendent or the superintendent’s designee under this subsection
to enter into and approve  payment on contracts that are collective bargaining agreements or service
contracts that include the provision of labor performed by employees of the school district.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a district  school board may
not agree under  a collective bargaining agreement to an annual increase in the total amount
of moneys used to pay for the  salary and benefits of an employee of the school district that
exceeds the percentage established by the Department  of Education under section 1 of this
2017 Act.
(b) Nothing in this subsection:
(A) Prevents a school  district from providing a salary increase under a merit pay system
or as the result of a promotion or change in duties.
(B) Requires the total cost of  salary and benefits paid to an employee of a school district
to be decreased from the previous fiscal year.
(C) Prevents the parties to a collective bargaining agreement from  entering into a writ-
[2]
HB 3379
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
ten agreement, as part of the collective bargaining process, to  provide for the reopening of
any sections of the collective bargaining agreement related to salary  and benefits. Refusal
by either  party to reopen sections related to salary and benefits is not grounds for third
party interpretation or resolution. The reopening of sections as provided  by this subpara-
graph does not compel either  party to agree to a proposal or require the making of a con-
cession.
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments to  ORS 332.075 by section 2 of this 2017 Act become
operative January 1, 2018.
(2) The amendments to ORS 332.075 by section 2 of this  2017 Act apply to collective bar-
gaining agreements entered into on or after January 1, 2018.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]