Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 468.
SECTION 2. (1) With respect to any permit issued pursuant to ORS 468.065 or any other
permit or authorization  issued pursuant to ORS chapters 448, 453, 454, 459, 459A, 465, 466,
467, 468, 468A and 468B and ORS 475.405 to 475.495, the Department of Environmental Quality:
(a) Shall establish and maintain clear administrative rules, informal guidance  and inter-
nal agency directives for each type of permit or authorization.
(b)(A) Except  as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, may not impose as a
condition of a permit  or authorization, or otherwise require an applicant for a permit or
authorization to comply with, any requirement not in effect at the time the applicant  applied
for the permit or authorization.
(B) Subparagraph (A) of this paragraph does  not apply to requirements necessary to
comply with:
(i) An Act of the Legislative Assembly; or
(ii) Any requirement imposed by federal law.
(c) Shall establish, maintain and make publicly available a deadline for  final action on an
application for each type of permit or authorization.
(2) If  the department fails to meet a deadline established under subsection (1)(c) of this
section, the department shall expedite the application for  which the deadline has been
missed. Expedition may include, but need not be limited to, entering into an  agreement with
the applicant under ORS 468.073.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2771