Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Educators Benefit Board shall study the adequacy of benefits
offered to education workers. The board shall submit  a report in the manner provided by
ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations  for legislation, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to health care no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2577