Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 260.407 is amended to read:
260.407. (1)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, amounts received as con-
tributions by a candidate, the principal campaign committee of a candidate or the  principal cam-
paign committee of a holder of public office may be:
(A) Used to defray  any expenses incurred in connection with the recipient’s duties as a holder
of public office;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any organization described in section 170(c) of the Internal  Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as  contributions by a candidate, the principal campaign committee of a
candidate for public office or the principal campaign committee of a holder of  public office may not
be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal use  other than to defray any expenses incurred in
connection with the person’s duties as a holder of public office or to repay to a candidate  any loan
the proceeds of which were used in connection with the candidate’s campaign;
(B) Except as provided in this  subparagraph, used to pay any money award as defined in ORS
18.005 included as  part of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil penalty imposed by
an agency as defined in ORS 183.310 or by a local government as defined  in ORS 174.116. Contri-
butions described in this paragraph may be used to pay a civil penalty  imposed under this chapter,
other than a civil penalty imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409; [ or]
(C) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any legal expenses  incurred by the
candidate or public official in any civil, criminal or other legal proceeding or  investigation that re-
lates to or arises from the course  and scope of the duties of the person as a candidate or public
official. Contributions described in this paragraph may be used to pay  legal expenses incurred by
the candidate or public official in connection with a legal proceeding brought under ORS chapters
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4545
HB 3453
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
246 to 260, other than a proceeding brought under this section or ORS 260.409 ; or
(D) Used to pay, or to reimburse for  the payment of, a civil penalty imposed by a house
of the Legislative Assembly on a member of the Legislative Assembly .
(2)(a) Except  as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, amounts received as contributions
by a political committee that is not a principal campaign committee may be:
(A) Used to repay to the political committee any loan  the proceeds of which were used in con-
nection with the campaign;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any organization described in section 170(c) of the Internal  Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions by the political committee may not be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal use;
(B) Except as provided in this  subparagraph, used to pay any money award as defined in ORS
18.005 included as  part of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil penalty imposed by
an agency as defined in ORS 183.310 or by a local government as defined  in ORS 174.116. Contri-
butions described in this subsection may be used to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter,
other than a civil penalty imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409; [ or]
(C) Except as provided in  this subparagraph, used to pay any legal expenses incurred by a
treasurer or director of a  political committee in any civil, criminal or other legal proceeding or in-
vestigation that relates to or arises  from the course and scope of the duties of the person as a
treasurer or director. Contributions described in  this subsection may be used to pay legal expenses
incurred by a treasurer  or director in connection with a legal proceeding brought under ORS
chapters 246 to 260, other than a proceeding brought under this section or ORS 260.409 ; or
(D) Used to pay, or to reimburse for  the payment of, a civil penalty imposed by a house
of the Legislative Assembly on a member of the Legislative Assembly .
(3)(a) Except  as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, amounts received as contributions
by a chief petitioner or treasurer of a petition committee may be:
(A) Used to repay to  the chief petitioner any loan the proceeds of which were used in con-
nection with the initiative, referendum or recall petition;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any organization described in section 170(c) of the Internal  Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions by a chief  petitioner or treasurer of a petition committee
may not be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal use;
(B) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any money  award as defined in ORS
18.005 included as part of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil penalty  imposed by
an agency as defined in  ORS 183.310 or by a local government as defined in ORS 174.116. Contri-
butions described in this subsection may be used to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter,
other than a civil penalty imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409; [ or]
(C) Except as provided in  this subparagraph, used to pay any legal expenses incurred by a chief
petitioner or the treasurer of  a petition committee in any civil, criminal or other legal proceeding
or investigation that relates to or arises from the course and scope  of the duties of the person as
[2]
HB 3453
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
a chief petitioner or treasurer. Contributions  described in this subsection may be used to pay legal
expenses incurred by a chief  petitioner or treasurer in connection with a legal proceeding brought
under ORS chapters 246 to 260, other than a proceeding brought under  this section or ORS
260.409; or
(D) Used to pay, or to reimburse for the payment of,  a civil penalty imposed by a house
of the Legislative Assembly on a member of the Legislative Assembly .
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Contribution” and “expenditure” include a contribution or expenditure to or  on behalf of
an initiative, referendum or recall petition.
(b) “Funds donated” means all funds,  including but not limited to gifts, loans, advances, credits
or deposits of money that  are donated for the purpose of supporting the activities of a holder of
public office. “Funds donated” does not mean funds  appropriated by the Legislative Assembly or
another similar public appropriating body  or personal funds of the office holder donated to an ac-
count containing only those personal funds.
(c) “Public office” does not include national or political party office.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 260.407 by section 1 of this 2019 Act apply to  civil
penalties imposed by a house of the  Legislative Assembly on a member of the Legislative
Assembly on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]