Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue Officer shall conduct a study of potential means of
granting a tax benefit  to emergency management volunteers. Not later than September 15,
2026, the officer shall submit a report of the findings of the study, in  the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to revenue,
and may include recommendations for legislation in the report.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2466