Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Energy  shall study the following subjects as
related to nuclear energy, including nuclear waste disposal from nuclear energy:
(a) Advantages of nuclear energy;
(b) Feasibility of constructing nuclear power plants in Oregon;
(c) How the use of nuclear energy may support current energy systems;
(d) Economic growth and workforce development potential for Oregon communities;
(e) Safety of nuclear energy and nuclear waste disposal;
(f) Reliability of nuclear energy;
(g) How the use  of locally produced nuclear energy can eliminate dependence on
foreign-sourced energy; and
(h) Use of thorium as an option for producing nuclear energy.
(2) The department shall submit a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committee of the House of
Representatives on climate, energy and environment no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 481