Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Forestry Department shall study mechanisms  for funding re-
sponses to wildfire and other natural disasters.
(2) The study must:
(a) Examine sources of potential funding, including international, federal, state,  local and
private aid.
(b) Examine models for cost sharing  between levels of government and private
stakeholders.
(c) Examine insurance-based solutions and public-private partnerships.
(d) Examine disaster relief funds and emergency management frameworks.
(e) Examine models  of long-term, sustainable funding for natural disaster prevention,
response and recovery.
(f) Examine the impact of climate change on funding needs and adaptation strategies.
(g) Identify innovative and sustainable funding solutions that can be adapted for Oregon’s
wildfire and nature disaster preparedness and response systems.
(h) Evaluate the effectiveness of various funding models in meeting  immediate response
needs, achieving long-term recovery and mitigating natural disasters.
(i) Analyze the equity and accessibility of  different funding approaches for communities
most vulnerable to wildfire and natural disasters.
(3) The department shall submit a report on the study in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include  recommendations for legislation, to the committees or interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later than September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1285