Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 197.
SECTION 2. (1) On or before December 31, 2026, the Department of Land Conservation
and Development shall develop guidance for local governments that includes:
(a) Recommendations  with respect to implementing ORS 329A.440, 215.213 (2)(aa) and
215.283 (2)(dd);
(b) Recommendations for allowing for child  care facilities, as defined in ORS 329A.250,
as home occupations under ORS 215.448;
(c) Model land use regulations for the development of child care facilities;
(d) Best practices for streamlining the permitting process for child care facilities; and
(e) Policies and  programs that local governments may adopt to incentivize the develop-
ment of child care facilities.
(2) A copy of the guidance must be:
(a) Published to the department’s website; and
(b) Delivered, along with any recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to land use or child care.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4078