Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
An employee of a local government may volunteer with a  city fire depart-
ment or rural fire protection district for  up to 30 days in a year in order to support wildland
fire suppression in emergency situations.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1607