Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 743.683 is amended to read:
743.683. (1) A Medicare supplement insurance policy, contract or certificate in force  in the state
may not contain benefits which duplicate benefits provided by Medicare.
(2) The  Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall adopt by rule spe-
cific standards for policy provisions  of Medicare supplement policies and certificates. The standards
shall be in addition to and  in accordance with applicable laws of this state. A requirement of the
Insurance Code relating to minimum required policy benefits, other than the  minimum standards
contained in ORS 743.680 to 743.689, may not apply to  Medicare supplement policies. The standards
may cover, but not be limited to:
(a) Terms of renewability;
(b) Initial and subsequent conditions of eligibility;
(c) Nonduplication of coverage;
(d) Probationary periods;
(e) Benefit limitations, exceptions and reductions;
(f) Elimination periods;
(g) Requirements for replacement;
(h) Recurrent conditions; [ and]
(i) Definitions of terms[ .]; and
(j) Annual open enrollment periods as described in subsection (7) of this section.
(3) Provisions established by the director  governing eligibility for Medicare supplement insur-
ance shall not be limited to persons qualifying for Medicare by reason of age.
(4) The director  may adopt by rule standards that specify prohibited policy provisions not oth-
erwise specifically authorized by statute which, in the opinion of the  director, are unjust, unfair or
unfairly discriminatory to any person insured or proposed for coverage  under a Medicare supple-
ment policy.
(5) Notwithstanding any other  provision of law of this state, [ a] for an eligible application a
carrier offering a policy, contract or certificate of  Medicare supplement  [policy] insurance may
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2440
SB 1181
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
not: [ deny a claim  for losses incurred more than six months from the effective date of coverage for a
preexisting condition. The policy may not  define a preexisting condition more restrictively than a
condition for which medical advice was given or treatment  was recommended by or received from a
physician or naturopathic physician within six months before the effective date of coverage. ]
(a) Apply a preexisting condition exclusion, as defined in ORS 743B.005; or
(b) Impose different terms or conditions on the coverage provided or  the premium
charged or deny coverage based on the actual or expected health status, geographic  location,
claims experience, age, receipt of health  care or medical condition of an enrollee or pro-
spective enrollee.
(6) The director shall adopt by rule standards for benefits and claims  payment under Medicare
supplement policies.
(7) As used in this section, “eligible  application” means an application for Medicare sup-
plement insurance that is submitted:
(a) Prior to or during the six-month period beginning  with the first day of the month in
which an individual first enrolled in Medicare Part B; or
(b) During an  annual 90-day open enrollment period that begins on January 1 of each
year.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 743.683  by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to in-
surance policies, contracts or certificates issued, renewed or extended on or after  January
1, 2026.
[2]