Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which shall be expended  for summer and after-school
programs, with priority given to applicants or programs that, as  determined by the depart-
ment:
(1) Serve youth  from rural areas or historically underserved populations, including youth
with disabilities;
(2) Encourage collaboration between community organizations and education providers;
(3) Promote the healthy development of youth;
(4) Use or expand upon existing programs, organizations or services provided to youth
or for the benefit of youth; and
(5) Align with quality standards established by the  department in consultation with pri-
vate and public  organizations and community members involved with expanded learning op-
portunities.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2177