Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible educator” means an  elementary or secondary school teacher at a public
school or an adjunct instructor who teaches at least six  credit hours in the tax year at an
eligible institution.
(b) “Eligible  expenses” means unreimbursed expenses of the types described in section
62(a)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code that are incurred by an eligible educator.
(c) “Eligible institution”  means a public university listed in ORS 352.002, the Oregon
Health and Science University,  a community college operated under ORS chapter 341 or any
other public educational institution in this state that is authorized by law to provide a pro-
gram of education for kindergarten through grade 12.
(2) A credit against the taxes otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 shall be  allowed for
eligible expenses incurred during the tax year. The amount of credit  shall equal the lesser
of:
(a) The amount of eligible expenses; or
(b) $250.
(3) The credit allowed under this section in one tax year may not exceed  the tax liability
of the taxpayer.
(4) If a  credit allowed under this section is claimed, the amount upon which the credit
is based that is allowed or allowable as a deduction from federal taxable income under section
62 of the Internal Revenue Code  shall be added to federal taxable income in determining
Oregon taxable income.
(5)(a) A nonresident shall  be allowed the credit under this section in the proportion pro-
vided in ORS 316.117.
(b) If a change in the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from  nonres-
ident to resident occurs, the credit  allowed under this section shall be determined in a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2575
HB 3334
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
manner consistent with ORS 316.117.
(c) If a change in the taxable year of a taxpayer occurs as  described in ORS 314.085, or
if the Department of Revenue  terminates the taxpayer’s taxable year under ORS 314.440, the
credit allowed under this section shall be prorated or computed in a  manner consistent with
ORS 314.085.
(6) The Department of Education shall adopt rules that establish policies  and procedures
for certifying taxpayers  as eligible educators for purposes of the tax credit allowed under this
section.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2025, and before January 1, 2031.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]