Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 822.043 is amended to read:
822.043. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Integrator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 802.600.
(b) “Vehicle dealer” means a person issued a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020.
(2) A vehicle  dealer that the Department of Transportation has designated to act as an agent
of the department under  ORS 802.031 may elect to prepare, submit, or prepare and submit documents
necessary to:
(a) Issue or transfer a certificate of title for a vehicle;
(b) Register a vehicle or transfer registration of a vehicle;
(c) Issue a registration plate;
(d) Verify and clear a title;
(e) Perfect, release or satisfy a lien or other security interest;
(f) Comply with federal security requirements; or
(g) Render any other services for the purpose of complying with state  and federal laws related
to the sale of a vehicle.
(3) A vehicle dealer who prepares any documents described in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) May charge a purchaser of a vehicle a document processing  fee for the preparation of those
documents.
(b) May not charge a purchaser of a vehicle a document processing fee  for the submission of
any document or the issuance of a registration plate.
(c) May charge a purchaser of a vehicle a document processing fee for performing any of  the
services described in subsection (2) of this section in connection with preparing the documents de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
(d) May submit the documents in person at any  field office of the Department of Trans-
portation.
(4) A purchaser of a vehicle may  negotiate the amount of the document processing fee with a
vehicle dealer, but in no case shall the  document processing fee charged by a vehicle dealer under
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2785
HB 2718
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
this section exceed:
(a) $250, if the vehicle dealer uses an integrator; or
(b) $200, if the vehicle dealer does not use an integrator.
(5) If a vehicle dealer charges a document processing fee  under subsection (4)(a) of this section,
of the amount collected $35 shall be paid to the integrator.
(6) Unless otherwise provided by rule, if a vehicle dealer uses an integrator and charges a doc-
ument processing fee greater than that charged for not using an integrator, the dealer  must inform
the purchaser of the vehicle of the  option of using an integrator to prepare the documents. The
purchaser may then elect whether or not to have  the vehicle dealer use an integrator to prepare the
documents.
(7) If the purchaser of a vehicle  pays a document processing fee, the vehicle dealer shall prepare
and submit all documents to complete the transaction as permitted by law.
(8)(a) A vehicle dealer who collects the privilege tax imposed under  ORS 320.405 from the pur-
chaser of a taxable motor vehicle may  collect the privilege tax at the same time and in the same
manner as the vehicle dealer collects document processing fees under this  section. The amount of
the privilege tax shall be in addition to and not in lieu  of document processing fees collected under
this section.
(b) A vehicle dealer may exclude  the amount of the privilege tax from the capitalized cost and
offering price of a taxable motor vehicle as those terms are defined by  the Department of Justice
by rule.
[2]