Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Employment Department shall conduct a study of the  implementation
of unemployment insurance law in Oregon. The department shall submit a report of its
findings to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to employment in the
manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1654