Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 164.805 is amended to read:
164.805. (1) A person commits the crime  of offensive littering if the person creates an
objectionable stench or degrades the beauty or appearance of property  or detracts from the natural
cleanliness or safety of property by intentionally:
(a) Discarding  or depositing any rubbish, trash, garbage, debris or other refuse upon the land
of another without permission of the owner, or upon any public way or in or upon any public
transportation facility[ ;].
(b) Draining,  or causing or permitting to be drained, sewage or the drainage from a cesspool,
septic tank, recreational or camping  vehicle waste holding tank or other contaminated source, upon
the land of another without permission of the owner, or upon any public way[ ; or ].
(c) Permitting any rubbish, trash,  garbage, debris or other refuse to be thrown from a vehicle
that the person is operating. This [ subsection] paragraph does not apply  to a person operating a
vehicle transporting passengers for hire  subject to regulation by the Department of Transportation
or a person operating a school bus described under ORS 801.460.
(d) Releasing  a balloon filled with helium, or another substance that allows the balloon
to remain airborne, into the airspace of this state, except for:
(A) Balloons released by a person on behalf of a governmental agency;
(B) Balloons released pursuant to a governmental  contract for scientific or
meteorological purposes; or
(C) Hot air balloons that are recovered after launching.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Public transportation facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 164.365.
(b) “Public way” includes, but is not limited to, roads, streets, alleys, lanes, trails, beaches, parks
and all  recreational facilities operated by the state, a county or a local municipality for use by the
general public.
(3) Offensive littering is a Class C misdemeanor.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 110
HB 2592
1
[2]