Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Subject to approval by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission under
ORS 350.075 (3)(g) or 352.089 (2), each public university listed in ORS 352.002  may offer doc-
toral degrees.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding section 1  of this 2025 Act, the Oregon Institute of Tech-
nology, Eastern Oregon University, Southern Oregon University and Western Oregon  Uni-
versity may not offer more than five doctoral programs each.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 1, 2044.
SECTION 4.  ORS 352.011 is amended to read:
352.011. [(1) As used in this section, “professional doctoral degree” means a first professional de-
gree, excluding a Doctor of Philosophy degree, that: ]
[(a) Represents a category of qualifications in a professional subject area that requires students to
have previously completed specified undergraduate  coursework or obtained previous undergraduate
degrees before enrolling in the professional doctoral degree granting program; and ]
[(b) Is awarded upon completion of a program  that provides the knowledge and skills for the re-
cognition, credential or license required for professional practice. ]
[(2)] Western Oregon University, Southern Oregon University and  Eastern Oregon University
are established as comprehensive universities  that offer a full range of baccalaureate programs
and, subject to section 1 of  this 2025 Act,  graduate programs [ through the master’s degree and the
professional doctoral degree ].
SECTION 5. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission or any other  state
agency may not use public moneys to award a scholarship,  grant or other type of student
financial aid to a post-secondary institution of education if  the post-secondary institution of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2849
HB 2715
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
education:
(a) Offers coursework primarily online; and
(b) Has been found to have engaged in fraudulent or predatory practices against a  stu-
dent or prospective student, as determined by:
(A) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission;
(B) A court of this state; or
(C) A public body as defined by ORS 174.109.
(2) As used in this section,  “offers coursework primarily online” and “fraudulent or
predatory practices” shall be defined by rule by  the Higher Education Coordinating Com-
mission.
[2]