Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Criminal Defense Clinical Legal Education Program is established in  the
Higher Education Coordinating  Commission to provide training and supervision of court-
certified law students to undertake misdemeanor cases.
SECTION 2. (1) The  Criminal Defense Clinical Legal Education Program Fund is estab-
lished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The fund consists of moneys credited  to the fund from moneys appropriated or
transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly. Moneys in the fund are continuously
appropriated to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission to be distributed to the law
schools in this state for purposes of the  program established under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $ , which shall be deposited  to the
Criminal Defense Clinical Legal Education Program Fund established under section 2  of this
2025 Act for purposes of administering the program established under section 1 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1711