Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “eligible newcomer” means:
(a) An individual who:
(A) Is not a United States citizen;
(B) Is not receiving support services under an eligible immigration status designated  by
the federal Office of Refugee Resettlement;
(C) Has been in the United States for 24 months or less; and
(D) Has been residing in Oregon for 18 months or less.
(b) A minor child,  who is residing in Oregon, of an individual described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection.
(2) The Office of Immigrant and Refugee Advancement shall, in consultation with the
Department of Human  Services, coordinate with community-based organizations and award
contracts to entities to equitably provide eligible  newcomers with the following support ser-
vices:
(a) Streamlined intake, initial reception and case management services.
(b) Short-term wraparound support services,  including shelter, food, clothing, health care
and transportation.
(c) Long-term support services related  to housing, education, employment, leadership
development and technology.
(3) The support services provided under this section must be provided in a manner  that
is equitable and culturally and linguistically appropriate.
(4) An eligible newcomer who receives support services under this section may receive:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 95
HB 4159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Case management services for a period of up to  15 months from when the eligible
newcomer first receives case management services.
(b) Housing or rental assistance for a  period of up to 12 months from when the eligible
newcomer first receives housing or rental assistance.
(5) An entity that is awarded a contract to provide support services under this  section
shall:
(a) Assist eligible newcomers in accessing, to the greatest extent possible,  existing fed-
eral, state and local support services and programs to receive  the support services provided
under this section;
(b) Provide eligible newcomers with  those support services that eligible newcomers are
unable to access through existing federal, state or local support services and programs; and
(c) Coordinate with and work collaboratively with all  entities that are awarded a contract
under this section.
(6)(a) The office shall award contracts under this section by using  a competitive request
for proposal process.
(b) Funding awarded under a contract shall be  used to provide support services under the
contract to eligible newcomers  and the contract shall specify the percentage or amount of
funding that may be used  to cover an entity’s administrative costs in providing the support
services.
(c) Funding under a contract shall be on a per person  basis based on the number of
persons for whom the contracted entity provides support services,  except for funding for
housing or rental assistance, a family consisting of two persons shall count as one person.
(7) An entity that has an active contract under this section shall:
(a) For the purpose  of improving the delivery of support services, outcomes and prac-
tices, conduct an annual survey of the eligible newcomers served by the entity;
(b) Provide a summary of the annual  survey to the office and the advisory council cre-
ated under section 3 of this 2024 Act; and
(c) Make public the summary of the annual survey.
(8) In carrying the provisions of this section, the office shall consult with the Department
of Human Services.
SECTION 2.
The Office of Immigrant and Refugee  Advancement shall require an annual
performance audit of each entity that has an active contract with the office under section 1
of this 2024 Act to evaluate compliance with the contract  and the financial effectiveness with
which the contracted entity provides support services under the contract. The office shall
provide a copy of each audit to the  advisory council created under section 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) There is  created an advisory council that shall consist of at least seven,
but not more than 11, members. Members shall be  appointed by and serve at the pleasure
of the director of the Office of Immigrant and Refugee  Advancement. The advisory council
shall be composed of representatives from:
(a) Entities contracted under section 1 of this 2024 Act;
(b) Community-based organizations that serve immigrant or refugee communities;
(c) Immigrant and refugee communities;
(d) City and county governments; and
(e) The Office of Immigrant and Refugee Advancement.
(2) The advisory council shall:
[2]
HB 4159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
(a) Serve as a forum for sharing information and recommendations  on providing support
services;
(b) Serve as a channel of communication between eligible newcomers being  served under
section 1 of this 2024 Act and the office;
(c) Review the summaries of annual surveys and  audits provided to the advisory council
under sections 1 and 2 of this 2024 Act; and
(d) Advise and make  policy recommendations to the office regarding the delivery of sup-
port services, outcomes, financial effectiveness and use of best practices.
(3) Members of the advisory  council may elect a person from among the membership to
chair the advisory council.
(4) A majority of  members of the advisory council constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(5) The advisory council shall  meet at times and places specified by the call of the
chairperson or of a majority of members of the advisory council and shall meet at least once
every six months.
(6) Members  of the advisory council may not receive compensation for their services.
Members of the advisory council other than members employed in  full-time public service
shall be reimbursed by the office for their actual and necessary expenses  incurred in the
performance of their duties. The reimbursements  shall be subject to the provisions of ORS
292.210 to  292.288. Members of the advisory council who are employed in full-time public
service may  be reimbursed by their employing agencies for their actual and necessary ex-
penses incurred in the performance of their duties.
SECTION 4.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]