Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 480.310 to
480.385.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
(b) “Mobile on-demand fueling” means dispensing Class 1, 2 or 3  flammable liquids into
the fuel tanks of motor vehicles.
(c) “Mobile on-demand fueling motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle that has been  cer-
tified by a local government to provide mobile  on-demand fueling to customers and has met
the standards established under this section.
(d) “Mobile on-demand fueling  operator” means a person who has been certified by a local
government to provide  mobile on-demand fueling to customers and has and met the stan-
dards established under this section.
(2) Notwithstanding any restriction in ORS 480.310  to 480.385, a local government may
provide certificates described in subsection (3) of this section. Any ordinance adopted shall
conform to the standards established by the  State Fire Marshal under this section and may
include additional provisions as required by local ordinances.
(3) The State Fire Marshal shall  adopt standards and advise local governments with re-
spect to the criteria for  issuing mobile on-demand fueling operator certificates and mobile
on-demand fueling motor vehicle certificates.
(4) The State Fire Marshal shall provide recommendations to local governments on:
(a) Establishing timely and consistent requirements for issuing mobile on-demand  fueling
operator certificates and mobile on-demand fueling motor vehicle certificates;
(b) Procedures for eliminating redundancies and improving efficiency across Oregon;
(c) Recommendations  for reciprocal acceptance of certificates among local governments
in Oregon;
(d) Processes that do not require multiple and substantially similar inspections of a  par-
ticular vehicle for the vehicle to operate in multiple jurisdictions;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 638
HB 2201
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
(e) Standards for vehicle requirements; and
(f) Any other recommendations of  the State Fire Marshal related to mobile on-demand
fueling in Oregon.
(5) A local  government may charge a fee to cover the costs of issuing certificates, in-
spections or other administrative costs related to carrying out the authority under this
section.
(6) The State Fire Marshal and local governments shall  take into consideration the
International Fire Code regulations related to  mobile on-demand fueling when adopting
standards under this section.
[2]