Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Conservation  and Recreation Fund is established separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Oregon Conservation and Re-
creation Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State Department  of Fish
and Wildlife to carry out activities that serve to protect, maintain or enhance fish  and
wildlife resources in Oregon.  The activities for which the department may expend fund
moneys include, but are not limited to:
(a) Promoting the health of Oregon’s ecosystems and fish  and wildlife species by imple-
menting conservation programs and strategies identified  in the Oregon Conservation Strat-
egy, as defined in ORS 541.890, including conservation programs and strategies for the
nearshore identified in the marine component of the Oregon Conservation Strategy;
(b) Improving engagement of  the public in hunting and fishing opportunities and in other
outdoor recreation opportunities related  to and in support of healthy fish, wildlife and
habitats;
(c) Improving educational outreach and engagement of the public,  including diverse and
underserved communities, related to and in support of healthy fish, wildlife and habitats;
(d) Engaging in, and providing funding for, joint projects of the department  and the State
Parks and Recreation Department or other state agencies as  recommended by the Oregon
Conservation and Recreation Advisory Committee established under section 2 of this  2018
Act; and
(e) Other conservation,  management, research, habitat improvement, enforcement, out-
door recreation or education activities.
(3) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife for deposit in the
fund or otherwise transferred to the fund; and
(b) Gifts, grants, contributions or other donations for use as described in subsection  (2)
of this section, that  are received by the department from any public or private source and
caused to be deposited and credited to the fund.
[2]
HB 4015
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Conservation and Recreation Advisory Committee  is estab-
lished as an advisory committee to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission  and the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife for the  purpose of carrying out the duties described in
subsection (2) of this section.  The commission shall determine the number of members of the
committee and the geographical representation by the members.  The Governor shall appoint
the members of the committee.
(2) The committee shall review department policies regarding the use  of Oregon Conser-
vation and Recreation Fund moneys and  make recommendations to the commission and the
department regarding the use of fund moneys for implementing and  administering depart-
ment activities.
(3) Members of the committee may  not receive compensation for service as members.
However, subject to any applicable law regulating travel and other expenses  of state officers
and employees, a member  may be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel and other ex-
penses incurred in the performance of official duties  from moneys available to the depart-
ment for the purpose of reimbursement of committee members.
(4) The department and the committee  jointly shall submit a biennial report to the Leg-
islative Assembly as provided in ORS 293.640 regarding  the expenditure of moneys deposited
in the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund established under section 1 of this 2018 Act
and on the status of various activities funded by the moneys.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $13,000,000 for deposit in the Oregon Conservation
and Recreation Fund established under section 1 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, for  the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2019, expenditures by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife from the Oregon
Conservation and Recreation  Fund established under section 1 of this 2018 Act are not lim-
ited.
SECTION 5.
This 2018 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2018
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]