Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Water Resources  Department shall provide a grant to the City of
Carlton for  water system infrastructure improvements. The grant provided under this sec-
tion shall be  used by the City of Carlton for the costs of planning, engineering, permitting
and constructing water system infrastructure that includes:
(1) Approximately 11 miles of pipeline connecting the City of Carlton  water system to a
water system facility in the City of Hillsboro; and
(2) Pipeline interconnections to allow for future services to nearby water suppliers with
water supply needs.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $23,000,000,  which may be expended for the purpose of carrying
out the provisions of section 1 of this 2023 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1881