Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 414.782 is amended to read:
414.782. (1) As used in this section, “coordinated care organization” and “medical  assist-
ance” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 414.025.
(2) The  Oregon Health Authority, with the advice of stakeholders and the Alcohol and Drug
Policy Commission, [ may] shall  establish minimum rates of reimbursement  paid by the authority or
coordinated care organizations to [ addiction] behavioral health  treatment providers to ensure
medical assistance recipients’ access, without delay, to all modalities of [ addiction treatment ] be-
havioral health services  within each geographic region of this state.
(3) A  coordinated care organization shall reimburse both in-network and out-of-network
behavioral health treatment providers at the rates  established under subsection (2) of this
section.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4089