Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Renewable Diesel is established.
(2) The task force consists of 16 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from  among the members of
the Senate, including one member from the majority party and one member from the mi-
nority party.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two members from among
the members of  the House of Representatives, including one member from the majority party
and one member from the minority party.
(c) The Governor shall appoint nine members as follows:
(A) One representative of truck owners with extensive  experience using renewable diesel
as a primary fuel source;
(B) One representative of an association representing the trucking industry;
(C) One representative of the renewable diesel industry;
(D) One representative of a major diesel fuel manufacturer;
(E) One representative of a major diesel fuel marketer and distributor;
(F) One representative of an association representing the construction industry with ex-
tensive experience using diesel fuel for nonroad purposes;
(G) One representative of an association representing businesses  that use diesel fuel for
nonroad purposes; and
(H) Two representatives of the environmental community.
(d) The following shall serve as ex officio nonvoting members of the task force:
(A) The Director of Agriculture or the director’s designee;
(B) The Director of the Department of  Environmental Quality or the director’s designee;
and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3426
HB 3261
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) The Director of the State Department of Energy or the director’s designee.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Study the  availability of renewable diesel in this state and incentives for increasing
the availability of renewable diesel.
(b) Develop estimates of current and future demand for diesel fuels in this state, includ-
ing separate estimates for:
(A) The Portland metropolitan area;
(B) The portion of the state lying east of the Cascade Mountains; and
(C) The portion of the state lying west of the Cascade Mountains.
(c) Analyze the cost difference between renewable diesel and other fuels, including  pe-
troleum diesel, using market data from Oil Price Information  Service, and calculate the
supply and demand implications  if petroleum diesel is removed from the marketplace. An
analysis under this paragraph may include:
(A) A baseline cost of diesel using a national average;
(B) An examination of the state costs and state incentives specific to diesel fuel; and
(C) An examination of implications for the supply of nonroad diesel fuel.
(4) The task force may, upon the approval of a majority  of the voting members of the
task force, study or develop recommendations for matters related to the availability  of
renewable diesel in addition to those described in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report, which may include recommendations for  legis-
lation, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to the environment no later than December 15, 2026.
(12) The State Department of  Agriculture and the State Department of Energy shall
jointly provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
[2]
HB 3261
1
2
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]