Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 653.025 is amended to read:
653.025. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, ORS 652.020 and the
rules of the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries issued under ORS  653.030 and
653.261, for each hour of work time that the employee is gainfully employed,  no employer shall em-
ploy or agree to employ any employee at wages computed at a rate lower than:
(a) For calendar year 2003, $6.90.
(b) From January 1, 2004, to June 30, 2016,  a rate adjusted for inflation as calculated by the
commissioner.
(c) From July 1, 2016, to June 30, 2017, $9.75.
(d) From July 1, 2017, to June 30, 2018, $10.25.
(e) From July 1, 2018, to June 30, 2019, $10.75.
(f) From July 1, 2019, to June 30, 2020, $11.25.
(g) From July 1, 2020, to June 30, 2021, $12.
(h) From July 1, 2021, to June 30, 2022, $12.75.
(i) From July 1, 2022, to June 30, 2023, $13.50.
(j) After June 30, 2023, beginning on July 1 of each  year, a rate adjusted annually for inflation
as described in subsection (5) of this section.
(2) If the employer is located  within the urban growth boundary of a metropolitan service dis-
trict organized under ORS chapter  268, except as provided by ORS 652.020 and the rules of the
commissioner issued under ORS 653.030 and 653.261, for each  hour of work time that the employee
is gainfully employed, no employer shall employ or agree to employ any employee at wages computed
at a rate lower than:
(a) From July 1, 2016, to June 30, 2017, $9.75.
(b) From July 1, 2017, to June 30, 2018, $11.25.
(c) From July 1, 2018, to June 30, 2019, $12.
(d) From July 1, 2019, to June 30, 2020, $12.50.
(e) From July 1, 2020, to June 30, 2021, $13.25.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1222
SB 766
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
(f) From July 1, 2021, to June 30, 2022, $14.
(g) From July 1, 2022, to June 30, 2023, $14.75.
(h) After June 30, 2023, $1.25  per hour more than the minimum wage determined under sub-
section (1)(j) of this section.
(3) If the employer is located within  a nonurban county as described in ORS 653.026, except as
provided by ORS 652.020 and the rules of the commissioner issued under ORS 653.030 and 653.261,
for each hour of work time that the employee is gainfully employed, no employer shall employ or
agree to employ any employee at wages computed at a rate lower than:
(a) From July 1, 2016, to June 30, 2017, $9.50.
(b) From July 1, 2017, to June 30, 2018, $10.
(c) From July 1, 2018, to June 30, 2019, $10.50.
(d) From July 1, 2019, to June 30, 2020, $11.
(e) From July 1, 2020, to June 30, 2021, $11.50.
(f) From July 1, 2021, to June 30, 2022, $12.
(g) From July 1, 2022, to June 30, 2023, $12.50.
(h) After June 30, 2023, $1 per hour less than the minimum wage  determined under subsection
(1)(j) of this section.
(4) The  commissioner shall adopt rules for determining an employer’s location under subsection
(2) of this section.
(5)(a) The Oregon minimum wage shall be adjusted for inflation as provided  in paragraph (b) of
this subsection.
(b) No later than April 30 of each year, beginning in 2023, the commissioner  shall calculate [ an
adjustment of the wage amount  specified in subsection (1)(j) of this section based upon ] the increase,
if any, from March of the preceding year to March of the year in which  the calculation is made in
the U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers  for All Items as prepared by
the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department  of Labor or its successor and in-
crease the wage amount specified in subsection (1)(j) of this section by the lesser of:
(A) Five percent; or
(B) The percentage increase in the inflation rate as calculated by the commissioner under
this paragraph.
(c) The wage  amount as adjusted under this subsection shall be rounded to the nearest five
cents.
(d) The wage amount as adjusted under this subsection becomes effective as  the new Oregon
minimum wage amount, replacing the minimum wage amount  specified in subsection (1)(j) of this
section, on July 1 of the year in which the calculation is made.
(e) The wage amount specified in subsection (1)(j) of this section may not  be decreased
as a result of an adjustment made under this subsection.
[2]