Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(1) Oregonians accused of a crime are entitled, under the Sixth and  Fourteenth Amend-
ments of  the United States Constitution, and Article I, section 11, of the Oregon Constitu-
tion, to have an attorney provided at government expense  whenever the person is facing the
potential loss of liberty and is unable to afford an attorney.
(2) The current unrepresented defendant crisis represents a  threat to the constitutional
rights of Oregonians and must be resolved.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) The presiding judge of each judicial district shall immediately develop
and implement a coordinated public safety unrepresented defendant crisis plan,  and submit
the plan to  the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, as soon as practicable and no later
than September 1, 2023.
(b) The plan described in this subsection must first prioritize the resolution of the cases
of unrepresented defendants who are in custody,  and then the cases of unrepresented de-
fendants who are out of custody.
(2) The presiding judge of a judicial district with a total  population of over 100,000 shall
immediately convene a crisis team to assist in the development of the plan and  to coordinate
the implementation of the plan described in subsection (1) of this section. The team shall  be
composed of at least the following persons:
(a) The presiding judge of the judicial district;
(b) District attorneys within the judicial district; and
(c) The public defense services executive director, or the director’s designee.
(3) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court may issue orders related to resolving  the
unrepresented defendant crisis.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4497
SB 1093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
(4) The presiding judge of a judicial district may enter standing orders  related to resolv-
ing the unrepresented defendant crisis that are  consistent with the orders of the Chief Jus-
tice described in subsection (3) of this section and the plan of the judicial district described
in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3.
The Public Defense Services Commission shall:
(1) By no later than August 15, 2023, promulgate and disseminate guidance for the judicial
district coordinated public safety unrepresented defendant crisis plans  described in section
2 of this 2023 Act.
(2) By no later than September 1, 2023, develop a training plan for public defense pro-
viders specific to the unrepresented defendant crisis, in consultation and cooperation with
public defense provider associations and organizations.
(3) By  no later than October 1, 2023, report to the Joint Interim Committee on Ways and
Means and the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to the judiciary, in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the commission’s progress in carrying out the  pro-
visions described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
SECTION 4.
The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  shall conduct a review of each
judicial district’s coordinated public safety  unrepresented defendant crisis plan submitted to
the commission  under section 2 of this 2023 Act. The commission shall report the
commission’s findings to  the Joint Interim Committee on Ways and Means and the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to the judiciary, in the manner provided in
ORS 192.245, no later than October 1, 2023.
SECTION 5. All agencies of  state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to
assist the presiding judges of  judicial districts, the Public Defense Services Commission and
the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission in the performance of  their duties under sections
2 to 4 of this 2023 Act and, to the extent permitted by laws relating  to confidentiality, to
furnish such information and advice to the judges and  commissions necessary to perform
their duties.
SECTION 6. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  out
of the General Fund,  the amount of $ , for the purposes of funding public defense ex-
penses related to implementing the crisis plans described in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 7. Sections 1 to 5 of this 2023 Act are repealed on June 30, 2025.
SECTION 8. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]