Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for distribution to the Portland
Opportunities Industrialization Center for construction and operation of the Sunrise Campus
Cultural Workforce Center that will serve as  a hub for preapprenticeship and apprenticeship
programs that provide marginalized youth with skills training in construction and  semicon-
ductor manufacturing.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1956