Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  consult with com-
munity colleges and  the public universities listed in ORS 352.002 and conduct a study to de-
termine whether additional legislation is necessary to enhance the  process for transferring
academic credits between community colleges and the public universities listed in ORS
352.002.
(2) The commission shall present the results of the study, along with  any recommended
legislative changes, in a report to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related
to higher education in the manner provided under ORS 192.245  on or before September 15,
2020.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2021.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3591