Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 4, chapter 624, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) Sections 1 to 3 [ of this 2017 Act ], chapter 624, Oregon  Laws 2017,  are repealed on
January 2, [ 2027] 2033.
(2) Notwithstanding the  date specified in subsection (1) of this section, eligible rental property
that is granted  exemption under an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to section 1 [ of this
2017 Act], chapter 624, Oregon Laws 2017,  before the date specified in subsection (1) of this section
shall continue to receive the exemption under  the provisions of the ordinance or resolution for the
period of time for which the exemption was granted.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2141