Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the Office of Community Colleges
and Workforce Development, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $3,000,000 for the Oregon Employer Workforce Training Program.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the Office of Community Colleges
and Workforce Development, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $4,750,000  for local workforce investment boards for youth work expe-
rience programs.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the Office of Community Colleges
and Workforce Development, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $1,250,000  for the Oregon Youth Conservation Corps for grants for the
Oregon Community Stewardship Corps and the Summer Conservation Corps.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 368