Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 3 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Grant program recipient” means a nonprofit organization that has been awarded  a
grant from the Housing and Community Services Department under section 2 of this  2017
Act.
(2) “Homeownership assistance program” means a program established,  implemented and
operated by a nonprofit organization whereby the organization provides housing-related  as-
sistance to persons in low income households.
(3) “Low income household” means a household having an  income equal to or less than
80 percent of the median household income,  adjusted for family size, for the county in which
the low income household is located as  determined by the Housing and Community Services
Department. In making the determination, the department shall give consideration  to any
data on area  household income published by the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development.
(4) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization or group of organizations  that is de-
scribed in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue  Code and is exempt from income tax
under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(5) “Residence” means a single family residence that is intended  for occupation by a
single family unit and that is owned and occupied by an individual who  is a member of a low
income household as the individual’s principal residence. “Residence” includes a manufac-
tured home, residential trailer, mobile home or condominium unit.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Homeownership Repair  and Rehabilitation Program is established
within the Housing and Community Services Department. The purpose of the program  is to
provide grants to eligible nonprofit organizations with homeownership  assistance programs
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3656
HB 2961
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that will provide  financial assistance to persons in low income households to repair and re-
habilitate their residences.
(2) A nonprofit organization is eligible to receive  grants from the Homeownership Repair
and Rehabilitation Program upon establishing that the organization:
(a) Is operating, or will be operating,  a homeownership assistance program that provides
assistance to low income households;
(b) Has the capacity to administer grant funds received under this section; and
(c) Is able to comply with the requirements of all state and federal laws, rules and reg-
ulations.
(3) The department shall provide grants  to eligible nonprofit organizations for the pur-
pose of providing loans, grants or other financial assistance to eligible low income households
for the repair and rehabilitation of their residences. The department shall  establish by rule
the nature and extent of the repair and rehabilitation that may be funded by  nonprofit or-
ganizations under the program.
(4) The department shall establish by rule a process for  nonprofit organizations to apply
to receive grants from the Homeownership Repair and Rehabilitation Program.  The process
may include a request for proposals.
(5) Upon being awarded a  grant under this section, the grant program recipient shall
enter into an agreement with the department that, at a minimum, contains provisions that:
(a) Indicate the purposes for which the grant funds may be used;
(b) Limit the amount of financial assistance provided by the grant program recipient  to
a low income household to a maximum of $25,000 per low income household;
(c) Limit the amount charged by the grant program  recipient for administrative costs to
implement the program to a maximum of five percent of the grant funds received;
(d) Limit the amount charged by the grant program recipient for  program delivery costs
to a maximum of 15 percent of the grant funds received;
(e) Include the repayment provisions set forth in subsection (6) of this section;
(f) Include the provisions set forth in subsection (8) of this section;
(g) Permit the department to  conduct audits and investigations of the grant program
recipient regarding the purposes for which grant funds have been used; and
(h) Require annual reports by the grant program  recipient to the department as set forth
in subsection (7) of this section.
(6) A grant  program recipient must repay to the department, in whole or in part, grant
funds received under this section to the extent that:
(a) The grant program recipient does not use the grant funds in accordance with  the
provisions of the grant agreement executed between the department  and the grant program
recipient under subsection (5) of this section; or
(b) The Director of  the Housing and Community Services Department determines that
the grant program recipient must repay all or part of the grant funds  on grounds of
defalcation, fraud or similar reasons after  auditing or investigating the grant program
recipient’s operations and conducting an administrative hearing under ORS 183.413 to 183.470.
(7) A grant program recipient shall report to  the department by December 31 of each
year concerning the status and use of grant  funds received under this section. The depart-
ment by rule shall specify the information that the report must  contain. At a minimum, the
report must exclude any personal information about an individual and must include:
[2]
HB 2961
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A detailed description of the grant program recipient’s use of grant funds;
(b) A list of each loan, grant or other financial assistance that the grant program  recip-
ient has provided and, where applicable, a full accounting of the repayment status of  the
loans;
(c) The number of low income households that the grant program recipient has  provided
financial assistance to for the repair and rehabilitation of their residences;
(d) The nature and amounts of the administrative  expenses the grant program recipient
has incurred in providing the financial assistance under the program; and
(e) Aggregated data concerning the income, racial or ethnic background,  family size and
related demographic information of persons in  low income households who received financial
assistance for repairs and rehabilitation of  residences under the program from the grant
program recipient.
(8)(a) Amounts of loans purchased, leveraged or made by a grant program recipient under
this section shall not constitute a debt of the state  or a lending of the credit of the state
within the meaning of any constitutional or  statutory limitation, although nothing in this
subsection or in the terms of an agreement between  the department and a grant program
recipient is intended to impair the rights of the  grant program recipient to exercise any
rights granted to the grant program recipient against the security for the loan.
(b) The department may not pay amounts for grants under this section from any source
other than available funds in the  Homeownership Repair and Rehabilitation Program Fund
established in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Homeownership Repair  and Rehabilitation Program Fund. Interest earned
by the Homeownership Repair and Rehabilitation Program Fund shall be credited to the fund.
All moneys in the  Homeownership Repair and Rehabilitation Program Fund are continuously
appropriated to the Housing and Community Services Department to award grants  to eligible
nonprofit organizations with homeownership assistance programs.
(2) Moneys in the Homeownership  Repair and Rehabilitation Program Fund may be used
by the department to pay for the administrative expenses of the department in  establishing,
implementing and administering the Homeownership Repair and Rehabilitation Program.
(3) The Homeownership Repair and Rehabilitation Program Fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Grant funds repaid under section 2 (6) of this 2017 Act;
(c) Moneys transferred to the fund from the federal or state government;
(d) Application fees, if any;
(e) Interest and other earnings on moneys in the fund; and
(f) Gifts, grants and donations received from any source.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $10,000,000, which may be expended to es-
tablish and implement the Homeownership Repair and Rehabilitation Program under sections
1 to 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) Sections 1 to 3 of this 2017 Act become operative on January 1, 2018.
(2) The Director of the Housing and Community Services Department  may take any
action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary
[3]
HB 2961
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
to enable the director to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers  conferred on the director by sections
1 to 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[4]