Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 279A.010 is amended to read:
279A.010. (1) As used in  the Public Contracting Code[ , unless the context or a specifically appli-
cable definition requires otherwise ]:
(a) “Bidder” means a person that submits a bid in response to an invitation to bid.
(b)(A) “Contracting agency” means a public body  that is  authorized  by law to conduct a
procurement[ . “Contracting agency” includes, but is not limited to, the Director of the  Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services and any person authorized  by a contracting agency to conduct a pro-
curement on the contracting agency’s behalf ] or a person that the public body  authorizes to
conduct a procurement on the public body’s behalf .
(B) “Contracting agency”  does not include the judicial department or the legislative department.
(c) “Days” means calendar days.
[(d) “Department” means the Oregon Department of Administrative Services. ]
[(e) “Director” means the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services or a person
designated by the director to carry out the authority of the director under the Public Contracting
Code.]
[(f)] (d) “Emergency” means circumstances that:
(A) Could not have been reasonably foreseen;
(B) Create a substantial risk of loss, damage  or interruption of services or a substantial threat
to property, public health, welfare or safety; and
(C) Require prompt execution of a contract to remedy the condition.
[(g)] (e)  “Energy savings performance contract” means a public contract , including a design-
build contract,  between a contracting agency and  a qualified energy service company for [ the
identification, evaluation, recommendation, design and construction  of ] identifying, evaluating, re-
commending, designing and constructing  energy conservation measures[ , including a design-build
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2498
HB 2408
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
contract,] that guarantee energy savings or performance.
[(h)] (f)  “Executive department” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.112.
[(i)] (g)  “Goods” [ includes] means:
(A) Supplies, equipment, materials[ ,] and tangible and intangible  personal property[ , including
any tangible, intangible and ];
(B) Intellectual property and rights and licenses [ in relation thereto, ] connected with intellec-
tual property; and
(C) Combinations of any of the items identified in  subparagraphs (A) and  (B) of  this para-
graph.
[(j)] (h)  “Goods and  services” or “goods or services” [ includes combinations ] means a combi-
nation of any of the items identified in the definitions of “goods” and “services.”
[(k)(A) ] (i)(A)  “Grant” means:
(i) An agreement  under which a contracting agency receives  from a grantor moneys, property
or other assistance, including but not limited  to federal assistance that [ is characterized as a grant
by] federal law or regulations  characterize as a grant , loans, loan guarantees, credit enhance-
ments, gifts, bequests, commodities or other assets[ , from a grantor ] for the  purpose of supporting
or stimulating a program or activity of the contracting agency [ and in which no substantial in-
volvement by the grantor is anticipated in the program or activity other than  involvement associated
with monitoring] in which the grantor is not anticipated to have  substantial involvement other
than to monitor  compliance with the grant conditions; or
(ii) An  agreement under which a contracting agency provides  to a recipient  moneys, property
or other assistance, including but not limited  to federal assistance that [ is characterized as a grant
by] federal law or regulations  characterize as a grant , loans, loan guarantees, credit enhance-
ments, gifts, bequests, commodities or  other assets[ , to a recipient ] for the purpose of supporting or
stimulating a program or activity  of the recipient [ and in which no substantial involvement by the
contracting agency is anticipated in the  program or activity other than involvement associated with
monitoring] in which the grantor is not anticipated to have substantial involvement other than
to monitor  compliance with the grant conditions.
(B) “Grant” does not include a public contract for a public improvement, for  public works, as
defined in ORS 279C.800,  or for emergency work, minor alterations or ordinary repair or mainte-
nance necessary to preserve a public improvement, [ when] if under the public contract a contracting
agency pays[ ,] moneys the contracting agency received under a  grant  in consideration for con-
tract performance intended to realize or to  support the realization of the purposes for which grant
funds were provided to the  contracting agency[ , moneys that the contracting agency has received un-
der a grant ].
[(L)] (j)  “Industrial oil” means [ any] compressor, turbine or bearing oil, hydraulic oil,  metal-
working oil or refrigeration oil.
[(m)] (k)  “Judicial department” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.113.
[(n)] (L)  “Legislative department” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.114.
[(o)] (m)  “Local contract review board” means a  local contract review board described in ORS
279A.060.
[(p)] (n) “Local contracting agency” means a local government or special government body  that
is authorized by law to  conduct a procurement[ . “Local contracting agency” includes any ] or a  person
[authorized by a ] that the  local  contracting agency  authorizes to conduct a procurement on behalf
of the local contracting agency.
[2]
HB 2408
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(q)] (o)  “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
[(r)] (p) “Lowest responsible bidder” means the lowest bidder [ who] that :
(A) [ Has substantially complied ] Complies substantially  with all prescribed public contracting
procedures and requirements;
(B) [ Has met] Meets  the standards of responsibility set forth in ORS 279B.110 or 279C.375;
(C) [Has not  been] Is not  debarred or disqualified by the contracting agency under ORS 279B.130
or 279C.440; and
(D) [ If the advertised contract is a public improvement contract, ] Is not  on the list [ created by ]
that the Construction Contractors Board  created  under ORS  701.227, if the advertised contract
is a public improvement contract .
[(s)] (q) “Lubricating oil” means [ any] oil intended for use in  an internal combustion crankcase,
transmission, gearbox or differential or an automobile, bus,  truck, vessel, plane, train, heavy equip-
ment or machinery powered by an internal combustion engine.
[(t)] (r)  “Person”  means a natural person capable of being legally bound, a sole proprietorship,
a corporation,  a partnership, a limited liability company or partnership, a limited partnership, a
for-profit or nonprofit unincorporated association, a business trust, two  or more persons having a
joint or common economic interest,  a public body or  any other person with legal capacity to  con-
tract [ or a public body ].
[(u)] (s)(A)  “Post-consumer waste” means a finished material that  has completed a life cycle
as a  consumer item and  would normally be disposed of as solid waste[ , having completed its life
cycle as a consumer item ].
(B) “Post-consumer waste” does not include manufacturing waste.
[(v)] (t)  “Price agreement” means a public contract for [ the procurement of ] procuring goods  or
services at a set price with:
(A) No guarantee of a minimum or maximum purchase; or
(B) An initial order or minimum purchase combined with [ a continuing contractor ] an obligation
for a  contractor to continue  to provide goods or services [ in which ], but no corresponding ob-
ligation for  the contracting agency [ does not ] to  guarantee a  minimum or maximum additional
purchase.
[(w)] (u)  “Procurement” means  the act of purchasing, leasing, renting or otherwise acquiring
goods or services[ . “Procurement” includes ] and  each function and procedure  [ undertaken or re-
quired to be undertaken  by] that  a contracting agency  undertakes or must undertake  to enter into
a public contract, administer  a public contract and obtain the performance of a public contract un-
der the Public Contracting Code.
[(x)] (v)  “Proposer” means a person that submits a proposal in response to  a request for pro-
posals.
[(y)] (w) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
[(z)] (x)(A)  “Public contract” means a  contracting agency’s  sale or other disposal[ , or a ] or
purchase, lease, rental or other acquisition[ , by a contracting agency ] of :
(i) Personal property[ ,];
(ii) Services, including personal services[ ,];
(iii) Public improvements[ ,];
(iv) Public works[ ,]; or
(v) Minor alterations, [ or] ordinary repair or maintenance necessary to preserve a public im-
provement.
[3]
HB 2408
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) “Public contract” does not include grants.
[(aa)] (y) “Public contracting” means procurement activities described in the Public Contracting
Code [ relating] that are related  to obtaining, modifying or administering public contracts  or price
agreements.
[(bb)] (z)  “Public Contracting Code” [ or “code” ] means ORS chapters 279A, 279B and 279C.
[(cc)] (aa)(A)  “Public improvement” means a project for construction, reconstruction  or major
renovation on real property by or for a contracting agency.
(B) “Public improvement” does not include:
[(A)] (i)  [ Projects ] A project  for which [ no] funds of a contracting agency are  not  directly or
indirectly used, except for participation that is incidental or related primarily to project design  or
inspection; or
[(B)] (ii)  Emergency  work, minor [ alteration] alterations , ordinary repair or maintenance nec-
essary to preserve a public improvement.
[(dd)] (bb)(A)  “Public improvement contract” means a public contract for a public improvement.
(B) “Public improvement contract” does not  include a public contract for emergency work, mi-
nor alterations, [ or] ordinary repair or maintenance necessary to preserve a public improvement.
[(ee)] (cc)  “Recycled material” means [ any] material that would otherwise be [ a] useless, un-
wanted or discarded [ material except for the fact ] except  that the material  still has useful physical
or chemical properties after serving a specific purpose and can, therefore, be reused or recycled.
[(ff)] (dd) “Recycled oil” means used oil that  has been prepared for reuse as a petroleum product
by refining, rerefining,  reclaiming, reprocessing or other means, provided that the preparation or
use is operationally safe, environmentally sound and complies with all laws and regulations.
[(gg)] (ee)  “Recycled paper” means a paper product [ with] in which not less than:
(A) Fifty percent of [ its] the  fiber weight [ consisting] of the paper  product consists  of sec-
ondary waste materials; or
(B) Twenty-five percent of [ its] the  fiber weight [ consisting] of the paper product consists  of
post-consumer  waste.
[(hh)] (ff)  “Recycled PETE” means post-consumer polyethylene terephthalate material.
[(ii)] (gg)  “Recycled product” means [ all] materials, goods and supplies,  of which  not less than
50 percent of the total weight [ of which ] consists of  secondary and post-consumer waste [ with] and
not less than 10 percent of [ its] the  total weight [ consisting] consists  of  post-consumer waste[ .
“Recycled product” includes ], and  any  product that  has completed the product’s life cycle as a
consumer item and  could have been disposed of as solid waste[ , having completed its life  cycle as
a consumer item, but otherwise ] but  is refurbished for reuse without substantial alteration of the
product’s form.
[(jj)] (hh)(A)  “Secondary waste materials” means  post-consumer waste and  fragments of pro-
ducts or finished products of a manufacturing process that has  converted a virgin resource into a
commodity of real economic value. [ “Secondary waste materials” includes post-consumer waste. ]
(B) “Secondary waste materials” does not include excess virgin resources of the  manufacturing
process[ . For paper, “secondary waste materials” does not include ] or fibrous waste generated [ during
the manufacturing process ] in manufacturing paper,  such as  fibers recovered from waste water or
trimmings of  paper machine rolls, mill broke, wood slabs, chips, sawdust or other wood residue from
a manufacturing process.
[(kk)] (ii) “Services” [ mean] means  services other than personal services designated  under ORS
279A.055, except that, for state contracting agencies with procurement authority  under ORS
[4]
HB 2408
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
279A.050 or 279A.140, “services” includes personal services  as designated by the state contracting
agencies.
[(LL)] (jj)  “Special government body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.117.
[(mm)] (kk)  “State agency” means the executive department, except the  Secretary of State and
the State Treasurer in [ the performance of ] performing the duties of [ their] the constitutional offices
of the Secretary of State and the State Treasurer .
[(nn)] (LL)  “State contracting agency” means an executive  department entity authorized by law
to conduct a procurement.
[(oo)] (mm)  “State government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.111.
[(pp)] (nn)  “Used oil” has the meaning given that term in ORS 459A.555.
[(qq)] (oo) “Virgin oil” means oil that has been refined from crude oil and that has not been used
or contaminated with impurities.
(2) Other definitions appearing in the Public Contracting  Code and the sections in which they
appear are:
(a) “Administering contracting
agency” .............................ORS 279A.200
(b) “Affirmative action” ......ORS 279A.100
(c) “Architect” .......................ORS 279C.100
(d) “Architectural,
engineering, photogram-
metric mapping,
transportation planning
or land surveying
services” ............................ORS 279C.100
(e) “Bid documents” .............ORS 279C.400
(f) “Bidder” ............................ORS 279B.415
(g) “Bids” ................................ORS 279C.400
(h) “Brand name” ..................ORS 279B.405
(i) “Brand name or equal
specification” ...................ORS 279B.200
(j) “Brand name
specification” ...................ORS 279B.200
(k) “Class special
procurement” ...................ORS 279B.085
(L) “Consultant” ....................ORS 279C.115
(m) “Contract-specific
special procurement” .....ORS 279B.085
(n) “Cooperative
procurement” ...................ORS 279A.200
(o) “Cooperative procurement
group” ................................ORS 279A.200
(p) “Donee” .............................ORS 279A.250
(q) “Engineer” ........................ORS 279C.100
(r) “Findings” .........................ORS 279C.330
[5]
HB 2408
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(s) “Fire protection
equipment” .......................ORS 279A.190
(t) “Fringe benefits” .............ORS 279C.800
(u) “Funds of a public
[agency” ...........................ORS 279C.810]
agency” ...................... ORS 279C.800
(v) “Good cause” ...................ORS 279C.585
(w) “Good faith dispute” ......ORS 279C.580
(x) “Goods” .............................ORS 279B.115
(y) “Housing” .........................ORS 279C.800
(z) “Interstate cooperative
procurement” ...................ORS 279A.200
(aa) “Invitation to bid” ..........ORS 279B.005
..............................................and 279C.400
(bb) “Joint cooperative
procurement” ...................ORS 279A.200
(cc) “Labor dispute” ...............ORS 279C.650
(dd) “Land surveyor” ..............ORS 279C.100
(ee) “Legally flawed” .............ORS 279B.405
(ff) “Locality” .........................ORS 279C.800
[(gg) “Nonprofit
organization” ...................ORS 279C.810
(hh) “Nonresident bidder” .....ORS 279A.120
(ii) “Not-for-profit
organization” ...................ORS 279A.250
(jj) “Original contract” .........ORS 279A.200
(kk) “Permissive cooperative
procurement” ....................ORS 279A.200
(LL) “Person” ............................ORS 279C.500
..............................................and 279C.815
(mm) “Personal services” .........ORS 279C.100
(nn) “Photogrammetric
mapping” ...........................ORS 279C.100
(oo) “Photogrammetrist” ........ORS 279C.100
(pp) “Prevailing rate of
wage” .................................ORS 279C.800
(qq) “Procurement
description” ......................ORS 279B.005
(rr) “Property” ........................ORS 279A.250
(ss) “Public agency” ...............ORS 279C.800
(tt) “Public contract” ............ORS 279A.190
(uu) “Public works” ................ORS 279C.800
(vv) “Purchasing contracting
agency” .............................ORS 279A.200
(ww) “Regularly organized fire
[6]
HB 2408
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
department” ......................ORS 279A.190
(xx) “Related services” ...........ORS 279C.100
(yy) “Request for
proposals” .........................ORS 279B.005
(zz) “Resident bidder” ...........ORS 279A.120
(aaa) “Responsible bidder” ......ORS 279A.105
.............................................and 279B.005
(bbb) “Responsible
proposer” ..........................ORS 279B.005
(ccc) “Responsive bid” .............ORS 279B.005
 (ddd) “Responsive
proposal” ..........................ORS 279B.005
 (eee) “Retainage” ......................ORS 279C.550
 (fff) “Special
procurement” ....................ORS 279B.085
 (ggg) “Specification” .................ORS 279B.200
 (hhh) “State agency” .................ORS 279A.250
 (iii) “Substantial
completion” .......................ORS 279C.465
 (jjj) “Surplus property” .........ORS 279A.250
 (kkk) “Transportation
planning services” ...........ORS 279C.100
 (LLL) “Unnecessarily
restrictive” .......................ORS 279B.405]
(gg) “Nonresident bidder” .ORS 279A.120
 (hh) “Not-for-profit
organization” ............. ORS 279A.250
 (ii) “Original contract” ... ORS 279A.200
 (jj) “Permissive cooperative
procurement” ............ ORS 279A.200
 (kk) “Person” .................... ORS 279C.500
.................................... and 279C.815
 (LL) “Personal services” ... ORS 279C.100
 (mm) “Photogrammetric
mapping” .................... ORS 279C.100
 (nn) “Photogrammetrist” ..ORS 279C.100
(oo) “Prevailing rate of
wage” ......................... ORS 279C.800
(pp) “Procurement
description” ............... ORS 279B.005
(qq) “Property” ................. ORS 279A.250
(rr) “Public agency” ......... ORS 279C.800
(ss) “Public contract” ...... ORS 279A.190
(tt) “Public works” ........... ORS 279C.800
(uu) “Purchasing contracting
[7]
HB 2408
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
agency” ...................... ORS 279A.200
(vv) “Regularly organized fire
department” .............. ORS 279A.190
 (ww) “Related services” ..... ORS 279C.100
 (xx) “Request for
proposals” .................. ORS 279B.005
 (yy) “Resident bidder” ...... ORS 279A.120
 (zz) “Responsible bidder” .ORS 279A.105
.................................... and 279B.005
 (aaa) “Responsible
proposer” ................... ORS 279B.005
 (bbb) “Responsive bid” ........ ORS 279B.005
 (ccc)  “Responsive
proposal” ................... ORS 279B.005
 (ddd) “Retainage” ................ ORS 279C.550
 (eee)  “Special
procurement” ............ ORS 279B.085
 (fff) “Specification” ........... ORS 279B.200
 (ggg) “State agency” .......... ORS 279A.250
 (hhh) “Substantial
completion” ................ ORS 279C.465
 (iii) “Surplus property” .... ORS 279A.250
 (jjj) “Transportation
planning services” ..... ORS 279C.100
 (kkk) “Unnecessarily
restrictive” ................ ORS 279B.405
SECTION 2.  ORS 279A.128 is amended to read:
279A.128. (1) As used  in this section, “services” means services as defined in ORS 279A.010
[(1)(kk)] and personal services designated under ORS 279A.055.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding provisions of law requiring a contracting  agency to award a contract to
the lowest responsible bidder or  best proposer or provider of a quotation, a contracting agency that
uses public funds to procure  goods or services for a public use under ORS chapter 279B may give
preference to procuring goods  that are fabricated or processed, or services that are performed, en-
tirely within this state if the goods or services cost not  more than 10 percent more than goods that
are not fabricated or processed, or  services that are not performed, entirely within this state. If
more than one bidder or proposer qualifies for the preference described in this  subsection, the con-
tracting agency may give a further preference to  a qualifying bidder or proposer that resides in or
is headquartered in this state.
(b) The contracting agency by order may set a higher percentage than the percentage set forth
in paragraph (a) of this subsection if the contracting agency,  in a written determination to support
the order, finds good cause  to set the higher percentage and explains the contracting agency’s rea-
sons and evidence for the finding.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 279C.320 (1), subsection (2) of this section does  not apply to emergency
work, minor  alterations, ordinary repairs or maintenance work for public improvements or to other
construction contracts described in ORS 279C.320 (1).
[8]
HB 2408
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 3.  ORS 279C.800 is amended to read:
279C.800. As used in ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870:
(1) “Fringe benefits” means:
(a) Contributions that a contractor or subcontractor  makes irrevocably to a trustee or to a third
person under a plan, fund or program; and
(b) Costs that a contractor or subcontractor may  reasonably be anticipated to incur in providing
the following items, except for items that federal, state or local law requires the contractor or sub-
contractor to provide:
(A) Benefits to workers pursuant  to an enforceable written commitment to the workers to carry
out a financially responsible plan or program for:
(i) Medical or hospital care;
(ii) Pensions on retirement or death; or
(iii) Compensation for injuries or illness that result from occupational activity;
(B) Insurance to provide the benefits described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;
(C) Unemployment benefits;
(D) Life insurance;
(E) Disability and sickness insurance or accident insurance;
(F) Vacation and holiday pay;
(G) Costs of apprenticeship or other similar programs; or
(H) Other bona fide fringe benefits.
(2)(a) “Funds of a public agency” means  moneys that a public agency uses to fund con-
struction, reconstruction, major renovation or painting for a public works project,  or a tax
credit or tax abatement that a contractor engaged in a public works project receives from
this state in connection with the public works project.
(b) “Funds of a public agency” does not include:
(A) Funds in the form of a government grant to an  organization or group of organiza-
tions described in section 501(c)(3)  of the Internal Revenue Code that is exempt from income
tax under section 501(a)  of the Internal Revenue Code, unless the government grant is for
the purpose of construction, reconstruction, major renovation or painting;
(B) Building and development permit fees that the public agency pays or waives;
(C) Land that a public agency sells to a private entity at fair market value;
(D) The difference between:
(i) The value of land that a public agency sells  to a private entity as determined at the
time of the sale after taking into account  any plan, requirement, covenant, condition, re-
striction or other limitation, exclusive of zoning or land use regulations,  that the public
agency imposes on the development or use of the land; and
(ii) The fair market value of the land if the land is not subject to the limitations described
in sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph;
(E) Staff resources the public agency uses to:
(i) Manage a project  or provide a principal source of supervision, coordination or over-
sight of a project; or
(ii) Design or inspect one or more components of a project;
(F) Moneys derived from the sale of bonds  that a state agency lends to a private entity,
unless the moneys will be used for a public improvement;
(G) Value  added to land as a consequence of a public agency’s site preparation, demolition
[9]
HB 2408
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of real property  or remediation or removal of environmental contamination, except for value
added in excess of the  expenses the public agency incurred in the site preparation, demolition
or remediation or removal when the land is sold for use in a project otherwise subject to
ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870; or
(H) Bonds, or  loans from the proceeds of bonds, issued in accordance with ORS chapter
289 or ORS 441.525 to 441.595, unless the  bonds or loans will be used for a public improve-
ment.
[(2)] (3) “Housing” has the meaning given that term in ORS 456.055.
[(3)] (4) “Locality” means the following district in which the public  works, or the major portion
of the public works, is to be performed:
(a) District 1, composed of Clatsop, Columbia and Tillamook Counties;
(b) District 2, composed of Clackamas, Multnomah and Washington Counties;
(c) District 3, composed of Marion, Polk and Yamhill Counties;
(d) District 4, composed of Benton, Lincoln and Linn Counties;
(e) District 5, composed of Lane County;
(f) District 6, composed of Douglas County;
(g) District 7, composed of Coos and Curry Counties;
(h) District 8, composed of Jackson and Josephine Counties;
(i) District 9, composed of Hood River, Sherman and Wasco Counties;
(j) District 10, composed of Crook, Deschutes and Jefferson Counties;
(k) District 11, composed of Klamath and Lake Counties;
(L) District 12, composed of Gilliam, Grant, Morrow, Umatilla and Wheeler Counties;
(m) District 13, composed of Baker, Union and Wallowa Counties; and
(n) District 14, composed of Harney and Malheur Counties.
[(4)] (5)  “Prevailing rate of wage” means the rate of hourly wage, including all  fringe benefits,
that the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries determines  is paid in the locality to
the majority of workers  employed on projects of a similar character in the same trade or occupation.
[(5)] (6)  “Public agency” means the State of Oregon or a political subdivision  of the State of
Oregon, or a county, city, district, authority, public corporation or public entity  organized and ex-
isting under law  or charter or an instrumentality of the county, city, district, authority, public cor-
poration or public entity.
[(6)(a)] (7)(a)  “Public works” [ includes, but is not limited to ] means :
(A) Roads, highways, buildings, structures  and improvements of all types, the construction, re-
construction, major renovation or painting of which is carried on or contracted for by any  public
agency to serve the public interest;
(B) A project that uses $750,000  or more of funds of a public agency for constructing, recon-
structing, painting or performing a major renovation on a  road, highway, building, structure or im-
provement of any type;
(C) A project that uses funds of a private  entity for constructing a privately owned road, high-
way, building, structure  or improvement of any type in which a public agency will use or occupy
25 percent or more of the square footage of the completed project;
(D) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 279C.810 [ (2)(a), (b) and (c) ] (1), (2)  and (3), a device,
structure or mechanism, or a combination of devices, structures or mechanisms, that:
(i) Uses solar radiation as a source for generating heat, cooling or electrical energy; and
(ii) Is constructed or installed, with  or without using funds of a public agency, on land, premises,
[10]
HB 2408
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
structures or buildings that a public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, owns; [ or]
(E) Notwithstanding paragraph (b)(A) of this  subsection and ORS 279C.810 [ (2)(b) and (c) ] (1),
(2) and (3) , construction, reconstruction, painting or major renovation of a  road, highway, building,
structure or improvement of any type that occurs, with or without using funds of a public agency,
on real property that a public university listed in ORS 352.002 owns[ .]; or
(F) A project of a character or nature similar to other projects described in  this para-
graph.
(b) “Public works” does not include:
(A) Reconstructing or renovating privately owned property that a public agency leases; or
(B) A private nonprofit entity’s renovation of publicly owned  real property that is more than 75
years old if:
(i) The real property is leased to the private nonprofit entity for more than 25 years;
(ii) Funds of a public agency used in the renovation do not  exceed 15 percent of the total cost
of the renovation; and
(iii) Contracts for the renovation were advertised or,  if not advertised, were entered into before
July 1, 2003, but the renovation has not been completed on or before July 13, 2007.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 279C.810 is amended to read:
279C.810. [(1) As used in this section: ]
[(a) “Funds of a public agency” does not include: ]
[(A) Funds provided in the form of a  government grant to a nonprofit organization, unless the
government grant is issued for the purpose of construction, reconstruction, major renovation or  paint-
ing;]
[(B) Building and development permit fees paid or waived by the public agency; ]
[(C) Tax credits or tax abatements; ]
[(D) Land that a public agency sells to a private entity at fair market value; ]
[(E) The difference between: ]
[(i) The value of land that  a public agency sells to a private entity as determined at the time of the
sale after taking into account any plan, requirement, covenant, condition, restriction or  other limitation,
exclusive of zoning or land use regulations,  that the public agency imposes on the development or use
of the land; and ]
[(ii) The fair market value of the land if the land is not subject  to the limitations described in
sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph; ]
[(F) Staff resources of the public agency used to manage a  project or to provide a principal source
of supervision, coordination or oversight of a project; ]
[(G) Staff resources  of the public agency used to design or inspect one or more components of a
project; ]
[(H) Moneys  derived from the sale of bonds that are loaned by a state agency to a private entity,
unless the moneys will be used for a public improvement; ]
[(I) Value added to land as a consequence of a public agency’s  site preparation, demolition of real
property or remediation or removal of environmental contamination, except  for value added in excess
of the expenses the public agency incurred  in the site preparation, demolition or remediation or removal
when the land is sold for use in a project otherwise subject to ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870; or ]
[(J) Bonds, or loans from the proceeds of bonds, issued in accordance with ORS chapter 289 or
ORS 441.525 to 441.595, unless the bonds or loans will be used for a public improvement. ]
[(b) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization or  group of organizations described in section
[11]
HB 2408
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that  is exempt from income tax under section 501(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code. ]
[(2)] ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870 do not apply to:
[(a)] (1) [ Projects ] A project  for which the contract price does not  exceed $50,000. In determin-
ing the price of a project, a public agency:
[(A)] (a)  May not  include the value of donated materials or work [ performed on the project by ]
that individuals [ volunteering] who volunteer services  to the public agency  perform on  the
project without pay; and
[(B)] (b)  Shall include  the value of work [ performed by every person paid by ] for which  a con-
tractor or subcontractor  pays a person  in any manner for the person’s work on the project.
[(b)] (2)  [ Projects ] A project  for which [ no] funds of a public agency are  not  directly or indi-
rectly used. In accordance  with ORS chapter 183, the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and
Industries shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this [ paragraph] subsection.
[(c) Projects: ]
(3) A project:
[(A)] (a)  That [ are] is  privately owned;
[(B)] (b) That [ use] uses  funds of a private entity;
[(C)] (c)  In which  a public agency will occupy or use  less than 25 percent of the square
footage of [ a] the  completed project [ will be occupied or used by a public agency ]; and
[(D)] (d) [ For] In  which less than $750,000 of funds of a public agency are used.
[(d)] (4)  [ Projects ] A project  for residential construction that [ are] is  privately  owned and that
predominantly [ provide] provides affordable housing. As used in this [ paragraph] subsection:
[(A)] (a) “Affordable housing” means housing that  serves occupants whose incomes are [ no] not
greater than 60 percent of the area median income or, if the  occupants are owners, whose incomes
are [ no] not  greater than 80 percent of the area median income.
[(B)] (b) “Predominantly” means 60 percent or more.
[(C)] (c) “Privately owned” [ includes] means :
[(i)] (A) Affordable housing provided on real property  [ owned by ] that  a public agency  owns if
the real property and related structures are leased to a private entity for 50 or more years; and
[(ii)] (B) Affordable housing owned by a partnership, nonprofit  corporation or limited liability
company in which a housing authority, as defined in  ORS 456.005, is a general partner, director or
managing member and the housing authority is not a  majority owner in the partnership, nonprofit
corporation or limited liability company.
[(D)] (d) “Residential construction” [ includes] means  the construction, reconstruction,  major
renovation or painting of single-family houses or  apartment buildings not more than four stories in
height and all  incidental items, such as site work, parking areas, utilities, streets and sidewalks,
pursuant to the  United States Department of Labor’s “All Agency Memorandum No. 130: Applica-
tion of the Standard of Comparison “Projects of a Character Similar” Under Davis-Bacon and  Re-
lated Acts,” dated March 17, 1978. However, the commissioner may consider different definitions  of
residential construction in determining whether a project  is a residential construction project for
purposes of this [ paragraph] subsection, including definitions that:
[(i)] (A) Exist in local ordinances or codes; or
[(ii)] (B) Differ, in the prevailing practice of a particular trade or occupation, from the United
States Department of Labor’s description of residential construction.
SECTION 5.  ORS 279C.827 is amended to read:
[12]
HB 2408
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
279C.827. (1)(a) A person or public agency may not divide a public works project into more than
one contract for the purpose of avoiding compliance with ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870.
(b) If the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries determines that a person or public
agency has divided a public works project into  more than one contract for the purpose of avoiding
compliance with ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870, the commissioner shall issue an order compelling  com-
pliance.
(c) In making determinations under this subsection, the commissioner shall consider:
(A) The physical separation of the project structures;
(B) The timing of the work on project phases or structures;
(C) The continuity of project  contractors and subcontractors working on project parts or phases;
(D) The manner in  which the public agency and the contractors administer and implement the
project;
(E) Whether a single public works  project includes several types of improvements or structures;
and
(F) Whether the combined improvements or structures have an overall purpose or function.
(2)(a) The commissioner may apply the considerations set forth in subsection (1)(c) of this section
to determine whether to divide a public works project into more than one  contract, regardless of
whether the commissioner believes  that a person or public agency divided the public works project
for the purpose of avoiding compliance with ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870.
(b) If a project is a public works project of  the type described in ORS 279C.800 [ (6)(a)(B)]
(7)(a)(B) or (C), the commissioner , after applying the considerations  set forth in subsection
(1)(c) of this section,  shall divide the project, if appropriate, [ after applying the considerations set
forth in subsection (1)(c) of this section ] to separate the parts of  the project that [ include] use  funds
of a public agency or that  a public agency  will [ be occupied or used by a public  agency ] occupy or
use from the parts of the project that do  not [ include] use  funds of a public agency and that  a
public agency will not [ be occupied or used by a  public agency ] occupy or use . If the commissioner
divides the project, any part of the project that does not [ include] use  funds of a public agency and
that a public agency  will not [ be occupied or used by a public agency ] occupy or use  is not subject
to ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870.
(3) If a project includes parts that [ are owned by ] a public  agency  owns  and parts that [ are
owned by ] a private entity  owns , the commissioner , after  applying the considerations set forth
in subsections (1)(c) and (2) of this section,  shall divide  the project, if appropriate, [ after applying
the considerations set forth in subsections (1)(c) and (2)(b) of this section ] to separate  the parts of the
project that are public works  from the parts of the project that are not public works. If the com-
missioner divides the project, parts of the project that are not public works are not  subject to ORS
279C.800 to 279C.870.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 279C.830 is amended to read:
279C.830. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, the specifications  for
every contract for public works must state the existing state prevailing rate of wage and,  if appli-
cable, the federal prevailing rate of wage required under the Davis-Bacon Act (40 U.S.C.  3141 et
seq.) that must be paid  to workers in each trade or occupation that the contractor or subcontractor
or other person [ who] that  is a party to the contract  uses in performing all or part of the contract.
If the prevailing  rates of wage are available electronically or are accessible on the Internet, the
specifications may incorporate the rates by  referring to the electronically accessible or Internet-
accessible rates and by providing adequate information about how to access the rates.
[13]
HB 2408
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) If a public agency under paragraph (a) of this subsection must  state the state and federal
prevailing rates of wage in the specifications,  the public agency shall also require the contractor to
pay the higher of the applicable state or federal prevailing rate of wage  to all workers on the public
works.
(c) Every contract and subcontract must provide that the workers must be paid not less than
the specified minimum hourly rate of wage in accordance with ORS 279C.838 and 279C.840.
(d) If a public works project is subject both  to ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870 and to the Davis-Bacon
Act, every contract  and subcontract must provide that workers on the public works must be paid
not less than the higher of the applicable state or federal prevailing rate of wage.
(e) A public works project described in ORS 279C.800 [ (6)(a)(B)] (7)(a)(B)  or (C) is subject to the
existing state prevailing rate of wage or,  if applicable, the federal prevailing rate of wage required
under the Davis-Bacon Act that  is in effect at the time a public agency enters into an agreement
with a private entity for the project.  After that time, the specifications for a contract for the public
works must state the applicable prevailing rate of wage.
(2)(a) The specifications  for a contract for public works must provide that the contractor and
every subcontractor must have  a public works bond filed with the Construction Contractors Board
before starting work on the project, unless  the contractor or subcontractor is exempt under ORS
279C.836 (4), (7), (8) or (9).
(b) Every contract that a [ contracting] public agency awards must require the contractor to:
(A) Have a public works bond filed  with the Construction Contractors Board before starting
work on the project, unless the contractor is exempt under ORS 279C.836 (4), (7), (8) or (9).
(B) Require, in every subcontract, that the subcontractor have a public works  bond filed with
the Construction Contractors Board before starting work on the project, unless the subcontractor
is exempt under ORS 279C.836 (4), (7), (8) or (9).
(c) Every subcontract that a contractor or subcontractor awards in connection with a  public
works contract between a contractor and a public agency must require any  subcontractor to have
a public works  bond filed with the Construction Contractors Board before starting work on the
public works project, unless the subcontractor is exempt under ORS 279C.836 (4), (7), (8) or (9).
SECTION 7.
The amendments to ORS 279A.010, 279A.128, 279C.800,  279C.810, 279C.827 and
279C.830 by sections 1 to 6 of this 2019 Act apply to contracts for  public works that a public
agency first advertises or otherwise solicits  or, if the public agency does not advertise or
solicit the contract for public works,  to a contract for public works that the public agency
first enters into on or after the operative date specified in section 8 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) The amendments to ORS 279A.010, 279A.128, 279C.800, 279C.810, 279C.827
and 279C.830 by sections 1 to 6 of this 2019 Act become operative on January 1, 2020.
(2) A public agency or the Commissioner of  the Bureau of Labor and Industries may
adopt rules and take any  action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section that is necessary to enable  the public agency or the commissioner to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the public agency or the commissioner by the amendments to ORS
279A.010, 279A.128, 279C.800, 279C.810, 279C.827 and 279C.830 by sections 1 to  6 of this 2019
Act.
SECTION 9.
This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[14]