Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 442.315 is amended to read:
442.315. (1) Any new hospital [ or new skilled nursing or intermediate care service or  facility not
excluded pursuant to ORS 441.065 ] shall obtain a certificate of need from the  Oregon Health Au-
thority prior to an offering or development  unless the hospital:
(a) Is excluded pursuant to ORS 441.065;
(b) Provides inpatient psychiatric services as its primary focus;
(c) Provides inpatient or outpatient mental health services or  substance use treatment
as its primary focus; or
(d) Provides rehabilitation services for the  rehabilitation of individuals who are injured
or sick or who have disabilities, as described in ORS 442.015 (24) .
(2) The authority shall adopt rules specifying criteria and procedures  for making decisions as
to the need for the new services or facilities.
(3)(a) An applicant for a certificate of need shall  apply to the authority on forms provided for
this purpose by authority rule.
(b) An applicant shall pay  a fee prescribed as provided in this section. Subject to the approval
of the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, the authority shall prescribe application fees,
based on the complexity and scope of the proposed project.
(4)[(a)] The authority shall issue a draft recommendation in response to  an application for a
certificate of need.
[(b) The authority may establish an expedited review process for an application for a certificate of
need to rebuild a long term care facility, relocate  buildings that are part of a long term care facility
or relocate long term care facility bed capacity from one long term  care facility to another. The au-
thority shall issue a draft recommendation not later than 120 days after the  date a complete application
subject to expedited review is received by the authority. ]
(5)(a) An applicant or any affected person who  is dissatisfied with the draft recommendation of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 262
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the authority is entitled to an informal hearing before the authority in the course  of review and
before a proposed decision is  rendered. Following an informal hearing, or if no applicant or affected
person requests an informal  hearing within a period of time prescribed by the authority by rule, the
authority shall issue a proposed decision.
(b) An applicant or affected person is entitled  to a contested case hearing in accordance with
ORS chapter 183 to challenge the proposed decision of the authority. Following  a contested case
hearing, or if no applicant or affected person requests a contested case hearing within a period  of
time prescribed by the  authority by rule, the authority shall issue a final order granting, with or
without limitations, or denying the certificate of need.
(6) Once a certificate of need has been granted, it may not be revoked or  rescinded unless it
was acquired by fraud or deceit. However, if the authority finds that a person is offering or devel-
oping a project that is not  within the scope of the certificate of need, the authority may limit the
project as specified in the granted certificate of need or reconsider the application. A certificate of
need is not transferable.
(7) Nothing in this section applies to any hospital[ , skilled nursing  or intermediate care service
or facility ] that seeks to replace equipment with equipment of similar basic technological function
or an upgrade that improves the  quality or cost-effectiveness of the service provided. Any person
acquiring such replacement or upgrade shall file a  letter of intent for the project in accordance with
the rules of the authority if the price of the replacement equipment or upgrade exceeds $1 million.
(8) Except as required in subsection (1) of this section for a new hospital [ or new  skilled nursing
or intermediate care service or facility not operating as a Medicare swing bed program ], nothing in this
section requires a rural hospital as defined in ORS 442.470 (6)(a)(A) and (B) to obtain a  certificate
of need.
(9) Nothing in this section applies to basic health  services, but basic health services do not in-
clude:
(a) Magnetic resonance imaging scanners;
(b) Positron emission tomography scanners;
(c) Cardiac catheterization equipment;
(d) Megavoltage radiation therapy equipment;
(e) Extracorporeal shock wave lithotriptors;
(f) Neonatal intensive care;
(g) Burn care;
(h) Trauma care;
[(i) Inpatient psychiatric services; ]
[(j) Inpatient chemical dependency services; ]
[(k) Inpatient rehabilitation services; ]
[(L)] (i) Open heart surgery; or
[(m)] (j) Organ transplant services.
(10) In addition to any other  remedy provided by law, whenever it appears that any person is
engaged in, or is  about to engage in, any acts that constitute a violation of this section, or any rule
or order  issued by the authority under this section, the authority may institute proceedings in the
circuit courts to enforce obedience to such statute, rule  or order by injunction or by other pro-
cesses, mandatory or otherwise.
(11) As used in this section, “basic health  services” means health services offered in or through
a hospital licensed under ORS chapter 441, except [ skilled nursing  or intermediate care nursing fa-
[2]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cilities or services and ] those services specified in subsection (9) of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 442.015 is amended to read:
442.015. As used in ORS chapter 441 and this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Acquire” or “acquisition” means obtaining equipment,  supplies, components or facilities by
any means, including purchase, capital or operating  lease, rental or donation, for the purpose of
using such equipment, supplies, components or  facilities to provide health services in Oregon. When
equipment or other materials are obtained  outside of this state, acquisition is considered to occur
when the equipment or other materials begin to be used in Oregon for the provision of  health ser-
vices or when such services are offered for use in Oregon.
(2) “Affected persons” has the same meaning as given to “party” in ORS 183.310.
(3)(a) “Ambulatory surgical  center” means a facility or portion of a facility that operates ex-
clusively  for  the purpose of providing surgical services to patients who do not require
hospitalization  and  for whom the expected duration of services does not exceed 24 hours following
admission.
(b) “Ambulatory surgical center” does not mean:
(A) Individual or group practice offices  of private physicians or dentists that do not contain a
distinct area used for outpatient surgical treatment on a regular and organized basis, or  that only
provide surgery routinely provided in a physician’s  or dentist’s office using local anesthesia or
conscious sedation; or
(B) A portion of a licensed hospital designated for outpatient surgical treatment.
(4) “Delegated credentialing agreement” means a written agreement  between an originating-site
hospital and a  distant-site hospital that provides that the medical staff of the originating-site hospi-
tal will rely upon the credentialing and privileging decisions  of the distant-site hospital in making
recommendations to the governing body of the originating-site hospital as to whether  to credential
a telemedicine  provider, practicing at the distant-site hospital either as an employee or under con-
tract, to provide telemedicine services to patients in the originating-site hospital.
(5) “Develop”  means to undertake those activities that on their completion will result in the
offer of a new institutional health service or the incurring of  a financial obligation, as defined under
applicable state law, in relation to the offering of such a health service.
(6) “Distant-site hospital” means  the hospital where a telemedicine provider, at the time the
telemedicine provider is providing telemedicine services, is practicing  as an employee or under
contract.
(7) “Expenditure” or “capital expenditure” means the actual expenditure, an obligation to  an
expenditure, lease or similar arrangement  in lieu of an expenditure, and the reasonable value of a
donation or grant in lieu of an expenditure but not including any interest thereon.
(8) “Extended stay center” means a facility licensed in accordance with ORS 441.026.
(9) “Freestanding  birthing center” means a facility licensed for the primary purpose of per-
forming low risk deliveries.
(10) “Governmental unit” means the state, or any county, municipality or  other political subdi-
vision, or any related department, division, board or other agency.
(11) “Gross revenue” means the sum of daily hospital service charges,  ambulatory service
charges, ancillary service charges and other operating revenue. “Gross revenue” does not include
contributions, donations, legacies or bequests made to a hospital without restriction by the donors.
(12)(a) “Health care facility” means:
(A) A hospital;
[3]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) A long term care facility;
(C) An ambulatory surgical center;
(D) A freestanding birthing center;
(E) An outpatient renal dialysis facility; or
(F) An extended stay center.
(b) “Health care facility” does not mean:
(A) A residential facility licensed by the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 443.415;
(B) An establishment furnishing primarily domiciliary care as described in ORS 443.205;
(C) A residential facility licensed or approved under the rules of the Department of Corrections;
(D) Facilities established by ORS 430.335 for treatment of substance abuse disorders; or
(E) Community mental health  programs or community developmental disabilities programs es-
tablished under ORS 430.620.
(13) “Health maintenance organization” or “HMO” means a public organization or a  private
organization organized under the laws of any state that:
(a) Is a qualified HMO under section 1310(d) of the U.S. Public Health Services Act; or
(b)(A) Provides or otherwise makes available  to enrolled participants health care services, in-
cluding at least the following basic health care services:
(i) Usual physician services;
(ii) Hospitalization;
(iii) Laboratory;
(iv) X-ray;
(v) Emergency and preventive services; and
(vi) Out-of-area coverage;
(B) Is compensated,  except for copayments, for the provision of the basic health care services
listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph to enrolled participants on  a predetermined periodic
rate basis; and
(C) Provides physicians’ services primarily directly  through physicians who are either employees
or partners of such organization,  or through arrangements with individual physicians or one or more
groups of physicians organized on a group practice or individual practice basis.
(14) “Health services” means clinically related  diagnostic, treatment or rehabilitative services,
and includes alcohol, drug or controlled substance abuse and mental  health services that may be
provided either directly or indirectly on an inpatient or ambulatory patient basis.
(15) “Hospital” means:
(a) A facility with an organized medical staff and a permanent building  that is capable of pro-
viding 24-hour inpatient care to two or more individuals who  have an illness or injury and that
provides at least the following health services:
(A) Medical;
(B) Nursing;
(C) Laboratory;
(D) Pharmacy; and
(E) Dietary; or
(b) A special inpatient care facility as that term is defined by the authority by rule.
(16) “Institutional health services” means health services  provided in or through health care
facilities and the entities in or through which such services are provided.
[4]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(17) “Intermediate care facility” means a facility  that provides, on a regular basis, health-related
care and services to individuals who do not require the degree of care  and treatment that a hospital
or skilled  nursing facility is designed to provide, but who because of their mental or physical con-
dition require care and services above the level  of room and board that can be made available to
them only through institutional facilities.
(18)(a) “Long term care facility” means a permanent facility with inpatient beds, providing:
(A) Medical services,  including nursing services but excluding surgical procedures except as
may be permitted by the rules of the Director of Human Services; and
(B) Treatment for two or more unrelated patients.
(b) “Long term care facility” includes  skilled nursing facilities and intermediate care facilities
but does not include facilities licensed and operated pursuant to ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
(19) “New hospital” means:
(a) A facility that did  not offer hospital services on a regular basis within its service area within
the prior 12-month period and is initiating or proposing to initiate such services; or
(b) Any replacement of an existing hospital that involves a  substantial increase or change in the
services offered.
[(20) “New skilled nursing or intermediate care service or facility” means a service or facility  that
did not offer  long term care services on a regular basis by or through the facility within the prior
12-month period and is initiating or proposing to initiate such services. “New skilled nursing  or inter-
mediate care service or facility” also includes the rebuilding of a  long term care facility, the relocation
of buildings that are a part of a long term care  facility, the relocation of long term care beds from one
facility to another  or an increase in the number of beds of more than 10 or 10 percent of the bed ca-
pacity, whichever is the lesser, within a two-year period. ]
[(21)] (20)  “Offer” means that the health care facility holds itself out as capable  of providing,
or as having the means for the provision of, specified health services.
[(22)] (21)  “Originating-site hospital” means a hospital in which  a patient is located while re-
ceiving telemedicine services.
[(23)] (22) “Outpatient renal  dialysis facility” means a facility that provides renal dialysis ser-
vices directly to outpatients.
[(24)] (23) “Person” means an  individual, a trust or estate, a partnership, a corporation (includ-
ing associations, joint stock companies and insurance companies), a state, or a  political subdivision
or instrumentality, including a municipal corporation, of a state.
[(25)] (24) “Skilled nursing facility” means a facility or a distinct part of a facility, that is pri-
marily engaged in providing to inpatients skilled nursing care and  related services for patients who
require medical or nursing care, or an institution that provides  rehabilitation services for the re-
habilitation of individuals who are injured or sick or who have disabilities.
[(26)] (25) “Telemedicine” means the provision of health services to patients by physicians and
health care practitioners  from a distance using electronic communications, including synchronous
technologies to facilitate an exchange of information between a patient  and physician or health care
practitioner in real  time or asynchronous technologies to facilitate an exchange of information be-
tween a patient and a physician or health care practitioner in other than real time.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 101.090 is amended to read:
101.090. A closed bed long term care facility shall be subject to the same requirements as all
other long term care  facilities, as defined by ORS 442.015[ , except that it shall be exempt from the
certificate of need process provided by ORS 442.315. However,  any closed bed long term care facility
[5]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
which initiates under  this exemption any new institutional health services, as defined in ORS 442.015,
and which subsequently accepts patients who are not residents of the continuing care  retirement com-
munity, shall become subject to certificate of need review for such new institutional health services  at
the time that nonresident patients begin to be admitted ].
SECTION 4.
 ORS 408.380 is amended to read:
408.380. (1) As used in this section,  “long term care facility” has the meaning given that term
in ORS 442.015.
(2) [Except as provided in subsection (3) of  this section, ] An Oregon Veterans’ Home is subject to
all state laws and administrative rules and all federal laws and administrative regulations to  which
a long term care facility operated by a nongovernmental entity is subject.
[(3) Notwithstanding ORS 442.315  and 442.325, an Oregon Veterans’ Home is not subject to any
certificate of need requirement. ]
[(4)] (3)  In addition to the  other uses for the Oregon Housing Fund set forth in ORS 458.600 to
458.665, financial support for an Oregon Veterans’ Home is a permitted use of moneys from the
Oregon Housing Fund.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 430.021 is amended to read:
430.021. Subject to ORS 417.300 and 417.305:
(1) The Department of Human Services shall  directly or through contracts with private entities,
counties under ORS 430.620 or other public entities:
(a) Direct, promote, correlate and  coordinate all the activities, duties and direct services for
persons with developmental disabilities.
(b) Promote, correlate and coordinate the developmental disabilities activities of  all govern-
mental organizations throughout the state in which there is any  direct contact with developmental
disabilities programs.
(c) Establish, coordinate, assist  and direct a community developmental disabilities program in
cooperation with local government units and integrate such a program with the state developmental
disabilities  program.
(d) Promote public education in this state concerning developmental disabilities and act as  the
liaison center for work with  all interested public and private groups and agencies in the field of
developmental disabilities services.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall directly or by contract with private or public entities:
(a) Direct, promote, correlate and  coordinate all the activities, duties and direct services for
persons with mental or emotional disturbances, alcoholism or drug dependence.
(b) Promote, correlate and coordinate the mental health activities of  all governmental organ-
izations throughout the state in which there is any direct contact with mental health programs.
(c) Establish, coordinate, assist and direct a community mental health program  in cooperation
with local government units and integrate such a program with the state mental health program.
(d) Promote public education in  this state concerning mental health and act as the liaison center
for work with all interested public  and private groups and agencies in the field of mental health
services.
(3) The department and the authority  shall develop cooperative programs with interested private
groups throughout the state  to effect better community awareness and action in the fields of mental
health and  developmental disabilities, and encourage and assist in all necessary ways community
general hospitals to establish psychiatric services.
(4) To the greatest extent possible, the least costly settings for treatment,  outpatient services
[6]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
and residential facilities shall be widely available and utilized  except when contraindicated because
of individual health care  needs. State agencies that purchase treatment for mental or emotional
disturbances shall develop  criteria consistent with this policy. [In reviewing applications for certif-
icates of need, the Director of the Oregon Health Authority shall take this policy into account. ]
(5) The department  and the authority shall accept the custody of persons committed to its care
by the courts of this state.
(6) The authority shall adopt rules to require a facility and a nonhospital facility as those terms
are defined in ORS 426.005, and a provider that employs a  person described in ORS 426.415, if sub-
ject to authority rules regarding the use of restraint or seclusion during  the course of mental health
treatment of a child or adult, to report to the authority each calendar quarter the number of inci-
dents involving  the use of restraint or seclusion. The aggregate data shall be made available to the
public.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 430.315 is amended to read:
430.315. The Legislative Assembly finds alcoholism or drug dependence  is an illness. The alco-
holic or drug-dependent person is ill and should be afforded treatment for that illness. To  the
greatest extent possible, the least costly settings for treatment, outpatient  services and residential
facilities shall be widely available and utilized except  when contraindicated because of individual
health care needs. State  agencies that purchase treatment for alcoholism or drug dependence shall
develop  criteria  consistent with this policy in consultation with the Oregon Health Authority. [ In
reviewing applications for certificate of need, the Director of the Oregon Health Authority shall take
this policy into account. ]
[7]