Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2022 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 456.255 to
456.265.
SECTION 2. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall administer  an
affordable housing preservation rental assistance pilot program that provides  rental assist-
ance on behalf of low income households, as defined in ORS 456.270, who:
(a) Are tenants of publicly supported housing;
(b) Remain tenants of housing after the housing has been withdrawn from publicly  sup-
ported housing; and
(c) Are not receiving other public tenant-based assistance.
(2) The amount of rental assistance:
(a) Must be calculated at least annually.
(b) Is equal to the difference between the current rent minus the rent on the date that
the tenant’s housing was last publicly supported housing.
(c) Is payable directly to the tenant’s landlord under a contract with the landlord.
(3) Rental assistance is not transferable for use on any other housing of the  tenant or
to any other tenant.
(4) This section does not authorize a landlord to increase rents by an  amount that is
prohibited under ORS 90.323 (3).
(5) Notwithstanding the limitations on damages  provided in ORS 90.375, if a landlord acts
in violation of ORS 90.385 (1), a tenant receiving rental  assistance under this section is en-
titled to recover the greater of:
(a) Three times the tenant’s monthly rent; or
(b) Three times any actual damages sustained by the tenant as a result of the violation.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 91
SB 1557
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
(6) The department shall  contract with the Salem Housing Authority and Washington
County to administer  the affordable housing preservation rental assistance pilot program
described in this section.
SECTION 3.
Before the date of the convening of the  2023 regular session of the Legisla-
tive Assembly as specified in ORS 171.010, the Housing and  Community Services Department,
Salem Housing Authority  and Washington County shall provide a report to an appropriate
interim committee of the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in ORS 192.245  on the
affordable housing preservation rental assistance pilot program administered under section
2 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 4.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2022 Act are repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $900,000, to administer the affordable housing
preservation rental assistance pilot program required under section 2 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 6.
This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]