Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Judicial Department, the  Department of Corrections, the Oregon Public
Guardian and Conservator and the Oregon Health Authority shall:
(1) Survey the capacity of:
(a) Local probation departments to participate  in the hearings described in ORS 161.370
(2)(c) and to coordinate and provide supervision as ordered by a court in the hearings.
(b) County offices of public guardian and conservator to participate in the hearings  de-
scribed in ORS 161.370 (2)(c) and to coordinate and  provide guardianship services as ordered
by a court in the hearings.
(c) The authority to license and pay for enough secure residential treatment facilities  for
defendants committed to the custody of the superintendent of the Oregon  State Hospital or
the director of a facility designated by the authority under ORS 161.370 (3) or  (4) to ensure
the defendants’ access to the services.
(d) Local community  resources to ensure that community behavioral services are readily
available for defendants who can safely participate in community restoration.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1704
HB 2460
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) The community mental health programs to meet the requirements  of ORS 426.070 and
to participate in commitment hearings described in ORS 426.095.
(f) Judges and other court personnel to facilitate  the hearings described in ORS 161.370
and have the opportunity to coordinate actions ordered by the court in the hearings.
(g) Public defense service providers to prepare  and participate in hearings described in
ORS 161.370.
(h) District attorneys to prepare for and participate in hearings  described in ORS 161.370.
(2) Compile the findings of  the survey and develop recommendations for funding or other
resources needed to ensure the capacity needed.
(3) Submit a report of the findings and recommendations,  in the manner prescribed by
ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to health and the
judiciary no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2.
The Oregon Health Authority, the Department of Human Services, the Psy-
chiatric Security Review Board,  local courts, community mental health programs and other
local mental health authorities and coordinated care organizations  within this state shall
collaborate to establish and coordinate community resources necessary to assist:
(1) Defendants who lack  fitness to proceed and who have been ordered to engage in
community restoration services under ORS 161.370; and
(2) Persons who are under the  jurisdiction of the Psychiatric Security Review Board who
have been conditionally released under ORS 161.315 to 161.351.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this  2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 161.315 to
161.351.
SECTION 4. The Psychiatric Security  Review Board shall establish a standardized end
of jurisdiction planning process. Planning in each person’s case must begin  no earlier than
12 months before the end of the total period of commitment or  conditional release described
in ORS 161.327 (7) for the person or when there  is a reasonable probability that the person
will be discharged from commitment and conditional release with the next 12-month period.
SECTION 5. With respect to individuals who are committed to the Oregon Health Au-
thority for treatment under ORS 426.130, the authority shall:
(1) Be responsible for discharge planning and coordination of care;
(2) Implement a process to screen the individuals and establish the eligibility of  individ-
uals for services  at community mental health residential facilities so that the individuals do
not have to be interviewed separately at each facility to which they apply for services;
(3) Implement a tool to track the placement and coordination of services for  the indi-
viduals;
(4) Maintain a list of the number of individuals committed to the authority for  treatment
and adopt by rule criteria to prioritize the individuals for placement at the Oregon State
Hospital or on a waiting list for the Oregon State Hospital; and
(5) If an individual is in a hospital and is to be transferred to the  Oregon State Hospital,
no less than one week before the transfer, meet  with the hospital staff and the director of
the community mental health program to discuss the goals of the individual’s care and next
steps.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall conduct a study of the:
(a) Costs incurred by community mental  health programs when the programs contract
with third parties to provide services to clients of the programs, including indirect expenses
[2]
HB 2460
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and administrative expenses; and
(b) Efficiency of providing services through third parties.
(2) The authority shall evaluate the adequacy of the funding  provided to community
mental health programs to collect and report the data as required by ORS 430.634.
(3) No later than January 1, 2024, the  authority shall report the authority’s findings un-
der subsections (1) and (2) of this section, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245,  to the in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to  health and to the Joint Interim
Committee on Ways and Means Interim Subcommittee on Human Services.
SECTION 7.
The agency request budget for the Oregon Health Authority filed under  ORS
291.208 shall include,  in the authority’s non-Medicaid caseload forecast, a forecast of the
number of individuals expected to need:
(1) Precommitment investigations; and
(2) Community restoration services, as defined in ORS 161.355.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 426.127 is amended to read:
426.127. The following provisions  are applicable to outpatient commitment under ORS 426.130
as described:
(1) The Oregon Health Authority may  only place a person in an outpatient commitment if an
adequate treatment  facility is available.  The authority is responsible for coordinating services
for the person,  including by identifying the acuity of the person’s needs and coordinating the
appropriate level of services.
(2) At the time of the hearing under  ORS 426.095, the community mental health program direc-
tor, or a designee for the director, for  the county in which the hearing takes place shall set the
conditions for the outpatient commitment. The  conditions shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(a) Provision for outpatient care.
(b) A designation of a facility, service or other provider to provide care or treatment.
(3) A copy of the conditions shall be  given to all of the individuals and entities described in ORS
426.278.
(4) Any outpatient commitment ordered under  this section is subject to the provisions under
ORS 426.275.
(5) The community mental health program director or designee, for the county where a person
is on outpatient commitment, may modify the conditions for outpatient commitment when a modifi-
cation is in the best  interest of the person. The community mental health program director or
designee shall send notification of such changes and  the reasons for the changes to all those who
received a copy of the original conditions under ORS 426.278.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 430.630 is amended to read:
430.630. (1) In addition to any other requirements that may be  established by rule by the Oregon
Health Authority, each community mental health program, subject to the availability  of funds, shall
provide the following basic  services to persons with alcoholism or drug dependence, and persons
who are alcohol or drug abusers:
(a) Outpatient services;
(b) Aftercare for persons released from hospitals;
(c) Training, case and program consultation and education for community agencies,  related
professions and the public;
(d) Guidance and assistance to  other human service agencies for joint development of prevention
[3]
HB 2460
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
programs and activities to reduce factors  causing alcohol abuse, alcoholism, drug abuse and drug
dependence; and
(e) Age-appropriate treatment options for older adults.
(2) As alternatives to state hospitalization, it is the responsibility of the community  mental
health program to ensure that, subject to the availability of funds,  the following services for persons
with alcoholism or drug dependence, and persons who are alcohol or drug abusers, are available
when needed and approved by the Oregon Health Authority:
(a) Emergency services on a 24-hour basis,  such as telephone consultation, crisis intervention
and prehospital screening examination;
(b) Care and treatment for  a portion of the day or night, which may include day treatment
centers, work activity centers and after-school programs;
(c) Residential care and treatment in facilities such as halfway houses, detoxification centers
and other community living facilities;
(d) Continuity  of care, such as that provided by service coordinators, community case develop-
ment specialists and core staff of federally assisted community mental health centers;
(e) Inpatient treatment in community hospitals;
(f) Community restoration services, as defined in ORS 161.355;  and
[(f)] (g)  Other alternative services to state hospitalization as defined by  the Oregon Health Au-
thority.
(3) In addition to any other requirements that may be established by rule of the Oregon  Health
Authority, each community mental health program, subject to the availability of funds, shall provide
or ensure the provision of the following services to persons with mental or emotional disturbances:
(a) Screening and evaluation to determine the client’s service needs;
(b) Crisis stabilization to meet the needs of persons with acute mental or emotional disturbances,
including the costs of investigations and prehearing detention in community hospitals or other fa-
cilities approved by the authority for persons involved in involuntary commitment procedures;
(c) Vocational and social services that are appropriate for the client’s age, designed  to improve
the client’s vocational, social, educational and recreational functioning;
(d) Continuity  of care to link the client to housing and appropriate and available health and
social service needs;
(e) Psychiatric care  in state and community hospitals, subject to the provisions of subsection (4)
of this section;
(f) Residential services;
(g) Medication monitoring;
(h) Individual, family and group counseling and therapy;
(i) Public education and information;
(j) Prevention of mental or emotional disturbances and promotion of mental health;
(k) Consultation with other community agencies;
(L) Preventive mental health services for children  and adolescents, including primary prevention
efforts, early  identification and early intervention services. Preventive services should be patterned
after service models that have  demonstrated effectiveness in reducing the incidence of emotional,
behavioral and cognitive disorders in children. As used in this paragraph:
(A) “Early identification” means detecting emotional disturbance in  its initial developmental
stage;
(B) “Early intervention services” for children at risk of later development of emotional  disturb-
[4]
HB 2460
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ances means  programs and activities for children and their families that promote conditions, oppor-
tunities and experiences that encourage and develop  emotional stability, self-sufficiency and
increased personal competence; and
(C) “Primary prevention efforts” means efforts that prevent emotional  problems from occurring
by addressing issues early so that disturbances do not have an opportunity to develop; and
(m) Preventive mental health services for older adults, including primary prevention efforts,
early identification and early intervention services. Preventive services should be patterned after
service models that have demonstrated effectiveness in reducing the incidence of  emotional and be-
havioral disorders and suicide attempts in older adults. As used in this paragraph:
(A) “Early identification” means detecting emotional disturbance in  its initial developmental
stage;
(B) “Early intervention services” for older adults at risk of development of emotional  disturb-
ances means programs and activities for older adults and their  families that promote conditions,
opportunities and experiences that encourage and  maintain emotional stability, self-sufficiency and
increased personal competence and that deter suicide; and
(C) “Primary prevention efforts” means efforts that prevent emotional  problems from occurring
by addressing issues early so that disturbances do not have an opportunity to develop.
(4) A community mental  health program shall assume responsibility for psychiatric care in state
and community hospitals, as provided in  subsection (3)(e) of this section, in the following circum-
stances:
(a) The  person receiving care is a resident of the county served by the program. For purposes
of this  paragraph, “resident” means the resident of a county in which the person maintains a current
mailing address or, if  the person does not maintain a current mailing address within the state, the
county in which the person is found, or the county in which  a court-committed person with a mental
illness has been conditionally released.
(b) The person has been hospitalized involuntarily  or voluntarily, pursuant to ORS 426.130 or
426.220, except for persons confined to the Secure Child  and Adolescent Treatment Unit at Oregon
State Hospital, or has been hospitalized as the result of a revocation of conditional release.
(c) Payment is made for the first 60 consecutive days of hospitalization.
(d) The hospital has collected all available patient payments and third-party reimbursements.
(e) In the case of a community hospital, the authority has approved the hospital for the care  of
persons with mental or emotional disturbances, the community mental health program  has a con-
tract with the hospital for the psychiatric care of residents and a representative  of the program
approves voluntary or involuntary admissions to the hospital prior to admission.
(5) Subject to the  review and approval of the Oregon Health Authority, a community mental
health program may initiate additional services after  the services defined in this section are pro-
vided.
(6) Each community  mental health program and the state hospital serving the program’s ge-
ographic area shall enter into a written agreement concerning the policies and procedures to  be
followed by the program and the hospital when a patient is admitted  to, and discharged from, the
hospital and during the period of hospitalization.
(7) Each community mental health  program shall have a mental health advisory committee, ap-
pointed by the board of county commissioners or the county court or, if two or more counties  have
combined to provide mental health services, the boards or courts of the participating counties  or,
in the case of a Native American reservation, the tribal council.
[5]
HB 2460
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(8) A community mental health program may request  and the authority may grant a waiver re-
garding provision of one  or more of the services described in subsection (3) of this section upon a
showing by the county and a determination by the authority that persons with mental or  emotional
disturbances in that county would be better served and unnecessary institutionalization avoided.
(9)(a) As used in this subsection, “local mental health authority”  means one of the following
entities:
(A) The board of county  commissioners of one or more counties that establishes or operates a
community mental health program;
(B) The  tribal council, in the case of a federally recognized tribe of Native Americans that elects
to enter into an agreement to provide mental health services; or
(C) A regional local mental health authority comprising two or  more boards of county commis-
sioners.
(b) Each local mental health authority that provides mental health services shall determine  the
need for local mental health services and adopt a comprehensive local plan for the delivery of
mental health services for children,  families, adults and older adults that describes the methods by
which the local mental health authority shall provide  those services. The purpose of the local plan
is to create  a blueprint to provide mental health services that are directed by and responsive to the
mental health needs of individuals  in the community served by the local plan. A local mental health
authority shall coordinate its local planning with the development of the community health  im-
provement plan under ORS 414.575 by the coordinated  care organization serving the area. The
Oregon Health Authority may require a local mental health authority to review and revise  the local
plan periodically.
(c) The local plan shall identify ways to:
(A) Coordinate and ensure accountability for all levels of care described in paragraph (e) of this
subsection;
(B) Maximize resources for consumers and minimize administrative expenses;
(C) Provide supported employment and other vocational opportunities for consumers;
(D) Determine the most appropriate service provider among a range of qualified providers;
(E) Ensure that appropriate mental health referrals are made;
(F) Address local housing needs for persons with mental health disorders;
(G) Develop a process for discharge from state and local psychiatric  hospitals and transition
planning between levels of care or components of the system of care;
(H) Provide peer support  services, including but not limited to drop-in centers and paid peer
support;
(I) Provide transportation supports; and
(J) Coordinate services among the criminal and  juvenile justice systems, adult and juvenile
corrections systems and  local mental health programs to ensure that persons with mental illness
who come into contact with the justice and  corrections systems receive needed care and to ensure
continuity of services for adults and juveniles leaving the corrections system.
(d) When developing a local plan, a local mental health authority shall:
(A) Coordinate with the  budgetary cycles of state and local governments that provide the local
mental health authority with funding for mental health services;
(B) Involve consumers, advocates, families, service providers, schools and  other interested par-
ties in the planning process;
(C) Coordinate with the local public safety coordinating council to address the services de-
[6]
HB 2460
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
scribed in paragraph (c)(J) of this subsection;
(D) Conduct a population based needs assessment  to determine the types of services needed lo-
cally;
(E) Determine the ethnic, age-specific, cultural and diversity needs of the  population served by
the local plan;
(F) Describe the anticipated outcomes of services and the actions  to be achieved in the local
plan;
(G) Ensure that the local plan coordinates planning, funding and services with:
(i) The educational needs of children, adults and older adults;
(ii) Providers of social supports, including but not limited to housing, employment, transportation
and education; and
(iii) Providers of physical health and medical services;
(H) Describe how funds, other than state resources,  may be used to support and implement the
local plan;
(I) Demonstrate ways  to integrate local services and administrative functions in order to support
integrated service delivery in the local plan; and
(J) Involve the local mental health advisory committees described in subsection (7) of this  sec-
tion.
(e) The  local plan must describe how the local mental health authority will ensure the delivery
of and be accountable for clinically appropriate services in a continuum of care based  on consumer
needs. The local plan shall include, but not be limited  to, services providing the following levels of
care:
(A) Twenty-four-hour crisis services;
(B) Secure and nonsecure extended psychiatric care;
(C) Secure and nonsecure acute psychiatric care;
(D) Twenty-four-hour supervised structured treatment;
(E) Psychiatric day treatment;
(F) Treatments that maximize client independence;
(G) Family and peer support and self-help services;
(H) Support services;
(I) Prevention and early intervention services;
(J) Transition assistance between levels of care;
(K) Dual diagnosis services;
(L) Access to placement in state-funded psychiatric hospital beds;
(M) Precommitment and civil commitment in accordance with ORS chapter 426; and
(N) Outreach  to older adults at locations appropriate for making contact with older adults, in-
cluding senior centers, long term care facilities and personal residences.
(f) In developing the part of the local plan  referred to in paragraph (c)(J) of this subsection, the
local mental health authority shall collaborate with the local public safety coordinating council  to
address the following:
(A) Training for all law enforcement officers on ways to recognize and interact  with persons
with mental illness, for the purpose of diverting them from  the criminal and juvenile justice systems;
(B) Developing voluntary locked facilities  for crisis treatment and follow-up as an alternative
to custodial arrests;
(C) Developing a plan for sharing a daily jail and juvenile detention center custody  roster and
[7]
HB 2460
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the identity of persons of concern and offering mental health services to those in custody;
(D) Developing a voluntary  diversion program to provide an alternative for persons with mental
illness in the criminal and juvenile justice systems; and
(E) Developing mental health services, including housing, for persons with  mental illness prior
to and upon release from custody.
(g) Services described in the local plan shall:
(A) Address the vision, values and guiding principles described in the  Report to the Governor
from the Mental Health Alignment Workgroup, January 2001;
(B) Be provided to children, older adults and families as close to their homes as possible;
(C) Be culturally appropriate and competent;
(D) Be, for children, older adults and adults with mental health needs,  from providers appropri-
ate to deliver those services;
(E) Be delivered in an integrated service delivery system with integrated service sites  or pro-
cesses, and with the use of integrated service teams;
(F) Ensure consumer choice among a range of qualified providers in the community;
(G) Be distributed geographically;
(H) Involve consumers, families, clinicians, children and schools in treatment as appropriate;
(I) Maximize early identification and early intervention;
(J) Ensure appropriate transition  planning between providers and service delivery systems, with
an emphasis on transition between children and adult mental health services;
(K) Be based on the ability of a client to pay;
(L) Be delivered collaboratively;
(M) Use age-appropriate, research-based quality indicators;
(N) Use best-practice innovations; and
(O) Be delivered using a community-based, multisystem approach.
(h) A local mental health authority shall submit to the Oregon Health Authority a  copy of the
local plan and revisions  adopted under paragraph (b) of this subsection at time intervals established
by the Oregon Health Authority.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 430.640 is amended to read:
430.640. (1) The Oregon Health Authority, in carrying out the legislative policy declared in ORS
430.610, subject to the availability of funds, shall:
(a) Assist Oregon  counties and groups of Oregon counties in the establishment and financing
of community mental health programs operated or contracted for by one or more counties.
(b) If a  county declines to operate or contract for a community mental health program, contract
with another public agency or private corporation to  provide the program. The county must be
provided with an opportunity to review and comment.
(c) In an emergency situation when no community mental health program  is operating within a
county or when a county is unable  to provide a service essential to public health and safety, operate
the program or service on a temporary basis.
(d) At the request of the tribal council of a federally recognized tribe of Native Americans,
contract with the tribal council for the establishment and operation of a community mental health
program in the same manner in which  the authority contracts with a county court or board of
county commissioners.
(e) If a county agrees, contract with a public agency or private corporation for all services
within one or more of the following program areas:
[8]
HB 2460
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Mental or emotional disturbances.
(B) Drug abuse.
(C) Alcohol abuse and alcoholism.
(f) Approve or disapprove the local plan and budget information for  the establishment and op-
eration of each community mental health program. Subsequent amendments  to or modifications of
an approved plan  or budget information involving more than 10 percent of the state funds provided
for services under ORS 430.630 may not be placed in effect without prior approval of  the authority.
However,  an amendment or modification affecting 10 percent or less of state funds for services under
ORS 430.630 within the portion  of the program for persons with mental or emotional disturbances
or within the portion for persons with alcohol or drug dependence may be made without  authority
approval.
(g) Make all  necessary and proper rules to govern the establishment and operation of community
mental health programs, including adopting rules defining the range and nature of  the services
which shall or may be provided under ORS 430.630.
(h) Collect data  and evaluate services in the state hospitals in accordance with the same meth-
ods prescribed for community mental health programs under ORS 430.634.
(i) Develop guidelines that include, for the development of comprehensive local plans  in consul-
tation with local mental health authorities:
(A) The use of integrated services;
(B) The outcomes expected from services and programs provided;
(C) Incentives to reduce the use of state hospitals;
(D) Mechanisms for local sharing of risk for state hospitalization;
(E) The provision of clinically appropriate levels of care based on  an assessment of the mental
health needs of consumers;
(F) The transition of consumers between levels of care; and
(G) The development, maintenance and continuation of older  adult mental health programs with
mental health professionals trained in geriatrics.
(j) Work with local mental health authorities to provide incentives  for community-based care
whenever appropriate while simultaneously ensuring adequate statewide capacity.
(k) Provide  technical assistance and information regarding state and federal requirements to
local mental health authorities throughout the local planning process required under ORS 430.630
(9).
(L) Provide incentives for local mental health authorities to  enhance or increase vocational
placements for adults with mental health needs.
(m)(A) Develop or adopt nationally  recognized system-level performance measures, linked to the
Oregon Benchmarks, for state-level monitoring and reporting of mental health  services for children,
adults and  older adults, including but not limited to quality and appropriateness of services, out-
comes from services, structure and management of  local plans, prevention of mental health disorders
and integration of mental health services with other needed supports ; and
(B) Review data collected from community mental health programs against  the
benchmarks in subparagraph (A)  of this paragraph and provide feedback to community
mental health programs on their progress in meeting the  benchmarks and on any needed
improvements.
(n) Develop  standardized criteria for each level of care described in ORS 430.630 (9), including
protocols  for  implementation of local plans, strength-based mental health assessment and case plan-
[9]
HB 2460
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
ning.
(o) Develop a comprehensive long-term plan for providing appropriate and adequate  mental
health treatment and services to children, adults and older adults that is derived  from the needs
identified in local plans,  is consistent with the vision, values and guiding principles in the Report
to the Governor from the Mental Health Alignment Workgroup, January 2001, and addresses the
need for and the role of state hospitals.
(p) Report biennially to the Governor and the Legislative  Assembly on the progress of the local
planning process and the implementation of the local  plans adopted under ORS 430.630 (9)(b) and the
state planning process described in  paragraph (o) of this subsection, and on the performance meas-
ures and performance data available under paragraph (m) of this subsection.
(q) On a periodic basis, not to exceed 10 years, reevaluate the methodology  used to estimate
prevalence and demand  for mental health services using the most current nationally recognized
models and data.
(r) Encourage the  development of regional local mental health authorities comprised of two or
more boards  of county commissioners that establish or operate a community mental health program.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may provide  technical assistance and other incentives to assist
in the planning, development and implementation of regional local mental health  authorities when-
ever the Oregon Health Authority determines that a regional approach will  optimize the compre-
hensive local plan described under ORS 430.630 (9).
(3) The enumeration of duties and functions in subsections (1)  and (2) of this section shall not
be deemed exclusive nor construed as a limitation  on the powers and authority vested in the au-
thority by other provisions of law.
SECTION 11.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[10]