Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 731.256 is amended to read:
731.256. (1) The Director of  the Department of Consumer and Business Services may institute
actions or other lawful proceedings that the director deems necessary to enforce a provision of  the
Insurance Code or any order or action the director makes or takes in pursuance of law.
(2) As part of or in addition to any action or proceeding the  director institutes against an
insurer under subsection (1) of this section, the director may:
(a) Seek restitution on a consumer’s behalf for actual damages the consumer suffers as a  result
of the insurer’s violation of a provision of the Insurance  Code or applicable federal law or the
insurer’s breach of an insurance contract or policy the insurer has with the consumer; and
(b) Seek other equitable relief the director deems appropriate under the circumstances.
(3) If the director has reason to believe that a person has violated a provision of the  Insurance
Code or another law that applies to insurance operations, and if  the violation is subject to criminal
prosecution and in the opinion of the director criminal  prosecution is warranted, the director shall
give the information about  the violation to the Attorney General or district attorney that has ju-
risdiction over the violation. The Attorney General or district attorney promptly shall institute an
action or a proceeding against the person as the information requires or justifies.
(4) An action  or proceeding that the director institutes under subsection (1) of this section is
an exercise of the director’s regulatory authority and, except as otherwise provided  in subsection
(3) or (5)  of this section, does not create a cause of action for any other person.
(5)(a) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Affiliate” has the meaning given that term in ORS 732.548.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1775
HB 3234
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
(B) “Health insurance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.162.
(b) If an insurer that issues health  insurance, or an affiliate of the insurer, violates ORS
646.725 or 646.730 or reduces timely consumer access to health care by an act or practice that
constitutes a monopoly,  a business combination in restraint of trade or commerce or a sub-
stantial reduction or elimination of competition or competitors within  a region or market
of this state, or that otherwise constitutes an unlawful trade practice,  the Attorney General,
in addition to bringing any action under subsection (3)  of this section that is appropriate or
warranted, may at the  Attorney General’s own initiative but in consultation and cooperation
with the director:
(A) Investigate the violation or the act or practice as provided in  ORS 646.618 or 646.750,
as is appropriate for the violation or for the act or practice;
(B) Bring an action in a  court of this state under ORS 646.632 to enjoin the act or prac-
tice or under ORS 646.760 or  646.780, as appropriate, to obtain equitable relief, damages, civil
penalties or other relief; or
(C) Bring an action in a court of this state  to obtain relief on behalf of another person
as provided in ORS 646.775.
(c) The  director shall cooperate with and provide information to the Attorney General
that may enable or assist the Attorney  General with an investigation or action described in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]