Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “Advanced Clean Trucks  regulations” means the
portion of the California Low Emission Vehicle program that was first adopted  by the
California Air Resources Board in 2021, and  which would require manufacturers of medium-
duty and heavy-duty motor vehicles to sell an increasing  percentage of zero-emissions vehi-
cles.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 468A.360 or any other provision of law, the Department of En-
vironmental Quality may not implement or enforce the Advanced Clean  Trucks regulations,
as adopted by the Environmental Quality Commission, before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 802