Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall establish a grant
program for  the purpose of supporting organizations to expand the scope and community
reach of college access and success programs.
(2) In order to be eligible to receive a grant under this section, an organization must:
(a) Be a not-for-profit corporation that is tax exempt under section 501(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(b) Be a community-based organization; or
(c) Be a public institution of higher education as defined in ORS 350.260.
(3) In awarding grants under this section, the commission shall consider:
(a) Whether an eligible organization has a  demonstrated history of providing successful
college access and success programs; and
(b) Whether an eligible organization has  a demonstrated history of providing programs
and services to populations that  are historically underrepresented in post-secondary insti-
tutions of education.
(4) The commission  shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration of this section,
including any rules related to:
(a) Specifying the form and timelines for submitting an application for a  grant under this
section;
(b) Determining whether an organization is eligible for a grant under this section;
(c) Calculating the amount to award to grant recipients under this section; and
(d) Collecting data required to evaluate program effectiveness.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 140