Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A person commits  the crime of unlawful transport, manufacture or
transfer of a rapid fire activator if the person knowingly:
(a) Transports a rapid fire activator into this state; or
(b) Manufactures, sells, offers to sell or transfers a rapid fire activator.
(2) A person commits the crime  of unlawful possession of a rapid fire activator if the
person knowingly possesses, purchases or receives a rapid fire activator.
(3)(a) Unlawful transport, manufacture or transfer of a rapid fire activator is a Class  B
felony.
(b) Unlawful possession of a rapid fire activator is a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) A peace officer, or other person employed by a law  enforcement agency, who pos-
sesses a rapid fire activator in accordance with authorization given to the peace officer or
other person by the law enforcement agency.
(b) A person who has registered a machine gun in accordance with  federal law and the
rapid fire activator is possessed for use in only, and necessary  for the proper function of, the
lawfully registered machine gun.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Binary trigger system” means a  device that, when installed in or attached to a
firearm, allows the firearm to fire both when the trigger is pulled or depressed and  when the
trigger is released.
(b) “Bump stock” means a device that, when installed in or attached to a firearm,  in-
creases the rate of fire of the firearm by using energy from the recoil of the firearm to
generate a reciprocating action that facilitates repeated activation of the trigger.
(c) “Burst trigger system” means a device that, when installed in or attached  to a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3704
SB 696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
firearm, allows the firearm to discharge two  or more rounds with a single pull or depression
of the trigger by altering the trigger reset.
(d) “Firearm” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
(e) “Hellfire trigger” means a device  that, when installed in or attached to a firearm,
disengages the trigger return spring when the trigger is pulled or depressed.
(f) “Machine gun” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
(g) “Peace officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 133.005.
(h)(A) “Rapid fire activator” means any device, including a  removable manual or power-
driven device, part or combination of  parts, constructed so that, when built into, installed
on or attached to a firearm:
(i) The rate at which the trigger is activated  increases to a faster rate than is possible
for the firearm without the device; or
(ii) The rate of fire increases to a faster rate than is possible for a  person to fire the
firearm without the device.
(B) “Rapid fire activator” includes, but is not limited to, a bump stock, trigger crank,
hellfire trigger, binary trigger  system, burst trigger system, switch, auto sear or a copy or
similar device, regardless of the producer or manufacturer.
(i) “Switch”  or “auto sear” means a device that, when installed in or attached to a
firearm, applies force to a firearm’s trigger bar to  prevent the bar from limiting the weapon
to firing only one round each time the trigger is pulled or depressed.
(j) “Trigger crank” means  a device that, when installed in or attached to a firearm, re-
peatedly activates the  trigger of the firearm through the use of a crank, level or any other
part that is turned in a circular motion.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]