Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2021 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 477.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) The Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and  Community Protection Fund is
established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Moneys in
the Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and Community Protection Fund are continuously  appro-
priated as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection for the purposes specified in section
3 of this 2021 Act.
(b) The moneys in the  Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and Community Protection Fund
are continuously appropriated during each biennium in the following manner:
(A) Fifty percent of the moneys are appropriated to the State Fire Marshal;
(B) Twenty five percent of the moneys are appropriated to the State Forestry  Depart-
ment; and
(C) Twenty five percent of the moneys are appropriated to the Oregon Watershed  En-
hancement Board.
(2) The Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services shall pay into the
State Treasury to the credit of the Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and  Community Protection
Fund all moneys the director receives from the surcharge described in section 5 of this  2021
Act. Moneys in the Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and Community Protection  Fund may be
invested in the same manner as other state moneys,  and any interest earned on the invest-
ments must be credited to the fund.
(3) The State  Treasurer shall keep a record of all moneys deposited into the Oregon
Wildfire Preparedness and Community Protection Fund. The record must indicate,  by sepa-
rate account,  the source from which the moneys are derived, the interest earned and the
activity or program against which any withdrawal is charged.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2771
HB 3160
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) If moneys credited to any one  account are withdrawn, transferred or otherwise used
for a program other than the program or activity for which the account  is established, in-
terest accrues on  the amount withdrawn from the date of the withdrawal until such funds
are restored.
(5) The State Fire Marshal, the Oregon Watershed  Enhancement Board and the State
Forestry Department, in addition to and not in lieu of the moneys derived from the  sur-
charge described in  subsection (2) of this section, may accept, from whatever source, gifts
or grants  of moneys given for the purposes set forth in section 3 of this 2021 Act and shall
deposit such moneys into the Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and  Community Protection
Fund. All moneys deposited in this manner are available for  appropriation as described in
subsection (1)(b) of this section, unless the donor or grantor of the moneys specifies  a con-
dition for the use of the moneys, in which case the agency that  received the gift or grant
shall use the moneys in conformance with the condition the donor or grantor specified.
SECTION 3.
(1)(a) The State Fire Marshal shall expend moneys or provide grants from
the Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and Community Protection  Fund established under section
2 of this 2021 Act to assist communities in:
(A) Preparing for and protecting against wildfires;
(B) Funding full-time firefighters; and
(C) Developing and implementing community wildfire protection plans and programs that
are based upon or that comply with standards promulgated by the National  Fire Protection
Association’s Firewise USA and the Fire Adapted Communities Learning Network or  that
otherwise serve community needs for protection against wildfires.
(b) The State Fire Marshal shall adopt rules to guide the State Fire Marshal’s  imple-
mentation of the programs described in this subsection. At a minimum, the rules must:
(A) Specify the purposes, goals and criteria for funding projects under  paragraph (a) of
this subsection, along with criteria for evaluating the success of each project;
(B) Specify the purposes, goals and  eligibility criteria for grants under paragraph (a) of
this subsection, along with criteria for determining  whether a grant recipient has made use
of grant moneys in accordance with the purposes and goals; and
(C) Provide forms and  specify application procedures by means of which a community
may apply for a grant under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2)(a) The State Forestry  Department shall use moneys from the Oregon Wildfire
Preparedness and Community Protection Fund to:
(A) Restore landscape resiliency;
(B) Reduce hazardous fuel levels to improve forest health; and
(C) Reduce forest vulnerability to  drought, insect infestation and disease by taking ap-
propriate forest management actions such as thinning and prescribed burning.
(b) In implementing the programs described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the State
Forestry Department shall give priority to programs, activities or  projects that protect lives,
communities and infrastructure, that improve and enhance watershed health, water quality
and resiliency in response to changes in the climate and that achieve reductions in  wildfire
risk. After  seeking and receiving necessary permissions and cooperation, the State Forestry
Department may conduct programs on federal, state, local and private lands.
(c) The State Forestry  Department shall adopt rules to guide the department’s imple-
mentation of the programs described in this subsection.
[2]
HB 3160
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall use moneys  from the Oregon
Wildfire Preparedness and Community Protection  Fund to conduct or fund recovery activ-
ities, such as reforestation,  watershed rehabilitation, drinking water protection, slope sta-
bilization and erosion control, in areas that have been subjected to wildfires.
(4) The State Fire Marshal,  the State Forestry Department and the Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board shall jointly:
(a) Consult and cooperate with each of the other agencies  identified in this subsection in
adopting rules to implement the areas of responsibility each agency has  under this section;
and
(b) Coordinate with each of the other agencies in developing  and implementing programs
and activities to the maximum extent practicable in order to reduce duplication  and over-
lapping or  redundant efforts. At a minimum, coordination must consist of cooperatively de-
veloping and implementing:
(A) Work plans;
(B) Programs and activities; and
(C) Monitoring and reporting activities.
(5) By December 31 of each year, the State Fire Marshal, the State Forester and  the
executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall submit  a joint report
to the Governor and  an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly with oversight over
forestry issues that details the agencies’ activities under this  section. The report, at a min-
imum, must include:
(a) A list of the amounts the agencies expended from the Oregon  Wildfire Preparedness
and Community Protection Fund during the previous 12 months;
(b) A list of the projects the agencies funded or conducted in the previous 12 months,
together with the cost of each project and a summary of the  goals and results of each
project;
(c) A list of all grants the State Fire Marshal awarded within  the previous 12 months
under subsection (1)(a) of this section, along with a list of  the grant recipients, the amount
each grant recipient received and the purpose and goals of each grant; and
(d) A list of projects, grants and other activities the agencies have planned for the up-
coming calendar year.
SECTION 4.
Section 5 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 742.
SECTION 5. (1)(a) Every insurer that transacts insurance in this state shall remit to the
Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services an annual surcharge of $10
for each policy of insurance the insurer issues in this  state that is casualty insurance or
property insurance. The surcharge is in addition  to and not in lieu of any other tax, fee or
charge that the insurer is otherwise liable to pay. The  insurer shall remit the proceeds of
the surcharge each calendar year as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(b) Regardless of the number of policies of insurance an insurer issues that  are casualty
insurance or property insurance, the  minimum amount that an insurer that transacts in-
surance in this state must remit to the director each calendar year under  paragraph (a) of
this subsection is $1,000.
(c) Each insurer shall pay the amount due to the director under this subsection  not later
than July 15 of each year. The director shall forward to the Department of Revenue the name
and amount in arrears of each insurer that fails  to pay the amount due by July 31 of each
[3]
HB 3160
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
year. The Department of Revenue shall treat the insurer’s failure to pay  the surcharge as
equivalent to a failure to pay a tax  at the time the tax becomes due and may apply the
penalties and procedures set forth in ORS 314.400 for collecting taxes due from a taxpayer.
(2)(a) Each  insurer that is subject to the requirement set forth in subsection (1) of this
section may recoup the amount for which the insurer is liable by one of the  following
methods:
(A) The insurer may each year charge and collect from each of the  insurer’s insureds
not more than the amount of the surcharge on each  of the insured’s policies of insurance
that is casualty insurance or property  insurance. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, the insurer shall charge each insured not more than $10 per policy.
(B) The insurer may recoup the surcharge through the insurer’s premium rates.
(b) An insurer that, in the  first year after the surcharge is due, does not recoup under
paragraph (a) of this subsection the entire amount the insurer remitted to the director under
subsection (1) of this section may, during the following  year, recoup the remaining amount
by collecting a surcharge that exceeds the  amount specified in paragraph (a)(A) of this sub-
section.
(3)(a) A surcharge that  an insurer collects under subsection (2) of this section is not a
premium for any purpose, including liability for any tax upon premiums or  any commissions
that an insurance producer may receive.
(b) If an insurer elects to collect a surcharge under subsection (2)(a) of this section, the
insurer shall disclose the amount and nature of the surcharge on a bill or  policy declaration
the insurer provides to an insured.
(4) The director shall deposit  all moneys the director receives under this section into the
Oregon Wildfire  Preparedness and Community Protection Fund established under section 2
of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6.
The surcharge described in section 5 of this 2021 Act applies to policies of
insurance that an insurer issues or renews on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
[4]