Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 286A.035 is amended to read:
286A.035. (1) Each related agency shall  report the plans of the related agency for the issuance
of bonds during the next  biennium. The related agency shall submit the related agency’s report to
the Governor by  a date determined by the Governor and shall include in the report a description
of bonds that the related agency intends to retire or defease during the next biennium.
(2)(a) On or before  a date determined by the Governor, the State Treasurer shall advise the
Governor on the prudent maximum amount of bonds to be issued for each bond program. The  State
Treasurer shall consider available economic and financial data in preparing advice to be  given to
the Governor.
(b) The State Treasurer may not  recommend a prudent maximum amount of lottery
bonds, as defined in ORS 286A.560, that would  cause combined existing and proposed lottery
bond debt service to exceed 25 percent of unobligated net lottery proceeds.
(3) As part of the Governor’s budget described in ORS 291.216, the Governor shall:
(a) Consider the prudent  maximum amounts advised by the State Treasurer pursuant to sub-
section (2) of this section to determine the Governor’s total recommended amount; and
(b) Recommend to  the Legislative Assembly the total amount of bonds the State Treasurer may
issue for each bond program for a biennium.
(4) The Legislative Assembly shall determine the  amount of bonds the State Treasurer may issue
for each state  agency for a biennium. If the Legislative Assembly fails to make the determination
described in this subsection by the first day of the biennium,  the unused portion of the authorization
the Legislative Assembly made for the preceding biennium is deemed to carry forward for  the cur-
rent biennium at the amount authorized for the preceding biennium until the earlier of:
(a) The date on which legislation authorizing the amount of bonds  for the current biennium is
enacted; or
(b) The date on which the Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
(5) The amount of bonds  that may be issued under bond programs may be modified by the Gov-
ernor. However, the Governor may not modify the amount  of bonds that may be issued under bond
programs in a way that would cause  the maximum amount established by the Legislative Assembly
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2307
SB 616
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
for a category of bond programs to be exceeded if the Legislative Assembly:
(a) Has categorized the bonds that may be issued under bond programs  as general obligation,
direct revenue and pass-through revenue bonds; and
(b) Assigned a maximum amount to each category.
(6) This section applies to bonds:
(a) Unless the bonds are expressly exempted from the requirements of this section.
(b) Except refunding bonds.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 286A.035 by  section 1 of this 2019 Act apply to ad-
vice relating to biennia beginning on or after July 1, 2021.
[2]