Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall  establish a thriving youth pilot pro-
gram to  provide substance use prevention education and improve youth mental health
through comprehensive out-of-school programming and access to specialized  mental or be-
havioral health services to youth  in 20 counties in this state, with a focus on youth in remote
or underserved communities.
(2) The authority shall partner with a  statewide community-based organization to ad-
minister the program. The  statewide community-based organization must have partnerships
with an existing network of positive  youth development entities that provide comprehensive
out-of-school programming with a  proven positive impact on the well-being of youth between
the ages of 6 and 18.
(3) The statewide community-based organization shall work  with qualified community
partners, as determined by the statewide community-based organization, to:
(a) Implement an evidence-based prevention curriculum to increase  positive behavior,
reduce substance use and reduce absenteeism among youth;
(b) Implement staff training in trauma-informed,  evidence-based behavioral strategies
that promote the development of self-regulation in  youth, reduce conflict between youth and
adults and improve relationships; and
(c) Connect youth with licensed mental health professionals, certified  prevention spe-
cialists or other qualified providers,  as determined by the statewide community-based or-
ganization, that  provide early intervention and prevention services in a community-based
setting.
(4)(a) No  later than September 15, 2026, the authority shall provide an interim report, in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1788
HB 3631
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
related to  youth behavioral health on the following outcomes of the pilot program for par-
ticipating youth:
(A) Social development;
(B) Mental health; and
(C) Well-being, including sense of belonging, supportive relationships and  positive
decision-making.
(b) No later than September 15, 2027, the authority  shall provide a report, in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to
youth behavioral health on the feasibility of extending the  pilot program established under
this section.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $8,000,000, which may be  expended to carry out the pilot pro-
gram described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]