Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) To protect public health, the environment and the  quality and quantity
of ground water, and to increase the security of drinking water and  wastewater, the Oregon
State University Extension Service shall establish a program to provide  assistance to
households that rely on wells for drinking  water or on septic systems for wastewater treat-
ment.
(2) Assistance under the program must include:
(a) Outreach.
(b) Research.
(c) Education.
(d) Advice on navigating available resources.
(e) Monitoring of wells and septic systems.
(3) Under the program, the extension service shall focus on providing  assistance to
households in areas that are declared areas of ground water concern under ORS 468B.175.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $2,500,000, for
distribution to the Oregon State University Extension Service  for the purpose of carrying
out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Water Resources Department,  for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000,  for deposit into the
Water Well Abandonment, Repair and Replacement Fund established by ORS 537.766.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Quality,  for the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2811
HB 2168
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $5,000,000, for pur-
poses related to the septic  system low-interest loan programs described in ORS 454.777 and
454.779.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]