Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Rental Property Inspections is established.
(2) The task force consists of nine members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one  member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Director of the Housing and Community Services Department shall appoint:
(A) One member representing  the Housing and Community Services Department, who
shall serve as the chairperson of the task force;
(B) Two members representing local governments;
(C) One member representing tenants or tenant organizations; and
(D) One member representing landlords or landlord organizations.
(d) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall appoint:
(A) One member representing the Department of Consumer and Business Services; and
(B) One member representing residential contractors.
(3) The task force shall study and  make recommendations concerning residential rental
property inspections, including consideration of:
(a) Existing local rental inspection programs in this state;
(b) Existing statewide rental inspection programs or support for local programs in other
states;
(c) Ways this state can support the development, continuation or  improvement of local
rental inspection programs;
(d) Development of a statewide rental inspection program or uniform standards for  local
rental inspection programs; and
(e) Changes in state laws necessary  to support tenants who report habitability issues,
including with respect to fears of retaliation.
(4) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3521
HB 3325
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(7) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(8) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(9) The task force shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,  which
may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to the work of the task force no later than September 15, 2022.
(10) The Housing and Community Services Department shall provide staff support to the
task force.
(11) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(12) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(13) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2022.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]