Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this  section, “SSBCI” means the federal State Small Business
Credit Initiative.
(2) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the federal moneys made available by
the SSBCI to the Business Oregon  Venture Fund Program, the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department shall distribute, in accordance  with the requirements of the SSBCI and
notwithstanding any other requirements for making distributions  under the Business Oregon
Venture Fund Program, $2,550,000 to Lit Motors, Inc., to be used in  accordance with section
2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2. Lit Motors, Inc., shall use the federal moneys it receives under section 1 of
this 2025 Act toward the following goals:
(1) Manufacturing hyperefficient, safe, practical and fun electric vehicles in Oregon;
(2) Creating high-paying manufacturing jobs in Oregon;
(3) Increasing manufacturing, wages and tax revenues in Oregon;
(4) Attracting, training and retaining a new generation of high-tech  workers in Oregon;
and
(5) Enhancing Oregon’s culture and future economic prosperity.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1182