Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue  Officer shall conduct a study of the inclusion of
public safety programs as tourism promotion for  purposes of transient lodging tax expen-
ditures. The officer shall submit a report of findings to the interim committees of  the Leg-
islative Assembly related to revenue in the manner provided under ORS  192.245 no later than
September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1863