Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 498.164 is amended to read:
498.164. (1)  Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a person may not use
bait to attract or take black  bears or use one or more dogs to hunt or pursue black bears or
[cougars] wild cats .
(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section  prohibits the use of bait or one or more dogs by
employees or agents of county, state or federal agencies while acting in their official capacities.
(3) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section prohibits the use of bait or dogs by persons for the
taking of black bears or [ cougars] wild cats  in accordance with the provisions of ORS 498.012 re-
lating to taking wildlife that is causing damage.
(4) Any person who violates  subsection (1) of this section commits a Class A misdemeanor and,
upon conviction, shall in addition to appropriate criminal  penalties have the person’s privilege to
apply for any hunting license suspended for  a period of five years for a first offense and permanently
suspended for any subsequent offense.
(5) [For the purposes of this section, ] As used in this section:
(a) “Bait” means any  material placed for the purpose of attracting or attempting to attract
bears.
(b) “Wild cats” means cougars, lynx and bobcats.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1502