Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 184.617, 184.893, 184.895,  184.897, 184.899, 283.327,
283.398, 283.401, 383.001, 455.030, 455.500, 455.511, 459.015, 459.045, 459.205  to 459.385, 459A.010,
459A.012, 459A.860, 468.035, 468.065, 468.130, 468.140, 468.215, 468A.010 to  468A.180, 468A.200 to
468A.260, 468A.265 to 468A.277, 468A.279, 468A.280, 468A.290, 468A.310, 468A.345, 468A.360,
469.059, 469.137, 469.229 to  469.261, 469.503, 469A.050, 469A.400 to 469A.475, 526.277, 526.786,
756.040, 757.357, 757.359, 757.390 to 757.398 and 757.522 to 757.536, and except where expressly
required by federal law, the Governor and  the state agencies and state commissions subject
to this  subsection may not take measures to reduce greenhouse gas emissions in Oregon
unless the Legislative Assembly by law enacted on or after the effective date of  this 2025 Act
has authorized those measures to be taken.
(2) The following state agencies and state  commissions are subject to subsection (1) of
this section:
(a) The Oregon Business Development Department;
(b) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services;
(c) The Department of Consumer and Business Services Building Codes Division;
(d) The Department  of Land Conservation and Development and the Land Conservation
and Development Commission;
(e) The Environmental Justice Council;
(f) The Environmental Quality Commission and the Department of Environmental  Qual-
ity;
(g) The State Department of Agriculture;
(h) The State Department of Energy;
(i) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(j) The State Forestry Department;
(k) The Department of Transportation and the Oregon Transportation Commission;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1964
SB 369
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(L) The Oregon Climate Action Commission;
(m) The Oregon Health Authority;
(n) The Water Resources Department;
(o) The Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board; and
(p) The Public Utility Commission.
(3) The agencies and other entities listed in  subsection (2) of this section shall, for peri-
ods on or after the  effective date of this 2025 Act, reverse any action, repeal any rule or undo
any adopted policy that was undertaken under Executive Order  20-04 because subsection (1)
of this section eliminates any legal authority underpinning  Executive Order 20-04, rendering
Executive Order 20-04 null and void as of the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]