Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $10,000,000,
to be distributed to the Oregon Coast Aquarium for the purposes set forth in section 2 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) The Legislative  Assembly finds that the Oregon Coast Aquarium plays a
significant role in the educational, cultural, economic and social life of Oregon by:
(a) Expanding ocean literacy education;
(b) Attracting tourism to the surrounding community and the state; and
(c) Rehabilitating the growing number of marine animals stranded  along the Oregon
coast due to changing ocean conditions.
(2) Moneys distributed to the Oregon Coast Aquarium under section  1 of this 2019 Act
may be used by the aquarium for any of the following projects, which  have been identified
as priorities for the aquarium’s current capital campaign:
(a) Remodeling the entryway and cafe;
(b) Improving three galleries;
(c) Creating a nature play area with a forestry theme;
(d) Enhancing ocean literacy education programming; and
(e) Constructing and furnishing a  marine wildlife rehabilitation and education center for
assessment, urgent care, surgery, research and veterinary practicums and other  marine
science education.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1403