Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2, 3 and 5 of  this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 343.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “English” includes English literacy,  spoken
English, signing exact English  and morphemic system of signs, CASE, cued speech and any
other visual supplements.
(2) In accordance with rules  of the State Board of Education, the Superintendent of
Public Instruction shall establish a program to assess, monitor and track the language  de-
velopmental milestones of children who are deaf or hard of hearing from  birth through the
age of eight. Developmental milestones must be  established for children who communicate
in American Sign Language and English.
(3) The program shall provide  annual language assessment to each child who is deaf or
hard of hearing who  is under nine years of age. Language assessments shall be provided to
a child by:
(a) Early intervention services, from birth until three years of age;
(b) Early special education, from three years of age until the age  of eligibility for
kindergarten; and
(c) By the school district in which the child is enrolled,  once the child is enrolled in
kindergarten.
(4) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may convene an advisory council as neces-
sary to advise the superintendent on the development and implementation of the program
established under this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) Notwithstanding section 2  (4) of this 2025 Act, an advisory committee is
established to advise the Superintendent of  Public Instruction on the development and im-
plementation of the program established under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1541
HB 2133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The superintendent shall appoint the following members of the committee:
(a) One member to represent the Oregon School for the Deaf.
(b) One member to represent the Department of Early Learning and Care.
(c) One member to represent the State Interagency Coordinating Council.
(d) One member to represent early childhood special education  and early intervention
services.
(e) One member who is a licensed teacher of students who are deaf or hard of  hearing
who uses both American Sign Language and English during instruction.
(f) One member who is a licensed teacher of students who are deaf  or hard of hearing
who uses spoken English with or without visual supplements during instruction.
(g) One member who is a licensed teacher of students who are deaf or hard  of hearing
who has expertise in  curriculum development and instruction of American Sign Language
and English.
(h) One member who is a licensed teacher of students who are deaf  or hard of hearing
who has  expertise in assessing language development in both American Sign Language and
English.
(i) One member who is a speech-language pathologist who has experience working  with
children from birth through the age of eight.
(j) One member who is a professional with a linguistics background who conducts re-
search on language outcomes of children who are deaf or hard of hearing and use American
Sign Language and English.
(k) One member who is a parent of a child  who is deaf or hard of hearing and who uses
both American Sign Language and English.
(L) One member who is a parent of a child who is deaf  or hard of hearing and who uses
spoken English with or without visual supplements.
(m) One member who is  knowledgeable about teaching and using both American Sign
Language and English in the education of children who are deaf and hard of hearing.
(3) The advisory committee shall elect one of its members to serve as  chairperson and
another to serve  as vice chairperson, for the terms and with the duties and powers necessary
for the performance of the functions of such offices as the advisory committee determines.
(4) The advisory committee shall meet at times and places  specified by the chairperson
or by a majority of the members of the advisory committee.
(5) A majority of the members of the advisory committee constitutes a quorum.
(6) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the superintendent  shall appoint a member to fill
the vacancy.
(7) The advisory  committee shall develop specific action plans and make recommen-
dations necessary to fully  implement the program established under section 2 of this 2025
Act. In carrying out its duties, the advisory committee shall:
(a) Solicit input from professionals trained in the language development  and education
of children who are deaf or hard  of hearing on the selection of specific language develop-
mental milestones;
(b) Review and recommend the use of existing  and available language assessments for
children who are deaf or hard of hearing;
(c) Identify and recommend qualifications  for language professionals with knowledge of
the use of evidence-based, best practices in English  and American Sign Language who can
[2]
HB 2133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be available to advocate at individualized family service plan or individualized  education
program meetings;
(d) Identify qualifications for language assessment evaluators with knowledge  on the use
of evidence-based, best practices with children who are deaf or  hard of hearing and the re-
sources for locating such evaluators; and
(e) Identify procedures and methods for communicating information on  language acqui-
sition, assessment results, milestones, assessment tools  used and progress of the child to the
parent or legal guardian of the child, teachers and other professionals involved in the early
intervention and education of the child.
(8) The specific action plans and recommendations developed by the advisory  committee
shall include, but need not be limited to, plans and recommendations for:
(a) Language assessments that include  data collection and timely tracking of the child’s
development so as to provide information about the child’s  receptive and expressive language
compared to the child’s linguistically age-appropriate peers who are not deaf or hard  of
hearing;
(b) Language  assessments conducted in accordance with standardized norms and
timelines in order to  monitor and track language developmental milestones in receptive, ex-
pressive, social and pragmatic  language acquisition and developmental stages to show
progress in American Sign Language literacy, English literacy or both;
(c) Language assessments delivered  in the child’s mode of communication, which have
been validated for the specific purposes for  which each assessment is used and appropriately
normed;
(d) Language assessments administered by individuals who  are proficient in American
Sign Language for American Sign Language assessments and English for English assess-
ments;
(e) Reporting of assessment results to the parent or legal guardian of the child and  the
applicable agency;
(f) Reporting of assessment results on an aggregated basis to the committees  or interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education; and
(g) Reporting of assessment results  to the members of the child’s individualized family
service plan or individualized education program team, which may be used, in addition to the
assessment  required by federal law, by the child’s individualized family service plan or indi-
vidualized education program team to track the child’s  progress and to establish or modify
the individualized family service plan or individualized education program.
(9) The advisory committee shall develop final action plans  and recommendations de-
scribed in subsection (8) of this section no later than July 1, 2027.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 5. No later than December 15 of each year, the Department  of Education shall
publish a report that is specific to language and literacy developmental milestones of children
who are deaf or hard of hearing for each age from birth through the age  of eight, relative
to such children’s peers who are not  deaf or hard of hearing. The report shall be based on
existing data reported in compliance with the federally required state performance plan on
pupils with disabilities. The department shall publish the report on  the department’s website.
SECTION 6.
The Department of Education shall first publish the report required  by sec-
tion 5 of this 2025 Act no later than December 15, 2028.
[3]
HB 2133
1
2
3
SECTION 7.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]