Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Justice shall establish a program for awarding grants
to law enforcement agencies and local governments  to fund training for groups and agencies
that interact with persons who have experienced trauma.
(2) A law enforcement agency or local government may apply for a grant under this
section to fund training for law enforcement agencies,  district attorneys, sexual assault
nurse examiners, emergency communications workers, victim  advocates or any other group
or agency the law enforcement agency or local government determines appropriate for the
training. The application may request funding for an  established training program provided
by an outside entity, or for  the development of a training program within the group or
agency or in cooperation with other groups or agencies.
(3) The department shall by rule establish the application process and eligibility criteria
for the grant program. At a minimum,  the training program for which a law enforcement
agency or local government requests funding  must be consistent with the model training
program described in subsection (5) of this section.
(4) The department  shall by rule establish the process of awarding grants under this
section. No later than January 1, 2021, the  department shall award grants in accordance with
the rules  of the program. When awarding grants under this section, the department shall
consider the community partnerships of the group or agency for which the law  enforcement
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 950
HB 2750
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
agency or local government seeks funding.
(5) No later than January 1, 2020, the department shall develop a model training program
for groups and  agencies that interact with persons who have experienced trauma. The model
training program must, at a minimum:
(a) Be research-based and take into account the psychological and  neurological effects
of trauma;
(b) Utilize best practices when recommending techniques  for interacting with persons
who have experienced trauma; and
(c) Have the objective of minimizing further trauma.
(6) The department shall by rule establish outcome measures to be used for  evaluating
grant program performance.
SECTION 2.
(1) No later than January  1, 2020, the Department of Public Safety Standards
and Training, in consultation with the Department of  Justice, shall develop best practices for
law enforcement agencies when interacting with persons who have experienced trauma.
(2)(a) The best  practices developed under this section must offer alternative options for
law enforcement agencies of varying size and resource capacity.
(b) The best practices developed under this section must, at a minimum:
(A) Be research-based and take into  account the psychological and neurological effects
of trauma;
(B) Recommend techniques for interacting with persons who have experienced trauma;
(C) Have the objective of minimizing further trauma;
(D) Require law enforcement officers to consider the effects of trauma when  working on
a case;
(E) Recommend techniques for interviewing persons who have experienced trauma; and
(F) Provide recommendations for writing reports based on  interviews with persons who
have experienced trauma.
(3) Law enforcement agencies within this state shall  adopt appropriate best practice
policies for interacting with persons who have  experienced trauma no later than the date
established by the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training by rule.
(4) The Department of Public Safety Standards  and Training shall adopt rules to carry
out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
Beginning January 1, 2020, the Department of Public  Safety Standards and
Training shall review and, if  necessary, update training on interacting with persons who have
experienced trauma, consistent with the model training program developed by the Depart-
ment of Justice under section 1 of this 2019  Act, for all law enforcement personnel who enter
the training academy operated by the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $ , which may be expended for the  purposes described in
section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]