Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 65.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(b) “Public funds” means funds that an officer or employee of this  state or of a political
subdivision or municipal corporation of this state has custody of or controls by law or by
virtue of the officer’s or employee’s office.
(2) A corporation that engages in business  in this state is subject to the requirements
of subsection (3) of this section if the corporation:
(a) Has gross annual revenues of more than $100,000 or  has 25 or more full-time or
part-time employees;
(b) Receives public funds in any amount or receives a public benefit in the form of a tax
credit or tax deduction that  is available only to a corporation organized under this chapter;
and
(c)(A) Performs a governmental function by means of a contract or another written del-
egation of a governmental function; or
(B) Sets or implements  a policy that controls or influences an expenditure, disbursement
or distribution of public funds or that designates a recipient of public funds.
(3)(a) A corporation described in subsection (2) of this section shall:
(A) Hold meetings  of the corporation’s board of directors in accordance with ORS 192.610
to 192.690.
(B) Post a copy of the corporation’s proposed annual budget on the corporation’s public
website at least 30 days before the corporation takes action to adopt the  budget. The budget
must identify the source of any public funds in  the budget and the expenditures the corpo-
ration proposes to make from the public funds.
(C) Submit to and cooperate with audits of the  corporation’s finances conducted by the
Secretary of State or the public body that provided the corporation with public  funds or by
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2308
HB 2821
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
designees of the Secretary of State or the public body.
(D) Make records that the corporation keeps under  ORS 65.771 available in accordance
with ORS 192.311 to 192.478, except that the  corporation may redact from a record informa-
tion that personally identifies a member  or employee of the corporation, other than by first
and last name, before disclosing the record.
(b) A member of the  board of directors of a corporation described in subsection (2) of this
section, or  an officer or employee of the corporation, in addition to and not in lieu of pro-
visions in this chapter that  govern the board member’s, officer’s or employee’s conduct with
respect to the corporation, including but not limited to ORS 65.357, 65.361,  65.364, 65.367,
65.369 and 65.377, is subject  to the provisions of ORS chapter 244. To the extent that a con-
flict exists between a provision of ORS  chapter 65 identified in this paragraph and a provision
of ORS chapter 244, the provisions of ORS chapter 65 identified in this paragraph control.
(4) A public body that  provides a corporation with public funds or a public benefit de-
scribed in subsection (2)(b) of this section shall monitor  the corporation’s compliance with
subsection (3) of this section. The  public body may designate or enter into an agreement with
another public body to carry out the public body’s responsibilities under this subsection.
(5)(a) A corporation described in subsection (2) of this section that  does not comply with
the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, at the discretion of the public body that
provided the corporation with public funds or a public  benefit described in subsection (2)(b)
of this section, is subject to:
(A) A demand for repayment of public funds or the equivalent value of a  public benefit
described in subsection (2)(b) of this  section that the corporation received from the public
body; and
(B) A denial of public funds or a  public benefit described in subsection (2)(b) of this sec-
tion for a period of 10 years.
(b) A public body that provides a corporation with public funds or a public  benefit de-
scribed in subsection (2)(b) of this section may enter into an assurance of voluntary compli-
ance with the corporation before imposing a sanction described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(c) The Secretary of State shall, under ORS 65.647, administratively  dissolve a corpo-
ration that shows a pattern of repeated violations  of subsection (3) of this section or that
fails to  comply with the terms of an assurance of voluntary compliance that a public body
negotiates with the corporation.
(d) A member of the board of directors or an officer of a corporation that the  Secretary
of State administratively dissolves under paragraph  (c) of this subsection may not serve as
a member of the board of directors or an officer of another corporation for a period  of not
less than 10 years.  The Secretary of State by rule shall specify procedures for enforcing the
provision described in this paragraph.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 2 of this 2023 Act becomes operative January 1, 2024.
(2) The Secretary of State and a public body that provides public  funds or a public benefit
described in section 2 (2)(b) of this 2023 Act may adopt, as appropriate,  rules, resolutions or
ordinances before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section that are nec-
essary to enable the Secretary of State or the  public body to undertake and exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the Secretary of State or the public body by section 2 of  this 2023
[2]
HB 2821
1
2
3
4
5
Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]