Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 197.365 is amended to read:
197.365. Unless the applicant requests to use the procedure set forth in a  comprehensive plan
and land use regulations, a local government shall use  the following procedure for an expedited land
division, as described in ORS 197.360, or a middle housing land division under ORS 92.031:
(1)(a) If the application for a land division is incomplete, the local government shall notify  the
applicant of exactly what information is missing within 21 days of receipt of the application and
allow the applicant to submit the missing information. For purposes of computation of time under
this section, the application shall be deemed complete on the date the applicant submits  the re-
quested information or refuses in writing to submit it.
(b) If the application was complete when first submitted or the  applicant submits the requested
additional information within 180  days of the date the application was first submitted, approval or
denial of the application shall be based upon the standards and criteria that were applicable at  the
time the application was first submitted.
(2) The local government shall provide written notice of the  receipt of the completed application
for a land division to  any state agency, local government or special district responsible for providing
public facilities or services to the development  and to owners of property within 100 feet , or no less
than 300 feet for a middle housing  land division, of the entire contiguous site for which the ap-
plication is made. The notification list shall be compiled from the most recent property tax  assess-
ment roll. For purposes of appeal to the referee under ORS 197.375, this requirement shall be deemed
met when the local government can provide an affidavit or other certification that such notice  was
given. Notice shall also be provided to any neighborhood  or community planning organization re-
cognized by the governing body and whose boundaries include the site.
(3) The notice required under subsection (2) of this section shall:
(a) State:
(A) The deadline for submitting written comments;
(B) That issues that may provide the basis for an appeal to the  referee must be raised in writing
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3449
SB 737
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
prior to the expiration of the comment period; and
(C) That issues must be raised with sufficient specificity to enable the local government  to re-
spond to the issue.
(b) Set forth, by commonly used citation, the applicable criteria for the decision.
(c) Set forth the street address or other easily  understood geographical reference to the subject
property.
(d) State the place, date and time that comments are due.
(e) State a time  and place where copies of all evidence submitted by the applicant will be
available for review.
(f) Include the name and telephone number of a local government contact person.
(g) Briefly summarize the local decision-making process for the land division  decision being
made.
(h) State, for middle housing land divisions:
(A) The conditions under which the application may be denied;
(B) An explanation that the local  government must approve an application that is com-
plete and meets the statutory requirements;
(C) The local government’s assessment of whether approval  of the application will trigger
the need for a traffic study;
(D) The local government’s assessment  of whether approval of the application will trigger
the need to enhance other infrastructure; and
(E) Where residents  may get more information about how systems development charges
will be  applied to the development and how infrastructure need and traffic safety are as-
sessed.
(4) After notice under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the local government shall:
(a) Provide a 14-day period for submission of written comments prior to the decision.
(b) Make a decision to approve or deny the application within 63 days  of receiving a completed
application, based on whether it satisfies the substantive requirements of the applicable land  use
regulations. An approval may include conditions  to ensure that the application meets the applicable
land use regulations. For applications subject to this section, the local government:
(A) Shall not hold a hearing on the application; and
(B) Shall issue a written determination of compliance or noncompliance  with applicable land use
regulations that includes a summary statement explaining the  determination. The summary state-
ment may be in any form reasonably intended to communicate  the local government’s basis for the
determination.
(c) Provide notice of the decision to the applicant  and to those who received notice under sub-
section (2) of  this section within 63 days of the date of a completed application. The notice of deci-
sion shall include:
(A) The summary statement described in paragraph (b)(B) of this subsection; and
(B) An explanation of appeal rights under ORS 197.375.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]