Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “cognitive impairment” means a deficiency in:
(a) Short-term or long-term memory;
(b) Orientation as to person, place and time; or
(c) Deductive or abstract reasoning.
(2) In determining the extent of health care and health services to  be provided in medical
assistance under ORS  414.065, the Oregon Health Authority shall ensure payment for the
cost of  cognitive assessment and care planning for a medical assistance recipient, including
a member  of a coordinated care organization, who experiences signs or symptoms of cogni-
tive impairment.
(3) The authority shall prescribe the elements of cognitive assessment and  care planning,
which must include, but are not limited  to, all of the elements described in the Medicare
billing code  for cognitive assessment and care planning services provided by a physician,
nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist or physician assistant.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 210