Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 653.646 is amended to read:
653.646. (1) An employer signatory to  a collective bargaining agreement to which the employer
has agreed to contribute to a  joint  multiemployer-employee trust or benefit plan or
multiemployer-employee trust or  benefit plan that is maintained for the benefit of the employees
subject to the agreement shall  be considered to have met the requirements of ORS 653.601 to 653.661
if:
(a) The terms of the agreement provide a  sick leave policy or other paid time off program that
is substantially equivalent to or more generous than the minimum  requirements of ORS 653.601 to
653.661 for the benefit of employees:
(A) Who are employed through a hiring hall or similar referral  system operated by the labor
organization or a third party;
(B) Whose terms  and conditions of employment are covered by the multiemployer collective
bargaining agreement; and
(C) Whose employment-related benefits are provided by the [ joint multiemployer-employee ] trust
or benefit plan;
(b) The trustees of the trust or benefit plan have agreed to the level of benefits provided  under
the sick leave policy or other paid time off program; and
(c) The contributions to the trust or benefit plan are :
(A) Made solely by the employer signatories to  the agreement[ .] under a multiemployer-
employee trust or benefit plan; or
(B) Made jointly by the employer signatories  to the agreement under a joint
multiemployer-employee trust or benefit plan and the employees covered by the trust  or
benefit plan.
(2)(a) An employee is eligible to  use sick time accrued under a sick time policy or other program
made available by an  employer under subsection (1) of this section beginning on the 91st calendar
day of employment with an employer who is a signatory to the  multiemployer collective bargaining
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1379
SB 86
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
agreement described under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) An employee may combine employment service attributable to  each employer signatory for
whom the employee worked to meet the eligibility  requirements under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section.
(3) The requirements of ORS 653.601 to 653.661 do not apply to an employee:
(a) Who is employed as a longshore worker;
(b) Who is  employed through a hiring hall or similar referral system operated by the labor or-
ganization or a third party;
(c) Whose terms and conditions of employment are covered  by a collective bargaining agree-
ment; and
(d) Whose employment-related benefits are provided by a joint multiemployer-employee  trust or
benefit plan.
(4)(a) The Home Care Commission created under ORS 410.602 shall establish a  paid sick time
policy for consumer employed home care workers and consumer employed  personal support workers.
(b) A policy for paid sick time for consumer employed home care workers and consumer em-
ployed personal support workers  implemented by the Home Care Commission that allows an eligible
home care worker  or personal support worker to accrue and use up to 40 hours of paid time off a
year, including but not limited to sick time, is deemed to meet the  requirements of ORS 653.601 to
653.661 and is exempt  from the provisions of ORS 653.601 (6), 653.606 (5), 653.611, 653.621, 653.626
and 653.631.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Consumer employed home care worker” has the meaning given the  term  “home care
worker” in ORS 410.600.
(b) “Consumer  employed personal support worker” has the meaning given the term “personal
support worker” in ORS 410.600.
(c) “Joint multiemployer-employee  trust or benefit plan or multiemployer-employee trust
or benefit plan” means an employee benefit plan:
(A) Under which benefits are financed and administered according to the terms of a col-
lective bargaining agreement; and
(B) Where applicable, complies with the federal Employee Retirement Income  Security
Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. 1001 et seq., as amended.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]