Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The provisions of the Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact are as follows:
DENTIST AND DENTAL HYGIENIST COMPACT
SECTION 1. TITLE AND PURPOSE
This statute shall be known and cited as the Dentist and Dental Hygienist  Compact. The
purposes of this Compact  are to facilitate the interstate practice of dentistry and dental
hygiene and improve public access to dentistry and dental hygiene services  by providing
dentists and dental hygienists licensed in a participating state  the ability to practice in par-
ticipating states in which they are not licensed. This  Compact does this by establishing a
pathway for dentists and dental hygienists licensed in a participating state to obtain a  Com-
pact privilege that  authorizes them to practice in another participating state in which they
are not licensed.  This Compact enables participating states to protect the public health and
safety with respect to the practice  of such dentists and dental hygienists, through the state’s
authority to regulate the practice of dentistry and  dental hygiene in the state. This Compact:
A. Enables dentists and dental hygienists who  qualify for a Compact privilege to practice
in other participating states without satisfying burdensome and  duplicative requirements
associated with securing a license to practice in those states;
B. Promotes  mobility and addresses workforce shortages through each participating
state’s acceptance of a Compact privilege to practice in that state;
C. Increases public access to qualified, licensed dentists and  dental hygienists by creating
a responsible, streamlined pathway for licensees to practice in participating states;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 788
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
D. Enhances the ability of participating states to protect the public’s health and safety;
E. Does not interfere with licensure requirements established by a participating state;
F. Facilitates the  sharing of licensure and disciplinary information among participating
states;
G. Requires dentists and dental hygienists who  practice in a participating state pursuant
to a Compact privilege to practice within the scope of practice authorized in that state;
H. Extends the authority of a participating state to  regulate the practice of dentistry and
dental hygiene within its borders to dentists and dental hygienists who  practice in the state
through a Compact privilege;
I. Promotes the cooperation of participating states in regulating the practice  of dentistry
and dental hygiene within those states; and
J. Facilitates the relocation of military members and their spouses who  are licensed to
practice dentistry or dental hygiene.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, unless the context requires otherwise,  the following definitions
shall apply:
A. “Active military member” means any person  with full-time duty status in the Armed
Forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard and Reserve.
B. “Adverse action” means disciplinary action or encumbrance imposed on a license  or
Compact privilege by a state licensing authority.
C. “Alternative program” means a nondisciplinary monitoring or  practice remediation
process applicable to a dentist or dental hygienist approved by a state  licensing authority of
a participating state in which the dentist or dental hygienist is licensed.  This includes, but
is not limited to, programs to which licensees with substance abuse  or addiction issues are
referred in lieu of adverse action.
D. “Clinical assessment”  means examination or process, required for licensure as a den-
tist or dental hygienist as applicable, that provides evidence of clinical  competence in
dentistry or dental hygiene.
E. “Commissioner” means the individual appointed by a participating state to  serve as
the member of the Commission for that participating state.
F. “Compact” means this Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact.
G. “Compact privilege”  means the authorization granted by a remote state to allow a
licensee from a participating  state to practice as a dentist or dental hygienist in a remote
state.
H. “Continuing professional development”  means a requirement, as a condition of license
renewal, to provide evidence of successful participation in educational or professional activ-
ities relevant to practice or area of work.
I. “Criminal background check” means the submission of fingerprints or other
biometric-based information for a license applicant for  the purpose of obtaining that
applicant’s criminal history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. 20.3(d), from  the
Federal Bureau of Investigation and  the state’s criminal history record repository, as defined
in 28 C.F.R. 20.3(f).
J. “Data system” means the Commission’s repository of  information about licensees, in-
cluding but not limited to information about examinations,  licensure, investigations, adverse
actions, alternative programs and Compact privilege.
[2]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
K. “Dental hygienist” means an individual who is licensed by a state  licensing authority
to practice dental hygiene.
L. “Dentist”  means an individual who is licensed by a state licensing authority to practice
dentistry.
M. “Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact Commission” or “Commission”  means a joint
government agency established by  this Compact comprised of each state that has enacted
this Compact and a national administrative body comprised of a commissioner  from each
state that has enacted this Compact.
N. “Encumbered license” means a license that a state licensing authority  has limited in
any way other than through an alternative program.
O. “Executive board” means the  chair, vice chair, secretary and treasurer and any other
commissioners as may be determined by Commission rule or bylaw.
P. “Jurisprudence requirement” means the assessment  of an individual’s knowledge of
the laws and  rules governing the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene, as applicable, in a
state.
Q. “License” means current authorization by a state, other than  authorization pursuant
to a  Compact privilege or other privilege, for an individual to practice as a dentist or dental
hygienist in that state.
R. “Licensee”  means an individual who holds an unrestricted license from a participating
state to practice as a dentist or dental hygienist in that state.
S. “Model  compact” means the model for this Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact on
file with the Council of State Governments, or its  successor organization, or another entity
as designated by the Commission.
T. “Participating state” means a state that has enacted this Compact and  been admitted
to the Commission in accordance with the provisions herein and Commission rules.
U. “Qualifying license” means a license that is not an encumbered license  issued by a
participating state to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.
V. “Remote state” means  a participating state where a licensee who is not licensed as a
dentist or dental hygienist is exercising or seeking to exercise the Compact privilege.
W. “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the force of law.
X. “Scope of practice” means  the procedures, actions and processes a dentist or dental
hygienist licensed in a state is permitted to  undertake in that state and the circumstances
under which the licensee is permitted to undertake those  procedures, actions and processes.
Such procedures, actions and processes  and the circumstances under which they may be
undertaken may be established through  means including, but not limited to, statute, regu-
lations, case law and other processes available to the state licensing authority or other
government agency.
Y. “Significant investigative information” means  information, records and documents
received or generated by a state licensing  authority pursuant to an investigation for which
a determination has been made that  there is probable cause to believe that the licensee has
violated a statute or regulation that is considered more than a  minor infraction for which
the state licensing authority could pursue adverse action against the licensee.
Z. “State” means any state,  commonwealth, district or territory of the United States
that regulates the practices of dentistry and dental hygiene.
AA. “State licensing authority” means an agency  or other entity of a state that is re-
[3]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sponsible for the licensing and regulation of dentists or dental hygienists.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. In order to join this Compact and  thereafter continue as a participating state, a state
must:
1. Enact a version of this Compact that is  not materially different from the model com-
pact as determined in accordance with Commission rules;
2. Participate fully in the Commission’s data system;
3. Have  a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about its
licensees and license applicants;
4. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of this Compact and  Commission
rules, of  any adverse action or the availability of significant investigative information re-
garding a licensee and license applicant;
5. Fully implement a criminal background check requirement, within a time  frame es-
tablished by Commission rule, by receiving  the results of a qualifying criminal background
check;
6. Comply with the Commission rules applicable to a participating state;
7. Accept the national board  examinations of the Joint Commission on National Dental
Examinations, or its successor organization, or another examination accepted by  Commis-
sion rule as a licensure examination;
8. Accept for licensure that applicants for a dentist license graduate  from a predoctoral
dental education program  accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, or its
successor organization, or another accrediting agency  recognized by the United States De-
partment of Education  for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene education pro-
grams, leading to the Doctor of Dental Surgery (D.D.S.) or Doctor of Dental  Medicine
(D.M.D.) degree;
9. Accept for licensure that applicants for  a dental hygienist license graduate from a
dental hygiene education  program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation,
or its successor organization, or another accrediting  agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education for the accreditation of dentistry and dental  hygiene education
programs;
10. Require for licensure that applicants successfully complete a clinical assessment;
11. Have continuing professional development requirements as  a condition for license
renewal; and
12. Pay a participation fee to the Dentist and  Dental Hygienist Compact Commission as
established by Commission rule.
B. Providing alternative pathways for an individual to obtain an unrestricted  license does
not disqualify a state from participating in this Compact.
C. When conducting a criminal background check the state licensing authority shall:
1. Consider that information in making a licensure decision;
2. Maintain documentation of completion  of the criminal background check and back-
ground check information to the extent allowed by state and federal law; and
3. Report to the Commission whether it has completed the criminal background check
and whether the individual was granted or denied a license.
D. A licensee of a  participating state who has a qualifying license in that state and does
not hold an encumbered license in any other participating state  shall be issued a Compact
[4]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
privilege in a remote state in  accordance with the terms of this Compact and Commission
rules. If a remote state has a jurisprudence requirement, a Compact privilege will not be is-
sued to the licensee unless the licensee has satisfied the jurisprudence requirement.
SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. To obtain and exercise the Compact privilege under the terms  and provisions of this
Compact, the licensee shall:
1. Have a qualifying license as a dentist or dental hygienist in a participating state;
2. Be eligible for a Compact privilege  in any remote state in accordance with subsections
D, G and H of this section;
3. Submit to an application process whenever the licensee is seeking a Compact  privilege;
4. Pay  any applicable Commission and remote state fees for a Compact privilege in the
remote state;
5. Meet any jurisprudence requirement established by  a remote state in which the
licensee is seeking a Compact privilege;
6. Have passed a national  board examination of the Joint Commission on National Dental
Examinations, or  its successor organization, or another examination accepted by Commis-
sion rule;
7. For a dentist, have graduated from a predoctoral  dental education program accredited
by the Commission on Dental  Accreditation, or its successor organization, or another ac-
crediting agency recognized by the United States Department  of Education for the accredi-
tation of dentistry and  dental hygiene education programs, leading to the Doctor of Dental
Surgery (D.D.S.) or Doctor of Dental Medicine (D.M.D.) degree;
8. For  a dental hygienist, have graduated from a dental hygiene education program ac-
credited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, or its successor organization, or  an-
other accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education for the
accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene education programs;
9. Have successfully completed a clinical assessment for licensure;
10. Report to the Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact Commission adverse action
taken by any nonparticipating state when  applying for a Compact privilege within 30 days
from the date the adverse action is taken;
11. Report to the Commission when applying for a Compact privilege  the address of the
licensee’s primary residence and thereafter immediately report to the Commission  any
change in the address of the licensee’s primary residence; and
12. Consent to accept service of process by mail at the licensee’s primary residence on
record with the Commission  with respect to any action brought against the licensee by the
Commission or a participating state, and consent to accept service of a subpoena by  mail at
the licensee’s primary residence on  record with the Commission with respect to any action
brought or investigation conducted by the Commission or a participating state.
B. The licensee must comply with the requirements of subsection A of this  section to
maintain the Compact privilege in the remote state.  If those requirements are met, the
Compact privilege will continue as long as the licensee maintains a qualifying license in the
state through which the licensee applied for the Compact privilege and pays any applicable
Compact privilege renewal fees.
C. A licensee providing dentistry or dental hygiene in a remote state under the  Compact
privilege shall function within the scope of practice authorized by the remote state for  a
[5]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dentist or dental hygienist licensed in that state.
D. A licensee providing  dentistry or dental hygiene pursuant to a Compact privilege in a
remote state is subject to that state’s regulatory authority. A  remote state may, in accord-
ance with due process  and that state’s laws, by adverse action revoke or remove a licensee’s
Compact privilege in the remote state for a  specific period of time and impose fines or take
any other necessary actions to protect the health and safety of its citizens. If  a remote state
imposes an adverse action against a Compact privilege that limits the Compact privilege, that
adverse action applies to all Compact privileges in all remote  states. A licensee whose Com-
pact privilege in a remote state is removed for a specified period  of time is not eligible for
a Compact privilege in any other remote state until  the specific time for removal of the
Compact privilege has passed and all encumbrance requirements are satisfied.
E. If a license issued  by a participating state is an encumbered license, the licensee shall
lose the Compact privilege in  a remote state and shall not be eligible for a Compact privilege
in any remote state until the license is no longer encumbered.
F. Once an encumbered license in a participating  state is restored to good standing, the
licensee must meet the requirements of subsection A of this section  to obtain a Compact
privilege in a remote state.
G. If a licensee’s Compact privilege in a remote  state is removed by the remote state,
the individual shall lose or be ineligible for the Compact privilege in  any remote state until
the following occur:
1. The specific period  of time for which the Compact privilege was removed has ended;
and
2. All conditions for removal of the Compact privilege have been satisfied.
H. Once the requirements of subsection G of this  section have been met, the licensee
must meet the requirements in subsection A of this  section to obtain a Compact privilege in
a remote state.
SECTION 5. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR SPOUSES
An active military member and their  spouse shall not be required to pay to the Com-
mission for a  Compact privilege the fee otherwise charged by the Commission. If a remote
state chooses to charge a fee for a  Compact privilege, it may choose to charge a reduced fee
or no fee to an active military member and their spouse for a Compact privilege.
SECTION 6. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. A participating state in which a licensee is licensed shall have exclusive authority  to
impose adverse action against the qualifying license issued by that participating state.
B. A participating state may  take adverse action based on the significant investigative
information of a remote state, so long as the participating state follows its own  procedures
for imposing adverse action.
C. Nothing in this Compact shall  override a participating state’s decision that partic-
ipation in an alternative program may be used in lieu  of adverse action and that such par-
ticipation shall  remain nonpublic if required by the participating state’s laws. Participating
states must require licensees who enter any alternative  program in lieu of discipline to agree
not to practice pursuant to a Compact  privilege in any other participating state during the
term of the alternative program without prior  authorization from such other participating
state.
D. Any participating state in which a licensee  is applying to practice or is practicing
[6]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
pursuant to a Compact privilege  may investigate actual or alleged violations of the statutes
and regulations authorizing the practice of dentistry or  dental hygiene in any other partic-
ipating state in which the dentist or dental hygienist holds a license or Compact privilege.
E. A remote state shall have the authority to:
1. Take adverse actions as set forth in Section  4.D of this Compact against a licensee’s
Compact privilege in the state;
2. In furtherance of its rights and responsibilities  under the Compact and the
Commission’s rules, issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that  require the
attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence.  Subpoenas issued by
a state  licensing authority in a participating state for the attendance and testimony of wit-
nesses, or the production of evidence  from another participating state, shall be enforced in
the latter state  by any court of competent jurisdiction according to the practice and proce-
dure of  that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issu-
ing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage  and other fees required by
the service statutes of the state where the witnesses or evidence are located; and
3. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the licensee  the costs of investi-
gations and disposition of cases resulting from any  adverse action taken against that
licensee.
F. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a participating state by  its dentist or dental
hygienist licensure act or other applicable state law, a participating  state may jointly inves-
tigate licensees with other participating states.
2. Participating states shall share any significant investigative information, litigation or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint  or individual investigation initiated under
this Compact.
G. Authority to Continue Investigation
1. After a licensee’s Compact privilege in a remote state is terminated, the  remote state
may continue an investigation of the licensee that began when the licensee  had a Compact
privilege in that remote state.
2. If the investigation yields  what would be significant investigative information had the
licensee continued to have a Compact privilege in that remote state, the remote state  shall
report the presence of such  information to the data system as required by section 8.B.6 of
this Compact as if it were significant investigative information.
SECTION 7. ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF THE COMMISSION
A. The Compact participating states hereby create  and establish a joint government
agency whose  membership consists of all participating states that have enacted this Com-
pact. The Commission is an instrumentality  of the participating states acting jointly and not
an instrumentality of any one state. The Commission  shall come into existence on or after
the effective date of this Compact as set forth in Section 11.A of this Compact.
B. Participation, Voting and Meetings
1. Each participating state shall have and be limited to one commissioner selected by that
participating state’s state licensing authority or, if the state has more than one  state li-
censing authority, selected collectively by the state licensing authorities.
2. The commissioner shall be a member or designee of such authority or authorities.
3. The Commission may by rule or  bylaw establish a term of office for commissioners and
[7]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
may by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The Commission may recommend to a state licensing authority or authorities, as ap-
plicable, removal or suspension of an individual as the state’s commissioner.
5. A  participating state’s state licensing authority or authorities, as applicable, shall fill
any vacancy of its commissioner on the Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
6. Each commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on all  matters that are voted upon
by the Commission.
7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar  year. Additional
meetings may be held as set forth  in the bylaws. The Commission may meet by telecommu-
nication, video conference or other similar electronic means.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish a code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
3. Adopt rules and bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the  provisions of this Compact, the
Commission’s rules and the bylaws;
6. Initiate and  conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the Commission,
provided that the standing of any state licensing authority to sue  or be sued under applicable
law shall not be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records  and information provided to a participating state as the
authenticated business records of the Commission, and designate a person to do  so on the
Commission’s behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept or contract  for services of personnel, including, but not limited to,
employees of a participating state;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers,  fix compensation, define duties, grant such
individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of  this Compact and establish the
Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to  conflicts of interest, qualifications
of personnel and other related personnel matters;
12. As set forth in the  Commission rules, charge a fee to a licensee for the grant of a
Compact privilege in a remote state and thereafter, as may be established by Commission
rule, charge the licensee a Compact privilege renewal fee for each renewal period  in which
that licensee exercises or  intends to exercise the Compact privilege in that remote state.
Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent a remote state from charging a licensee a fee
for a Compact privilege or renewals of a  Compact privilege, or a fee for the jurisprudence
requirement if the remote state  imposes such a requirement for the grant of a Compact
privilege;
13. Accept any and all  appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other sources of
revenue, equipment,  supplies, materials and services, and receive, utilize and dispose of the
same, provided that at all times the Commission  shall avoid any appearance of impropriety
or conflict of interest;
14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve or use any property, real,  personal or
mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
[8]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
15. Sell,  convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of any
property real, personal or mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money;
18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, which may  be composed of
members, state regulators, state legislators or their representatives,  consumer represen-
tatives and such other interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the by-
laws;
19. Provide and receive information from,  and cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;
20. Elect a chair, vice chair, secretary and treasurer and such other officers of the
Commission as provided in the Commission’s bylaws;
21. Establish and elect an executive board;
22. Adopt and provide to the participating states an annual report;
23. Determine whether a state’s enacted compact is materially  different from the model
compact language such that the state would not qualify for participation in this Compact;
and
24. Perform such other  functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the
purposes of this Compact.
D. Meetings of the Commission
1. All  meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant to this subsection shall
be open to the public. Notice of public meetings  shall be posted on the Commission’s website
at least 30 days prior to the public meeting.
2. Notwithstanding subsection D.1 of this section, the Commission may  convene an
emergency public meeting by providing at least 24 hours’ prior  notice on the Commission’s
website, and any other means as provided in the Commission’s rules, for any  of the reasons
it may dispense  with notice of proposed rulemaking under section 9.L of this Compact. The
Commission’s legal counsel shall certify that one of the reasons justifying an emergency
public meeting has been met.
3. Notice of all Commission meetings  shall provide the time, date and location of the
meeting, and if the meeting  is to be held or accessible via telecommunication, video confer-
ence or other electronic means, the notice shall  include the mechanism for access to the
meeting through such means.
4. The Commission may convene in a  closed, nonpublic meeting for the Commission to
receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Noncompliance of a participating state with its obligations under this Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or  other matters, practices or procedures
related to specific employees  or other matters related to the Commission’s internal person-
nel practices and procedures;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a licensee  or Compact privilege holder by the
Commission or by a participating state’s licensing authority;
d. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease or sale of goods,  services or real es-
tate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential;
[9]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure  would constitute a clearly unwar-
ranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or  for use
of the Commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation  or deter-
mination of compliance issues pursuant to this Compact;
k. Legal advice;
L. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the public  by federal or participating
state law; and
m. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by rule.
5. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the  presiding officer shall state that
the meeting will be closed and reference each  relevant exempting provision, and such refer-
ence shall be recorded in the minutes.
6. The Commission shall keep minutes  that fully and clearly describe all matters dis-
cussed in a meeting and shall  provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All documents  considered
in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents
of a closed  meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the
Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
E. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission  shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of
its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate sources of revenue,  donations and
grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services.
3.a. The Commission may levy on and collect  an annual assessment from each partic-
ipating state and impose fees on licensees of participating states  when a Compact privilege
is granted, to  cover the cost of the operations and activities of the Commission and its staff,
which must be in a total amount sufficient to  cover its annual budget as approved each fiscal
year for which  sufficient revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual
assessment amount for participating states shall be allocated based upon a formula  that the
Commission shall promulgate by rule.
b. An assessment levied, or  other financial obligation imposed, under this Compact is
effective against the State of Oregon only to the extent that moneys necessary  to pay the
assessment or meet the financial  obligation have been deposited in the Oregon Board of
Dentistry Account established under ORS 679.260.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of  any kind prior to securing the funds
adequate to meet the same, nor shall the Commission pledge  the credit of any participating
state, except by and with the authority of the participating state.
5. The Commission shall keep  accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be  subject to the financial review and
accounting procedures established under its bylaws. All receipts and disbursements  of funds
handled by the Commission  shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or
licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included  in and
become part of the annual report of the Commission.
F. The Executive Board
[10]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
1. The executive board shall have  the power to act on behalf of the Commission according
to the terms  of this Compact. The powers, duties and responsibilities of the executive board
shall include:
a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of this Compact including
compliance with the provisions of this Compact and the Commission’s rules and bylaws;
b. Recommending to the Commission changes to the rules or  bylaws, changes to this
Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact participating states, fees charged to  licensees
and other fees;
c. Ensuring Compact administration services are appropriately provided, including by
contract;
d. Preparing and recommending the budget;
e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the Commission;
f. Monitoring Compact compliance of  participating states and providing compliance re-
ports to the Commission;
g. Establishing additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercising the powers and duties of the Commission during  the interim between
Commission meetings, except for adopting or  amending rules, adopting or amending bylaws
and exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the Commission  by rule
or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the Commission.
2. The executive board shall be composed of up to seven members:
a. The chair, vice chair, secretary and  treasurer of the Commission and any other
members of the Commission who serve on the executive board shall be voting  members of
the executive board; and
b. Other than the chair,  vice chair, secretary and treasurer, the Commission may elect
up to three voting members from the current membership of the Commission.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the executive board  as provided in the
Commission’s bylaws.
4. The executive board shall meet at least annually.
a. An executive board meeting at  which it takes or intends to take formal action on a
matter shall be open to the  public, except that the executive board may meet in a closed,
nonpublic session of a  public meeting when dealing with any of the matters covered under
subsection D.4 of this section.
b. The executive board shall give five business days’  notice of its public meetings posted
on its website and as it may otherwise determine  to provide notice to persons with an in-
terest in the public matters the executive board intends to address at those meetings.
5. The executive board may hold an emergency meeting when acting for  the Commission
to:
a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
b. Prevent a loss of Commission or participating state funds; or
c. Protect public health and safety.
G. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of  the Com-
mission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally  and in their official capacity,
for any claim  for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability
[11]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
caused by or arising  out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that
the person against whom the claim is made had a  reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or  responsibilities, provided that nothing
in this paragraph shall  be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any
damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional, willful or  wanton misconduct of
that person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in  any
way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The Commission  shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee and
representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising  out
of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities,  or as determined by the Commission that the person
against whom the claim  is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that  nothing herein
shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel at their  own
expense and provided further that the actual or alleged act, error or omission  did not result
from that person’s intentional, willful or wanton misconduct.
3. Notwithstanding subsection G.1 of this section,  should any member, officer, executive
director, employee or representative of the Commission be held liable for the amount  of any
settlement or judgment arising out of any actual  or alleged act, error or omission that oc-
curred within the scope of that individual’s employment, duties or responsibilities  for the
Commission, or that the person  to whom that individual is liable had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of the individual’s employment, duties  or responsibilities
for the Commission, the Commission  shall indemnify and hold harmless such individual,
provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from  the intentional,
willful or wanton misconduct of the individual.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed  as a limitation on the liability of any licensee for
professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed  solely by any other appli-
cable state laws.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted  to waive or otherwise abrogate a partic-
ipating state’s state action immunity or  state action affirmative defense with respect to
antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton  Act or any other state or federal antitrust
or anticompetitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this Compact shall  be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity by
the participating states or by the Commission.
SECTION 8. DATA SYSTEM
A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,  operation and utili-
zation of a coordinated database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse  action
and the presence of significant investigative information on all licensees  and applicants for
a license in participating states.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to  the contrary, a participating state
shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all individuals to  whom this Compact
is applicable as required by the rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a licensee, license applicant or Compact  privilege and infor-
[12]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mation related thereto;
4. Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation, the beginning
and ending dates of such participation and other information related to such participation;
5. Any denial of an application for licensure and the reason  for such denial (excluding the
reporting of any criminal history record information where prohibited by law);
6. The presence of significant investigative information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact  or the pro-
tection of the public, as determined by the rules of the Commission.
C. The records and information provided to a participating  state pursuant to this Com-
pact or through the data system, when certified by the Commission or an agent thereof, shall
constitute the authenticated business records  of the Commission, and shall be entitled to any
associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial  or administrative pro-
ceedings in a participating state.
D. Significant investigative information pertaining to a licensee in  any participating state
will only be available to other participating states.
E. It is  the responsibility of the participating states to monitor the database to determine
whether adverse action has been taken against a licensee or license applicant. Adverse action
information pertaining to a licensee or license applicant in any participating state  will be
available to any other participating state.
F. Participating states contributing information to the data system may designate infor-
mation that  may not be shared with the public without the express permission of the con-
tributing state.
G. Any  information submitted to the data system that is subsequently expunged pursuant
to federal law or the laws of the  participating state contributing the information shall be
removed from the data system.
SECTION 9. RULEMAKING
A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order  to effectively and effi-
ciently implement and administer the purposes and provisions of this  Compact. A Commis-
sion rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction
holds that  the rule is invalid because the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in
a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of this  Compact or the powers granted
hereunder or based upon another applicable standard of review.
B.1. The rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in  each participating state,
provided however that where the rules of the  Commission conflict with the laws of the par-
ticipating state  that establish the participating state’s scope of practice as held by a court
of competent jurisdiction, the rules of  the Commission shall be ineffective in that state to
the extent of the conflict.
2. Notwithstanding subsection B.1 of this section, the Oregon Board of Dentistry  shall
review the rules of the Commission. The board  may approve and adopt the rules of the
Commission as rules of  the board. The State of Oregon is subject to a rule of the Commission
only if the rule of the Commission is adopted by the board.
C. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the  criteria set
forth in this section and  the rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding as of the
date specified by the Commission for each rule.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of  the participating states rejects a Commission rule
[13]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or portion of a Commission rule,  by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner
used to adopt the Compact, within four years of the date of adoption  of the rule, then such
rule shall have no  further force and effect in any participating state or to any state applying
to participate in this Compact.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall hold a  public hearing and
allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions and arguments.
G. Prior to  adoption of a proposed rule by the Commission, and at least 30 days in ad-
vance of  the meeting at which the Commission will hold a public hearing on the proposed
rule, the Commission shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice  of the Commission’s notices of proposed
rulemaking; and
3. In such other ways as the Commission may by rule specify.
H. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date  and location of the public hearing at which the Commission will hear
public comments on the proposed rule and, if different, the time, date and location of  the
meeting where the Commission will consider and vote on the proposed rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video  conference or other electronic
means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for access to  the hearing in the notice
of proposed rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments  and
documents received by the Commission  in response to the proposed rule shall be available
to the public.
J. Nothing in  this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each
Commission rule. Rules may be  grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings
required by this section.
K. The Commission shall, by majority  vote of all Commissioners, take final action on the
proposed rule based on the rulemaking record.
1. The Commission  may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided the changes do not
enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
2. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for  substantive changes
made to the proposed rule as well as  reasons for substantive changes not made that were
recommended by commenters.
3. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective  date for the rule. Except for
an emergency as provided in subsection L of this section, the effective date of  the rule shall
be no sooner than 30 days after the Commission issues  the notice that it adopted or amended
the rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists,  the Commission may consider and
adopt an emergency rule with 24 hours’  notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that
the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this  Compact and in this section shall be
retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days
[14]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency  rule is
one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or participating state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by federal law  or
rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct  revisions
to a previously adopted rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors,  errors in for-
mat, errors in consistency or  grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be
posted on the website of the Commission. The revision shall  be subject to challenge by any
person for a period of 30 days after posting. The  revision may be challenged only on grounds
that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing
and delivered to the Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is
made, the revision will take effect without further action. If  the revision is challenged, the
revision may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.
N. No participating state’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this Compact.
SECTION 10. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches  of state government in each participating state
shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate  to implement this
Compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall be brought
solely and exclusively in  a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the
extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute  resolution proceedings.
Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against
a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct or any such similar matter.
3. The Commission shall  be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding re-
garding the enforcement or interpretation of the  Compact or Commission rule and shall have
standing to intervene in such a proceeding  for all purposes. Failure to provide the Com-
mission service of process  shall render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this
Compact or promulgated rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a participating state has defaulted in the  perform-
ance of its obligations or responsibilities under  this Compact or the promulgated rules, the
Commission shall provide written notice  to the defaulting state. The notice of default shall
describe the default, the proposed means of curing the  default and any other action that the
Commission may take,  and shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the
default.
2. The Commission  shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other participating
states.
C. If a  state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated
from this Compact upon an affirmative vote of  a majority of the Commissioners, and all
rights, privileges and benefits conferred on that state by this  Compact may be terminated
[15]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state
of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
D. Termination of participation in  this Compact shall be imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend  or terminate
shall be given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and minority  leaders of the
defaulting state’s legislature, the  defaulting state’s state licensing authority or authorities,
as applicable, and each of the  participating states’ state licensing authority or authorities,
as applicable.
E. A state that  has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations and
liabilities incurred through the effective  date of termination, including obligations that ex-
tend beyond the effective date of termination.
F. Upon the termination of a state’s participation in this Compact, that  state shall im-
mediately provide notice to all licensees of the state,  including licensees of other participat-
ing states issued a Compact privilege to practice within that state, of  such termination. The
terminated state shall continue to  recognize all Compact privileges then in effect in that
state for a minimum of 180 days after the date of said notice of termination.
G. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state  that is found to be in de-
fault or that has been terminated  from this Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between
the Commission and the defaulting state.
H. The defaulting state  may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning the U.S.
District Court for the District of Columbia or  the federal district where the Commission has
its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, in-
cluding reasonable attorney’s fees.
I. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by  a participating state, the Commission shall attempt to resolve dis-
putes related to this Compact  that arise among participating states and between participat-
ing states and non-participating states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for  both mediation and binding
dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
J. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable  exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the pro-
visions of this Compact and the Commission’s rules.
2. By majority  vote, the Commission may initiate legal action against a participating
state in default in the U.S. District Court for the  District of Columbia or the federal district
where the Commission has its principal  offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of
this Compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive  relief
and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall  be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees. The  remedies herein
shall not be the exclusive  remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any
other remedies available under federal or the defaulting participating state’s law.
3. A participating state may initiate legal action against  the Commission in the U.S.
District Court for the District of Columbia or  the federal district where the Commission has
its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the  Compact and its
promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both  injunctive relief and damages. In the
event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing  party shall be awarded all costs of
[16]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees.
4. No individual or entity other than a participating state may  enforce this Compact
against the Commission.
SECTION 11. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL AND AMENDMENT
A. This Compact shall come into effect on the date on which  this Compact statute is
enacted into law in the seventh participating state.
1. On or after the  effective date of this Compact, the Commission shall convene and re-
view the enactment of each of the states that  enacted the Compact prior to the Commission
convening (“charter participating states”)  to determine if the statute enacted by each such
charter participating state is materially different than the model compact.
a. A charter participating state whose enactment is found to  be materially different from
the model compact shall be entitled to the default process set forth in section 10  of this
Compact.
b. If any participating  state is later found to be in default, or is terminated or withdraws
from this  Compact, the Commission shall remain in existence and this Compact shall remain
in effect even if the number of participating states should be less than seven.
2. Participating states enacting this Compact  subsequent to the charter participating
states shall be subject to the process set forth in section  7.C.23 of this Compact to determine
if their enactments are materially different from the model  compact and whether they
qualify for participation in this Compact.
3. All actions taken for the  benefit of the Commission or in furtherance of the purposes
of the administration of this  Compact prior to the effective date of this Compact or the
Commission coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the Commission unless
specifically repudiated by the Commission.
4. Any state  that joins this Compact subsequent to the Commission’s initial adoption of
the rules and bylaws shall be subject to the Commission’s rules and  bylaws as they exist on
the date on which this Compact becomes law in that  state. Any rule that has been previously
adopted by  the Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day this Com-
pact becomes law in that state.
B. Any participating state may withdraw from this Compact by  enacting a statute re-
pealing that state’s enactment of this Compact.
1. A participating state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days after enactment
of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall  not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state’s li-
censing authority or authorities to comply with the investigative  and adverse action report-
ing requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a  statute withdrawing from this Compact, the state shall im-
mediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all licensees within  that state.
Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to  the contrary, such withdrawing
state shall continue to recognize all  Compact privileges to practice within that state granted
pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date of  such notice of with-
drawal.
C. Nothing contained in  this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a participating state and  a
nonparticipating state that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
[17]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
D. This Compact may be amended  by the participating states. No amendment to this
Compact shall become effective and  binding upon any participating state until it is enacted
into the laws of all participating states.
SECTION 12. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This Compact and the Commission’s rulemaking  authority shall be liberally construed
so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and administration of this Compact.
Provisions of this Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the  promulgation of rules shall
not be construed to limit the Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be  severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence
or provision of this Compact is  held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to
the constitution of any  participating state, a state seeking participation in this Compact or
the United States, or the  applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or cir-
cumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of  competent jurisdiction, the validity
of the remainder of this Compact  and the applicability thereof to any other government,
agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, the  Commission may deny a state’s
participation in this Compact or, in  accordance with the requirements of section 10.B of this
Compact, terminate a participating state’s  participation in this Compact, if it determines
that a constitutional requirement of a  participating state is a material departure from this
Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution  of any
participating state, this Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the  remaining
participating states and in full force and effect as  to the participating state affected as to
all severable matters.
SECTION 13. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit  the enforcement of any other law of a partic-
ipating state that is not inconsistent with this Compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations or other legal requirements in a participating  state in
conflict with this Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the  Commission and the participating states are
binding in accordance with their terms.
SECTION 2. The Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon hereby ratifies the Dentist
and Dental Hygienist Compact set forth in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 676.177 is amended to read:
676.177. (1) Notwithstanding any  other provision of ORS 676.165 to 676.180 and except as pro-
vided in subsection (5) of this section, a health professional regulatory board, upon a determination
by the board that it possesses otherwise confidential information that reasonably  relates to the
regulatory or enforcement function  of another public entity, may disclose that information to the
other public entity.
(2) Any public entity that receives information pursuant to subsection (1) of this  section shall
agree to take  all reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of the information, except that the
public entity may use or disclose  the information to the extent necessary to carry out the regulatory
or enforcement functions of the public entity.
(3) For purposes of this section, “public entity” means:
[18]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A board or agency  of this state, or a board or agency of another state with regulatory or
enforcement functions similar to the  functions of a health professional regulatory board of this state;
(b) A district attorney;
(c) The Department of Justice;
(d) A state or  local public body of this state that licenses, franchises or provides emergency
medical services; or
(e) A law enforcement agency of this state, another state or the federal government.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section[ ,]:
(a) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may disclose information described in  subsection (1)
of this section to the Physical Therapy Compact Commission [ established] described in ORS 688.240.
(b) The Oregon Board of Dentistry may  disclose information described in subsection (1)
of this section to the Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact Commission described in  section
1 of this 2025 Act.
(5) A health professional  regulatory board may not disclose the information described in sub-
section (1) of this section to  another public entity if the information relates to the provision of or
referral for reproductive or gender-affirming health care services.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 679.025 is amended to read:
679.025. (1) A  person may not practice dentistry or purport to be a dentist without a valid li-
cense to practice dentistry issued by the Oregon Board of Dentistry.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Dentists licensed in another state  or country making a clinical presentation sponsored by a
bona fide  dental society or association or an accredited dental educational institution approved by
the board.
(b) Bona fide full-time students of dentistry who, during the period of their enrollment and as a
part of the course of study in  an Oregon accredited dental education program, engage in clinical
studies on the premises of such institution or in a clinical setting located off  the premises of the
institution if the facility, the instructional staff and the course  of study to be pursued at the off-
premises location meet minimum requirements prescribed by the rules of the board and  the clinical
study is performed under the indirect supervision of a member of the faculty.
(c) Bona  fide full-time students of dentistry who, during the period of their enrollment and as a
part of the course of study in a dental education program located outside of Oregon that is accred-
ited by the Commission  on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association or its successor
agency, engage in community-based or clinical studies as an elective or  required rotation in a clin-
ical setting located in Oregon  if the community-based or clinical studies meet minimum requirements
prescribed by the rules of the  board and are performed under the indirect supervision of a member
of the faculty of the Oregon Health and Science University School of Dentistry.
(d) Candidates who are  preparing for a licensure examination to practice dentistry and whose
application has been accepted by the board or its agent, if  the clinical preparation is conducted in
a clinic located on premises approved  for that purpose by the board and if the procedures are lim-
ited to examination only. This exception  shall exist for a period not to exceed two weeks imme-
diately prior to a regularly scheduled licensure examination.
(e) Dentists  practicing in the discharge of official duties as employees of the United States
Government and any of its agencies.
(f) Instructors  of dentistry, whether full- or part-time, while exclusively engaged in teaching ac-
tivities and while employed in accredited dental educational institutions.
[19]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) Dentists who are employed by public health agencies and who are  not engaged in the direct
delivery of clinical dental services to patients.
(h) Persons licensed to  practice medicine in the State of Oregon in the regular discharge of their
duties.
(i) Persons qualified to perform services relating to general anesthesia or sedation under  the
direct supervision of a licensed dentist.
(j)(A) Dentists licensed in another country and in  good standing, while practicing dentistry
without compensation for no more than  five consecutive days in any 12-month period, provided the
dentist submits an application to the board at least 10  days before practicing dentistry under this
subparagraph and the application is approved by the board.
(B) Dentists licensed in another state or United States territory and  practicing in this state
under ORS 676.347.
(k) Persons practicing dentistry upon themselves as the patient.
(L) Dental hygienists, dental  assistants or dental technicians performing services under the
supervision of a licensed dentist in accordance with the rules adopted by the board.
(m) A person licensed as a denturist under ORS 680.500 to 680.565 engaged in the  practice of
denture technology.
(n) An expanded  practice dental hygienist who renders services authorized by a permit issued
by the board pursuant to ORS 680.200.
(o) A person authorized under compact privilege as defined in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 679.260 is amended to read:
679.260. (1) The Oregon Board of Dentistry  Account is established in the State Treasury sepa-
rate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) All moneys received by the  Oregon Board of Dentistry under this chapter shall be paid to
the State Treasury and  credited to the [ Oregon Board of Dentistry ] account. Any interest or other
income derived from moneys paid into the account shall be credited monthly to the account.
(3) Moneys in the [ Oregon Board of  Dentistry ] account are appropriated continuously to the
board and shall be used only for the administration and enforcement of  ORS 676.850 and 680.010 to
680.205 and this chapter and for the purpose of meeting the financial  obligations imposed on
the State of Oregon as a result of this state’s participation in  the Dentist and Dental
Hygienist Compact described in section 1 of this 2025 Act .
(4) Ten percent of the annual license fee to be paid by each licensee of  the [ Oregon Board of
Dentistry] board shall be used by the board to ensure the continued professional competence  of
licensees. Such activities shall include the development of performance standards and  professional
peer review.
SECTION 6.  ORS 680.020 is amended to read:
680.020. (1) It is unlawful for any person not  otherwise authorized by law to practice dental
hygiene or purport to be a dental hygienist without a valid license to practice dental  hygiene issued
by the Oregon Board of Dentistry.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Dental hygienists licensed in another state making a clinical presentation sponsored by  a
bona fide dental or dental hygiene society or association or an  accredited dental or dental hygiene
education program approved by the board.
(b) Bona fide students of dental hygiene  who engage in clinical studies during the period of their
enrollment and as a part of the course of  study in an Oregon dental hygiene education program. The
[20]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
program must be accredited by the  Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental
Association, or its successor agency, and approved by the board. The clinical study  may be con-
ducted on the premises of the program or in a clinical  setting located off the premises. The facility,
the instructional staff and the course of study  at the off-premises location must meet minimum re-
quirements prescribed by  the rules of the board, and the clinical study at the off-premises location
must be performed under the indirect supervision of a member of the faculty.
(c) Bona fide students of dental hygiene  who engage in community-based or clinical studies as
an elective or required rotation in a clinical setting located in Oregon during  the period of their
enrollment and  as a part of the course of study in a dental hygiene education program located out-
side of Oregon. The program must be accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation  of the
American Dental Association or its successor agency. The community-based or  clinical studies must:
(A) Meet minimum requirements prescribed by the rules of the board; and
(B) Be performed under the  indirect supervision of a member of the faculty of the Oregon Health
and Science University School of Dentistry or another Oregon institution  with an accredited dental
hygiene education program approved by the board.
(d) Students  of dental hygiene or graduates of dental hygiene programs who engage in clinical
studies as part of a course of study or continuing education course offered by an institution with  a
dental or dental hygiene program. The  program must be accredited by the Commission on Dental
Accreditation of the American Dental Association or its successor agency.
(e) Candidates  who are preparing for licensure examination to practice dental hygiene and
whose application has been accepted by  the board or its agent, if the clinical preparation is con-
ducted in a clinic located on  premises approved for that purpose by the board and if the procedures
are limited to examination only.
(f) Dental  hygienists practicing in the discharge of official duties as employees of the United
States Government and any of its agencies.
(g) Instructors of dental hygiene, whether full- or part-time, while exclusively engaged in teach-
ing activities and while employed in accredited dental hygiene educational programs.
(h) Dental hygienists who are employed by public health agencies and who are not engaged in
direct delivery of clinical dental hygiene services to patients.
(i) Counselors and health assistants who have been trained in the application of fluoride
varnishes to the teeth of children and who apply fluoride varnishes only  to the teeth of children
enrolled in or receiving services from the Women, Infants and  Children Program, the Oregon
Prenatal to Kindergarten Program or a federal Head Start grant program.
(j) Persons acting in  accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Education under ORS
336.213 to provide dental screenings to students.
(k) Dental hygienists licensed in  another state or United States territory and practicing in this
state under ORS 676.347.
(L) Persons authorized under compact privilege as defined in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7.
(1) The amendments to ORS 676.177 by  section 3 of this 2025 Act apply to
information disclosed on or after the operative date specified in section 8 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 679.025 by section 4 of this 2025 Act apply to persons  au-
thorized to practice by compact privilege on or after the operative  date specified in section
8 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 679.260 by section 5 of this 2025 Act apply to moneys received
by the Oregon Board of Dentistry  on or after the operative date specified in section 8 of this
[21]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
2025 Act.
(4) The amendments to ORS 680.020 by section 6 of this 2025 Act apply to persons  au-
thorized by compact privilege on or after the operative date specified in section 8  of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 8.
(1) Sections 1 and 2 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 676.177,
679.025, 679.260 and 680.020 by sections 3 to 6 of this 2025  Act become operative on January
1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Board of Dentistry may take any action before the  operative date speci-
fied in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the board to exercise, on  and
after the operative date specified (1) of this section, all of  the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the board by sections 1 and 2 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS
676.177, 679.025, 679.260 and 680.020 by sections 3 to 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[22]