Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in  sections 3 and 5 of this 2025 Act, “consumer-owned utility” means
a people’s utility district organized under ORS chapter 261,  a municipal utility organized
under ORS chapter 225 or an electric cooperative organized under ORS chapter 62.
SECTION 2. (1) There is established within the Oregon Department of Emergency Man-
agement the Oregon Public Utility Homeland Security Commission.
(2) The commission shall consist of five members appointed by the Governor.
(3) The commission shall carry out the duties and functions described in section 3 of this
2025 Act.
(4) A majority of  the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(5) Official action by the commission requires the  approval of a majority of the members
of the commission.
(6) The commission shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The commission shall meet  at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson
or a majority of the members of the commission.
(9) The commission may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the commission.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Department of  Emergency Management shall make grants
from the Oregon Public Utility Homeland Security Fund established  under section 4 of this
2025 Act to consumer-owned utilities for the purposes of implementing  projects related to
natural disaster mitigation, prevention, response and recovery strategies, such as:
(a) The evaluation of facilities owned by consumer-owned utilities to determine  whether
the facilities meet state safety standards;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1658
HB 2909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The assessment of facilities owned by consumer-owned utilities to determine  capabil-
ities and vulnerabilities;
(c) The review of facility construction standards related to service reliability that  are
used by consumer-owned utilities;
(d) The establishment of resiliency measures;
(e) The  development of a prioritization schedule for restoring power to certain critical
infrastructure, such as hospitals, after a power outage; and
(f) The review of operations, planning and infrastructure protection processes.
(2) To receive a grant under this section, a consumer-owned utility shall submit  to the
Oregon Public Utility Homeland  Security Commission a proposal for a project described in
subsection (1) of this section. The proposal must  include a description of the proposed
project, an explanation of the need for the project, the estimated cost  of the project and the
estimated amount of grant moneys that the consumer-owned utility needs to  complete the
project.
(3) The commission shall prescribe the form and manner of making a proposal  under this
section.
(4) Upon receiving a proposal under this section,  the commission shall evaluate the pro-
posal to determine whether to recommend to the Oregon Department of Emergency Man-
agement the awarding of  a grant to the consumer-owned utility that submitted the proposal.
In evaluating a proposal, the commission shall consider:
(a) The need for the proposed project;
(b) The degree to which the project will enhance natural disaster mitigation, prevention,
response and recovery;
(c) The feasibility of a consumer-owned utility completing the project; and
(d) The feasibility of a consumer-owned utility completing the  project at the estimated
cost.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management shall  establish the
Oregon Public Utility Homeland  Security Fund. The fund is separate and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The Oregon Public Utility Homeland  Security Fund shall consist of moneys appropri-
ated by the Legislative Assembly  to the department for the purposes described in section 3
of this 2025 Act.
(3) Moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated to the department for the purposes
of:
(a) Making grants as described in section 3 of this 2025 Act; and
(b) Paying the administrative costs incurred under sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
(1) In addition to and not  in lieu of the budget authorization to issue lottery
bonds under ORS 286A.035, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, at the request of the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the
Oregon Department of Emergency  Management, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue
lottery bonds pursuant to ORS  286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $  in
net proceeds and interest earnings for the purposes described in  section 3 of this 2025 Act,
plus an additional amount estimated  by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-
related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under  this section and interest earnings in an
[2]
HB 2909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
amount sufficient to provide $
must be transferred to the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services to provide  a grant to the Oregon Department of Emergency Man-
agement. The department shall use the grant to fund projects  as described in section 3 of
this 2025 Act.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that  the use of lottery bond proceeds pursuant to this
section for the purposes of projects related  to natural disaster mitigation, prevention, re-
sponse and recovery  strategies for consumer-owned utilities creates jobs and furthers eco-
nomic development.
[3]