Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 650.005 to
650.100.
SECTION 2. (1) A franchisor may not in any manner  or by means of any unilateral
change to a franchise impose upon or collect from a franchisee  in this state a fee that the
franchisor did not disclose in the agreement  under which the franchisor and franchisee es-
tablished the franchise or in  the disclosure document a franchisor must provide to the
franchisee under 16 C.F.R. part 436, as in effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(2) A franchisor that violates the  provisions of subsection (1) of this section is liable to
the franchisee as provided in ORS 650.020 (3) for a violation of ORS 650.020 (1) and the Di-
rector of the  Department of Consumer and Business Services may issue an order to cease
and desist the violation as provided in ORS 650.055 (4).
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to franchises into which a franchisor and
franchisee enter or that a franchisor and franchisee renew on or after the  effective date of
this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 731