Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 317A.125 is amended to read:
317A.125. (1) The corporate activity tax imposed under ORS  317A.116 for each tax year shall
equal $250 plus the product of the taxpayer’s  taxable commercial activity in excess of [ $1 million ]
$10 million for the tax year multiplied by 0.57 percent.
(2) A tax is not owed under this section if the person’s  taxable commercial activity does not
exceed [ $1 million] $10 million.
SECTION 2.  ORS 317A.137 is amended to read:
317A.137. (1) For purposes of the corporate activity tax imposed under ORS 317A.116, every
person doing business in this state with commercial activity for the tax year in excess of  [ $1
million] $10 million shall file an annual return not later than the 15th day of  the fourth month fol-
lowing the end of the tax year. If the 15th day of the fourth month falls on  a Saturday, Sunday or
legal holiday, including any legal holiday in the District of Columbia, the return is due on the  next
business day following the Saturday, Sunday or  legal holiday. The return must be filed with the
Department of Revenue in a form prescribed by the department.
(2) The corporate activity tax imposed under ORS 317A.116 is due and  estimated tax payments
for the previous quarter are payable to  the department on or before the last day of the 4th, 7th and
10th months of the tax year and of the first month immediately following the end of the tax year.
(3) The department may by rule  extend the time for making any return. If the time for filing a
return is extended, interest  on any unpaid tax at the rate established under ORS 305.220 from the
time the return was originally required to be filed to the time of payment, shall be added and paid.
SECTION 3. The amendments  to ORS 317A.125 and 317A.137 by sections 1 and 2 of this
2025 Act apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 142
HB 2039
1
[2]