Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Grant Soil and Water Conservation District:
(1) Shall undertake,  or contract for, an independent, third-party scientific review of the
data, methodologies and analyses that relevant state and federal agencies rely on  to plan,
implement and evaluate riparian and fish restoration efforts in the John Day River Basin.
(2) Shall use  the review to inform and propose more effective riparian and fish restora-
tion efforts, if warranted.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General  Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, for distribution to the Grant Soil and Water
Conservation District, which may be expended for  the purposes described in section 1 of this
2023 Act and any associated overhead costs.
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3335