Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 90.323 is amended to read:
90.323. (1) If a tenancy is a week-to-week tenancy, the landlord may not increase the rent with-
out giving the tenant written notice at least seven days prior to the effective  date of the rent in-
crease.
(2) During any tenancy other than week-to-week, the landlord may not increase the rent:
(a) During the first year after the tenancy begins.
(b) At any time after the first year of the tenancy without giving  the tenant written notice at
least 90 days prior to the effective date of the rent increase.
(c) More than once in any 12-month period.
[(d) Except as permitted under subsection (5) of this section, by a  percentage greater than the
maximum calculated under ORS 90.324 (1). ]
(3) The notices required under this section must specify:
(a) The amount of the rent increase;
(b) The amount of the new rent;  and
[(c) Facts supporting the exemption authorized by subsection (5)  of this section, if the increase is
above the amount allowed in subsection (2)(d) of this section; and ]
[(d)] (c)  The date on which the increase becomes effective.
[(4) A landlord terminating a tenancy with a 30-day notice without cause as authorized  by ORS
90.427 (3) or (4) during the first year of a tenancy may not charge rent for the next tenancy in  an
amount greater than the maximum amount the landlord  could have charged the terminated tenancy
under this section. ]
[(5) A landlord is not subject to subsection (2)(d) or (4) of this section if: ]
[(a) The first certificate of occupancy for the dwelling unit was issued less than 15 years  from the
date of the notice of the rent increase; or ]
[(b) The dwelling unit is regulated or certified as affordable housing by a federal, state or local
government and the change in rent: ]
[(A) Does not increase the tenant’s portion of the rent; or ]
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2094
SB 496
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(B) Is required by program eligibility requirements or by a change in the tenant’s income. ]
[(6) A landlord that increases rent  in violation of subsection (2)(d) or (4) of this section is liable
to the tenant in an amount equal to three months’ rent plus actual damages suffered by the tenant. ]
[(7)] (4) This section does not apply to tenancies governed by ORS 90.505 to 90.850.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 90.600 is amended to read:
90.600. (1) If a rental agreement is a  month-to-month tenancy to which ORS 90.505 to 90.850
apply, the landlord may not increase the rent:
(a) Without giving each affected tenant notice in writing  at least 90 days prior to the effective
date of the rent increase[ ;].
(b) More than once in any 12-month period[ ; or ].
[(c) By a percentage greater than the maximum calculated under ORS 90.324 (1). ]
(2) The written notice required by subsection (1)(a) of this section must specify:
(a) The amount of the rent increase;
(b) The amount of the new rent;  and
[(c) Facts supporting the exemption authorized by subsection  (3) of this section, if the increase is
above the amount allowed in subsection (1)(c) of this section; and ]
[(d)] (c) The date on which the increase becomes effective.
[(3) A landlord is not subject to subsection (1)(c) of this section if: ]
[(a) The first certificate of occupancy for the dwelling unit was issued less than 15 years  from the
date of the notice of the rent increase; or ]
[(b) The dwelling unit is regulated or certified as affordable housing by a federal, state or local
government and the change in rent: ]
[(A) Does not increase the tenant’s portion of the rent; or ]
[(B) Is required by program eligibility requirements or by a change in the tenant’s income. ]
[(4) A landlord that increases rent in violation of subsection (1)(c) of this section shall  be liable to
the tenant in an amount equal to three months’ rent plus actual damages suffered by the tenant. ]
[(5)] (3) This section does not create a right to increase rent that does not otherwise exist.
[(6)] (4) This section does  not require a landlord to compromise, justify or reduce a rent increase
that the landlord otherwise is entitled to impose.
[(7)] (5) Neither ORS 90.510 (1), requiring a landlord to  provide a statement of policy, nor ORS
90.510 (4), requiring a  landlord to provide a written rental agreement, creates a basis for tenant
challenge of a rent increase, judicially or otherwise.
[(8)(a)] (6)(a)  The tenants who reside in a facility may elect one committee of seven  or fewer
members in a facility-wide election to represent  the tenants. One tenant of record for each rented
space may vote in the election. Upon written request from the tenants’ committee, the landlord  or
a representative of the landlord shall meet with the committee within 10 to 30  days of the request
to discuss the tenants’ nonrent concerns  regarding the facility. Unless the parties agree otherwise,
upon a request from the tenants’ committee, a landlord or representative of the landlord shall  meet
with the tenants’ committee at least once, but  not more than twice, each calendar year. The meeting
shall be held on the premises  if the facility has suitable meeting space for that purpose, or at a lo-
cation reasonably convenient to the tenants. After the meeting, the tenants’ committee  shall send
a written summary  of the issues and concerns addressed at the meeting to the landlord. The landlord
or the landlord’s representative shall make a good faith response in writing to  the committee’s
summary within 60 days.
(b) The tenants’ committee may  be entitled to informal dispute resolution under ORS 90.769 if
[2]
SB 496
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the landlord or landlord’s representative fails to meet with the tenants’ committee or fails to respond
in good faith to the written summary as required by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 90.323 and 90.600 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025
Act apply to rent increases for which notice is given on or after the effective date of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 4.
ORS 90.324 is repealed.
SECTION 5.  ORS 90.643 is amended to read:
90.643. (1) A manufactured dwelling park may be converted  to a planned community subdivision
of manufactured dwellings pursuant to ORS 92.830 to 92.845.  When a manufactured dwelling park is
converted pursuant to ORS 92.830 to 92.845:
(a) Conversion  does not require closure of the park pursuant to ORS 90.645 or termination of
any tenancy  on any space in the park or any lot in the planned community subdivision of manufac-
tured dwellings.
(b) After approval of the tentative plan  under ORS 92.830 to 92.845, the manufactured dwelling
park ceases to exist,  notwithstanding the possibility that four or more lots in the planned community
subdivision may be available for rent.
(2) If  a park is converted to a subdivision under ORS 92.830 to 92.845, and the landlord closes
the park as a result of the conversion, ORS 90.645 applies to the closure.
(3) If a park is  converted to a subdivision under ORS 92.830 to 92.845, but the landlord does not
close the park as a result of the conversion:
(a) A tenant who does not buy the space  occupied by the tenant’s manufactured dwelling may
terminate the tenancy and move. If the  tenant terminates the tenancy after receiving the notice
required by ORS 92.839 and  before the expiration of the 60-day period described in ORS 92.840 (2),
the landlord shall pay the tenant as provided in ORS 90.645 (1).
(b) If the landlord and the tenant continue the tenancy on the lot created in the planned com-
munity subdivision, the tenancy is governed by ORS 90.100 to 90.465, except that the following pro-
visions apply and, in the case of a conflict, control:
(A) ORS  90.510 (4) to (7) applies to a rental agreement and rules and regulations concerning the
use and occupancy of the subdivision lot until the declarant turns over administrative  control of the
planned community subdivision of manufactured dwellings to a homeowners association pursuant  to
ORS 94.600 and 94.604 to 94.621. The landlord shall provide each tenant with a copy of  the bylaws,
rules and regulations of the homeowners association at least 60 days before the  turnover meeting
described in ORS 94.609.
(B) ORS 90.530 applies regarding pets.
(C) ORS 90.545 applies regarding the extension of a fixed term tenancy.
(D) ORS 90.600 (1) to [ (7)] (5) applies to an increase in rent.
(E) ORS 90.620 applies to a termination by a tenant.
(F) ORS 90.630 applies to a termination by a landlord for  cause. However, the sale of a lot in
the planned community subdivision occupied by a tenant to someone other than the  tenant is a good
cause for termination under ORS 90.630 that the tenant cannot  cure or correct and for which the
landlord must give written notice of termination that states the cause of termination at  least 180
days before termination.
(G) ORS 90.632 applies to a termination of tenancy  by a landlord due to the physical condition
of the manufactured dwelling.
(H) ORS 90.634 applies to a lien for manufactured dwelling unit rent.
[3]
SB 496
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(I) ORS 90.680 applies to the sale  of a manufactured dwelling occupying a lot in the planned
community subdivision. If the intention of  the buyer of the manufactured dwelling is to leave the
dwelling on the lot, the landlord may reject the buyer as a tenant if the buyer does  not buy the lot
also.
(J) ORS 90.710 applies to a cause of action for a violation of ORS 90.510 (4) to (7), 90.630, 90.680
or 90.765.
(K) ORS 90.725 applies to landlord access to a rented lot in a planned community subdivision.
(L) ORS 90.730 (2), (3), (4) and (7) apply to the  duty of a landlord to maintain a rented lot in a
habitable condition.
(M) ORS 90.750 applies to the right of a tenant to assemble or canvass.
(N) ORS 90.755 applies to the right of a tenant to speak on  political issues and to post political
signs.
(O) ORS 90.765 applies to retaliatory conduct by a landlord.
(P) ORS 90.771 applies to the confidentiality of information  provided to the Housing and Com-
munity Services Department about disputes.
[4]