Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education for the Educator  Advancement Council, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,250,000, which shall
be used by the council, in partnership with  the department, to provide professional learning
opportunities related to the ethnic studies standards adopted by the department, with prior-
ity given to opportunities for school districts that have demonstrated a commitment to  im-
plementing the standards before implementation of the standards is required.
SECTION 2.
This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 137