Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Department of Agriculture shall  study the regulation of agricul-
ture. The department shall submit a report on  the study in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the  committees or interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later than September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3581