Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall conduct a study to
determine how best to connect public  higher education to the workforce and economic de-
velopment needs of this state. The  commission shall submit a report in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to higher education no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3573