Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “coordinated care organization” and “medical
assistance” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 414.025.
(2)(a) For inpatient psychiatric services provided by hospitals  to medical assistance re-
cipients who are committed to the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 426.130, the authority
shall establish fee-for-service reimbursement rates that are no less than the budgeted, per
diem rates for inpatient psychiatric rehabilitation provided by the Oregon State Hospital.
(b) The authority shall adjust  the rates established under this subsection to correspond
with any increases in the rates paid for individuals receiving inpatient psychiatric rehabili-
tation at the Oregon State Hospital.
(3)(a) For inpatient psychiatric services provided by hospitals  to medical assistance re-
cipients who are not committed to the authority under ORS 426.130, the  authority shall es-
tablish actuarially determined reimbursement rates, including  an additional payment rate for
services that are provided  to an individual for more than 30 days when a hospital is unable
to discharge the individual due to a lack of  bed capacity at the Oregon State Hospital, a se-
cure residential treatment home  or facility as described in ORS 443.465, a residential treat-
ment facility or residential treatment home as defined in  ORS 443.400, an adult foster home
as defined in ORS 443.705 or other community-based placement.
(b) The authority may reimburse a  hospital at an additional payment rate that is lower
than the rate established under this subsection only if the authority  has engaged with the
hospital and determined that the hospital has voluntarily  chosen not to discharge the pa-
tient.
(c) Every two years, the authority shall  conduct an actuarial review of the reimburse-
ment rates established under this subsection to  ensure that the rates are sufficient to cover
the costs to provide care.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1773
SB 140
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) A coordinated care organization shall reimburse hospitals for providing inpatient
psychiatric services at the rates established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section, “coordinated care organization” has the meaning
given that term in ORS 414.025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Maintain an inventory of the population of individuals in this state who are committed
to the authority under ORS 426.130.
(b) Prescribe  transparent criteria for placing individuals at, and determining priority
among individuals on the wait lists for,  the Oregon State Hospital or a secure residential
treatment home or facility as described in ORS 443.465.
(c) Require the Oregon State Hospital and any residential treatment facility or residential
treatment home  as defined in ORS 443.400 or adult foster home as defined in ORS 443.705
that serves individuals with mental illness to adopt electronic medical records and  eliminate
paper processes.
(d) Establish criteria for a universal interview process to be  used when placing an indi-
vidual who is discharging from an acute care setting to a community-based care setting, in-
cluding a requirement that all facilities accept  the results of the universal interview and do
not conduct a separate interview of the individual.
(3) The authority, in  collaboration with community mental health programs, shall develop
a comprehensive plan to meet the individualized needs of patients who  are committed to the
authority under ORS 426.130 and receiving care from a hospital, including a plan to:
(a) Clearly delineate accountability for the patient and a timeline for expected action;
(b) Require that trial visits, as described in ORS 426.273, are completed;
(c) Begin  discharge planning when the patient is admitted and share care plans with
counties and hospitals;
(d) Create an escalation process within the  authority if a patient is in the hospital for
30 or more days;
(e) Coordinate the patient’s care across the behavioral health system;
(f) Establish an intensive wraparound services team to  help stabilize the patient and es-
tablish wraparound services for patients who are transferred to settings other than the
Oregon State Hospital;
(g) Increase the availability of an ombudsman for patients; and
(h) Assign a case manager, from a  coordinated care organization if the patient is enrolled
in a coordinated care organization or from  a community mental health program if the pa-
tient is not enrolled in a  coordinated care organization, to coordinate placement for the pa-
tient in the community upon discharge.
(4)(a) When a patient committed to the authority  under ORS 426.130 is ready to be dis-
charged from a hospital, the authority shall develop a care plan in partnership  with the
hospital and:
(A) The patient’s coordinated care organization, if  the patient is enrolled in a coordinated
care organization; or
(B) A community  mental health program, if the patient is not enrolled in a coordinated
care organization.
(b) The care plan developed under this subsection shall assign the coordinated care  or-
ganization or community mental health program, as applicable, to be responsible for:
[2]
SB 140
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
(A) The  patient’s care coordination and transitions between acute care and community-
based settings, with consideration given to the patient’s acuity and level of care;
(B) Coordinating and reimbursing secure transport for the patient between facilities; and
(C) Ensuring that the discharge planning requirements for the patient are met.
SECTION 3.
Section 1  of this 2025 Act applies to contracts between a coordinated care
organization and the Oregon Health Authority entered  into, amended or renewed on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[3]