Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $5,750,000
to be distributed to Soul District  Business Association for the purpose of acquiring and re-
developing property as the AfroEats Community Cultural Hub in Portland.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4670