Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $1,800,000, which shall be distributed  to local area agencies
on aging and  disabilities or other local programs serving seniors or people with disabilities
to pay for preventive  and behavioral health programs and services that emphasize creative
and innovative community and facility approaches to behavioral health within the senior and
disability communities.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3457