Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, in consultation with the Department of Transporta-
tion, the  State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $  million in net  proceeds and interest earnings
for the purpose described in  subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to  this section must be transferred to
the Department of Transportation  for deposit in the Connect Oregon Fund established under
ORS 367.080 in an amount sufficient  to provide $  million for the department to fi-
nance grants for transportation projects as provided in ORS 367.080 to 367.086.
(3) Bond-related costs for the lottery  bonds authorized by this section must be paid from
the gross proceeds of the lottery bonds and from allocations for the purposes of ORS
286A.576 (1)(c).
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds that issuing lottery bonds to finance transportation
projects pursuant to this section is essential  to promoting the state’s economic development
and the use of lottery bond proceeds is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) There is an urgent need to improve and expand publicly owned and privately  owned
transportation infrastructure to support economic development in this state.
(b) A safe, efficient and reliable transportation network supports the  long-term economic
development and livability of this state.
(c) A multimodal network of air, bicycle, highway, marine, pedestrian, public  transit and
rail transportation moves people and goods efficiently.
(d) Local governments and private sector businesses often lack capital and the  technical
capacity to undertake multimodal transportation projects.
(e) Public financial assistance can stimulate industrial growth and  commercial enterprise
and promote employment opportunities in this state.
(f) Public investment in transportation infrastructure will create jobs and  further eco-
nomic development in this state.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 544
HB 2288
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
(g) The use  of lottery bond proceeds as provided in this section will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or protect parks, watersheds, fish  or wildlife
within Oregon, and issuance of lottery bonds for  the purpose described in this section is
therefore an appropriate use of state lottery funds under Article XV, section 4, of the Oregon
Constitution, and ORS 461.510.
SECTION 2. To the extent that proposed transportation  projects meet the qualifications
established by the Oregon Transportation  Commission by rule, the commission shall allocate
at least  10 percent of the net proceeds of the lottery bonds authorized by section 1 of this
2017 Act to each region described in this section. For purposes of this section, the regions
are as follows:
(1) Region one consists of Clackamas,  Hood River, Multnomah and Washington Counties.
(2) Region two consists of Benton, Clatsop, Columbia, Lane, Lincoln, Linn, Marion, Polk,
Tillamook and Yamhill Counties.
(3) Region three consists of Coos, Curry, Douglas, Jackson and Josephine Counties.
(4) Region four consists of Crook, Deschutes, Gilliam,  Jefferson, Klamath, Lake,
Sherman, Wasco and Wheeler Counties.
(5) Region five consists  of Baker, Grant, Harney, Malheur, Morrow, Umatilla, Union and
Wallowa Counties.
SECTION 3.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]