Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
On or before January 1, 2026, and notwithstanding ORS 197.626 or any  pro-
vision of ORS chapter 197A  or rule of the Land Conservation and Development Commission,
the commission shall issue an order:
(1) Approving the amendments  to the urban growth boundary by the City of Coos Bay
that were adopted by an ordinance of the city dated _____ and were submitted  to the com-
mission for review on _____; and
(2) Declaring the approved urban growth boundary to  be the acknowledged urban growth
boundary for the city.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3802