Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Disabled veteran” and  “veteran” have the meanings given those terms in ORS
408.225.
(b) “Institution  of higher education” means a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or
a community college, as defined in ORS 341.005.
(2) There is established in the Department  of Veterans’ Affairs the Oregon Educational
and Workforce  Development Bridge Loan Program. The purpose of the program is to conduct
outreach and provide forgivable loans to veterans and disabled veterans who:
(a) Are pursuing and  enrolled in an approved course of study, approved professional
training, approved workforce development program or  approved apprenticeship in, or in
connection with, any institution of higher education; and
(b) Are eligible to receive educational aid or other financial assistance under any federal
Act based upon prior service in the Armed Forces of the United States, and the  aid or as-
sistance has not yet commenced being paid, has been  delayed, has been suspended or is
otherwise temporarily unavailable.
(3) Loans under this section:
(a) Shall be made pursuant to a written contractual  agreement between the department
and the veteran or disabled  veteran that contains, at a minimum, the requirement that the
veteran or disabled veteran pay to the department the amount of  any loan made under this
section if the veteran or disabled veteran does not complete the  course of study, professional
training, workforce development program or apprenticeship for which the loan was made;
(b) May not be made for a term longer than 90 days;
(c) May not  be made to a veteran or disabled veteran if the veteran or disabled veteran
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1145
HB 2825
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
received a loan under this  section in the five-year period immediately preceding the veteran’s
or disabled veteran’s application for a loan;
(d) May not exceed $5,000 per veteran or disabled veteran;
(e) May be  made only when there are sufficient funds in the Oregon Educational and
Workforce Development Bridge Loan Program Fund established  under section 2 of this 2019
Act to make the loan; and
(f) May be forgiven by the department upon completion by the veteran or disabled vet-
eran of the course  of study, professional training, workforce development program or ap-
prenticeship for which the loan was made.
(4) The department shall adopt rules for the implementation and operation of the  pro-
gram, including but not limited to eligibility requirements for loan applicants.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Educational and Workforce Development Bridge Loan Pro-
gram Fund is established in the  State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General
Fund. All moneys in the Oregon Educational and Workforce Development Bridge Loan  Pro-
gram Fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs  for the
purpose of making loans under section 1 of this  2019 Act and for the payment of actual and
necessary expenses incurred by the  department in administering the fund and establishing
and maintaining the Oregon Educational and Workforce Development  Bridge Loan Program
pursuant to section 1 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The Oregon Educational and Workforce Development Bridge  Loan Program Fund
consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or transferred to the department by the  Legislative Assembly
for deposit in the fund;
(b) Proceeds from repayment of loans made pursuant to section 1 of this 2019 Act;
(c) Transfers of moneys to the fund, including  but not limited to moneys transferred
from the Veterans’ Educational Aid Account for the purposes of  implementing section 1 of
this 2019 Act; and
(d) Moneys from gifts, donations or any other source.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 408.090 is amended to read:
408.090. (1) The Director of  Veterans’ Affairs, acting on behalf of the State of Oregon, is au-
thorized to accept any donation, gift, grant, bequest or devise made in furtherance  of the purposes
of ORS  408.010 to 408.090  and section 1 of this 2019 Act [, and if ]. A donation, gift, grant, be-
quest or devise that is  made in cash or its equivalent or reduced thereto, shall be promptly  paid
by the director to the State Treasurer, who  shall credit the amount so received to the Veterans’
Educational Aid Account in the General  Fund. The director shall make such disposition of do-
nations, gifts, grants, bequests or devises, not made in cash or its equivalent,  as is specified by the
donor thereof, and their earnings and proceeds shall inure to said account. All such  donations, gifts,
grants, bequests or  devises accepted by the director are transfers exempt from taxes imposed on
inheritances under the laws of this state.
(2) All moneys in the Veterans’ Educational Aid Account are continuously appropriated to the
director and may be  used by the director for the purposes authorized in ORS 408.010 to 408.090  and
section 1 of this 2019 Act .
[2]