Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.205.
(b) “Short-term placement” means a child-caring  agency described in ORS 418.322 (3)(g),
(h) or (i) that provides short-term assessment and stabilization services.
(c) “Ward” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419A.004.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall establish a pilot  program for the placement
of children or wards in short-term placements consistent with this section.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 418.322 (4)(a) and  (5), a child or ward who has been placed by
the department in  a short-term placement may continue in the short-term placement for
more than 60 consecutive or 90 cumulative days in a 12-month period if:
(a) The short-term placement is  located in a county along the southern Oregon border
having a population of more than 80,000 and less than 200,000;
(b) Despite diligent efforts, the department has failed to identify an appropriate long-term
placement for the child or ward;
(c) The child or ward would be placed in another short-term placement if relocated;
(d) At  least once every 60 days, the department, in consultation with the short-term
placement, conducts an assessment of the child or ward as provided in  subsection (4) of this
section; and
(e) The assessment indicates that relocating the child  or ward to another short-term
placement is reasonably likely to jeopardize  any educational and social improvements the
child or ward has made since being placed with the short-term placement.
(4) The department shall by rule establish criteria  for the assessment under subsection
(3) of this section. At a minimum, the assessment must take into consideration:
(a) The strengths and needs of the child  or ward when initially placed in the short-term
placement;
(b) How the needs of the child or ward have been met while in the short-term  placement;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4215
HB 3402
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(c) The overall well-being of the child  or ward since placement in the short-term place-
ment;
(d) The social  and educational development of the child or ward since placement in the
short-term placement;
(e) Whether another  short-term placement would provide a more effective and appropri-
ate level of care for the child or ward; and
(f) Whether relocation of the child or ward to another short-term placement  would
jeopardize any improvements the child  or ward has made since placement in the short-term
placement.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act applies to children or  wards placed by the De-
partment of Human Services before, on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
[2]