Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SENTENCING MITIGATION FINDINGS
SECTION 1.
(1) At sentencing,  in determining mitigation the court shall consider
whether:
(a) The defendant was subjected to domestic abuse by a family or household member;
(b) The domestic abuse  was ongoing when the defendant’s criminal behavior occurred and
was a contributing factor to the criminal behavior; and
(c) Sentencing the defendant  to a presumptive or mandatory sentence would be unduly
harsh in light of the circumstances of the crime, the circumstances of the  defendant and the
domestic abuse the defendant suffered.
(2) If court finds that the three circumstances described in subsection (1)  of this section
have been established by the defendant by a preponderance of the  evidence, the finding shall
constitute substantial and compelling reasons justifying a downward dispositional  departure
or a downward durational departure under the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Com-
mission.
(3) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall adopt rules in  accordance with this
section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4122
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Domestic abuse”  means a pattern of behavior in a relationship by which one person
in the  relationship gains or maintains control over the other person, consisting of physical,
sexual, emotional, economic or psychological actions or threats of action that influence the
other person, including but not limited to  actions or threats of action that frighten, intim-
idate, terrorize, manipulate, hurt, humiliate, blame, injure or wound the other person.
(b) “Family or household member” means:
(A) Spouses.
(B) Former spouses.
(C) Adult persons related by blood or marriage.
(D) Persons cohabiting with each other.
(E) Persons who have cohabited with each other or who  have been involved in a sexually
intimate relationship.
(F) Unmarried parents of a minor child.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 137.635 is amended to read:
137.635. (1) When,  in the case of a felony described in subsection (2) of this section, a court
sentences a convicted defendant who  has previously been convicted of any felony designated in
subsection (2) of this section, the sentence shall  not be an indeterminate sentence to which the de-
fendant otherwise would be  subject under ORS 137.120, but, unless it imposes a death penalty under
ORS 163.105, the court shall impose a determinate sentence,  the length of which the court shall
determine, to the custody of the Department of  Corrections. Any mandatory minimum sentence
otherwise provided by law shall apply. The sentence shall not exceed the  maximum sentence other-
wise provided by law in such cases. The convicted defendant who is subject to this section shall not
be eligible for probation. The convicted defendant shall serve  the entire sentence imposed by the
court and shall not, during the service of such a sentence, be eligible for  parole or any form of
temporary leave from custody. The person shall not be eligible for any reduction  in sentence pur-
suant to ORS 421.120 or for any reduction in term of incarceration pursuant to ORS 421.121.
(2) Felonies to which subsection (1) of this section applies include and are limited to:
(a) Murder in any degree, as defined in ORS 163.107 or 163.115, and any aggravated form
thereof.
(b) Manslaughter in the first degree, as defined in ORS 163.118.
(c) Assault in the first degree, as defined in ORS 163.185.
(d) Kidnapping in the first degree, as defined in ORS 163.235.
(e) Rape in the first degree, as defined in ORS 163.375.
(f) Sodomy in the first degree, as defined in ORS 163.405.
(g) Unlawful sexual penetration in the first degree, as defined in ORS 163.411.
(h) Burglary in the first degree, as defined in ORS 164.225.
(i) Arson in the first degree, as defined in ORS 164.325.
(j) Robbery in the first degree, as defined in ORS 164.415.
(3) When the court imposes a sentence under this section, the court shall indicate in the  judg-
ment that the defendant is subject to this section.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision  of this section, when a person is convicted of one
of the offenses listed in subsection  (2) of this section and the court finds substantial and
compelling reasons justifying a lesser sentence under section 1 of this 2025 Act, the court  is
not obligated to impose the sentence described in subsection (1) of this section and  may in-
[2]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
stead impose any other sentence in accordance with  the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission. If the court imposes a sentence under this  subsection, unless the court orders
otherwise under ORS 137.750, the person is eligible  for a reduction in sentence under ORS
421.121 and any form  of temporary leave from custody, work release or program of condi-
tional or supervised release.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 137.690 is amended to read:
137.690. [a.] (1)  Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,  any person who is con-
victed of a major felony sex  crime, who has one [ (or more) ] or more  previous [ conviction of ] con-
victions for  a  major felony sex crime, shall be imprisoned for a mandatory minimum term of 25
years.
(2) When a person is  convicted as described in subsection (1) of this section and the court
finds substantial and compelling reasons justifying a lesser sentence under section 1 of this
2025 Act, the court is not obligated to impose the sentence described in subsection (1) of this
section and may instead impose any other sentence  in accordance with the rules of the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission. If  the court imposes a sentence under this subsection,
unless the  court orders otherwise under ORS 137.750, the person is eligible for a reduction
in sentence under ORS 421.121  and any form of temporary leave from custody, work release
or program of conditional or supervised release.
[b.] (3) As used in this section:
(a) “Major felony sex crime” means rape in the  first degree [ (ORS 163.375) ] under ORS
163.375, sodomy in the  first degree [ (ORS 163.405)] under ORS 163.405, unlawful sexual penetration
in the first degree [ (ORS 163.411),] under ORS 163.411  or using a child in a display of sexually ex-
plicit conduct [ (ORS 163.670)] under ORS 163.670.
[c.] (b)  “Previous conviction” includes a conviction for the statutory counterpart of a major
felony sex crime in any jurisdiction, and includes a conviction in the same  sentencing proceeding
if the conviction is for a separate criminal episode as defined in ORS 131.505.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 137.700 is amended to read:
137.700. (1)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 161.605, when a person is convicted of one of the  offenses
listed in  subsection (2)(a) of this section and the offense was committed on or after April 1, 1995,
or of one of the offenses listed in subsection (2)(b) of this section  and the offense was committed on
or after October 4, 1997, or  of the offense described in subsection (2)(c) of this section and the of-
fense was  committed on or after January 1, 2008, the court shall impose, and the person shall serve,
at least the entire term of imprisonment listed in subsection (2) of this  section. The person is not,
during the service of the term of imprisonment, eligible for release  on post-prison supervision or any
form of temporary leave from custody. The  person is not eligible for any reduction in[ , or based
on,] the minimum sentence for  any reason whatsoever under ORS 421.121 or any other statute. The
court may impose a  greater sentence if otherwise permitted by law, but may not impose a lower
sentence than the sentence specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding any other  provision of this section, when a person is convicted of
one of the offenses  listed in subsection (2) of this section and the court finds substantial and
compelling reasons justifying a lesser sentence under section 1 of this 2025 Act, the court  is
not obligated to sentence the defendant to the sentence  specified in subsection (2) of this
section and may instead impose any other sentence  in accordance with the rules of the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission. If the court imposes a sentence under  this paragraph,
unless the  court orders otherwise under ORS 137.750, the person is eligible for a reduction
[3]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in sentence under ORS 421.121  and any form of temporary leave from custody, work release
or program of conditional or supervised release.
(2) The offenses to which subsection (1) of this section applies and  the applicable mandatory
minimum sentences are:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(a)(A) Murder in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.115.......................300 months
(B) Murder in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.107 ..................360 months
(C) Attempt or conspiracy
to commit aggravated
murder, as defined
in ORS 163.095. .................120 months
(D) Attempt or conspiracy
to commit murder
in any degree. .....................90 months
(E) Manslaughter in the
first degree, as defined
in ORS 163.118. .................120 months
(F) Manslaughter in the
second degree, as defined
in ORS 163.125. ...................75 months
(G) Assault in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.185.........................90 months
(H) Assault in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.175.........................70 months
(I) Except as provided in
paragraph (b)(G) of
this subsection,
kidnapping in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.235. ...................90 months
(J) Kidnapping in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.225.........................70 months
(K) Rape in the first degree,
as defined in ORS 163.375
(1)(a), (c) or (d). .................100 months
(L) Rape in the second degree,
as defined in
[4]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 163.365.........................75 months
(M) Sodomy in the first degree,
as defined in ORS 163.405
(1)(a), (c) or (d). .................100 months
(N) Sodomy in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.395.........................75 months
(O) Unlawful sexual penetration
in the first degree, as
defined in ORS 163.411
(1)(a) or (c). ........................100 months
(P) Unlawful sexual penetration
in the second degree, as
defined in ORS 163.408. ....75 months
(Q) Sexual abuse in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.427.........................75 months
(R) Robbery in the first degree,
as defined in
ORS 164.415.........................90 months
(S) Robbery in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 164.405.........................70 months
(b)(A) Arson in the first degree,
as defined in ORS 164.325,
when the offense represented
a threat of serious
physical injury. ...................90 months
(B) Using a child in a display
of sexually explicit
conduct, as defined in
ORS 163.670.........................70 months
(C) Compelling prostitution,
as defined in
ORS 167.017.........................70 months
(D) Rape in the first degree,
as defined in
ORS 163.375 (1)(b). ...........300 months
(E) Sodomy in the first degree,
as defined in
ORS 163.405 (1)(b). ...........300 months
(F) Unlawful sexual penetration
in the first degree, as
defined in
ORS 163.411 (1)(b). ...........300 months
[5]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(G) Kidnapping in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.235, when the
offense is committed in
furtherance of the commission
or attempted commission of an
offense listed in subparagraph
(D), (E) or (F) of
this paragraph. ..................300 months
(c) Aggravated vehicular
homicide, as defined in
ORS 163.149.......................240 months
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 5.
 ORS 137.707 is amended to read:
137.707. (1)(a) When a  person waived under ORS 419C.349 (1)(a) is convicted of an offense listed
in subsection (4) of this section, the court  shall impose at least the presumptive term of
imprisonment provided for the offense in subsection (4) of this section. The court may impose  a
greater presumptive term if otherwise permitted by law, but may not impose a lesser term. The
person is not, during the service of the  term of imprisonment, eligible for release on post-prison
supervision or any form of temporary leave from custody. The person is not eligible for  any re-
duction in the minimum  sentence for any reason under ORS 421.121 or any other provision of law.
The person is eligible for a hearing and conditional release under ORS 420A.203 and 420A.206.
(b) Notwithstanding any other  provision of this section, when a person is convicted of
one of the offenses  listed in subsection (4) of this section and the court finds substantial and
compelling reasons justifying a lesser sentence under section 1 of this 2025 Act, the court  is
not obligated to sentence the defendant to the sentence  specified in subsection (4) of this
section and may instead impose any other sentence  in accordance with the rules of the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission. If the court imposes a sentence under  this paragraph,
unless the  court orders otherwise under ORS 137.750, the person is eligible for a reduction
in sentence under ORS 421.121  and any form of temporary leave from custody, work release
or program of conditional or supervised release.
(2) ORS 138.052, 163.105 and 163.150 apply to sentencing  a person prosecuted under this section
and convicted of aggravated murder  under ORS 163.095 except that a person who was under 18
years of  age at the time the offense was committed is not subject to a sentence of death or life
imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole.
(3) The court  shall commit the person to the legal and physical custody of the Department of
Corrections.
(4) The offenses to which this section applies and the presumptive sentences are:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(a)(A) Murder in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.115. ............................300 months
(B) Murder in the first
[6]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.107. .......................360 months
(C) Attempt or conspiracy
to commit aggravated
murder, as defined
in ORS 163.095. .......................120 months
(D) Attempt or conspiracy
to commit murder
in any degree. ............................90 months
(E) Manslaughter in the
first degree, as defined
in ORS 163.118. .......................120 months
(F) Manslaughter in the
second degree, as defined
in ORS 163.125. .........................75 months
(G) Assault in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.185. .........................90 months
(H) Assault in the second
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.175. .........................70 months
(I) Kidnapping in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.235. ..............................90 months
(J) Kidnapping in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.225. ..............................70 months
(K) Rape in the first degree,
as defined in ORS 163.375. ...100 months
(L) Rape in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.365. ..............................75 months
(M) Sodomy in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.405. ............................100 months
(N) Sodomy in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.395. ..............................75 months
(O) Unlawful sexual
penetration in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.411. .......................100 months
(P) Unlawful sexual
penetration in the
second degree, as
[7]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
defined in ORS 163.408. ..........75 months
(Q) Sexual abuse in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.427. ..............................75 months
(R) Robbery in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 164.415. ..............................90 months
(S) Robbery in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 164.405. ..............................70 months
(b)(A) Arson in the first degree,
as defined in ORS 164.325,
when the offense represented
a threat of serious
physical injury. .........................90 months
(B) Using a child in a display
of sexually explicit
conduct, as defined in
ORS 163.670. ..............................70 months
(C) Compelling prostitution,
as defined in ORS 167.017
(1)(a), (b) or (d). .........................70 months
(c) Aggravated vehicular
homicide, as defined in
ORS 163.149. ............................240 months
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(5) If  a person charged with an offense under this section is found guilty of a lesser included
offense and the lesser included offense is:
(a) An offense listed in subsection (4) of this section, the  court shall sentence the person as
provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(b) Not an offense listed in subsection (4) of this section:
(A) But constitutes an  offense for which waiver is authorized under ORS 419C.349 (1)(b), the
court, upon motion of the district attorney, shall hold  a hearing to determine whether to retain ju-
risdiction or to transfer the case to juvenile court for disposition. In determining whether to retain
jurisdiction,  the  court shall consider the criteria for waiver in ORS 419C.349. If the court retains
jurisdiction, the court shall sentence  the person as an adult under sentencing guidelines. If the court
does not retain jurisdiction, the court shall:
(i) Order that a presentence report be prepared;
(ii) Set forth in a  memorandum any observations and recommendations that the court deems
appropriate;
(iii) Enter  an order transferring the case to the juvenile court for disposition under ORS
419C.067 and 419C.411; and
(iv) Enter an order  providing that all court records of the case are subject to the same limita-
tions on inspection, copying and disclosure  of records, reports and materials as those set forth under
[8]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 419A.255.
(B) And is not an offense for which waiver is  authorized under ORS 419C.349 (1)(b), the court
may not sentence the person. The court shall:
(i) Order that a presentence report be prepared;
(ii) Set forth in a  memorandum any observations and recommendations that the court deems
appropriate;
(iii) Enter  an order transferring the case to the juvenile court for disposition under ORS
419C.067 and 419C.411; and
(iv) Enter an order  providing that all court records of the case are subject to the same limita-
tions on inspection, copying and disclosure  of records, reports and materials as those set forth under
ORS 419A.255.
(6) When a person is charged under this section, other offenses based on  the same act or
transaction shall be charged as separate counts in the same accusatory instrument and  consolidated
for trial, whether or not the other offenses are  aggravated murder or offenses listed in subsection
(4) of this section. If  it appears, upon motion, that the state or the person charged is prejudiced by
the joinder  and consolidation of offenses, the court may order an election or separate trials of
counts or provide whatever other relief justice requires.
(7)(a) If a person charged and tried as provided in subsection (6)  of this section is found guilty
of aggravated murder or an offense listed in subsection (4) of this section and  one or more other
offenses, the court shall impose the sentence  for aggravated murder or the offense listed in sub-
section (4) of this section as provided in subsections (1) and  (2) of this section and shall impose
sentences for the other offenses as otherwise provided by law.
(b) If a person charged and  tried as provided in subsection (6) of this section is not found guilty
of aggravated murder or an offense  listed in subsection (4) of this section, but is found guilty of one
of the other charges that constitutes an offense for which  waiver is authorized under ORS 419C.349
(1)(b), the court, upon motion  of the district attorney, shall hold a hearing to determine whether to
retain jurisdiction or to transfer the case to juvenile court for disposition. In determining whether
to retain jurisdiction, the  court shall consider the criteria for waiver in ORS 419C.349. If the court
retains jurisdiction, the court shall sentence  the person as an adult under sentencing guidelines. If
the court does not retain jurisdiction, the court shall:
(A) Order that a presentence report be prepared;
(B) Set forth in a memorandum any observations  and recommendations that the court deems
appropriate;
(C) Enter an order transferring the  case to the juvenile court for disposition under ORS
419C.067 and 419C.411; and
(D) Enter an order providing that all court records of the case are subject to the same limita-
tions on inspection, copying and disclosure  of records, reports and materials as those set forth under
ORS 419A.255.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 137.717 is amended to read:
137.717. (1) When a court sentences a person convicted of:
(a) Aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057, organized retail theft under ORS
164.098, burglary in the first degree under  ORS 164.225 or aggravated identity theft under ORS
165.803, the presumptive sentence is 24 months of incarceration, unless  the rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission prescribe a longer presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree under  ORS 164.057, organized
[9]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
retail theft under ORS 164.098, burglary in the first degree under ORS 164.225,  robbery in the third
degree under ORS 164.395, robbery in the second degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the first
degree under ORS 164.415 or aggravated identity theft under ORS 165.803;
(B) Two or more previous convictions for any combination of the crimes listed  in subsection (2)
of this section; or
(C) A previous conviction for a crime listed in subsection (2) of this  section, if the current crime
of conviction was committed while the defendant was on supervision for the  previous conviction or
less than three  years after the date the defendant completed the period of supervision for the pre-
vious conviction.
(b) Unauthorized use of a vehicle under ORS 164.135, mail theft or receipt  of stolen mail under
ORS 164.162, burglary in the  second degree under ORS 164.215, criminal mischief in the first degree
under ORS 164.365, computer crime under ORS 164.377, robbery  in the third degree under ORS
164.395, forgery in the first degree under ORS 165.013, criminal possession of a forged  instrument
in the first degree under ORS 165.022, fraudulent use of a credit card  under ORS 165.055 (4)(b),
possession of a stolen vehicle under  ORS 819.300 or trafficking in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310,
the presumptive sentence is 18 months of incarceration, unless the  rules of the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission prescribe a longer presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree under  ORS 164.057, organized
retail theft under ORS 164.098, unauthorized use of a  vehicle under ORS 164.135, burglary in the
first degree under ORS 164.225, robbery in the third degree under ORS  164.395, robbery in the sec-
ond degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the first degree under ORS 164.415, possession of  a stolen
vehicle under ORS 819.300, trafficking in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310  or aggravated identity
theft under ORS 165.803;
(B) Two or more previous convictions for any combination of the crimes listed  in subsection (2)
of this section; or
(C) A previous conviction for a crime listed in subsection (2) of this  section, if the current crime
of conviction was committed while the defendant was on supervision for the  previous conviction or
less than three  years after the date the defendant completed the period of supervision for the pre-
vious conviction.
(c) Theft in the first degree  under ORS 164.055 or identity theft under ORS 165.800, the
presumptive sentence is 13 months  of incarceration, unless the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission prescribe a longer presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree under  ORS 164.057, organized
retail theft under ORS 164.098, unauthorized use of a  vehicle under ORS 164.135, burglary in the
first degree under ORS 164.225,  robbery in the second degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the first
degree under ORS 164.415, possession of a stolen vehicle under ORS  819.300, trafficking in stolen
vehicles under ORS 819.310 or aggravated identity theft under ORS 165.803; or
(B) Four or more previous convictions for any combination of  crimes listed in subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) The crimes to which subsection (1) of this section applies are:
(a) Theft in the second degree under ORS 164.045;
(b) Theft in the first degree under ORS 164.055;
(c) Aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057;
(d) Organized retail theft under ORS 164.098;
(e) Unauthorized use of a vehicle under ORS 164.135;
[10]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) Mail theft or receipt of stolen mail under ORS 164.162;
(g) Burglary in the second degree under ORS 164.215;
(h) Burglary in the first degree under ORS 164.225;
(i) Criminal mischief in the second degree under ORS 164.354;
(j) Criminal mischief in the first degree under ORS 164.365;
(k) Computer crime under ORS 164.377;
(L) Forgery in the second degree under ORS 165.007;
(m) Forgery in the first degree under ORS 165.013;
(n) Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the second degree under ORS 165.017;
(o) Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the first degree under ORS 165.022;
(p) Fraudulent use of a credit card under ORS 165.055;
(q) Identity theft under ORS 165.800;
(r) Possession of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300;
(s) Trafficking in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310; and
(t) Any attempt to commit a crime listed in this subsection.
(3)(a) A  presumptive sentence described in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section shall be in-
creased by two months for each previous conviction the person has that:
(A) Was for any of the crimes listed in subsection (1) or (2) of this section; and
(B) Was not used as a predicate for the presumptive sentence described in subsection  (1)(a) or
(b) of this section.
(b) Previous convictions may not increase a presumptive sentence described in subsection (1)(a)
or (b) of this section by more than 12 months under this subsection.
(4) The court may impose a sentence other than the sentence provided by subsection (1) or  (3)
of this section if the court imposes:
(a) A longer term of incarceration that is otherwise required or authorized by law; or
(b) A  departure sentence authorized by the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
based upon findings of substantial and  compelling reasons. Unless the law or the rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission allow for imposition of a longer sentence, the maximum departure  al-
lowed for a person sentenced under this  subsection is double the presumptive sentence provided in
subsection (1) or (3) of this section.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4)(b) of this section, the  court may not sentence a person under
subsection (4) of this section to a term of incarceration that exceeds the period of  time described
in ORS 161.605.
(6) The court shall sentence a person under this section to at  least the presumptive sentence
described in subsection (1)(a) or (b) or (3)  of this section, unless the parties stipulate otherwise , the
court finds substantial and compelling  reasons justifying a downward departure under sec-
tion 1 of this 2025 Act,  or the court finds that:
(a) The person was not on probation, parole or post-prison supervision for a crime  listed in
subsection (1) of this section at the time of the commission of the current crime of conviction;
(b) The person has not  previously received a downward departure from a presumptive sentence
for a crime listed in subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The harm or loss caused by the crime is not greater than usual for that type of crime; and
(d) In consideration of the nature of the offense  and the harm to the victim, a downward de-
parture will:
(A) Increase public safety;
[11]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Enhance the likelihood that the person will be rehabilitated; and
(C) Not unduly reduce the appropriate punishment.
(7) When the court imposes a  sentence of probation for a conviction for theft in the first degree
or identity theft or under subsection (6) of  this section, the supervisory authority as defined in ORS
144.087 may require the person to  receive a high level of supervision for at least 12 months, and
may extend the period of high-level supervision for all or part of the remaining probationary term.
(8)(a) For a crime committed on or after November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered  to have
occurred upon the pronouncement of sentence in open court.  However, when sentences are imposed
for two or more convictions arising out of  the same conduct or criminal episode, none of the con-
victions is considered to have occurred prior to any of the other convictions arising out of  the same
conduct or criminal episode.
(b) For  a crime committed prior to November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered to have oc-
curred upon the pronouncement in open court of a sentence or upon the pronouncement in  open
court of the suspended imposition of a sentence.
(9) For purposes of this section, previous convictions must be proven pursuant to ORS 137.079.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) “Downward departure” means a downward dispositional departure or a  downward durational
departure under the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(b) “Previous conviction” includes:
(A) Convictions occurring before, on or after July 1, 2003; and
(B) Convictions entered in any other state or federal court for comparable offenses.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 137.717, as amended by  section 7, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, section 6,
chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017, and section 3, chapter 151, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
137.717. (1) When a court sentences a person convicted of:
(a) Aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057, organized retail theft under ORS
164.098, burglary in the first degree under ORS 164.225, robbery in the third degree under ORS
164.395 or aggravated identity theft under ORS 165.803, the presumptive sentence is 24 months of
incarceration, unless the rules of the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission prescribe a longer
presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree under  ORS 164.057, organized
retail theft under ORS 164.098, burglary in the first degree under ORS 164.225,  robbery in the third
degree under ORS 164.395, robbery in the second degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the first
degree under ORS 164.415 or aggravated identity theft under ORS 165.803;
(B) Two or more previous convictions for any combination of the crimes listed  in subsection (2)
of this section; or
(C) A previous conviction for a crime listed in subsection (2) of this  section, if the current crime
of conviction was committed  while the defendant was on supervision for the previous conviction or
less than three years after the date the defendant completed the period of supervision for  the pre-
vious conviction.
(b) Unauthorized use of a  vehicle under ORS 164.135, mail theft or receipt of stolen mail under
ORS 164.162, burglary in the  second degree under ORS 164.215, criminal mischief in the first degree
under ORS 164.365,  computer crime under ORS 164.377, forgery in the first degree under ORS
165.013, criminal possession of a forged instrument in the first degree under ORS  165.022, fraudulent
use of a  credit card under ORS 165.055 (4)(b), possession of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300 or
trafficking in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310, the presumptive sentence is  18 months of
[12]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
incarceration, unless the rules of the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission prescribe a longer
presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree under  ORS 164.057, organized
retail theft under ORS 164.098, unauthorized use of  a vehicle under ORS 164.135, burglary in the
first degree under ORS 164.225, robbery  in the third degree under ORS 164.395, robbery in the sec-
ond degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the first degree under ORS 164.415, possession of  a stolen
vehicle under ORS 819.300,  trafficking in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310 or aggravated identity
theft under ORS 165.803;
(B) Two or more previous convictions for any combination of the crimes listed  in subsection (2)
of this section; or
(C) A previous conviction for a crime listed in subsection (2) of this  section, if the current crime
of conviction was committed  while the defendant was on supervision for the previous conviction or
less than three years after the date the defendant completed the period of supervision for  the pre-
vious conviction.
(c) Theft in the first degree under ORS 164.055 or identity  theft under ORS 165.800, the
presumptive sentence is 13 months  of incarceration, unless the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission prescribe a longer presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree under  ORS 164.057, organized
retail theft under ORS 164.098, unauthorized use of  a vehicle under ORS 164.135, burglary in the
first degree under ORS 164.225,  robbery in the second degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the first
degree under ORS 164.415, possession  of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300, trafficking in stolen
vehicles under ORS 819.310 or aggravated identity theft under ORS 165.803; or
(B) Four or more previous convictions for  any combination of crimes listed in subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) The crimes to which subsection (1) of this section applies are:
(a) Theft in the second degree under ORS 164.045;
(b) Theft in the first degree under ORS 164.055;
(c) Aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057;
(d) Organized retail theft under ORS 164.098;
(e) Unauthorized use of a vehicle under ORS 164.135;
(f) Mail theft or receipt of stolen mail under ORS 164.162;
(g) Burglary in the second degree under ORS 164.215;
(h) Burglary in the first degree under ORS 164.225;
(i) Criminal mischief in the second degree under ORS 164.354;
(j) Criminal mischief in the first degree under ORS 164.365;
(k) Computer crime under ORS 164.377;
(L) Forgery in the second degree under ORS 165.007;
(m) Forgery in the first degree under ORS 165.013;
(n) Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the second degree under ORS 165.017;
(o) Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the first degree under ORS 165.022;
(p) Fraudulent use of a credit card under ORS 165.055;
(q) Identity theft under ORS 165.800;
(r) Possession of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300;
(s) Trafficking in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310; and
(t) Any attempt to commit a crime listed in this subsection.
[13]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3)(a) A  presumptive sentence described in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section shall be in-
creased by two months for each previous conviction the person has that:
(A) Was for any of the crimes listed in subsection (1) or (2) of this section; and
(B) Was not used as a predicate for the presumptive sentence described in subsection  (1)(a) or
(b) of this section.
(b) Previous convictions may not increase a presumptive sentence described in subsection (1)(a)
or (b) of this section by more than 12 months under this subsection.
(4) The court may impose a sentence other than the sentence provided by subsection (1) or  (3)
of this section if the court imposes:
(a) A longer term of incarceration that is otherwise required or authorized by law; or
(b) A  departure sentence authorized by the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
based upon findings of substantial and  compelling reasons. Unless the law or the rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission allow for imposition of a longer sentence, the maximum departure  al-
lowed for a person sentenced under this  subsection is double the presumptive sentence provided in
subsection (1) or (3) of this section.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4)(b) of this section, the  court may not sentence a person under
subsection (4) of this section to a term of incarceration that exceeds the period of  time described
in ORS 161.605.
(6) The court shall sentence a person under this section to at  least the presumptive sentence
described in subsection (1)(a) or (b) or (3)  of this section, unless the parties stipulate otherwise , the
court finds substantial and compelling  reasons justifying a downward departure under sec-
tion 1 of this 2025 Act,  or the court finds that:
(a) The person was not on probation, parole or post-prison supervision for a crime  listed in
subsection (1) of this section at the time of the commission of the current crime of conviction;
(b) The person has not  previously received a downward departure from a presumptive sentence
for a crime listed in subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The harm or loss caused by the crime is not greater than usual for that type of crime; and
(d) In consideration of the nature of the offense  and the harm to the victim, a downward de-
parture will:
(A) Increase public safety;
(B) Enhance the likelihood that the person will be rehabilitated; and
(C) Not unduly reduce the appropriate punishment.
(7) When the court imposes a  sentence of probation for a conviction for theft in the first degree
or identity theft or under subsection (6) of  this section, the supervisory authority as defined in ORS
144.087 may require the person to  receive a high level of supervision for at least 12 months, and
may extend the period of high-level supervision for all or part of the remaining probationary term.
(8)(a) For a crime committed on or after November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered  to have
occurred upon the pronouncement of sentence in open court.  However, when sentences are imposed
for two or more convictions arising out of  the same conduct or criminal episode, none of the con-
victions is considered to have occurred prior to any of the other convictions arising out of  the same
conduct or criminal episode.
(b) For  a crime committed prior to November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered to have oc-
curred upon the pronouncement in open court of a sentence or upon the pronouncement in  open
court of the suspended imposition of a sentence.
(9) For purposes of this section, previous convictions must be proven pursuant to ORS 137.079.
[14]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(10) As used in this section:
(a) “Downward departure” means a downward dispositional departure or a  downward durational
departure under the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(b) “Previous conviction” includes:
(A) Convictions occurring before, on or after July 1, 2003; and
(B) Convictions entered in any other state or federal court for comparable offenses.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 163.107 is amended to read:
163.107. (1) “Murder in the  first degree” means murder in the second degree as defined in ORS
163.115 which is committed under, or accompanied by, any of the following circumstances:
(a) The defendant  committed the murder pursuant to an agreement that the defendant receive
money or other thing of value for committing the murder.
(b) The defendant solicited another to commit the murder and paid or agreed to pay  the person
money or other thing of value for committing the murder.
(c) The defendant committed murder after having been convicted previously in  any jurisdiction
of any homicide, the elements of which constitute the crime of aggravated  murder as defined in ORS
163.095, murder in the first degree  under this section, murder in the second degree as defined in
ORS 163.115 or manslaughter in the first degree as defined in ORS 163.118.
(d) There was more than one  murder victim in the same criminal episode as defined in ORS
131.505.
(e) The homicide occurred in the course of or as a  result of intentional maiming or torture of
the victim.
(f) The victim of the intentional homicide was a person under the age of 14 years.
(g) The  victim was one of the following and the murder was related to the performance of the
victim’s official duties in the justice system:
(A) A police officer as defined in ORS 181A.355;
(B) A correctional, parole and probation officer or  other person charged with the duty of cus-
tody, control or supervision of convicted persons;
(C) A member of the Oregon State Police;
(D) A judicial officer as defined in ORS 1.210;
(E) A juror or witness in a criminal proceeding;
(F) An employee or officer of a court of justice;
(G) A member of the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision; or
(H) A regulatory specialist.
(h) The  defendant was confined in a state, county or municipal penal or correctional facility or
was otherwise in custody when the murder occurred.
(i) The defendant committed murder by means of an explosive as defined in ORS 164.055.
(j) Notwithstanding ORS 163.115 (1)(b), the defendant personally and intentionally  committed the
homicide under the circumstances set forth in ORS 163.115 (1)(b).
(k) The murder was committed in an effort to conceal the commission of a crime, or to  conceal
the identity of the perpetrator of a crime.
(L) The murder was  committed after the defendant had escaped from a state, county or munici-
pal penal or correctional facility and before the defendant  had been returned to the custody of the
facility.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 163.155 and [ paragraph (b) ] paragraphs (b) and (c)
of this  subsection, the court shall sentence a person convicted of murder in the first degree, who
[15]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
was at least 15 years of age at the  time of committing the murder, to life imprisonment. The court
shall order that the defendant be  confined for a minimum of 30 years without possibility of parole
or release to post-prison supervision except as provided in ORS 144.397, and without the  possibility
of release on  work release or any form of temporary leave or employment at a forest or work camp.
(b) The court may sentence the person to life imprisonment without the possibility of parole if
the person was at least 18 years of age at the time of committing  the murder. The court shall state
on the record the reasons for imposing the sentence. A person sentenced to life imprisonment
without the possibility of release or  parole under this paragraph shall not have that sentence sus-
pended, deferred or  commuted by any judicial officer, and the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison
Supervision may not parole the prisoner nor reduce the period of confinement in any manner what-
soever. The Department of Corrections or any executive official may not permit the prisoner  to
participate in any sort of release or furlough program.
(c) If the court finds substantial  and compelling reasons justifying a lesser sentence un-
der section 1 of this  2025 Act, the court is not obligated to sentence the defendant to the
sentence specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection  and may instead impose any
other sentence in accordance with the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(3)(a) For a person sentenced to life  imprisonment, at any time after completion of the minimum
period of confinement described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the State Board of  Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision, upon the petition of a prisoner so confined,  shall hold a hearing to deter-
mine if the prisoner is likely to be rehabilitated within a reasonable period of  time. The sole issue
is whether the prisoner is likely  to be rehabilitated within a reasonable period of time. At the
hearing the prisoner has:
(A) The burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence the  likelihood of rehabilitation
within a reasonable period of time;
(B) The right, if the prisoner is without  sufficient funds to employ an attorney, to be represented
by legal counsel, appointed by the board, at board expense; and
(C) The right to a subpoena upon a showing of  the general relevance and reasonable scope of
the evidence sought, provided that any subpoena issued on behalf of the prisoner  must be issued by
the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision pursuant to rules adopted by the board.
(b) If, upon hearing all of the evidence, the board,  upon a unanimous vote of three board mem-
bers or, if the chairperson requires all voting members to  participate, a unanimous vote of all voting
members, finds  that the prisoner is capable of rehabilitation and that the terms of the prisoner’s
confinement should be changed to life imprisonment with  the possibility of parole, release to post-
prison supervision or work  release, it shall enter an order to that effect and the order shall convert
the terms of the prisoner’s confinement to  life imprisonment with the possibility of parole, release
to post-prison supervision or work release and may set a release date. Otherwise, the board shall
deny the relief sought in the petition.
(c) If the board denies the relief sought in the petition, the  board shall determine the date of the
subsequent hearing, and  the prisoner may petition for an interim hearing, in accordance with ORS
144.285.
(d) The board’s final order shall be accompanied by findings of  fact and conclusions of law. The
findings of fact shall consist of a concise statement of the underlying facts supporting the findings
as to each contested issue of fact and as to each ultimate fact required  to support the board’s order.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 163.115 is amended to read:
163.115. (1) Except as provided in ORS 163.095, 163.118  and 163.125, criminal homicide consti-
[16]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tutes murder in the second degree:
(a) When it is committed intentionally, except that it is an affirmative defense that, at the time
of the homicide, the defendant was under the influence of an extreme emotional disturbance;
(b) When it is committed by a person, acting either alone or with one or more  persons, who
commits or attempts to commit any of the following crimes and in the course of and in furtherance
of the crime the person is committing or attempting to commit, or during  the immediate flight
therefrom, the person, or another participant if there be any, causes  the death of a person other
than one of the participants:
(A) Arson in the first degree as defined in ORS 164.325;
(B) Criminal mischief in the first degree by means of an explosive as defined in ORS 164.365;
(C) Burglary in the first degree as defined in ORS 164.225;
(D) Escape in the first degree as defined in ORS 162.165;
(E) Kidnapping in the second degree as defined in ORS 163.225;
(F) Kidnapping in the first degree as defined in ORS 163.235;
(G) Robbery in the first degree as defined in ORS 164.415;
(H) Any felony sexual offense in the first degree defined in this chapter;
(I) Compelling prostitution as defined in ORS 167.017; or
(J) Assault in the first degree, as defined in ORS 163.185, and the victim  is under 14 years of
age, or assault in the second degree, as defined in ORS  163.175 (1)(a) or (b), and the victim is under
14 years of age; or
(c) By abuse when a person,  recklessly under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to
the value of human life, causes the death of a child under  14 years of age or a dependent person,
as defined in ORS 163.205, and:
(A) The person has previously engaged in a pattern or practice of assault or torture of the vic-
tim or another child under 14 years of age or a dependent person; or
(B) The person causes the death by neglect or maltreatment.
(2) An accusatory instrument alleging murder by  abuse under subsection (1)(c) of this section
need not allege specific incidents of assault or torture.
(3) It is an affirmative defense to a charge of violating subsection (1)(b) of this section  that the
defendant:
(a) Was not the only participant in the underlying crime;
(b) Did not commit the homicidal act or in any  way solicit, request, command, importune, cause
or aid in the commission thereof;
(c) Was not armed with a dangerous or deadly weapon;
(d) Had no reasonable ground to believe that any other participant was armed with a dangerous
or deadly weapon; and
(e) Had no reasonable  ground to believe that any other participant intended to engage in con-
duct likely to result in death.
(4) It is an affirmative defense to a charge of violating subsection (1)(c)(B)  of this section that
the victim  was a dependent person who was at least 18 years of age and was under care or treat-
ment solely by spiritual means pursuant to the religious beliefs or practices of the  dependent person
or the guardian of the dependent person.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 144.397 and 163.155 and subsection (6) of this
section:
(a) A person convicted of murder in the second degree, who was at least 15 years  of age at the
[17]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
time of committing the murder, shall be punished by imprisonment for life.
(b) When a  defendant is convicted of murder in the second degree under this section, the court
shall order that the defendant shall  be confined for a minimum of 25 years without possibility of
parole, release to post-prison supervision, release on work  release or any form of temporary leave
or employment at a forest or work camp.
(c) At any time after completion of a minimum period of confinement pursuant to paragraph (b)
of this subsection, the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision,  upon the petition of a
prisoner so confined, shall hold a  hearing to determine if the prisoner is likely to be rehabilitated
within a reasonable period of time. The sole issue  is whether the prisoner is likely to be rehabili-
tated within a reasonable period of time. At the hearing the prisoner has:
(A) The burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence the  likelihood of rehabilitation
within a reasonable period of time;
(B) The right, if the prisoner is without  sufficient funds to employ an attorney, to be represented
by legal counsel, appointed by the board, at board expense; and
(C) The right to a subpoena upon a showing of  the general relevance and reasonable scope of
the evidence sought, provided that any subpoena issued on behalf of the prisoner  must be issued by
the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision pursuant to rules adopted by the board.
(d) If, upon hearing all of the evidence, the board,  upon a unanimous vote of three board mem-
bers or, if the chairperson requires all voting members to  participate, a unanimous vote of all voting
members, finds  that the prisoner is capable of rehabilitation and that the terms of the prisoner’s
confinement should be changed to life imprisonment with  the possibility of parole, release to post-
prison supervision or work  release, it shall enter an order to that effect and the order shall convert
the terms of the prisoner’s confinement to  life imprisonment with the possibility of parole, release
to post-prison supervision or work release and may set a release date. Otherwise, the board shall
deny the relief sought in the petition.
(e) If the board denies the relief sought in the petition, the  board shall determine the date of the
subsequent hearing, and  the prisoner may petition for an interim hearing, in accordance with ORS
144.285.
(f) The  board’s final order shall be accompanied by findings of fact and conclusions of law. The
findings of fact shall consist of a concise statement of the underlying facts supporting the findings
as to each contested issue of fact and as to each ultimate fact required  to support the board’s order.
(6) If the court finds substantial and  compelling reasons justifying a lesser sentence un-
der section 1 of this  2025 Act, the court is not obligated to sentence the defendant to the
sentence specified in subsection (5) of this section and may  instead impose any other sen-
tence in accordance with the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
[(6)] (7) As used in this section:
(a) “Assault” means the intentional, knowing or reckless causation of physical injury to another
person. “Assault” does not include the causation of  physical injury in a motor vehicle accident that
occurs by reason of the reckless conduct of a defendant.
(b) “Neglect or maltreatment” means a violation of ORS 163.535, 163.545 or 163.547 or a  failure
to provide adequate food, clothing, shelter  or medical care that is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of a  child under 14 years of age or a dependent person. This paragraph is not intended to
replace or affect the duty or standard of care required under ORS chapter 677.
(c) “Pattern or practice” means one or more previous episodes.
(d) “Torture” means the intentional infliction of intense physical pain upon  an unwilling victim
[18]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
as a separate objective apart from any other purpose.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 163.155 is amended to read:
163.155. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,  when a defendant,  who was
at least 15 years of age at the time of  committing the murder, is convicted of murdering a pregnant
victim under ORS 163.115 (1)(a) and the defendant knew that the victim was  pregnant, the defendant
shall be sentenced to life imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole if the  person was
at least  18 years of age at the time of committing the offense or to life imprisonment. The court shall
conduct a sentencing proceeding to  determine whether the defendant shall be sentenced to life
imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole as  described in subsection [ (4)] (5)  of this
section , sentenced  [ or] to  life imprisonment as described in subsection [ (5)] (6)  of this section  or
sentenced under subsection (3) of this section . If the defendant waives all rights to  a jury sen-
tencing proceeding, the court  shall conduct the sentencing proceeding as the trier of fact. The pro-
cedure for the sentencing proceeding, whether before a court or a jury, shall follow the procedure
of ORS 163.150 (1)(a), as modified by this section.
(2) Following the presentation of evidence and argument under subsection  (1) of this section, the
court shall instruct the jury that the trial  court shall sentence the defendant to life imprisonment
without the possibility of release or  parole as described in subsection [ (4)] (5) of this section, unless
the court sentences the person under subsection (3) of this section, or unless,  after  consider-
ing all of the evidence submitted, 10 or more members  of the jury find there are sufficient mitigating
circumstances to warrant life imprisonment with the possibility of release or parole as described  in
subsection [ (5)] (6) of  this section. If 10 or more members of the jury do not find there are sufficient
mitigating circumstances to warrant life imprisonment with  the possibility of release or parole, the
trial court shall sentence  the defendant to life imprisonment without the possibility of release or
parole as described  in subsection [ (4)] (5) of this section , unless the court sentences the defend-
ant under subsection (3) of this section . If 10 or more members of the  jury find there are suffi-
cient mitigating circumstances to warrant life imprisonment  with the possibility of release or parole,
the trial court  shall sentence the defendant to life imprisonment as described in subsection [ (5)] (6)
of this section , unless the court sentences the defendant under subsection (3) of this section .
(3) Notwithstanding any jury finding  under subsection (2) of this section, if the court
finds substantial and compelling reasons justifying a lesser sentence under section 1 of this
2025 Act, the court is not obligated to sentence the  defendant to a sentence otherwise re-
quired by this section, and may instead impose any other sentence  in accordance with the
rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
[(3)] (4)  Nothing in this section precludes the court from sentencing the defendant  to life
imprisonment, as described in subsection [ (5)] (6)  of this section, or life imprisonment without the
possibility of release or parole, as described  in subsection [ (4)] (5)  of this section, pursuant to a
stipulation of  sentence or stipulation of sentencing facts agreed to and offered by both parties if the
defendant waives all rights to a jury sentencing proceeding.
[(4)] (5)  A sentence of life imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole under  this
section may not be suspended, deferred or  commuted by any judicial officer, and the State Board
of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision may neither parole the  prisoner nor reduce the period of
confinement in any manner whatsoever. The Department of  Corrections or any executive official
may not permit the prisoner to participate in any sort of release or furlough program.
[(5)] (6)  If the  defendant is sentenced to life imprisonment, the court shall order that the de-
fendant be  confined for a minimum of 30 years without possibility of parole or release to post-prison
[19]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
supervision except as provided  in ORS 144.397, and without the possibility of release on work re-
lease or any form of temporary leave or employment at a forest or work camp.
[(6)] (7)  At any time after completion  of the minimum period of confinement pursuant to sub-
section [ (5)] (6)  of this section, the board, upon the petition of a prisoner so confined, shall hold a
hearing to determine if the prisoner is likely to be rehabilitated within a  reasonable period of time.
The sole issue shall be whether the prisoner is likely  to be rehabilitated within a reasonable period
of time. The proceeding shall be conducted in  the manner prescribed for a contested case hearing
under ORS chapter 183, except that:
(a) The prisoner has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence the  likelihood
of rehabilitation within a reasonable period of time;
(b) The prisoner has the right, if the prisoner is without sufficient funds to  employ an attorney,
to be represented by legal counsel, appointed by the board, at board expense; and
(c) The prisoner has the right to a subpoena  upon a showing of the general relevance and rea-
sonable scope of the  evidence sought, provided that any subpoena issued on behalf of the prisoner
must be issued by the board pursuant to rules adopted by the board.
[(7)] (8)  If, upon hearing all of the evidence, the board,  upon a unanimous vote of three board
members or, if the chairperson requires all voting members to participate, a unanimous vote of all
voting members, finds that the prisoner is capable of rehabilitation and  that the terms of the
prisoner’s confinement should  be changed to life imprisonment with the possibility of parole, release
on post-prison supervision or work release, it shall enter an order  to that effect and the order shall
convert  the  terms of the prisoner’s confinement to life imprisonment with the possibility of parole,
release on post-prison supervision or work release and may set a release date. Otherwise  the board
shall deny the relief sought in the petition.
[(8)] (9)  Not less than two years after the  denial of the relief sought in a petition under this
section, the prisoner may petition again for a change in  the terms of confinement. Further petitions
for a change may be filed at intervals of not less than two years thereafter.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 475.930 is amended to read:
475.930. (1) Except as  provided in subsection (3) of this section,  when a court sentences a
person under ORS 164.061, 475.907, 475.924 [ and] or  475.925:
(a) The court shall use the criminal  history scale of the sentencing guidelines grid of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission to determine the sentence to impose. The sentence described in:
(A) ORS 475.925 (1) shall be determined utilizing crime category  10 of the sentencing guidelines
grid.
(B) ORS 475.907 (1) and 475.925 (2) shall be  determined utilizing crime category 9 of the sen-
tencing guidelines grid.
(C) ORS 164.061 shall be determined utilizing crime category 8 of the  sentencing guidelines grid.
(b)(A) Notwithstanding ORS 161.605, the court shall impose the sentence described  in ORS
164.061, 475.907, 475.924 [ and] or  475.925 and may not impose a sentence of optional probation or
grant a downward dispositional departure or a downward durational departure under  the rules of
the commission.
(B) The court may impose a sentence other than the sentence described in ORS  164.061, 475.907,
475.924 [and] or  475.925 if the court imposes a longer  term of incarceration that is otherwise re-
quired or authorized by law.
(2) A person sentenced  under ORS 164.061, 475.907, 475.924 [ and] or  475.925 may not receive a
reduction in the term of incarceration for appropriate institutional behavior that exceeds  20 percent
[20]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the sentence imposed.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 164.061, 475.907,  475.924 and 475.925, when a court sentences a
person under ORS 164.061, 475.907, 475.924 or 475.925 and  the court finds substantial and
compelling reasons justifying a lesser sentence under section 1 of this 2025 Act, the court  is
not obligated to sentence the person to the sentence specified in ORS 164.061, 475.907, 475.924
or 475.925 and may instead impose any  other sentence in accordance with the rules of the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
PROCEDURE FOR PERSONS PREVIOUSLY SENTENCED
SECTION 12.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, a  person serving a
sentence of imprisonment after conviction of a felony is eligible to be resentenced under this
section if:
(a) The person was sentenced to, and is currently serving, a term of  imprisonment for
the felony conviction;
(b) The person was subjected to domestic abuse by a family or household member;
(c) The domestic abuse was ongoing  when the person’s criminal behavior occurred and
was a contributing factor to the criminal behavior; and
(d) The sentence the person received was unduly harsh in light of  the circumstances of
the crime,  the circumstances of the person, the domestic abuse the person suffered and the
likely sentence the person would receive if the person were sentenced under current law.
(2)(a) A person described in subsection (1) of this section may  file a petition for a hearing
to determine whether the  person should be resentenced in the circuit court in which the
person was originally convicted and sentenced.
(b) The petition shall include:
(A) The case number and  specific counts for which the person is requesting resentencing;
and
(B) A  factual statement explaining how the person meets the eligibility requirements
described in subsection (1) of this section.
(c) The petition may be accompanied by supporting documents.
(d) Facts within the petition that are within the personal knowledge of the petitioner, and
the authenticity of all documents accompanying the  petition, must be sworn to affirmatively
by the petitioner as true and correct.
(3)(a) Upon filing the petition, the person shall serve a copy  of the petition on the district
attorney.
(b) Upon receipt of the petition, the district attorney shall make  reasonable efforts to
inform the victim:
(A) That the person has petitioned the court for a resentencing;
(B) Of the victim’s rights implicated by the resentencing; and
(C) That the victim has the right to appear at the resentencing and be heard.
(4)(a) Upon receiving the petition, the  sentencing court shall determine whether the facts
stated in the petition are sufficient to support a finding that the person  meets the eligibility
requirements described in subsection (1) of this section. When making this  determination,
the court shall assume that the facts stated in  the petition are uncontested and established
in court by a preponderance of evidence.  If the court determines that the facts stated in the
[21]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
petition are sufficient, the court shall grant the petition.  If the court determines that the
facts stated in the petition are  insufficient, the court shall enter an order denying the peti-
tion and shall cause a copy of the order to be provided to the person.
(b) If a petition is denied, upon the request of the person, the court shall appoint counsel
for the person for the purpose of assisting the  person in preparing an amended petition.
Pursuant to ORS 151.216 and 151.219, the Public  Defense Services Commission shall provide
for the representation of a person for whom counsel is appointed under this paragraph.
(c) Upon granting a petition, including an amended petition, the court  shall set a resen-
tencing hearing, and shall hold the hearing within 60 days of the  date the petition was
granted unless the court finds good cause to hold a hearing  at a later date. If counsel was
appointed under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the appointed  counsel shall continue to
represent the petitioner for the hearing.
(d) The court shall issue an order granting  or denying a petition with 30 days of the date
the petition is filed. If the court does  not issue an order as described in this paragraph, the
petition shall be deemed granted.
(e) If, upon review of an amended petition, the court determines that the facts stated in
the petition are insufficient to support a finding that  the person meets the eligibility re-
quirements described in subsection  (1) of this section, the court shall issue a final order de-
nying the  petition. The person may not file another petition upon issuance of a final order
described in this paragraph except as described in subsection (8) of this section.
(f) An order granting or denying a petition under this subsection is not appealable.
(5)(a) When the court sets a  resentencing hearing under subsection (4) of this section,
the court shall  appoint counsel for the person, if counsel has not previously been appointed
or hired for the current petition, and notify the person, the person’s counsel,  the Depart-
ment of Corrections and the district attorney of the hearing  date. Upon receipt of the notice,
the district attorney shall make reasonable efforts to inform the victim of:
(A) The hearing date; and
(B) The victim’s rights implicated in the resentencing hearing.
(b) Pursuant to ORS 151.216 and 151.219,  the Public Defense Services Commission shall
provide for the representation of a person for whom counsel  is appointed under this sub-
section.
(6)(a) At the hearing, the  person has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the
evidence that:
(A) The person was subjected to domestic abuse by a family or household member;
(B) The domestic abuse was ongoing when the person’s criminal behavior  occurred and
was a contributing factor to the criminal behavior; and
(C) The sentence the person received is unduly harsh in light of the  circumstances of the
crime, the circumstances of the person, the domestic abuse the person suffered and the
likely sentence the person would receive if the person were sentenced under current law.
(b) The district attorney may introduce evidence at the hearing.
(c) Upon the conclusion of the hearing, if the court  finds that the person has met the
burden of proof,  the court shall find that there exists substantial and compelling reasons
justifying a downward durational departure or  a downward dispositional departure from any
presumptive or mandatory sentence and shall resentence the defendant to an appropriate
sentence under the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
[22]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) The court may not resentence a person under this  section to a more severe sentence
than originally imposed or impose an upward durational or dispositional departure.
(e) ORS  40.010 to 40.210 and 40.310 to 40.585 do not apply to a hearing conducted under
this section.
(f) The sentencing court has  jurisdiction to amend its judgment and resentence the de-
fendant as provided in this subsection.
(7) Unless the court orders  otherwise, a person shall appear at a hearing described in
subsection (6) of this section by simultaneous  electronic transmission as defined in ORS
131.045.
(8) A person whose  petition is denied under subsection (4) of this section after filing an
amended petition, or who is not resentenced  after a hearing under subsection (6) of this
section, may file a new petition under this section only if the new petition is based on the
following evidence not previously considered by the court:
(a) Evidence that did not exist at the time the previous  hearing was held or previous
petition or amended petition was filed; or
(b) Evidence that existed at  the time the previous hearing was held or previous petition
or amended petition was filed, but could not have been discovered with reasonable diligence.
(9) A person serving a  sentence for aggravated murder as defined in ORS 163.095 is not
eligible to file a petition under this section unless the conduct leading to the conviction would
constitute murder in the first degree under ORS 163.107  or murder in the second degree
under ORS 163.115 under current law.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) “Domestic abuse”  means a pattern of behavior in a relationship by which one person
in the  relationship gains or maintains control over the other person, consisting of physical,
sexual, emotional, economic or psychological actions or threats of action that influence the
other person, including but not limited to  actions or threats of action that frighten, intim-
idate, terrorize, manipulate, hurt, humiliate, blame, injure or wound the other person.
(b) “Family or household member” means:
(A) Spouses.
(B) Former spouses.
(C) Adult persons related by blood or marriage.
(D) Persons cohabiting with each other.
(E) Persons who have cohabited with each other or who  have been involved in a sexually
intimate relationship.
(F) Unmarried parents of a minor child.
(c) “Reasonable efforts to  inform the victim” has the meaning given that phrase in ORS
147.500.
(d) “Victim” has the meaning given that term in ORS 147.500.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 13.
 ORS 138.105 is amended to read:
138.105. (1) On appeal by a defendant, the appellate court has authority to  review the judgment
or order being appealed, subject to the provisions of this section.
(2) The appellate court has authority to review only questions of law appearing on the record.
[23]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the appellate court has authority  to review any
intermediate decision of the trial court.
(4) On appeal from a judgment of conviction and sentence, the  appellate court has authority to
review:
(a) The denial of  a motion for new trial based on juror misconduct or newly discovered evidence;
and
(b) The denial of a motion in arrest of judgment.
(5) The appellate court has  no authority to review the validity of the defendant’s plea of guilty
or no contest, or a conviction based on the defendant’s plea of guilty or no contest, except that:
(a) The appellate court has authority to review the  trial court’s adverse determination of a
pretrial motion reserved in a conditional plea of guilty or no contest under ORS 135.335.
(b) The appellate court has authority  to review whether the trial court erred by not merging
determinations of guilt of two or more offenses,  unless the entry of separate convictions results from
an agreement between the state and the defendant.
(6) On appeal from a judgment  ordering payment of restitution but not specifying the amount
of restitution, the appellate court has no authority to review the decision to award restitution.
(7) Except as otherwise  provided in subsections (8) and (9) of this section, the appellate court
has authority to review any sentence to determine whether the trial court failed to comply with
requirements of law in imposing or failing to impose a sentence.
(8) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (9) of this section, for  a sentence imposed on
conviction of a felony committed on or after November 1, 1989:
(a) The appellate court has no authority to review:
(A) A sentence that is within the presumptive sentence prescribed by the  rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission.
(B) A sentence of probation when the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission prescribe
a presumptive sentence of imprisonment but allow a sentence of probation without departure.
(C) A sentence of  imprisonment when the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
prescribe  a  presumptive sentence of imprisonment but allow a sentence of probation without depar-
ture.
(b) If the trial court imposed a sentence that departs from the  presumptive sentence prescribed
by the rules of the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission, the appellate court’s authority to review
is limited to whether  the trial court’s findings of fact and reasons justifying a departure from the
sentence prescribed by the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission:
(A) Are supported by the evidence in the record; and
(B) Constitute substantial and compelling reasons for departure.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the appellate court  has authority to review
whether the sentencing court erred:
(A) In  ranking the crime seriousness classification of the current crime or in determining the
appropriate classification of a prior conviction or juvenile  adjudication for criminal history pur-
poses.
(B) In imposing or failing  to impose a minimum sentence prescribed by ORS 137.700  (1)(a)  or
137.707 (1)(a).
(9) The appellate court has no authority to  review any part of a sentence resulting from a
stipulated sentencing agreement between the state and the defendant.
(10)(a) On  appeal from a corrected or amended judgment that is entered before expiration of the
[24]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
applicable period under  ORS 138.071 (1) or (2) during which the original judgment can be appealed,
the appellate court has authority to review the judgment, including the corrections  or amendments,
as provided in this section.
(b) On appeal from a corrected or amended judgment that is entered after  expiration of the ap-
plicable period under ORS 138.071 (1) or (2) during which the  original judgment was or could have
been appealed, the appellate court has authority to  review, as provided in this section, only the
corrected or amended part of the judgment, any part of the  judgment affected by the correction or
amendment, or the trial court’s decision under ORS 137.172 not to correct or amend the judgment.
(c) As used in this subsection, “judgment” means any appealable judgment or order.
(11)(a) On a defendant’s cross-appeal under ORS 138.035  (5), the appellate court may, in its dis-
cretion, limit review to any decision by  the trial court that is inextricably linked, either factually
or legally, to the state’s appeal.
(b) The failure to file a cross-appeal under  ORS 138.035 (5) does not waive a defendant’s right
to assign error to a particular ruling of the trial court on appeal from a judgment.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 138.115 is amended to read:
138.115. (1) On appeal by the state, the appellate court has  authority to review the judgment or
order being appealed, subject to the provisions of this section.
(2) The appellate court has authority to review only questions of law appearing on the record.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the appellate court has authority  to review any
intermediate decision involving the  merits of, or necessarily affecting, the judgment or order from
which the appeal is taken.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, on  appeal from a judgment of
conviction of any felony, the appellate court has authority to review only  the sentence as provided
by subsections (5) and (6) of this section.
(b) The appellate court has authority  to review whether the trial court erred in merging deter-
minations of guilt of two or  more offenses, unless the merger of determinations of guilt resulted from
an agreement between the state and the defendant.
(5) Except as otherwise  provided in subsections (6) and (7) of this section, the appellate court
has authority to review the sentence imposed on conviction of any felony to  determine whether the
trial court failed to comply with requirements of law in imposing or failing to impose a sentence.
(6) Except as otherwise provided  in subsection (7) of this section, for a sentence imposed on
conviction of a felony committed on or after November 1, 1989:
(a) The appellate court has no authority to review:
(A) A sentence that is  within the presumptive sentence prescribed by the rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission.
(B) A sentence of probation when the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission prescribe
a presumptive sentence of imprisonment but allow a sentence of probation without departure.
(C) A sentence of imprisonment when the rules of the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission
prescribe a presumptive sentence of imprisonment but allow a sentence of probation without  depar-
ture.
(b) If the trial  court imposed a sentence that departs from the presumptive sentence prescribed
by the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission,  the appellate court’s authority to review
is limited to whether the trial court’s findings of fact and reasons justifying a  departure from the
sentence prescribed by the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission:
(A) Are supported by the evidence in the record; and
[25]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Constitute substantial and compelling reasons for departure.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the appellate court  has authority to review
whether the sentencing court erred:
(A) In ranking the crime seriousness classification of the current crime or in determining  the
appropriate classification of a prior conviction  or juvenile adjudication for criminal history pur-
poses.
(B) In imposing or failing  to impose a minimum sentence prescribed by ORS 137.700  (1)(a)  or
137.707 (1)(a).
(7) The appellate court has no authority to  review any part of a sentence resulting from a
stipulated sentencing agreement between the state and the defendant.
(8)(a) On appeal  from a corrected or amended judgment that is entered before expiration of the
applicable period under ORS 138.071 (1) or (2) during which the original judgment can  be appealed,
the appellate court has authority to review the judgment, including the corrections  or amendments,
as provided in this section.
(b) On appeal from a  corrected or amended judgment that is entered after expiration of the ap-
plicable period under ORS 138.071 (1) or  (2) during which the original judgment was or could have
been appealed, the appellate court has authority to review,  as provided in this section, only the
corrected or amended part of the judgment,  any part of the judgment affected by the correction or
amendment, or the trial court’s decision under ORS 137.172 not to correct or amend the judgment.
(c) As used in this subsection, “judgment” means any appealable judgment or order.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 144.110 is amended to read:
144.110. (1) In any felony case, the court may impose a minimum term of imprisonment of up to
one-half of the sentence it imposes.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 144.120 and 144.780:
(a) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision shall not release a prisoner  on parole
who has been sentenced under subsection (1) of this section until the minimum term has been served,
except upon affirmative vote of a majority of three board members or, if the  chairperson requires
all voting members to participate, a majority of all voting members.
(b) The board shall not release a prisoner on parole:
(A) Who has been  convicted of murder defined as aggravated murder under the provisions of
ORS 163.095, except as provided in ORS 163.105;
(B) Who has been convicted of murder in the first  degree under the provisions of ORS 163.107,
except as provided in ORS 163.107 (3) [ or 163.155 (6) to (8) ]; or
(C) Who has been  convicted of murder in the second degree under the provisions of ORS 163.115,
except as provided in ORS 163.115 (5)(c) to (f) or 163.155 [ (6) to (8) ] (7) to (9) .
(3) This section does  not apply to a person sentenced under ORS 163.107 (2)(c), 163.115 (6)
or 163.155 (3).
SECTION 16.
 ORS 161.620 is amended to read:
161.620. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a sentence imposed upon any  person
waived under ORS 419C.349, 419C.352, 419C.364 or 419C.370  shall not include any sentence of death
or life imprisonment without the possibility of release or  parole nor imposition of any mandatory
minimum sentence except that a mandatory minimum sentence under:
(1) ORS 137.707  (1)(a)  shall be imposed, except as provided in ORS 137.712;
(2) ORS 163.105 (1)(c) shall be imposed; and
(3) ORS 161.610 may be imposed.
[26]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 17.
 ORS 420.240 is amended to read:
420.240. (1) The Oregon Youth Authority may establish and  administer a work release program
in which persons who are committed to the custody  of the Department of Corrections and placed in
the physical custody of the youth authority under ORS 137.124 or other statute may be  authorized
to leave assigned quarters for the purpose of:
(a) Participating in private, gainful employment;
(b) Participating in a work  program approved by the youth authority, including work with public
or private agencies or persons, with or without compensation;
(c) Obtaining in  this state additional education, including but not limited to vocational, technical
and general education;
(d) Participating in alcohol or drug treatment programs;
(e) Participating in mental health programs;
(f) Specific treatment to develop independent living skills; or
(g) Other purposes established by the youth authority by rule.
(2) After consulting with the Department of Corrections,  the youth authority shall adopt rules
to carry out the provisions of ORS 420.240 to 420.265.
(3) The provisions  of this section do not apply to persons sentenced under ORS 137.635  (1) ,
137.700 (1)(a)  or 137.707  (1)(a)  or  any other provision of law that prohibits eligibility for any form
of temporary leave from custody.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 421.121 is amended to read:
421.121. (1) Except as  otherwise provided in ORS 137.635, 137.700, 137.707, 163.105,  163.107 and
163.115, each  adult in custody sentenced to the custody of the Department of Corrections for felonies
committed on or after November 1, 1989, is eligible for a  reduction in the term of incarceration for:
(a) Appropriate institutional behavior, as defined by rule of the Department of Corrections;  and
(b) Participation in the adult basic skills development program described in ORS 421.084.
(2) The maximum amount of time  credits earned for appropriate institutional behavior or for
participation in the  adult basic skills development program described in ORS 421.084 may not exceed
20 percent of the total term of incarceration in a Department of Corrections institution.
(3) The time credits may not be used to shorten  the term of actual prison confinement to less
than six months.
(4) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to the rulemaking provisions of ORS chapter  183
to establish a process for granting, retracting and restoring the time credits earned  by the offender
as allowed in subsections (1) to (3) of this section.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 421.168 is amended to read:
421.168. (1) The Department of  Corrections shall establish a short-term transitional leave pro-
gram. The program shall provide adults  in custody with an opportunity to secure appropriate tran-
sitional support when necessary for successful reintegration into  the community prior to the adult’s
discharge to post-prison supervision.
(2) The  Department of Corrections shall identify each adult in custody who is eligible for the
short-term transitional leave program and shall, in conjunction with the  supervisory authority for
the county to which the adult in custody will be released, assist each eligible adult  in custody in
preparing a transition plan and in identifying and applying  for an employment, educational or other
transitional opportunity in the community.
(3) If the transition plan for the adult  in custody is approved by the department and is an es-
sential part  of successful reintegration into the community, the department may grant a transitional
[27]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
leave no more than 120 days before the discharge date of the adult in custody.
(4) An adult in custody is  not eligible for transitional leave before having served six months of
prison incarceration.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section. The rules must
include a set of release  conditions for adults in custody released on transitional leave status. [ An
adult in custody ] A person  on transitional leave status is subject to immediate return to prison for
any violation of the conditions of release.
(6) The provisions of this section do not apply to adults in custody whose sentences were im-
posed under ORS 137.635  (1) , 137.690 (1) , 137.700 (1)(a) , 137.707 (1)(a) , 164.061, 475.907, 475.925,
475.930 (1)  or 813.011 or under a provision of law that prohibits release on any form of temporary
leave from custody.
TASK FORCE
SECTION 20.
(1) The Task Force on Services and Support for Incarcerated Domestic  Vi-
olence Survivors is established.
(2) The task force consists of 15 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the  Senate shall appoint two members from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Director of the Department of Corrections shall appoint two members  to repre-
sent the department.
(d) The Governor shall appoint nine members as follows:
(A) Two members who are experts on the psychological and behavioral effects of  trauma.
(B) Two members who are experts on domestic violence prevention or treatment.
(C) Two members who were previously incarcerated in a  Department of Corrections
correctional facility, including one member who was previously incarcerated at  Coffee Creek
Correctional Facility.
(D) Two members  who are currently incarcerated in a Department of Corrections
correctional facility, including one member who is currently incarcerated at Coffee Creek
Correctional Facility.
(E) One member representing the Oregon Justice Resource Center.
(3) The purpose of the task force is  to make recommendations to the Department of
Corrections concerning:
(a) Programs and  services needed to help ensure that incarcerated domestic violence
survivors return to the community in a safe and healthy manner; and
(b) Any changes needed  in the department’s facility operations, procedures and protocols
to prevent further retraumatization of incarcerated domestic violence survivors.
(4) The task force shall:
(a) Conduct a review  of the department’s current programs and services that address
domestic violence, identifying  eligibility for each program or service, the duration of the
program or service and the  number of adults in custody who are able to participate in the
program or service.
(b) Consult with currently incarcerated and  formerly incarcerated domestic violence
[28]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
survivors as to programs or services needed by survivors while incarcerated, and about  de-
partment facility operations, procedures and protocols that are problematic for survivors.
(c) Consult with experts and advocates in domestic violence  prevention and treatment,
representing diverse populations in the community, to understand the dynamics of  domestic
violence and about the programs or services that should  be available to incarcerated do-
mestic violence survivors.
(d) Consider the  feedback from currently incarcerated and formerly incarcerated do-
mestic violence survivors about  problematic department facility operations, procedures and
protocols and review those operations, procedures and protocols in consultation with trauma
experts.
(5) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11)(a) No later than September 15, 2026, the task force shall submit a report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245  to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to the judiciary. The report must contain:
(A) Recommendations for department programs and services needed  to help ensure that
incarcerated domestic violence survivors return  to the community in a healthy and safe
manner; and
(B) Recommendations for changes  to department facility operations, procedures and
protocols necessary to prevent further retraumatization  of incarcerated domestic violence
survivors.
(b) The department shall publish a copy of the report on the website of the department.
(12) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall provide  staff support to the task
force.
(13) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 21.
Section 20 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
APPLICABILITY
[29]
SB 1179
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
SECTION 22.
(1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act and  the amendments to ORS 137.635, 137.690,
137.700, 137.707, 137.717, 138.105, 138.115, 144.110, 161.620,  163.107, 163.115, 163.155, 420.240,
421.121, 421.168 and 475.930 by sections 2 to 11 and 13 to 19 of  this 2025 Act apply to sentences
imposed on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act, including resentencings under section
12 of this 2025 Act or any other law.
(2) Section 12 of this 2025 Act applies to persons serving  sentences imposed before, on
or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 23.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 24. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[30]