Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 321.017 is amended to read:
321.017. (1) In addition to the  taxes levied under ORS 321.015 (1) to (4), there hereby is levied
a privilege tax upon taxpayers on the harvesting of all  merchantable forest products harvested on
forestlands in the amount provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The State Board of Forestry shall establish annually, at the beginning of each calendar
year, the rate of tax levied  in subsection (1) of this section [ shall be established annually at the be-
ginning of each calendar year by the board of directors of the Oregon Forest Resources Institute, ] at
a rate not to exceed 75 cents per thousand feet, board measure, adjusted annually  for inflation since
1991 based on the  Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as
published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(3) The tax shall be measured by and be  applicable to each per thousand feet, board measure,
and such shall be subject to  and determined by the procedures and provisions of ORS 321.015 (5)
and (6).
(4) The tax levied by subsection (1) of this section  shall be due and payable to the Department
of Revenue  in the manner and procedure, including penalties and interest, as set forth for the col-
lection of the privilege tax in ORS 321.005 to 321.185.
(5) The revenue from the tax levied by  subsection (1) of this section shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer who shall deposit it in a suspense account established  under ORS 321.145 (1). After
payment of refunds, which  shall be paid in the same manner as other forest products harvest tax
refunds are paid in ORS 321.145 (2), the  balance of the additional tax imposed under subsection (1)
of this section shall be [ deposited in  the Oregon Forest Resources Institute Fund ] transferred as
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1141
HB 2298
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
provided in ORS 321.152 (2) to the Forest Research and  Experiment Account, subject to ORS
321.145.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 526.610 is amended to read:
526.610. (1)  There is created the Oregon Forest  Resources Institute. The institute shall be gov-
erned by a board of directors [ appointed by the State Forester. In making the  appointments, the State
Forester shall take into consideration any nominations or recommendations made  to the State Forester
by producers or organizations  that represent producers. The board shall consist ] consisting  of [ 11]
13 voting members plus two nonvoting members [ appointed as follows: ].
(2) After consideration of any nominations or recommendations made to the State
Forester by producers or organizations that represent producers, the  State Forester shall
appoint to the board:
[(1)] (a)  Three voting members to represent small producers of 20 million board feet or less  per
year.
[(2)] (b) Three  voting members to represent medium producers of more than 20 million board feet
but less than 100 million board feet per year.
[(3)] (c)  Three voting members to represent large producers of 100 million board feet  or more
per year.
[(4)] (d) One voting member  who is an owner of between 100 and 2,000 acres of forestland and
who has no direct financial interest in any forest products processing activity.
[(5)] (e)  After consideration of the  recommendations of the other appointed members described
in [subsections (1) to  (4) of this section ] paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection , one voting member
who is an hourly wage employee of a producer or  a person who represents such employees. [ The
member appointed under this subsection need not comply with  the requirements of ORS 526.615 (3) to
(6).]
(3) The President of the Senate and  the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
jointly appoint to the board:
(a) One voting member who represents the environmental community.
(b) One voting member who has experience with a fishery or a wildlife-related science.
(c) One nonvoting member to represent the public who may not be a member of or sig-
nificantly affiliated with any organization of or business in the timber industry of any or-
ganization or business known to support or promote environmental or conservation issues.
(4) The members  appointed under subsection (3) of this section serve at the pleasure of
the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
[(6)(a) Two nonvoting members: ]
[(A)] (5)  The Dean of the College of Forestry at Oregon State University  shall  serve on the
board as a nonvoting member.
(6) The nonvoting members are not subject to ORS 526.615 to 526.625 .
[(B) An individual jointly appointed by the President of the Senate  and the Speaker of the House
of Representatives to represent the public. The public representative may not be a member  of or sig-
nificantly affiliated with any organization of or  business in the timber industry or any organization
or business known to support or promote environmental or conservation issues. A person appointed
under this subparagraph serves at the pleasure of the President of the Senate and the Speaker of  the
House of Representatives. ]
[(b) Members referred to in this subsection are not subject to ORS 526.615 to 526.625. ]
SECTION 3.
 ORS 526.650 is amended to read:
[2]
HB 2298
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
526.650. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 526.645 (2), [ no funds shall be expended by ] the Oregon Forest
Resources Institute may not expend funds:
(a) For the purpose of supporting or  opposing litigation or other legal action [ which] that  is
unrelated to the administration of the institute.
[(2)] (b) [ No funds shall be expended by the institute ] For the purpose of influencing, or attempt-
ing to influence, [ any] legislation or [ any] a  rulemaking or other administrative activity of [ any] a
state board, commission or agency.
(c) On generalized advertising for public  education related to forest practices, including
the adequacy or effectiveness of any particular forest practice.
(d) On educational materials, trainings, tours or other outreach that does not include a
conservation perspective.
(2) The institute shall:
(a) Maintain records of interactions between institute staff and elected officials, members
of boards and commissions and senior agency employees.
(b) By January 15 of each year, present a report summarizing the records described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection to the Governor.
(c) Make the report described in paragraph (b) of this subsection available to the public
on a website maintained by the institute.
SECTION 4.
The State Forestry Department shall:
(1) Review, and may approve or disapprove, communications and  publications produced
or recommended by the Oregon Forest Resources Institute.
(2) Consider whether the communications or publications described  in subsection (1) of
this section are factually accurate.
SECTION 5.  ORS 526.600 is amended to read:
526.600. As used in ORS 526.600 to 526.675, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Institute” means the Oregon Forest Resources Institute.
(2) “Producer” means a producer of forest products and  includes any person, partnership, asso-
ciation, corporation, cooperative or other business entity involved in the  growing, harvesting or
producing of timber or timber  products. “Producer” does not include landowners who meet the re-
quirement of ORS 526.610 [ (4)] (2)(d).
SECTION 6.
 ORS 526.615 is amended to read:
526.615. Except  as provided in ORS 526.610 [ (5)] (2)(e) , each voting member of the board of di-
rectors of the Oregon Forest Resources Institute shall have the following qualifications:
(1) Be a citizen of the United States.
(2) Be a bona fide resident of this state.
(3) Be a producer in this state, an employee of such a producer or own between 100  and 2,000
acres of forestland in this state on which harvest taxes are paid, but  have no direct financial in-
terest in any forest products processing activity.
(4) Have been actively engaged in producing forest products for a period of at least five years.
(5) Derive a substantial proportion of income from the production of forest products.
(6) Have demonstrated, through membership in  producers’ organizations or organizations repre-
senting landowners who meet the requirements of ORS 526.610 [ (4)] (2)(d), a profound interest in the
development of Oregon’s forest products industry.
[3]