Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) If a constitutional convention for proposing a  balanced budget amend-
ment to  the United States Constitution is called by the Congress of the United States under
Article V of the United States Constitution on or before December 31,  2018, the State of
Oregon shall send a delegation to the convention as provided in this section.
(2) The Oregon Constitutional Convention Delegation is established.
(3) The delegation shall be composed of 
 delegates and an equal number of alter-
nates. The President of the Senate, the Speaker of  the House of Representatives, the Senate
Minority Leader and the House Minority Leader shall each  appoint delegates and an
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3459
HB 2863
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
equal number of alternates.
(4) A majority of delegates of the delegation constitutes a quorum  for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the delegation requires the approval of a majority of delegates.
(6) The delegation shall elect one of its delegates to serve as chairperson.
(7) The delegation may adopt rules consistent with sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act.
(8) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall provide administrative  support to
the delegation.
SECTION 2.
(1) If an Oregon Constitutional Convention Delegation  delegate is unable or
unwilling to participate in a constitutional convention convened on or before  December 31,
2018, either permanently or temporarily, the  delegate’s respective alternate shall replace the
delegate for the time the delegate is unable to serve. Should the alternate so designated not
be able to participate in  the convention, then the delegation shall choose a replacement del-
egate from the remaining alternates.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a delegate or alternate may  at any
time be replaced by resolution of  the Legislative Assembly or may be replaced by the Article
V Convention Oversight Committee pursuant to section 6 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) If a constitutional convention  is convened on or before December 31,
2018, the Oregon Constitutional Convention Delegation has authority to:
(a) Represent the Legislative Assembly at  formal and informal planning sessions related
to the convention;
(b) Conduct community  meetings and hearings throughout this state prior to the con-
vention; and
(c) Correspond with other state delegations.
(2) The authority described in subsection (1) of this section only exists to the  extent the
delegation, delegates and alternates adhere to the oath that  is described in section 4 of this
2017 Act and that has been administered to and subscribed by delegates and alternates.
SECTION 4.
Delegates and alternates of the Oregon Constitutional Convention Delegation
shall take the following oath or affirmation prior to accepting appointment:
I do solemnly swear or affirm that to the best of my abilities,  I will, as a delegate (or
an alternate) to a constitutional convention for proposing  a balanced budget amendment,
uphold the Constitutions and laws of the United States and the State of Oregon.
I will abide by my specific instructions from the Legislative  Assembly. I will not discuss
or vote to allow consideration of  or to approve any amendment proposed for ratification to
the United States Constitution that is unrelated to  the subject of a balanced budget amend-
ment.
I will vote only for convention rules that provide that each  state have one equal vote,
that no state or delegate shall be allowed to propose an  amendment that is unrelated to
balancing the federal budget, and that all but  procedural issues be resolved by a simple ma-
jority vote of the states voting on the issue. I acknowledge that  any violation of this oath
or affirmation may result in  being recalled by the Legislative Assembly or its authorized
committee.
[2]
HB 2863
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 5. Delegates of the Oregon Constitutional  Convention Delegation shall vote
only for constitutional convention rules that are consistent with the following principles:
(1) The convention  is convened under the authority granted to the state legislatures of
the several states by Article V of the United States Constitution.
(2) The only participants at the convention are the  several states represented by their
respective delegations duly selected in the manner their respective legislatures have deter-
mined.
(3) The scope of the authority of the convention  is defined by applications adopted by at
least two-thirds of  the legislatures of the several states, which authority is accurately
characterized as being limited  to the subject of a balanced budget amendment to the United
States Constitution.
(4) The convention has no authority to propose or discuss an  amendment to the United
States Constitution on any other subject.
(5) The convention shall provide  for disciplining a delegate or delegation for exceeding the
scope of the authority of the convention by raising subjects for discussion or debate that are
outside the authority of the convention as expressed in subsection (3) of this section.
(6) The convention may not infringe on  the respective authority of state legislatures to
instruct, discipline, recall or replace their respective state delegates or delegations.
(7) A  quorum for all sessions of the convention and for all committee meetings shall be
a majority of the states  attending the convention or serving as members of the relevant
committee.
(8) All voting at the convention or in a committee shall be by state with each state hav-
ing one vote, without apportionment  or division. Each state legislature shall determine the
internal voting and quorum rules for casting the vote of its delegation.
(9) A majority vote of the quorum shall prevail on all issues before  the convention and
in all committees save for procedural votes, which may require  a supermajority vote in favor
to carry out the procedural issue under consideration.
(10) A vote to propose an amendment to the United States Constitution may not be con-
sidered a procedural vote.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Article V Convention Oversight Committee is established.
(2) The committee shall be composed of three members, one appointed by the President
of the Senate, one appointed by the  Speaker of the House of Representatives and one ap-
pointed jointly by the President and the Speaker. A member  of the committee may not be
an Oregon Constitutional Convention Delegation delegate or alternate.
(3) The duties of the committee include:
(a) Monitoring the delegation to determine if the delegation is following  legislative in-
structions and obeying constitutional convention rules;
(b) Advising the delegation on the position of the  Legislative Assembly on issues before
the convention;
(c) Disciplining any delegate or  alternate who violates the oath of office or instructions
as set forth in sections  4 and 5 of this 2017 Act or who engages in malfeasance or is other-
wise guilty of  malfeasance or nonfeasance, such discipline of whom may include but is not
limited to recall from the convention or dismissal from the delegation;
(d) Notifying the convention that a delegate has been recalled or dismissed; and
[3]
HB 2863
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
(e) Any other duty assigned to the committee by resolution of the Legislative Assembly.
(4) The Legislative  Policy and Research Director shall provide administrative support to
the committee.
SECTION 7.
The Constitutional Convention Fund is established in the  State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by  the Constitutional Conven-
tion Fund shall be credited to the fund. All  moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated
to the Legislative Policy and Research  Director for the purposes of carrying out the duties
of the Oregon Constitutional Convention Delegation and the  Constitutional Convention
Oversight Committee under sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) Sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act are repealed on June 30, 2019.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Constitutional Convention Fund on June 30, 2019, that
are unexpended, unobligated and not subject to any conditions shall revert to the General
Fund.
SECTION 9.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]