Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 565.447 is amended to read:
565.447. (1) Subject only  to the availability of unobligated net lottery proceeds, there is allocated
from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to :
(a) The County Fair Account created  under ORS 565.445 an amount equal to  nine-tenths of
one percent of the net proceeds from the Oregon State Lottery[ , but not to  exceed $1.53 million an-
nually, adjusted biennially pursuant to an inflation factor  determined by dividing the Consumer Price
Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All  Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Sta-
tistics of the United States Department of Labor, for January 1 immediately preceding commencement
of the biennium, by the Consumer  Price Index for All Urban Consumers of the Portland, Oregon,
Standard Metropolitan Statistical Area, as compiled by  the United States Department of Labor, Bureau
of Labor Statistics, for January 1, 2001. ]; and
(b) The State Fair Council, for deposit as described  in ORS 565.539, an amount equal to
one-tenth of one percent of the  net proceeds from the Oregon State Lottery. Moneys allo-
cated to the council under this paragraph shall be in addition to  and not in lieu of any
moneys otherwise typically provided to the council  by the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services.
(2) The allocation of moneys from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund un-
der this section is subject to the requirements in section 4,  Article XV of the Oregon Constitution,
for deposit of specified amounts of  the net proceeds from the Oregon State Lottery into the Educa-
tion Stability Fund and into the Parks and Natural Resources Fund and shall  be made only after
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1215
HB 2304
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
satisfaction or payment of:
(a) Amounts allocated to Westside lottery bonds issued  under ORS 391.140 or to the reserves
or any refunding related to the Westside lottery bonds in  accordance with the priority for allocation
and disbursement established by ORS 391.130;
(b) All liens, pledges or other obligations relating to lottery  bonds or refunding lottery bonds
due or payable during the year for which an allocation is to be made; and
(c) Amounts required by any other pledges of, or liens on, net proceeds from  the Oregon State
Lottery.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop a master
plan for  county fairground capital construction. The master plan shall consist of five-year
and 10-year capital construction plans for  each county fairground in this state and any
findings or recommendations of the department regarding  county fairground capital con-
struction.
(2) The department shall retain a consultant to work with each county  fair board, the
board of directors for each fair  association exercising powers under ORS 565.268 and the
board of each fair district operating under ORS 565.275 to identify the five-year and  10-year
capital construction needs for county  fairground facilities. The department shall work with
the consultant in developing the master plan for county fairground capital construction.
(3) The department shall complete the master plan and shall submit a report on the
master plan in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim committees  of the Legis-
lative Assembly related to natural resources no later than September 15,  2026. The depart-
ment shall provide copies of the report to each county fair board and to the  boards for each
fair association and fair district.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on July 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $250,000, which may be expended by the  de-
partment for consultant services described under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any authorization to issue  general obli-
gation bonds under ORS 286A.035, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, at the request of
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the State Treasurer  may issue Article
XI-Q bonds under ORS  286A.816 to 286A.826 in an amount that produces $20,838,690 of net
proceeds for the purpose specified in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of bonds issued under  this section must be transferred to the depart-
ment for  the purposes of acquiring, constructing, remodeling, repairing, equipping or fur-
nishing real or personal property to support the use of the Oregon State Fair and Exposition
Center as a regional emergency and evacuee center.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]