Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall conduct a study  of the
use of a loan loss reserve fund  to support infrastructure improvement projects undertaken
by underserved communities in Oregon. The department shall  submit a report of the study
to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to economic development in
the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later  than September 15, 2026. The report may
include recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2082