Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Account” means a cohort account established in accordance with sections 1 to 13 of
this 2017 Act.
(2) “Designated beneficiary” means an individual associated with a unique  identifier
within a cohort account  for whom the State Treasurer may make qualified withdrawals for
the payment of qualified post-secondary education expenses.
(3) “Financial institution” means a bank,  a commercial bank, a national bank, a savings
bank, a savings and loan, a thrift  institution, a credit union, an insurance company, a trust
company, a mutual fund, an  investment firm or other similar entity authorized to do busi-
ness in this state.
(4) “Internal Revenue Code” means the federal  Internal Revenue Code, as amended and
in effect on December 31, 2016.
(5) “Post-secondary education institution” means:
(a) A public university;
(b) A community college;
(c) Oregon Health and Science University;
(d) A career school licensed under ORS 345.010 to 345.450 or a similar law in  another
state;
(e) A private post-secondary institution authorized to confer  academic degrees under
ORS 348.594 to 348.615 or a similar law in another state; and
(f) A private post-secondary institution that meets the criteria set forth  in ORS 348.597
(2).
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3740
HB 3367
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) “Qualified post-secondary education expenses” means:
(a) Expenses incurred in  the acquisition of post-secondary education or job training at a
post-secondary education institution, including  but not limited to tuition and extracurricular
nontuition expenses designed to prepare a designated beneficiary for post-secondary educa-
tion or job training; and
(b) Expenses constituting qualified higher education expenses under section 529(e) of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(7) “Qualified withdrawal” means a withdrawal made as prescribed in section 13 of this
2017 Act and made from an account to pay the  qualified post-secondary education expenses
of the designated beneficiary.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon  Bright Futures Savings Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Oregon
Bright Futures Savings Fund shall be credited to the fund. All moneys in the  Oregon Bright
Futures Savings Fund are continuously appropriated to the State Treasurer  for purposes of
administering sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The Oregon Bright Futures  Savings Fund shall contain cohort accounts established
by the State Treasurer for each calendar year quarter. Each cohort  account shall contain
moneys earmarked for children for whom the State Treasurer received notice under  section
3 of this 2017 Act for that calendar year  quarter. The fund and cohort accounts within the
fund may contain moneys that are not earmarked. The State Treasurer shall invest and
track separately the amounts in the fund and in each cohort  account in the manner provided
in ORS 293.701 to 293.857.
(3) The Oregon Bright Futures Savings Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly for deposit in the fund;
(b) Moneys transferred to the  fund from the federal government or any public body as
defined in ORS 174.109;
(c) Any gifts,  contributions or donations made to the State of Oregon for deposit in the
fund; and
(d) Earnings on moneys in the fund.
(4) The  State Treasurer may use the moneys in the Oregon Bright Futures Savings Fund
to make qualified withdrawals for  post-secondary education expenses of a designated benefi-
ciary, to pay the administrative  costs and expenses of the State Treasurer related to the
administration of accounts established for qualified post-secondary education expenses  under
sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act, to provide  or make available scholarships, grants and other
incentives to designated  beneficiaries or to further any other purpose of sections 1 to 13 of
this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) For each child born  in Oregon to residents of this state, the State
Registrar of the Center for Health Statistics shall, on a quarterly basis, send or  deliver by
secure electronic or other reasonable  means to the State Treasurer a data file containing the
name of the  child, the names of the parents of the child and the mother’s mailing address
for the purpose of implementing section 4 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The state registrar  and the State Treasurer shall enter into an agreement to imple-
ment the provisions of this section, including but not limited to the transfer, storage  and
destruction of data files.
SECTION 4. (1) Within 120 days after  receiving information about the birth of a child
[2]
HB 3367
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
from the State Registrar of  the Center for Health Statistics under section 3 of this 2017 Act,
the State Treasurer shall:
(a) Establish a unique identifier associated with  the child to be used for the purposes of
earmarking moneys within the appropriate cohort account for the child;
(b) Establish a record associating the unique identifier with the name  of the child and
the county of the child’s birth; and
(c) Notify the parents  of the child whose birth information was received of the unique
identifier assigned to the child.
(2) Notice shall be sent to the mother’s mailing  address as received from the state
registrar and must include, at a minimum, the following:
(a) The purpose of the cohort account and the unique identifier;
(b) Any actions  the parents may take to participate in the post-secondary education
savings provisions of sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act; and
(c) How, when and for what purposes the State Treasurer may  make qualified with-
drawals from the cohort account.
(3) If a parent was an Oregon resident at the time of  the birth of a child of the parent
and the child  was born outside of Oregon, the parent may apply to the State Treasurer to
establish a unique identifier under this section, provided that the parent is  an Oregon resi-
dent at the time of application.
(4) The State Treasurer shall, upon determining that a child for whom  a unique identifier
has not been  established under this section has been lawfully adopted, establish a unique
identifier and send notice as provided in this section to the adoptive parents.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law that requires consideration of
one or  more financial circumstances of an individual for the purpose of determining the el-
igibility to receive, or the amount of, any assistance  or benefit authorized by law to be pro-
vided to or for  the benefit of the individual, any moneys in the Oregon Bright Futures
Savings Fund earmarked for an individual under sections 1 to 13 of this 2017  Act, and any
qualified withdrawals from the fund, shall be disregarded for such purpose.
SECTION 6. Upon the establishment of a unique identifier for a child in a cohort  account
under section 4 of this 2017 Act, the State Treasurer, out  of moneys appropriated for such
purpose, shall deposit the amount of $  in the cohort account and earmark the amount
for the child.
SECTION 7. For purposes of sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act, the  State Treasurer has
the following powers, duties and functions:
(1) To establish, develop, implement and maintain accounts and unique identifiers  re-
quired under section 4 of this 2017 Act.
(2) To adopt rules for the general administration of sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act.
(3) To maintain, invest and reinvest the  funds maintained in cohort accounts within the
Oregon Bright Futures Savings Fund established pursuant to section 2 of this 2017 Act.  In
making investments, the State Treasurer shall exercise the judgment and care then prevail-
ing that persons of prudence, discretion and intelligence exercise in  the management of their
own affairs  with due regard to the probable income and level of risk from certain types of
investments of money.
(4) To make and enter into any and all contracts, agreements or arrangements,  and to
retain, employ and contract for the services of private and  public financial institutions, de-
[3]
HB 3367
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
positories, consultants, investment  advisors or managers and third-party plan administrators
and for  research, technical and other services necessary or desirable for carrying out the
purposes of sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act.
(5) To accept donations or receive  funds for purposes of providing scholarships, grants
and other incentives to designated beneficiaries or furthering any of the  purposes of sections
1 to 13 of this 2017 Act.
(6) To award scholarships or grants, provide or make available other incentives to  des-
ignated beneficiaries or enter into promotional arrangements with third parties  as the State
Treasurer considers desirable.
SECTION 8. Moneys deposited into accounts under sections 1 to 13  of this 2017 Act are
considered moneys of the State  of Oregon. Except as otherwise provided by law, the State
Treasurer is the trustee of the moneys and earnings.
SECTION 9. (1) The State Treasurer may accept contributions from any  person to a
cohort account once  an account is established. The State Treasurer shall adopt rules de-
scribing persons who may contribute  and establishing conditions that apply to contributions.
(2) Moneys contributed to a cohort  account may not be earmarked for specific individuals
unless the moneys are contributed by a public body as defined in ORS 174.109.
(3) Contributions to an account may be made only in cash.
SECTION 9a.
(1) Total amounts earmarked for an individual in the Oregon Bright  Fu-
tures Savings  Fund may not exceed amounts reasonably necessary to provide for the quali-
fied post-secondary education expenses of the individual.
(2) The State Treasurer shall maintain  separate records and accountings for each cohort
account. The State Treasurer  shall, at least annually, report to designated beneficiaries the
amounts earmarked for the designated beneficiaries.
(3) If the State  Treasurer determines that moneys in the fund earmarked for an indi-
vidual will not be or are highly unlikely to be used to pay qualified  post-secondary education
expenses, the  State Treasurer shall remove the earmark but maintain the moneys in the
appropriate cohort account.
(4) The State Treasurer shall allow information regarding amounts earmarked for an in-
dividual in the fund to be electronically linked using financial aggregation software to finan-
cial accounts held at financial institutions, to accounts  established under the Oregon 529
Savings Network or to other accounts, entities, persons  or locations as specified by the State
Treasurer by rule.
(5) The State Treasurer may require the provision of information from a  designated
beneficiary as the State Treasurer considers necessary to administer  the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 10.
(1) Only the State Treasurer may direct the  investment of any moneys in
an account.
(2) The State Treasurer and the State  of Oregon may not insure any account or guar-
antee any rate of return or any interest rate on any moneys in an account. The State
Treasurer and the  State of Oregon are not liable for any loss incurred by any person as a
result of having moneys earmarked in an account established under section 4 of this  2017
Act or as a result of establishing or contributing to an account.
SECTION 11.
(1) Amounts earmarked for an individual in a cohort account and  any in-
terest thereon may not be assigned  or pledged or otherwise used to secure or obtain a loan
[4]
HB 3367
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or other advancement.
(2) Payments and  withdrawals made from the Oregon Bright Futures Savings Fund for
qualified post-secondary education expenses are exempt from garnishment and are not  sub-
ject to execution, attachment or any other process or to the operation of any  bankruptcy
or insolvency law.
(3) A refund of a qualified post-secondary education expense payment may not be paid
by a post-secondary education institution directly to the designated beneficiary. Any refund
of qualified post-secondary education expenses owed by  a post-secondary education institu-
tion on account of  an overpayment of educational expenses from the fund must be refunded
to the State Treasurer.
(4) A qualified withdrawal that is used to pay for qualified  post-secondary education ex-
penses must be paid as prescribed by rules adopted by the State Treasurer.
SECTION 12.
Information relating to an individual, including but not limited to names,
addresses, telephone numbers, personal identification information, amounts earmarked  to
the individual and the unique identifier assigned by the State Treasurer, is confidential and
may not be disclosed:
(1) Except to the extent necessary to administer sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act; or
(2) Unless the person who provides the information or is the subject  of the information
expressly agrees in writing that the information may be disclosed.
SECTION 13.
(1) The State Treasurer may withdraw moneys  from the Oregon Bright
Futures Savings Fund for the payment of qualified post-secondary education  expenses only
in the manner prescribed by the State Treasurer by rule.
(2) The State Treasurer shall notify  a designated beneficiary of any withdrawal of moneys
earmarked for the designated beneficiary.
SECTION 14. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Treasurer, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $ , to be deposited in the Oregon Bright Futures  Savings Fund
established under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 15. (1) The State Treasurer shall report the State Treasurer’s findings and
recommendations regarding the implementation of sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act  to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education,  in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245,  no later than September 15, 2018, and may include recommendations for
legislation.
(2) In addition to the report required under subsection (1) of this  section, the State
Treasurer shall report the State Treasurer’s findings and recommendations regarding the
implementation of sections 1 to 13  of this 2017 Act to the Legislative Assembly in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245  no later than April 1, 2019, and may include recommendations for
legislation.
SECTION 16.
(1) Sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act become operative on January 1, 2018.
(2) The State Registrar of the Center for  Health Statistics and the State Treasurer may
take any action before the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this section that is
necessary to enable the  state registrar or State Treasurer to exercise, on and after the op-
erative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the state registrar or State Treasurer by sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 17. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
[5]
HB 3367
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[6]