Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.531 is amended to read:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 113
SB 1581
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
327.531. (1)(a) A school or school district that meets the  eligibility requirements of the special
provisions of the United States Department of Agriculture’s National School Lunch Program  or
School Breakfast Program [ may] must apply to the Department of Education to  offer
reimbursable breakfasts, lunches or both at no charge and without  consideration of individual el-
igibility [ by applying to the Department of Education ].
(b) If the school or school district is approved under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school
or school district must offer breakfasts, lunches or both  to all students of the school or school dis-
trict at no charge to the student.
(c) For each breakfast or lunch that a school or school district provides at  no charge as de-
scribed in this subsection, the Department of Education shall provide reimbursement  pursuant to
ORS 327.545 [ (2)] (3).
(2)(a) If a school or school  district does not offer reimbursable breakfasts or lunches as de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section, the school district must [ ensure] require that  each school
of the school district:
(A) Offers lunch at no charge to students [ from households with incomes that  do not exceed 300
percent of the federal poverty guidelines ].
(B) Offers breakfast at no charge to students [ from households with  incomes that do not exceed
300 percent of the federal poverty guidelines ], if breakfast must be offered pursuant to ORS 327.535.
(b) For each breakfast or lunch that a school or school district provides  at no charge as de-
scribed in this subsection, the Department of Education shall provide reimbursement  pursuant to
ORS 327.545 [ (3)] (4).
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this  section, a school or school district is not re-
quired to provide breakfast or lunch at no charge to students if :
(a) The Department of Education has insufficient funds to provide reimbursement pursuant  to
ORS 327.545 [ (2) or ] (3) or (4) . The State Board of Education shall adopt rules that describe:
[(a)] (A) The method for determining when the department has insufficient funds;
[(b)] (B) The content and timing of the notice to be provided to school districts when the de-
partment determines that the department has insufficient funds; and
[(c)] (C) The procedures the school or school district must follow upon receiving notice  of in-
sufficient funds.
(b) The school site operates on a schedule that  does not include a traditional service time
for breakfast or lunch, as determined by the Department  of Education based on criteria es-
tablished by the State Board of Education by rule.
(4) If the Department of Education makes a determination under subsection (3)(a) of  this
section, a school district must ensure that each school  of the school district, at a minimum:
(a) Offers lunch at no charge to students  from households with incomes that do not ex-
ceed 300 percent of the federal poverty guidelines.
(b) Offers breakfast at no charge to  students from households with incomes that do not
exceed 300 percent of federal poverty guidelines.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.535 is amended to read:
327.535. (1) As used in this section, “eligible student” means  a student who is eligible for free
or reduced price meals under the United  States Department of Agriculture’s National School Lunch
Program or School Breakfast Program.
[(2) A school district may make breakfast accessible at any school site and shall  make breakfast
accessible if required by this section. ]
[2]
SB 1581
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(3) Subject to subsections (4) and (5) of this section, a school  district that provides lunch at any
school site shall make breakfast accessible as part of a breakfast program if 25 percent or more  of the
students at the school site are eligible students or the school site qualifies for assistance under Chapter
I of Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965. ]
[(4) A school district that makes breakfast accessible as provided under subsection  (3) of this sec-
tion may apply  to the Department of Education for a waiver for all or for particular grade levels if the
school district is financially unable to implement  a breakfast program. The department may grant a
waiver to the school district for a period not to  exceed two years, after which the school district must
reestablish its claim of financial hardship if the waiver is to be extended. ]
[(5) If the per meal federal reimbursement for the  breakfast program falls below the 1991 re-
imbursement levels, a school district may elect to discontinue the program until federal funding is re-
stored to those levels. No waiver is required for such election. ]
(2) Except as  provided by subsection (3) of this section, a school district must make
breakfast accessible at every school site.
(3) A school district is not required to make breakfast accessible at every  school site if
the school district qualifies for a waiver from the Department of Education under  this sub-
section. A school district may qualify for a waiver as follows:
(a) The school district may apply for a waiver for all or for particular grade levels if  the
school district is financially unable  to implement a breakfast program. A school district may
qualify for a waiver under this paragraph only if 25 percent or more of  the students at the
school site are eligible students or the school site  qualifies for assistance under Chapter I
of Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965. The department
may grant  a waiver to the school district for a period not to exceed two years, after which
the waiver may be extended only if the  school district reestablishes a claim of financial
hardship.
(b) The school district may apply for a waiver for all or for particular grade levels if  the
school district  is unable to implement a breakfast program due to reasons identified by the
State Board of Education by rule,  including operating on a schedule that does not include a
traditional service time for breakfast.  The waiver shall be for a period identified by the de-
partment based on criteria established by the state  board, and may be extended as provided
by the criteria.
[(6)] (4) A school  district that makes breakfast accessible at any school site shall make breakfast
accessible at that school site at no charge as provided by ORS 327.531 (1) or  (2). The department
shall provide reimbursement to the school district for each breakfast provided at  no charge as pro-
vided by ORS 327.545.
[(7)(a)] (5)(a) Except as provided by [ subsection (8) of this section ] paragraph (e) of  this sub-
section, a school district that makes  breakfast accessible at a school site [ may choose to ] must
make breakfast accessible at that school site [ after the beginning of the school day ] as provided by
this subsection .
(b) Time spent  by students consuming breakfast is considered instructional time when students
consume breakfast in the students’ classroom and instruction is  being provided while students are
consuming breakfast. No more than 15 minutes may be considered instructional time  when students
are consuming breakfast.
[(8)(a) If 70 percent or more of the students at a school site are eligible students, the school district
must make breakfast accessible at that school site after the beginning of the school day. ]
[3]
SB 1581
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(b)] (c) A school district that [ is required to make breakfast accessible as prescribed by para-
graph (a) of this subsection ] makes breakfast accessible  must ensure that breakfast is:
(A) Accessible to all students after  the beginning of the school day, regardless of grade or ar-
rival time; and
(B) Provided at no charge to all students[ , regardless of whether a  student is an eligible
student].
[(c)] (d) The department shall provide technical assistance to school districts to meet the re-
quirements of this subsection. Technical assistance may include the development of breakfast de-
livery models.
[(d)] (e) [ Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, ] If a school district can demonstrate
that 70 percent or more  of the [ eligible] students at a school site who regularly receive lunch at
the school site also  regularly  receive breakfast at the school site without the school district com-
plying with  paragraph [ (a)] (c)(A) of this subsection, the school district is not required to comply
with paragraph [ (a)] (c)(A) of this subsection.
[(9)(a)] (6)(a) The department may award grants or enter into contracts to enable  school dis-
tricts to make breakfast accessible as required under subsection [ (8)] (5) of this section. Each grant
or contract may not exceed $5,000 per school  site and must be used to purchase or upgrade neces-
sary equipment required to provide breakfast after the beginning of the school day.
(b) The department may enter into a contract  with a public or private entity for the purposes
of the entity providing:
(A) Technical assistance to applicants for and recipients of grants; and
(B) Administration of the grant program.
(7) The department  shall provide technical assistance to school districts to maximize to
the greatest extent practicable the amounts received for reimbursement under federal law.
[(10)] (8) The State Board of Education may adopt  any rules necessary for the implementation
of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 327.545 is amended to read:
327.545. (1) For school districts with schools that provide  [ United States Department of Agricul-
ture reimbursable ] meals to students as described in ORS 327.531 and 327.535, the  Department of
Education shall reimburse the school districts for costs  incurred by the school districts [ in providing
the meals. The  amounts of the reimbursements may not exceed the amounts prescribed by subsections
(2) and (3) of this section. ] as provided by this section.
(2) Reimbursement shall be provided by state sources to school districts:
(a) For meals that meet the stricter of the following nutrition standards:
(A) The nutrition standards prescribed by federal law for reimbursable meals; or
(B) The nutrition standards prescribed by 7 C.F.R. 210.10 and 220.8, as  required to be
implemented by July 1, 2027, as in effect on July 1, 2024.
(b) In amounts that do not exceed  the amounts prescribed by subsections (3) and (4) of
this section.
[(2)] (3) For schools that offer reimbursable breakfast and lunch at no charge to all  students of
the school without consideration of individual eligibility  for free or reduced price meals as described
in ORS 327.531 (1), the amount of  reimbursements provided under this section may not exceed the
difference  between:
(a) The free reimbursement rate established by  the United States Department of Agriculture for
reimbursable meals; and
[4]
SB 1581
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
[(3)] (4) For schools  that offer [ reimbursable] breakfast and lunch at no charge to students [ from
households with incomes that do not exceed 300 percent of  the federal poverty guidelines ] as described
in ORS 327.531 (2), the amount of reimbursements provided under this section [ may not exceed ] shall
equal the difference between:
(a) Any amounts available as the free reimbursement rate established by the United  States
Department of Agriculture for reimbursable meals; and
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
[(4)] (5) The State Board of Education  may adopt any rules necessary for making reimburse-
ments under this section.
SECTION 4.
The amendments to  ORS 327.531, 327.535 and 327.545 by sections 1 to 3 of this
2026 Act first apply to the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 5.  ORS 327.537 is amended to read:
327.537. (1) A school district that makes meals accessible to students at school  sites under ORS
327.531 or 327.535 or under the United States Department of Agriculture’s National School Lunch
Program or School Breakfast Program:
(a) Must provide a [ United States Department of Agriculture reimbursable ] meal to a  student who
requests the meal:
(A) Unless the student’s parent or guardian has provided written permission  to the school dis-
trict to withhold a meal from the student; and
(B) Regardless of whether the student has money to pay for the meal or owes money for  meals;
and
(b) May not require that a student throw away a meal after  the meal has been served because
of the student’s inability to pay for the meal or because money is owed for meals.
(2) If a student owes money for five or more meals, a school district shall:
(a) Determine if the student has been identified as being categorically  eligible for free school
meals and can be directly certified without application;
(b) If the student  has not been identified as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, make
at least two attempts to contact the student’s parent or guardian to have the parent or guardian  fill
out an application to  determine if the student is eligible for free or reduced price lunches under the
United States Department of Agriculture’s current Income Eligibility Guidelines; and
(c) If the student is not eligible or the parent or guardian  does not fill out an application as
described in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, make reasonable efforts to contact the parent or
guardian and to offer assistance filling out an application, if appropriate.
(3) A school district may not:
(a) Publicly identify or stigmatize a student who cannot pay for a meal or who  owes money for
a meal by requiring that the student wear a wristband, hand stamp or other identifying marker  or
by serving the student an alternative meal; or
(b) Require a student who cannot pay for a meal or who  owes money for a meal to do chores
or other work to pay for meals, unless all other students do similar chores or work regardless  of
whether money is owed for meals.
(4)(a) A school district shall direct communications about amounts owed by a student for meals
to the student’s parent or guardian and not to the student.
(b) Nothing in this subsection prohibits a school district from sending home  a letter with a
student addressed to the parent or guardian of the student.
[5]
SB 1581
1
2
3
4
(5) A school district may not require a parent or guardian to pay fees  or costs from collection
agencies hired to collect moneys owed for meals.
SECTION 6.
This 2026 Act takes effect on July 1, 2026.
[6]