Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 459.488 is amended to read:
459.488. ORS 459.485 does not apply to:
(1) A  lamp used for image capture and projection, including photocopying, printing, directly or
in preprocessing, lithography, film and video projection and holography.
(2) A lamp that has a high proportion of ultraviolet light emission and is one of the following:
(a) A lamp  with high ultraviolet content that has ultraviolet power greater than two milliwatts
per kilolumen.
(b) A lamp for germicidal use, such as the destruction of DNA  (deoxyribonucleic acid), that
emits a peak radiation of approximately 253.7 nanometers.
(c) A lamp used for disinfection or fly trapping from which either:
(A) The radiation power emitted between 250  and 315 nanometers represents at least five per-
cent of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers; or
(B) The radiation power  emitted between 315 and 400 nanometers represents at least 20 percent
of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers.
(d) A lamp  used for the generation of ozone where the primary purpose is to emit radiation at
approximately 185.1 nanometers.
(e) A lamp used for coral zooxanthellae symbiosis from which the radiation  power emitted be-
tween 400 and 480 nanometers represents  at least 40 percent of the total radiation power emitted
between 250 and 800 nanometers.
(f) Any  lamp used in an electronic product designed to incorporate one or more ultraviolet lamps
and intended for irradiation  of any part of the living human body by ultraviolet radiation, with
wavelengths in air between 200 and 400 nanometers, to induce skin tanning.
(3) A lamp used in a medical device or otherwise used for medical or veterinary  diagnosis or
treatment.
(4) A lamp used in pharmaceutical product manufacturing or quality control.
(5) A lamp used for spectroscopy and photometric applications, including ultraviolet-visible
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4221
HB 3549
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
spectroscopy,  molecular  spectroscopy, atomic absorption spectroscopy, nondispersive infrared
(NDIR), Fourier transform infrared (FTIR), medical analysis, ellipsometry, layer thickness measure-
ment, process monitoring or environmental monitoring.
(6) A  lamp used by academic or research institutions exclusively for conducting research
projects or experiments.
(7) A compact fluorescent  lamp used to replace a lamp in a motor vehicle manufactured on or
before January 1, 2020.
(8) A lamp used for the care of animals.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]