Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 317.
SECTION 2. (1) There may be subtracted from federal taxable income for Oregon  tax
purposes the difference between the amount allowable as a deduction under section 168(k)
of the Internal Revenue Code as applicable to the tax year of the taxpayer  and the amount
allowable as a deduction under section 168(k) of the Internal  Revenue Code as amended and
in effect on December 21,  2017, and as applicable to tax years beginning before January 1,
2023, and to property placed in service after September 27, 2017, and before January 1, 2023.
(2) Amounts subtracted from federal taxable income for Oregon tax purposes under
subsection (1) of this section shall thereafter be added  to federal taxable income for Oregon
tax purposes in  the tax year for which the amounts would have been allowed as a deduction
on the taxpayer’s federal income  tax return under section 168(k) of the Internal Revenue
Code as amended and in effect on December 23, 2017,  and applicable to tax years beginning
on or after January 1, 2022.
SECTION 3.
There may be subtracted from federal taxable income for Oregon tax  pur-
poses the amount disallowable as a deduction for business interest  under section 163(j) of the
Internal Revenue Code, as applicable to the tax year of the taxpayer.
SECTION 4. (1) There may be subtracted from federal taxable income for Oregon tax
purposes the difference  between the amount allowable as a deduction under section 174 of
the Internal Revenue Code as applicable to the tax year  of the taxpayer and the amount al-
lowable as a deduction under section 174 of  the Internal Revenue Code as amended and in
effect on December 20, 2017, and applicable to tax years beginning before January 1, 2022.
(2) Amounts subtracted from federal taxable income for Oregon tax purposes under
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2357
HB 2113
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
subsection (1) of this section shall thereafter be added  to federal taxable income for Oregon
tax purposes in  the tax year for which the amounts would have been allowed as a deduction
on the taxpayer’s federal income tax return under section 174 of  the Internal Revenue Code
as amended and in effect on December 31, 2017, and applicable to tax years beginning  on or
after January 1, 2022.
SECTION 5.
(1) Section 2 this 2025 Act applies to tax years beginning  on or after January
1, 2025, and to property placed in service on or after January 1, 2025.
(2) Sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act apply to tax years beginning  on or after January 1,
2025.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]