Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 183.335, as amended by section 6, chapter 97, Oregon Laws 2022, is  amended
to read:
183.335. (1) Prior  to the adoption, amendment or repeal of any rule, the agency shall give notice
of its intended action:
(a) In the manner established by rule adopted  by the agency under ORS 183.341 (4), which pro-
vides a reasonable opportunity for interested  persons to be notified of the agency’s proposed action;
(b) In the bulletin referred to in ORS 183.360 at least 21 days prior to the effective date;
(c) At least 28 days before the effective date, to  persons who have requested notice pursuant to
subsection (8) of this section; and
(d) Delivered  only by electronic mail, at least 49 days before the effective date, to the persons
specified in subsection (15) of this section.
(2)(a) The notice required by subsection (1) of this section must include:
(A) A caption of not more than 15 words that  reasonably identifies the subject matter of the
agency’s intended action.  The agency shall include the caption on each separate notice, statement,
certificate or other similar document related to the intended action.
(B) An objective,  simple and understandable statement summarizing the subject matter and
purpose of the intended action in sufficient detail to inform a person that the person’s interests may
be affected, and the time, place and manner  in which interested persons may present their views on
the intended action.
(b) The agency shall include with the notice  of intended action given under subsection (1) of this
section:
(A) A citation of the statutory or other legal authority  relied upon and bearing upon the
promulgation of the rule;
(B) A citation of the statute or other law the rule is intended to implement;
(C) A statement of the need for the rule and a statement of how the  rule is intended to meet the
need;
(D) A  list of the principal documents, reports or studies, if any, prepared by or relied upon by
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 876
SB 42
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the agency in considering the  need for and in preparing the rule, and a statement of the location
at which those documents are available for  public inspection. The list may be abbreviated if neces-
sary, and if so abbreviated there shall be identified the location of a complete list;
(E) A statement of fiscal impact identifying state agencies,  units of local government and the
public that may be economically affected by the adoption, amendment or repeal of the rule  and an
estimate of  that economic impact on state agencies, units of local government and the public. In
considering the economic effect  of the proposed action on the public, the agency shall utilize avail-
able information to project any significant economic effect of that action on  businesses which shall
include a cost of compliance effect on small businesses affected , and shall consider resultant job
loss and consumer cost impacts . For  an agency specified in ORS 183.530, the statement of fiscal
impact shall also  include a housing cost impact statement as described in ORS 183.534 . An agency
may not state that the fiscal impact of the adoption, amendment or repeal of a rule  is inde-
terminate if the rule is expected to have a total fiscal impact on  all parties that exceeds
$100,000;
(F) A statement identifying how adoption of the rule will affect racial equity in this state;
(G) If an advisory committee is  not appointed under the provisions of ORS 183.333, an explana-
tion as to why no advisory committee was used to assist the agency in drafting the rule; and
(H) A request for public comment on whether  other options should be considered for achieving
the rule’s substantive goals while reducing the negative economic impact of the rule on business.
(c) The Secretary of State may omit the information  submitted under paragraph (b) of this sub-
section from publication in the bulletin referred to in ORS 183.360.
(d) When providing notice of an intended action under subsection (1)(c) of this  section, the
agency shall provide a copy of the rule that the agency proposes to adopt, amend or repeal,  or an
explanation of how the person may acquire a copy of the  rule. The copy of an amended rule shall
show all changes to the  rule by striking through material to be deleted and underlining all new
material, or by any other method that clearly shows all new and deleted material.
(3)(a) When an agency proposes to adopt, amend  or repeal a rule, it shall give interested persons
reasonable opportunity to submit data or views. Opportunity for oral hearing shall  be granted upon
request received from 10 persons or from an association having not less than 10 members before  the
earliest  date  that the rule could become effective after the giving of notice pursuant to subsection
(1) of  this section. An agency holding a hearing upon a request made under this subsection shall give
notice of the hearing at least 21 days before the hearing to the person  who has requested the
hearing, to persons who have requested notice pursuant to subsection (8) of this section  and to the
persons specified in subsection (15) of this section. The agency  shall publish notice of the hearing
in the bulletin referred to in ORS 183.360 at least  14 days before the hearing. The agency shall
consider fully any written or oral submission.
(b) If an agency is required to conduct an oral hearing under paragraph (a) of this subsection,
and the rule for which the hearing  is to be conducted applies only to a limited geographical area
within this state, or affects only a limited geographical area  within this state, the hearing shall be
conducted  within  the geographical area at the place most convenient for the majority of the resi-
dents within the geographical area. At least  14 days before a hearing conducted under this para-
graph, the agency shall publish notice of the hearing in the bulletin referred to in  ORS 183.360 and
in a newspaper of general circulation published within  the geographical area that is affected by the
rule or to which the rule applies.  If a newspaper of general circulation is not published within the
geographical area that is affected by  the rule or to which the rule applies, the publication shall be
[2]
SB 42
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
made in the newspaper of general circulation published closest to the geographical area.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the Department of Corrections and  the
State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision may adopt rules limiting participation  by adults
in custody in the proposed adoption, amendment or repeal of any rule to written submissions.
(d) If  requested by at least five persons before the earliest date that the rule could become ef-
fective after the agency gives notice pursuant to subsection (1) of this  section, the agency shall
provide a statement that identifies the objective of the rule and a  statement of how the agency will
subsequently determine whether the rule is in fact accomplishing that objective.
(e) If requested by at least 10 persons or by an association having not less  than 10
members before the  earliest date that the rule could become effective after the giving of
notice pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the  agency shall, before the rule becomes
effective, provide a third-party analysis of the fiscal impact of  the rule, as described in sub-
section (2)(b)(E)  of this section. The analysis required by this paragraph must be supported
by substantial evidence.
[(e)] (f) An agency  that receives data or views concerning proposed rules from interested per-
sons shall maintain a record of the data or views submitted. The record shall contain:
(A) All written materials submitted to an agency in response to  a notice of intent to adopt,
amend or repeal a rule.
(B) A recording or summary of  oral submissions received at hearings held for the purpose of
receiving those submissions.
(C) Any public comment received in response to  the request made under subsection (2)(b)(H) of
this section and the agency’s response to that comment.
(D) Any statements provided by the agency under paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(4) Upon request of an interested person received before the earliest date that the  rule could
become  effective  after the giving of notice pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the agency shall
postpone the date of its intended action no less than 21 nor more than 90 days in order to allow  the
requesting person an opportunity to submit data,  views or arguments concerning the proposed
action. Nothing in this subsection shall  preclude an agency from adopting a temporary rule pursuant
to subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections  (1) to (4) of this section, an agency may adopt, amend or sus-
pend a rule without prior notice or hearing or upon any abbreviated notice and  hearing that it finds
practicable, if the agency prepares:
(a) A statement of its findings that its failure to act promptly  will result in serious prejudice to
the public interest or the interest of the parties  concerned and the specific reasons for its findings
of prejudice;
(b) A citation  of the statutory or other legal authority relied upon and bearing upon the
promulgation of the rule;
(c) A statement of the need for the rule and a statement of how the rule is intended to meet the
need;
(d) A list of the principal documents, reports or  studies, if any, prepared by or relied upon by
the agency in considering the  need for and in preparing the rule, and a statement of the location
at which those documents are available for public inspection; and
(e) For an agency specified in  ORS 183.530, a housing cost impact statement as defined in ORS
183.534.
(6)(a) A rule adopted, amended or suspended under subsection (5) of this section  is temporary
[3]
SB 42
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and may be effective for a period of not  longer than 180 days. The adoption of a rule under this
subsection does not preclude the subsequent adoption of an  identical rule under subsections (1) to
(4) of this section.
(b) A rule temporarily suspended shall regain effectiveness  upon expiration of the temporary
period of suspension unless the rule is repealed under subsections (1) to (4) of this section.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (4) of this section, an agency may amend a rule without
prior notice or hearing if the amendment is solely for the purpose of:
(a) Changing the name of an agency by reason of a name change prescribed by law;
(b) Changing the name of a program, office  or division within an agency as long as the change
in name does not have a substantive effect on the functions of the program, office or division;
(c) Correcting spelling;
(d) Correcting grammatical mistakes in a manner that  does not alter the scope, application or
meaning of the rule;
(e) Correcting statutory or rule references;
(f) Correcting addresses or telephone numbers referred to in the rules; or
(g) Changing a term or phrase in order to conform with a change prescribed by law.
(8)(a) Any person may request in writing that an agency send to  the person copies of the
agency’s notices of intended action issued under subsection (1) of this section.  The person must
provide an address where the person elects to receive  notices. The address provided may be a postal
mailing address or, if the agency provides notice by electronic  mail, may be an electronic mailing
address.
(b) A request under this subsection must indicate that the person requests  one of the following:
(A) The person may request that the agency mail paper  copies of the proposed rule and other
information required by subsection (2) of this section to the postal mailing address.
(B) If the agency posts notices  of intended action on a website, the person may request that the
agency mail the  information required by subsection (2)(a) of this section to the postal mailing ad-
dress with a reference to the website where electronic copies  of the proposed rule and other infor-
mation required by subsection (2) of this section are posted.
(C) The person may  request that the agency electronically mail the information required by
subsection (2)(a) of this section to the electronic mailing address, and either  provide electronic
copies of the proposed rule and other information required by subsection  (2) of this section or pro-
vide a reference to a website where electronic copies  of the proposed rule and other information
required by subsection (2) of this section are posted.
(c) Upon receipt of any request under  this subsection, the agency shall acknowledge the request,
establish a mailing list and maintain a record of all  mailings made pursuant to the request. Agen-
cies may establish procedures for  establishing the mailing lists and keeping the mailing lists current.
Agencies by rule  may establish fees necessary to defray the costs of mailings and maintenance of
the lists.
(d) Members of the Legislative Assembly who receive notices under subsection  (15) of this sec-
tion may request that an agency furnish paper copies of the notices.
(9) This section does not apply to  rules establishing an effective date for a previously effective
rule or establishing a period during which a provision of a previously effective rule will apply.
(10) This section does not apply to ORS 279.835 to 279.855, 279A.140 to 279A.161, 279A.250 to
279A.290, 279A.990, 279B.050  to 279B.085, 279B.200 to 279B.240, 279B.270, 279B.275, 279B.280,
279C.360, 279C.365, 279C.370, 279C.375, 279C.380, 279C.385, 279C.500 to 279C.530, 279C.540, 279C.545,
[4]
SB 42
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
279C.550 to 279C.570, 279C.580, 279C.585, 279C.590, 279C.600 to 279C.625, 279C.650 to 279C.670  and
279C.800 to 279C.870 relating to public contracts and purchasing.
(11)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, a  rule is not valid unless adopted
in substantial compliance with the provisions of this section in effect on the  date that the notice
required under subsection (1) of this  section is delivered to the Secretary of State for the purpose
of publication in the bulletin referred to in ORS 183.360.
(b) In  addition to all other requirements with which rule adoptions must comply, a rule other
than a rule amended for a purpose described in subsection (7) of this  section is not valid if the rule
has not been submitted to the Legislative Counsel in the manner required by ORS  183.355 and
183.715.
(c) A rule is not subject to  judicial review or other challenge by reason of failing to comply with
subsection (2)(a)(A) of this section.
(12)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions  of subsection (11) of this section, but subject to paragraph
(b) of this subsection, an agency may  correct its failure to substantially comply with the require-
ments of subsections (2) and (5) of this section in adoption of a rule by an amended filing,  as long
as the noncompliance  did not substantially prejudice the interests of persons to be affected by the
rule.
(b) An agency may use an amended filing to  correct a failure to include a fiscal impact state-
ment in a notice of intended action, as required by subsection (2)(b)(E)  of this section, or to correct
an inaccurate  fiscal impact statement, only if the agency developed the fiscal impact statement with
the assistance of an advisory committee  or fiscal impact advisory committee appointed under ORS
183.333.
(13) Unless otherwise provided by statute, the adoption, amendment or repeal of a rule  by an
agency need not be based upon or supported by an evidentiary record.
(14) When an agency has established a deadline for comment on a proposed rule under the pro-
visions of subsection (3)(a) of this section, the agency may not extend that deadline for  another
agency or person unless the extension applies equally to all interested agencies and persons.  An
agency shall not consider any submission made by another  agency after the final deadline has
passed.
(15) The  notices required under subsections (1) and (3) of this section must be given by the
agency to the following persons:
(a) If the proposed adoption, amendment or repeal results from legislation  that was passed
within two years before notice is given under subsection (1) of this  section, notice shall be given to
the legislator who introduced the bill that subsequently was enacted into law, and  to the chair or
cochairs of all committees that reported the bill out, except for  those committees whose sole action
on the bill was referral to another committee.
(b) If the proposed adoption,  amendment or repeal does not result from legislation that was
passed within two years before notice is given under subsection (1) of this section,  notice shall be
given to the chair or cochairs of any interim or session committee with  authority over the subject
matter of the rule.
(c) If notice cannot be given under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, notice  shall be given
to the Speaker of the House  of Representatives and to the President of the Senate who are in office
on the date the notice is given.
(16)(a) Upon the request of a member of the Legislative Assembly or of a  person who would be
affected by a proposed adoption, amendment or  repeal, the committees receiving notice under sub-
[5]
SB 42
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
section (15) of this section shall review the proposed adoption, amendment or  repeal for compliance
with the legislation from which the proposed adoption, amendment or repeal results.
(b) The committees shall  submit their comments on the proposed adoption, amendment or repeal
to the agency proposing the adoption, amendment or repeal.
SECTION 2.
(1) As  used in this section, “agency” and “rule” have the meanings given
those terms in ORS 183.310.
(2) As part of the process of presenting budget  requests during each odd-numbered year
regular session of the Legislative Assembly, an agency  shall report to the Legislative Fiscal
Officer detailing the fiscal impact of rules adopted, amended or repealed by  the agency in the
current biennium. The report must describe rules adopted by the agency  that required or
caused:
(a) An increase in fees charged by the agency;
(b) Transfer of funds available to the agency of more than $50,000;
(c) Rededication of more than .5 full-time employees; or
(d) A need for new state resources in the next biennium of $100,000 or more.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 183.335 by section 1 of this 2023 Act apply to rules
for which notice of intended action is given on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
[6]