Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 6, chapter 68, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  [Section 5  of this 2016 Act is repealed on January 2, 2020 ] Section 5, chapter 68, Oregon
Laws 2016, as amended by section 1, chapter 137, Oregon Laws 2017, is repealed on  January
2, 2022.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated  to the Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $2.5 million for the purpose
of carrying out the provisions of section 5, chapter 68, Oregon Laws 2016.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1351