Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health  Authority shall study licensing requirements for hospi-
tals. The authority shall  submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to health no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4384