Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
INSURANCE COVERAGE
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is  added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Cervical cancer examination” means, for the purpose of detecting  the presence
of cervical cancer or precancerous lesions, a visualization of  the uterine cervix using both
the naked eye and a magnifying scope and the sampling of the cervical tissue by  biopsy or
excision.
(B) “Cervical cancer examination” includes follow-up examinations.
(b) “Follow-up examination”  means additional cervical cancer examinations, performed
at approximately six months and 12 months after a cervical cancer examination, to screen
for abnormalities in the uterine cervix or cervical tissue.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 283
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Except  as provided in ORS 742.008, a carrier offering a group health benefit plan or
an individual health benefit in this state that  reimburses the cost of cervical cancer exam-
inations may not impose on the  coverage of a medically necessary cervical cancer examina-
tion:
(a) A deductible;
(b) Coinsurance;
(c) A copayment; or
(d) Other out-of-pocket expenses.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 743B.005 is amended to read:
743B.005. For purposes of ORS 743.004, 743.007, 743.022, 743.416, 743.417, 743.535, 743A.101,
743B.003 to 743B.127, 743B.109, 743B.128, 743B.250 and 743B.323 and section 2 of this 2024 Act :
(1) “Actuarial certification” means a written statement by a member of  the American Academy
of Actuaries or other  individual acceptable to the Director of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services that a carrier is in compliance with the  provisions of ORS 743B.012 based upon
the person’s  examination, including a review of the appropriate records and of the actuarial as-
sumptions and methods used by the carrier in establishing premium rates for  small employer health
benefit plans.
(2) “Affiliate” of, or person “affiliated” with, a specified person  means any carrier who, directly
or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls or is controlled by  or is under common
control with a specified person. For purposes  of this definition, “control” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 732.548.
(3) “Affiliation period” means,  under the terms of a group health benefit plan issued by a health
care service contractor, a period:
(a) That is applied uniformly and without regard to any health  status related factors to an
enrollee or late enrollee;
(b) That must expire before any coverage becomes effective under the plan  for the enrollee or
late enrollee;
(c) During which no premium shall be charged to the enrollee or late enrollee; and
(d) That begins on the enrollee’s or late enrollee’s first date of  eligibility for coverage and runs
concurrently with any eligibility waiting period under the plan.
(4) “Bona fide association” means an association that:
(a) Has been in active existence for at least five years;
(b) Has been formed and maintained in good faith for purposes other than obtaining insurance;
(c) Does not condition  membership in the association on any factor relating to the health status
of an individual or the individual’s dependent or employee;
(d) Makes health insurance  coverage that is offered through the association available to all
members of the association  regardless of the health status of the member or individuals who are
eligible for coverage through the member;
(e) Does not make health insurance coverage that is offered through  the association available
other than in connection with a member of the association;
(f) Has a constitution and bylaws; and
(g) Is not owned or controlled by a carrier, producer or affiliate of a carrier or producer.
(5) “Carrier” means any person who provides health benefit plans in this state, including:
(a) A licensed insurance company;
(b) A health care service contractor;
[2]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) A health maintenance organization;
(d) An association or group of employers that provides benefits by means of a multiple employer
welfare arrangement and that:
(A) Is subject to ORS 750.301 to 750.341; or
(B) Is fully  insured and otherwise exempt under ORS 750.303 (4) but elects to be governed by
ORS 743B.010 to 743B.013; or
(e) Any  other person or corporation responsible for the payment of benefits or provision of ser-
vices.
(6) “Dependent” means  the spouse or child of an eligible employee, subject to applicable terms
of the health benefit plan covering the employee.
(7) “Eligible employee” means  an employee who is eligible for coverage under a group health
benefit plan.
(8) “Employee” means any individual employed by an employer.
(9) “Enrollee” means an employee, dependent of the employee  or an individual otherwise eligible
for a group or individual health benefit  plan who has enrolled for coverage under the terms of the
plan.
(10) “Exchange” means the health insurance exchange as defined in ORS 741.300.
(11) “Exclusion period” means a period during which specified treatments or services are  ex-
cluded from coverage.
(12) “Financial impairment” means that a carrier is not insolvent and is:
(a) Considered by the director to be potentially unable to fulfill its contractual obligations; or
(b) Placed under an  order of rehabilitation or conservation by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(13)(a) “Geographic  average rate” means the arithmetical average of the lowest premium and the
corresponding highest premium to  be charged by a carrier in a geographic area established by the
director for the carrier’s:
(A) Group health benefit plans offered to small employers; or
(B) Individual health benefit plans.
(b) “Geographic average  rate” does not include premium differences that are due to differences
in benefit design, age, tobacco use or family composition.
(14) “Grandfathered health plan” has the meaning prescribed  by rule by the United States Sec-
retaries of Labor, Health and Human Services and the Treasury pursuant  to 42 U.S.C. 18011(e) that
is in effect on January 1, 2017.
(15) “Group eligibility waiting period” means, with respect to a group  health benefit plan, the
period of  employment or membership with the group that a prospective enrollee must complete be-
fore plan coverage begins.
(16)(a) “Health benefit plan” means any:
(A) Hospital expense, medical expense or hospital or medical expense policy or certificate;
(B) Subscriber contract of a health care service contractor as defined in ORS 750.005; or
(C) Plan provided by a  multiple employer welfare arrangement or by another benefit arrange-
ment defined in the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974,  as amended, to the
extent that the plan is subject to state regulation.
(b) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(A) Coverage for accident only, specific disease or condition only, credit or disability income;
(B) Coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the federal government;
(C) Medicare supplement insurance policies;
[3]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) Coverage of TRICARE services pursuant to contracts with the federal government;
(E) Benefits delivered through a  flexible spending arrangement established pursuant to section
125 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, when  the benefits are provided in addition
to a group health benefit plan;
(F) Separately  offered long term care insurance, including, but not limited to, coverage of nurs-
ing home care, home health care and community-based care;
(G) Independent, noncoordinated, hospital-only  indemnity insurance or other fixed indemnity in-
surance;
(H) Short term health insurance policies;
(I) Dental only coverage;
(J) Vision only coverage;
(K) Stop-loss coverage that meets the requirements of ORS 742.065;
(L) Coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance;
(M) Insurance arising out of a workers’ compensation or similar law;
(N) Automobile medical payment insurance or insurance under which benefits  are payable with
or without regard to fault and that is statutorily  required to be contained in any liability insurance
policy or equivalent self-insurance; or
(O) Any employee welfare benefit plan that is exempt from state  regulation because of the fed-
eral Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended.
(17) “Individual health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan:
(a) That is issued to an individual policyholder; or
(b) That provides individual  coverage through a trust, association or similar group, regardless
of the situs of the policy or contract.
(18) “Initial enrollment period” means  a period of at least 30 days following commencement of
the first eligibility period for an individual.
(19) “Late enrollee” means an individual who enrolls in a group  health benefit plan subsequent
to the initial enrollment period during which  the individual was eligible for coverage but declined
to enroll. However, an eligible individual shall not be considered a late enrollee if:
(a) The individual qualifies for a special enrollment period in accordance with 42  U.S.C. 300gg
or as prescribed by rule by the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(b) The individual applies for coverage during an open enrollment period;
(c) A court issues an order that coverage  be provided for a spouse or minor child under an
employee’s employer sponsored health benefit  plan and request for enrollment is made within 30
days after issuance of the court order;
(d) The individual is employed by an employer  that offers multiple health benefit plans and the
individual elects a different health benefit plan during an open enrollment period; or
(e) The  individual’s coverage under Medicaid, Medicare, TRICARE, Indian Health Service or a
publicly sponsored or subsidized health plan, including, but not limited  to, the medical assistance
program under ORS chapter 414, has been involuntarily terminated within  63 days after applying for
coverage in a group health benefit plan.
(20) “Multiple employer welfare arrangement” means a multiple employer  welfare arrangement
as defined in section 3 of the federal  Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended,
29 U.S.C. 1002, that is subject to ORS 750.301 to 750.341.
(21) “Preexisting  condition exclusion” means a limitation or exclusion of benefits or a denial of
coverage based on a medical condition being present  before the effective date of coverage or before
[4]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the date coverage  is denied, whether or not any medical advice, diagnosis, care or treatment was
recommended or received for the condition before the date of coverage or denial of coverage.
(22) “Premium” includes insurance premiums  or other fees charged for a health benefit plan,
including the costs of benefits paid or reimbursements made to or on  behalf of enrollees covered by
the plan.
(23) “Rating period” means the 12-month calendar period for which premium rates  established
by a carrier are in effect, as determined by the carrier.
(24) “Representative” does not include an insurance producer or an employee  or authorized
representative of an insurance producer or carrier.
(25)(a) “Short term health insurance policy” means a policy of health  insurance that is in effect
for a period of three months or less, including the term of a renewal of the policy.
(b) As used in this subsection, “term of a renewal” includes the term of a new  short term health
insurance policy issued by an  insurer to a policyholder no later than 60 days after the expiration
of a short term health insurance policy issued by the insurer to the policyholder.
(26) “Small employer” means an employer who  employed an average of at least one but not more
than 50 full-time equivalent employees on business days during the  preceding calendar year and who
employs at least one full-time equivalent employee on the first day of the plan year, determined  in
accordance with a methodology prescribed by the Department of Consumer and Business Services
by rule.
SECTION 4.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act applies to policies or certificates of insurance is-
sued, renewed or extended on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 5. Section 6 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 6. (1) As used in this section, “continuous glucose monitor” means:
(a) An instrument or device that is  designed and offered for the purpose of measuring
glucose levels at set intervals by means of a small electrode  placed under the skin and held
in place by an adhesive; and
(b) Any repair or replacement parts for the instrument or device.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 414.065 or  414.690, medical assistance shall include a continuous
glucose monitor prescribed for a recipient of medical assistance if the recipient:
(a)(A) Is diagnosed with any type of diabetes that requires the use of insulin;
(B) Has evidence of level two or three hypoglycemia; or
(C) Is diagnosed with glycogen storage disease type 1a; and
(b) At least once every six months attends a visit with a health care provider in  order
to assess the benefits of the recipient’s use of the continuous glucose monitor.
SECTION 7.
Section 6 of this 2024 Act applies to  prescriptions issued on or after the ef-
fective date of this 2024 Act.
DENTAL LABORATORY REGISTRATION
SECTION 8. As used in sections 8 to 12 of this 2024 Act:
(1) “Certified dental laboratory technician” means a dental laboratory technician who is
certified by the National  Board for Certification in Dental Laboratory Technology, or its
successor organization, as approved by the Health Licensing Office by rule.
(2) “Dental  laboratory” means a facility where one or more dental laboratory technicians
make, provide, repair or alter dental prosthetic appliances and other artificial materials and
[5]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
devices that are returned to a dentist and  inserted into the human oral cavity, or that come
into contact  with the human oral cavity’s adjacent structures and tissues, of a dental pa-
tient.
(3) “Dental laboratory technician” means a person who, pursuant to a dentist’s pre-
scribed work order, makes, provides, repairs or alters dental prosthetic appliances and other
artificial materials and devices that are returned to  the dentist and inserted into the human
oral cavity, or that come into contact with the human oral  cavity’s adjacent structures and
tissues, of the dentist’s patient.
(4) “Dentist” means a dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679.
(5) “Material content disclosure” means a  notice provided to a dentist by a dental labo-
ratory that includes:
(a) The name, physical address and registration number of the dental laboratory;
(b) The city, state and country of origin  where the technological work under the work
order was performed in whole or in part;
(c) The city, state and country of the dental laboratory or dental  laboratories that man-
ufactured or repaired, directly  or indirectly, the dental prosthetic appliances or other artifi-
cial materials and devices ordered under the work order; and
(d) So that the dentist may include the information in the patient’s record, the man-
ufacturer and brand name or the United  States Food and Drug Administration registration
number of all patient contact materials used in a  dental prosthetic appliance or other arti-
ficial material  or device that is inserted into the human oral cavity, or that comes into
contact with the human oral cavity’s adjacent structures  and tissues, of the dentist’s pa-
tient.
(6) “Responsible person” means the person who:
(a) Controls a majority interest in a dental laboratory; or
(b) Is primarily responsible for the supervision  of the day-to-day operations of the dental
laboratory.
(7) “Work order” means a written instrument prescribed by a  dentist that directs a
dental laboratory to, for an individual patient, make, provide, repair or alter one  or more
dental prosthetic appliances or  other artificial materials or devices that will be returned to
the dentist and inserted into the human oral cavity, or that will come into  contact with the
human oral cavity’s adjacent structures and tissues, of the dentist’s patient.
SECTION 9.
(1) A dental laboratory may not operate or do business in this state  unless
the dental laboratory holds an active registration issued by the Health Licensing Office under
section 10 of this 2024 Act.
(2) A dental laboratory is considered to operate or do business in this state if the  dental
laboratory is physically  located within this state or prepares work product pursuant to a
work order that originated from a dentist licensed in this state.
(3)(a) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a dental laboratory that:
(A) Is in a dental office;
(B) Is owned and operated by and under the supervision of a practicing dentist; and
(C) Does  not perform work pursuant to work orders that originate from outside of the
dentist’s practice.
(b) A dental laboratory described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection shall annually file
with the office:
[6]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The address of the dental laboratory; and
(B) The name, license number and contact information of the dentist described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection.
(4) A dental laboratory operated as part of an educational program  is not required to
register under section 10 of this 2024 Act if the dental laboratory  is operated solely for the
purpose of allowing students to perform duties that are part of a supervised  course of study
in an educational program that meets any of the accreditation standards described in  ORS
chapter 679.
SECTION 10.
(1) The Health Licensing  Office shall issue a dental laboratory registration
to an applicant that submits  a completed application and pays the fee established under ORS
676.576. The application must include:
(a) The name, mailing address, phone number and  electronic mail address of the dental
laboratory;
(b) The physical address of the dental laboratory if different than the mailing address;
(c) The name, mailing address, phone number and electronic mail address of the respon-
sible person or the name and license number of the dentist who supervises the dental  labo-
ratory;
(d) A statement that  the dental laboratory meets the infectious disease control require-
ments of the federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration and the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention; and
(e) An acknowledgement  by the responsible person or the dentist supervising the dental
laboratory that the dental laboratory will comply with the requirements  of section 11 of this
2024 Act.
(2) To  be eligible for registration under this section, the applicant must include with the
application documentation that the applicant, or an employee of  the applicant who works at
least 30 hours per week in the dental laboratory:
(a) Has successfully completed, during the 12 months immediately preceding the applica-
tion for registration, at least 12 hours of continuing education  in dental laboratory technol-
ogy approved or accepted by the  National Board for Certification in Dental Laboratory
Technology, or its successor organization, and by the Health Licensing Office;
(b) Is a certified dental laboratory technician in good standing; or
(c) Is a dentist.
(3) The office shall assign a registration number to each registered dental laboratory. The
dental laboratory shall include the dental laboratory registration number on all invoices  and
other correspondence of the dental laboratory.
(4) A dental laboratory registered under this  section shall maintain a qualified employee
as described in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) A dental laboratory registration is valid for one year. To renew a  dental laboratory
registration, the dental laboratory shall, prior to July 31 of each year,  submit to the office
an application for renewal and pay the applicable fee.
(6) The office may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 11.
(1) A dental laboratory registered under section 10 of this 2024 Act shall
provide to a prescribing dentist who submits a work order to the dental laboratory:
(a) A material content disclosure for each dental prosthetic appliance or other  artificial
material or device in a manner that is easily entered into the patient record; and
[7]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The point of origin of the manufacture of each dental prosthetic appliance or other
artificial material or device ordered under the work order.
(2) If a dental prosthetic appliance or other artificial material  or device ordered under
the work order was partially or entirely manufactured by  one or more third parties, the
point of origin disclosure described in subsection (1) of this section must identify:
(a) The portion of the dental prosthetic appliance or  other artificial material or device
that was manufactured by the third party; and
(b) The city, state and country of each third party.
SECTION 12.
In the manner prescribed in ORS chapter 183 for contested cases, the
Health Licensing Office may impose  a form of discipline listed in ORS 676.612 against a dental
laboratory registered under section 10  of this 2024 Act for any violation of sections 8 to 12
of this 2024 Act and for any  violation of a rule adopted under sections 8 to 12 of this 2024
Act.
SECTION 13. Violation of section 9 of this 2024 Act is a Class B violation.
SECTION 14. The Health Licensing Office may adopt rules to carry out sections 8  to 12
of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 15.  Section 10 of this 2024 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  (1) The Health Licensing Office shall issue a dental laboratory registration  to an ap-
plicant that submits a  completed application and pays the fee established under ORS 676.576. The
application must include:
(a) The name, mailing address, phone number and electronic mail address of the dental  labora-
tory;
(b) The physical address of the dental laboratory if different than the mailing address;
(c) The name, mailing address, phone number and electronic mail address of  the responsible
person or the name and license number of the dentist who supervises the dental laboratory;
(d) A statement that the dental laboratory  meets the infectious disease control requirements of
the federal Occupational Safety and  Health Administration and the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention;  and
(e) An acknowledgement by the responsible person or the dentist supervising the dental labora-
tory that the dental laboratory will comply with the requirements of section 11 of this 2024 Act.
[(2) To be eligible for  registration under this section, the applicant must include with the applica-
tion documentation that  the applicant, or an employee of the applicant who works at least 30 hours per
week in the dental laboratory: ]
[(a) Has successfully completed, during the 12 months immediately preceding the application for
registration, at least 12 hours of continuing education in dental laboratory technology  approved or ac-
cepted by the National Board for Certification in Dental Laboratory Technology, or its successor  or-
ganization, and by the Health Licensing Office; ]
[(b) Is a certified dental laboratory technician in good standing; or ]
[(c) Is a dentist. ]
(2)(a) To be eligible  for registration under this section, the applicant must include with
the application documentation that the dental laboratory:
(A) Employs a certified dental laboratory technician in  good standing with the National
Board for Certification in Dental Laboratory Technology, or its successor organization,  and
approved by the Health Licensing Office by rule and who  works at least 30 hours per week
in the dental laboratory; or
[8]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Is operated under the supervision of a dentist who works at least 30  hours per week
in the dental laboratory.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to  a dental laboratory that provides
to the office documentation that the dental laboratory has been continuously owned and  op-
erated by the same individual since January 1, 2013.
(3) The office shall assign  a registration number to each registered dental laboratory. The dental
laboratory  shall  include the dental laboratory registration number on all invoices and other corre-
spondence of the dental laboratory.
(4) A dental laboratory registered under this  section shall maintain a qualified employee as de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) A dental laboratory registration is valid for one year. To renew a dental laboratory regis-
tration, the dental laboratory shall, prior to July 31 of each year, submit to  the office an application
for renewal and pay the applicable fee.
(6) The office may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 679.176 is amended to read:
679.176. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Sub-work order” means a written instrument by which a dental laboratory registered
under section 10 of this 2024 Act subcontracts all or part of the work directed  to be done by
a work order prescribed by a dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679.
(b) “Work order” has the meaning given that term in section 8 of this 2024 Act.
[(1)] (2) [No] A dentist may not use the services of any person[ ,] who is not licensed  to practice
dentistry in this state[ , to construct, alter, repair, reline, reproduce  or duplicate any prosthetic denture,
bridge, appliance or any other structure to be worn in the human mouth, ] to make,  provide, repair
or alter dental prosthetic appliances  or other artificial materials or devices that are returned
to a dentist and inserted into  the human oral cavity, or that come into contact with the
human oral cavity’s adjacent structures and tissues,  unless the dentist first [ furnishes to  such ]
provides to the  person a [ written] work order, in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(Date) , 2
TO: (Name of dental [ technician or ] laboratory with address) (Dental laboratory registration
number)
RE: (Name or number of patient)
(Description of the work to be done, including diagrams  if necessary, together with specifica-
tions of the type of materials to be used.)
(Name of ordering dentist)
(Address) 
(Current license number) 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(3) A person that receives  a work order prescribed by a dentist under subsection (1) of
this section may not engage as a subcontractor another person that is not authorized  to
perform the services necessary to complete the work order unless the person that  receives
the work order first provides to the subcontractor a sub-work  order in substantially the
[9]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
following form:
(Date) , 2
TO: (Name of subcontracted dental laboratory with address) (Subcontracted dental  labora-
tory registration number, if applicable)
RE: (Name or number of patient)
(Description of the work to be done, including diagrams if necessary, together with
specifications of the type of materials to be used.)
(Name of ordering dental laboratory)
(Address) 
(Current dental laboratory registration number) 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
[(2)] (4)(a) [ A duplicate copy of each such work order issued by the dentist  shall be retained by
each dentist for not less  than two years. The Oregon Board of Dentistry or its agents shall be permitted
to inspect,  upon demand, the duplicate copies of all such work orders retained by each dentist. ] A
dentist shall retain for at least two years from  the date of prescription a duplicate copy of
each work order prescribed by the dentist.
(b) A person described in subsection (3) of this section shall attach a duplicate  copy of
each sub-work order issued by the person to a duplicate  copy of the associated work order
and shall retain the duplicate copies for at least two years from the date of issuance.
(c) The Oregon Board of Dentistry, or an agent of  the board, may inspect, upon demand,
the duplicate copies of all work orders and sub-work orders retained pursuant to this  sub-
section.
(5) A work order or sub-work order may be transmitted or retained in an  electronic
format.
[(3)] (6) [ No] A work order [ shall] may not  permit or require the taking of impressions of any
part of the human oral cavity by any person [ not a dentist licensed by the board ] who is not a
dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679 .
SECTION 17.  ORS 676.565 is amended to read:
676.565. Pursuant to ORS 676.568,  the Health Licensing Office shall provide administrative and
regulatory oversight and centralized service for the following boards, councils and programs:
(1) Board of Athletic Trainers, as provided in ORS 688.701 to 688.734;
(2) Board of Cosmetology, as provided in ORS 690.005 to 690.225;
(3) State Board of Denture Technology, as provided in ORS 680.500 to 680.565;
(4) State Board of Direct Entry Midwifery, as provided in ORS 687.405 to 687.495;
(5) Respiratory Therapist and Polysomnographic  Technologist Licensing Board, as provided in
ORS 688.800 to 688.840;
(6) Environmental Health Registration Board, as provided in ORS chapter 700;
(7) Board of Electrologists and Body Art Practitioners, as provided in ORS 690.350 to 690.410;
(8) Advisory Council on Hearing Aids, as provided in ORS 694.015 to 694.170;
(9) Sexual Offense Treatment Board, as provided in ORS 675.365 to 675.410;
(10) Long Term Care Administrators Board, as provided in ORS 678.710 to 678.820;
[10]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(11) Board of Licensed Dietitians, as provided in ORS 691.405 to 691.485;
(12) Behavior Analysis Regulatory Board, as provided in ORS 676.806;
(13) Board of Certified Advanced Estheticians, as provided in ORS 676.630 to 676.660;
(14) Art therapy, as provided in ORS 681.740 to 681.758;
(15) Lactation consultation, as provided in ORS 676.665 to 676.689;
(16) Music therapy, as provided in ORS 681.700 to 681.730;
(17) Genetic counseling, as provided in ORS 676.730 to 676.748;
(18) State Board of Sign Language Interpreters, as provided in ORS 676.750 to 676.789; [ and]
(19) Temporary staffing agencies, as provided in ORS 676.695 to 676.725[ .]; and
(20) Dental laboratories, as provided in sections 8 to 12 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 676.579 is amended to read:
676.579. (1)(a) The Health Licensing  Office is under the supervision and control of a director,
who is responsible for the performance of the duties, functions and powers and  for the organization
of the office.
(b) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority shall establish the qualifications for  and ap-
point the  Director of the Health Licensing Office, who holds office at the pleasure of the Director
of the Oregon Health Authority.
(c) The Director of the Health Licensing Office shall receive  a salary as provided by law or, if
not so provided, as prescribed by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(d) The Director of the Health Licensing Office is in the unclassified service.
(2) The Director of the Health Licensing Office shall  provide the boards, councils and programs
administered by the office  with any services and employees as the office requires to carry out the
office’s duties. Subject to any applicable provisions of the  State Personnel Relations Law, the Di-
rector of the Health Licensing Office shall appoint all subordinate officers and employees of the of-
fice, prescribe their duties and fix their compensation.
(3) The Director of the Health  Licensing Office is responsible for carrying out the duties, func-
tions and powers under ORS 675.365 to 675.410, 676.560 to 676.625, 676.630 to 676.660, 676.665 to
676.689, 676.695 to 676.725,  676.730 to 676.748, 676.750 to 676.789, 676.810, 676.815, 676.825, 676.992,
678.710 to 678.820, 680.500 to 680.565, 681.700 to 681.730, 681.740 to 681.758,  687.405 to 687.495,
687.895, 688.701 to 688.734,  688.800 to 688.840, 690.005 to 690.225, 690.350 to 690.410, 691.405 to
691.485 and 694.015 to 694.170 and ORS chapter 700 and sections 8 to 12 of this 2024 Act .
(4) The enumeration of duties, functions and powers in  subsection (3) of this section is not in-
tended to be exclusive or to limit the duties,  functions and powers imposed on or vested in the office
by other statutes.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 676.590 is amended to read:
676.590. (1) Information obtained by the Health Licensing Office as part of an  investigation
conducted under the  following laws and any reports issued by an investigator are exempt from
public disclosure:
(a) ORS 676.630 to 676.660, 676.665 to 676.689, 676.695 to 676.725, 676.730  to 676.748, 676.750 to
676.789, 681.700 to 681.730, 681.740 to 681.758, 690.005 to  690.225, 690.350 to 690.410 or 694.015 to
694.170 and sections 8 to 12 of this 2024 Act .
(b) ORS 676.560 to 676.625 if the investigation is related to the regulation of:
(A) Advanced nonablative esthetics under ORS 676.630 to 676.660;
(B) Lactation consultation under ORS 676.665 to 676.689;
(C) Music therapy under ORS 681.700 to 681.730;
[11]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) Art therapy under ORS 681.740 to 681.758;
(E) Barbering, hair design, esthetics, nail technology or natural hair care  under ORS 690.005 to
690.225;
(F) Electrologists and body art practitioners under ORS 690.350 to 690.410;
(G) Dealing in hearing aids under ORS 694.015 to 694.170;
(H) Genetic counseling under ORS 676.730 to 676.748;
(I) Signed language interpretation under ORS 676.750 to 676.789; [ or]
(J) Temporary staffing agencies under ORS 676.695 to 676.725 ; or
(K) Dental laboratories under sections 8 to 12 of this 2024 Act .
(2) The office  shall disclose information obtained as part of an investigation described in sub-
section (1) of this section to a person  who demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that the
public interest in disclosure outweighs other interests in nondisclosure, including the  public interest
in nondisclosure.
(3) A  complaint that forms the basis for an investigation described in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion shall not  be considered information obtained as part of an investigation and is not exempt from
public disclosure.
(4) Upon request, the office shall disclose to a  person against whom disciplinary action is sought
any information obtained as part of an investigation described  in subsection (1) of this section, if the
information is not otherwise privileged or confidential under state or federal law.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 676.612 is amended to read:
676.612. (1) Subject to ORS 676.616 and 687.445, and  in the manner prescribed in ORS chapter
183 for contested cases and as specified in  ORS 675.385, 676.660, 676.685, 676.745, 676.777, 676.825,
678.780, 680.535, 681.733, 681.755, 687.445, 688.734,  688.836, 690.167, 690.407, 691.477, 694.147 and
700.111 and section 12 of this 2024 Act , the Health  Licensing Office may refuse to issue or renew,
may suspend  or revoke or may otherwise condition or limit an authorization or may discipline or
place on probation an authorization holder for commission of the  prohibited acts listed in subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) A person subject  to the authority of a board, council or program listed in ORS 676.565
commits a prohibited act if the person engages in:
(a) Fraud, misrepresentation, concealment of material facts  or deception in applying for or ob-
taining an authorization to practice in this state, or in any written or oral communication to  the
office concerning the issuance or retention of the authorization.
(b) Using, causing  or promoting the use of any advertising matter, promotional literature, testi-
monial, guarantee, warranty, label, insignia or  any other representation, however disseminated or
published, that is false, misleading or deceptive.
(c) Making a representation that  the authorization holder knew or should have known is false
or misleading  regarding skill or the efficacy or value of treatment or remedy administered by the
authorization holder.
(d) Practicing under a false, misleading or deceptive name, or impersonating  another authori-
zation holder.
(e) Permitting a person other than the authorization holder to use the authorization.
(f) Practicing with a physical or mental condition that presents an unreasonable risk  of harm
to the authorization holder or to the  person or property of others in the course of performing the
authorization holder’s duties.
(g) Practicing while under the influence of alcohol, cannabis,  controlled substances or other
[12]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
skill-impairing substances, or engaging in the illegal  use of controlled substances or other skill-
impairing substances so as to create a risk of  harm to the person or property of others in the course
of performing the duties of an authorization holder.
(h) Failing to properly and reasonably accept responsibility for the actions of employees.
(i) Employing, directly or indirectly, any suspended, uncertified, unlicensed or  unregistered per-
son to practice a regulated occupation  or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils
and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(j) Unprofessional conduct, negligence, incompetence, repeated violations or  any departure from
or failure to conform to standards of  practice in performing services or practicing in a regulated
occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils  and programs listed under
ORS 676.565.
(k) Conviction of any criminal offense, subject to ORS 670.280.  A copy of the record of con-
viction, certified by the clerk of the court entering the  conviction, is conclusive evidence of the
conviction. A plea  of no contest or an admission of guilt is a conviction for purposes of this para-
graph.
(L) Failing to report  any adverse action, as required by statute or rule, taken against the au-
thorization holder by another regulatory jurisdiction or any peer  review body, health care institu-
tion, professional association, governmental agency, law enforcement agency or  court for acts or
conduct similar to acts or conduct  that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action as described
in this section.
(m) Violation of a statute regulating an occupation or profession  subject to the authority of the
boards, councils and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(n) Violation of any rule regulating an occupation or profession  subject to the authority of the
boards, councils and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(o) Failing to cooperate with the office in any investigation, inspection or  request for informa-
tion.
(p) Selling or fraudulently obtaining or furnishing an authorization to  practice in a regulated
occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils and programs  listed in ORS
676.565, or aiding or abetting such an act.
(q) Selling or fraudulently obtaining or furnishing any record related to practice  in a regulated
occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils and programs  listed in ORS
676.565, or aiding or abetting such an act.
(r) Failing to pay an outstanding civil penalty or fee that is due or failing to meet the terms of
any order issued by the office that has become final.
(3) For the purpose of requesting a  state or nationwide criminal records check under ORS
181A.195, the office may require the fingerprints of a person who is:
(a) Applying for an authorization;
(b) Applying for renewal of an authorization; or
(c) Under investigation by the office.
(4) If the office places an authorization holder on probation  under subsection (1) of this section,
the office, in consultation with the appropriate  board, council or program, may determine and at any
time modify the conditions of the probation.
(5) If an authorization is suspended,  the authorization holder may not practice during the term
of suspension. Upon the expiration of the term of suspension, the authorization may be  reinstated
by the office if the conditions  of suspension no longer exist and the authorization holder has satis-
[13]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
fied all requirements in the relevant statutes or administrative rules for issuance, renewal or  rein-
statement.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 676.613 is amended to read:
676.613. (1) In addition to all other remedies, when it appears to the Health Licensing Office that
a person is engaged in, has engaged in or is about to engage in  any act, practice or transaction that
violates any provision of  ORS 675.365 to 675.410, 676.630 to 676.660, 676.665 to 676.689, 676.695 to
676.725, 676.730 to 676.748, 676.750 to 676.789, 676.810, 676.815, 678.710 to  678.820, 680.500 to 680.565,
681.700 to 681.730, 681.740  to 681.758, 687.405 to 687.495, 688.701 to 688.734, 688.800 to 688.840,
690.005 to 690.225, 690.350 to 690.410, 691.405 to 691.485  or 694.015 to 694.170 or ORS chapter 700
or sections 8 to 12 of this 2024  Act , the office may, through the Attorney General or the district
attorney  of  the county in which the act, practice or transaction occurs or will occur, apply to the
court for an injunction restraining the person from the act, practice or transaction.
(2) A court may issue an injunction under this section without  proof of actual damages. An in-
junction issued under this section does not relieve a person from any  other prosecution or enforce-
ment action taken for violation of statutes listed in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 22.  ORS 676.622 is amended to read:
676.622. (1) A transaction conducted through a state or  local system or network that provides
electronic  access  to the Health Licensing Office information and services is exempt from any re-
quirement under ORS 675.365 to 675.410, 676.560 to 676.625, 676.630 to 676.660,  676.665 to 676.689,
676.695 to 676.725, 676.730 to 676.748, 676.750 to 676.789, 676.810, 676.815,  676.992, 680.500 to 680.565,
681.700 to 681.730, 681.740 to 681.758, 687.405 to 687.495, 688.701 to 688.734,  688.800 to 688.840,
690.005 to 690.225, 690.350 to 690.410, 691.405 to 691.485 and 694.015 to 694.170 and ORS  chapter 700
and sections 8 to 12 of this 2024 Act , and rules adopted thereunder, requiring an original signature
or the submission of handwritten materials.
(2) Electronic signatures subject to ORS 84.001 to 84.061  and facsimile signatures are acceptable
and have the same force as original signatures.
SECTION 23.  ORS 676.992 is amended to read:
676.992. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, and in  addition to any other
penalty or remedy provided by law, the Health Licensing Office may impose a  civil penalty not to
exceed $5,000 for each violation of  the following statutes and any rule adopted under the following
statutes:
(a) ORS 688.701 to 688.734 (athletic training);
(b) ORS 690.005 to 690.225 (cosmetology);
(c) ORS 680.500 to 680.565 (denture technology);
(d) Subject to ORS 676.616 and 687.445, ORS 687.405 to 687.495 (direct entry midwifery);
(e) ORS 690.350  to 690.410 (tattooing, electrolysis, body piercing, earlobe piercing, dermal im-
planting and scarification);
(f) ORS 694.015 to 694.170 (dealing in hearing aids);
(g) ORS 688.800 to 688.840 (respiratory therapy and polysomnography);
(h) ORS chapter 700 (environmental sanitation);
(i) ORS 675.365 to 675.410 (sexual abuse specific treatment);
(j) ORS  678.710 to 678.820 (nursing home administrators and residential care facility adminis-
trators);
(k) ORS 691.405 to 691.485 (dietitians);
(L) ORS 676.612 (prohibited acts);
[14]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(m) ORS 676.802 to 676.830 (applied behavior analysis);
(n) ORS 681.700 to 681.730 (music therapy);
(o) ORS 676.630 to 676.660 (advanced nonablative esthetics procedure);
(p) ORS 681.740 to 681.758 (art therapy);
(q) ORS 676.665 to 676.689 (lactation consultation);
(r) ORS 676.730 to 676.748 (genetic counseling); [ and]
(s) ORS 676.750 to 676.789 (signed language interpretation)[ .]; and
(t) Sections 8 to 12 of this 2024 Act (dental laboratories).
(2) The office may take any other disciplinary action that it finds proper,  including but not
limited to  assessment of costs of disciplinary proceedings, not to exceed $5,000, for violation of any
statute listed in subsection (1) of this section or any  rule adopted under any statute listed in sub-
section (1) of this section.
(3) Subsection  (1) of this section does not limit the amount of the civil penalty resulting from a
violation of ORS 694.042.
(4) In imposing a civil penalty under this section,  the office shall consider the following factors:
(a) The immediacy and extent to which the violation threatens the public health or safety;
(b) Any prior violations of statutes, rules or orders;
(c) The history of the person incurring a penalty in taking all feasible steps to correct any vio-
lation; and
(d) Any other aggravating or mitigating factors.
(5) Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
(6) The moneys received by the office from civil penalties  under this section shall be deposited
in the  Health Licensing Office Account and are continuously appropriated to the office for the ad-
ministration and enforcement of the laws the office is  charged with administering and enforcing that
govern the person against whom the penalty was imposed.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 679.010 is amended to read:
679.010. As used in this chapter and ORS 680.010 to  680.205, unless the context requires other-
wise:
(1) “Dental assistant” means a person who, under the supervision of a  dentist or dental thera-
pist, renders assistance to a dentist, dental therapist, dental hygienist, dental technician  or another
dental assistant or who, under the supervision of a  dental hygienist, renders assistance to a dental
hygienist providing dental hygiene.
(2) “Dental hygiene” is that portion of dentistry that includes, but is not limited to:
(a) The rendering of educational, preventive and therapeutic dental services and diagnosis  and
treatment planning for such services;
(b) Prediagnostic risk  assessment, scaling, root planing, curettage, the application of sealants
and fluoride and any related intraoral or extraoral procedure  required in the performance of such
services; and
(c) Prescribing, dispensing and administering prescription drugs for the services  described in
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(3) “Dental hygienist” means a person who, under the supervision of  a dentist, practices dental
hygiene.
(4) “Dental technician” means a  person who, at the authorization of a dentist, makes, provides,
repairs or alters [ oral] dental prosthetic appliances and other artificial materials  and devices that
are returned to a dentist and inserted into the human oral cavity or that come  in contact with its
[15]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
adjacent structures and tissues.
(5) “Dental therapist” means a person licensed to practice dental therapy under ORS 679.603.
(6) “Dental therapy” means the provision of preventive dental care, restorative  dental treatment
and other educational, clinical and therapeutic patient services as part of a  dental care team, in-
cluding the services described under ORS 679.621.
(7) “Dentist” means a person  who may perform any intraoral or extraoral procedure required
in the practice of dentistry.
(8) “Dentist of record” means  a dentist that either authorizes treatment for, supervises treat-
ment of  or provides treatment for a patient in a dental office or clinic owned or operated by an in-
stitution as described in ORS 679.020 (3).
(9)(a) “Dentistry” means the healing art concerned with:
(A) The examination,  diagnosis, treatment planning, treatment, care and prevention of conditions
within the human oral cavity  and maxillofacial region, and of conditions of adjacent or related tis-
sues and structures; and
(B) The prescribing,  dispensing and administering of prescription drugs for purposes related to
the activities described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(b) “Dentistry” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) The cutting, altering, repairing, removing, replacing or repositioning  of hard or soft tissues
and other  acts or procedures as determined by the Oregon Board of Dentistry and included in the
curricula  of:
(i) Dental schools accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental
Association;
(ii) Post-graduate training programs; or
(iii) Continuing education courses.
(B) The prescription and administration of vaccines.
(10) “Direct supervision” means supervision requiring that a dentist diagnose the condition  to
be treated, that a dentist authorize the procedure to be performed, and that  a dentist remain in the
dental treatment room while the procedures are performed.
(11) “Expanded practice dental hygienist” means a  dental hygienist who performs dental hygiene
services in accordance with ORS 680.205 as authorized by an expanded  practice dental hygienist
permit issued by the board under ORS 680.200.
(12) “General supervision” means supervision requiring that a dentist  authorize the procedures
by standing  orders, practice agreements or collaboration agreements, but not requiring that a den-
tist be present when the authorized  procedures are performed. The authorized procedures may also
be performed at a place other than the usual place of practice of the dentist.
(13) “Indirect supervision” means supervision requiring that a dentist  authorize the procedures
and that a dentist be on the premises while the procedures are performed.
SECTION 25.
ORS 679.530 is repealed.
SECTION 26. (1) Sections 8 to 12 of this 2024 Act, the amendments to ORS  676.565,
676.579, 676.590, 676.612, 676.613, 676.622, 676.992, 679.010 and 679.176 by sections 16 to 24 of this
2024 Act and the repeal of ORS  679.530 by section 25 of this 2024 Act become operative on
January 1, 2025.
(2) The amendments to section 10 of this 2024 Act by  section 15 of this 2024 Act become
operative on January 1, 2029.
(3) The Health Licensing Office may take any  action before the operative date specified
[16]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable  the office to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on  the office by sections 8 to 12 of this 2024 Act, the amendments to
ORS 676.565, 676.579, 676.590, 676.612, 676.613, 676.622, 676.992, 679.010 and 679.176 by sections
16 to 24 of this 2024 Act and the repeal of ORS 679.530 by section 25 of this 2024 Act.
NURSE EDUCATORS
SECTION 27.
The Oregon Health Authority shall provide grants to the Oregon  Center for
Nursing to work with Oregon’s nursing education programs, including  the programs at the
Oregon Health and Science  University and Oregon’s community colleges, to develop pro-
grams to recruit and retain nurse educators at public and private institutions of  higher ed-
ucation.
SECTION 28. In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000 for the purpose of carrying  out the provisions of
section 27 of this 2024 Act.
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROVIDERS
SECTION 29. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall enter into an agreement with the
Mental Health and Addiction Certification Board of  Oregon for the purpose of increasing the
recruitment and retention of providers  in the behavioral health care workforce with associ-
ate, bachelor’s,  master’s or doctoral degrees or other credentials who are people of color,
tribal members or residents of  rural areas in this state and who can provide culturally re-
sponsive behavioral health services to underserved communities in this state.
(2) The agreement must require the:
(a) Authority to distribute moneys to the board; and
(b) Board to provide incentives for the purposes described in subsection (1)  of this sec-
tion, including for the reimbursement or payment of the board’s certification or  licensure
fees on behalf of the providers described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The authority may request a report from the board  on the use of moneys described
in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 30.
In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000 for the purpose of carrying  out the provisions of
section 29 of this 2024 Act.
HARM REDUCTION CLEARINGHOUSE
SECTION 31. (1) The Harm Reduction Clearinghouse Project  is established within the
Oregon Health Authority for the purpose of making bulk purchases of  harm reduction sup-
plies that prevent  overdose, infections and injuries related to substance use. The harm re-
duction supplies may be use  by participating harm reduction clearinghouse entities in this
state to expand access to opioid overdose reversal medications and provide equitable  access
[17]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
to harm reduction supplies for individuals at risk of overdose,  infections or injuries related
to substance use.
(2) The authority may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 413.115 is amended to read:
413.115. (1) The Opioid Reversal Medication and Harm Reduction Clearinghouse Bulk Purchas-
ing Fund is established in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest
earned by the Opioid Reversal Medication and Harm  Reduction Clearinghouse Bulk Purchasing
Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Opioid  Reversal Medication and Harm Reduction Clearinghouse Bulk Purchasing Fund
consists  of:
(a) Moneys received by the Oregon Health Authority from opioid litigation settlements;
(b) Grants awarded for the purpose of addressing substance use and overdose epidemics;
(c) Other gifts, grants, bequests, endowments or donations made to the fund; and
(d) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(3) The moneys in the Opioid Reversal  Medication and Harm Reduction Clearinghouse Bulk
Purchasing Fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Health Authority for [ expenses related
to opioid harm reduction ] the purposes described in section 31 of this 2024 Act .
CAPTIONS
SECTION 33.
The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 34. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[18]