Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Addiction Treatment and Prevention  Fund is established separate
and distinct from the General Fund. The Addiction Treatment and  Prevention Fund consists
of moneys deposited into the fund under  ORS 131.597, 137.300, 430.426, 471.810 and 475B.759
and other moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund by  the Legislative Assembly. In-
terest earned by the Addiction Treatment and Prevention Fund shall be credited to the fund.
The moneys in the Addiction Treatment and Prevention Fund are continuously  appropriated
to the Oregon Health Authority for:
(a) Paying the costs incurred by  counties in providing drug treatment services pursuant
to plans submitted under ORS 430.420 and for the establishment, operation  and maintenance
of alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services  and for local
matching funds under ORS 430.345 to 430.380.
(b) The purposes of ORS  430.345 to 430.380 and providing funding for sobering facilities
registered under ORS 430.262.
(c) Use by the authority for alcohol and drug abuse prevention,  early intervention and
treatment services for adults in custody of correctional and  penal institutions and for
parolees and for probationers as provided pursuant to rules of the authority.
(d) Paying for providing treatment for problem drinking, alcoholism or  drug dependency
for individuals who enter diversion agreements under ORS 813.200  and who are found to be
indigent.
(e) Paying for the evaluation of programs used for diversion agreements.
(f) Paying for materials, resources and training supplied by the authority to those per-
sons, organizations or agencies performing the screening interviews or providing education
or treatment to persons under diversion agreements.
(g) Paying for  providing treatment programs required under ORS 813.020 and treatment
or information programs required under ORS 471.432 for individuals who  are found to be in-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1613
HB 2683
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
digent.
(h) Paying for special services required to enable a person with a disability, or  a person
whose proficiency in the use of English is limited because of the person’s national  origin, to
participate in treatment programs that are used for diversion agreements under ORS 813.200
or are required under ORS 813.020. This paragraph applies:
(A) Whether or not the person is indigent; and
(B) Only to special services required solely because of the person’s disability  or limited
proficiency in the use of English.
(i) Paying for administration and evaluation of the ignition interlock program established
by ORS 813.600 to 813.616 and for the costs of participation in the program for indigents.
(j) Paying for programs for  the prevention and treatment of gambling addiction and other
emotional and behavioral problems  related to gambling and for the administration of the
programs.
(k) Paying the authority’s costs in  administering the Addiction Treatment and Pre-
vention Fund.
(2) Counties and state agencies:
(a) May not use moneys received under subsection (1) of  this section for alcohol and drug
prevention and treatment services that  do not meet or exceed minimum standards estab-
lished under ORS 430.357; and
(b) Shall include in all grants  and contracts with providers of alcohol and drug prevention
and treatment services a contract provision that the grant or contract may be terminated
by the county or state agency if the provider does not meet or exceed  the minimum stan-
dards adopted by the Oregon Health Authority pursuant to ORS 430.357. A county or  state
agency may not be penalized and is not liable for the termination of a contract under  this
section.
(3) The authority shall adopt  by rule uniform payment methodologies for the reimburse-
ment of services funded by the Addiction Treatment and Prevention Fund.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 90.113 is amended to read:
90.113. Residence in a licensed program,  facility or home described in ORS 430.306 to 430.375,
[430.380,] 430.385, 430.395, 430.397 to 430.401, 430.405 to 430.565, 430.570,  430.590, 443.400 to 443.455,
443.705 to 443.825 or 443.835  or section 1 of this 2021 Act  is not governed by this chapter.
SECTION 3.  ORS 131.597 is amended to read:
131.597. (1) After the seizing agency  distributes property under ORS 131.588, and when the
seizing agency is the state or  when the state is the recipient of property forfeited under ORS 131.550
to 131.600, the seizing agency shall dispose of and distribute property as follows:
(a) The seizing agency  shall pay costs first from the property or its proceeds. As used in this
subsection, “costs” includes the  expenses of publication, service of notices, towing, storage and
servicing or maintaining the seized property under ORS 131.564.
(b) After costs have been paid, the seizing agency shall distribute to the victim  any amount the
seizing agency was ordered to distribute under ORS 131.588 (4).
(c) Of the property remaining after costs have been paid under paragraph (a) of this  subsection
and distributions  have been made under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the seizing agency shall
distribute:
(A) Three percent to the Asset Forfeiture Oversight Account established in ORS 131A.460;
(B) Seven percent  to the Illegal Drug Cleanup Fund established in ORS 475.495 for the purposes
[2]
HB 2683
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
specified in ORS 475.495 (5) and (6);
(C) Ten percent to the state General Fund;
(D) Subject  to subsection (5) of this section, 40 percent to the Department of State Police or the
Department of Justice for official law enforcement use; and
(E) Forty percent to the [ Drug Prevention  and Education Fund ] Addiction Treatment and
Prevention Fund established in [ ORS 430.422] section 1 of this 2021 Act .
(2)(a) Any amount paid to or retained by the Department of Justice under subsection (1) of  this
section must be deposited in the Criminal Justice Revolving Account in the State Treasury.
(b) Any amount paid to  or retained by the Department of State Police under subsection (1) of
this section must be deposited in the State Police Account.
(3) The state may:
(a) With written authorization from the  district attorney for the jurisdiction in which the prop-
erty was seized, destroy any firearms or controlled substances.
(b) Sell the forfeited property by public  or other commercially reasonable sale and pay from the
proceeds the expenses of keeping and selling the property.
(c) Retain any vehicles, firearms or other equipment usable for law enforcement  purposes, for
official law enforcement use directly by the state.
(d) Lend or transfer any vehicles, firearms or other equipment usable  for law enforcement pur-
poses to any federal, state or local law enforcement agency or  district attorney for official law
enforcement use directly by the transferee entity.
(4) When the state has entered into an intergovernmental agreement with one or  more political
subdivisions under ORS 131.591, or when a law enforcement agency of this state has entered  into
an agreement with another law enforcement agency of  this state, an equitable portion of the for-
feited property distributed under subsection (1)(c)(D) of this  section must be distributed to each
agency participating in the seizure or criminal forfeiture as provided by the agreement.
(5) The property distributed under subsection (1)(c)(D) of this section, including any proceeds
received by the state under an intergovernmental agreement or under an agreement between  state
law enforcement agencies, must be divided as follows:
(a) When no law enforcement agency other than the Department of Justice participated  in the
seizure or forfeiture, or when the Department of Justice has entered into an  agreement under sub-
section (4) of this section, the property must be deposited in the Criminal Justice Revolving Account.
(b) When no law enforcement agency other than the Department of State Police participated  in
the seizure or forfeiture, or when the Department of State Police has entered into an agreement
under subsection (4) of this section, the property must be deposited in the State Police Account.
(6) The seizing agency may sell as much property as  may be needed to make the distributions
required by subsection (1) of this section. The seizing agency shall make  distributions to the Asset
Forfeiture Oversight Account and the Illegal Drug Cleanup Fund that are required by  subsection (1)
of this section  once every three months. The distributions are due within 20 days of the end of each
quarter. Interest does not accrue on  amounts that are paid within the period specified by this sub-
section.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 137.300 is amended to read:
137.300. (1) The Criminal Fine Account is established in the General Fund.  Except as otherwise
provided by law, all amounts collected in state courts as monetary  obligations in criminal actions
shall be deposited by the courts in the account. All moneys  in the account are continuously appro-
priated to the Department of Revenue to be distributed by the  Department of Revenue as provided
[3]
HB 2683
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in this section. The Department of Revenue shall keep a record of moneys  transferred into and out
of the account.
(2) The Legislative Assembly  shall first allocate moneys from the Criminal Fine Account for the
following purposes, in the following order of priority:
(a) Allocations for public safety standards, training and facilities.
(b) Allocations for criminal injuries compensation and assistance to victims of crime and chil-
dren reasonably suspected of being victims of crime.
(c) Allocations for the forensic services provided by the Oregon State Police, including, but  not
limited to, services of the Chief Medical Examiner.
(d) Allocations for the maintenance and operation of the Law Enforcement Data System.
(3) After making allocations under subsection (2) of this section, the Legislative Assembly  shall
allocate moneys from the Criminal Fine Account for the following purposes:
(a) Allocations to the Law Enforcement Medical Liability Account  established under ORS
414.815.
(b) Allocations to the State Court Facilities and Security Account established under ORS  1.178.
(c) Allocations to the Department of Corrections for the  purpose of planning, operating and
maintaining county juvenile  and adult corrections programs and facilities and drug and alcohol
programs.
(d) Allocations to the Oregon Health Authority  for the purpose of grants under ORS 430.345 for
the establishment, operation and maintenance of alcohol and drug abuse  prevention, early inter-
vention and treatment services provided through a county.
(e) Allocations to the Oregon State Police for the purpose of the enforcement of the laws relat-
ing to driving under the influence of intoxicants.
(f) Allocations to the Arrest and Return Account established under ORS 133.865.
(g) Allocations to the [ Intoxicated  Driver Program Fund ] Addiction Treatment and Prevention
Fund established under [ ORS 813.270] section 1 of this 2021 Act .
(h) Allocations to the State Court Technology Fund established under ORS 1.012.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that allocations from the Criminal Fine  Account
under subsection  (3) of this section be consistent with historical funding of the entities, programs
and accounts listed in subsection (3) of this section from monetary obligations imposed in criminal
proceedings. Amounts that are allocated under subsection (3)(c) of this section shall be distributed
to counties based on the amounts that were transferred to counties  by circuit courts during the
2009-2011 biennium under the provisions of ORS 137.308, as in effect January 1, 2011.
(5) Moneys in the Criminal Fine Account may  not be allocated for the payment of debt service
obligations.
(6) The Department of Revenue shall deposit in the General Fund all moneys remaining in  the
Criminal Fine Account after the distributions listed in subsections (2) and (3) of  this section have
been made.
(7) The Department of Revenue shall establish by  rule a process for distributing moneys in the
Criminal Fine Account. The department may not distribute more  than one-eighth of the total
biennial allocation to an entity during a calendar quarter.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 413.520 is amended to read:
413.520. (1) The Oregon Health Authority, in  collaboration with county representatives, shall
develop a plan for the  administration of the statewide gambling addiction programs and delivery of
program services.
[4]
HB 2683
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The authority may appoint an advisory committee  or designate an existing advisory com-
mittee to make recommendations to the authority concerning:
(a) Performance standards and evaluation methodology;
(b) Fiscal reporting and accountability;
(c) Delivery of services; and
(d) A distribution plan for use of available funds.
(3) The distribution plan for the moneys available in  the [ Problem Gambling Treatment Fund ]
Addiction Treatment and Prevention Fund established in section 1 of this 2021 Act  shall be
based on performance standards.
(4) The authority may enter into an intergovernmental agreement or other  contract, subject to
ORS chapters 279A, 279B and 279C, for the delivery of services related to programs for the pre-
vention and treatment of gambling addiction and other emotional and behavioral  problems related
to gambling.
(5) Before entering into an agreement  or contract under subsection (4) of this section, the au-
thority must consider the experience, performance and program  capacity of those organizations
currently providing services.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 430.256 is amended to read:
430.256. (1) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority shall  administer alcohol and drug
abuse programs, including but  not limited to programs or components of programs described in ORS
430.397 to 430.401 and 475.225 and ORS chapters 430 and [ 801 to 822 ] 813.
(2) Subject to ORS 417.300 and 417.305, the director shall:
(a) Report to the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission on accomplishments  and issues occurring
during each biennium, and report on a new biennial plan describing  resources, needs and priorities
for all alcohol and drug abuse programs.
(b) Develop within the Oregon Health Authority priorities for alcohol and drug  abuse programs
and activities.
(c) Conduct statewide and special planning processes that provide for participation from  state
and local agencies, groups and individuals.
(d) Identify the needs of special populations  including minorities, elderly, youth, women and in-
dividuals with disabilities.
(e) Subject to ORS chapter 183, adopt such rules as are necessary for the performance of the
duties and functions specified by this section.
(3) The  director may apply for, receive and administer funds, including federal funds and grants,
from sources other than the state. Subject to expenditure limitation  set by the Legislative Assembly,
funds received under this subsection may be expended by the director:
(a) For  the study, prevention or treatment of alcohol and drug abuse and dependence in this
state.
(b) To provide training, both within this state and in other states, in the prevention  and treat-
ment of alcohol and drug abuse and dependence.
(4) The director shall, in consultation with state agencies and  counties, establish guidelines to
coordinate program review and audit activities  by state agencies and counties that provide funds to
alcohol  and  drug prevention and treatment programs. The purpose of the guidelines is to minimize
duplication of auditing and  program review requirements imposed by state agencies and counties on
alcohol and drug prevention and treatment programs that receive  state funds, including programs
that receive beer and wine tax  revenues under ORS [ 430.380 and] 471.810 and section 1 of this 2021
[5]
HB 2683
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Act.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 430.359 is amended to read:
430.359. (1) Upon approval  of an application, the Oregon Health Authority shall enter into a
matching fund relationship  with the applicant. In all cases the amount granted by the authority
under the matching formula  shall not exceed 50 percent of the total estimated costs, as approved
by the authority, of the alcohol and  drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment ser-
vices.
(2) The authority shall distribute funds to applicants consistent with the budget priority policies
adopted by the Alcohol  and Drug Policy Commission, the community needs as determined by local
planning committees for alcohol  and drug prevention and treatment services under ORS 430.342 and
the particular needs of minority groups with a significant population of affected persons.  The funds
granted shall be distributed monthly.
(3) Federal funds at the disposal of an applicant for use in  providing alcohol and drug abuse
prevention, early intervention and treatment services may be counted toward  the percentage con-
tribution of an applicant.
(4) An applicant that is, at the time of a grant made under this section, expending funds appro-
priated by its governing body for the alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early  intervention and
treatment services shall, as a condition to the receipt of funds under this section, maintain  its fi-
nancial contribution to these programs at an amount not less than the  preceding year. However, the
financial contribution requirement may  be waived in its entirety or in part in any year by the au-
thority because of:
(a) The severe financial hardship that would be  imposed to maintain the contribution in full or
in part;
(b) The application of any special funds  for the alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early inter-
vention and  treatment services in the prior year when such funds are not available in the current
year;
(c) The application of federal funds, including but not limited to general revenue sharing,  dis-
tributions from the Oregon and California land grant fund and block grant  funds to the alcohol and
drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services in the  prior year when such funds
are not available for such application in the current year; or
(d) The  application of fund balances resulting from fees, donations or underexpenditures in a
given year of  the funds appropriated to counties pursuant to [ ORS 430.380] section 1 of this 2021
Act to the alcohol and drug abuse prevention,  early intervention and treatment services in the prior
year when such funds are not available for such application in the current year.
(5) Any moneys received by an applicant from fees, contributions or other  sources for alcohol
and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services for  service purposes, including
federal funds, shall be considered a portion of an applicant’s contribution for the purpose of deter-
mining the matching fund  formula relationship. All moneys so received shall only be used for the
purposes of carrying out ORS 430.345 to 430.380.
(6) Grants made pursuant to ORS 430.345 to 430.380 shall be paid from funds specifically  ap-
propriated  therefor  and shall be paid in the same manner as other claims against the state are paid.
SECTION 8.  ORS 430.366 is amended to read:
430.366. (1) Every  proposal for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treat-
ment services received from an applicant shall contain:
(a) A clear statement of  the goals and objectives of the program for the following fiscal year,
[6]
HB 2683
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
including the number of persons to be served and methods of measuring the success of  services
rendered;
(b) A description of services to be funded; and
(c) A statement of the minorities to be served, if a minority program.
(2) Each grant recipient and provider of alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early  intervention
and treatment services funded with  moneys from the [ Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services
Account ] Addiction Treatment and Prevention Fund  established by [ ORS 430.380] section 1 of
this 2021 Act  shall report to  the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission all data regarding the ser-
vices in the form and manner prescribed by the commission. This  subsection does not apply to so-
bering facilities that receive moneys under [ ORS 430.380] section 1 of this 2021 Act .
SECTION 9.
 ORS 430.385 is amended to read:
430.385. Nothing in ORS 430.347, 430.359, [ 430.380,] 471.805, 471.810, 473.030 or section 1 of this
2021 Act or this section shall be construed as justification for  a reduction in General Fund support
of local alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
SECTION 10.  ORS 430.424 is amended to read:
430.424. Consistent with the budget priority policies adopted by the Alcohol and Drug  Policy
Commission, the  Oregon Health Authority shall distribute moneys in the [ Drug Prevention and Ed-
ucation Fund ] Addiction Treatment and Prevention Fund  established in [ ORS 430.422] section 1
of this 2021 Act  based on a review of the plans  submitted to the office under ORS 430.420. Funding
criteria include, but need not be limited to, whether the  plan includes the existence or development
of a drug treatment court or a drug diversion program.
SECTION 11.  ORS 430.426 is amended to read:
430.426. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall  adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions
of ORS 430.420 to 430.426.
(2) The authority may accept gifts, grants and donations from any source,  public or private.
Moneys accepted under this  section must be deposited in the [ Drug Prevention and Education
Fund] Addiction Treatment and Prevention Fund established in section 1 of this 2021 Act  to
be used for the purposes for which the fund is established.
SECTION 12.  ORS 461.549 is amended to read:
461.549. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that emotional and  behavioral problems related to
gambling may impose additional costs on state government and on the  state economy, such as ad-
ditional mental health expenditures, increased law enforcement  costs and lost economic output. The
use of a  portion of the net receipts from video lottery games to pay the costs of preventing and
treating emotional and behavioral problems related to gambling promotes  the creation of jobs and
this state’s economic development by offsetting and treating the  negative economic consequences
of such behavior.
(2) In each fiscal quarter  of a biennium, commencing with the fifth fiscal quarter of the biennium
[beginning July 1, 2013 ], there is allocated from the Administrative  Services Economic Development
Fund to the [ Problem Gambling  Treatment Fund ] Addiction Treatment and Prevention Fund  es-
tablished by [ ORS 413.522] section 1 of this 2021 Act  an amount equal to the greater of:
(a) One percent of the moneys transferred from the Oregon State Lottery Fund  to the Adminis-
trative Services Economic Development Fund in that fiscal quarter; or
(b) One percent of  the moneys transferred from the Oregon State Lottery Fund to the Adminis-
trative Services Economic Development Fund during the same fiscal quarter of the  biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2011.
[7]
HB 2683
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 13.
 ORS 471.810 is amended to read:
471.810. (1) At the end of each month, the Oregon Liquor Control  Commission shall certify the
amount of moneys  available for distribution in the Oregon Liquor Control Commission Account and,
after withholding such moneys as it may deem  necessary to pay its outstanding obligations, shall
within 35 days of the month for  which a distribution is made direct the State Treasurer to pay the
amounts due, upon warrants  drawn by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, as fol-
lows:
(a) Fifty-six  percent, or the amount remaining after the distribution under subsection (4) of this
section, credited to the General Fund  available for general governmental purposes wherein it shall
be considered as revenue during the quarter immediately preceding receipt;
(b) Twenty percent to the cities of the state in  such shares as the population of each city bears
to the population of the cities of the state, as determined by Portland State University last preceding
such apportionment, under ORS 190.510 to 190.610;
(c) Ten percent to counties in  such shares as their respective populations bear to the total
population of the state, as estimated from time to time by Portland State University; and
(d) Fourteen percent to the cities of the state to be distributed as provided in ORS  221.770 and
this section.
(2) The commission shall direct the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  to transfer
50 percent of the revenues from the taxes imposed by ORS  473.030 and 473.035 to the [ Mental Health
Alcoholism and Drug Services Account in the General  Fund ] Addiction Treatment and Prevention
Fund established in section 1 of this 2021 Act  to be paid monthly [ as provided in ORS 430.380 ].
(3) If the amount of revenues  received from the taxes imposed by ORS 473.030 for the preceding
month was reduced as a result of credits claimed under ORS 473.047,  the commission shall compute
the difference between the  amounts paid or transferred as described in subsections (1)(b), (c) and (d)
and (2) of this section and the amounts that would have been paid or transferred  under subsections
(1)(b), (c)  and (d) and (2) of this section if no credits had been claimed. The commission shall direct
the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services to pay or transfer amounts equal to the differ-
ences computed for subsections (1)(b), (c) and (d) and (2) of  this section from the General Fund to
the recipients or accounts described in subsections (1)(b), (c) and (d) and (2) of this section.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, no city or county  shall receive for any fiscal
year an amount less than the amount distributed to the city  or county in accordance with ORS
471.350 (1965 Replacement Part), 471.810, 473.190 and 473.210 (1965 Replacement Part) during the
1966-1967 fiscal year unless the city or county had a decline in population as  shown by its census.
If the population  declined, the per capita distribution to the city or county shall be not less than
the total per capita distribution during the 1966-1967 fiscal  year. Any additional funds required to
maintain the level of distribution under this  subsection shall be paid from funds credited under
subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, amounts to be distributed  from the Oregon
Liquor Control Commission Account that are attributable to a per bottle surcharge  imposed by the
Oregon Liquor Control Commission, shall be credited to the General Fund.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 475B.759 is amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate  and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available  in the
[8]
HB 2683
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject  to subsection (4) of this section, the department shall transfer quarterly 20 percent
of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys  in the account must be transferred to the cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent  must be transferred in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that is  not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population of all cities of this  state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, as determined by  Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the  number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100  and 475B.105 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten  percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total  commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in  each county compared to the total commercially available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of  the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS  475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located  in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) Eighty percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty  percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the  account must be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for  purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of  the moneys in the account must be [ used] transferred to the Addiction
Treatment and Prevention Fund established in section 1  of this 2021 Act to be used  solely for
purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance  prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
[9]
HB 2683
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
(5)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection (4) of this section to  receive a transfer
of moneys  from the Oregon Marijuana Account during a given quarter but has received a transfer
of moneys for that quarter shall return the amount transferred to the Department of Revenue,  with
interest as described  under paragraph (f) of this subsection. An ineligible city or county may vol-
untarily transfer the moneys to the Department of Revenue immediately upon receipt of the ineligi-
ble transfer.
(b) If the Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services determines that a city
or county received a transfer of moneys under subsection (3)(b) of this section but was  ineligible to
receive that transfer under subsection (4) of this section, the director  shall provide notice to the
ineligible city or county and order the city or county to return the amount received to  the Depart-
ment of Revenue, with interest as  described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. A city or county
may appeal the order within 30 days of the date of  the order under the procedures for a contested
case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under paragraph  (b) of this subsection becomes final, the director shall
notify the Department of Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon  notification, the Depart-
ment of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have the  benefit of all laws of the state pertaining to the
collection of income and  excise taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts described in the no-
tice under paragraph (c) of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not necessary and  the collection
described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject to  an order to return moneys from an ineligible transfer, the
city or county shall  be denied any further relief in connection with the ineligible transfer on or after
the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at  the rate established in ORS 305.220 beginning on
the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys and  the interest collected from or returned by an ineligible city or county
shall be redistributed to the cities or counties that were eligible to  receive a transfer under sub-
section (3)(b) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(6)(a) Not later than July 1 of each year, each city  and county in this state shall certify with
the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services whether the city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required.  The certification shall be made concurrently with the
certifications under ORS 221.770, in a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon Department  of
Administrative Services.
(b) If  a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive transfers of
moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section. If a county fails to comply  with this subsection,
the county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as provided  in ORS 475B.496 shall file an updated
certification with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services in a  form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, noting the effective date of  the change. A city or county that repeals an
ordinance as provided in ORS 475B.496 is eligible to  receive quarterly transfers of moneys under
this section for quarters where  the repeal is effective for the entire quarter and the updated certi-
fication was filed at least 30 days before the date of transfer.
[10]
HB 2683
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
SECTION 15.
 ORS 813.603 is amended to read:
813.603. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of  this section, if an ignition interlock device
is ordered or required  under ORS 813.602, the person so ordered or required shall pay to the
manufacturer’s representative the reasonable costs  of leasing, installing and maintaining the device.
A payment schedule may be established for the person by the Department of  State Police, in con-
sultation with the Transportation Safety Committee.
(2) The department may waive, in whole or in part, or  defer the person’s responsibility to pay
all or part of the  costs under subsection (1) of this section if the person meets the criteria for
indigence established for waiving or deferring such costs under subsection (3) of this section. If  the
person’s responsibility for costs is waived,  [ then notwithstanding ORS 813.270, ] the costs described
in subsection (1) of  this section must be paid from the [ Intoxicated Driver Program Fund ] Addiction
Treatment and Prevention Fund established in section 1 of this 2021 Act .
(3) The department, by rule, shall establish criteria and procedures  for qualification to waive
or defer costs described under subsection (1) of this section for indigence. The  criteria must be
consistent with the standards for  indigence adopted by the federal government for purposes of the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
SECTION 16. ORS 413.522, 430.380, 430.422, 813.270 and 813.616 are repealed.
SECTION 17. On the effective date of this 2021 Act, all moneys in  the following funds and
accounts are transferred to the Addiction Treatment and Prevention Fund  established in
section 1 of this 2021 Act  and are available for the purposes described in section 1 of this 2021
Act:
(1) The Problem Gambling Treatment Fund established in ORS 413.522.
(2) The Mental Health Alcoholism  and Drug Services Account established in ORS 430.380.
(3) The Drug Prevention and Education Fund established in ORS 430.422.
(4) The Intoxicated Driver Program Fund created in ORS 813.270.
SECTION 18.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[11]