Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, there is appropriated:
(1) To the Housing and Community Services Department:
(a) $35,000,000 for deposit in the Manufactured Home  Preservation Fund under ORS
458.366 to be used to provide loans under ORS 458.352.
(b) $10,000,000 to provide grants to qualified housing sponsors, as defined in ORS 456.548,
that are consumer housing cooperatives, nonprofit housing corporations or housing  author-
ities, for the project costs of developing manufactured dwelling parks.
(c) $10,000,000 to provide grants to a nonprofit corporation that is  a community develop-
ment financial institution that operates statewide to support investment  in the construction
of affordable housing, for the purpose of lending funds to construct or acquire manufactured
dwelling parks.
(2) To the Department of Land Conservation and Development, the amount of $250,000
to develop:
(a) Model codes for the development of manufactured dwelling parks; and
(b) Efficiency measures for cottage clusters which may  include the development of
manufactured dwellings as defined in ORS 458.356.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1111