Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Education shall:
(1) Review the information collected from school districts for  the purpose of section 1,
chapter 71, Oregon Laws 2022, and identify information that is incomplete,  clearly inaccurate
or likely inaccurate.
(2) Request the school  district responsible for the provision of the information identified
in subsection (1) of this section  to submit or resubmit information that is complete and ac-
curate. The department shall provide assistance to the school district to ensure that the in-
formation collected is complete and accurate.
(3) Update the report required under section 1 (6), chapter 71, Oregon Laws 2022, to:
(a) Reflect information collected as provided by subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) Include recommendations and best practices  for surveying teachers and classified
school employees about time spent to  plan, prepare and administer academic assessments
required by the school district and the perceived usefulness of the assessments.
(4) Submit the updated report prepared under subsection (3) of this  section to the State
Board of Education and an interim committee of the  Legislative Assembly related to educa-
tion no later than December 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1714