Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $3,155,147,  which shall be expended to provide the nonfederal
matching share required for costs of targeted case management services in the Nurse-Family
Partnership nurse home visiting services program.
SECTION 2. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 189