Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2026 Act:
(1) “Dependent” means the spouse or child of an employee.
(2)(a) “Employee” means any person, including noncitizens and minors, employed  for
remuneration or under any contract of hire,  written or oral, express or implied, by an em-
ployer.
(b) “Employee” does not mean any person who volunteers  or donates services performed
for no remuneration  or without expectation or contemplation of remuneration as the ade-
quate consideration for the services  performed for a religious or charitable institution or a
governmental entity.
(3)(a) “Employer” means a person who employs 50 or more employees in this state.
(b) “Employer” does not mean the State of Oregon or a political subdivision thereof or
any county, city, district, authority,  public corporation or entity and any of their instru-
mentalities organized and existing under law or charter.
(4) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(5) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(6) “Medical assistance recipient” means a recipient of medical assistance  from any pro-
gram operated by the Oregon Health Authority, including the Cover All People program  es-
tablished in ORS 414.231.
(7) “Protected health information” has the meaning given that term in ORS 192.556.
SECTION 2.
(1) Not later than January 15 of each year, the Oregon Health  Authority, in
collaboration with the Department  of Human Services and the Employment Department,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 65
HB 4147
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
shall submit a  report to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health
care, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,  and to the Legislative Fiscal Officer, that in-
cludes the following information for the preceding calendar year:
(a) For each employer in this  state that has employees or dependents of the employees
who are medical assistance recipients:
(A) The name of the employer;
(B) A description of the industry in which the employer does business in this  state, using
the North American Industry Classification System code associated with the employer;
(C) The total number of employees employed by the employer in this state;
(D) Whether  the employer offers a health benefit plan to its employees and employees’
dependents and, if so, whether the health benefit plan is self-funded or fully insured;
(E) The total number of medical assistance recipients who are an  employee of the em-
ployer;
(F) The total number of medical assistance recipients who are a dependent  of an em-
ployee of the employer;
(G) The cost of providing medical assistance to the employees or dependents; and
(H) Quarterly wage data or hours worked categories pertaining to the employees.
(b) Aggregated statewide information regarding:
(A) The total number of medical assistance recipients who are employees or dependents;
(B) The  total number of medical assistance recipients who are employees or dependents,
distributed by employer size;
(C) The total number of medical assistance recipients who are  employees or dependents,
distributed by industry;
(D) The total number of medical assistance recipients who are employees or dependents,
distributed by region; and
(E) The demographics of medical  assistance recipients who are employees or dependents.
(c) Analysis of trends related to the number of medical assistance recipients who  are
employees or dependents, as compared to earlier years.
(d) A summary of the 20 employers  with the highest total number of medical assistance
recipients who are an employee of the employer or a dependent of an employee.
(2) A report required  under this section may not include any personally identifiable in-
formation or protected health information of an employee or  dependent whose information
is included in the report.
(3) The collection, storage and release of health care data and other  information under
sections 1 to 5 of this 2026 Act is subject to the privacy regulations of the federal Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Health Authority shall publish  a report described in section 2
of this 2026 Act on the authority’s website no later than 10  days after the authority submits
the report as required under section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 4. The Oregon Health Authority, the Department of Human Services and the
Employment Department may enter into an interagency agreement for the  purpose of car-
rying out duties and responsibilities under sections 1 to 5 of this 2026 Act. An  interagency
agreement under this section must include provisions for:
(1) Good faith cooperation among  the authority, the Department of Human Services and
the Employment Department to enable the authority to carry out its duties and responsibil-
[2]
HB 4147
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ities under law or under the agreement;
(2) The sharing of resources and information necessary for the authority to carry out its
duties and responsibilities under law or under the agreement, to the extent permitted by law;
and
(3) Ensuring the privacy and security of information shared under the agreement.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules necessary to carry  out
the duties and responsibilities of the  authority under sections 1 to 5 of this 2026 Act. The
rules must  include procedures for ensuring the privacy and security of protected health in-
formation and personally identifiable information that is collected, stored or released under
sections 1 to 5 of this  2026 Act, including ensuring that the use of data or information under
sections 1 to 5 of this 2026 Act is compliant with applicable federal and state privacy laws.
(2) The Department of Human Services and the Employment Department may adopt rules
necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 1 to 5 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 657.665 is amended to read:
657.665. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) to (5) of  this section, all information in the
records of the Employment Department pertaining to the administration  of the unemployment in-
surance, employment service and workforce and labor market information programs:
(a) Is confidential  and for the exclusive use and information of the Director of the Employment
Department in administering the unemployment insurance, employment service  and workforce and
labor market information programs in Oregon.
(b) May not be used in any  court action or in any proceeding pending in the court unless the
director or the state is a party to the action or proceeding  or unless the proceeding concerns the
establishment, enforcement or modification of  a support obligation and support services are being
provided by the Division of Child Support or the district attorney pursuant to ORS 25.080.
(c) Is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(2) The Employment Department shall disclose information:
(a) To any claimant or legal representative, at a hearing before an administrative law judge,  to
the extent necessary for the proper presentation of an unemployment insurance claim.
(b) Upon request to the United States  Secretary of Labor. The Employment Department shall
disclose the information in a form and containing the  information that the United States Secretary
of Labor may require. The  information disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other
purpose.
(c) Pursuant to  section 303(a)(7) of the Social Security Act, upon request to any agency of the
United States charged with the administration of public works or  assistance through public em-
ployment. Under this paragraph, the Employment Department shall  disclose the name, address, or-
dinary occupation and employment status of each recipient of  unemployment insurance benefits and
a statement of the recipient’s right  to further benefits under this chapter. The information disclosed
is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose.
(d) Pursuant to section 303(c)(1) of the Social  Security Act, to the Railroad Retirement Board.
Under this paragraph, the Employment Department  shall disclose unemployment insurance records.
The information disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any  other purpose. The costs of
disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by the board.
(e) Pursuant  to section 303(d) of the Social Security Act, upon request to officers and employees
of the United States Department of Agriculture and  to officers or employees of any state Supple-
mental Nutrition Assistance Program agency for the purpose of determining an individual’s  eligibil-
[3]
HB 4147
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ity for or the amount of supplemental nutrition assistance. The  information disclosed is confidential
and may not be used for any  other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph
shall be paid by the United States Department of Agriculture.
(f) Pursuant to section 303(e)(1) and (2)(A)(ii) of the Social Security Act, to state  or local child
support enforcement agencies enforcing child support obligations under Title IV-D of the  Social Se-
curity Act for the purposes of  establishing child support obligations, locating individuals owing child
support obligations and collecting child  support obligations from those individuals. The information
disclosed is confidential and may not be used for  any other purpose. The costs of disclosing infor-
mation under this paragraph shall be paid by the child support enforcement agency.
(g) Pursuant to sections 303(f) and 1137 of  the Social Security Act, to agencies participating in
the income and  eligibility verification system for the purpose of verifying an individual’s eligibility
for benefits, or the  amount of benefits, under unemployment insurance, temporary assistance for
needy families, Medicaid, the Supplemental Nutrition  Assistance Program, Supplemental Security
Income, child support  enforcement or Social Security programs. The information disclosed is confi-
dential and may not be used for any other purpose. The  costs of disclosing information under this
paragraph shall be paid by the requesting agency.
(h) Pursuant  to section 303(h) of the Social Security Act and section 3304(a)(16)(B) of the Federal
Unemployment Tax Act, to the United States Department  of Health and Human Services National
Directory of New Hires. The information disclosed is confidential and may  not be used for any other
purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by the  United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
(i) Pursuant to section 303(i) of the Social Security  Act, to officers and employees of the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development and to representatives of a public housing
agency for the purpose of determining an individual’s eligibility for benefits, or the  amount of ben-
efits, under  a housing assistance program of the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be used for any other purpose.
The costs of disclosing information  under this paragraph shall be paid by the United States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development or the public housing agency.
(j) Pursuant to regulations of the United States Secretary of  Health and Human Services issued
under section 3304(a)(16)(A) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, and except as required by sec-
tion 303 of the Social Security  Act, to the state, a political subdivision or a federally recognized
Indian tribe that has signed an agreement with the Department  of Human Services to administer
Part A of Title IV of the Social Security Act for the purpose of determining an individual’s eligibility
for assistance, or the amount of assistance, under a  program funded under Part A of Title IV of the
Social Security Act. The information  disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other
purpose.
(k) Upon request, to  the United States Attorney’s Office. Under this paragraph, the Employment
Department may disclose an individual’s employment and wage information in response to a  federal
grand jury subpoena or for the purpose of  collecting civil and criminal judgments, including
restitution and special assessment fees. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be
used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid
by the United States Attorney’s Office.
(3) The Employment Department may disclose information secured from employing units:
(a) To state agencies, federal agencies, local  government agencies, public universities listed in
ORS 352.002 and the Oregon  Health and Science University established under ORS 353.020, to the
[4]
HB 4147
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
extent necessary to properly carry out governmental planning, performance measurement,  program
analysis, socioeconomic analysis or policy analysis functions  performed under applicable law. The
information disclosed is confidential and may not be disclosed by the agencies or universities in any
manner that would identify individuals, claimants, employees  or employing units. If the information
disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs
of disclosing the information shall be paid by the agency or university requesting the information.
(b) As part of a geographic  information system. Points on a map may be used to represent eco-
nomic data, including the location, employment size class and industrial  classification of businesses
in Oregon. Information presented as part of a geographic information system may  not give specific
details regarding a business’s address, actual  employment or proprietary information. If the infor-
mation disclosed under this paragraph  is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department,
the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the party requesting the information.
(c) In accordance with ORS 657.673.
(4) The Employment Department may:
(a) Disclose information to public employees in the performance of their  duties under state or
federal laws relating to the payment of  unemployment insurance benefits, the provision of employ-
ment services and the provision of workforce and labor market information.
(b) At the discretion of the Director of the Employment Department and subject to an  intera-
gency agreement, disclose information to public officials in the performance  of their official duties
administering or enforcing laws within their authority and to the  agents or contractors of public
officials. The public official shall agree to assume responsibility for misuse of the information by
the official’s agent or contractor.
(c) Disclose information pursuant  to an informed consent, received from an employer or claim-
ant, to disclose the information.
(d) Disclose information to partners under the federal Workforce Innovation  and Opportunity
Act for the purpose of administering state workforce programs  under the Act. The information dis-
closed is confidential and may not be  used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information
under this paragraph shall be paid by the requesting partner.
(e) Disclose the names and addresses of employing units to the  Bureau of Labor and Industries
for the purpose of disseminating information to employing units.  The names and addresses disclosed
are confidential and may  not be used for any other purpose. If the information disclosed under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of the  Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the bureau.
(f) Disclose information to the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and  Industries for the
purpose of performing duties under ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870,  658.005 to 658.245 or 658.405 to
658.511 or ORS chapter 652, 653 or 659A. The information disclosed may include the names and ad-
dresses of employers and employees and payroll data of employers and employees. The  information
disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose. If the information disclosed
under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment  Department, the costs of dis-
closing the information shall be paid by the bureau.
(g) Disclose information required under ORS 657.660 (3)  and (4) to the Public Employees Re-
tirement System for the purpose of determining the eligibility of members  of the retirement system
for disability under  ORS chapters 238 and 238A. The information disclosed is confidential and may
not be used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph  shall
be paid by the Public Employees Retirement System.
[5]
HB 4147
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) Disclose to the Oregon Business Development Commission  and the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department information required by the commission  and the department in performing their
duties under  ORS 285A.050 and 285B.630 to verify changes in employment levels following direct
employer participation in department programs or indirect participation through  municipalities un-
der ORS 285B.410 to 285B.482. The information disclosed to the commission  and the department may
include an employer’s employment level, total subject  wages payroll and whole hours worked. The
information disclosed is confidential and may not  be used for any other purpose. The commission
and the  department may not disclose the information in any manner that would identify an employ-
ing unit or employee except to the  extent necessary to carry out the commission’s and the
department’s duties under ORS 285A.050 and 285B.630. If the information disclosed under this para-
graph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs  of disclosing the infor-
mation shall be paid by the commission or the Oregon Business Development Department.
(i) Disclose  information to the Department of Revenue for the purpose of performing its duties
under ORS 293.250 or under the revenue  and tax laws of this state, or for the purpose of using in-
formation reported by employers and claimants to detect potential identity theft  or fraudulent
claims. The information disclosed may include the  names and addresses of employers and employees
and payroll data of employers and employees. The  information disclosed is confidential and may not
be disclosed by the Department of Revenue in any  manner that would identify an employing unit
or employee except to the extent necessary to carry out  the department’s duties under ORS 293.250
or in auditing or reviewing any report or return required or permitted to be filed under the  revenue
and tax laws administered by the department. The Department of Revenue may not disclose any in-
formation received to any private collection agency or for any  other purpose. If the information
disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs
of disclosing the information shall be paid by the Department of Revenue.
(j) Disclose information to the Department of Consumer and Business Services  for the purpose
of performing  its duties under ORS chapters 654 and 656. The information disclosed may include the
name, address, number of employees  and industrial classification code of an employer and payroll
data of employers and employees. The information disclosed is confidential and may  not be disclosed
by the Department of Consumer and Business Services in  any manner that would identify an em-
ploying unit or employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the department’s  duties under
ORS chapters 654 and 656, including administrative hearings and court proceedings in which the
Department of  Consumer and Business Services is a party. If the information disclosed under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of  the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(k) Disclose information to the Construction Contractors Board  for the purpose of performing
its duties under ORS chapter 701.  The information disclosed to the board may include the names and
addresses of employers and status of their compliance with this chapter. If the information  disclosed
under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment  Department, the costs of dis-
closing the information shall be paid by the board.
(L) Disclose information to the State Fire Marshal to assist the State Fire  Marshal in carrying
out duties under ORS 453.307 to 453.414. The  information disclosed may include the name, address,
telephone  number  and industrial classification code of an employer. The information disclosed is
confidential  and  may not be disclosed by the State Fire Marshal in any manner that would identify
an employing unit except to the extent necessary to carry out duties under ORS  453.307 to 453.414.
If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of  the Employment
[6]
HB 4147
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the Department of the State Fire
Marshal.
(m) Disclose information to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  for the purpose of
performing the commission’s duties under ORS  chapter 348 and Title IV of the Higher Education
Act of 1965. The information disclosed may include the names and addresses of employers and em-
ployees and payroll data of employers and employees. The  information disclosed is confidential and
may not be disclosed by the commission in any manner that  would identify an employing unit or
employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duties under  ORS chapter
348 or Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965.  If the information disclosed under this para-
graph is not prepared for  the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the infor-
mation shall be paid by the commission.
(n) Disclose information to the Department of Transportation to  assist the Department of
Transportation  in  carrying out the duties of the Department of Transportation relating to collection
of delinquent and liquidated debts, including taxes,  under ORS 184.610 to 184.665, 184.670 to 184.733
and 805.263, ORS chapter 319 and the Oregon Vehicle Code. The information disclosed may include
the names and addresses of employers and employees and payroll data of employers and employees.
The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be disclosed by the Department of Transpor-
tation in any manner that  would identify an employing unit or employee except to the extent nec-
essary to carry out the Department of Transportation’s duties relating  to collection of delinquent
and liquidated debts or in auditing or reviewing any report or return required or permitted  to be
filed under the revenue and tax laws administered  by the Department of Transportation. The De-
partment of Transportation may not disclose any information received to any private collection
agency or for any other  purpose. If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared
for the use of the Employment Department,  the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by
the Department of Transportation.
(o) Disclose information to the Department of Human Services and the  Oregon Health Authority
to assist the Department of Human Services and the Oregon Health  Authority in the collection of
debts that the Department  of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority are authorized by
law to collect. The information disclosed may include the names,  addresses and payroll data of em-
ployers and employees. The information disclosed is  confidential and may not be disclosed by the
Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority in a manner that  would identify an
employing unit or  employee except to the extent necessary for the collection of debts as described
in this paragraph. The Department of  Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority may not
disclose information received under this paragraph to a private collection agency or use the  infor-
mation for a purpose other than  the collection of debts as described in this paragraph. If the infor-
mation disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use  of the Employment Department,
the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the Department  of Human Services or the
Oregon Health Authority.
(p) Disclose to the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission information  required by the commission
in evaluating and measuring the performance of substance use  prevention, substance use disorder
treatment and recovery support services programs under ORS 430.223 or the impact  of the programs
on employment.  The information disclosed to the commission may include total subject wages payroll
and whole hours worked. The information disclosed under this  paragraph is confidential and may
not be used for any other purpose. The commission may  not disclose the information in any manner
that would identify an employing unit or  employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the
[7]
HB 4147
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
commission’s duties under  ORS 430.223. If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not
prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of  disclosing the information shall
be paid by the commission.
(q) Disclose to any person establishment level information secured  pursuant to this chapter from
federal, state and local government agencies, public universities listed  in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon
Health and Science University established under ORS 353.020. If the information disclosed under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of  the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the person requesting the information.
(r) Disclose to any person the industrial classification code assigned to an employing  unit. If the
information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for  the use of the Employment Depart-
ment, the costs of disclosing the  information shall be paid by the person requesting the information.
(s) Disclose  information to the State Treasurer useful for the purpose of performing the State
Treasurer’s duties under ORS 98.302 to 98.436, 98.992 and 116.253 and the role of an estate admin-
istrator  under  ORS 113.235. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be used by the
State Treasurer for any other purpose. If the information disclosed  is not prepared for the use of the
Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the State  Treas-
urer.
(t) Disclose information to the  Oregon Health Authority and the Department of Human
Services to assist the  authority and the department in carrying out duties and responsibil-
ities under sections 1 to 5 of  this 2026 Act. The information disclosed may include the num-
ber of employees and industrial classification code of an employer and  the names, addresses
and payroll data of employers and employees. The information disclosed is confidential and
may not be used for any other purpose. The authority and  the department may not disclose
the information in any manner that  would identify an employer or employee except to the
extent necessary to carry out the authority’s and  department’s duties under sections 1 to 5
of this 2026 Act.
(5) The Employment Department may  make public all decisions of the Employment Appeals
Board.
(6) Any officer appointed  by or any employee of the Director of the Employment Department
who discloses confidential information, except with the authority of the director, pursuant to  rules
or as otherwise required by law, may be disqualified from holding any appointment or employment
with the Employment Department.
(7) Any person or any  officer or employee of an entity to whom information is disclosed by the
Employment Department under this section who divulges or uses the  information for any purpose
other than that specified in the provision of law or agreement authorizing the use or  disclosure may
be disqualified from performing any service under contract or disqualified from holding any  ap-
pointment or employment with the state  agency that engaged or employed that person, officer or
employee. The Employment Department may immediately cancel or modify  any information sharing
agreement with an  entity when a person or an officer or employee of that entity discloses confi-
dential information, other than as specified in law or agreement.
SECTION 7.
This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[8]