Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 98.396 is amended to read:
98.396. (1) The Department of State Lands shall consider  any claim filed under ORS 98.392 and
may hold a hearing and receive evidence concerning the claim. If a hearing is  held, the department
shall prepare findings and a decision in writing on  each claim filed, stating the substance of any
evidence heard by the department and the reasons for the decision. The decision shall  be a public
record.
(2)(a) Except as provided  by paragraph (b) of this subsection,  if the claim allowed is for
property deposited in the Common School Fund Account, the department shall return the  property
or make payment of the proceeds of the sale of the  property to the claimant[ .] from the Common
School Fund Account.
(b) After proceeds of the sale of property  have been in the Common School Fund Account
for 25 years or more, the department shall:
(A) Make the amounts of the  proceeds available for distribution through the Common
School Fund; and
(B) Pay any claims for the amounts  of the proceeds as though the proceeds had been
deposited in the General Fund, as provided by subsection (3) of this section.
(3) If the claim allowed is for funds deposited in the General Fund  or  for claims to be paid
as provided by subsection (2)(b) of this section , the department shall  pay the claim and file a
request for reimbursement  with the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall reimburse the de-
partment within five working days from the fund against  which the check or order represented in
the claim was issued.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 98.396 by section 1 of this 2017 Act apply to pro-
ceeds from the sale of  property that are deposited in the Common School Fund Account be-
fore, on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 98.392 is amended to read:
98.392. (1)(a) A person claiming an interest in  unclaimed property reported to the Department
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4191
HB 3430
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
of State Lands may file  a claim to the property or to the proceeds from the sale of the property at
any time after the person learns that the property has been reported to the department.
(b) Claims shall  be filed on the form prescribed by the department.  The form must include
statements that:
(A) Any proceeds from sales of property that have not been claimed after 25 years are
made available to school districts through distributions of the Common School Fund; and
(B) A person has a right to claim proceeds from sales of property after 25 years and that
those claims will be paid from the General Fund.
(c) The department may require the person to provide  a lost instrument bond if the claim is for
securities and the person does not surrender the original certificate to the department.
(2) If a claim is filed under this section for amounts identified as lawyer trust  account funds in
the report required by ORS 98.352, the department shall forward the claim  to the Oregon State Bar
for review and for payment by the Oregon State Bar if the  claim is allowed. The department and the
Oregon State Bar shall adopt rules for the administration of claims subject to this subsection.
[2]