Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 540.510 is amended to read:
540.510. (1)(a) Except as provided in subsections (2) to (8) of this section, all  water used in this
state for any purpose shall remain appurtenant to the premises upon which it is used  and no change
in use  or place of use of any water for any purpose may be made without compliance with the pro-
visions of ORS  540.520 and 540.530. However, the holder of any water use subject to transfer may,
upon compliance with the provisions of ORS 540.520 and 540.530, change the use and place of use,
the point of diversion or the use of the water without losing priority of the right. A district  may
change the place of use in the manner provided in ORS 540.572 to 540.580 in lieu  of the method
provided in ORS 540.520 and 540.530. When an application for change of the use or  place of use for
a primary water right is submitted in  accordance with this section, the applicant also shall indicate
whether the land described in  the application has an appurtenant supplemental water right or per-
mit. If the applicant  also intends to transfer the supplemental water right or permit, the applicant
also shall include  the information required under ORS 540.520 (2) for the supplemental water right
or permit.  If the applicant does not include the supplemental water right or permit in the transfer
application, the Water Resources  Department shall notify the applicant that the supplemental water
right or permit will be canceled before the  department issues the order approving the transfer of the
primary water right, unless within 30 days the applicant modifies the application to include  the
supplemental water right or permit or withdraws the  application. The department may approve the
transfer of the supplemental water right or permit in accordance with the provisions of  ORS 540.520
and 540.530. The department shall not approve the transfer of a supplemental water  right or permit
if the transfer would result in enlargement of the original water right or injury to an existing  water
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1944
HB 3501
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
right. If the department approves the  transfer of the primary water right but does not approve the
transfer of the supplemental water  right or permit, the department shall notify the applicant of the
department’s intent to cancel that  portion of the supplemental water right or permit described in the
transfer application before the department issues the primary water right transfer order,  unless the
applicant withdraws the transfer application within 90 days.
(b) A  holder of a water right certificate that authorizes the storage of water may change the
type of use identified in the water right certificate,  as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection,
without losing priority of the right.
(2) Subject to the limitations in ORS 537.490, any right to the use of conserved  water allocated
by the Water Resources Commission under  ORS 537.470 may be severed from the land and trans-
ferred or sold after notice to the commission as required under ORS 537.490.
(3)(a) Any water used under a permit or certificate issued to a  municipality, or under rights
conferred by ORS  538.410 to 538.450, or under the registration system set forth in ORS 537.132, may
be applied to beneficial use on lands to which the right is not appurtenant if:
(A) The water is  applied to lands which are acquired by annexation or through merger, consol-
idation or  formation of a water authority, so long as the rate and use of water allowed in the ori-
ginal certificate is not exceeded;
(B) The use  continues to be for municipal purposes and would not interfere with or impair prior
vested water rights; or
(C) The use is authorized under a permit granted  under ORS 468B.050 or 468B.053 and for which
a reclaimed water registration form has been filed under ORS 537.132.
(b) As used in this subsection, “municipality” means a  city, a port formed under ORS 777.005 to
777.725, 777.915 to 777.953 and  778.010, a domestic water supply district formed under ORS chapter
264, a water supplier as defined in ORS 448.115 or a water authority  formed under ORS chapter 450.
(4) Pursuant to the provisions of  ORS 540.570 or 540.585, any water used under a permit or
certificate issued to a district may  be applied to beneficial use on lands within the district to which
the right is not appurtenant.
(5) The relocation of a point of diversion  as necessary to follow the movements of a naturally
changing stream channel does not constitute a change in point of diversion for purposes  of ORS
540.520 if:
(a) The diversion point stays within 500 feet of the point of diversion on record  with the Water
Resources  Department;
(b) The change does not move the diversion point upstream or downstream beyond the diversion
point of another appropriator; and
(c) The diversion is provided with a  proper fish screen, if requested by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife.
(6)(a) In the event that  government action results in or creates a reasonable expectation of a
change in the surface level  of a surface water source that impairs or threatens to impair access to
a point of diversion authorized by a water right  permit, certificate or decree, the owner of the water
right may change the point of diversion or add  an additional point of diversion in accordance with
the provisions of this section in lieu of complying with the requirements  of ORS 540.520 and 540.530.
(b) Before changing the point of diversion  under this subsection , the water right owner shall
provide written notice of [ the] a proposed change to the Water Resources Department.
(c) Within 15 days after receipt of [ such] a written  notice  of a proposed change  described in
paragraph (b) of this subsection , the  department shall provide notice by publication in the
[2]
HB 3501
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
department’s public notice of water right applications.
(d) Within 60 days after the department receives  a  written  notice  of a proposed change de-
scribed in paragraph (b) of this subsection  [ from the owner ], the Water Resources  Director, by
order, shall  approve the change , without considering whether the change will impair or be
detrimental to the public interest,  unless the director finds the [ changes] change  will result  in
injury to other existing water rights.
(e) After a change is approved pursuant  to paragraph (d) of this subsection,  all other
terms and conditions of the water right shall remain in effect.
(7) The sale or lease  of the right to the use of conserved water under ORS 537.490 does not
constitute a change of use or a change in the place of use of water for purposes of ORS 540.520.
(8) Ground water applied to an exempt use as set forth in ORS 537.141 or 537.545 may  be sub-
sequently applied to land for irrigation purposes  under ORS 537.141 (1)(i) or 537.545 (1)(g) without
application for a change in use or place of use under this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 540.520 is amended to read:
540.520. (1)(a) Except when  the application is made under ORS 541.327 or when an application
for a temporary transfer is  made under ORS 540.523, if the holder of a water use subject to transfer
for irrigation, domestic use, manufacturing purposes, or other use, for any reason  desires to change
the place of use, the point of diversion, or the use  made of the water, an application to make such
change, as the case may be, shall be filed with the Water Resources Department.
(b) A  holder of a water right certificate that authorizes the storage of water may change the
type of use identified in the water right certificate, as described in this section.
(2) The application required under subsection (1) of this section shall include:
(a) The name of the owner;
(b) The previous use of the water;
(c) A description of the premises upon which the water is used;
(d) A description of the premises upon which it is proposed to use the water;
(e) The use that is proposed to be made of the water;
(f) The reasons for making the proposed change; and
(g) Evidence that the water has been used  over the past five years according to the terms and
conditions of the owner’s water right certificate  or that the water right is not subject to forfeiture
under ORS 540.610.
(3) If the application required under subsection (1) of this section  is necessary to allow a change
in a water right pursuant to ORS 537.348, is necessary to  complete a project funded under ORS
541.932, or is approved by the State Department of Fish and  Wildlife as a change that will result in
a net benefit to fish and wildlife habitat, the department, at the discretion of  the Water Resources
Director, may waive  or assist the applicant in satisfying the requirements of subsection (2)(c) and
(d) of this section. The assistance  provided by the department may include, but need not be limited
to, development of an application map.
(4) If the application is to change the point of diversion, the transfer shall include a  condition
that the holder of the water right provide a proper fish  screen at the new point of diversion, if re-
quested by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(5)(a) Upon the filing of the application the department shall give notice by publication in  a
newspaper having general circulation in the area in which the water rights are located,  for a period
of at least two weeks and not less than one publication  each week. The notice shall include the date
on which the last notice by publication  will occur. The cost of the publication shall be paid by the
[3]
HB 3501
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
applicant in advance to the department. In applications for only a change in  place of use or for a
change in the point  of diversion of less than one-fourth mile, and where there are no intervening
diversions between the  old diversion of the applicant and the proposed new diversion, no newspaper
notice need be published.  The department shall include notice of such applications in the weekly
notice published by the department.
(b) The Water Resources Director shall issue an order  approving or denying the proposed
changes within 120 days after the department receives the  complete application, unless the
applicant requests one or more extensions, specifying a number of days for the extension  or
extensions, of up to 125 additional days. Neither the department  nor the director may compel
an applicant to waive the 120-day period as a condition for taking an action on an application
under this section. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law,  an application that is not
the subject of an order within the time frames described in this paragraph is approved.
(6)(a) Within 30 days after the last publication of a newspaper notice  of the proposed transfer
or the mailing of the department’s weekly notice, whichever is later, any  person may file, jointly or
severally, with the department, a protest against approval of the application.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 536.050 (1)(j), the fee to submit a protest described  in paragraph
(a) of this subsection shall be $10,000 if the protest is  by a nonapplicant, unless the nonap-
plicant is:
(A) A landowner within the hydrologic basin in  which the water right subject to transfer
is located; or
(B) Is the holder of an instream water right  within the hydrologic basin in which the
water right subject to transfer is located.
(7)(a) If a timely  protest is filed, or in the opinion of the [ Water Resources ] director a hearing
is necessary to determine whether the proposed changes as described by the  application would re-
sult in injury to existing water rights, the department shall hold a hearing on the matter.
(b) Notice  and conduct of the hearing  described in paragraph (a) of this subsection  shall be
under the provisions of ORS chapter  183, pertaining to contested cases, and shall be held in the area
where the rights are located unless all parties and persons who filed a protest under  this subsection
stipulate otherwise.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of  this subsection and any other contrary provision
of law, at a hearing described in this subsection:
(A) The only issue that may be considered is whether the proposed changes as  described
by the application would result in injury to existing water rights.
(B) Whether the proposed changes as described by the application  would impair or be
detrimental to the public interest may not be considered.
(8) An application for a change of use under this section is not required  if the beneficial use
authorized by the water use subject to transfer is irrigation  and the owner of the water right uses
the water for incidental agricultural, stock  watering and other uses related to irrigation use, so long
as there is no increase in the rate, duty, total acreage benefited or season of use.
(9) A water right transfer under subsection (1) of this section is not required for  a general in-
dustrial use that was not included in a water right certificate issued for a  specific industrial use if:
(a) The quantity of water  used for the general industrial use is not greater than the rate allowed
in the original water right and not  greater than the quantity of water diverted to satisfy the au-
thorized specific use under the original water right;
(b) The location where the water is to be used for  general industrial use was owned by the
[4]
HB 3501
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
holder of the original water right at the time the water right permit was issued; and
(c) The person who makes the change in water  use provides the following information to the
Water Resources Department:
(A) The name and mailing address of the person using water under the water right;
(B) The water right certificate number;
(C) A description  of the location of the industrial facility owned by the holder of the original
water right at the time the water right permit was issued; and
(D) A description of the general industrial use to be made of the water after the change.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 540.523 is amended to read:
540.523. (1) In accordance with the  provisions of this section, any person who holds a water use
subject to transfer may request that  the Water Resources Department approve the temporary
transfer of place  of use and, if necessary to convey water to the new temporary place of use, tem-
porarily change the point of  diversion or point of appropriation for a period not to exceed five years.
An application for a temporary transfer shall:
(a) Be submitted in writing to the Water Resources Department;
(b) Be  accompanied by the appropriate fee for a change in the place of use as set forth in ORS
536.050;
(c) Include the information required under ORS 540.520 (2); and
(d) Include any other information the Water Resources Commission by rule may require.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding the notice and waiting requirements under  ORS 540.520, the department
shall approve by order  a request for a temporary transfer under this section if the department de-
termines that the temporary transfer will not injure any existing water right.
(b) In deciding whether to approve a request for a temporary transfer  under this section,
the department may  not consider whether the proposed change would impair or be detri-
mental to the public interest.
(3) All uses of  water for which a temporary transfer is allowed under this section shall revert
automatically to the terms and conditions of the  water use subject to transfer upon expiration of the
temporary transfer period.
(4) The time during which water is used under an approved temporary transfer order does  not
apply toward a finding of forfeiture under ORS 540.610.
(5) The department may revoke a prior  approval of the temporary transfer at any time if the
department finds that the transfer is causing injury to any existing water right.
(6) Any map that may be required under subsection (1)  of this section need not be prepared by
a certified water right examiner.
(7) The lands from which the water right is  removed during the period of a temporary transfer
shall receive no water under the transferred water right.
(8) When an application for a temporary change of  the place of use for a primary water right
is submitted in accordance with this section, the applicant also  shall indicate whether the land de-
scribed in the application has an appurtenant supplemental water  right or permit. If the applicant
also intends to temporarily transfer the supplemental  water right or permit, the applicant also shall
include the information required under ORS 540.520  (2) for the supplemental water right or permit.
If the  applicant does not include the supplemental water right or permit in the temporary transfer
application, the Water Resources  Department shall notify the applicant that the supplemental water
right or permit will be canceled before the department issues the order approving  the temporary
transfer of the primary water right, unless within 30  days the applicant modifies the application to
[5]
HB 3501
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
include the supplemental water right  or permit or withdraws the application. The department may
approve the temporary transfer of the supplemental water right or permit in accordance with  the
provisions of this  section. The department may not approve the temporary transfer of a supplemental
water right or permit if the temporary transfer would result in enlargement of the original water
right or injury to an existing water right. If the department approves the temporary transfer of  the
primary water right but does not approve the temporary transfer of the supplemental  water right
or permit, the department shall  notify the applicant of the department’s intent not to allow the
temporary transfer of the supplemental water right or permit before the  department issues the order
for the temporary transfer of the primary  water right. If the department does not allow the tempo-
rary transfer of the supplemental  right, the supplemental right shall remain appurtenant to the land
described in the application, but may not be exercised until the primary right  reverts to the original
water use. If the primary water right does  not revert soon enough to allow use of water under the
supplemental right within five years, the supplemental right shall become subject to cancellation  for
nonuse under ORS 540.610.
(9) In  issuing an order under subsection (2) of this section, the department shall include any
condition necessary to protect other water rights.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 540.524 is amended to read:
540.524. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 540.510 or 540.670, upon approval  of an application submitted
to the Water Resources Department, the holder of both  a primary water right originating from a
surface water source and a supplemental water right permit or certificate originating from  a ground
water source may substitute the use of the supplemental water right for the primary water  right.
A substitution may not be made under this subsection if the  use of the supplemental water right
results in an enlargement or expansion of the primary  water right. This subsection does not au-
thorize a change in place of use, type of use, point of diversion or point of appropriation.
(2) An application required under subsection (1) of this  section shall be submitted on forms
provided by the department. The department may request  additional information if necessary to
assist with the injury evaluation.  Each application shall be submitted with the fee described in ORS
536.050 (1)(s).
(3) Upon  receiving an application under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
provide notice, accept protests and conduct hearings on protests in the manner  described in ORS
540.520 (5), (6) and (7).
(4)(a) The Water Resources Director  shall issue an order approving or denying the substitution.
If the proposed substitution will result  in injury to other water rights, the director shall prohibit
or condition the use to avoid or mitigate the injury. The director shall issue an order approving  or
denying the substitution within 90 days  after the department receives an application under sub-
section (1) of this section.
(b) In deciding whether to approve or deny a substitution under this section, the  director
may not consider whether the substitution would impair or be detrimental to the public in-
terest.
(5) For the purpose of ORS  540.610, a substituted primary surface water right shall be treated
as a supplemental water right, and a substituted supplemental ground water  right shall be treated
as a primary water right.
(6) A  completed and approved substitution of a supplemental ground water right for a primary
surface water right under this section may be terminated upon a request by  the water right holder
or by  an order of the director if the director determines that the use of the ground water as the
[6]
HB 3501
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
primary water right causes injury to other water rights.  Upon termination, the substituted primary
and supplemental water rights shall revert back to their original status.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 540.530 is amended to read:
540.530. (1)(a) If, after  hearing or examination, the Water Resources Commission finds that a
proposed change can be effected without injury to existing water rights,  the commission shall make
an order approving the transfer and fixing a  time limit within which the approved changes may be
completed.
(b) If,  after hearing or examination, the commission finds that a proposed change in point of
diversion  cannot  be effected without injury to existing water rights, upon receipt by the commission
of an affidavit consenting to the change from every holder of an affected water right, the commission
may make an order approving the transfer and fixing a time  limit within which the approved
changes may be completed.
(c) If, after  hearing or examination, the commission finds that a proposed change in point of
diversion cannot be effected without injury to an in-stream water right  granted pursuant to a re-
quest under ORS 537.336 or an in-stream water right created pursuant  to ORS 537.346 (1), the Water
Resources Department may consent  to the change only upon a recommendation that the department
do so from the agency that requested the in-stream water right. The agency that requested the in-
stream water right may recommend that the department  consent to the change only if the change
will result in a net benefit to the resource consistent with the purposes  of the in-stream water right.
(d)(A) If an in-stream water right would be injured by a proposed change under  paragraph (c)
of this subsection,  the department shall obtain a recommendation from the agency that requested the
in-stream water right. If the recommendation of the agency is to consent to the change, the depart-
ment shall provide public notice of the recommendation and, consistent with state  laws regarding
cooperation with Indian tribes in  the development and implementation of state agency programs that
affect tribes or rights and privileges of tribes, the department shall consult  with affected Indian
tribes.
(B) The recommendation  of an agency under this paragraph must be in writing and, if the rec-
ommendation is to consent to  the change, must describe the extent of the injury to the in-stream
water right, the effect on the resource  and the net benefit that will occur as a result of the proposed
change. The recommendation may include any proposed conditions that  are necessary to ensure that
the proposed change will be consistent with the recommendation.
(C) In determining whether a net  benefit will result from the proposed change, the recommen-
dation of  an agency must include an analysis of the cumulative impact of any previous changes un-
der paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection that allow injury to the  affected in-stream water right.
(D) A person may comment on the recommendation of  an agency. The comment must be in
writing and must be received by the  department within 30 days after publication of notice under this
paragraph. If a written comment received by the department requests a meeting on  the proposed
change, the department and the agency that requested the in-stream water right shall  hold a joint
public meeting within 90 days of the receipt of the comment requesting a meeting.
(e)(A) If, after review  of public comments and consultation with the agency that requested the
in-stream water right, the  agency that requested the in-stream water right does not withdraw its
recommendation to consent to the change,  the department may approve the change consistent with
the requirements of paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(B) An order approving a change under paragraph (c) of  this subsection shall include written
findings on the extent of the injury to the in-stream water right, the effect on the resource and  the
[7]
HB 3501
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
net benefit that will occur as a result of the  change. The order shall include any conditions neces-
sary to ensure that the change will be consistent with the findings and ensure that the  change will
result in a continued net benefit to the resource consistent with the purposes of the  in-stream water
right.
(C) In determining whether  a net benefit will result from the change, the order of the depart-
ment must include an analysis of the cumulative impact of any previous  changes approved under
paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection that allow injury to the affected in-stream water right.
(f) When making  a finding under this subsection, the commission may not consider
whether the proposed change would impair or be detrimental to the public interest.
[(f)] (g)  The time  allowed by the commission for completion of an authorized change under par-
agraphs (a) to  [ (e)] (f)  of this subsection may not be used when computing a five-year period of
nonuse under the provisions of ORS 540.610 (1).
(2)(a) If a certificate covering the water right has  been previously issued, the commission shall
cancel the previous certificate or, if for an irrigation district, the commission  may modify the pre-
vious certificate and, when proper proof of completion of the authorized changes has been filed  with
the commission,  issue a new certificate or, if for an irrigation district, modify the previous certif-
icate, preserving the previously established priority of rights and covering the authorized changes.
If only a  portion of the water right covered by the previous certificate is affected by the changes,
a separate new certificate may be issued to cover the unaffected portion of the water right.
(b) If the change authorized under subsection (1) of this section is  necessary to allow a change
in a water right pursuant to ORS  537.348, is necessary to complete a project funded under ORS
541.932, or is approved by the State Department of Fish and  Wildlife as a change that will result in
a net benefit to fish and wildlife habitat, the Water Resources  Department, at the discretion of the
Water Resources Director, may waive or assist the applicant in satisfying  any of the proof of com-
pletion requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection. The assistance  provided by the department
may include, but need not be limited to, development of a final  proof survey map and claim of ben-
eficial  use.
(3) Upon receiving notification of  the merger or consolidation of municipal water supply entities,
or the formation of a water  authority under ORS chapter 450, the commission shall cancel the pre-
vious certificates of the entities  replaced by the merger, consolidation or formation and issue a new
certificate to the  newly formed municipality or water authority. The new certificate shall preserve
the previously established priority of rights of the replaced entities and shall allow beneficial  use
of the water on any lands acquired in the merger, consolidation or formation.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 540.531 is amended to read:
540.531. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 537.515  and 537.535, an owner of a surface water use subject
to transfer may apply  for a transfer of the point of diversion to allow the appropriation of ground
water if  the proposed transfer complies with the requirements of subsection (2) or [ (3)] (4) of this
section and with the requirements for a transfer in  point of diversion specified in ORS 540.520 and
540.530.
(2) The Water Resources Department  may allow a transfer of the point of diversion under sub-
section (1) of this section if:
(a)(A) The new point of diversion appropriates ground  water from an aquifer that is hydrau-
lically connected to the authorized surface water source;
(B) The proposed change  in point of diversion will not result in enlargement of the original
water right or in injury to other water right holders;
[8]
HB 3501
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) The use of the new point  of diversion will affect the surface water source similarly to the
authorized point of diversion specified in the water use subject to transfer; and
(D) The withdrawal of ground water at the new  point of diversion is located within 500 feet of
the surface  water source and, when the surface water source is a stream, is also located within 1,000
feet upstream or downstream of the original point of diversion as specified  in the water use subject
to transfer; or
(b) The new point of diversion is not  located within the distance requirements set forth in par-
agraph (a)(D) of this subsection, the holder of the water use subject to  transfer submits to the de-
partment evidence prepared by a licensed geologist that demonstrates that  the use of the ground
water at the  new point of diversion will meet the criteria set forth in paragraph (a)(A) to (C) of this
subsection.
(3) In deciding whether to allow a transfer of the point of diversion under subsections (1)
and (2) of this section, the department may not consider  whether the transfer would impair
or be detrimental to the public interest.
[(3)] (4)  Notwithstanding subsection (2) of  this section, the department shall allow a transfer of
the point of diversion under  subsection (1) of this section in the Deschutes Basin ground water study
area if:
(a) The new point  of diversion appropriates ground water from an aquifer that is hydraulically
connected to the authorized surface water source;
(b) The proposed change  in the point of diversion will not result in enlargement of the original
water right or in injury to other water right holders; and
(c) The use of the new point of diversion will  affect the surface water source hydraulically
connected to the authorized point of diversion specified  in the water use subject to transfer. The
department may not require that the use of the new point of diversion affect the surface water
source similarly to the authorized point of diversion specified  in the water use subject to transfer
under this subsection.
[(4)] (5) All applicable  restrictions that existed at the original point of diversion shall apply at
the new point of diversion allowed under this section.
[(5)] (6) The new point of diversion shall retain the original date of priority.  However, if within
five years  after approving the transfer, the department finds that the transfer results in substantial
interference with existing  ground water rights that would not have occurred in the absence of the
transfer, the new point of diversion shall be  subordinate to any existing right injured by the trans-
ferred water right or permit.
[(6)(a)] (7)(a)  The department shall approve an  application to return to the last authorized sur-
face water point of diversion if a holder of a  water use subject to transfer submits an application
to the department within five years after the department approves a transfer under this section.
(b) The department  shall approve an application to return to the last authorized surface water
point of diversion  after five  years of the date the department allows  a transfer under subsection
[(3)] (4)  of this section if a holder of a water use subject to transfer submits an application  to the
department, and the return will not result in injury to an existing water right.
[(7)] (8)  For transfers allowed  under this section, the department shall require mitigation meas-
ures to prevent depletion  from any surface water source not specified in the permit or certificated
or decreed  water right, except that the department may not require mitigation measures if the
transfer complies with subsection [ (3)] (4) of this section.
[(8)] (9) The Water Resources Commission shall adopt rules that prescribe:
[9]
HB 3501
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The process for reviewing applications submitted under this section;
(b) The persons to whom the department shall provide  notice of the receipt of an application
submitted under this section; and
(c) The persons who may participate in the process of reviewing applications  submitted under
this section.
[(9)] (10) As used in this section:
(a) “Deschutes Basin ground water study  area” means the part of the Deschutes River Basin
that is designated by the Water Resources Commission by rule.
(b) “Similarly” means  that the use of ground water at the new point of diversion affects the
surface water source specified in the permit or  certificated or decreed water right and would result
in stream depletion of at least 50 percent of the rate of appropriation within  10 days of continuous
pumping.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 540.570 is amended to read:
540.570. (1) Provided that the proposed transfer complies with all of the provisions of this sub-
section and will not result in injury to any existing water right, a district with a manager may,  for
one irrigation season, temporarily transfer  the place of use of water appurtenant to any land within
the legal  boundaries of the district to an equal acreage elsewhere within the legal boundaries of that
district or temporarily transfer the type of use identified in a right to store  water. A temporary
transfer of the place of use may occur if:
(a) The rate and duty, and the total number of acres to which water will be  applied under the
transfer, do not exceed existing limits on the water use subject to transfer;
(b) The type of use authorized under the water use subject to transfer remains the same; and
(c) The land from which the water use is being transferred does not receive any water under
the right being transferred during the irrigation season in which the change is made.
(2) Provided that the proposed transfer complies  with all the provisions of this subsection and
will not result in injury to or enlargement of an existing water  right, a district with a manager may,
for one irrigation season, temporarily change the point of diversion or  appropriation combined with
a change in place of  use, change the point of diversion in the event that an emergency prevents the
district from diverting water from its authorized point  of diversion, change the point of diversion to
allow for the appropriation of ground water or change a primary right to a supplemental right if:
(a) The land on which the water is to be used is within the district’s legal boundaries established
pursuant to ORS chapter 545, 547, 552, 553 or 554;
(b) The other terms of the permit or certificate remain the same, including  the beneficial use for
which the water is used and the number of acres to which water is applied;
(c) The diversion is provided with a proper fish screen, if required by the  Water Resources De-
partment; and
(d) For a proposal to transfer the point of diversion  to allow for the appropriation of ground
water, the proposed change meets the standards set forth in ORS 540.531 (2).
(3) In deciding whether to make a temporary transfer under this section,  a district with
a manager may not consider whether the temporary transfer would impair or be  detrimental
to the public interest.
[(3)] (4) When a district or  an owner or an owner’s agent within a district who is subject to the
charges or assessments of  the district wishes to use water on alternate acreage within the district,
if the district has  approved the owner’s request, the district shall submit to the department a peti-
tion seeking a temporary transfer under this  section. The district shall submit the petition prior to
[10]
HB 3501
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
making the proposed change. The  petition may contain changes to one or more tax lots within the
district and shall:
(a) Include the information required under ORS 540.574 (3);
(b) Be accompanied by a map in  a form satisfactory to the department and certified by the dis-
trict. If the water right is on a tract of land  of five acres or less, the assessor’s tax map with a
notation of the acres of  water right shall be sufficient for identification of the tract and place of
use;
(c) Include a statement  that a written authorization for the transfer from each landowner af-
fected by the particular temporary transfer is on file with the district;
(d) Include any other information required by rules of the Water Resources Commission; and
(e) Include a fee in the amount required under ORS 536.050 (1)(i).
[(4)] (5)  The district shall notify each affected landowner that the department  may reject the
transfer or may  require mitigation to avoid injury to other water rights. Upon receipt of a completed
petition under subsection [ (3)] (4)  of this section, the department shall place  a summary of the pe-
tition in the weekly notice  published by the department. The department shall accept written public
comments on the petition for 30 days following publication of the weekly  notice. The department
shall consider comments that pertain to the potential for injury  to an existing water right or to the
enlargement of the water use  subject to transfer in determining whether to condition, reject or re-
voke a temporary transfer.
[(5)] (6)  Use of water on  lands from which the right is transferred and in the new temporary
location during the same irrigation season or calendar year is prohibited  and may subject the dis-
trict and the landowner to civil penalties.
[(6)] (7) The department may condition, reject or revoke a temporary transfer at any time  to the
extent necessary to  avoid injury if the department finds the transfer is causing injury to an existing
water right.
[(7)] (8)  Upon expiration of the temporary transfer  period, all uses of water for which a tempo-
rary transfer is allowed under this section shall revert automatically  to the terms and conditions
of the original water right  permit, certificate or adjudication under ORS chapter 539 as evidenced
by a court decree.
[(8)] (9) The time during which water is used under an approved temporary  transfer order does
not apply toward a finding of forfeiture under ORS 540.610.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 540.990 is amended to read:
540.990. (1) Violation of any provision of ORS 540.440 is a Class C misdemeanor.
(2) Violation of any provision of ORS 540.570 [ (5)] (6) , 540.710, 540.720 or 540.730 is a Class B
misdemeanor.
(3) Failure to comply with a final order issued under ORS 540.461 (4),  or with an order issued
by an appellate court on appeal from a final order under ORS 540.461 (4), is a Class B  misdemeanor.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 536.900 is amended to read:
536.900. (1) In addition to any  other liability or penalty provided by law, the Water Resources
Commission may impose a civil penalty on a person for violation of:
(a) A term or condition of a permit, certificate or  license issued under ORS chapters 536 to
543A.
(b) ORS 537.130 or 537.535.
(c) ORS 537.545 (5) or a rule described in ORS 537.545 (7).
(d) A commission rule or order that pertains to well maintenance.
[11]
HB 3501
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) ORS 540.045, 540.145, 540.210, 540.310, 540.320, 540.330, 540.340, 540.435, 540.440,  540.570
[(5)] (6), 540.710, 540.720 and 540.730 or rules adopted under ORS 540.145.
(f) ORS 537.897 or 537.898 (2).
(g) ORS 537.387.
(2) A civil penalty may be imposed under this section for each day of  violation of ORS 537.130,
537.535, 540.045, 540.310, 540.330, 540.570 [(5)] (6), 540.710, 540.720 or 540.730.
(3) In the event the petitioner knowingly misrepresents the map and petition required in  ORS
541.329, the commission may assess a penalty of up to  $1,000 based upon guidelines to be established
by the commission. In addition, the petition and map shall be amended to  correct the error at the
petitioner’s cost. Affected users shall be given notice as provided in ORS 541.329 (5).
(4) A civil  penalty may not be imposed until the commission prescribes a reasonable time to
eliminate the violation. The commission shall notify the violator  of the time allowed to correct a
violation within 10 business days after the commission first becomes aware of the violation.
(5) Notwithstanding any term or condition of a permit,  certificate or license, the rotation of the
use of water under ORS 540.150  may not be considered a violation under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion.
(6) The commission may  impose a civil penalty of not more than $2,000 per occurrence for a
violation described in subsection (1)(g) of this section.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 537.211 is amended to read:
537.211. (1) The approval of an application referred  to in ORS 537.140 or 537.400 shall be set
forth in a water right permit issued by the Water Resources Department.  The permit shall specify
the details of the authorized use and shall set forth any terms, limitations and conditions as the
department considers appropriate including but not limited to any applicable condition  required
under ORS 537.289. A copy of the permit shall be filed as a public record in  the department. The
permit shall be mailed to the applicant, and upon receipt of the permit the permittee  may proceed
with the construction of  the necessary works and may take all action required to apply the water
to the designated beneficial use and to perfect the proposed appropriation.
(2) Except as  provided in subsection (6) of this section, if an application under ORS 537.140 or
537.400 indicates that the applicant does not have written  authorization or an easement permitting
access to nonowned land crossed by the proposed ditch,  canal or other work, the department may
issue a final  order approving the application if the approval includes a condition requiring the ap-
plicant to obtain such written authorization, or easement or ownership of such land  and to provide
the department with a copy of the written authorization, easement or evidence of ownership.
(3) If an application referred to in ORS 537.140 or  537.400 is rejected, the department shall enter
a written order setting forth the reasons  for the rejection. The applicant shall take no action toward
construction of the works or use of the  water. The department shall mail a copy of the order to the
applicant.
(4) The holder of a water right permit may change  the point of diversion, change the point of
appropriation, change the point  of diversion to allow the appropriation of ground water or use the
water on land to which the right is not appurtenant if:
(a) The use of water on land to which the  right is not appurtenant, the change of point of di-
version or the change in point of appropriation does not result in injury to an existing  water right;
(b) For a proposed change in the place of use of the water, the land on which  the water is to
be used is owned or controlled by the holder of the permit and is contiguous to the land  to which
the permit is appurtenant;
[12]
HB 3501
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) All other terms of the permit remain the same, including  but not limited to the beneficial
use for which the water is used and the number of acres to which water is applied;
(d) Prior approval  is obtained from the district if the water is transported or conveyed by an
irrigation district organized under ORS chapter 545, a drainage district organized  under ORS chap-
ter 547, a water improvement  district organized under ORS chapter 552, a water control district
organized under ORS chapter 553 or a district improvement company or  a corporation organized
under ORS chapter 554;
(e) The holder of the permit  provides written notice to the department at least 60 days before
making any changes to the lands,  point of diversion or point of appropriation described in the per-
mit;
(f) The holder of the permit  complies with the publication requirements of ORS 540.520 (5), if
applicable;
(g) Diversion is provided with a proper fish screen, if requested by the State  Department of Fish
and Wildlife; and
(h) For a request to transfer the point of diversion to  allow the appropriation of ground water,
the proposed change meets the standards set forth in ORS 540.531 (2) or [ (3)] (4).
(5) Notwithstanding the  requirements of subsection (4)(b) of this section, the holder of a water
right permit may  change the place of use of all or any portion of water under the permit to land that
is not contiguous to the land to which the permit is appurtenant if:
(a) The change  to noncontiguous land is in furtherance of mitigation or conservation efforts
undertaken for the purposes of benefiting  a species listed as sensitive, threatened or endangered
under ORS 496.171 to 496.192  or the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. 1531 to 1544),
as determined by the listing agency; and
(b) All other requirements of subsection (4) of this section are met.
(6) For an application made by or on behalf of a public corporation, the department may issue
a permit approving the application without requiring the applicant to obtain prior written  authori-
zation or an easement permitting access  to nonowned lands affected by the proposed project. How-
ever, nothing in this subsection shall be construed to allow any person to trespass on  the lands of
another person.
(7) When the department receives notice under subsection  (4)(e) of this section, the department
shall publish the notice in the department’s weekly public notice of water right applications.
(8) If the use of water under the permit is for operation of a mining operation as  defined in ORS
517.952:
(a) Review of the application and approval or denial of the application  shall be coordinated with
the consolidated application process  under ORS 517.952 to 517.989. However, such review and ap-
proval or denial  shall take into consideration all policy considerations for the appropriation of water
as set forth in this chapter and ORS chapter 536.
(b) The permit may be issued for exploration  under ORS 517.702 to 517.740, but the permit shall
be conditioned on the applicant’s compliance with the consolidated application process.
(c) The permit shall include a condition that additional conditions may  be added to the use of
water when a water right certificate is issued,  or when the use of water is changed pursuant to ORS
540.520 and 540.530 to use for a mine.
(9) As used in this section, “contiguous” includes land separated from the land to  which a water
right is appurtenant by roads, utility corridors, irrigation ditches or publicly owned rights of way.
[13]