Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In consultation with  the Department of Environmental Quality, the State
Department of Agriculture shall study potential uses for animal processing waste  products,
including, but not limited to, hides. The department shall submit  a report on the study in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources  no later than
September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1293