Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Low-income senior” means an individual with an income at or below 150 percent  of
the area median income and who is at least 55 years old.
(b) “Low-income senior housing development”  means a building or group of buildings in
which ___ or more residential units  for low-income seniors each have space for eating, living
and sleeping and permanent provisions for cooking and sanitation.
(c) “Senior  tenant” means a low-income senior participating in the pilot program estab-
lished by this section by living in a low-income senior housing development and  assisting in
classrooms of a participating school district.
(2) The Housing  and Community Services Department, working together with one or
more school districts, shall establish and implement  a school district and low-income senior
housing colocation pilot program. Notwithstanding the provisions  of any statewide land use
planning goals or local zoning or land use planning ordinances or regulations, the department
shall adopt rules to implement the pilot program. The pilot program is intended to:
(a) Grant  approval to one or more school districts to build a low-income senior housing
development on school district property;
(b) Rent units in the low-income senior housing development; and
(c) Provide participating school districts with additional classroom assistants.
(3)(a) A school district may apply to the department to participate in the pilot program.
(b) An application submitted by a school district under this subsection must, at  a mini-
mum, include:
(A) An estimate of additional staff and resources the school district will require to  par-
ticipate in the pilot program; and
(B) A proposal  for how the school district will use the low-income senior housing devel-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2620
HB 2433
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
opment at the conclusion of the pilot program.
(4) The department shall, by rule:
(a) Select one or more school districts to participate in the pilot program;
(b) Limit the rent charged for a  unit in the low-income senior housing development to
__ percent of the senior tenant’s income;
(c) Require senior tenants to assist in the classrooms  of a participating school district
for an average of 10 hours per week during the school year;
(d) Develop a relocation plan to assist  senior tenants to find new housing and relocate
at the conclusion of the pilot program; and
(e) Create an application process for low-income seniors to participate in the pilot pro-
gram as senior tenants that, at a minimum, includes:
(A) Income verification;
(B) Criminal background checks; and
(C) A  process for determining whether an applicant is well-suited to assist in school dis-
trict classrooms.
(5) A school district selected to participate in the pilot program:
(a) May partner with a nonprofit organization that has  programs for or experience de-
veloping affordable housing or housing for seniors.
(b) Shall collect the rent described in subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(c) Shall remit 50 percent of the rent collected under paragraph (b) of this subsection to
a nonprofit partner described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, if applicable.
SECTION 2.
 (1) A school district may construct a low-income senior housing development
on land owned or held by the school district as part of the pilot program established by sec-
tion 1 of this 2017 Act, notwithstanding any state law relating to  residential use of land, any
statewide land use planning goal or the  administrative rules implementing the goal or any
local zoning or land use planning ordinance.
(2) As used in this section, “low-income senior housing development” has the  meaning
given that term in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.
The Housing and Community Services Department  shall report on the effi-
cacy of the pilot program established in section 1 of this 2017 Act, in the  manner provided
in ORS 192.245, to the committees of the Legislative Assembly related to housing and human
services at  least once during each of three consecutive regular sessions of the Legislative
Assembly, beginning with the 2018 regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 4. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, at the request  of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, in consultation with  the Housing and Community
Services Department, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount  that produces $____ million in net proceeds and in-
terest earnings for the purpose described in subsection (2) of this section, plus  an additional
amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to  this section must be transferred to
the Housing and Community Services Department for deposit in  the Low-Income Senior
Housing Colocation Fund established  in section 5 of this 2017 Act in an amount sufficient to
provide $___ million for disbursement to the department to fund construction of a low-income
senior housing development as part of the pilot program established under section 1 of this
2017 Act.
[2]
HB 2433
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
(3) Bond-related costs incurred  by the Housing and Community Services Department and
the State Treasurer for  the lottery bonds authorized by this section must be paid from the
gross proceeds of the lottery bonds and from allocations for the  purposes of ORS 286A.576
(1)(c).
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds that construction of a low-income senior housing de-
velopment as part of the pilot program established by section 1 of this 2017 Act will:
(a) Create jobs;
(b) Provide low-income seniors with affordable housing options; and
(c) Provide the school  district selected to participate in the pilot program with additional
classroom assistants.
(5) The  findings described in subsection (4) of this section will encourage and promote
economic development within the State of Oregon, and issuance of  lottery bonds to finance
the agreement is therefore an appropriate use of state lottery funds under  Article XV, sec-
tion 4, of the Oregon Constitution, and ORS 461.510.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Low-Income Senior Housing Colocation Fund is established, separate
and distinct from the  General Fund. The moneys in the Low-Income Senior Housing
Colocation Fund  and the interest earnings on moneys in the fund are continuously appro-
priated to the Housing and  Community Services Department for the purposes described in
subsection (2) of this section. The fund consists of moneys deposited in the  fund under sec-
tion 4 of this 2017 Act, and may include other fees, revenues or other income transferred into
the fund by the Legislative Assembly for payment of costs incurred to  establish the Low-
Income Senior Housing Colocation Fund.
(2) Moneys in  the fund are available for immediate distribution to the Housing and
Community Services Department to:
(a) Pay the  costs incurred to fund construction of a low-income senior housing develop-
ment as part of the pilot program established under section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(b) Pay bond-related costs, as defined in ORS 286A.560.
SECTION 6.
Sections 1 to 5 of this 2017 Act are repealed on January 2, 2021.
SECTION 7. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]