Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Green electrolytic hydrogen” means hydrogen produced through electrolysis.
(B) “Green electrolytic hydrogen”  does not include hydrogen manufactured using steam
reforming or any other conversion technology that  produces hydrogen from a fossil fuel
feedstock.
(b) “Renewable hydrogen” means hydrogen produced  using energy sources that do not
emit greenhouse gases.
(c) “Renewable hydrogen-fueled generator” means a backup electrical system  that uses
green electrolytic hydrogen or renewable hydrogen to generate electric power.
(2) The Renewable Hydrogen-Fueled Generator Grant Program is  established within the
State Department of Energy to  provide grants from the Renewable Hydrogen-Fueled Gener-
ator Grant  Fund established under section 2 of this 2023 Act to be used to fund the replace-
ment of backup electrical systems or generators that use diesel or other fossil fuels to
generate electric power with renewable hydrogen-fueled  generators. The department shall
give priority when awarding grants to:
(a) Buildings designated to provide emergency shelter;
(b) Infrastructure, facilities and buildings that provide critical public services;
(c) Hospitals and health care facilities; and
(d) Infrastructure,  facilities and buildings used in the provision of utilities, such as water,
sewage, energy or telecommunications.
(3) The department shall administer the grant program and establish:
(a) Grant application procedures;
(b) Criteria for grant approval; and
(c) Grant amounts to be awarded.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1491
HB 2718
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
(4) The department may adopt rules to administer the grant program.
SECTION 2.
The Renewable Hydrogen-Fueled Generator Grant Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Renewable Hydrogen-Fueled Generator Grant Fund shall be credited to the fund.  Moneys in
the Renewable Hydrogen-Fueled Generator Grant Fund are continuously appropriated to  the
State Department of Energy for  the purposes of making grants as part of the Renewable
Hydrogen-Fueled Generator Grant Program described in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) The State Department of  Energy shall develop planning goals for the
development of hydrogen production  and storage and other infrastructure related to the
wide-scale adoption and use of hydrogen fuel in this state.
(2) The department  shall update the state energy strategy and incorporate the planning
goals developed under subsection (1) of this section into the state energy strategy.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of  Energy, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000 to be deposited  into the Renewable Hydrogen-Fueled
Generator Grant Fund established under section 2 of this 2023 Act.
[2]