Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 163A.215 is amended to read:
163A.215. (1)(a) A notifying agency or a supervising agency  shall release, upon request, any in-
formation that may be necessary to  protect the public concerning sex offenders who reside in a
specific area or concerning a specific sex offender.
(b) A notifying agency or a supervising agency may release sex offender information to  a law
enforcement agency if the notifying agency or  supervising agency determines that the release of
information is in the public interest.
(c) In addition to the release of information described in this subsection and  ORS 137.540,
144.260 and 441.373, a notifying agency or a supervising agency may release sex offender information
to the public in accordance with subsections (2) , (3) and (5)  [ to (4) ] of this section.
(2) If the sex offender is classified as a level three sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (3):
(a) The Department  of State Police shall release sex offender information on a website main-
tained by the department; and
(b) The supervising agency or a notifying agency may release sex offender information to:
(A) A person that resides with the sex offender;
(B) A person with whom the sex offender has a significant relationship;
(C) Residential neighbors and churches, community parks,  schools and child care centers, con-
venience stores, businesses and other places that children or other potential victims may frequent;
(D) A long term care facility, as defined in ORS 442.015, or a residential care  facility, as defined
in ORS 443.400, if the agency knows that the sex offender is seeking admission to the facility; and
(E) Local or regional media sources.
[(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of this section, the Department  of State Police may not use
the Internet  to make available to the public information concerning a sex offender classified as a level
three sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (3) while the person is under the supervision  of the Psychiatric
Security Review Board, unless the department is authorized to  do so by a request of the supervising
agency.]
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3947
SB 1082
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
[(4)] (3) If the sex offender is classified as a level two sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (2)[ ,]:
(a) The Department of State Police shall release sex offender  information on the website
described in subsection (2)(a) of this section; and
(b) The supervising agency or a notifying agency may release sex offender information to  the
persons or entities described in subsection (2)(b)(A) to (D) of this section.
[(5)] (4) If the sex offender is classified as a level one sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (1),  the
supervising agency or a notifying agency may release sex  offender information to a person described
in subsection (2)(b)(A) of this section.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (2)(a) and (3)(a) of this section, the  Department of State
Police may not use the Internet to make available to  the public information concerning a sex
offender classified as a level three sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (3) or a level  two sex
offender under ORS 163A.100 (2) while the person  is under the supervision of the Psychiatric
Security Review Board,  unless the department is authorized to do so by a request of the
supervising agency.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) “Notifying agency” means the Department of State Police, a  city police department, a county
sheriff’s office or a police department established by a university under ORS 352.121.
(b) “Sex offender  information” means information that the Department of State Police deter-
mines by rule is appropriate for release to the public.
(c) “Supervising agency” means a governmental entity responsible  for supervising a person re-
quired to report as a sex offender under ORS 163A.010 or 163A.015.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]