Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 172.100 to
172.140.
SECTION 2. (1) The Executive  Officer of the Commission on Indian Services shall at least
once per calendar quarter provide training on the following topics:
(a) Tribal sovereignty;
(b) Tribal relations with federally recognized Indian tribes and other tribes, bands or
groups that may be affected by the work of the Legislative Assembly;
(c) How to consult with the nine federally recognized Indian tribes in Oregon;
(d) The legal significance of consultation and standards for adequate consultation; and
(e) Tribal customs and how to be respectful of tribal customs.
(2) Each member of the Legislative Assembly and each  employee of the legislative branch
shall attend a training described in subsection (1) of this section at least once per year.
(3) The officer may choose one or more of the topics  described in subsection (1) of this
section for emphasis in any particular training being given.
(4) The commission may  appoint someone other than the officer to provide trainings
under this section.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3501