Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “start-up expenditure” has the meaning given
that term in section 195(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2)(a) A  subtraction from federal taxable income shall be allowed under this chapter for
start-up expenditures of an Oregon trade or business paid or incurred by the taxpayer.
(b) The amount of the subtraction under this section shall equal 20 percent of the amount
allowed as a deduction under section 195 of the Internal Revenue Code for the tax year.
(3) The Department of Revenue shall  by rule establish criteria and policies for adminis-
tering the subtraction allowed under this section.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section, “start-up expenditure” has the  meaning given
that term in section 195(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2)(a) A subtraction from federal taxable income shall be allowed under this chapter  for
start-up expenditures of an Oregon trade or business paid or incurred by the taxpayer.
(b) The amount of the subtraction under this section shall equal 20 percent of the amount
allowed as a deduction under section 195 of the Internal Revenue Code for the tax year.
(3) The Department of Revenue shall by rule establish  criteria and policies for adminis-
tering the subtraction allowed under this section.
SECTION 5. Sections 2 and 4 of this 2025  Act apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1521