Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 469.590 to
469.601.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Small modular reactor” means an advanced nuclear reactor:
(A) With a nameplate capacity of 300 electrical megawatts or less;
(B) That is made up of components  that are factory fabricated and transported to lo-
cation for on-site assembly; and
(C) That may  be constructed and operated in combination with similar reactors at a
single site.
(b) “Small modular reactor energy facility” means an energy facility  that produces power
from using one or more small modular reactors at a single site.
(2) ORS 469.597 does not apply to a small modular reactor energy facility.NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4506