Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “child” means an unmarried person under  18
years of age.
(2) A parent or guardian of a child may admit the child, with or without the child’s  con-
sent, to  an inpatient treatment facility or program licensed by the Oregon Health Authority
or the Department of Human Services for mental, emotional or behavioral health treatment
or for treatment for  a substance use disorder, upon application to the facility or program
and after a careful diagnostic assessment is made by a neutral fact  finder, consistent with
the requirements of this section.
(3) The neutral fact finder who conducts the assessment under this section:
(a) Must be  a licensed health care professional or other qualified professional, as de-
scribed by the department by rule;
(b) Must be trained in the type of treatment for which the parent  or guardian is admit-
ting the child;
(c) May not profit, financially or otherwise, from the child’s admission; and
(d) May not be employed by the facility or program.
(4) The assessment under this section:
(a) May be conducted on the premises of the facility or program;
(b) Must include a private interview with the child, an interview with the child’s parent
or guardian and an evaluation of the child’s background and need for treatment; and
(c) Must culminate in a written report.
(5)(a) The child may be admitted to the  facility or program if the neutral fact finder de-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1048
SB 989
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
termines that:
(A)(i) The child’s mental, emotional or behavioral health needs pose a  reasonable risk of
harm to the child or others; or
(ii) The child  has a substance use disorder and, because of that disorder, poses a rea-
sonable risk of harm to the child or others;
(B) The treatment or rehabilitation is in the child’s best interests; and
(C) There is no less restrictive  alternative that would be equally as effective, from a
clinical standpoint, as the facility or program.
(b) If the child is at least 14 years of age, in determining whether admission to  the fa-
cility or program is in the child’s best interests  under this subsection, the neutral fact finder
shall take into consideration the child’s  reluctance or refusal to assent to treatment, the
child’s maturity level and ability to understand the consequences of refusing treatment,  and
whether the treatment is essential to the child’s welfare or can be  deferred without sub-
stantial risk to the child’s welfare.
(c) A facility or program to which  a child is admitted under this section shall conduct
periodic reviews, at intervals not to exceed 30 days, to determine  whether the criteria de-
scribed in this subsection continue to exist.
(6) A facility  or program may not decline to accept a child for admission under this sec-
tion solely based on the child’s unwillingness to consent to the admission.
(7) If a child admitted to a facility or program under this section is at least 14 years of
age, the child may request administrative review, as provided by the facility’s or program’s
licensing agency by rule, of the appropriateness of the child’s admission under this section.
(8)(a) Upon admission of a child under this section, the facility or program shall  notify
the child’s parent  or guardian and, if the child is at least 14 years of age, the child, both
orally and in writing, in  easily understandable language, of the process to request the child’s
discharge from the facility  or program, including the process for a child to request admin-
istrative review of the admission decision under subsection (7) of this section.
(b) If the child attains 14 years of age while admitted to  the facility or program, the fa-
cility or program shall provide the child with  the notice required under paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(9) A child admitted under this section shall be  discharged no later than 72 hours after
the earliest of the following:
(a) A facility or program receives a written request from the child’s  parent or guardian
requesting the child’s discharge from the facility or program;
(b) A facility or program makes a determination under subsection (5)(c) of this section
that the child no longer meets the criteria for admission to the facility or program; or
(c) The child attains 18 years of age.
(10) This section does not apply to:
(a) The placement of a child in an inpatient  treatment facility or program by the De-
partment of Human Services, the Oregon Youth Authority or  a county juvenile department;
or
(b) The voluntary admission of a child to a state hospital under ORS 426.220 or 426.650.
(11) The Oregon Health Authority or the Department of Human Services shall adopt  any
rules necessary for the implementation of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) As  used in this section, “treatment” means mental, emotional or behav-
[2]
SB 989
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
ioral health treatment or substance use disorder treatment.
(2) The Department of Human Services, in consultation with  the Oregon Health Author-
ity, shall make the following written materials available on the department’s website:
(a) A description of  public and private resources that are available to assist parents and
guardians who are seeking treatment in this state for minor children.
(b) A directory of inpatient and outpatient facilities  and programs that are licensed by
the department or authority to provide treatment in this state to minor children.
(c) A directory of transportation services providers that are licensed  by the department
or authority to transport minor children to facilities  and programs described in paragraph
(b) of this subsection.
(d) A directory of individuals who are  licensed by the department or authority to provide
in-home treatment in this state to minor children.
(e) Any  other information the department determines relevant to assist parents and
guardians who seek treatment in this state for minor children.
(3) The department and authority, by rule, shall require each facility,  program, service
provider or individual included in the directories described in subsection (2) of this section
to inform parents or guardians of patients or prospective  patients about the availability of,
and how to access, the written materials described in subsection (2) of this section.
[3]