Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 652.220 is amended to read:
652.220. (1) It is an unlawful employment practice under ORS chapter 659A for an employer to:
(a) In any manner discriminate between employees on the basis of a protected class in the  pay-
ment of wages or other compensation for work of comparable character.
(b) Pay wages or other  compensation to any employee at a rate greater than that at which the
employer pays wages or other compensation  to employees of a protected class for work of compa-
rable character.
(c) Screen job applicants based on current or past compensation.
(d) Determine compensation for a position  based on current or past compensation of a prospec-
tive employee. This paragraph is not intended to prevent an employer from considering  the com-
pensation of a current employee of the employer during a transfer, move or  hire of the employee to
a new position with the same employer.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:
(a) An employer may pay employees for work of comparable character at different  compensation
levels if all of the difference in compensation levels is based on [ a bona fide factor ] one  or more
of the following factors  that [ is] are related to the position in question [ and is based on ]:
(A) A seniority system;
(B) A merit system;
(C) A system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of  production, including piece-rate
work;
(D) Workplace locations;
(E) Travel, if travel is necessary and regular for the employee;
(F) Education;
(G) Training;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 8
HB 4050
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
(H) Experience; or
[(I) Any combination of the factors described in this paragraph, if the  combination of factors ac-
counts for the entire compensation differential. ]
(I) A bona fide factor:
(i) Other than an employee’s protected class status;
(ii) That is consistent with a business necessity; and
(iii) That fulfills the underlying business purpose of the business necessity.
(b) An employer may pay employees for work of comparable character at different  compensation
levels on the basis of one or more  of the factors listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection that are
contained in a collective bargaining agreement.
(c) An employer may not rely on the bona fide factor described in paragraph  (a)(I) of this
subsection to justify a compensation  differential if an employee demonstrates the existence
of alternative business policies or practices that would equally fulfill the same business pur-
poses as those fulfilled by the  bona fide factor, without producing a compensation differen-
tial. For purposes of this subsection, “business necessity” means an overriding legitimate
business purpose.
(3) An employer may not in any manner discriminate in the payment of  wages or other com-
pensation against any employee because the employee has filed a complaint under  ORS 659A.820 or
in a proceeding under ORS 652.210 to 652.235 or 659A.885 or has testified, or is about to testify, or
because the employer believes that  the employee may testify, in any investigation or proceedings
pursuant to ORS 652.210 to 652.235, 659A.830 or 659A.885 or in a criminal  action pursuant to ORS
652.210 to 652.235.
(4) An employer may not reduce the compensation level of an employee to  comply with the
provisions of this section.
(5) It is not a violation  of this section for an employer to pay a different level of compensation
to an employee who:
(a) Pursuant  to a claim for a compensable injury under ORS chapter 656, receives wages for
modified work; or
(b) As a result of a medical condition, is temporarily performing modified work that is:
(A) Authorized by a medical professional licensed under ORS chapter 677; or
(B) Requested by the  employee and authorized by the employer in a manner that does not dis-
criminate against employees on the basis of a protected class.
(6) Amounts owed to an employee because of the failure of the employer to comply with the
requirements of this section are unpaid wages.
(7) An employee who asserts a violation under this section  may file a complaint with the Com-
missioner of  the Bureau of Labor and Industries under ORS 659A.820, a civil action under ORS
652.230 or a civil action under 659A.885.
(8) An employer shall post a notice of the requirements of this  section in every establishment
where employees work. The Bureau of Labor and Industries shall make available to employers  a
template that meets the required notice provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]