Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Catastrophe model” means a tool,  instrument, means, product or method, including
a map- or computer-based tool or a  simulation, that an insurer uses to estimate potential
losses from catastrophic events.
(b) “Community-level mitigation  action” means an action or set of actions to reduce the
risk of or hazards or loss from wildfire that is based in scientific practice and:
(A) Consists  of actions such as forest treatment and fuel reduction, investments in
equipment to fight wildfires and mitigate impacts from wildfires  and actions that utilities
take to prevent  or reduce the risk of wildfires in accordance with a plan that the Public
Utility Commission approves; and
(B) Is certified by the State Fire Marshal  as effective in reducing the risk of or hazards
or loss from  wildfire in a neighborhood or community or is undertaken by a local government
or state agency to reduce the risk of or hazards or loss from wildfire  in a neighborhood or
community.
(c) “Property-specific  mitigation action” means an action or set of actions to reduce the
risk of wildfire or hazards or loss from wildfire for  a specific property that is based in sci-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 182
SB 1540
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
entific practice and:
(A) Consists of actions such as establishing defensible space,  hardening structures
against fire  or similar or related actions that prevent or reduce the risk of wildfire or the
risk of hazards or loss from wildfire on the property; and
(B) Results in a certification  from the Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety
that designates the property as a Wildfire Prepared Home or results in  a certification from
an equivalent program that verifies that the action is effective in reducing the risk  of
wildfire or hazards or loss from wildfire.
(d) “Wildfire risk model” means a tool,  instrument, means, product or method, including
a map- or  computer-based tool or a simulation, that an insurer uses, in whole or in part, to
measure or assess the risk of wildfire  associated with a residential property or with a com-
munity, for the purposes of:
(A) Rating, classifying or pricing insurance coverage on the basis of the risk; or
(B) Estimating potential loss from wildfire on the basis of a risk classification.
(2)(a) An insurer that uses a catastrophe model, wildfire risk model or  a scoring method
to assign risk for residential property or a community  shall submit the catastrophe model,
wildfire risk model or scoring method to the Director of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services for approval as part of the insurer’s filings under ORS chapter 737.
(b) The insurer’s submission under paragraph (a) of this subsection must include:
(A) A description of the model or method;
(B) How the model or method affects rates;
(C) An actuarial  justification for all rating factors, including any discounts offered for
mitigation actions; and
(D) An explanation of how the insurer uses the model in underwriting decisions.
(c) An  insurer that makes a submission under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall in-
clude in the submission information about whether and how the models the insurer  uses for
rating and underwriting take account of community-level mitigation actions or  mitigation
actions that state agencies perform.
(d) A model or method that an insurer submits under paragraph (a)  of this subsection is
confidential as provided in ORS 705.137.
(3)(a) An insurer that uses a catastrophe model or wildfire risk model, or  a combination
of a catastrophe model and a  wildfire risk model, shall incorporate applicable community-
level mitigation actions and property-specific  mitigation actions into the catastrophe model,
wildfire risk model or  combination of models, or shall otherwise demonstrate that the
insurer’s underwriting and  rates incorporate applicable community-level mitigation actions
and property-specific mitigation actions.
(b) An insurer that does not comply  with the requirement set forth in paragraph (a) of
this subsection shall give a premium discount or adjustment or other incentive to a  policy
holder that demonstrates that the  policy holder has undertaken a property-specific miti-
gation action for the policy holder’s  property or that a community-level mitigation action
has occurred in sufficient proximity to the policy holder’s  property to reduce the risk of loss.
(4) An insurer shall  post on the insurer’s public website the process for appealing the
insurer’s risk classification and  readily accessible information about the premium discounts
or adjustments or other  incentives available to policy holders that demonstrate that the
policy holder has undertaken a  property-specific mitigation action or that a community-level
[2]
SB 1540
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mitigation action occurred in sufficient proximity to the policy holder’s property to  reduce
the risk of loss. The information must identify  property-specific mitigation actions a policy
holder could undertake to receive the premium  discount or adjustment or other incentive,
and the amount of the discount, adjustment or incentive that corresponds with each action.
(5)(a) An insurer that  provides a premium discount or adjustment or other incentive, or
that uses a catastrophe model  or wildfire risk model to underwrite, price, decline to renew,
create a differential rate or impose a surcharge  on a premium shall each year notify an ap-
plicant for insurance or a policy holder, in writing and within the deadlines specified  in sub-
section (6) of this section, of:
(A) The risk classification or score the  insurer has given to the applicant or policy
holder; and
(B) Any applicable  property-specific mitigation action the policy holder could undertake
and any community-level mitigation action that could result in  a more favorable classifica-
tion or score, acceptance or renewal of an  application, withdrawal of a rate differential,
surcharge, a premium discount or adjustment or other incentive.
(b) The notice described in paragraph (a) of this subsection must:
(A) Explain in plain language the classification or score  the insurer has determined for
the applicant’s or policy holder’s property and state that different  insurers may use different
models or have different risk classifications or scores that could  lead to different results or
different decisions;
(B) Identify the classifications or range of scores  the insurer could assign to the
applicant’s or policy holder’s property;
(C) Specify the relative position of the classification or score the insurer  assigns to the
applicant’s or policy holder’s property within the range of classifications or  scores the
insurer identifies in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph;
(D) Explain why the applicant’s  or policy holder’s property received the classification or
score the insurer assigned  and identify the primary features of the property that influenced
the classification or score;
(E) Explain how each property-specific mitigation  action or community-level mitigation
action could affect the classification or score the insurer assigned; and
(F) Notify, as provided in subsection (7) of this section,  the applicant or policy holder of
the right to appeal the  classification or score the insurer assigned to the applicant’s or policy
holder’s property, or to dispute the amount of  the premium discount or adjustment or other
incentive the insurer gives for a property-specific mitigation action or community-level  mit-
igation action.
(6) An insurer shall provide  the notice described in subsection (5) of this section within
the following deadlines, as applicable:
(a) Not later than 15 days after the  applicant submits a completed application for insur-
ance to the insurer;
(b) At the time the insurer offers to renew a policy holder’s policy;
(c) At the time the insurer notifies a policy holder that the insurer declines to renew the
policy holder’s policy; or
(d) Not later than 30 days  after an applicant or policy holder submits a request or appeal
to an  insurer for a reclassification or adjustment to the score the insurer gives to the
applicant’s or policy holder’s property together with a demonstration:
[3]
SB 1540
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
(A) Of having completed, since the last application or renewal of the policy, a  property-
specific mitigation action; or
(B) That a community-level mitigation  action occurred, since the last application or re-
newal of the policy, in sufficient proximity to the property to reduce the risk of loss.
(7)(a) An applicant or policy  holder may appeal a classification or score an insurer as-
signs to the applicant’s or policy holder’s property, or  dispute the amount of a premium
discount or adjustment or other incentive the insurer  provides for a property-specific miti-
gation action or  community-level mitigation action, if the applicant or policy holder believes
the classification, score  or amount is not accurate. The insurer shall provide the applicant
or policy holder with a written acknowledgement not  later than 10 calendar days after re-
ceiving the appeal or dispute and shall respond to  the appeal or dispute with a decision in
writing not later than 30 calendar days after receiving the appeal or dispute.
(b) If an insurer denies an  appeal or refuses to change the amount of a premium discount
or adjustment or other incentive, the insurer shall forward to the director, at  the director’s
request, a copy of the appeal or dispute and the insurer’s response.
(8) The director and the  State Fire Marshal may adopt rules to implement the provisions
of this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2026 Act applies to policies of fire insurance,  casualty in-
surance as defined in ORS 731.158, property insurance as  defined in ORS 731.182 and home-
owner insurance as defined in ORS 746.600 that an insurer issues or renews  on or after the
operative date specified in section 3 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) Section 1 of this 2026 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services and the State
Fire Marshal may adopt rules and take any other action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of  this section that is necessary to enable the director or the State Fire
Marshal to undertake and exercise, on  and after the operative date specified in subsection
(1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the director or the
State Fire Marshal by section 1 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]