Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 401.165 to
401.236.
SECTION 2. The Governor, and any state officer or  agency in the executive branch, may
not order  any ongoing business concern to close or suspend operations under the authority
of the other provisions of ORS 401.165 to 401.236, if the business concern was  operating law-
fully immediately prior to the declaration of a state of emergency under ORS 401.165.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 433.441 to
433.452.
SECTION 4. The Governor, and any state officer or  agency in the executive branch, may
not order any ongoing business concern to close or suspend operations under the  authority
of the other  provisions of ORS 433.441 to 433.452, if the business concern was operating law-
fully immediately prior to the declaration of a state  of public health emergency under ORS
433.441.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1883