Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2023 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
458.
SECTION 2. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall  provide grants
for the development of owner-occupied single-family homes as provided in this section.
(2) To be eligible for a grant under this section, the grantee must:
(a) Be or partner with a culturally responsive or culturally specific organization;
(b) Demonstrate strategies  to make eligibility for purchasing a home available to histor-
ically underserved communities, including communities of color; and
(c) Sell each home  to a low income household that is a first-time home buyer that will
occupy the home as its primary residence.
(3) Each home must be subject to an affordability restriction, such as a restriction  de-
scribed in ORS 456.270 to 456.295, for a  term of no less than 90 years, that makes the home
available for purchase:
(a) Only by households that are low income and that will occupy the property; and
(b) At a price that is affordable to low income households, as defined in ORS 456.270.
(4) The department may  award larger grants per developed home under this section for
homes that will be made affordable to lower income households,  but with the target of
awarding grants under this section that average $200,000 per developed home.
(5) The department shall give preference to grantees:
(a) That finance or arrange financing of the sale of the home at below-market  interest
rates or with down payments of less than $10,000; or
(b) That use a community land trust model in which the grantee will own the land subject
to a ground lease of no less than 90 years.
(6) The department may release up to 15 percent of the total grant  amount awarded un-
der this section for a grantee’s predevelopment costs, including  infrastructure, site acquisi-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3586
SB 936
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion, planning, reports, surveys and consultants, only if the  grantee is a public benefit
corporation whose primary purpose is the development of  affordable housing. A grantee who
receives moneys for  predevelopment costs and is unable to complete the development of the
homes is not liable to the department for the return of any  predevelopment costs actually
and reasonably spent, except for any  equity that the grantee has retained in the real prop-
erty.
(7) The sale  of homes under this section includes ownership of a ground lease with a term
of at least 90 years or ownership  of a share in a cooperative or other form of equity interest
in the real property.
SECTION 3.
The Housing and  Community Services Department shall provide financial
assistance to eligible  organizations under the Affordable Housing Land Acquisition Revolving
Loan Program under ORS 456.502 that:
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 456.502 (2), (5) and (6), is available  only to operating
homeownership programs for low income households that are, or are  partnering with, a
culturally responsive or a culturally specific organization;
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 456.502 (12), consists of loans with an interest rate of  zero per-
cent, except as provided in ORS 456.502 (10);
(3) Has deadlines under ORS 456.502 (8) and (10) that are reduced from eight years  to five
years; and
(4) Is not subject to ORS 456.502 (7).
SECTION 4.
(1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall award grants  to
fund housing projects that incorporate innovative  and creative solutions to providing housing
for ownership or co-ownership by low income households.
(2) Projects funded under this section may include:
(a) Projects using innovative building materials or processes;
(b) Projects converting existing nonresidential uses into residential uses;
(c) Projects using innovative  or uncommon ownership models of ownership, including
community land trusts, shared or limited-equity models or housing cooperatives;
(d) Projects using public-private partnerships,  including industry-specific employment
housing; or
(e) Projects incorporating economic development components or  establishing other public
benefits.
(3) In awarding grants under this section, the department shall prioritize projects:
(a) That have existing dedicated funding available; and
(b) That are submitted by, or  in partnership with, a culturally responsive or culturally
specific organization.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund:
(1) The amount of $100,000,000, to provide grants under section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The amount of $30,000,000, to provide financial assistance under section 3 of  this 2023
Act.
(3) The amount of $20,000,000, to provide grants under section 4 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 6.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 7. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
[2]
SB 936
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2023.
[3]