Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 468A.485 is amended to read:
468A.485. As used in ORS 468A.460 to 468A.515:
(1) “Local  service provider” means a local government, a regional authority, an economic
development district as defined in ORS 285B.636 or a nonprofit organization.
(2) “Masonry heater” has the meaning given that  term in the American Society for Testing and
Materials (ASTM) E1602-03, Standard Guide for Construction of Solid  Fuel Burning Masonry Heat-
ers, as in effect on January 1, 2010, or the meaning given  that term by rule of the Environmental
Quality Commission.
[(2)] (3)  “Pellet stove” means a heating device that uses wood pellets,  or other biomass fuels
designed for use in pellet stoves, as its primary source of fuel.
(4) “Regional authority” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468A.100.
[(3)] (5) “Residential structure” has the meaning given that term in ORS 701.005.
[(4)(a)] (6)(a)  “Solid fuel burning device” means any device  that burns wood, coal or other
nongaseous or nonliquid fuels for aesthetic, space-heating or  water-heating purposes in a private
residential structure or a commercial establishment and that  has a heat output of less than one
million British thermal units per hour.
(b) “Solid fuel burning device” does not include:
(A) Masonry fireplaces built on homesites, or factory-built fireplaces, that are designed to  be
used with an open combustion chamber, that are without features to control air-to-fuel ratios and
that meet minimum emission performance  standards adopted by the commission, or all masonry
fireplaces and factory-built fireplaces if the commission does not adopt any standards;
(B) Woodstoves built before 1940 that  have an ornate construction and a current market value
substantially higher than a common woodstove manufactured during the same period;
(C) Pellet stoves  that meet minimum emission performance standards adopted by the commission,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2054
HB 2725
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or all pellet stoves if the commission does not adopt any standards;
(D) Masonry heaters that meet minimum emission performance standards adopted by the com-
mission, or all masonry heaters if the commission does not adopt any standards;
(E) Central, wood-fired furnaces that are indoors, ducted and  thermostatically controlled, that
have a dedicated cold air inlet and a dedicated hot air outlet that connect to the  heating ductwork
for the entire residential structure and that meet  minimum emission performance standards adopted
by the commission, or all central,  wood-fired furnaces if the commission does not adopt any stan-
dards; and
(F) Other solid fuel burning devices identified in rules adopted by the commission.
[(5)(a)] (7)(a)  “Trash burner” means any equipment that is used to dispose of waste by burning.
(b) “Trash burner” does not include an air contamination source that has  been issued an air
quality permit as described in ORS 468A.040.
[(6)] (8)  “Treated wood” means wood of any  species that has been chemically impregnated,
painted or similarly modified to prevent weathering and deterioration.
SECTION 2. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission shall  adopt by rule a grant pro-
gram for providing funding to local service providers to develop and implement  woodstove
replacement rebate programs.  Rebate programs funded by grants awarded under the grant
program must  provide for rebates for replacement of solid fuel burning devices in residential
structures that were not certified by the Department of  Environmental Quality pursuant to
ORS 468A.465 with new high-efficiency and low air contaminant-emitting heating systems.
(2) Rules  adopted under this section must require the Department of Environmental
Quality to prioritize the awarding of grants to fund rebate programs first to  local service
providers that serve maintenance areas  or nonattainment areas, as those terms are defined
in ORS 468A.040, and second to local service providers based on a scoring system that takes
into account the following factors:
(a) The geographic diversity of the areas to be served by all  grants awarded under the
grant program;
(b) The degree of the local match proposed in the local service provider’s grant  applica-
tion;
(c) The estimated percentage of low-income residents to be served by the rebate program;
and
(d) Any  existing or planned partnerships between the local service provider and other
agencies that provide weatherization or low-income heating assistance.
(3) An application by  a local service provider for a grant under the grant program
adopted under this section must include, at a minimum, a description of:
(a) How the local service provider will  develop and administer a woodstove replacement
rebate program;
(b) The geographic area that the proposed rebate program will serve;
(c) The rebate funding amounts that will be awarded  under the rebate program, including
whether the  local service provider will offer full or partial rebates and any incentives to be
offered;
(d) Any  other programs in the area served by the local service provider that will sup-
plement the rebate program, including but not limited to public education programs, discount
firewood programs, weatherization programs or programs  to curtail residential solid fuel
heating during periods of air stagnation;
[2]
HB 2725
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) How air quality improvements as a result of the rebate program will be measured;
and
(f) Partnerships  or expected partnerships between the local service provider and other
organizations or state or federal agencies related to the rebate program.
(4)(a) The grant program adopted under this  section must require local service providers
to provide a matching contribution as follows in order to receive grant funds:
(A) For a  local service provider serving an area with a population of 10,000 or less, a 10
percent match.
(B) For a local service provider serving an area with a population of  more than 10,000
but less than 50,000, a 15 percent match.
(C) For a local service provider serving an area with a population of 50,000  or more, a 25
percent match.
(b) If the area served by a local service  provider has a population of less than 10,000, or
if low-income residents account for 25 percent or more of the population of the area  served,
the match required by this subsection may be satisfied by an in-kind contribution.
(5) The grant program adopted under this section must  require a local service provider
that receives a grant to report to the department on  the rebate program funded by the grant
once every six months and to submit a  final report to the department at the conclusion of
the rebate program funded by the grant.
SECTION 3.  ORS 468A.490 is amended to read:
468A.490. (1) There is established within the State Treasury a fund  known as the Residential
Solid Fuel Heating Air Quality Improvement Fund, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) All moneys appropriated or received as gifts or grants for the purposes of  this section shall
be credited to the Residential Solid Fuel Heating Air Quality Improvement Fund.
(3) The  State Treasurer may invest and reinvest the moneys in the fund as provided in ORS
293.701 to 293.857. Interest from the moneys deposited in  the fund and earnings from investment of
the moneys in the fund shall accrue to the fund.
(4) All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Department of Environmental
Quality to:
(a) Pay all costs incurred by the department  for evaluating projects and programs, including
projects and programs proposed by local communities  or qualifying organizations, for project man-
agement and oversight of funds awarded for projects  and programs selected in accordance with this
section and for documenting the benefit to air quality from such projects;
(b) Fund the [ program established under subsection (5)  of this section; ] programs established
under subsection (5) of this section and section 2 of this 2017 Act;
(c) Fund activities to enhance enforcement of ORS 468A.460 to 468A.515;
(d) Fund public education programs related to compliance with ORS 468A.460 to 468A.515; and
(e) Fund public education programs related to the benefits of the  use of solid fuel burning de-
vices certified pursuant to ORS 468A.460 to 468A.515.
(5) The department shall use moneys available under subsection (4) of this section  to establish
a program designed to reduce the emission of air contaminants  by providing grants, loans or other
subsidies for the replacement  or removal of solid fuel burning devices that were not certified by the
department pursuant to ORS 468A.465. In addition to any other requirements established by  rules
adopted by the Environmental Quality Commission, the program shall provide that:
(a) All forms  of new high-efficiency, low air contaminant-emitting heating systems are allowed,
[3]
HB 2725
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
except vent-free heating appliances;
(b) Any solid fuel burning device removed under the program must be destroyed;
(c) Any replacement device selected under the program must  be installed in conformance with
building code requirements and the manufacturer’s specifications including but not limited to  vent-
ing specifications; and
(d) To be eligible, program participants shall participate  in any home energy audit program
provided at no  charge to the homeowner and shall obtain all information available regarding subsi-
dies for cost-effective weatherization. The department  shall make the information required in this
subsection readily available to program participants.
(6) The department may enter into an agreement with a local government or a regional author-
ity in order to implement the program established under subsection (5) of this section.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 468A.467 is amended to read:
468A.467. A person  may not cause or allow any of the following materials to be burned in a solid
fuel burning device, a masonry heater, a pellet stove, a trash burner or  any device described in ORS
468A.485 [(4)(b)] (6)(b):
(1) Garbage;
(2) Treated wood;
(3) Plastic or plastic products;
(4) Rubber or rubber products;
(5) Animal carcasses;
(6) Products that contain asphalt;
(7) Waste petroleum products;
(8) Paint;
(9) Chemicals;
(10) Paper or paper products, except for paper used to kindle a fire; or
(11) Any other materials described in rules adopted by the commission.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 468A.505 is amended to read:
468A.505. (1) In connection with the sale of  a residential structure, all used solid fuel burning
devices, other than cookstoves, in the  residential structure or on the real property sold with the
residential  structure,  must be removed and destroyed unless the solid fuel burning devices were
certified for sale as new:
(a) By the United States Environmental Protection Agency  pursuant to 40 C.F.R. part 60, sub-
part AAA; or
(b) By the Department of Environmental Quality pursuant to ORS 468A.465.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1)  of this section, if pursuant to ORS 468A.465 the Environ-
mental Quality Commission adopts more stringent standards than those described in  subsection (1)
of this section for the certification of new solid fuel burning devices,  the commission by rule may
require the removal and destruction of some or all used solid fuel burning devices certified  for sale
as new under less stringent standards if:
(a) The used  solid fuel burning devices were manufactured at least 15 years prior to the date
on which the commission adopts more stringent standards; or
(b) The used solid fuel burning devices are located in a nonattainment area in this state that
does not attain  compliance with standards for particulate matter established by the commission
pursuant to ORS 468A.025.
(3) This section does not apply to:
[4]
HB 2725
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Masonry heaters;
(b) Masonry fireplaces described in ORS 468A.485 [ (4)(b)(A)] (6)(b)(A) ; and
(c) Central, wood-fired furnaces described in ORS 468A.485 [ (4)(b)(E)] (6)(b)(E) .
(4) The removal and destruction of a used solid fuel burning device under  this section is the
responsibility of the seller of the residential structure, unless the seller and  buyer agree in writing
that it is the buyer’s responsibility. If  the seller retains responsibility, the seller shall remove and
destroy the device prior to the closing date of the sale of the residential structure. If the buyer ac-
cepts responsibility, the buyer shall remove and destroy the device within 30 days after the  closing
date of the sale of the residential structure.
(5) The person responsible for removal and destruction of a used solid fuel burning device  under
this section shall provide to the department written confirmation of  the removal and destruction,
pursuant to rules adopted by the commission.
(6) The failure of a seller or  buyer of a residential structure to comply with this section does
not invalidate an instrument of conveyance executed in the sale.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 468A.515 is amended to read:
468A.515. (1) If a local government or  regional authority has not adopted or is not adequately
implementing a curtailment program in any area of the state where such a program is  required un-
der the  Clean Air Act, the Environmental Quality Commission may adopt by rule, and the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality may operate and enforce, a program to curtail  residential solid fuel
heating during periods of air stagnation as described in subsection (2) of  this section. The depart-
ment shall suspend operation and enforcement of  a program adopted under this subsection upon a
determination by the department that the local government or  regional authority has adopted and
is adequately implementing the required curtailment program.
(2) Any programs adopted by the commission pursuant to subsection (1) of  this section to curtail
residential solid fuel heating during periods  of air stagnation shall provide for two stages of
curtailment based on the severity of projected air quality  conditions. Except as provided in sub-
section (4) of this section, the programs  shall apply to all heating by means of solid fuel, including
but not limited to solid fuel burning devices, masonry  heaters, pellet stoves, trash burners and all
devices described in  ORS 468A.485 [ (4)(b)] (6)(b). The programs shall provide that use of a solid fuel
burning device, masonry fireplace or other solid fuel  burning device identified in rules adopted by
the commission be curtailed only at the more severe stage of projected air quality if  the solid fuel
burning device, masonry fireplace or other solid fuel  burning device identified in rules adopted by
the commission was certified for sale as new:
(a) By the United States Environmental Protection Agency  pursuant to 40 C.F.R. part 60, sub-
part AAA; or
(b) By the department pursuant to ORS 468A.465.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if pursuant to ORS 468A.465 the commission
adopts more stringent standards than those described  in subsection (2) of this section for the certi-
fication of new solid  fuel burning devices, the commission by rule may require curtailment during
the less severe stage of projected air quality of some or all solid fuel burning devices certified for
sale as new under less stringent standards if:
(a) The solid fuel burning  devices were manufactured at least 15 years prior to the date on
which the commission adopts more stringent standards; or
(b) The  solid fuel burning devices are located in a nonattainment area in this state that does
not attain compliance with standards for particulate  matter established by the commission pursuant
[5]
HB 2725
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
to ORS 468A.025.
(4) Programs adopted by the  commission to curtail residential solid fuel heating during periods
of air stagnation do not apply to:
(a) A person who is classified at  less than or equal to 125 percent of poverty level pursuant to
guidelines established by the commission taking into account federal poverty guidelines;
(b) A person whose residence is equipped solely with  a solid fuel burning device that meets any
additional requirements as described in rules adopted by the commission; and
(c) Pellet stoves, unless the pellet stove is located in  a nonattainment area in this state that
does not attain  compliance with standards for particulate matter established by the commission
pursuant to ORS 468A.025.
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department  of Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______ to be deposited in the Residential Solid Fuel
Heating Air Quality Improvement Fund for the purpose of  awarding grants under the grant
program adopted under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 8.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[6]