Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $_______, for the purposes of employing one
full-time equivalent employee to:
(1) Provide assistance, education and other services to local  governments, developers and
community members in order to increase the availability of affordable housing;
(2) Draft, review, update and recommend changes to  state policy, rules, technical guide-
books and other resources relating to housing; and
(3) Perform other duties as assigned by the department.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Land Conservation and  Development, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, for  the purposes of employing
one full-time equivalent employee to:
(1) Provide assistance, education and other services to local  governments, developers and
community members in order to increase the availability of affordable housing;
(2) Draft, review, update and recommend  changes to state policy, rules, technical guide-
books and other resources relating to housing; and
(3) Perform other duties as assigned by the department.
SECTION 3.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3512