Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible entity” means a medical facility in Oregon that:
(A) Is located within 25 miles of a tsunami inundation zone; and
(B) Lacks storage capacity for a two-week supply of fuel and water.
(b) “Tsunami inundation zone” means an area of expected  tsunami inundation, based on
scientific evidence that may include geologic field  data and tsunami modeling, determined by
the governing board of the State Department of Geology  and Mineral Industries, by rule, as
required by ORS 455.446.
(2) The Oregon  Business Development Department shall develop and administer a pro-
gram for awarding grants to eligible entities to carry  out capital projects that will enable an
eligible entity to store a supply of fuel and  water sufficient to allow the eligible entity to
operate for two weeks in the event of a disaster.
(3) The department shall prescribe an application  process, including forms and deadlines,
for eligible entities seeking grants. Applications  must include, at a minimum, a proposal for
the project for which grant funding is sought.
(4)(a) The department shall review each timely and  complete application and approve the
application as submitted, approve the application for an amount other  than the amount
sought in the application or reject  the application. In reviewing and approving applications,
the department shall seek to maximize the emergency preparedness of this state.
(b) Grant award amounts and  the rejection of an application may not be appealed, but
an eligible entity may submit another application at any time within the application period.
(5)(a) Upon making a  decision with respect to an application under subsection (4) of this
section, the department shall:
(A) Notify the applicant of its decision and the reason for its decision; and
(B) Offer a grant award agreement to the successful applicant.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3010
HB 3788
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
(b) The  department may elect to disburse the grant moneys in a single payment or in
multiple conditional payments, as specified in the grant agreement.
(c) The grant agreement must require an eligible entity  to make such periodic reports
as the department deems necessary for the department’s  administration of the grant award
program.
(d) The grant agreement must require an eligible entity to repay grant moneys to the
department if the department determines that the eligible entity has used  grant moneys for
any purposes other than those permitted under the grant agreement.
(e) The grant agreement  must specify that if the department discovers that an eligible
entity willfully made a false  statement or misrepresentation, or willfully failed to report a
material fact, to  obtain a grant award under this section, the eligible entity must repay grant
moneys to the department, and the department may add to the amount the eligible entity  is
obligated to repay a  penalty not to exceed 20 percent of the principal amount of the grant
so obtained, plus  any applicable interest and fees associated with the Department of
Revenue’s costs of collection.
(f) When a grant award agreement has  been finalized, the Oregon Business and Devel-
opment Department shall  distribute to the eligible entity the grant moneys as specified in
the grant agreement.
(6) Any and all amounts required to be repaid under subsection  (5)(d) and (e) of this
section shall be considered to be liquidated and delinquent, and the department shall assign
such amounts to the Department of Revenue for collection as provided in ORS 293.250.
(7) Subject to ORS 293.250, all amounts repaid to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment or the Department of Revenue under this section, including  grant award amounts,
penalties, interest, fees and  any other charges, shall be deposited in a fund of the Oregon
Business Development Department.
(8) The department may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]