Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 340.300 is amended to read:
340.300. (1) As used in this section, “accelerated  college credit programs” includes dual credit
programs, two-plus-two programs, advanced placement programs and International  Baccalaureate
programs.
(2) Each school district shall:
(a) Provide students  in grades 9 through 12 with accelerated college credit programs including,
but not limited to, accelerated college credit programs related  to language arts, mathematics and
science; or
(b) Ensure that students  in grades 9 through 12 have online access to accelerated college credit
programs including,  but not limited to, accelerated college credit programs related to language arts,
mathematics and science.
(3) A school district shall ensure that a teacher  of a course that is part of a dual credit
program has completed a minimum of 27 quarter hours of graduate level course  work rele-
vant to the course.  The requirement of this subsection does not apply to career and technical
education courses.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 340.300 by section 1 of this 2025  Act first apply to
courses taught during the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on July 1, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1595