Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Department of  Agriculture shall establish and implement a do-
mestic trade promotion program to promote the purchase of Oregon-made  food and beverage
products by persons in other states.
SECTION 2. (1) In partnership with one or  more organizations that are exempt from
federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. 501 (c)(6), the State Department of Agriculture shall study
the competitiveness of food and beverage processing businesses in Oregon.
(2) The study must quantify:
(a) Limitations on business growth that are related to labor availability;
(b) The talent and labor needs of food and beverage processing businesses that are pur-
suing greater automation to improve employee wages and working conditions;
(c) Access to affordable energy that:
(A) Does not cost more than the median price for natural gas and electricity; and
(B) Can support business growth;
(d) Access to affordable capital;
(e) Any imbalance between demand for and the supply of  debt and equity capital for food
and beverage processing businesses;
(f) Access to the capacity to comanufacture;
(g) Current capabilities for comanufacturing;
(h) Any need for state funding to support comanufacturing; and
(i) Access to technical assistance.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Submit a report on the study in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245 to the commit-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2454
HB 2689
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
tees or  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later
than September 15, 2026; and
(b) Include recommendations in the report on how to:
(A) Ensure that food and beverage processing businesses can remain competitive in
Oregon, with access to affordable energy and capital;
(B) Reduce regulatory barriers for food and beverage processing in Oregon; and
(C) Expand market opportunities for food and beverage products made in Oregon.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out
of the  General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions
of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $750,000, for the purpose of carrying  out the provisions
of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]