Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) No later than July 1, 2018, the Oregon Military Department  shall submit
a report to the interim legislative committees on veterans’ affairs and military affairs  re-
garding implementation of the Oregon Code of Military Justice in this state.
(2) The report shall include a summary of implementation barriers and may  include rec-
ommendations for legislative changes.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3901