Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Land Conservation and  Development, for the biennium beginning
July 1,  2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $______ for natural hazards mitigation
planning.
SECTION 2. It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that the  appropriation made by
section 1 of this  2025 Act be used to secure additional funding from the Federal Emergency
Management Agency for natural hazards mitigation planning.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2443