Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 646.930 is amended to read:
646.930. (1) A person [ who] that  operates a service station, business or other place for the pur-
pose of retailing and delivering gasoline, diesel or other fuel into the tanks of motor vehicles[ :]
[(a) May ] shall display on a sign visible from the street and on a sign visible at or near each
dispensing device the [ lowest cash ] prices charged for the sale of [ the lowest ] all grades of gasoline,
diesel or other fuel.
[(b) If a sign is displayed under paragraph (a) of this  subsection, shall display on a sign visible
at or near any dispensing device all  prices charged for the sale of all grades of gasoline, diesel or other
fuel offered for sale. ]
(2) The following apply to a sign displaying prices under this section:
(a) The price per unit of measurement and  the unit of measurement for a particular kind of fuel
must be  the same on the sign as on any dispensing device used for delivering that kind of fuel into
the tanks of motor vehicles.
(b) If a [ cash] price displayed on a sign is available only under  some conditions, the sign and the
dispensing device must clearly state the conditions.
(c) If a price displayed on a sign is available only in a certain area  of the service station or
business, the area where the price displayed is available must be clearly identified.
(3) A person who displays a [ cash] price that is available only under some conditions may not
require, as a condition of buying fuel at the displayed price, that the buyer fill the fuel  tank of the
buyer’s vehicle.NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4526