Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall study methods for improving school
attendance. When conducting the study, the department  shall compare the attendance im-
provement practices of school districts, school district boards, the department and  other
state agencies of this state with the attendance  improvement practices of school districts,
school district boards, state education agencies and other state agencies in five other  states
identified by the department as being comparable states to Oregon.
(2) The department shall submit  a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to education no later than December 31, 2025.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3662