Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
REPEALS
SECTION 1.
(1) ORS 455.612, 455.614, 476.390, 476.394, 476.398, 477.027, 477.161 and 477.490
and sections 12a, 12b and 29, chapter 592, Oregon Laws 2021, are repealed.
(2) Section 12d, chapter 592, Oregon Laws 2021,  as amended by section 10, chapter 611,
Oregon Laws 2023, is repealed.
DEFENSIBLE SPACE
SECTION 2.  ORS 476.392 is amended to read:
476.392. [(1) The State Fire  Marshal shall establish minimum defensible space requirements for
wildfire risk reduction on lands in areas identified on the statewide wildfire  hazard map described in
ORS 477.490 as within the wildland-urban interface. ]
[(2) The State Fire Marshal: ]
[(a) Shall consult with the Oregon Fire Code Advisory Board to establish the requirements. ]
[(b) Shall establish requirements that are consistent with and do not exceed  the standards per-
taining only to defensible space  that are set forth in the International Wildland-Urban Interface Code
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4647
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
published by the International Code Council, including the standards  pertaining only to defensible
space that are set forth in sections 603 and 604 of the code. ]
[(c) May consider best practices specific to Oregon in order to establish the requirements. ]
[(d) Shall periodically reexamine the standards set  forth in the International Wildland-Urban
Interface Code and update the requirements to reflect current best practices, in consultation with the
Oregon Fire Code Advisory Board. ]
[(e) Shall enforce the requirements that are applicable to lands within the jurisdiction of  a local
government.]
[(f) Shall adopt rules governing administration of the requirements. ]
[(g) May develop and apply  a graduated fee structure for use in assessing penalties on property
owners for noncompliance with the requirements. ]
[(h) Shall consult on implementation of the requirements. ]
[(i) May adopt rules concerning reports by local governments described in subsection (4)(a)  of this
section.]
[(3) Subject to additional local requirements, the requirements  shall apply statewide for all lands
in the  wildland-urban interface that are designated as being in the high wildfire hazard zone, as
identified on the map. ]
[(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a local government may: ]
[(a) Administer, consult on and enforce the requirements established by the State  Fire Marshal,
within the jurisdiction  of the local government. A local government that administers or enforces the
requirements established by the State Fire Marshal shall periodically report  to the State Fire Marshal
regarding compliance with the requirements,  including the extent of compliance for each property
within the jurisdiction of the local government, any change in the degree of compliance  since the last
report and any other information required by the State Fire Marshal by rule. ]
[(b) Adopt and enforce local requirements for  defensible space that are greater than the require-
ments established by  the State Fire Marshal. Any local requirements that a local government adopts
for defensible space must be defensible  space standards selected from the framework set forth in the
International Wildland-Urban Interface Code or other best practices specific to Oregon. ]
[(c) Designate local fire districts, fire departments or fire agencies to enforce  the requirements es-
tablished by the State Fire Marshal or the local government pursuant to paragraph (b)  of this sub-
section. A local government that designates enforcement must  comply with the reporting requirements
in paragraph (a) of this subsection. ]
(1) As used in this section, “defensible space” means a natural or human-made area in
which material capable of supporting  the spread of fire has been treated, cleared or modified
to slow the rate and  intensity of advancing wildfire and allow space for fire suppression op-
erations to occur.
[(5)] (2)  The State Fire Marshal shall administer a community risk reduction program  that em-
phasizes education and methods of prevention with respect to :
(a) Wildfire risk[ , enforcement of ];
(b) The creation of a model code for  defensible space [ requirements,];
(c) Response planning ; and
(d) Community preparedness for wildfires.
(3) As part of the  program, in consultation with the Oregon Fire Code Advisory Board,
the State Fire  Marshal shall create and make available to local governments a model code
for defensible space that:
[2]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Includes standards that are consistent with,  and do not exceed, the standards in the
2024 International Wildland-Urban  Interface Code (October 2024), published by the Interna-
tional Code Council, that pertain to defensible space, including the standards  in sections 603
and 604 of the code; and
(b) To the extent consistent with the standards in the code described  in paragraph (a)
of this subsection, results from a consideration of best practices specific to this state.
(4) The State Fire Marshal may not require a  local government to adopt the model code
described in subsection (3) of this section.
[(6)] (5) As part of the  program, the State Fire Marshal may provide financial, administrative,
technical or other assistance to a local government  to facilitate the [ administration and enforcement
of requirements within the jurisdiction of the local government ] creation of defensible space .
(6) A local government shall  expend financial assistance provided by the State Fire Marshal
under [ this] subsection  (5) of this section  to give priority to the creation of defensible space:
(a) On lands on which members of  socially and economically vulnerable communities, persons
with limited proficiency in English and persons of lower income, as defined in ORS 456.055, reside.
(b) For critical or emergency infrastructure.
(c) For schools, hospitals and facilities that serve seniors.
WILDLAND-URBAN INTERFACE
SECTION 3.
 ORS 477.015 is amended to read:
477.015. As used in this section and ORS 477.025 [ and 477.027,]:
(1) “Wildland” means:
(a) Forestland, as defined in ORS 477.001; or
(b) An unimproved area that contains  enough unmanaged vegetation, at any time of the
year, to constitute a fire hazard, in the judgment  of the forester, regardless of how the area
is zoned or taxed.
(2) “Wildland-urban interface” [ has the meaning given that term in rule by the State Board of
Forestry ] means a geographic area in which there is a  concentration of dwellings in an urban
or suburban setting near wildland .
SECTION 4.
 ORS 477.503 is amended to read:
477.503. (1)[(a)] As used in this section,  “wildland-urban interface” has the meaning given
that term in ORS 477.015.
(2) The State Forestry Department shall design and implement  a program to reduce wildfire risk
through the restoration of landscape resiliency and  the reduction of hazardous fuel on public or
private forestlands and rangelands and in communities near homes and critical infrastructure.
(b) The department shall ensure that the program is consistent with the objectives described in
this section and biennially select, administer and evaluate projects consistent with  the objectives
described in this subsection.
(c) When developing program and project selection criteria, the department  shall, to the extent
practicable, consult and  cooperate with state and federal agencies, counties, cities and other units
of local government, federally recognized Indian tribes in this state,  public and private forestland
and rangeland owners, forest and rangeland collaboratives and other  relevant community organiza-
tions and ensure consistency with the priorities described in subsection [ (3)] (4) of this section.
[(2)] (3)  The department shall develop a 20-year strategic plan, as described in the Shared
[3]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Stewardship Agreement signed on August 13, 2019, that prioritizes restoration actions  and ge-
ographies for wildfire risk  reduction. The plan must be able to be used to direct federal, state and
private investments in a tangible way.
[(3)] (4) In selecting and administering projects, the department shall:
(a) In collaboration with the Oregon  State University Extension Service and other entities,
identify strategic landscapes that are ready for treatment, giving priority  to projects within the
landscapes that are:
(A) On lands in  the four highest eNVC risk classes identified in the United States Forest Service
report titled “Pacific Northwest  Quantitative Wildfire Risk Assessment: Methods and Results” and
dated April 9, 2018;
(B) Inclusive of federal lands  with treatment projects currently approved under the National
Environmental Policy Act (42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq.);
(C) Focusing on treatments protective of human  life[ ,] and property  within the wildland-urban
interface, critical infrastructure, watershed health and forest or rangeland habitat restoration;  and
(D) Part of a collaborative partnership with agreements across diverse forestland or  rangeland
stakeholders that use an expansive, landscape-scale approach to address underlying causes of  poor
wildfire resilience and elevated  risk of wildfire or that establish innovative approaches to addressing
the underlying causes that could be implemented on a larger scale.
(b) To the extent practicable, identify and support projects that are designed to:
(A) Evaluate varying types of fuel treatment methods;
(B) Leverage the collective power  of public-private partnerships and federal and state funding,
including leverage  of the coordination of funding to support collaborative initiatives that address the
underlying causes of elevated forestland and rangeland wildfire risk across ownerships; and
(C) Optimize the receipt of federal government investments that equal or exceed department
investments.
(c) Design the projects to involve existing forest-based and range-based contracting entities.
(d) Design the projects  to complement programs and projects of the Oregon Watershed En-
hancement Board or other state agencies as needed.
(e) Design the projects to  involve the Oregon Conservation Corps Program established by ORS
476.694, to the maximum extent possible, for community protection projects located in  the
wildland-urban interface, subject  to funding available in the Oregon Conservation Corps Fund es-
tablished by ORS 476.698.
(f) Affirmatively seek, and enhance opportunities for,  collaboration from stakeholders holding a
wide variety of perspectives regarding forest and rangeland management and opportunities  for sig-
nificant involvement by communities in proximity to project sites.
(g) Engage in monitoring of the projects to produce useful information  on which to base rec-
ommendations to the Legislative Assembly.
[(4)] (5) A project under this section may not include commercial thinning on:
(a) Inventoried roadless areas;
(b) Riparian reserves identified in the Northwest Forest Plan or in federal Bureau of  Land
Management resource management plans;
(c) Late successional reserves, except to the extent consistent with the 2011  United States Fish
and Wildlife Service  Revised Recovery Plan for the Northern Spotted Owl (Strix occidentalis
caurina);
(d) Areas protected under the federal Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (P.L. 90-542),  national recre-
[4]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ation areas, national monuments or areas protected under ORS 390.805 to 390.925;
(e) Designated critical habitat for species listed as threatened or endangered  under the Endan-
gered Species Act of  1973 (P.L. 93-205) or by the State Fish and Wildlife Commission under ORS
496.172, unless commercial thinning is already allowed under an existing environmental review or
recognized habitat recovery plan; or
(f) Federally designated areas of critical environmental  concern or federally designated
wilderness study areas.
[(5)] (6)  The department shall give public notice, and allow reasonable opportunity for  public
input, when identifying and selecting landscapes under this section.
WILDFIRE PROGRAMS ADVISORY COUNCIL
SECTION 5.
 ORS 476.690 is amended to read:
476.690. (1) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Defensible space” has the meaning given that term in ORS [ 476.390] 476.392.
(b) “Wildland-urban interface” has the meaning given that term in ORS 477.015.
(2) There is established  a Wildfire Programs Advisory Council to advise and assist the State
Wildfire Programs Director by:
(a) Closely monitoring  implementation of activities related to wildfire prevention and response,
including receiving and evaluating agency reports related to wildfire prevention and response.
(b) Providing advice  on potential changes to the activities in order to fulfill the goal of dra-
matically reducing wildfire risk in this state and ensuring that regional defensible space,  building
codes and land use applications are appropriate.
(c) Strengthening intergovernmental and multiparty collaboration  and enhancing collaboration
between governments and stakeholders on an ongoing basis.
(d) Developing strategies to  enhance collaboration among governmental bodies and the general
public.
[(e) Assessing ways the  statewide wildfire hazard map described in ORS 477.490 may inform de-
velopment of building  codes and land use laws, rules and decisions, in a regionally appropriate man-
ner.]
[(f) Assessing the application of defensible space requirements to vineyards,  crops and other culti-
vated vegetation. ]
[(g)] (e)  Reviewing Department of Land Conservation  and Development findings and recommen-
dations in the report required by section 11, chapter 592, Oregon  Laws 2021, and making additional
recommendations related to potential updates to the  statewide land use planning program, local
comprehensive plans and zoning codes to [ incorporate wildfire hazard maps and ] minimize wildfire
hazards to people, public and private property, businesses, infrastructure and natural resources.
(3) The council is not a decision-making body but instead is established to provide advice,  as-
sistance, perspective, ideas and recommendations to the State Wildfire Programs Director.
(4) The President of the Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall jointly ap-
point 19 members to the council as follows:
(a) One member who represents county government.
(b) One member who is a land use planning director of a county that  is wholly or partially
within the wildland-urban interface.
(c) One member who represents city government.
[5]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) One member who is a land use planning director of a city that is wholly or  partially within
the wildland-urban interface.
(e) One member who represents fire chiefs and  has experience with managing, fighting or pre-
venting fire within the wildland-urban interface.
(f) One member who represents fire marshals and has experience with managing,  fighting or
preventing fire within the wildland-urban interface.
(g) One member who represents firefighters and has  experience with managing, fighting or pre-
venting fire within the wildland-urban interface.
(h) One  member who represents rural residential property owners whose property is wholly or
partially within the wildland-urban interface.
(i) One member who represents farming property owners whose property is wholly or  partially
within the wildland-urban interface.
(j) One member who represents ranching property owners whose property is  wholly or partially
within the wildland-urban interface.
(k) One member who represents  forestland owners whose property is wholly or partially within
the wildland-urban interface.
(L) One member who represents federally recognized Indian tribes  with land wholly or partially
within the wildland-urban interface.
(m) One member who represents a utility company.
(n) One member who represents environmental interests.
(o) One member who represents forest resiliency interests.
(p) One member who represents state or regional land use planning organizations.
(q) One member who represents land and housing development  interests or real estate industry
interests.
(r) One member who represents public health professionals.
(s) One member who represents the environmental justice community.
(t) One member who represents fire marshals and has experience with managing, fighting
or preventing wildfire within the wildland-urban interface.
(5) The presiding officers shall provide public notice  of an opportunity for interested parties to
submit names of interest for appointment to the council.
(6) At least seven days before appointing a member, the presiding officers shall consult in  good
faith with the minority leaders of the Senate and House of Representatives on the appointment.
(7) The term of service for each member is four years.
(8) The members are eligible for reappointment.
(9) The council shall elect a chairperson and vice chairperson to serve for one-year terms.
(10) The members shall serve on  the council as volunteers and are not entitled to reimbursement
for expenses.
(11) The Department of Consumer and  Business Services, Department of Land Conservation and
Development, Department of  the State Fire Marshal and State Forestry Department shall each pro-
vide 15 percent of the time of a full-time equivalent employee to:
(a) Cooperatively staff the council.
(b) Attend council meetings as informational resources.
(c) Assist with drafting reports at the request of the council.
(d) Support the work of the State Wildfire Programs Director.
(12) The  Oregon State University Extension Service shall designate a person to serve as staff
[6]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for the council.
(13) Each October the council shall submit a  report to the Governor and appropriate committees
or interim  committees of the Legislative Assembly that describes progress on implementing program
activities related to defensible space, building codes,  land use and community emergency
preparedness and that recommends improvements.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 6.
 ORS 105.464 is amended to read:
105.464. A seller’s property disclosure statement must be in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
If required under ORS 105.465, a seller shall deliver in  substantially the following form the seller’s
property disclosure statement to each buyer who makes a written offer to purchase real  property
in this state:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER
Please complete the following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. Please refer to the line
number(s) of the question(s) when you provide your explanation(s). If you are  not claiming an ex-
clusion or refusing to provide the form under ORS 105.475 (4), you  should date and sign each page
of this disclosure statement and each attachment.
Each seller of residential  property described in ORS 105.465 must deliver this form to each buyer
who makes a written offer to purchase. Under ORS 105.475  (4), refusal to provide this form gives the
buyer the right to revoke their offer at any time prior to closing the transaction. Use only  the
section(s) of the form that apply  to the transaction for which the form is used. If you are claiming
an exclusion under ORS 105.470, fill out only Section 1.
An exclusion may be claimed only if the seller qualifies for the exclusion under the  law. If not ex-
cluded, the seller  must disclose the condition of the property or the buyer may revoke their offer
to purchase anytime prior to closing the transaction. Questions regarding  the legal consequences
of the seller’s choice should be directed to a qualified attorney.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(DO NOT
 FILL OUT THIS SECTION UNLESS YOU  ARE CLAIMING AN EXCLUSION
UNDER ORS 105.470)
Section 1. EXCLUSION FROM ORS 105.462 TO 105.490:
You may claim an exclusion under ORS 105.470  only if you qualify under the statute. If you are not
claiming an exclusion, you must fill out Section 2 of this form completely.
[7]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Initial only the exclusion you wish to claim.
 This is the first sale of a dwelling never occupied.  The dwelling is constructed or installed
under building or installation permit(s) # , issued by .
 This sale is by a  financial institution that acquired the property as custodian, agent or
trustee, or by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure.
 The seller is a court appointed  receiver, personal representative, trustee, conservator or
guardian.
 This sale or transfer is by a governmental agency.
Signature(s) of Seller claiming exclusion
Date 
Buyer(s) to acknowledge Seller’s claim
Date 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(IF YOU DID NOT CLAIM AN EXCLUSION IN SECTION 1, YOU MUST FILL OUT THIS  SEC-
TION.)
Section 2. SELLER’S PROPERTY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT
(NOT A WARRANTY)
(ORS 105.464)
NOTICE TO  THE BUYER: THE FOLLOWING REPRESENTATIONS ARE MADE BY THE
SELLER(S) CONCERNING THE CONDITION OF THE PROPERTY  LOCATED
AT
 (“THE PROPERTY”).
DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS FORM ARE PROVIDED BY THE SELLER ON THE  BASIS
OF SELLER’S ACTUAL  KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME OF DISCLOSURE.
BUYER HAS FIVE DAYS FROM THE SELLER’S DELIVERY OF THIS  SELLER’S DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT TO REVOKE BUYER’S  OFFER BY DELIVERING BUYER’S SEPARATE SIGNED
WRITTEN STATEMENT OF REVOCATION TO THE SELLER DISAPPROVING  THE SELLER’S
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT, UNLESS BUYER WAIVES  THIS RIGHT AT OR PRIOR TO ENTER-
ING INTO A SALE AGREEMENT.
FOR A MORE COMPREHENSIVE EXAMINATION  OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS
PROPERTY,  BUYER  IS ADVISED TO OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF A QUALIFIED
[8]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SPECIALIST TO INSPECT  THE PROPERTY ON BUYER’S BEHALF INCLUDING, FOR EXAM-
PLE, ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING: ARCHITECTS,  ENGINEERS, PLUMBERS,
ELECTRICIANS, ROOFERS, ENVIRONMENTAL INSPECTORS, BUILDING INSPECTORS,  CER-
TIFIED HOME INSPECTORS, OR PEST AND DRY ROT INSPECTORS.
Seller 
 is/  is not occupying the property.
I. SELLER’S REPRESENTATIONS:
The following are representations made by the seller and are not the representations of  any finan-
cial institution that may have made or may  make a loan pertaining to the property, or that may
have or take a security interest in the  property, or any real estate licensee engaged by the seller
or the buyer.
*If you mark yes on items with *, attach a copy or explain on an attached sheet.
1. TITLE
A. Do you have legal authority to sell the property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*B. Is title to the property subject to any of the
following: [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(1) First right of refusal
(2) Option
(3) Lease or rental agreement
(4) Other listing
(5) Life estate?
*C. Is the property being transferred an
unlawfully established unit of land? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*D. Are there any encroachments, boundary
agreements, boundary disputes or recent
boundary changes? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*E. Are there any rights of way, easements,
licenses, access limitations or claims that
may affect your interest in the property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*F. Are there any agreements for joint
maintenance of an easement or right of way? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*G. Are there any governmental studies, designations,
zoning overlays, surveys or notices that would
affect the property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*H. Are there any pending or existing governmental
assessments against the property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*I. Are there any zoning violations or
nonconforming uses? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*J. Is there a boundary survey for the
property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*K. Are there any covenants, conditions,
[9]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
restrictions or private assessments that
affect the property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*L. Is the property subject to any special tax
assessment or tax treatment that may result
in levy of additional taxes if the property
is sold? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
2. WATER
A. Household water
(1) The source of the water is (check ALL that apply):
[ ]Public [ ]Community [ ]Private
[ ]Other 
(2) Water source information:
*a. Does the water source require a water permit? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
If yes, do you have a permit? [ ]Yes [ ]No
b. Is the water source located on the property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*If not, are there any written agreements for
a shared water source? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
*c. Is there an easement (recorded or unrecorded)
for your access to or maintenance of the water
source? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
d. If the source of water is from a well or spring,
have you had any of the following in the past
12 months? [ ]Flow test [ ]Bacteria test
[ ]Chemical contents test [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
*e. Are there any water source plumbing problems
or needed repairs? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(3) Are there any water treatment systems for
the property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
[ ]Leased [ ]Owned
B. Irrigation
(1) Are there any [ ] water rights or [ ] other
irrigation rights for the property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*(2) If any exist, has the irrigation water been
used during the last five-year period? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
*(3) Is there a water rights certificate or other
written evidence available? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
C. Outdoor sprinkler system
(1) Is there an outdoor sprinkler system for the
property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(2) Has a back flow valve been installed? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
(3) Is the outdoor sprinkler system operable? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
3. SEWAGE SYSTEM
A. Is the property connected to a public or
[10]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
community sewage system? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
B. Are there any new public or community sewage
systems proposed for the property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
C. Is the property connected to an on-site septic
system? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(1) If yes, when was the system installed?
[ ]Unknown [ ]NA
(2) *If yes, was the system installed by permit? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
(3) *Has the system been repaired or altered? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(4) *Has the condition of the system been
evaluated and a report issued? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(5) Has the septic tank ever been pumped? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
If yes, when? [ ]NA
(6) Does the system have a pump? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(7) Does the system have a treatment unit such
as a sand filter or an aerobic unit? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(8) *Is a service contract for routine
maintenance required for the system? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(9) Are all components of the system located on
the property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
D. *Are there any sewage system problems or
needed repairs? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
E. Does your sewage system require on-site
pumping to another level? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
4. DWELLING INSULATION
A. Is there insulation in the:
(1) Ceiling? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(2) Exterior walls? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(3) Floors? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
B. Are there any defective insulated doors or
windows? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
5. DWELLING STRUCTURE
*A. Has the roof leaked? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
If yes, has it been repaired? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
B. Are there any additions, conversions or
remodeling? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
If yes, was a building permit required? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
If yes, was a building permit obtained? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
If yes, was final inspection obtained? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
C. Are there smoke alarms or detectors? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
D. Are there carbon monoxide alarms? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
E. Is there a woodstove or fireplace
insert included in the sale? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*If yes, what is the make? 
[11]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
*If yes, was it installed with a permit? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*If yes, is a certification label issued by the
United States Environmental Protection
Agency (EPA) or the Department of
Environmental Quality (DEQ) affixed to it? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*F. Has pest and dry rot, structural or
“whole house” inspection been done
within the last three years? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*G. Are there any moisture problems, areas of water
penetration, mildew odors or other moisture
conditions (especially in the basement)? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*If yes, explain on attached sheet the frequency
and extent of problem and any insurance claims,
repairs or remediation done.
 H. Is there a sump pump on the property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
I. Are there any materials used in the
construction of the structure that are or
have been the subject of a recall, class
action suit, settlement or litigation? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
If yes, what are the materials? 
(1) Are there problems with the materials? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
(2) Are the materials covered by a warranty?  [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
(3) Have the materials been inspected? [ ]Yes  [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
(4) Have there ever been claims filed for these
materials by you or by previous owners? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
If yes, when? 
(5) Was money received? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
(6) Were any of the materials repaired or
replaced? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
6. DWELLING SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES
If the following systems or fixtures are included
in the purchase price, are they in good working
order on the date this form is signed?
A. Electrical system, including wiring, switches,
outlets and service [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
B. Plumbing system, including pipes, faucets,
fixtures and toilets [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
C. Water heater tank [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
D. Garbage disposal [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
E. Built-in range and oven [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
F. Built-in dishwasher [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
G. Sump pump [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
 H. Heating and cooling systems [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
I. Security system [ ]Owned [ ]Leased [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
[12]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
J. Are there any materials or products used in
the systems and fixtures that are or have
been the subject of a recall, class action
suit settlement or litigation? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
If yes, what product? 
(1) Are there problems with the product? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(2) Is the product covered by a warranty? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(3) Has the product been inspected? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(4) Have claims been filed for this product
by you or by previous owners? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
If yes, when? 
(5) Was money received? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
(6) Were any of the materials or products repaired
or replaced? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
7. COMMON INTEREST
A. Is there a Home Owners’ Association
or other governing entity? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
Name of Association or Other Governing
Entity 
Contact Person 
Address 
Phone Number 
B. Regular periodic assessments: $
per [ ]Month [ ]Year [ ]Other 
*C. Are there any pending or proposed special
assessments? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
D. Are there shared “common areas” or joint
maintenance agreements for facilities like
walls, fences, pools, tennis courts, walkways
or other areas co-owned in undivided interest
with others? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
E. Is the Home Owners’ Association or other
governing entity a party to pending litigation
or subject to an unsatisfied judgment? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
F. Is the property in violation of recorded
covenants, conditions and restrictions or in
violation of other bylaws or governing rules,
whether recorded or not? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown [ ]NA
8. SEISMIC
Was the house constructed before 1974? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
If yes, has the house been bolted to its
foundation? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
[13]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
9. GENERAL
A. Are there problems with settling, soil,
standing water or drainage on the property
or in the immediate area? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
B. Does the property contain fill? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
C. Is there any material damage to the property or
any of the structure(s) from fire, wind, floods,
beach movements, earthquake, expansive soils
or landslides? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
D. Is the property in a designated floodplain? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
Note:
 Flood insurance may be required for
homes in a floodplain.
E. Is the property in a designated slide or
other geologic hazard zone? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*F. Has any portion of the property been tested
or treated for asbestos, formaldehyde, radon
gas, lead-based paint, mold, fuel or chemical
storage tanks or contaminated soil or water? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
G. Are there any tanks or underground storage
tanks (e.g., septic, chemical, fuel, etc.)
on the property? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
 H. Has the property ever been used as an illegal
drug manufacturing or distribution site? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
*If yes, was a Certificate of Fitness issued? [ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Unknown
[*I. Has the property been classified as ]
[  wildland-urban interface?  Yes  No  Unknown ]
10. FULL DISCLOSURE BY SELLERS
*A. Are there any other material defects affecting
this property or its value that a prospective
buyer should know about? [ ]Yes [ ]No
*If yes, describe the defect on attached sheet and
explain the frequency and extent of the problem
and any insurance claims, repairs or remediation.
B. Verification:
The foregoing answers and attached explanations (if any) are complete and correct to
the best of my/our knowledge and I/we have received a copy of this disclosure statement.
I/we authorize my/our agents to deliver a copy of this disclosure statement to all
prospective buyers of the property or their agents.
Seller(s) signature:
SELLER 
 DATE 
SELLER  DATE 
[14]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
_______________________________________________________________________________________
II. BUYER’S ACKNOWLEDGMENT
A. As buyer(s), I/we acknowledge the  duty to pay diligent attention to any material defects that are
known to me/us or can be known by me/us by utilizing diligent attention and observation.
B. Each buyer acknowledges and understands that  the disclosures set forth in this statement and in
any amendments to this  statement are made only by the seller and are not the representations of
any financial institution that may have made or may make a loan pertaining  to the property, or that
may have or take a security  interest in the property, or of any real estate licensee engaged by the
seller or buyer. A financial institution or real estate licensee  is not bound by and has no liability
with respect to any representation, misrepresentation, omission, error or inaccuracy contained in
another party’s disclosure statement required by this section or  any amendment to the disclosure
statement.
C. Buyer (which term includes all persons signing the “buyer’s acknowledgment” portion of this
disclosure statement below) hereby acknowledges receipt of a copy of  this disclosure statement (in-
cluding attachments, if any) bearing seller’s signature(s).
DISCLOSURES, IF ANY, CONTAINED IN  THIS FORM ARE PROVIDED BY THE SELLER ON
THE BASIS OF SELLER’S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE  OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME OF DIS-
CLOSURE. IF THE SELLER HAS FILLED OUT SECTION 2 OF THIS FORM,  YOU, THE BUYER,
HAVE FIVE DAYS FROM THE SELLER’S DELIVERY OF THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT  TO
REVOKE  YOUR  OFFER BY DELIVERING YOUR SEPARATE SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT
OF REVOCATION TO THE SELLER DISAPPROVING THE SELLER’S DISCLOSURE UNLESS
YOU WAIVE THIS RIGHT AT OR PRIOR TO ENTERING INTO A SALE AGREEMENT.
BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS SELLER’S  PROPERTY
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT.
BUYER 
 DATE 
BUYER  DATE 
Agent receiving disclosure statement on buyer’s behalf to sign and date:
 Real Estate Licensee
 Real Estate Firm
Date received by agent 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
[15]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 7.
 ORS 197.716 is amended to read:
197.716. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Economic opportunity analysis” means an analysis performed by a county that:
(A) Identifies the major  categories of industrial uses or other employment uses that could rea-
sonably be expected to expand or locate in the county  based on a review of trends on a national,
state, regional or county level;
(B) Identifies the number of  sites by type reasonably expected to be needed to accommodate the
expected employment growth based on the site characteristics typical of expected uses;
(C) Estimates the  types and amounts of industrial uses and other employment uses likely to oc-
cur in the county based on  subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph and considering the county’s
economic advantages and disadvantages, including:
(i) Location, size and buying power of markets;
(ii) Availability of transportation facilities for access and freight mobility;
(iii) Public facilities and public services;
(iv) Labor market factors;
(v) Access to suppliers and utilities;
(vi) Necessary support services;
(vii) Limits on development due to federal and state environmental protection laws; and
(viii) Educational and technical training programs;
(D) Assesses  community economic development potential through a public process in conjunction
with state agencies and consistent with any categories or particular types of industrial uses and
other employment uses desired by the community as identified in an existing comprehensive plan;
(E) Examines existing firms in the county to identify the types of sites that may  require expan-
sion;
(F) Includes an inventory of vacant and developed lands within the county designated for  in-
dustrial use or other employment use, including:
(i) The description, including site characteristics, of vacant or developed sites within  each plan
or zoning district; and
(ii) A description of any development constraints or infrastructure  needs that affect the
buildable area of sites in the inventory; and
(G) Identifies additional potential sites for designation and rezoning that  could reasonably ac-
commodate expected industrial  uses and other employment uses that cannot be met by existing in-
ventories.
(b) “Industrial use” means industrial employment activities, including manufacturing, assembly,
fabrication, processing, storage, logistics, warehousing,  importation, distribution and transshipment
and research and development.
(c) “Listed county” means Baker, Gilliam, Grant, Harney,  Lake, Malheur, Sherman, Union,
Wallowa or Wheeler County.
(d) “Other employment use” means all nonindustrial employment  activities, including small scale
commercial use, wholesale, service, nonprofit, business  headquarters, administrative, governmental
or employment  activities that serve the medical, educational, social service, recreational or security
industries and that occupy retail, office or flexible building types of any size  or multibuilding cam-
puses.
(e) “Reasonably be expected to expand or locate in the county” means  that the county possesses
the appropriate locational factors for the use or category of use.
[16]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f)(A) “Small scale commercial use” means the  low-impact use of land primarily for the retail
sale of products or services, including offices.
(B) “Small scale commercial use” does not include use of land  for factories, warehouses, freight
terminals or wholesale distribution centers.
(2) A listed county that has adopted an economic opportunity analysis as part of its  compre-
hensive plan may amend  its comprehensive plan, land use regulations and zoning map to designate
not more  than 10 sites outside an urban growth boundary that cumulatively total not more than 50
acres of land if the sites  were identified in any economic opportunity analysis as additional potential
sites for industrial uses or other employment uses in order to allow for industrial  uses and other
employment uses without requiring an exception under ORS 197.732 to any statewide land  use
planning goals related to:
(a) Agriculture;
(b) Forest use; or
(c) Urbanization.
(3) A county may not designate a site under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) On any lands designated as high-value farmland as defined in ORS 195.300;
(b) Unless the county complies with ORS 197.714; and
(c) If any portion of the proposed site is for lands designated for forest use, unless the county:
(A) Notifies the State Forester in writing not less than 21 days before designating the site; and
(B) Cooperates with the State Forester in:
(i) Updating and classifying wildland-urban interface lands in and around the site;
(ii) Taking  necessary steps to implement or update the wildland-urban interface fire protection
system in and around the site [ as described in ORS 477.027 ]; and
(iii) Implementing other fire protection measures authorized by the State Forester.
(4) A county may not amend its comprehensive  plan, land use regulations or zoning map under
this section to allow a use that would conflict with an  administrative rule adopted for the purpose
of implementing the Oregon Sage-Grouse Action Plan and Executive Order 15-18.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 215.291 is amended to read:
215.291. (1) A lawfully established dwelling may be altered,  restored or replaced under ORS
215.213 (1)(q), 215.283 (1)(p) or 215.755 (1) if the county determines that the dwelling to be altered,
restored or replaced:
(a) Has, or formerly had:
(A) Intact exterior walls and roof structure;
(B) Indoor plumbing consisting of a kitchen sink, toilet  and bathing facilities connected to a
sanitary waste disposal system;
(C) Interior wiring for interior lights; and
(D) A heating system; and
(b)(A) Unless the value of the dwelling was eliminated  as a result of destruction or demolition,
was assessed as a dwelling for purposes of ad valorem taxation since the later of:
(i) Five years before the date of the application; or
(ii) The date that the dwelling was erected upon or fixed to the land and  became subject to
property tax assessment; or
(B) If the  value of the dwelling was eliminated as a result of destruction or demolition, was as-
sessed as a dwelling for purposes of ad valorem taxation prior to the destruction or demolition and
since the later of:
[17]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Five years before the date of the destruction or demolition; or
(ii) The date that the dwelling was erected upon or fixed to the land and  became subject to
property tax assessment.
(2) For replacement of a lawfully established dwelling under this section:
(a) The  dwelling to be replaced must be removed, demolished or converted to an allowable
nonresidential use within three months after the  date the replacement dwelling is certified for oc-
cupancy pursuant to ORS 455.055.
(b) The replacement dwelling:
(A) May be sited on any part of the same lot or parcel.
(B) Must  comply with applicable siting standards. However, the standards may not be applied
in a manner that prohibits the siting of the replacement dwelling.
[(C) Must comply  with the construction provisions of section R327 of the Oregon Residential Spe-
cialty Code, if: ]
[(i) The  dwelling is in an area identified as extreme or high wildfire risk on the statewide map of
wildfire risk described in ORS 477.490; or ]
[(ii) No statewide map of wildfire risk has been adopted. ]
(c) As a condition of  approval, if the dwelling to be replaced is located on a portion of the lot
or parcel that is not zoned  for exclusive farm use, the applicant shall execute and cause to be re-
corded in the deed records of the county in which the property is located  a deed restriction pro-
hibiting the siting of another dwelling on that portion  of the lot or parcel. The restriction imposed
is irrevocable unless the county planning director, or the director’s designee,  places a statement of
release in the deed records of the county to the effect that the  provisions of this section and either
ORS 215.213 or 215.283 regarding replacement  dwellings have changed to allow the lawful siting of
another dwelling.
(3) The county planning director, or the director’s designee,  shall maintain a record of the lots
and parcels that do not qualify for the siting of a new dwelling under subsection  (2) of this section,
including a copy of the deed restrictions filed under subsection (2)(c) of this section.
(4) If an applicant is granted a deferred replacement permit under this section:
(a) The deferred replacement permit:
(A) Does not  expire but the permit becomes void unless the dwelling to be replaced is removed
or demolished within three months after the deferred replacement permit is issued; and
(B) May not be transferred, by sale  or otherwise, except by the applicant to the spouse or a
child of the applicant.
(b) The replacement dwelling must comply with applicable building codes,  plumbing codes, san-
itation codes and other requirements relating to health  and safety or to siting at the time of con-
struction.
(5) An application under this section must be filed  within three years following the date that the
dwelling last possessed all the features listed under subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(6) Construction of a  replacement dwelling approved under this section must commence no later
than four years after the approval of the application under this section becomes final.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 215.495 is amended to read:
215.495. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Accessory dwelling unit” has the meaning given that term in ORS 215.501.
(b) “Area zoned for rural residential use” has the meaning given that term in ORS 215.501.
(c) “Single-family dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 215.501.
[18]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Consistent with a county’s comprehensive plan, a county may allow an owner of a lot or
parcel within an area zoned for rural  residential use to construct one accessory dwelling unit on the
lot or parcel, provided:
(a) The lot or parcel is not located within an area designated  as an urban reserve as defined in
ORS 197A.230;
(b) The lot or parcel is at least two acres in size;
(c) One single-family dwelling is sited on the lot or parcel;
(d) The existing single-family dwelling property on the lot or parcel is  not subject to an order
declaring it a nuisance or subject to any pending action under ORS 105.550 to 105.600;
(e) The accessory dwelling unit will comply with all applicable laws and regulations relating  to
sanitation and wastewater disposal and treatment;
(f) The accessory dwelling unit will not include more than 900 square feet of usable floor area;
(g) The  accessory dwelling unit will be located no farther than 100 feet from the existing
single-family dwelling;
(h) If the water supply source for  the accessory dwelling unit or associated lands or gardens
will be a well using water under ORS  537.545 (1)(b) or (d), no portion of the lot or parcel is within
an area in which new or existing ground water uses under ORS 537.545 (1)(b) or (d) have been  re-
stricted by the Water Resources Commission;
(i) No portion of the lot or parcel is within a designated area of critical state concern;
(j) The lot or parcel is served by a fire protection service  provider with professionals who have
received training or certification described in ORS 181A.410;  and
[(k) If the lot  or parcel is in an area identified on the statewide wildfire hazard map described in
ORS 477.490 as within the wildland-urban interface, the lot or parcel  and accessory dwelling unit
comply with  any applicable minimum defensible space requirements for wildfire risk reduction estab-
lished by the State Fire Marshal under ORS 476.392 and any applicable local requirements for
defensible space established by a local government pursuant to ORS 476.392; ]
[(L) The accessory dwelling unit complies with the  construction provisions of section R327 of the
Oregon Residential Specialty Code, if: ]
[(A) The lot  or parcel is in an area identified as a high wildfire hazard zone on the statewide
wildfire hazard map described in ORS 477.490; or ]
[(B) No statewide wildfire hazard map has been adopted; and ]
[(m)] (k)  The county has adopted land use regulations that ensure that:
(A) The accessory  dwelling unit has adequate setbacks from adjacent lands zoned for resource
use; and
(B) The accessory dwelling unit has adequate access for firefighting equipment, safe  evacuation
and staged evacuation areas[ ; and ].
[(C) If the accessory dwelling unit is  not in an area identified on the statewide wildfire hazard
map described in ORS 477.490 as within  the wildland-urban interface, the accessory dwelling unit
complies with the provisions of this section and any applicable local  requirements for defensible space
established by a local government pursuant to ORS 476.392. ]
(3) A county may not allow an accessory dwelling unit allowed under this section to be used  for
vacation occupancy, as defined in ORS 90.100.
(4) A county that allows construction  of an accessory dwelling unit under this section may not
approve:
(a) A subdivision, partition or other division of the lot or parcel so that the existing single-family
[19]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dwelling is situated on a different lot or parcel than the accessory dwelling unit.
(b) Construction of an additional accessory dwelling unit on the same lot or parcel.
(5) A county may require that an accessory dwelling unit constructed under this  section be
served by the same water supply  source or water supply system as the existing single-family dwell-
ing, provided such use is allowed for the accessory dwelling unit by an existing water  right or a use
under ORS 537.545.  If the accessory dwelling unit is served by a well, the construction of the ac-
cessory  dwelling  unit shall maintain all setbacks from the well required by the Water Resources
Commission or Water Resources Department.
(6) An existing single-family dwelling and an accessory dwelling unit  allowed under this section
are considered a single unit for the purposes of calculating exemptions under ORS 537.545 (1).
(7) Nothing in this section requires a county  to allow any accessory dwelling units in areas
zoned for rural residential use  or prohibits a county from imposing any additional restrictions on
accessory dwelling units in areas  zoned for rural residential use, including restrictions on the con-
struction of garages and outbuildings that support an accessory dwelling unit.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 477.748 is amended to read:
477.748. (1) As used  in this section, “small forestland owner” means an individual, group, feder-
ally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon or association that owns:
(a) Up to 160 acres of nonindustrial private forestland west of the crest of the Cascade  Moun-
tains; or
(b) Up to 640 acres of nonindustrial private forestland  east of the crest of the Cascade Moun-
tains.
(2) The State Forestry Department shall establish a small forestland  grant program for the
purpose of providing grants, on a  competitive basis, to support small forestland owners in reducing
wildfire risk through the  restoration of landscape resiliency and the reduction of hazardous fuels
on the owners’ property.
(3) In consultation with partners and stakeholders, the department shall  set criteria for assess-
ing grant applications and awarding grants. The criteria may include, but need not be limited to:
[(a) Prioritization of projects on  forestland in the high wildfire hazard zone described in ORS
477.490.]
[(b)] (a)  Owner commitment to maintaining fuel reduction treatments.
[(c)] (b) Owner possession of a forest management plan.
[(d)] (c)  Project proximity  to current or past fuel mitigation efforts, supported by any owner or
funding source, that would contribute to cross-boundary, landscape-scale forest resiliency.
[(e)] (d) Whether the project addresses additional resource concerns, such as insect  and disease
management.
[(f)] (e)  Whether critical facilities and infrastructure may receive enhanced protection due to
project outcomes.
SECTION 11.  ORS 526.272 is amended to read:
526.272. (1) The State Forestry Department shall:
(a) In collaboration with any forest protective  association or agency that is under contract or
agreement with the State Board of Forestry for the protection of forestland against fire, and  whose
protection area is or may be affected by a fire on nearby federal lands, and with a  focus on pro-
tecting lands and rural communities within the  wildland-urban interface, as defined [ pursuant to
ORS 477.027] in ORS 477.015 , from fire on federal lands,  endeavor to further shared stewardship to
decrease wildfire risk across Oregon through increased partnership  with federal agencies to expand
[20]
HB 3944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
activities under the Good Neighbor Authority Agreement described  in ORS 526.275 in federal forests
through:
(A) Increasing forest thinning.
(B) Reducing ladder fuels and other hazardous fuel loading.
(C) Restoring meadowland.
(D) Increasing biomass utilization.
(E) Increasing post-disturbance recovery and restoration activities.
(b) Request that the federal agencies fund portions of the activities  described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection.
(2) Activities undertaken  pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must be executed in a manner
that protects and enhances the long-term ecological health of a landscape, in conformance with the
most broadly accepted scientific principles of forestry.
VOIDING ASSIGNMENTS OF PROPERTY TO WILDFIRE HAZARD ZONES
SECTION 12.
(1) As used  in this section, “order” has the meaning given that term in ORS
183.310.
(2) An order issued by the State Forestry  Department under ORS 477.490 (2023 Edition)
that assigns property to a wildfire hazard zone is null and void.
(3) Not more than 30 days after the effective date of this 2025  Act, the department shall
withdraw and reverse any order issued under ORS 477.490 (2023 Edition) that  assigns prop-
erty to a wildfire hazard zone.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 13. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 14. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[21]