Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 811.515 is amended to read:
811.515. This section establishes requirements for ORS  811.520. Except where an exemption un-
der ORS 811.525 specifically provides otherwise, a vehicle that does not comply with this section  is
in violation of ORS 811.520. Where specific types of lighting equipment are mentioned in this section,
those types are types described in ORS 816.040 to 816.290. The requirements under  this section are
as follows:
(1) Subject to any other  provision of this section, any lighting equipment a vehicle is required
to be equipped with  under ORS 816.040 to 816.290 must be displayed when the vehicle is upon a
highway within this state :
(a) At any time limited visibility conditions exist.
(b) At any time the windshield wipers of  the vehicle are in operation, unless the
windshield wipers are being operated solely for the purpose of cleaning the windshield.
(c) At any time there is fog.  [ The provisions of this subsection apply during  the times stated
when the required visibility is measured on a straight, level unlighted highway. ]
(2) Parking lights and lights other than clearance, identification and  marker lights that are
mounted on  the front of a vehicle and are designed to be displayed primarily when the vehicle is
parked [ shall] may  not be lighted when  a vehicle is driven upon a highway at times when limited
visibility conditions exist except when:
(a) The lights are being used as turn signals; or
(b) The headlights are also lighted at the same time.
(3) Any vehicle parked or stopped upon a roadway or shoulder adjacent thereto,  whether at-
tended or unattended, during times when limited  visibility conditions exist must display parking
lights.
(4) All vehicles not specifically required by  ORS 816.320 to be equipped with lighting equipment
shall at times when limited visibility conditions exist display  exempt-vehicle safety lighting equip-
ment. This section includes, but is not limited to, animal drawn vehicles and vehicles  exempted from
required lighting equipment under ORS 816.340.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1385
HB 2522
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) Tow vehicle warning lights on tow vehicles shall be activated when the tow vehicles are
engaged in connecting with other  vehicles and drawing such vehicles onto highways or while ser-
vicing disabled vehicles.
(6) When limited visibility conditions exist a person  shall use a distribution of light or composite
beam that is directed sufficiently high and that  is of such intensity so as to reveal persons and ve-
hicles on the highway at a safe distance in advance of the vehicle. A person violates  this subsection
if the person does not comply with the following:
(a) Whenever the  driver of a vehicle approaches an oncoming vehicle within 500 feet, the driver
must use a distribution of light or composite beam so aimed that the glaring rays  are not projected
into the eyes of the oncoming driver. The use of the low beams  of the vehicle headlight system is
in compliance with this paragraph at all times regardless of road  contour and loading of the vehicle.
(b) Except when in the act of overtaking or passing, a driver of a vehicle following another ve-
hicle within 350 feet to the rear must use the low beams of the vehicle headlight system.
(7) When a vehicle is upon a highway a person [ shall light not ] may not light  more than a  total
of four lights at any one time that are mounted on the front of a vehicle and that each projects  a
beam of intensity greater than 300 candlepower.
(8)(a) A light, other than a headlight, that projects a beam of light of  an intensity greater than
300 candlepower [ shall] may not be operated on a vehicle:
(A) Unless the beam is so directed that no part  of the high intensity portion of the beam will
strike the level of the roadway on which the vehicle stands at a distance  of more than 75 feet from
the vehicle; or
(B) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, when use of the low  beams of the
vehicle headlight system is required under subsection (6) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection,  a light, other than a headlight, may be
lighted on a motorcycle provided that the intensity of the light does not  exceed the intensity of the
low beams of the headlight system. A  motorcycle may not be operated with more than two lights,
other than headlights, under this paragraph.
(9) A spotlight [ shall] may  not be lighted upon approaching another vehicle unless the spotlight
is so aimed and used so that no part of the high-intensity portion of the  beam will be directed to the
left of  the prolongation of the extreme left side of the vehicle upon which it is mounted, more than
100 feet ahead of the vehicle.
(10) Auxiliary lights mounted higher than  54 inches [ shall] may not be lighted when the vehicle
is used on a highway.
(11) A back-up light [ shall] may  not be lighted when the vehicle is in forward motion.
(12) Bus safety lights shall only be operated in accordance with the following:
(a) The lights may be operated when the vehicle is stopping or has stopped for  the purpose of
loading or unloading students who are going to or from any school or authorized school activity  or
function.
(b) The lights may  be operated when the vehicle is stopping or has stopped for the purpose of
loading or unloading workers from worker transport buses.
(c) The lights may be operated when the vehicle is stopping or has stopped  for the purpose of
loading or unloading children being transported to or  from religious services or an activity or
function authorized by a religious organization.
(d) The lights may be operated when  the vehicle is stopping or has stopped in a place that ob-
structs other drivers’ ability to see the bus safety lights on another vehicle.
[2]
HB 2522
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Notwithstanding any other paragraph of this subsection, the lights  [ shall] may  not be oper-
ated if the vehicle is stopping or has stopped at an  intersection where traffic is controlled by elec-
trical traffic control signals, other than flashing signals, or by a police officer.
(f) Notwithstanding  any other paragraph of this subsection, the lights [ shall] may  not be oper-
ated if the vehicle is stopping or has  stopped at a loading or unloading area where the vehicle is
completely off the roadway.
(13)(a) Hazard lights shall be  used for the purpose of warning the operators of other vehicles
of the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring the exercise of unusual  care in approaching,
overtaking or passing.
(b) Hazard lights shall be used by the first and last vehicles in a funeral procession.
(14) Mail delivery lights may be used only while in active  service transporting United States
mail for the purpose of warning other vehicle operators of the  vehicle’s presence and to exercise
caution in approaching, overtaking or passing. A vehicle with mail  delivery lights is in compliance
with this subsection if the lights  are flashed continuously while the vehicle is in motion in active
service transporting mail or if the lights are actuated by application of the service brake while the
vehicle is parked.
(15) A pilot vehicle warning light may be activated only when the vehicle equipped with  the
light is an escort  accompanying a motor vehicle carrying or towing a load of a size or description
not permitted under ORS 818.020, 818.060, 818.090 or 818.160.
(16) Fire company warning lights authorized under a permit granted under ORS 818.250 may  be
used by the persons  authorized under the permit while being driven to a fire station or fire location
in response to a fire alarm. Fire company warning lights authorized under ORS 811.800 may be used
by funeral escort vehicle or funeral lead vehicle drivers while driving in a  funeral procession. The
lights shall be  covered or otherwise concealed when not being displayed as provided in this sub-
section.
(17) Any lighted headlights upon a parked vehicle shall be dimmed.
(18) Commercial vehicle warning lights may be used only:
(a) To warn operators of other vehicles of the  presence of a traffic hazard requiring the exercise
of unusual care in approaching, overtaking or passing the commercial vehicle; and
(b) When the commercial vehicle is being used for commercial purposes and the vehicle is:
(A) Stopped, parked or left standing at a commercial or work site; or
(B) In a highway work zone as defined in ORS 811.230.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 811.520 is amended to read:
811.520. (1) A  person commits the offense of unlawful use or failure to use lights if the person
does any of the following:
(a) Drives or moves on any highway any vehicle  at a time when vehicle lighting is required to
be operated or is prohibited from being operated under ORS 811.515 and operates or fails to operate
lighting equipment as required under ORS 811.515.
(b) Owns a vehicle or combination of  vehicles and causes or knowingly permits the vehicle or
combination of vehicles to be driven or moved on any highway at a time when ORS  811.515 requires
or prohibits the operation of vehicle lighting equipment without  compliance with the requirements
under ORS 811.515.
(c) Drives any vehicle in a funeral procession without using the low beam headlights.
(2) The application of this section is subject to the exemptions from this  section established
under ORS 811.525.
[3]
HB 2522
1
2
3
4
5
6
(3) The offense described in  this section, unlawful use of or failure to use lights, is a Class B
traffic violation, except that violation of ORS 811.515  (1)(b) and (c),  (3), (4), (13) or (17) or sub-
section (1)(c) of this section is a Class D traffic violation.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 811.515 and 811.520 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025
Act apply to conduct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[4]