Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) No later  than two months after the close of each calendar quarter, a data
center, as defined in ORS 308.505, shall:
(a) Report to the Water Resources Department, in the manner provided by ORS  537.101
and the rules adopted thereunder, the amount of  water used by the data center during the
previous calendar quarter. The department shall transmit reports received under this section
to the State Department of Energy.
(b) Report to the State Department of  Energy the amount of electricity used by the data
center during the previous calendar quarter.
(2) The State Department of Energy shall publish on a website maintained by the de-
partment a summary of the information reported by each data center  under subsection (1)
of this section.
SECTION 2. The State Department of Energy shall establish a website  for publishing in-
formation reported under section 1 of this 2025 Act no later than July 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 468A.
SECTION 4. The Environmental Quality Commission  shall, pursuant to ORS 468A.025,
adopt emissions standards to control the  discharge of air contaminants from standby gen-
erators used at data centers, as defined in ORS 308.505.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4388