Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Justice,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $400,000, for distribution to the Attorney General’s Sexual Assault  Task
Force for purposes of managing the Oregon SAE/SANE Certification  Commission, including
outreach, training,  technical assistance, establishing competencies and standards, member-
ship oversight and multidisciplinary work with  entities including law enforcement agencies,
hospitals and community-based victim services organizations.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 260