Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 317A.125 is amended to read:
317A.125. (1) The corporate activity tax imposed  under ORS 317A.116 for each tax year shall
equal $250 plus the product of the taxpayer’s taxable  commercial activity in excess of [ $1 million]
$5 million for the tax year multiplied by 0.57 percent.
(2) A tax is not owed  under this section if the person’s taxable commercial activity does not
exceed [ $1 million] $5 million.
SECTION 2.  ORS 317A.137 is amended to read:
317A.137. (1) For purposes of the corporate activity tax imposed under ORS 317A.116, every
person doing  business in this state with commercial activity for the tax year in excess of [ $1
million] $5 million shall file an annual return not later than the 15th day of the fourth month fol-
lowing the end of the  tax year. If the 15th day of the fourth month falls on a Saturday, Sunday or
legal holiday, including any legal holiday in the District of Columbia, the return is due on the  next
business day following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. The  return must be filed with the
Department of Revenue in a form prescribed by the department.
(2) The corporate activity  tax imposed under ORS 317A.116 is due and estimated tax payments
for the previous quarter are payable to  the department on or before the last day of the 4th, 7th and
10th months of the tax year and of the first month immediately following the end of the tax year.
(3) The department may by rule extend the time for making any return. If  the time for filing a
return is extended, interest on any unpaid tax at the rate established under ORS  305.220 from the
time the return was originally required to be filed to the time of payment, shall be added and paid.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 317A.125 and 317A.137 by sections 1 and  2 of this
2024 Act apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 191
HB 4055
1
[2]