Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Military Department shall study and make recommendations
regarding military leave from public employment.
(2) As part of its study, the department shall:
(a) Analyze current deployment and training  data and recommend an appropriate amount
of military leave for public employees; and
(b) Review approaches to  military leave for public employees taken in various jurisdic-
tions and analyze advantages and disadvantages of such approaches.
(3) The department shall submit a report on its  findings to an appropriate committee of
the Legislative Assembly no later than January 1, 2023.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2968