Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 197A.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “heritage tree” means a tree that is designated
by a local government through an ordinance or resolution  that recognizes the tree’s unique
location, size, age, botanical interest or historic or cultural significance.
(2) Except for a heritage tree or a tree in a riparian corridor, a local government may
not condition the development or use of property for needed housing on:
(a) The retention of a tree; or
(b) The payment of a fee in lieu of retaining a tree.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 1, 2036.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2133