Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 56.180 is amended to read:
56.180. (1) A Business Registration Information Center is established within the Office of  the
Secretary of State.
(2) The primary functions of the center are:
(a) To develop a system within the center by which accurate and easily understandable infor-
mation with respect  to the business registration requirements of participating state agencies  and
agencies of local government, as defined in ORS 174.116,  may be  made available to persons
undertaking a new business or operating an existing business;
(b) To establish a business portal as provided in subsection (3) of this section; [ and]
(c) To advertise and make the business portal described in subsection (3) of this  section and
information described in this subsection  available to all persons who request the information[ .]; and
(d) To share information the Secretary of State collects  under subsection (4) of this
section with:
(A) All agencies within the executive department of state government;
(B) All small business development centers  established within the state or within local
governments; and
(C) Organizations that the center determines are:
(i) Community-based;
(ii) Fostering economic development; and
(iii) Engaged  in substantive efforts to increase in this state the number of minority-
owned businesses, women-owned businesses and veteran-owned businesses.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 293
HB 4101
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3)(a) The center shall establish, maintain and update a business portal called the “One Stop
Shop for Oregon Business” that is accessible through the Internet and  that provides information,
services and resources for:
(A) Starting, expanding and operating a business in Oregon  or relocating a business within or
to Oregon;
(B) Understanding  state and local government rules, ordinances and policies that apply to busi-
ness;
(C) Understanding how to classify a business for registration purposes;
(D) Registering, licensing and obtaining needed permits for a business;
(E) Obtaining information about financing and tax credits available to businesses;
(F) Understanding business taxes and rules and policies concerning taxation that apply  to busi-
nesses;
(G) Obtaining information about and assistance with exporting;
(H) Obtaining information about and resources for hiring workers in Oregon;
(I) Obtaining information about public contracting;
(J) Obtaining information about and resources for business relocation;
(K) Obtaining information about and assistance with training for businesses; and
(L) Obtaining other information, services and resources related to business in Oregon.
(b) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, and local government, as defined
in ORS 174.116, that  have functions related to business registration, licensing, permitting or taxation
or that otherwise can provide information  for or assist with establishing, expanding, operating or
relocating a business are directed to cooperate with and assist the center in performing  the center’s
duties under subsection (3) of this section.
(4)(a) The Secretary of State shall  collect information about the ethnicity, gender and
veteran status of each owner and principal of a  business that applies for or renews a busi-
ness registration, if the owner or principal chooses to provide the information, together  with
the owner’s or principal’s street address and electronic  mail address. The Secretary of State
shall provide an accessible and easy to  use method for submitting the information electron-
ically in connection with a business registration, but may not mandate that a person provide
information about an owner’s or principal’s ethnicity, gender or veteran status as a condition
of applying for or renewing a business registration.
(b) The Secretary of State may not  make the information that the Secretary of State
collects under paragraph (a) of this subsection available or searchable on the  Internet unless
the person to whom the information pertains has given  explicit written consent to make the
information available and searchable. Information the Secretary of State collects under this
subsection is not subject to disclosure as a public record under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(c) The Secretary of State may share  or communicate with organizations described in
subsection (2)(d) of this section, by electronic means  or otherwise, the information that the
Secretary of State collects under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(4)] (5) The Secretary of State may adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions [ of sub-
section (3) ] of this  section , including rules that protect the confidentiality of the information
the Secretary of State collects under subsection (4) of this section .
SECTION 2.
(1) The amendments to ORS 56.180 by section 1 of  this 2024 Act become op-
erative on January 1, 2028.
(2) The Secretary of State may adopt rules and take any other action before the operative
[2]
HB 4101
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
date specified in  subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the Secretary of
State, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section, to undertake
and exercise all of the duties, functions and powers  conferred on the Secretary of State by
the amendments to ORS 56.180 by section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]