Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Subject to approval by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission under
ORS 350.075 (3)(g) or 352.089 (2), each public university listed in ORS 352.002  may offer doc-
toral degrees.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding section 1  of this 2020 Act, the Oregon Institute of Tech-
nology, Eastern Oregon University, Southern Oregon University and Western Oregon  Uni-
versity may not offer more than five doctoral programs each.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2020 Act is repealed on January 1, 2039.
SECTION 4.  ORS 352.011 is amended to read:
352.011. Western Oregon  University, Southern Oregon University and Eastern Oregon Univer-
sity are established as comprehensive universities that offer a full range of  baccalaureate programs
and, subject to section 1 of this 2020 Act,  graduate programs [ through the master’s degree ].
SECTION 5. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission or any other  state
agency may not use public moneys to award a scholarship,  grant or other type of student
financial aid to a post-secondary institution of education if  the post-secondary institution of
education:
(a) Offers coursework primarily online; and
(b) Has been found to have engaged in fraudulent or predatory practices against a  stu-
dent or prospective student, as determined by:
(A) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission;
(B) A court of this state; or
(C) A public body as defined by ORS 174.109.
(2) As used in this section,  “offers coursework primarily online” and “fraudulent or
predatory practices” shall be defined by rule by  the Higher Education Coordinating Com-
mission.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 23