Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.883 is amended to read:
327.883. (1) The State Board of Education shall by  rule adopt eligibility requirements, biennial
plan guidelines, biennial plan submission deadlines, reporting criteria and audit  processes to ensure
that amounts apportioned under ORS 327.859 improve students’ progress toward graduation begin-
ning with grade  9, increase the graduation rates of high schools and improve high school graduates’
readiness for college or career.
(2) The requirements for eligibility adopted under subsection (1) of this section must include:
(a) The requirement that the biennial plan include:
(A) A district needs assessment and an explanation  of how the establishment or expansion of
career and technical education  programs, college-level educational opportunities or dropout-
prevention strategies addresses those needs.
(B) A description of how the school district will establish or expand career and  technical edu-
cation  programs,  college-level educational opportunities and dropout-prevention strategies in com-
pliance with ORS 327.874.
(C) The four-year plan of the school district relating to the establishment or  expansion of career
and technical education programs, college-level educational opportunities and  dropout-prevention
strategies, as provided by ORS 327.874.
(b) The requirement that the school district demonstrate in the biennial plan how the  school
district will:
(A) Provide sufficient time for teachers and staff of students in grade 9  to review data on
students’ grades, absences and discipline by school and by course and to develop strategies to ensure
at-risk students stay on track to graduate;
(B) Implement district-wide evidence-based practices for reducing  chronic absenteeism in grades
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 619
HB 3055
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
9 through 12;
(C) Assign high school students to advanced and dual-credit courses based on academic quali-
fications in order to avoid bias in course assignments; and
(D) Implement systems to  ensure that high school students, including English Language
Learners, are taking courses required for on-time graduation.
(c) If necessary for the  success of the establishment or expansion of career and technical edu-
cation programs, college-level educational opportunities and dropout-prevention  strategies, the re-
quirement that a school district must demonstrate in the biennial plan that the school district will:
(A) Cooperate, coordinate or act jointly with other school districts,  education service districts,
regional achievement collaboratives, post-secondary institutions or other  education partners, in-
cluding professional learning communities, to achieve the purposes of  the High School Graduation
and College and Career Readiness Fund and to maximize  benefits from apportionments under ORS
327.859;
(B) Cooperate, coordinate or act jointly with nonprofit programs and community-based organ-
izations that have demonstrated achievement of positive outcomes in work  with underserved student
populations;
(C) Consult with federally recognized Oregon Indian tribes, as required by rule of the  State
Board of Education; and
(D) Use evidence-based criteria to  determine appropriate staffing ratios and class sizes to
achieve the purposes of the fund and to maximize benefits from apportionments under ORS 327.859.
(d) The requirement that, for the statewide summative  assessments administered for
mathematics and language arts at least once in grades 9 through 12  for purposes of 20 U.S.C.
6311, the school district comply with the percentage requirements for the  annual measure-
ment of achievement that applies to all students and to all students in each subgroup  of
students identified in 20 U.S.C. 6311.
(e) The requirement that the average student academic achievement, as  measured by the
statewide summative assessments administered for both mathematics and  language arts at
least once in grades 9 through 12 for purposes of 20 U.S.C. 6311, has improved as compared
to both the previous school year and the 2018-2019 school year.
SECTION 2.
(1) The amendments to  ORS 327.883 by section 1 of this 2025 Act become
operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The amendments to ORS 327.883 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to  distributions
commencing with the 2026-2027 distributions.
SECTION 3. ORS 329.482 is repealed.
[2]