Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 725.015 is amended to read:
725.015. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,  [ nothing in ] this chapter
[shall be construed or held to ] does not limit [ the] a person’s  rights, powers or privileges [ granted
to any person by any ] under another  law of this state or of the United States [ whereby the  loaning
of money or extending of ] that regulates lending money or extending  credit [ is regulated,  provided
that such person is operating in compliance with the provisions of  such law ] if the person complies
with the other law .
(2) The Legislative  Assembly hereby declares that this state does not want any of the
amendments set forth in section 521 of the Depository Institutions Deregulation  and Mone-
tary Control Act of 1980 (P.L. 96-221, 94 Stat. 132) to apply to consumer  finance loans made
in this state.
(3) A person  is subject to this chapter if the person engages in the business of making
consumer finance loans of $50,000 or less or if the person acts as  an agent, broker or
facilitator for a person that engages in the business of making consumer finance loans of
$50,000 or less to a consumer who:
(a) Resides in or maintains a domicile in this state;
(b) Negotiates, agrees to the  terms of or enters into or executes a contract for a con-
sumer finance loan of $50,000 or less in person, by  mail, by telephone or via the Internet
while the consumer is physically present in this state;
(c) Makes a payment on a consumer finance loan of $50,000 or less in which:
(A) A person debits an account that the consumer holds in this state at  a financial in-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 361
HB 2561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
stitution or trust company, as those terms are defined in ORS 706.008; or
(B) The consumer makes the payment by means of a negotiable instrument drawn on  a
financial institution or trust company, as those terms are defined in  ORS 706.008, that is
located in this state.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 725.120 is amended to read:
725.120. (1) [ Application] A person  may apply  for a license required under ORS 725.045 [ shall
be in writing in ] on  a form  and with the contents  [ prescribed by ] the Director of the Department
of Consumer and Business Services  specifies . [ The application shall contain  the name and both the
residence and business addresses of each individual applicant, of each member of a partnership or  as-
sociation that applies for a license and of each officer or director of  a corporation that applies for a
license. The application shall also  contain the county and city with street and number, if any, where
the business is to be conducted and any other information the director may require. ]
(2) An application under subsection (1) of this section must include:
(a) The name of  each individual applicant, of each member of a partnership or association
that applies for the license and of each director or  officer of a corporation that applies for
the license;
(b) The residential address for each  individual described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section;
(c) The business address for each individual described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection
and the street name and number,  the city and the county of the physical address, if any, at
which the applicant will conduct business under the license;
(d) A unique identifier  that the applicant applies for and receives from the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;
(e) Fingerprints that the director or the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry can send to a government agency that  has authority to lawfully use the fingerprints
to perform a statewide, nationwide or international criminal background check;
(f) A summary  of the applicant’s personal history and experience on a form and with
contents that the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry specifies;
(g) A written authorization for the Nationwide Mortgage  Licensing System and Registry
to obtain, with reference to the applicant:
(A) A  credit report from a consumer reporting agency, as defined in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(f),
or from a consumer reporting  agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a
nationwide basis, as defined in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(p); and
(B) Information about administrative, civil or criminal  proceedings, orders, judgments
or other official actions in any governmental jurisdiction that involve the applicant; and
(h) Any other information that the director  or the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing Sys-
tem and Registry may require.
[(2)] (3) An applicant, at the time the applicant  applies for a license under this section, shall pay
to the director a  license fee determined under ORS 725.185 for the period terminating on the last
day of the current calendar year. If the director  denies the applicant a license for cause or if the
applicant withdraws the  application after the director investigates the applicant, the director shall
refund the license fee paid  under this subsection, less an amount that reflects the director’s admin-
istrative and investigative costs for the application.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 725.015 and 725.120 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025
Act apply to consumer finance loans made in this state on or after the  effective date of this
[2]
HB 2561
1
2
3
4
2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]