Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 107.095 is amended to read:
107.095. (1) After the commencement  of a suit for marital annulment, dissolution or separation
and until a general judgment therein, the court may provide as follows:
(a) That a party pay to the other party such amount  of money as may be necessary to enable
the other party to prosecute or defend  the suit, including costs of expert witnesses, and also such
amount of money to the other party as may be necessary to support and maintain the other party.
(b) For the care, custody, support and maintenance, by one party  or jointly, of the minor chil-
dren as described in ORS 107.105 (1)(a) and for the parenting time rights as described in ORS 107.105
(1)(b) of the parent not having custody of such children.
(c) For the restraint of a party from molesting or  interfering in any manner with the other party
or the minor children.
(d) That if minor children reside in the family home and  the court considers it necessary for
their best interest to do so,  the court may require either party to move out of the home for such
period of time and under such conditions as the court may determine,  whether the home is rented,
owned or being purchased by one party or both parties.
(e) Restraining and enjoining either party or  both from encumbering or disposing of any of the
real or personal property of either or both of the parties, except as ordered by the court.
(f) For the exclusive temporary use, possession and control  of the real or personal property of
the parties or either of them and the payment of installment liens and encumbrances thereon.
(g) That even if no minor children reside in the family home, the court may  require one party
to move out of the home for  such period of time and under such conditions as the court determines,
whether the home is rented, owned or being purchased by one party or both parties if that  party
assaults or threatens to assault the other.
(2) A  limited judgment under ORS chapter 18 may be entered in an action for dissolution or
annulment of a marriage providing for a support award, as defined by ORS 18.005, or other  money
award, as defined by  ORS 18.005. Notwithstanding ORS 19.255, a limited judgment entered under this
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3384
HB 2638
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
subsection may not be appealed. Any decision of the court  in a limited judgment subject to this
subsection may be appealed as otherwise provided by law upon entry of a general judgment.
(3) The court shall not require an undertaking in case of the issuance of an order under  sub-
section (1)(c), (d), (e), (f) or (g) of this section.
(4) In a suit for annulment or dissolution of marriage or for separation,  wherein the parties are
copetitioners or the respondent is found by the court to  be in default or the respondent having ap-
peared has waived further appearance or the parties stipulate to the entry  of a judgment, the court
may, when the cause is otherwise ready for hearing on the merits, in lieu  of such hearing, enter a
judgment of annulment or dissolution or for separation based upon a current  affidavit or declaration
under penalty of perjury in the form  required by ORCP 1 E, executed by the petitioner or
copetitioners, setting forth a prima facie case, and covering such additional matters  as the court
may require. If custody of minor children is involved, then the affidavit  or declaration under penalty
of perjury must also include the name  of the party with whom the children currently reside and the
length of time they have so resided.
(5) When a court orders relief under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section, the court may in-
clude in its order an expiration date for the order  to allow entry of the order into the Law
Enforcement Data System and the databases of  the National Crime Information Center of the United
States Department of Justice as  provided in ORS 107.720. If the person being restrained was pro-
vided notice and an opportunity to be heard, the court shall also include in  the order, when appro-
priate, terms  and findings sufficient under 18 U.S.C. 922 (d)(8) or (g)(8) to affect the person’s ability
to possess firearms and ammunition or engage in activities involving firearms.
[2]