Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ADULT USE CANNABIS ITEMS
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 475C.005  to
475C.525.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) As used in this  section, “container” means the innermost wrapping,
packaging or vessel in direct contact with a final marijuana item in which  the final
marijuana item product is enclosed for retail sale to a consumer.
(b) “Container” does not mean  a bulk shipping container or outer wrapping that are not
essential for the final retail delivery or sale of the marijuana item to a consumer for personal
use.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall ensure that the  concentration
limit of adult  use cannabinoids established by rule under ORS 475C.009 (20) includes a per
container concentration limit of adult use cannabinoids.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 475C.009 is amended to read:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 6
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
475C.009. As used in ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525:
(1) “Adult use cannabinoid” includes, but is not limited  to, tetrahydrocannabinols,
tetrahydrocannabinolic acids that  are artificially or naturally derived, delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol,
delta-9- tetrahydrocannabinol, the  optical isomers of delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol or
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol and any artificially derived cannabinoid that is  reasonably determined
to have an intoxicating effect.
(2) “Adult use cannabis item” means:
(a) A marijuana item; or
[(b) An industrial hemp commodity or product that exceeds: ]
[(A) the concentration of adult use cannabinoids established by  the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission, in consultation with the Oregon Health Authority and the State Department  of Agricul-
ture, by rule; or ]
[(B) The greater of: ]
[(i) A concentration of more than 0.3 percent total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol; or ]
[(ii) The concentration of total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol allowed under federal law ]
(b) An industrial hemp-derived cannabinoid product.
(3)(a) “Artificially derived cannabinoid” means a chemical substance that is created by  a chem-
ical reaction that changes the molecular structure of any chemical substance derived from the  plant
Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Artificially derived cannabinoid” does not include:
(A) A naturally occurring chemical substance that is separated from  the plant Cannabis family
Cannabaceae by a chemical or mechanical extraction process;
(B) Cannabinoids that are produced by decarboxylation  from a naturally occurring cannabinoid
acid without the use of a chemical catalyst; or
(C) Any  other chemical substance identified by the commission, in consultation with the au-
thority and the department, by rule.
(4) “Cannabinoid” means  any of the chemical compounds that are the active constituents derived
from marijuana.
(5) “Cannabinoid concentrate” means a substance  obtained by separating cannabinoids from
marijuana by:
(a) A mechanical extraction process;
(b) A chemical  extraction process using a nonhydrocarbon-based solvent, such as water, vege-
table glycerin, vegetable oils, animal fats, isopropyl alcohol or ethanol;
(c) A chemical extraction process using carbon dioxide, provided  that the process does not in-
volve the use of high heat or pressure; or
(d) Any other process identified by the commission, in consultation with the authority, by rule.
(6) “Cannabinoid edible” means food or potable liquid into  which a cannabinoid concentrate,
cannabinoid extract or dried marijuana leaves or flowers have been incorporated.
(7) “Cannabinoid extract” means a substance obtained by  separating cannabinoids from
marijuana by:
(a) A chemical extraction process using a hydrocarbon-based solvent, such as butane, hexane
or propane;
(b) A  chemical extraction process using carbon dioxide, if the process uses high heat or pres-
sure; or
(c) Any other process identified by the commission, in consultation with the authority, by rule.
[2]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(8)(a) “Cannabinoid product” means a cannabinoid edible  and any other product intended for
human consumption  or use, including a product intended to be applied to the skin or hair, that
contains cannabinoids or dried marijuana leaves or flowers.
(b) “Cannabinoid product” does not include:
(A) Usable marijuana by itself;
(B) A cannabinoid concentrate by itself;
(C) A cannabinoid extract by itself; or
(D) Industrial hemp , other than an industrial hemp-derived cannabinoid product .
(9) “Consumer” means a person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds  or uses marijuana items
other than for the purpose of resale.
(10) “Deliver” means the actual, constructive or attempted transfer from one person  to another
of a marijuana item, whether or not there is an agency relationship.
(11) “Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol” or “delta-9-THC” means  (6aR,10aR)-6,6,9-
trimethyl-3-pentyl-6a,7,8,10a-tetrahydro-6H- benzo[c]chromen-1-ol.
(12) “Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinolic acid”  or “delta-9-THCA” means (6aR,10aR)-
1-hydroxy-6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6a,7,8,10a- tetrahydro-6H-benzo[c]chromene-2-carboxylic acid.
(13) “Designated primary caregiver” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475C.777.
(14)(a) “Financial consideration” means value that is given or received either directly  or indi-
rectly through sales, barter, trade, fees, charges, dues, contributions or donations.
(b) “Financial consideration” does not include marijuana, cannabinoid  products or cannabinoid
concentrates that are delivered within the scope of and in compliance with ORS 475C.305.
(15) “Homegrown” means  grown by a person 21 years of age or older for noncommercial pur-
poses.
(16) “Household” means a housing unit and any place in or around a housing unit at  which the
occupants of the housing unit  are producing, processing, possessing or storing homegrown
marijuana, cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts.
(17) “Housing unit” means a house, an  apartment or a mobile home, or a group of rooms or a
single room that is occupied as  separate living quarters, in which the occupants live and eat sepa-
rately from any other persons in the building and that has direct access from the outside of  the
building or through a common hall.
(18) “Immature marijuana plant” means a marijuana plant that is not flowering.
(19) “Industrial hemp” has the meaning given that term in ORS 571.269.
(20) “Industrial hemp-derived cannabinoid product” means an industrial  hemp commodity
or product that exceeds the concentration of adult use cannabinoids established  by the
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis  Commission, in consultation with the Oregon Health Authority
and the State Department of Agriculture, by rule, as informed by relevant federal law  and
regulations.
[(20)] (21) “Licensee” means a person that  holds a license issued under ORS 475C.065, 475C.085,
475C.093, 475C.097 or 475C.548.
[(21)] (22) “Licensee  representative” means an owner, director, officer, manager, employee, agent
or other representative of a licensee, to the extent that  the person acts in a representative capacity.
[(22)(a)] (23)(a) “Manufacture” means producing,  propagating, preparing, compounding, convert-
ing or processing  a marijuana item, either directly or indirectly, by extracting from substances of
natural origin.
(b) “Manufacture” includes any packaging or repackaging of a marijuana item or the  labeling
[3]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or relabeling of a container containing a marijuana item.
[(23)(a)] (24)(a) “Marijuana”  means the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae, any part of the
plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae and marijuana seeds.
(b) “Marijuana” does not include:
(A) Industrial hemp , other than an industrial hemp-derived cannabinoid product ; or
(B) Prescription drugs, as that term is defined in ORS 689.005, including those  containing one
or more  cannabinoids, that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and
dispensed by a pharmacy, as defined in ORS 689.005.
[(24)] (25) “Marijuana flowers” means the flowers  of the plant genus Cannabis within the plant
family Cannabaceae.
[(25)] (26) “Marijuana items” means marijuana, cannabinoid products,  cannabinoid concentrates
and cannabinoid extracts.
[(26)] (27) “Marijuana leaves” means the leaves of the  plant genus Cannabis within the plant
family Cannabaceae.
[(27)] (28) “Marijuana processor” means:
(a) A person that processes marijuana items in this state; or
(b) A person that holds a license issued under ORS  475C.085 and processes industrial hemp
commodities or products pursuant to ORS 571.336.
[(28)] (29) “Marijuana producer” means a person that produces marijuana in this state.
[(29)] (30) “Marijuana retailer” means a  person that sells marijuana items to a consumer in this
state.
[(30)(a)] (31)(a) “Marijuana seeds” means the seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Marijuana seeds” does not include the seeds of industrial hemp.
[(31)] (32) “Marijuana  wholesaler” means a person that purchases marijuana items in this state
for resale to a person other than a consumer.
[(32)] (33) “Mature marijuana plant”  means a marijuana plant that is not an immature marijuana
plant.
[(33)] (34) “Medical grade cannabinoid product, cannabinoid concentrate or cannabinoid
extract” means a cannabinoid product, cannabinoid concentrate or cannabinoid extract  that has a
concentration of adult use cannabinoids that is permitted under ORS 475C.620 in a single serving
of the cannabinoid product, cannabinoid concentrate or cannabinoid extract for consumers  who hold
a valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475C.783.
[(34)] (35) “Medical  purpose” means a purpose related to using usable marijuana, cannabinoid
products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts  to mitigate the symptoms or effects of
a debilitating medical condition, as defined in ORS 475C.777.
[(35)] (36) “Noncommercial” means not dependent or conditioned upon the provision or receipt
of financial consideration.
[(36)(a)] (37)(a) “Premises” includes the following areas of a location licensed under ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.548:
(A) All public and private enclosed areas at the location that are  used in the business operated
at the location, including offices, kitchens, rest rooms and storerooms;
(B) All areas  outside a building that the commission has specifically licensed for the processing,
wholesale sale or retail sale of marijuana items; and
(C) For a location that the commission has specifically licensed  for the production of marijuana
outside a building, that portion of the location used to produce marijuana.
[4]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) “Premises” does not include a primary residence.
[(37)(a)] (38)(a) “Processes” means the processing, compounding or conversion of:
(A) Marijuana into cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts; or
(B) Pursuant to ORS 571.336, industrial  hemp or industrial hemp commodities or products into
industrial hemp commodities or  products that contain cannabinoids and are intended for human
consumption or use.
(b) “Processes” does not include packaging or labeling.
[(38)(a)] (39)(a) “Produces” means the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing or harvesting
of marijuana.
(b) “Produces” does not include:
(A) The drying of marijuana by a marijuana processor, if  the marijuana processor is not other-
wise producing marijuana; or
(B) The cultivation and growing of an immature marijuana plant by a marijuana processor,
marijuana wholesaler or  marijuana retailer if the marijuana processor, marijuana wholesaler or
marijuana retailer purchased or otherwise received the plant from a licensed marijuana producer.
[(39)] (40) “Propagate” means to grow immature marijuana plants  or to breed or produce
marijuana seeds.
[(40)] (41) “Public place” means a place to  which the general public has access and includes,
but is not limited to, hallways, lobbies and  other parts of apartment houses and hotels not consti-
tuting rooms or apartments designed for actual residence, and highways, streets, schools,  places of
amusement, parks, playgrounds and areas used in connection with public passenger transportation.
[(41)] (42) “Registry identification cardholder” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475C.777.
[(42)] (43) “Total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol” or “total delta-9-THC” means the sum of the
concentration or mass of delta-9-THCA multiplied by 0.877 plus the concentration  or mass of
delta-9-THC.
[(43)(a)] (44)(a) “Usable marijuana” means the dried leaves and flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Usable marijuana” does not include:
(A) Marijuana seeds;
(B) The stalks and roots of marijuana; or
(C) Waste material that is a by-product of producing or processing marijuana.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 475C.157 is amended to read:
475C.157. (1) The Oregon  Liquor and Cannabis Commission may, after 72 hours’ notice, make
an examination of the books of a licensee  for the purpose of determining compliance with ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586 and rules adopted  under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525
and 475C.540 to 475C.586.
(2)(a) The commission may at any time make an  examination of a premises for which a license
has been  issued under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.548 for the purpose of determining com-
pliance with ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586 and rules adopted  under ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586.
(b) If the commission has, or receives  from a law enforcement agency or other source,
information that,  in the opinion of the commission, describes circumstances creating proba-
ble cause to believe that the premises for which a license issued under ORS 475C.005  to
475C.525 or 475C.548 is being used for unlawful marijuana cultivation  or distribution oper-
ations, the commission shall inspect the premises and shall  request that law enforcement
officers accompany the commission to the premises for the inspection.
[5]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The commission may not require the books of a licensee to be maintained on a  premises of
the licensee.
(4) This section does not authorize the commission to make an examination of  a premises of a
person registered under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 475C.257 is amended to read:
475C.257. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Consumer” means a person who purchases, acquires, owns,  holds or uses marijuana items
other than for the purpose of resale.
(b) “Marijuana item” includes [ an industrial hemp commodity or product that exceeds: ]
[(A) The concentration of adult use cannabinoids established  by the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission, in consultation with the Oregon Health Authority and the State Department  of Agricul-
ture, by rule; or ]
[(B) The greater of: ]
[(i) A concentration of 0.3 percent total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol; or ]
[(ii) The concentration  of total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol allowed under federal law ] an indus-
trial hemp-derived cannabinoid product.
(2) A person other than a marijuana retailer that holds a license  issued under ORS 475C.097
may not sell marijuana items to a consumer.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 475C.265 is amended to read:
475C.265. (1) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the Oregon  Liquor and Cannabis Com-
mission may revoke, suspend or restrict a license issued under  ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or
475C.548 or require a licensee or licensee representative to undergo training if the  commission finds
or has reasonable ground to believe that the licensee or licensee representative:
(a) Has violated  a provision of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to 475C.586 or a rule
adopted under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to 475C.586.
(b) Has diverted marijuana to the interstate  market or an illicit market or has diverted re-
sources to a criminal enterprise.
(c) Has  introduced into the marijuana industry regulated under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525
cannabinoids or marijuana not produced or  processed by a licensee and not tracked in the system
developed and maintained under ORS 475C.177.
(d) Has made any false representation or statement to the commission  regarding compliance
with a provision of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to 475C.586  or a rule adopted under ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to 475C.586 in  order to induce or prevent action by the commis-
sion.
(e) Is in the habit of  using alcoholic liquor, habit-forming drugs, marijuana or controlled sub-
stances to excess.
(f) Has misrepresented to a  customer or the public any marijuana items sold by the licensee or
licensee representative.
(g) Since the issuance of the license, has been convicted  of a felony, of violating any of the
marijuana laws of this state, general or  local, or of any misdemeanor or violation of any municipal
ordinance committed on the premises for which the license has been issued.
(h) Has sold a marijuana item to a person under 21 years of age.
(2) In addition to the grounds listed in subsection (1) of this section, the commission may  take
an action described in subsection (1) of this section if there is a history of a lack of  institutional
control involving the premises for which a license has been issued under ORS 475C.005  to 475C.525
[6]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or 475C.548.
(3)(a) The commission may revoke a license under subsection (1)(a) of this  section only when the
conduct poses a significant risk to public health or safety.
(b) The commission shall consider as mitigating factors to the  conduct described in subsection
(1) of this section the following:
(A) Self-reporting by a licensee or applicant;
(B) A  demonstration that, to the satisfaction of the commission, the conduct of the licensee or
applicant is not persistent or serious; and
(C) A  demonstration that, to the satisfaction of the commission, the licensee’s willingness and
ability to adequately control the premises for which a  license has been issued under ORS 475C.005
to 475C.525 or 475C.548 and any inventory stored at the premises.
(4) The commission may suspend or restrict a  license issued under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525
or 475C.548 or require a licensee or  licensee representative to undergo training if the commission
finds or has reasonable grounds to  believe that the licensee or licensee representative has violated
a provision of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to  475C.586 or a rule adopted under ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to 475C.586.
(5) The commission  may suspend or revoke a permit or temporary permit issued under ORS
475C.273 to  an individual rather than suspend or revoke a license issued under ORS 475C.005 to
475C.525 or 475C.548 if the commission determines that permit suspension  or revocation is more
appropriate.
(6)(a) The  commission may revoke a marijuana retailer license issued under ORS 475C.097 if the
licensee fails to:
(A) Pay the tax as required  under ORS 475C.682 twice in any four consecutive quarters and the
Department of Revenue has issued to the licensee a distraint warrant under ORS  475C.688 for the
nonpayment of tax; or
(B) File  a return as required under ORS 475C.682 twice in any four consecutive quarters and
the department has issued to the  licensee a notice of determination and assessment under ORS
475C.688 for failure to file a return.
(b) The  department’s written notice to the commission that a licensee described under this sub-
section has failed to pay a tax or file a return twice in any four consecutive quarters, and  that the
department has issued a distraint warrant or notice  of determination and assessment, shall consti-
tute prima facie evidence of the licensee’s failure to pay the tax or file a return.
(7)(a) The commission shall immediately suspend a production license issued  under ORS
475C.065 if the commission receives from a  law enforcement agency or other source infor-
mation that, in the opinion of the commission, describes circumstances creating probable
cause to believe that the  premises for which the production license is issued under ORS
475C.065 is being used for unlawful marijuana cultivation or distribution operations.
(b) A production license suspended under this subsection  is nontransferrable until the
final disposition of the commission’s action related to the suspension. If  the final determi-
nation of the commission is that the premises for which the suspended  production license
was issued under  ORS 475C.065 was used for unlawful marijuana cultivation or distribution
operations, the commission shall revoke the production license.
(c) The commission may not issue a new license for a premises described in paragraph
(b) of this subsection until 10 years after the date on which the commission’s  action related
to the license described in paragraph (b) of this subsection  was finalized unless the owner
[7]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the premises can demonstrate to the satisfaction  of the commission that the owner lacked
knowledge that the premises was used for unlawful  marijuana cultivation or distribution
operations.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 475C.540 is amended to read:
475C.540. As used in ORS 475C.540 to 475C.586:
(1) “Adult use  cannabinoid” includes, but is not limited to, tetrahydrocannabinols,
tetrahydrocannabinolic acids that are artificially or naturally  derived, delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol,
delta-9- tetrahydrocannabinol, the optical isomers of  delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol or
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol and any  artificially derived cannabinoid that is reasonably determined
to have an intoxicating effect.
(2) “Artificially derived cannabinoid” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475C.009.
(3) “Cannabinoid” means any of  the chemical compounds that are the active constituents of
marijuana.
(4) “Cannabinoid concentrate or extract” means  a substance obtained by separating
cannabinoids from marijuana by a mechanical, chemical or other process.
(5) “Cannabinoid edible” means food or potable liquid into  which a cannabinoid concentrate or
extract or the dried leaves or flowers of marijuana have been incorporated.
(6)(a) “Cannabinoid product” means a cannabinoid edible or  any other product intended for hu-
man consumption or use, including a product intended to be applied to a person’s skin  or hair, that
contains cannabinoids or the dried leaves or flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Cannabinoid product” does not include:
(A) Usable marijuana by itself;
(B) A cannabinoid concentrate or extract by itself; or
(C) Industrial hemp , other than an industrial hemp-derived  cannabinoid product, as defined
in ORS 475C.009.
(7) “Industrial hemp” has the meaning given that term in ORS 571.269.
(8) “Industrial hemp-derived vapor  item” means an industrial hemp concentrate or industrial
hemp extract, as those terms are defined in ORS 571.269, whether alone  or combined with other
substances, that is intended for use in an inhalant delivery system.
(9) “Inhalant delivery system” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
(10)(a) “Marijuana” means the plant Cannabis family  Cannabaceae, any part of the plant
Cannabis family Cannabaceae and the seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Marijuana” does not include:
(A) Industrial hemp , other than an  industrial hemp-derived cannabinoid product, as defined
in ORS 475C.009; or
(B) Prescription drugs,  as that term is defined in ORS 689.005, including those containing one
or more cannabinoids, that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration  and
dispensed by a pharmacy, as defined in ORS 689.005.
(11) “Marijuana item” means marijuana, usable  marijuana, a cannabinoid product or a
cannabinoid concentrate or extract.
(12) “Processing” means:
(a) The compounding or conversion of  marijuana into cannabinoid products or cannabinoid
concentrates or extracts.
(b) The  compounding or conversion of industrial hemp into industrial hemp concentrates or in-
dustrial hemp extracts.
[8]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(13) “Producing” means:
(a) Planting, cultivating, growing, trimming or harvesting marijuana; or
(b) Drying marijuana leaves and flowers.
(14)(a) “Usable marijuana” means the dried leaves and flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Usable marijuana” does not include:
(A) The seeds, stalks and roots of marijuana; or
(B) Waste material that is a by-product of producing or processing marijuana.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 475C.600 is amended to read:
475C.600. As used in ORS 475C.600 to 475C.648:
(1) “Adult use  cannabinoid” includes, but is not limited to, tetrahydrocannabinols,
tetrahydrocannabinolic acids that are artificially or naturally  derived, delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol,
delta-9- tetrahydrocannabinol, the optical isomers of  delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol or
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol and any  artificially derived cannabinoid that is reasonably determined
to have an intoxicating effect.
(2) “Artificially derived cannabinoid” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475C.009.
(3) “Cannabinoid” means any of  the chemical compounds that are the active constituents of
marijuana.
(4) “Cannabinoid concentrate or extract” means  a substance obtained by separating
cannabinoids from marijuana by a mechanical, chemical or other process.
(5) “Cannabinoid edible” means food or potable liquid into  which a cannabinoid concentrate or
extract or the dried leaves or flowers of marijuana have been incorporated.
(6)(a) “Cannabinoid product” means a cannabinoid edible or  any other product intended for hu-
man consumption or use, including a product intended to be applied to a person’s skin  or hair, that
contains cannabinoids or the dried leaves or flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Cannabinoid product” does not include:
(A) Usable marijuana by itself;
(B) A cannabinoid concentrate or extract by itself; or
(C) Industrial hemp , other than an industrial hemp-derived  cannabinoid product, as defined
in ORS 475C.009.
(7) “Industrial hemp” has the meaning given that term in ORS 571.269.
(8) “Industrial hemp-derived vapor  item” means an industrial hemp concentrate or industrial
hemp extract, as those terms are defined in ORS 571.269, whether alone  or combined with other
substances, that is intended for use in an inhalant delivery system.
(9) “Inhalant delivery system” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
(10)(a) “Marijuana” means the plant Cannabis family  Cannabaceae, any part of the plant
Cannabis family Cannabaceae and the seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Marijuana” does not include:
(A) Industrial hemp , other than an  industrial hemp-derived cannabinoid product, as defined
in ORS 475C.009; or
(B) Prescription drugs,  as that term is defined in ORS 689.005, including those containing one
or more cannabinoids, that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration  and
dispensed by a pharmacy, as defined in ORS 689.005.
(11) “Marijuana item” means marijuana, usable  marijuana, a cannabinoid product or a
cannabinoid concentrate or extract.
(12) “Processing” means:
[9]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The compounding or conversion of  marijuana into cannabinoid products or cannabinoid
concentrates or extracts.
(b) The  compounding or conversion of industrial hemp into industrial hemp concentrates or in-
dustrial hemp extracts.
(13) “Producing” means:
(a) Planting, cultivating, growing, trimming or harvesting marijuana; or
(b) Drying marijuana leaves and flowers.
(14) “Total delta-9-THC” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475C.009.
(15)(a) “Usable marijuana” means the dried leaves and flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Usable marijuana” does not include:
(A) The seeds, stalks and roots of marijuana; or
(B) Waste material that is a by-product of producing or processing marijuana.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 475C.670 is amended to read:
475C.670. As used in ORS 475C.670 to 475C.734:
(1) “Cannabinoid concentrate,” “cannabinoid  edible,” “cannabinoid extract,” “cannabinoid prod-
uct,” “consumer,” “immature marijuana plant,” “industrial hemp-derived cannabinoid product,”
“marijuana flowers,” “marijuana items,”  “marijuana leaves,” “marijuana processor,” “marijuana
producer,” “marijuana retailer” and “usable marijuana” have the meanings given those terms  in
ORS 475C.009.
(2) “Retail sale” means  any transfer, exchange, gift or barter of a marijuana item by any person
to a consumer.
(3) “Retail sales price” means the price paid for a marijuana item, excluding tax, to a  marijuana
retailer by or on behalf of a consumer of the marijuana item.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 475C.674 is amended to read:
475C.674. (1) A tax  is hereby imposed upon the retail sale of marijuana items in this state. The
tax imposed by this  section is a direct tax on the consumer, for which payment upon retail sale is
required. The tax shall be collected at the point of  sale of a marijuana item by a marijuana retailer
at the time [ at which ] when the retail sale occurs.
(2) The tax imposed under this section shall be imposed at the rate of:
(a) 17 percent of the retail sales price of usable marijuana;
(b) 17 percent of the retail sales price of immature marijuana plants;
(c) 17 percent of the retail sales price of a cannabinoid edible;
(d) 17 percent of the retail sales price of a cannabinoid concentrate;
(e) 17 percent of the retail sales price of a cannabinoid extract;
(f) 17 percent of  the retail sales price of a cannabinoid product that is intended to be used by
applying the cannabinoid product to the skin or hair; [ and]
(g) 17 percent of the retail  sales price of cannabinoid products other than those described in
paragraph (f) of this subsection[ .]; and
(h) 17 percent of the retail sales price of an industrial hemp-derived cannabinoid  product.
(3) If the tax imposed under this section does not equal an amount calculable to  a whole cent,
the tax shall be equal to the next higher whole cent.
(4) Except as otherwise provided by the Department of Revenue by  rule, the amount of the tax
shall be separately stated on an invoice, receipt  or other similar document that the marijuana
retailer provides to the consumer at the time [ at which ] when the retail sale occurs.
(5) A person may not knowingly sell, purchase, install, transfer or possess electronic  devices or
[10]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
software programs for the purposes of:
(a) Hiding or removing records of retail sales of marijuana items; or
(b) Falsifying records of retail sales of marijuana items.
(6)(a) A  marijuana retailer may not discount a marijuana item or offer a marijuana item for free
if the retail sale of the marijuana item is made in conjunction with the retail sale of any  other item.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not affect any provision of ORS 475C.005  to 475C.525
or any rule adopted by the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission pursuant to ORS 475C.005 to
475C.525 that is related to the retail sale of marijuana items.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 475C.718 is amended to read:
475C.718. (1) The Department of Revenue may  enter into an agreement with the governing body
of a federally recognized Indian tribe that is qualified  as described in this section for the purpose
of making rebate payments  for an estimate of the tax on marijuana items imposed under ORS
475C.674 as described in this section.
(2) The governing body of a federally recognized Indian tribe is qualified to enter into  an
agreement under this section if the governing  body has entered into an agreement with the Gover-
nor, or the Governor’s designee, pursuant to ORS 475C.521.
(3) The department shall provide rebates under this section for:
(a) Usable marijuana sold by a marijuana  retailer that holds a license issued under ORS
475C.097 that is produced by a marijuana producer that is located on tribal trust land and  licensed
by the  governing body of a federally recognized Indian tribe that has entered into an agreement with
the Governor, or the Governor’s designee, pursuant to ORS 475C.521, provided that the  licensing of
the marijuana producer comports with the agreement; [ and]
(b) Cannabinoid concentrates, cannabinoid extracts or cannabinoid products sold  by a marijuana
retailer that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.097 that  are processed by a marijuana processor
that is located  on tribal trust land and licensed by the governing body of a federally recognized
Indian tribe that  has entered into an agreement with the Governor, or the Governor’s designee,
pursuant to ORS 475C.521, provided that the licensing of the marijuana processor comports  with the
agreement[.]; and
(c) Industrial hemp-derived cannabinoid products sold by a marijuana retailer that holds
a license issued under ORS 475C.097 that are processed  by a marijuana processor that is lo-
cated on tribal trust land and licensed by the governing body of a federally recognized Indian
tribe that has entered into an agreement with the Governor, or the  Governor’s designee,
pursuant to ORS 475C.521, provided that the licensing of the  marijuana processor comports
with the agreement.
(4) Payments made by the department to  a federally recognized Indian tribe should represent the
department’s estimate of the amount of  revenue generated under ORS 475C.674 attributable to
marijuana items:
(a) Produced by  a marijuana producer that is located on tribal trust land and licensed by the
governing  body  of a federally recognized Indian tribe that has entered into an agreement with the
Governor, or the Governor’s designee, pursuant to ORS 475C.521, provided that the licensing  of the
marijuana producer comports with the agreement; or
(b) Processed by a marijuana processor  that is located on tribal trust land and licensed by the
governing  body  of a federally recognized Indian tribe that has entered into an agreement with the
Governor, or the Governor’s designee, pursuant to ORS 475C.521, provided that the licensing  of the
marijuana processor comports with the agreement.
[11]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) There is continuously appropriated from the suspense account established  under ORS
475C.734 the amounts necessary to make rebates  pursuant to an agreement entered into under this
section.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 571.309 is amended to read:
571.309. The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis  Commission, in consultation with the State Depart-
ment of Agriculture  and as informed by relevant federal law and regulations , shall adopt rules
to establish:
(1) The maximum concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol permitted in a single serving  of an in-
dustrial hemp product;
(2) The maximum concentration of any other cannabinoid, adult use  cannabinoid or artificially
derived cannabinoid that is permitted in a single serving of an industrial hemp product;
(3) The number of servings that are permitted in a package of industrial hemp products; and
(4) Standards for approving industrial hemp products that  contain artificially derived
cannabinoids and that are  intended for sale at retail. The rules adopted under this subsection may
not be more restrictive than the rules applicable to the sale at retail of adult use cannabis items.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 571.339 is amended to read:
571.339. (1) [For purposes of this section, ] As used in this section:
(a) “Consumer” means a  person that purchases, acquires, owns, holds or uses an industrial hemp
commodity or product other than for the purpose of resale.
(b) “Container” has the meaning given that term in section 2 of this 2026 Act.
(2) A person may not sell, transfer or deliver  to a consumer an industrial hemp commodity or
product that contains cannabinoids and is intended for human consumption unless:
(a) The industrial hemp commodity or product has been tested  in accordance with ORS 571.330
and any rules adopted pursuant to ORS 571.330;
(b) If the hemp commodity or product is intended for human consumption by ingestion,  the hemp
commodity or product was processed  in a facility licensed by the State Department of Agriculture
under ORS 616.695 to 616.755 or in a facility in another state or jurisdiction that meets requirements
substantially similar to requirements established under ORS 616.695 to 616.755;
(c) The person obtains and maintains documentation of the results of the testing;
(d) If the industrial hemp commodity or product is sold to a person under 21 years  of age or any
representations are made to the consumer about the concentration of  delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol,
the results  of the testing required under this subsection demonstrate the concentration of
delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol;
(e) The industrial  hemp commodity or product does not contain more than 0.3 percent
tetrahydrocannabinol or the concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol allowed under federal law,
whichever is greater; and
(f) The industrial hemp commodity or  product does not exceed the concentration , including the
per container concentration,  of adult use cannabinoids established by the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission, in conjunction with the Oregon Health Authority  and State Department of
Agriculture, by rule.
(3) The testing required under subsection (2) of this section may be conducted only by:
(a) A laboratory licensed by the commission under ORS 475C.548 and accredited by  the author-
ity under ORS 475C.560; or
(b) If the industrial hemp commodity or product  was processed outside of this state, a laboratory
accredited  to  the same or more stringent standards as a laboratory described in paragraph (a) of this
[12]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
subsection.
(4) A person  may not sell or deliver an adult use cannabis item to a person under 21 years of
age.
(5) This section does not apply to the retail sale of industrial hemp commodities or  products by
a marijuana retailer, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.097.
SECTION 14.
The amendments to ORS 475C.670, 475C.674 and 475C.718  by sections 9 to
11 of this 2026 Act apply to  sales of industrial hemp-derived cannabinoid products, as defined
in ORS 475C.009, that are made on or after July 1, 2026.
ILLEGAL MARIJUANA MARKET ENFORCEMENT
GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 15.  ORS 475C.728 is amended to read:
475C.728. Notwithstanding ORS 475C.726, before  making any other distribution from the Oregon
Marijuana Account established under ORS 475C.726, the Department of Revenue shall first distrib-
ute quarterly from the account the following:
(1) $875,000 to the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission for deposit in the Marijuana  Con-
trol and Regulation Fund established under ORS 475C.297; and
(2) [$750,000] $3 million to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission for deposit into the  Illegal
Marijuana Market Enforcement Grant Program Fund established under ORS 475C.535 for  the pur-
poses of paying the costs incurred by the  commission in carrying out the provisions of ORS
475C.531.
MARIJUANA FOR MEDICAL USE
SECTION 16.
 ORS 475C.777 is amended to read:
475C.777. As used in ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919:
(1) “Attending provider” means one of the following  health care providers who has primary re-
sponsibility for the care and treatment of a person diagnosed with a debilitating medical condition:
(a) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(b) A physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525;
(c) A nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
(d) A clinical nurse specialist licensed under ORS 678.370 and 678.372;
(e) A certified registered nurse anesthetist as defined in ORS 678.010; or
(f) A naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685.
(2) “Cannabinoid” means any of the chemical compounds that are  the active constituents of
marijuana.
(3) “Cannabinoid concentrate” means a substance  obtained by separating cannabinoids from
marijuana by:
(a) A mechanical extraction process;
(b) A chemical extraction process using a nonhydrocarbon-based solvent, such as vegetable
glycerin, vegetable oils, animal fats, isopropyl alcohol or ethanol;
(c) A chemical extraction process using the hydrocarbon-based solvent carbon  dioxide, provided
that the process does not involve the use of high heat or pressure; or
(d) Any other process identified by  the Oregon Health Authority, in consultation with the
[13]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, by rule.
(4) “Cannabinoid edible” means food  or potable liquid into which a cannabinoid concentrate,
cannabinoid extract or dried leaves or flowers of marijuana have been incorporated.
(5) “Cannabinoid extract” means  a substance obtained by separating cannabinoids from
marijuana by:
(a) A chemical extraction process using a hydrocarbon-based solvent, such as butane, hexane
or propane;
(b) A chemical extraction process using the hydrocarbon-based  solvent carbon dioxide, if the
process uses high heat or pressure; or
(c) Any other process identified by the Oregon  Health Authority, in consultation with the
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, by rule.
(6) “Debilitating medical condition” means:
(a) Cancer, glaucoma, a degenerative  or pervasive neurological condition, positive status for
human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immune deficiency  syndrome, or a side effect related to
the treatment of those medical conditions;
(b) A medical condition or treatment for  a medical condition that produces, for a specific pa-
tient, one or more of the following:
(A) Cachexia;
(B) Severe pain;
(C) Severe nausea;
(D) Seizures, including seizures caused by epilepsy; or
(E) Persistent muscle spasms, including spasms caused by multiple sclerosis;
(c) Post-traumatic stress disorder; or
(d) Any  other medical condition or side effect related to the treatment of a medical condition
[adopted by  the Oregon Health Authority by rule or approved by the authority pursuant to a petition
filed under ORS 475C.913 ] that an attending provider determines, in  accordance with
evidence-based practice and professional judgment, might be  mitigated by the medical use
of marijuana.
(7)(a) “Delivery” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.005.
(b) “Delivery” does  not include transfer of marijuana by a registry identification cardholder to
another registry identification cardholder if no consideration is paid for the transfer.
(8)(a) “Designated primary caregiver” means an individual:
(A) Who is 18 years of age or older;
(B) Who has significant responsibility for  managing the well-being of a person who has been
diagnosed with a debilitating medical condition; and
(C) Who is designated as the person responsible for managing the well-being of  a person who
has been  diagnosed with a debilitating medical condition on that person’s application for a registry
identification card or in other written notification submitted to the authority.
(b) “Designated primary caregiver” does not include a person’s attending provider.
(9) “High heat” means a temperature exceeding 180 degrees.
(10) “Immature marijuana plant” means a marijuana plant that is not flowering.
(11)(a) “Marijuana” means the plant Cannabis family  Cannabaceae, any part of the plant
Cannabis family Cannabaceae and the seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Marijuana” does not include:
(A) Industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.269; or
[14]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Prescription drugs, as that term is defined in ORS 689.005, including those  containing one
or more  cannabinoids, that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and
dispensed by a pharmacy, as defined in ORS 689.005.
(12) “Marijuana grow site” means  a location registered under ORS 475C.792 where marijuana
is produced for use by a registry identification cardholder.
(13) “Marijuana processing site” means a marijuana processing site registered  under ORS
475C.815 or a site for which an applicant has submitted an application for  registration under ORS
475C.815.
(14) “Mature marijuana plant” means a marijuana plant that is not an immature marijuana
plant.
(15)(a) “Medical cannabinoid product”  means a cannabinoid edible and any other product in-
tended for human consumption or use, including a product intended to  be applied to a person’s skin
or hair, that contains cannabinoids or dried leaves or flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Medical cannabinoid product” does not include:
(A) Usable marijuana by itself;
(B) A cannabinoid concentrate by itself;
(C) A cannabinoid extract by itself; or
(D) Industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.269.
(16) “Medical marijuana dispensary”  means a medical marijuana dispensary registered under
ORS 475C.833 or a site for which an applicant has submitted an application  for registration under
ORS 475C.833.
(17) “Medical use of marijuana” means the production, processing, possession,  delivery or ad-
ministration of marijuana,  or use of paraphernalia used to administer marijuana, to mitigate the
symptoms or effects of a debilitating medical condition.
(18) “Person designated to produce  marijuana by a registry identification cardholder” means a
person designated to produce marijuana by a registry identification cardholder  under ORS 475C.792
who produces  marijuana for a registry identification cardholder at an address other than the address
where the registry identification cardholder resides  or at an address where more than 12 mature
marijuana plants are produced.
(19) “Process” means the compounding or conversion of marijuana  into medical cannabinoid
products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts.
(20) “Production” means:
(a) Planting, cultivating, growing, trimming or harvesting marijuana; or
(b) Drying marijuana leaves or flowers.
(21) “Registry identification card” means a document issued by  the Oregon Health Authority
under ORS 475C.783 that  identifies a person authorized to engage in the medical use of marijuana
and, if the person has a designated primary caregiver  under ORS 475C.789, the person’s designated
primary caregiver.
(22) “Registry identification cardholder” means a  person to whom a registry identification card
has been issued under ORS 475C.783.
(23)(a) “Usable marijuana” means the dried leaves and flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Usable marijuana” does not include:
(A) The seeds, stalks and roots of marijuana; or
(B) Waste material that is a by-product of producing marijuana.
(24) “Written documentation” means a  statement signed by the attending provider of a person
[15]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
diagnosed with a debilitating medical condition or copies of the person’s relevant medical records.
INDUSTRIAL HEMP
SECTION 17.
Sections 18 and 19 of this 2026 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
571.260 to 571.348.
SECTION 18. (1) The State Department of Agriculture may not issue a license to  grow
or handle industrial hemp under ORS 571.281 unless the applicant submits with the applica-
tion a statement accurately identifying the legal address and owner of the premises at which
the industrial hemp operation will be located and  the requirements of subsections (2) and (3)
of this section are met.
(2) The department shall independently verify the information provided under subsection
(1) of this  section regarding the ownership of the premises described in subsection (1) of this
section with the county in which the premises is located.
(3) If the applicant  described in subsection (1) of this section is not the owner of the
premises described in subsection (1) of this section, the applicant shall:
(a) Inform the owner in writing that the premises is intended  to be the location of an
industrial hemp operation for which the applicant is licensed;
(b) If the owner wishes to consent to the use of the premises  for the purposes of growing
or handling industrial hemp, obtain from the owner the owner’s written signature,  witnessed
by a  notary public, confirming ownership of the premises and consenting to the use of the
premises for the purpose of growing or handling industrial hemp; and
(c) Provide the owner’s witnessed signature as described in  paragraph (b) of this sub-
section to the department.
(4) An owner who consents as described in subsection (3) of this section to the use  of the
owner’s premises for the purpose of growing or handling industrial hemp may specify in  the
document that contains the owner’s witnessed signature the number of licensure terms for
which the owner’s consent to the use of the premises is valid.
(5) The department shall cancel an application for a  license to grow or handle industrial
hemp under ORS 571.281 if the department:
(a) Is  not able to verify ownership of the premises described in subsection (1) of this
section; or
(b) Does not receive, if the application  is from an applicant described in subsection (3)
of this section, the witnessed signature described in subsection (3) of this section.
(6) The department may  adopt rules to carry out this section. Rules adopted under this
section may include rules to establish a form for the purposes of this section.
SECTION 19.
(1) An applicant for an industrial hemp grower license under ORS 571.281
shall include with the application a land  use compatibility statement from the city or county
that authorizes  the land use in the jurisdiction in which the applicant intends to locate the
industrial hemp operation. The land use compatibility statement must  demonstrate that the
industrial hemp operation is a  land use that is allowable as a permitted or conditional use
within the given zoning designation where the  land is located. The State Department of Ag-
riculture may not issue a license to the applicant if the land  use compatibility statement
shows that the proposed land use is prohibited in the applicable zone.
(2) A city or county that receives  a request for a land use compatibility statement under
[16]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
this section must act on the request within 21 days of:
(a) Receipt of the request, if the land use is allowable as an outright permitted use; or
(b) Final local permit approval, if the land use is allowable as a conditional use.
(3) A city  or county action concerning a land use compatibility statement under this
section is not a land use decision as that term is defined in ORS 197.015.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 571.281 is amended to read:
571.281. (1)(a) To grow or handle industrial hemp, a person must be licensed by the State  De-
partment of Agriculture as a grower or handler.
(b) The department may identify by rule  activities related to growing or handling hemp in ad-
dition to those described in ORS 571.269 and  may require licensure to engage in those activities.
The department may issue, renew, suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew  a license required
pursuant to this subsection.
(2)(a) Only a grower or handler licensed under this section may produce agricultural hemp  seed.
For a grower or handler to  produce agricultural hemp seed, the grower or handler must be licensed
by the department as an agricultural hemp seed producer.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) A grower licensed under this section that retains agricultural hemp seed for the purpose  of
personally propagating industrial hemp in a subsequent year is not required  to be licensed by the
department as an agricultural hemp seed producer; and
(B) A grower or handler licensed under this section that produces Cannabis  seeds that are in-
capable of germination, or a handler licensed under this section that processes Cannabis  seeds that
are incapable of  germination into commodities or products, is not required to be licensed by the
department as an agricultural hemp seed producer.
(3) An applicant for  a license under this section must submit to the department, in a form and
manner prescribed by the department, the following information:
(a) The name and address of the applicant;
(b) The name and address of the industrial hemp operation of the applicant; [ and]
(c) A land use compatibility statement as described in section 19 of this 2026 Act;
(d) The information described in section 18 of this  2026 Act and any additional proof that
the department may require  as proof of the applicant’s compliance with the requirements
of section 18 of this 2026 Act; and
[(c)] (e) Any other information required by the department by rule.
(4) The department shall conduct a  criminal records check under ORS 181A.195 on an
individual applying for a handler license under this section.
[(4)] (5) The department  shall adopt rules specifying the period of time for which a license issued
under this section is valid. A licensee  may renew a license under this section in a form and manner
prescribed by the department.
[(5)] (6) A license under this section is a personal privilege and is not transferable.
[(6)] (7) A grower or handler licensed under this section must keep records as required by  the
department by rule. Upon not less than three days’ notice,  the department may subject the records
to inspection  or audit during normal business hours. The department may make an inspection or
audit for the purpose of ensuring compliance with:
(a) A provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348;
(b) A rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348; or
(c) An order issued by the department pursuant to  a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348 or a
[17]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348.
[(7)(a)] (8)(a) In addition to any inspection conducted pursuant to  ORS 561.275, the department
may inspect any  crop during the crop’s growth phase and take a representative composite sample
for field analysis. If a crop contains an  average tetrahydrocannabinol concentration exceeding the
concentration specified by the department  by rule, the department may detain, seize or embargo the
crop as provided under ORS 561.605 to 561.620, subject to any process established  under ORS
571.345.
(b)(A) As used in this paragraph:
(i) “Biomass”  means the biodegradable portion of products, waste and residues of bi-
ological origin from industrial hemp.
(ii) “Inspect” means to examine or review officially.
(B) The department may inspect biomass  or processed industrial hemp that is stored at a lo-
cation for which a license is issued under this section.
[(8)(a)] (9)(a) The department may charge licensees  the following fees in amounts reasonably
calculated by the department to pay the cost of administering ORS 571.260 to 571.348:
(A) Application fees;
(B) License and license renewal fees;
(C) Administrative change fees; and
(D) Fees for other services.
(b) Moneys from fees charged under this subsection shall be deposited in the  Industrial Hemp
Fund established under ORS 571.278.
[(9)] (10) The department may adopt rules establishing public health and safety standards  and
industry best practices for growers and handlers licensed under this section.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 571.282 is amended to read:
571.282. (1) The State Department of Agriculture  may enter into an interagency agreement with
the Oregon Liquor and  Cannabis Commission to allow representatives of the commission to carry
out inspections of industrial hemp crops under ORS 571.281 [ (7)] (8) throughout this state.
(2) The department and the commission may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 571.283 is amended to read:
571.283. (1) The State Department of Agriculture shall adopt rules to allow:
[(1)] (a) Law enforcement officers to  accompany representatives of the department to an indus-
trial hemp operation for the  purposes of providing protection to the department’s representatives;
and
[(2)] (b) Public employees and officials who are responsible for the enforcement of  state and lo-
cal laws to accompany  representatives of the department to an industrial hemp operation in order
to carry out inspections that the public employees or officials are authorized to perform.
(2) If  the department has, or receives from a law enforcement agency or other source,
information that, in the discretion of  the department, describes circumstances creating
probable cause to believe that  an industrial hemp operation is being used for unlawful
marijuana cultivation or distribution operations, the department  shall inspect the industrial
hemp operation and request  that law enforcement officers accompany the department to the
industrial hemp operation to carry out the department’s inspection.
SECTION 23.  ORS 571.284 is amended to read:
571.284. The Governor may order that the Oregon National  Guard provide assistance and sup-
port to the State Department  of Agriculture and law enforcement in carrying out inspections of in-
[18]
HB 4139
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dustrial hemp crops under  ORS 571.281 [ (7)] (8) and other duties of the department related to the
enforcement of ORS 571.260 to 571.348.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 571.319 is amended to read:
571.319. (1) If the industrial hemp  crop of a grower licensed under ORS 571.281 is found to
contain  an  average tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that exceeds the limit described in ORS
571.281 [(7)] (8) and the State  Department of Agriculture requires the grower to destroy or remedi-
ate the industrial hemp crop, the grower shall provide documentation to the department of the de-
struction or remediation.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to carry out this  section, including rules to specify ac-
ceptable documentation for purposes of  subsection (1) of this section and timelines for providing the
documentation to the department.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 571.322 is amended to read:
571.322. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this  subsection, if a person plants an in-
dustrial hemp crop or commits a violation of ORS 571.260 to 571.348 prior to applying for a grower
license under ORS 571.281, the State Department of  Agriculture shall refuse to issue a license to the
person.
(b) If the crop described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection is removed and the department de-
termines that the violation is resolved,  the person described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may
apply for a license under ORS 571.281.
(2) If a  person plants an industrial hemp crop or commits a violation of ORS 571.260 to 571.348
prior to being issued a grower license under ORS 571.281, the department shall:
(a)(A) Prioritize the  person’s industrial hemp crop for inspection under ORS 571.281 [ (7)] (8), if
the person planted the industrial hemp crop as described in this subsection; and
(B) Require the person to enter into a corrective action plan with the department; or
(b) Refuse to issue a  license to the person if the department determines that a corrective action
plan is insufficient to address the violation.
(3) If the  person described in subsection (2) of this section does not enter into a corrective
action plan pursuant to subsection (2) of this  section, the department may not issue a license to the
person under ORS 571.281.
(4) The department may adopt rules to carry out this section, including rules to establish  the
corrective action plan described in subsection (2) of this section.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 26.
ORS 475C.730 is added to and made a part of ORS 475C.670 to 475C.734.
SECTION 27. ORS 571.280 is added to and made a part of ORS 571.260 to 571.348.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 28. The unit captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
[19]
HB 4139
1
2
3
SECTION 29.
This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[20]