Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 166.270 is amended to read:
166.270. (1) Any person who has been convicted of a felony under the law of  this state or any
other state, or who has been convicted of a felony under the laws of the Government of  the United
States, who owns or has in the person’s possession or under the person’s  custody or control any
firearm commits the crime of felon in possession of a firearm.
(2) Any person who  has been convicted of a felony under the law of this state or any other state,
or who has been convicted of a felony under the laws of the Government of the United  States, who
owns or has in the  person’s possession or under the person’s custody or control any instrument or
weapon having a blade  that projects or swings into position by force of a spring or by centrifugal
force or any blackjack, slungshot, sandclub, sandbag, sap glove, metal knuckles or  an Electro-
Muscular Disruption Technology device as defined in ORS 165.540,  or who carries a dirk, dagger
or stiletto, commits the crime of felon in possession of a restricted weapon.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a person “has been convicted of a felony” if, at the time
of conviction for an offense, that offense was a  felony under the law of the jurisdiction in which it
was committed. Such conviction shall not be deemed a conviction of a felony if:
(a) The court declared the conviction to be a misdemeanor at the time of judgment; or
(b) The offense was possession of marijuana and the conviction was prior to January 1, 1972.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any person who has been:
(a) Convicted of only one felony  under the law of this state or any other state, or who has been
convicted of only one felony under the laws  of the United States, which felony did not involve
criminal homicide, as defined in ORS 163.005, or the possession or use of a firearm or  a weapon
having a  blade that projects or swings into position by force of a spring or by centrifugal force, and
who has been discharged from imprisonment, parole or probation for said offense for a period  of 15
years prior to the date of alleged violation of subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) Granted relief from the disability under  18 U.S.C. 925(c) or ORS 166.274 or has had the
person’s record expunged under the laws of this state or equivalent laws of another jurisdiction.
(5) Felon in possession of a firearm is a Class C felony. Felon in  possession of a restricted
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3857
SB 987
1
2
3
4
weapon is a Class A misdemeanor.
(6) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall  classify felon in possession of a
firearm as crime category 8 of the sentencing guidelines grid of the commission.
[2]