Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Qualifying apprentice” means an  apprentice who is at least 16 years of age but not
more than 30 years of age at the close of the tax year.
(2) A credit against taxes that are  otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 or, if the tax-
payer is a corporation, under ORS chapter  317 or 318, is allowed to a taxpayer that employs
qualifying apprentices during the tax year.
(3) The credit allowed  under this section is $1000 per qualifying apprentice employed by
the taxpayer, provided that each qualifying apprentice is employed by the  taxpayer for at
least 500 hours during the tax year.
(4) Prior to claiming the credit allowed under this section, a taxpayer is required to  re-
ceive written certification of eligibility from the Department of Revenue.
(5) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax  liability of the taxpayer
for the tax year.
(6) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this section that is not  used by the taxpayer
in a particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax  liability
for the next succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused in  the next succeeding tax
year may be carried forward and used in the second succeeding tax year, and likewise any
credit not used in that second succeeding  tax year may be carried forward and used in the
third succeeding tax year but may not be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(7) A nonresident shall be allowed the credit under this section. The credit  shall be
computed in the same manner and be subject to the same limitations as the credit granted
to a resident. However, the credit shall be prorated using the proportion provided  in ORS
316.117.
(8) If a change in the  taxable year of the taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1556
SB 709
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or if the Department of Revenue  terminates the taxpayer’s taxable year under ORS 314.440,
the credit allowed by  this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with
ORS 314.085.
(9) If a change  in the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from nonres-
ident to resident occurs, the credit  allowed by this section shall be determined in a manner
consistent with ORS 316.117.
(10) The Department of Revenue shall adopt rules for the purposes of this section, in-
cluding policies and procedures for certifying taxpayers as eligible for the credit allowed  un-
der this section as required in subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 314.772 is amended to read:
314.772. (1) Except as provided in ORS 314.766 (5)(b), the tax credits allowed or allowable  to a
C corporation for purposes  of ORS chapter 317 or 318 shall not be allowed to an S corporation. The
business tax credits allowed or allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 316 shall be allowed  or are
allowable to the shareholders of the S corporation.
(2) In determining the tax imposed under ORS chapter 316, as provided under ORS 314.763, on
income of the  shareholder of an S corporation, there shall be taken into account the shareholder’s
pro rata share of  business tax credit (or item thereof) that would be allowed to the corporation (but
for subsection (1) of this section) or  recapture or recovery thereof. The credit (or item thereof), re-
capture or recovery shall be passed through to shareholders in pro rata shares as determined in the
manner prescribed under section 1377(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) The character of any item included in a shareholder’s pro rata  share under subsection (2)
of this section shall be determined as if such item were realized  directly from the source from which
realized by the corporation, or incurred in the same manner as incurred by the corporation.
(4) If the shareholder is a nonresident and there is a requirement applicable  for the business tax
credit that in the case of a nonresident the credit be allowed  in the proportion provided in ORS
316.117, then that provision shall apply to the nonresident shareholder.
(5) As used in this section, “business  tax credit” means the following credits: ORS 315.104
(forestation and reforestation), ORS 315.124 (small forest option), ORS 315.133 (agricultural overtime
pay), ORS 315.138 (fish screening, by-pass  devices, fishways), ORS 315.141 (biomass production for
biofuel), ORS  315.156 (crop gleaning), ORS 315.164 and 315.169 (agriculture workforce housing), ORS
315.176 (bovine manure), ORS 315.204 (dependent care assistance), ORS 315.208 (dependent care fa-
cilities), ORS 315.213 (contributions for child care), ORS  315.237 (employee and dependent scholar-
ships), ORS 315.271  (individual development accounts), ORS 315.283 (affordable housing sales), ORS
315.304 (pollution control facility),  ORS 315.326 (renewable energy development contributions), ORS
315.331 (energy conservation  projects), ORS 315.336 (transportation projects), ORS 315.341
(renewable energy resource equipment  manufacturing facilities), ORS 315.354 and 469B.151 (energy
conservation facilities), ORS  315.506 (tribal taxes on reservation enterprise zones and reservation
partnership zones), ORS 315.507 (electronic commerce), ORS 315.514 (film production development
contributions), ORS 315.518 (semiconductors),  ORS 315.523 (employee training programs), ORS
315.533 (low income community jobs initiative), ORS 315.593 (short  line railroads), ORS 315.640
(university venture development funds), ORS 315.643 (Opportunity Grant Fund contributions), ORS
315.675 (Trust for Cultural Development Account contributions), ORS 317.097 (loans for affordable
housing), ORS 317.124 (long term enterprise zone facilities), ORS 317.147  (loans for agriculture
workforce housing), ORS 317.152  (qualified research expenses) and ORS 317.154 (alternative qualified
research  expenses)  and section 9, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2013 (alternative fuel vehicle contribu-
[2]
SB 709
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
tions), and section 2 of this 2025 Act (apprenticeships) .
SECTION 4.
 ORS 318.031 is amended to read:
318.031. It being the intention of the Legislative Assembly that this chapter and ORS chapter
317 shall be administered as uniformly as possible (allowance being  made for the difference in im-
position of the taxes), ORS 305.140 and 305.150, ORS chapter 314 and  the following sections are in-
corporated  into  and made a part of this chapter: ORS 315.104, 315.124, 315.133, 315.141, 315.156,
315.176, 315.204, 315.208, 315.213, 315.283, 315.304, 315.326, 315.331, 315.336, 315.506, 315.507, 315.523,
315.533, 315.593 and 315.643 and section 2  of this 2025 Act (all only to the extent applicable to a
corporation) and ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding ORS 315.037, section 2 of this  2025 Act applies to all tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]