Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Armed Forces of the United States”  has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.792.
(2) “Distribution year” means  the July 1 to June 30 period during which the state agen-
cies subject to section 2 of  this 2017 Act received the moneys to be reported for distribution.
(3) “State government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.111.
SECTION 2.
(1) The State Department of Agriculture, the Department of Environmental
Quality, the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife, the State Forestry Department, the De-
partment of State Lands and the State Parks  and Recreation Department shall annually re-
port to the State Treasurer amounts that  were received by those agencies during the 12
months ending June 30 in payment for the use or attempted use of state  lands and waters,
products from state lands and waters or other natural resources of the state.  The agencies
subject to this section shall file reports under this subsection with the State Treasurer no
later than September 1 each year.
(2) An agency shall exclude from a report under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Any amounts the State of Oregon is required by law to  transfer or otherwise make
available to local  governments or local programs, multistate entities or multistate entity
programs or the federal government or federal government programs;
(b) Any payments that the agency receives in compensation for damage to state  lands
or waters, products from state lands or waters or other natural resources;
(c) Any payments received as fines or civil penalties;
(d) Any fees, special assessments or charges paid  to the agency in direct exchange for
provided services; and
(e) Any payments received from another unit of state government.
(3) The State Treasure shall transfer the equivalent of ___ percent of  the amounts re-
ported under subsection (1) of this section from the General Fund to the Resident Distrib-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2910
SB 956
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ution Account established under section 3 of this 2017  Act and notify the Department of
Revenue of the amounts transferred to the account. The State Treasurer shall complete  the
transfers and send notification of the amounts no later than October 1 each year.
(4) Subsection (3)  of this section does not authorize the State Treasurer to transfer
moneys from a fund or account of a reporting agency to the Resident Distribution Account.
SECTION 3. The Resident Distribution Account is established in the State  Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by  the Resident Distribution
Account shall be credited to the account. Moneys  in the account are continuously appropri-
ated to the Department of Revenue for purposes of administering and carrying  out duties
of the department under sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) No later than 90 days after the  Department of Revenue receives a no-
tification from the State Treasurer that  moneys have been transferred to the Resident Dis-
tribution Account, the department shall  determine a pro rata amount for distribution based
on the moneys available in the account, the number of qualifying individuals and  the cost to
the department to make the distributions. The department shall make  distributions to qual-
ifying individuals between January 1 and January 31 following determination of  the distrib-
ution amount.
(2) If  a distribution is returned to the department as undeliverable, and the department
cannot after a good faith effort locate the qualifying individual within two years after  the
undelivered distribution is returned to the department, the distribution is deemed abandoned.
(3) If the department determines that a distribution was  received by an individual who
did not qualify for  the distribution, the department shall undertake collection efforts to re-
cover the amount of the improper distribution.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 98.302 to  98.436, amounts from abandoned distributions and
amounts the  department recovers from the collection of improper distributions shall be de-
posited to the Criminal Injuries Compensation Account established under ORS 147.225.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding section 4 of  this 2017 Act, if the creditor of a qualifying
individual delivers a writ of garnishment to the  Department of Revenue, the department may
pay all or part of the distribution due a qualifying individual to the creditor. Notwithstanding
ORS 18.615 and except as provided in this section, 20  percent of a distribution is not
garnishable property. All of a distribution is garnishable property if the garnishment is:
(1) Part of support enforcement services provided under ORS 25.080;
(2) Restitution to a crime victim ordered by a court under ORS 137.101 to 137.109;
(3) For the recovery of moneys due on a defaulted college or university education loan;
(4) For the recovery of damages from the parent  of an unemancipated minor child under
ORS 30.765;
(5) For the recovery  of a public assistance or medical assistance overpayment as provided
under ORS 411.703; or
(6) For the collection of an amount owed to a unit of state government.
SECTION 6.
(1) To qualify for a distribution under section 4 of this 2017 Act, an individual
must:
(a) Submit an application to the Department of Revenue;
(b) Be a resident of this state at the time the application is submitted;
(c) Have been a resident of this state during all of the distribution year;
(d) Have been physically present in this state for a  continuous period of 72 hours or more
[2]
SB 956
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
during the two years immediately preceding the distribution year;
(e) Except as provided in section 7  of this 2017 Act, have been physically present in this
state during all of the distribution year;
(f) Be in compliance with United States Selective  Service System registration require-
ments, if applicable; and
(g) Be:
(A) A United States citizen;
(B) An alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States;
(C) An alien with refugee status under federal law; or
(D) An alien that has been granted asylum under federal law.
(2) A parent, guardian or other authorized representative  may submit an application and
claim a distribution on behalf of a qualifying unemancipated minor, person with a  disability
or individual who has been declared incompetent.
(3) A personal representative may submit an application and collect a  distribution for the
estate of a decedent who would have qualified for the distribution.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(b) to (d) of this section, a child  who, two or more
years prior to the distribution year, is  born to or adopted by a qualifying individual may also
qualify to receive a distribution.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (4) of this section, an individual does  not qualify
for a distribution if:
(a) The individual was at  any time during the distribution year sentenced for a felony
committed in this state; or
(b) The individual was at any time during the distribution year  incarcerated as a result
of:
(A) A felony committed in this state; or
(B) A misdemeanor committed in this state,  and the individual was previously convicted
of a felony or two or more misdemeanors in this state.
SECTION 7.
(1) Except as provided in  this section, an application to receive a distribution
of moneys under section 4 of this 2017 Act  must be filed with the Department of Revenue
no earlier  than January 1 and no later than March 31 of the year prior to the January dis-
tribution by the department.
(2) If, at any time  between January 1 and March 31 of the year prior to the January
distribution by the department, the individual was serving as a member of the Armed  Forces
of the United States or the Oregon Military Department in a combat operations area, the
Department of Revenue:
(a) Shall accept an application filed by the individual no later than 90 days  after the in-
dividual ceases to serve in a combat operations area; or
(b) May accept  an application filed by the individual more than 90 days after the individ-
ual ceases to serve in a combat operations area if the individual shows good cause for  the
delay.
(3) The Department of Revenue  may request that an individual provide any information
the department requires to determine whether an individual qualifies for  a distribution. The
department may suspend processing of an application  pending the receipt of requested addi-
tional information. If the department  suspends processing of an application under this sec-
tion, the individual may request a contested case hearing under ORS chapter 183.
[3]
SB 956
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) The Department  of Revenue may delay a distribution if the department is notified by
a law enforcement agency that the qualified individual is required to  register as a sex
offender and has not reported as required by law.
SECTION 8. The Department of Revenue may waive the requirement described  in section
6 (1)(d) of this 2017 Act for the following individuals:
(1) An individual who was absent from this state on  active duty orders during a declared
national emergency while serving in the Armed Forces of the United States or the  Oregon
Military Department.
(2) A spouse or child of an individual described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) An individual who by reason  of court order was in the custody of the Oregon Health
Authority and placed outside this state by the authority  for medical or behavioral treatment.
SECTION 9.
(1) An  individual who otherwise qualifies under section 6 of this 2017 Act for
a distribution and was a resident of this state for the six months immediately  preceding an
absence described in this section may receive a distribution for each year in  which the indi-
vidual was absent from this state:
(a) For the purpose of full-time secondary or post-secondary education;
(b) For the purpose of full-time enrollment in a vocational, professional or  other post-
secondary training program, if no similar program is available in this state;
(c) While serving on active duty as a member of the Armed Forces  of the United States;
(d) While a spouse or dependent of an individual  described in paragraph (c) of this sub-
section;
(e) While employed on an oceangoing vessel of the United States Merchant Marine;
(f) For the purpose  of receiving continuous medical care or convalescing as recommended
by a physician, other than a physician recommendation for change in climate;
(g) For the purpose  of accompanying a minor described in paragraph (f) of this sub-
section;
(h) For the purpose of providing  care to a critically ill family member requiring medical
care outside this state;
(i) For the purpose of providing care for a terminally ill family member;
(j) While settling the estate of a  deceased family member, if all of the absences in the
year do not total more than 220 days;
(k) While serving as a member, or as  a staff person for a member, of the Oregon Con-
gressional Delegation;
(L) While assigned as a state employee to a location outside this state;
(m) While a  spouse or dependent accompanying a person absent as provided under para-
graphs (a), (b), (e) to (L), (p) or (q) of this subsection;
(n) While serving in the federal Peace Corps program;
(o) For training or competition as a  member of a United States Olympic team or a United
States national team for an Olympic sport;
(p) For educational participation in a student fellowship sponsored by  the United States
Department of Education or the United States Department of State; or
(q) For  any other purpose consistent with an intent to remain a resident of this state,
if all of the absences in the year do not total:
(A) More  than 180 days in addition to any absence claimed to be exempt under paragraph
(c) of this subsection  and the individual does not claim any other exempt absence under
[4]
SB 956
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
paragraphs (a), (b) or (d) to (p) of this subsection;
(B) More than 120 days  in addition to the total of any other exempt absences claimed
under paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection and the individual does not claim an exempt
absence under paragraphs (d)  to (p) of this subsection but claims an exempt absence under
paragraph (a) of this subsection; or
(C) More than 45 days in addition to all other exempt absences claimed under paragraphs
(a) to (p) of this subsection and the individual claims an  exempt absence under paragraphs
(d) to (p) of this subsection.
(2) There is a rebuttable presumption that an individual who is absent  from this state for
more than 180 days in each of the preceding five years is not  a resident of this state for
purposes of sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act. An individual  may rebut the presumption by
demonstrating that the individual:
(a) Was present in this state during the five years for a total of 30 days or more;
(b) Intends to remain in this state indefinitely and maintain a principal residence in this
state; and
(c) Has not claimed residency or any benefits of residency in another state.
(3) In evaluating whether an individual has demonstrated intent  to remain in this state
indefinitely and maintain a principal residence in this state, the Department of Revenue shall
consider all relevant factors, including but not limited to:
(a) The length of the individual’s absences from this state in comparison with the number
of days the individual was present in this state;
(b) The frequency and duration of voluntary presence in this state by the  individual
during the preceding five years;
(c) Whether the intent to  return and maintain a residence in this state is dependent on
circumstances beyond the control of the individual; and
(d) The connections that the individual has established with any other states.
SECTION 10.
In addition to any other penalty provided by law, the Department of  Re-
venue may assess a civil  penalty against an individual who submits false information to the
department for the purpose of misrepresenting the qualification  of any individual for a dis-
tribution under sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act. The  amount of the civil penalty may not
exceed $10,000.
SECTION 11. Section 2 of this 2017 Act applies  to moneys the State Department of Ag-
riculture, the Department of Environmental Quality, the State Department  of Fish and
Wildlife, the State Forestry Department, the Department of  State Lands and the State Parks
and Recreation  Department receive during each July 1 to June 30 period that ends on or af-
ter June 30, 2018.
[5]