Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SPARTICIS
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Statewide Preparedness Authority  for Response Training and
Intergovernmental Continuity of Imperative Services is established as an office within the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services. The office is to be known as and may be
cited as SPARTICIS.
(2) The office is under the  supervision and control of the State Resilience Officer, who
is responsible for the performance of the duties, functions and powers of the office.
(3) For purposes  of administration, the State Resilience Officer may organize and reor-
ganize the office and appoint administrative personnel as the State  Resilience Officer con-
siders necessary to properly conduct the work of the office.
(4) The State  Resilience Officer may divide the functions of the office into administrative
divisions. The State Resilience Officer may appoint  an individual to administer each division.
The administrator of each division serves at the pleasure of the State  Resilience Officer and
is not  subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 240. Each individual appointed under this
subsection must be well qualified by technical training and experience in the functions to  be
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1405
HB 2844
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
performed by the individual.
(5) The office shall:
(a) Provide administrative and operational support for the  development of strategic im-
provements in facilities and programming;
(b) Provide oversight for prioritization of funding associated  with emergency-related
equipment and functions implemented throughout the state;
(c) Provide standardization across state agencies for continuity  of governance planning,
exercises and preparedness;
(d) Serve  as a platform for development, implementation and assessment of policies
adopted by the State Resilience Officer and provide  administrative and operational support
as directed by the State Resilience Officer;
(e) Carry out the duties imposed by sections 2 to 11 of this 2025 Act; and
(f) Perform such other duties as may be assigned to the office.
(6) The office shall periodically report to the  Legislative Assembly on the office’s activ-
ities, priorities and project outcomes.
(7) The office may adopt rules as necessary to carry out its duties.
SECTION 2.
(1) SPARTICIS shall oversee state strategy relating to regional facilities and
capacity related to emergency preparedness.
(2) The office shall identify,  prioritize and assist in obtaining funding for projects to
construct or improve regional facilities.
(3) The office shall ensure that the state has a combination of fixed, mobile and  trans-
portable supplies that is appropriate for emergency management purposes.
(4) The office shall make expenditures, including grants to local governments, as  defined
in ORS 174.116, and private entities, that  are consistent with the goal of enhancing regional
facilities related to emergency  management. The office may condition grants on matching
contributions or other contributions from recipients.
(5) The office shall monitor the progress of all projects overseen by the  office under this
section and publish quarterly reports on such progress.
(6) The office shall provide administrative support as necessary  to other interagency or
intergovernmental bodies related to emergency management.
SECTION 3. The Regional Facilities Account is established  in the State Treasury, sepa-
rate and distinct from the  General Fund. The account consists of moneys appropriated, al-
located, deposited or transferred to the account by  the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated  to the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services for SPARTICIS to carry out the provisions of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) SPARTICIS  shall oversee collaboration, cooperation and coordination
between the state and:
(a) Organizations involved in the development, implementation  and sustainment of the
emergency supplies and equipment stockpile plan described in ORS 401.111;
(b) Organizations involved in the  development, implementation and sustainment of the
emergency preparedness equipment grant program described in ORS 401.551; and
(c) Organizations involved in other stockpile or resilience grant programs carried out by
state agencies.
(2) The office may take actions as necessary to ensure that supplies, equipment and other
materials are appropriately staged in preparation for emergencies.
[2]
HB 2844
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The office shall monitor the progress of all projects overseen by the  office under this
section and publish quarterly reports on such progress.
SECTION 5.
The Regional Stockpile Support Account is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. The  account consists of moneys appropriated,
allocated, deposited or transferred to the account by the Legislative  Assembly or otherwise.
Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated  to the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services for SPARTICIS to carry out the provisions of section 4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) SPARTICIS shall enhance the emergency preparedness of this state
through education and training as described in this section.
(2) The office shall collaborate, cooperate and coordinate with appropriate  private and
public entities with responsibility for the emergency support functions identified  by the
Federal Emergency Management Agency to develop regionally specific public  safety educa-
tion, live exercises and training with  the goal of improving statewide emergency
preparedness.
(3) The office shall  develop, or support the development of, multidisciplinary, all-hazards
emergency response training and exercises.
(4) The office shall monitor the progress of all projects overseen by the  office under this
section and publish quarterly reports on such progress.
SECTION 7. The Regional Training Account is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General  Fund. The account consists of moneys appropriated, allocated,
deposited or transferred  to the account by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise. Moneys
in the account are continuously appropriated to the  Oregon Department of Administrative
Services for SPARTICIS to carry out the provisions of section 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) SPARTICIS shall collaborate, cooperate and coordinate with state agen-
cies and local governments to  develop and standardize measures for continuity of governance
during and after an emergency that affects normal government operations.
(2) The office shall develop  training for state agencies and local governments related to
continuity of governance. The office  may perform evaluations of continuity of governance
measures adopted by state agencies and local governments.
(3) The office shall monitor development  of continuity of governance measures by state
agencies and local governments and publish quarterly reports  on such development until the
office determines that sufficient measures are in place statewide.
(4) The office may provide  administrative and operational support for policies, programs
and initiatives of the State Resilience Officer related to continuity of governance.
SECTION 9. The Statewide Continuity of Governance Account is established  in the State
Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. The account consists of moneys ap-
propriated, allocated, deposited or transferred  to the account by the Legislative Assembly
or otherwise. Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Oregon  Depart-
ment of Administrative Services for SPARTICIS  to carry out the provisions of section 8 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 10.  (1) SPARTICIS shall collaborate, cooperate and coordinate with  public and
private entities with responsibility for the  emergency support functions identified by the
Federal Emergency  Management Agency to identify and implement strategic investments to
enhance the emergency resilience of the state.
(2) The office may issue grants to support  strategic investments described in subsection
[3]
HB 2844
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) of this section.
(3) The office shall monitor the progress of projects funded under this section and  shall
evaluate, using objective measurements, the improvements to statewide emergency
preparedness attributable to such projects. The office shall publish quarterly  reports on such
progress and improvements.
SECTION 11.
The Strategic Partnership Account is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General  Fund. The account consists of moneys appropriated,
allocated, deposited or transferred  to the account by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated  to the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services for SPARTICIS to carry out the provisions of section 10 of this 2025 Act.
SPARC
SECTION 12. (1) The Statewide Preparedness Authority for Response Coordination is es-
tablished as an office within  the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training. The
office is to be known as and may be cited as SPARC.
(2) The office is under the supervision and control of a facilitator, who is  responsible for
the performance of the duties, functions and powers of the office.
(3) The Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training  shall appoint
the facilitator, who holds office at the pleasure of the director.
(4) The facilitator shall be paid a salary as provided by law or, if not  so provided, as
prescribed by the director, with the approval of the Governor.
(5) For purposes of  administration, the facilitator may organize and reorganize the office
as the facilitator considers necessary to properly conduct the work of the office.
(6) The facilitator may  divide the functions of the office into administrative divisions. The
facilitator may  appoint an individual to administer each division. The administrator of each
division serves at the pleasure of  the facilitator and is not subject to the provisions of ORS
chapter 240. Each individual appointed under this subsection must  be well qualified by tech-
nical training and experience in the functions to be performed by the individual.
(7) The office shall:
(a) Develop a standardized and expandable training environment for emergency response
training in consultation and collaboration with subject matter experts based on strategic,
operational and tactical assessments, evaluations and requirements; and
(b) Plan, develop, construct and  operate facilities for emergency response training until
the facilitator determines that the facilities are fully operational,  at which time control of
the facilities must be transferred to  the Statewide Regional Training Office established under
section 18 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 13.
(1) SPARC shall develop and maintain a database to  be known as the All-
Hazards Statewide Responder Database. The database is to  be a centralized and comprehen-
sive repository of information regarding individuals and entities  with skills or responsibilities
relevant to emergency management.
(2) The office shall negotiate any data sharing agreements with public and private entities
necessary to develop or maintain the database.
(3) The office shall  collaborate, cooperate and coordinate with all appropriate private and
public entities with  responsibility for the emergency support functions identified by the
[4]
HB 2844
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Federal Emergency Management Agency to develop and maintain the database.
(4) In developing the database, the office shall prioritize the inclusion of  formalized
emergency response exercise, experience and training information derived from the  Emer-
gency Management Institute of the Federal  Emergency Management Agency, the emergency
health care provider registry established under ORS 401.651 to 401.670  and the Department
of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(5) The office shall identify, implement and support an  appropriate learning management
system to be used in conjunction with the database.
(6) The office shall prepare and  publish an annual report on the development, mainte-
nance and use of the database. The report must include assessments  and recommendations
for improvement relating to the operation and security of the database.
(7) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, shall assist the office in
carrying out the provisions of this section  and, to the extent permitted by laws relating to
confidentiality, shall furnish information and advice  the office considers necessary to carry
out those provisions.
SECTION 14.
(1) The  All-Hazards Statewide Responder Database Oversight Authority is
created within the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training. The  authority con-
sists of:
(a) The SPARC facilitator;
(b) One member  appointed by the Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency
Management to represent the Oregon Department of Emergency Management;
(c) One member appointed by the Director of the  Department of Public Safety Standards
and Training to represent the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training;
(d) One member appointed by the Director of the Oregon Department of  Administrative
Services to represent the Oregon Department of Administrative Services; and
(e) One member appointed by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority to represent
the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) The authority shall oversee the development  and maintenance of the database de-
scribed in section 13 of this 2025 Act.
COMMISSION ON EMERGENCY RESPONSE TRAINING
SECTION 15.
(1) The Commission on Statewide Intergovernmental Emergency Response
Training Facilities and Programming is established  within the Oregon Department of Emer-
gency Management. The mission of the commission is to develop and carry out a strategic
plan for investments to improve statewide emergency preparedness and interoperability.
(2) The commission consists of:
(a) Two members from the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate;
(b) Two members from the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker  of the
House of Representatives;
(c) The State Resilience Officer;
(d) The SPARC facilitator;
(e) One member with expertise in capital projects appointed by  the Director of the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services  to represent the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services;
[5]
HB 2844
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) One member appointed by the Adjutant General to  represent the Oregon Military
Department;
(g) One member  appointed by the State Fire Marshal to represent the Department of the
State Fire Marshal;
(h) One member appointed by  the Superintendent of State Police to represent the De-
partment of State Police;
(i) One member appointed by the Director of Human Services to  represent the office re-
lated to resilience and emergency management within the Department of Human Services;
(j) One  member appointed by the Governor to represent organizations of local govern-
ments;
(k) One member appointed by the Governor to represent the  Oregon Emergency Man-
agement Association; and
(L) One member appointed by the Governor  to represent tribal government emergency
management agencies.
(3) The commission shall:
(a) Develop short, medium and long term strategic objectives and measurements;
(b) Issue grants in support of its objectives;
(c) Research and make recommendations regarding placement and  distribution of facili-
ties, equipment and supplies;
(d) Adopt standards for regional training;
(e) Identify, evaluate and recommend  legislative changes associated with statewide
emergency resilience; and
(f) Carry out other tasks as necessary to further its mission.
(4) A majority of  the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(5) Official action by the commission requires the  approval of a majority of the members
of the commission.
(6) The SPARC facilitator shall serve as chairperson of the commission.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The commission shall meet  at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the commission.
(9) The commission may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the commission.
(10) SPARC shall provide staff support to the commission.
(11) Members of the Legislative Assembly  appointed to the commission are nonvoting
members of the commission and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(12) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the commission in the performance of the duties of the commission and, to the extent per-
mitted by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of
the commission consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 16.
(1) In addition to its other duties, the Commission  on Statewide Intergov-
ernmental Emergency Response  Training Facilities and Programming shall develop a six-year
strategic investment plan and report on the  plan to appropriate committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly on or before January 1, 2026.
(2) The plan must:
[6]
HB 2844
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Include a scalable investment strategy for enhancing existing  Department of Public
Safety Standards and Training facilities, with any additional construction to occur not more
than five miles away from the department headquarters;
(b) Identify at least seven locations for development of satellite training facilities;
(c) Include investments for a standardized baseline training  space, post-disaster evacuee
support space and equipment necessary for long-term post-disaster continuity of  operations;
(d) Include a standardized list of  equipment and investments for additional training sup-
port and post-disaster evacuee support functions; and
(e) Include a construction  list, a phased timeline for development and plans for training
programming at satellite training facilities, including potential training partners.
(3) The commission shall prepare the plan in a manner  that may be used for preparation
of the budget for the biennium beginning July 1, 2027.
(4) The commission shall provide updates  on the preparation and execution of the plan
at the request of committees of the Legislative Assembly.
(5) On or before March 1, 2033, the  commission shall report to an appropriate committee
of the Legislative Assembly on progress made pursuant to  the plan and recommendations for
further legislative action.
SECTION 17.
Sections 15 and 16 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2039.
STATEWIDE REGIONAL TRAINING OFFICE
SECTION 18. (1) The Statewide Regional Training Office is  established within the De-
partment of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(2) The office is under the supervision and control  of the Statewide Regional Training
Officer, who is responsible for  the performance of the duties, functions and powers of the
office.
(3) The Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training  shall appoint
the Statewide Regional Training Officer, who holds office at the pleasure of the director.
(4) The Statewide Regional Training Officer shall be paid  a salary as provided by law or,
if not so provided, as prescribed by the director, with the approval of the Governor.
(5) For purposes of administration, the Statewide Regional Training Officer may organize
and reorganize the office as the Statewide Regional Training Officer considers  necessary to
properly conduct the work of the office.
(6) The Statewide Regional Training Officer may divide the functions of the  office into
administrative divisions. The Statewide Regional Training Officer may  appoint an individual
to administer each division. The administrator of each division serves at the pleasure of the
Statewide Regional Training Officer and is not subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 240.
Each individual appointed under this subsection must be well qualified by technical training
and experience in the functions to be performed by the individual.
(7) The office shall manage and operate facilities  for emergency response training after
control of such facilities is transferred to the office from SPARC under section 12 of this 2025
Act.
(8) The office shall develop and implement a long-term strategy  for operation of the fa-
cilities with the goal of optimizing the emergency preparedness of the state.
(9) The office shall coordinate with the  SPARC facilitator and the Commission on State-
[7]
HB 2844
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
wide Intergovernmental  Emergency Response Training Facilities and Programming to de-
velop and sustain regional training programs.
TASK FORCE ON LOCAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT
SECTION 19.
(1) The Task  Force on Twenty-first Century Emergency Management Local
Governance is established.
(2) The task  force consists of no fewer than nine members, to be appointed by the State
Resilience Officer.
(3) The task force shall evaluate advantages and disadvantages of various models for
conducting local and regional emergency management operations, including  models that
place emergency management responsibility  with county law enforcement offices and models
that place such responsibility with  local departments that report to senior elected leadership.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee  of the Legislative
Assembly related to emergency management no later than January 1, 2026.
(11) The Oregon Department of  Emergency Management shall provide staff support to
the task force.
(12) If public officials in the legislative department,  as defined in ORS 174.114, are ap-
pointed to the task force, such members are nonvoting members of  the task force and may
act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 20.
Section 19 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
OTHER PROVISIONS
SECTION 21. (1) The State  Resilience Officer shall identify state agencies with responsi-
bility for one or more emergency support functions identified by  the Federal Emergency
Management Agency.
[8]
HB 2844
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Each  state agency identified under subsection (1) of this section shall designate an
employee of the state agency as the Emergency Management Responsible Officer. This offi-
cer shall act as the primary liaison between the state agency and state authorities related
to emergency management, including SPARC and the Oregon  Department of Emergency
Management.
(3) Each state agency not identified under subsection (1) of this section shall designate
an employee of the state  agency as the Continuity of Governance Responsible Officer. This
officer shall act  as the primary liaison between the state agency and SPARTICIS for the
purposes of preparing continuity of governance plans.
SECTION 22.
Each county shall submit  a report to the State Resilience Officer at least
once per biennium on  the state of the county’s emergency preparedness. The report must
include:
(1) An assessment of county-level emergency  management administrative support for
local first responder agencies and local nonprofit  or volunteer organizations associated with
emergency management;
(2) An assessment of county-level strengths and weaknesses relating to emergency
preparedness, response and recovery;
(3) An assessment of regional partnership development; and
(4) Recommendations for structural and systematic improvements.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 401.913 is amended to read:
401.913. (1) The office of State Resilience Officer is created in  the office of the Governor. The
office of State Resilience Officer shall direct, implement and coordinate [ seismic] all-hazards safety
and resilience goal setting and state agency planning and  preparation to improve [ seismic] all-
hazards safety and resilience.
(2) The State Resilience Officer shall facilitate policy standardization among state agen-
cies, prioritize investments for improving resilience posture and  provide regular reports on
state agency resilience policy compliance, organizational  preparedness, continuity of
governance procedures and measures of emergency readiness. Such reports may be made to
the Governor, appropriate committees of the Legislative Assembly or relevant public safety
advisory boards and commissions.
[(2)] (3) The Governor shall appoint  an individual to serve as the State Resilience Officer, sub-
ject to confirmation by the Senate pursuant to Article III, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution.
[(3)] (4)  The  legislative branch of government and the judicial branch of government shall each
select an individual to monitor the effectiveness of seismic safety and resilience planning in  their
branch.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 24.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 25. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
[9]
HB 2844
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[10]