Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall conduct a study  to identify methods
for assisting a school district that provides transportation to any student who lives  outside
of the boundaries of the  school district but for whom the school district is responsible for
transporting because of requirements under state or federal  law to maintain the school of
origin for the student.
(2) The study conducted under this section shall review:
(a) Methods  for a school district to reduce the administrative and financial impact of
providing transportation described in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) Methods for a school  district to provide transportation for a student described in
subsection (1) of this section who needs individual transportation; and
(c) The attendance data for student populations that  are transported across district
boundaries as described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The department shall submit a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2096