Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 291.330 is amended to read:
291.330. The Emergency Board shall be composed of :
(1) The President of the Senate[ ,];
(2) The Speaker of the House  of Representatives[ , the chairpersons of the Senate and House Ways
and Means Committees, eight ];
(3) Seven  other members of the Senate, at least four of whom shall have had  some previous
experience on the Joint Committee on  Ways and Means [ Committee], to be  appointed by the Pres-
ident [ of the Senate ] and confirmed by a majority of all the members elected to the Senate[ ,]; and
(4) [ eight] Fourteen  other  members of the House, at least four of whom shall have had some
previous experience on  the Joint Committee on  Ways and Means [ Committee], to be appointed by
the Speaker and confirmed by a majority of all the members elected to the House.
SECTION 2.  ORS 291.326 is amended to read:
291.326. (1) The Emergency Board, during the  interim between sessions of the Legislative As-
sembly, may exercise the following powers:
(a) Where an emergency exists, to allocate to any  state agency, out of any emergency fund that
may be appropriated to the Emergency Board for that purpose, additional funds beyond the amount
appropriated to the agency by the Legislative Assembly, or funds  to carry on an activity required
by law for which an appropriation was not made.
(b) Where an emergency exists,  to authorize any state agency to expend, from funds dedicated
or continuously appropriated for the uses  and purposes of the agency, sums in excess of the amount
of the budget of the agency as approved in accordance with law.
(c) In the case of a new activity coming into existence at such a time  as to preclude the possi-
bility of  submitting a budget to the Legislative Assembly for approval, to approve, or revise and
approve, a budget of the money appropriated for such new activity.
(d) Where  an emergency exists, to revise or amend the budgets of state agencies to the extent
of authorizing transfers between expenditure classifications within the budget of an agency.
[(2) No allocation, authorization or approval under subsection (1)(a), (b) or (c)  of this section shall
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3173
HB 3270
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
be effective unless made at a meeting at which 10 members of the board were present. ]
[(3)] (2)  The laws enacted by the Legislative  Assembly making appropriations and limiting
expenditures, or either, are not intended to limit the powers of the Emergency Board.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 291.326 and 291.330 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025
Act become operative upon adjournment sine die of the 2027 regular  session of the Eighty-
fourth Legislative Assembly.
[2]