Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 568.560 is amended to read:
568.560. (1) The local governing body of the soil and  water conservation district shall consist
of a board of either five or seven directors elected or appointed as provided by law. To  ensure
proper representation of all the people in the district and to facilitate  district functions, the State
Department of Agriculture shall provide for the zoning of each  district, and shall provide each time
directors are elected or appointed for the proper and equitable representation for each zone.
(2) Two director positions  shall be at-large positions. At-large directors must reside within the
district and be registered voters.
(3)(a) All zone directors must be registered  voters and reside within the zones they represent in
the district.
(b) In addition to the requirements described in paragraph (a) of this subsection,  zone directors
in a  district , other than the soil and water conservation district serving Deschutes County,
that does not include any county with a population of 250,000 or more must:
(A) Own or manage 10 or more acres of land in the zones they represent in  the district and be
involved in the active management of the land; or
(B) Indicate an interest in natural resource conservation as demonstrated  by serving at least
one year as a director or associate director of a district and having a conservation  plan that is
approved by the district.
(4) Candidates nominated for  director from a specific zone shall be voted on by all electors
within the district.
(5) The directors shall designate a chairperson, secretary and  other officers as necessary and
may, from time to time, change such designation.
(6) The term of office of each director shall be four years, except that:
(a) Of the directors first appointed under ORS 568.400, two shall serve until January  first fol-
lowing the first general  election following their appointment, and three shall serve until January
first following the second general election following their appointment, as  determined by the de-
partment, and thereafter, their successors shall be elected as provided by law for other elected  di-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4426
HB 3861
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rectors.
(b) Of the directors first elected as provided in ORS 568.545 (1), three shall serve  until January
first following the first general election and four shall serve until January first following  the second
general election after the date of their election, as  determined by them by lot at the meeting re-
ferred to in ORS 568.545 (1).
(c) Of the directors first elected as provided in ORS 568.565 (1), three shall serve until  January
first following the first general  election and two shall serve until January first following the second
general election after the date of their election, as determined  by them by lot at the meeting re-
ferred to in ORS 568.565 (1).
(d) Of the zone directors elected as provided under ORS  568.565 (2), three shall serve until
January first following the first general election and two shall serve until January first following
the second general election  after the date of their election, as determined by lot at the meeting re-
ferred to in ORS 568.565 (2).
(7) A director shall hold office until a successor has  been elected or appointed, has qualified and
has taken the oath of office or until the office  becomes vacant under subsection (8) of this section.
Any vacancy occurring in the office of director shall be filled as provided  by subsection (9) of this
section.
(8) A director position becomes vacant under the following circumstances:
(a) The department, upon the written recommendation of  a majority of the members of the local
governing body of a district, may  declare vacant the position of a director who is absent from three
consecutive meetings of the local governing body of the district.  A position becomes vacant under
this paragraph upon the issuance of the declaration by the department.
(b) No nominee for the position qualifies under ORS 568.530 to  have the name of the nominee
furnished to the county clerk for  placement on the general district election ballot and no person
qualifies under ORS 568.530 to have write-in votes counted. A position  becomes vacant under this
paragraph on January 1.
(c) The department determines that a candidate receiving the most votes at an  election does not
qualify under this section to hold the  position. A position becomes vacant under this paragraph on
January 1 next following the election at which  the unqualified candidate was elected unless an ap-
pointee to the position has been selected under subsection (9) of this section.
(d) A director serving in a position no longer qualifies under this section  to hold the position.
A position becomes  vacant under this paragraph upon the department’s declaration that the person
no longer qualifies for the position.
(e) A director resigns from a position. A position becomes vacant under this  paragraph upon the
department’s receiving notice of the resignation.
(f) A candidate who received the most votes at an election,  or an appointee, refuses to take the
oath of office as a director.
(9) A director position that becomes vacant before the scheduled expiration of a  term shall be
filled by appointment by a  majority of the remaining directors. However, if a majority of the director
positions are vacant or if the  remaining directors cannot agree on an appointee, the department
shall make an appointment to fill the position.
(10) An appointment under  subsection (9) of this section shall end on January 1 next following
the first general district election held after the appointment. If the  appointment ends under this
subsection before the January 1 that would  normally complete the four-year term of office for the
position, the position shall be placed on the ballot at the next general election  as provided under
[2]
HB 3861
1
2
ORS 568.530 to fill the position for the remainder of the four-year term.
[3]