Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Transportation, the State Department of Energy and  the
Department of Environmental  Quality shall collaborate with the City of Salem and mass
transit agencies in the  City of Salem to conduct a study to determine the feasibility of de-
veloping a rail streetcar system in the City of Salem  that connects West Salem, including
the Edgewater District, with Salem Hospital, Willamette University, state offices  and sur-
rounding businesses. The agencies conducting the study  shall submit a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to transportation  no later than January 1,
2025.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4006