Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Human Services shall study ways to fund the  operation
of senior centers in Oregon. The department shall  submit a report on the findings in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to human services no later  than
September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4379