Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Seismic Event Preparation is established.
(2) The task force consists of nine members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall  appoint one member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from  among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint seven members as follows:
(A) One member who represents the Oregon Department of Emergency Management;
(B) One member who manages emergencies for a school district;
(C) One member who represents the Department of Education;
(D) One member who represents the Department of Early Learning and Care;
(E) One member  who represents the Department of Human Services for child welfare
services;
(F) One member who is a mental health provider; and
(G) One member who is the public safety policy advisor to the Governor.
(3) The task force shall conduct a study regarding the  impacts of a major seismic event
on children. As part  of the study, the task force shall identify methods for preparing schools
and communities to meet the needs of children following a major seismic event.
(4) When conducting the study described in subsection (3) of this  section, the task force
shall consult with the Federal Emergency Management Agency.
(5) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2010
HB 2879
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task  force shall submit a report, and may include recommendations for legis-
lation, to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to  education no later
than September 15, 2026.
(12) The Department of Education shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]