Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 338.125 is amended to read:
338.125. (1) Student enrollment in a public charter school is voluntary.
(2)(a) All students who reside in the school district in which the public charter  school is located
are eligible for enrollment in the public charter school if space is available.
(b) Students  who do not reside in the school district in which the public charter school is lo-
cated are eligible for enrollment in the public charter school if space is  available and subject to
subsection (5) of this section.
(c) A public charter  school may not limit student enrollment based on race, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, ethnicity, national origin, disability, the terms of an  individualized ed-
ucation  program,  income level, proficiency in the English language or athletic ability. A public
charter school may implement a weighted lottery  that favors historically underserved students as
provided by subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(3)(a) Except as provided by paragraphs (b) and (c)  of this subsection, if the number of applica-
tions from students exceeds the capacity  of a program, class, grade level or building, the public
charter school shall select  students through an equitable lottery selection process. For the purpose
of ameliorating the impact of discrimination against  historically underserved students, an equitable
lottery selection process may include weights that  favor historically underserved students. As used
in this  paragraph, “historically underserved students” are students who are at risk because of any
combination of their race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ethnicity, disability, income  level,
proficiency in the English language, socioeconomic status or geographic location.
(b)(A) A  public charter school may give priority for admission to students who reside within the
attendance boundaries that were in effect at  the time a school district closed a nonchartered public
school  if:
(i) The public charter school began to operate  not more than two years after the nonchartered
public school was closed;
(ii) The school district that closed the nonchartered  public school is the sponsor of the public
charter school;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 688
SB 647
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(iii) The public charter school  is physically located within the attendance boundaries of the
closed nonchartered public school; and
(iv) The school district board, through board action, approved the public charter school  giving
priority as described in this paragraph.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph requires an amendment to a charter.  A school district board may
take an action described in subparagraph (A)(iv) of this  paragraph at any time during the term of
a charter.
(c) After a public charter school has been in operation for one or more  years, the public charter
school may give priority for admission to students who:
(A) Were enrolled in the prior year in the public charter school;
(B) Were enrolled  in a public preschool or prekindergarten program operated by the public
charter school;
(C) Have siblings who are presently enrolled in the school and who were  enrolled in the school
in the prior year;
(D) Are at risk because the student has an economic  or academic disadvantage that requires
special services or assistance, including students who:
(i) Are from economically disadvantaged families;
(ii) Are identified as having special educational needs;
(iii) Are limited in proficiency in the English language;
(iv) Are at risk of dropping out of high school; or
(v) Do not meet minimum standards of academic proficiency; or
(E) If the public charter school is  a party to a cooperative agreement described in ORS 338.080,
reside in the school  district that is the sponsor of the public charter school or in a school district
that is a party to the cooperative agreement.
(4) A student who wishes to enroll in a virtual public charter school does not need the approval
of the school district where the  student is a resident before the student enrolls in the virtual public
charter school. If a student wishes  to enroll in a virtual public charter school, the parent, legal
guardian or person in parental relationship with the student must provide the following  notices to
the school district where the student is a resident:
(a) Intent to enroll the student in a virtual public charter school; and
(b) Enrollment of the student in a virtual public charter school.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section  and ORS 339.133, if more than [ three] five
percent of the students who reside  in a school district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools
that are not  sponsored by the school district, a student who is a resident of the school district must
receive  approval  from the school district before enrolling in a virtual public charter school. A school
district is not required to give approval if more than [ three] five percent of the students who reside
in the school district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by the
school district. A school  district must provide notice of the decision to not give approval within 10
calendar days of receiving notice of intent for  the student to enroll in a virtual public charter
school.
(b) For the purpose of determining whether more than [ three] five percent of the students  who
reside in the school district are enrolled in  virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by
the school district, the school district board shall:
(A) Include any students who:
(i) Reside  in the school district, regardless of whether the students are considered residents of
[2]
SB 647
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
different school districts as provided by ORS 339.133 (5); and
(ii) Are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district.
(B) Calculate, at least twice each year, the school district’s percentage of students attending
virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district.
(c)(A) Except as provided by subparagraph  (B) of this paragraph, students who reside in the
school district, regardless of whether the students are considered  residents of different school dis-
tricts as provided by ORS 339.133 (5),  must receive approval from the school district before enrolling
in a virtual public charter school if the limit described in paragraph (a) of this  subsection has been
met.
(B) A student is not required to  receive approval from the school district in which the student
resides if the student:
(i) Previously lived in another school district;
(ii) While living in  the other school district, was enrolled in a virtual public charter school; and
(iii) Has maintained continuous  enrollment in the virtual public charter school since moving into
the school district where the student currently resides.
(d) If the school district does not give approval under paragraph (a)  of this subsection, the
school district must provide to the parent, legal  guardian or person in parental relationship with the
student information about:
(A) The percentage of students in the resident district that attend virtual public charter schools
that are not sponsored by the school district, based on the most recent calculation;
(B) The right to appeal the decision to the State Board of Education; and
(C) Other online options available to the student.
(e) If an appeal is made to the State Board  of Education as described in paragraph (d) of this
subsection, the board must issue a decision within 14 days of the submission of the appeal.
(6) Within 10 days of a student’s enrollment in a public charter  school, the public charter school
shall provide written notice of the  student’s enrollment to the school district in which the public
charter school is located if the student does not reside in the school district where the public
charter school is located.
(7) Within 10  days of receiving the notice described in subsection (6) of this section, the school
district in which the public charter school is located shall  provide to the student’s parent, legal
guardian or person in parental relationship written information about:
(a) The school district’s responsibility to identify, locate and  evaluate students enrolled in the
public charter school to determine which students  may be in need of special education and related
services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(b) The methods by which the school district may be contacted to  answer questions or provide
information related to special education and related services.
(8) When a student described in subsection (6) of this section withdraws from  a public charter
school for a reason other than graduation from  high school, the school district in which the public
charter school is located shall:
(a) Provide to the school district in which the student resides written notice that the student
has withdrawn.
(b) Provide to the student’s parent,  legal guardian or person in parental relationship written
information about:
(A) The responsibility of the school district in which the student  resides to identify, locate and
evaluate students  who reside in the school district to determine which students may be in need of
[3]
SB 647
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
special education and related services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(B) The methods by which the school district in which the student resides may  be contacted to
answer questions or provide information related to special education and related services.
(9)(a) If a student described in subsection (6) of this  section enrolls in a public charter school
and has an individualized education program, the school district in which the public charter  school
is located must implement the individualized education program and follow the terms  of the indi-
vidualized education program until a new individualized education program is developed.
(b) If a student described  in subsection (6) of this section withdraws from a public charter school
and has an individualized  education program, the school district in which the student resides must
implement the individualized education program and follow the terms  of the individualized education
program until a new individualized education program is developed.
(10) When a virtual public charter school enrolls a student or a student no  longer is enrolled
in a virtual public charter school, the virtual public charter school shall provide the written  notices
described in ORS 338.120 (1)(m) and (n) to the school district where the student is a resident.
(11) A public charter school may conduct fund-raising activities but may not require a  student
to participate in fund-raising activities as a condition of admission to the public charter school.
[4]