Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 456.055 is amended to read:
456.055. As used in the Housing Authorities Law, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Affordable housing” means dwelling units [ that may be purchased or rented ] available for
purchase or rent , with or without government assistance, by persons of eligible income.
(2) “Blighted area” means any area where housing, by reason of  neglect and dilapidation, is
detrimental to the safety or health of the occupants or of the neighborhood  in which the housing is
located.
(3) “Bonds” means any bonds, notes, interim certificates, debentures or other obligations issued
by an authority pursuant to the Housing Authorities Law.  The giving of a note secured by a mort-
gage or trust deed will not constitute a bond.
[(4) “The City” means the particular city included within a particular housing authority. ]
[(5)] (4)  “Clerk” means the recorder of the city , [ or] the clerk of the  county[ , as the case may
be,] or the officer of the city  or the county[ , respectively, ] charged with the duties customarily im-
posed on such clerk.
[(6) “County” means  any county in the state. “The county” means a particular county or counties
for which a particular housing authority is created. ]
[(7)] (5) “Governing body” means, in the case of a city, the common council  or other legislative
body [ thereof], and, in  the case of a county, the county court, commission or other legislative body
[thereof].
[(8)] (6)  “Housing” means housing of all kinds, including [ but not limited to ] single-family
dwellings, multifamily dwellings, emergency shelters, dwelling accommodations, living accommo-
dations, manufactured dwelling parks, residential units, housing projects or other dwellings.
[(9)] (7)  “Housing unit” or “unit” means  a single-family dwelling, a single apartment or [ other]
another single dwelling.
[(10)] (8) “Mixed income housing” means a housing project that houses tenants with a mixture
of income levels, including those not of lower income, for the purpose of reducing the  rents for
tenants whose incomes are no greater than 60 percent of the area median income.
[(11)] (9)  “Obligee of the  authority” or “obligee” includes any bondholder or trustee for any
bondholder, or lessor demising to the authority property used in connection with a  housing project,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3699
SB 820
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or any assignee of [ such] the lessor’s interest or any part thereof, and the federal government when
it is a party to any contract with the authority.
[(12)] (10)  “Persons of eligible income”  means individuals or families who meet the applicable
income limits of local, state or federally funded programs or developments.
[(13)] (11)  “Private market” means those rental housing units owned and  operated by nongov-
ernment entities and without government subsidies.
[(14)] (12)  “Person of lower income” or “family of lower income” means a person or a family,
residing in  this state, whose income is not greater than 80 percent of the area median income, ad-
justed for family size, as  determined by the Housing and Community Services Department using
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development information.
[(15)] (13) “Real property” includes all lands,  including improvements and fixtures thereon, and
property of any nature appurtenant  thereto, or used in connection therewith, and every estate, in-
terest and right, legal or equitable,  therein, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment,
mortgage or otherwise and the indebtedness secured by such liens.
SECTION 2.  ORS 456.075 is amended to read:
456.075. In each city[ , as defined in ORS 456.055, ] and county there [ hereby] is  created a public
body corporate and politic to be  known as the “housing authority” of the city or county.
[However,] The housing authority [ shall] may  not transact any  business or exercise its powers until
or unless the governing body [ of the city or the  county ], by proper resolution, declares that there is
need for an authority to function in [ such] the city or  county[ . The governing body of the city or the
county shall also  elect to have the powers of a ] and elects how the housing authority [ exercised in
any one of the two ways provided in ] may exercise its powers under  ORS 456.095 (1).
SECTION 3.  ORS 456.080 is amended to read:
456.080. (1) [ The determination ] Whether there is a need for a  housing authority to function in
a city or county may be [ made] determined either by election as provided in  this section or by the
governing body [ of a city or county ] on its own motion. The governing body [ of the city or  county ]
shall order the election when a petition is filed as provided in this section.
(2) A petition under this section must state that there is a need for a housing  authority to
function.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the requirements  for preparing,
circulating and filing a petition under this section [ shall] must  be as  provided for an initiative pe-
tition:
(a) In the case of a county, in ORS 250.165 to 250.235.
(b) In the case of a city, in ORS 250.265 to 250.346.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 250.325, a city governing  body shall submit the question to the electors
without first considering its adoption or rejection.
(5) If ORS 250.155 makes ORS 250.165 to  250.235 inapplicable to a county or if ORS 250.255
makes ORS 250.265  to 250.346 inapplicable to a city, the requirements for preparing, circulating and
filing a petition under this  section [ shall be ] are  as provided for an initiative petition under the
county or city charter or an ordinance adopted under the county or city charter.
(6) An election under this section [ shall] must  be conducted under ORS  chapters 246 to 260[ ,]
and:
(a) In the case of a city, must be held on a date specified in ORS 221.230.
(b) In the case of a county, must be held on a date specified in ORS 203.085.
(7) If the electors voting at the  election favor the functioning of the housing authority, the
[2]
SB 820
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
governing body shall declare that there is need for such housing authority to function.
(8) The question of need [ shall] may  not [ again] be submitted at any election within one year
immediately following the election at which the question was voted upon.
SECTION 4.  ORS 456.095 is amended to read:
456.095. (1) When the governing body [ of a city or county ] adopts  a resolution pursuant to ORS
456.085, the governing body [ may then] shall elect to have [ the powers of ] a housing authority [ under
this chapter, ORS chapter  455 and ORS 446.515 to 446.547 exercised in any of the following ways ]
exercise its powers by :
(a) Appointing by resolution[ ,] a commission composed of five, seven or nine persons[ .]; or
(b) Declaring[ ,] by resolution[ ,] that the governing body, itself, shall exercise  the powers of a
housing authority [ under this chapter, ORS chapter 455 and ORS 446.515 to 446.547 ].
(2) A governing body that exercises the  powers of a housing authority under subsection (1)(b)
of this section  may appoint  at least one but not more than two additional commissioners for the
housing authority. An appointed commissioner has the same authority as  other housing authority
commissioners, but may not exercise any powers  of the governing body. At least one appointed
commissioner must be a resident who receives direct  assistance from the housing authority. The
second appointed commissioner,  if any, at a minimum must live within the jurisdiction of the au-
thority. An appointed commissioner serves a term of office  equal in length to the terms of office for
governing body members, but not more than four years. An appointed  commissioner may be removed
only for cause as described  in ORS 456.110 or if the commissioner ceases to meet the requirements
for being an appointed commissioner.  [In the event that ] If a housing authority commission consisting
of the governing  body of a city and one or more appointed commissioners has an even number of
members, the mayor [ shall be ] is  included as  a member of the commission for the housing authority.
An act of a governing body exercising the powers of  a housing authority is an act of the commission
for the housing authority only and not of the governing body.
[(2)] (3)  When the governing bodies  of two or more authorities join and cooperate with one an-
other and create a regional authority to exercise all the powers conferred by  the Housing Authori-
ties Law, as authorized by ORS 456.140, the governing  bodies of the cooperating cities and counties
shall by resolution appoint a commission for the regional authority  consisting of nine persons. The
cooperating cities and counties shall each appoint  an equal number of the nine commissioners. If
nine divided by the number  of joining or cooperating cities and counties produces a fraction, then
the commissioners appointed by [ such] the cities and counties shall appoint one commissioner so
that nine commissioners in all are appointed. The nine commissioners appointed  by or on behalf of
cities or counties may appoint at least one but not more than two additional commissioners for the
housing authority. At least one additional commissioner  must be a resident who receives direct as-
sistance from the housing authority. The second additional commissioner, if any, at a minimum must
live within the jurisdiction of the authority. The term of office for an additional  commissioner is
equal to the term of office for  a commissioner appointed by or on behalf of cities or counties. An
additional commissioner may be removed only for cause as described under ORS 456.110 or if the
person ceases to meet the requirements for being an additional commissioner.
[(3)] (4) A commissioner of an authority may not be an officer or employee of  any city or county
for which the authority is created, unless the commissioner is a  member of the governing body or
one of the governing bodies.
[(4)] (5) Persons appointed to the commission [ shall] must  include a  variety of occupations. At
least one commissioner, but not  more than two commissioners, appointed under subsection (1)(a) of
[3]
SB 820
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
this section must be a resident who receives direct assistance from the housing authority.
[(5)] (6) A governing body shall adopt a resolution for the appointment or reappointment of a
commissioner. A governing body resolution is  conclusive evidence that the commissioner was prop-
erly appointed.
SECTION 5.  ORS 456.110 is amended to read:
456.110. For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a  commissioner of an au-
thority appointed pursuant to ORS 456.095 [ (1) or (2) ] (2) or (3)  may be removed by  the mayor or,
in the case of an authority  for a county, by the governing body of the county or, in the case of a
regional authority, by the appointing  authority for the commissioner. This section does not allow the
removal of a member of a governing body exercising power as a housing  authority. A commissioner
[shall] may  not be  removed until after the commissioner has been given a copy of the charges at
least 10 days prior to the hearing thereon and had an opportunity to be heard in person or  by
counsel. In the event of the removal of any commissioner, a  record of the proceedings, together with
the charges and findings thereon, [ shall] must  be filed in the office of the  clerk for each city and
county in the authority.
SECTION 6.  ORS 456.180 is amended to read:
456.180. (1) Neither the commissioners of an authority nor any  person executing the bonds [ shall
be] is  liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance thereof.
(2) The bonds and other obligations  of an authority [ shall not be ] are not  a debt of the city, the
county, the state or any political subdivision thereof, and the  bonds and obligations shall so state
on their face. Neither the city, the county, nor the state or any political subdivision thereof [ shall
be] is  liable thereon. [ Nor, in any event, shall ] Such bonds  or obligations [ be] are not  payable out
of any funds or properties other than those of the authority.
(3) The bonds  [ shall not constitute ] are not  an indebtedness within the meaning of any consti-
tutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction.
SECTION 7.  ORS 456.233 is amended to read:
456.233. If[, pursuant to this  chapter, ORS chapter 455 and ORS 446.515 to 446.547, ] the governing
body [ in a city or a county ] has declared, by resolution,  that the governing body [ itself] shall exercise
the powers of a housing authority [ under this chapter, ORS chapter 455 and ORS 446.515  to
446.547], the governing body may [ thereafter], by resolution, elect to transfer such powers and the
authority to act as the housing authority  to any other body [ which] that may be designated [ by this
chapter, ORS chapter 455 and ORS 446.515  to 446.547 ] to exercise such powers  under ORS 456.055
to 456.235. The governing  body [ of the city or county ] may, by resolution, transfer the powers and
authority to act as  the housing authority to itself. All duties and obligations of the governing body
as the housing authority of the municipality [ shall] thereafter must be assumed and performed by
the body to which such powers and authority are transferred.
[4]