Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS chapter 468B.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “microfiber filtration system”  means a filtration
system that:
(a) Is active across all washing cycles of a clothes washer;
(b) Has a mesh size of 100 micrometers or less; and
(c) Is either:
(A) Built into a newly manufactured clothes washer; or
(B) An in-line filtration system that is packaged with and capable of being installed  with
a new clothes washer.
(2) A person may not sell or offer for sale in this state a new clothes washer unless:
(a) The clothes washer is equipped with a microfiber filtration system; and
(b) The clothes washer bears a conspicuous label that notifies consumers that the unit
includes a microfiber filtration system and instructs the consumer  to check the filter ac-
cording to a regular schedule and dispose of captured lint with household solid waste.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2030.
(2) The Department of Environmental Quality and the  Environmental Quality Commis-
sion may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section
that is necessary to enable  the department or the commission to exercise, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section, all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the department and the commission by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 745