Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2026 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 757.
SECTION 2. Litigation-related costs and expenses. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric company” means an  electric company, as defined in ORS 757.600, that serves
more than 25,000 retail electricity consumers located in this state.
(b) “Retail electricity consumer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(2) If a court or jury finds that a wildfire resulted from the negligence  or a higher degree
of fault on the part  of an electric company, the electric company may not recover from retail
electricity consumers the following costs and expenses:
(a) Costs and expenses that are, or are associated with,  a civil judgment, civil fine or
penalty or criminal fine or penalty that results from  or is based on the finding that the
wildfire resulted from the negligence or a higher degree of fault on  the part of the electric
company.
(b) Costs and expenses that are, or are associated with, a settlement that is based on:
(A) The underlying  allegations that there are losses, expenses or damages caused by the
wildfire that resulted from the negligence or a  higher degree of fault on the part of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 298
SB 1553
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
electric company; or
(B) The finding that the wildfire resulted from the negligence or a  higher degree of fault
on the part of the electric company.
(c) Litigation costs  and expenses of, or associated with, the civil or criminal action in
which the court or jury finds that the wildfire resulted from the negligence or a higher de-
gree of fault on the part of the electric company.
SECTION 3.
Escrow requirements. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric company” means an  electric company, as defined in ORS 757.600, that serves
more than 25,000 retail electricity consumers located in this state.
(b) “Retail electricity consumer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(c) “Qualified escrow fund” means an escrow arrangement with a federally  or state
chartered financial institution having no affiliation with  any entity that is engaged in the
business of the production, sale or distribution of electricity and having assets of  at least $1
billion.
(2) If an electric company has been found to be liable for damages in a civil  action or
actions arising  out of allegations that the conduct of the electric company caused or sub-
stantially contributed to a wildfire, the Public Utility Commission  shall require the electric
company:
(a) To establish and maintain a qualified escrow fund for the benefit of those persons that
the electric company is found to be liable in the civil action or actions; and
(b) To execute a qualified escrow agreement that has been  reviewed and approved by the
commission.
(3) The commission may:
(a) Establish a minimum amount that the electric company  shall maintain in the quali-
fied escrow fund as necessary to ensure the electric company’s  ability to satisfy all judg-
ments that may result from the civil action or actions;
(b) Require the electric company  to place all or part of any proceeds from any sale of
property or assets located in this state in the qualified escrow fund; and
(c) Prohibit the electric company from accessing or  directing the use of the escrowed
funds except to satisfy any judgment amounts that result from the civil action or actions.
(4) Upon the satisfaction of all judgments that may  result from the civil action or
actions, the commission shall  allow the electric company to close the qualified escrow fund
and recover any remaining amounts in the qualified escrow fund.
(5) In carrying out this section, the commission shall balance the electric company’s ob-
ligation to provide adequate service to its customers and its ability to  satisfy any judgments
that may result from being found to be liable in the civil action or actions.
SECTION 4.
Federal tax liability. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric company” means an  electric company, as defined in ORS 757.600, that serves
more than 25,000 retail electricity consumers located in this state.
(b) “Retail electricity consumer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(2) In a civil action arising out of allegations that the conduct of an electric  company
caused or substantially contributed to a wildfire, an electric  company that has been found
to be liable for damages to a plaintiff or class member shall also be liable for any federal
income tax liability for any tax years that is imposed on any amounts  received by the
plaintiff or class member in relation to the  civil action and that the plaintiff or class member
[2]
SB 1553
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
owes or pays.
SECTION 5.
Direct appeal to Supreme Court. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric company” means an  electric company, as defined in ORS 757.600, that serves
more than 25,000 retail electricity consumers located in this state.
(b) “Retail electricity consumer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(2) Any appeal of a judgment, order or decision of the circuit court for a civil action
arising out of allegations that the  conduct of an electric company caused or substantially
contributed to a wildfire shall be directed to the Supreme Court.
(3) Jurisdiction is vested in the Supreme Court to hear and determine all appeals  from
judgments, orders and decisions of a circuit court for any  civil action arising out of
allegations that the conduct of an electric company caused or substantially contributed  to a
wildfire.
(4) An appeal taken under this section shall be  within the time and in the manner spec-
ified in ORS chapter 19 for civil appeals to the Court of Appeals.  Any party filing a notice
of appeal under this section must note in the notice of appeal that the case is subject to this
section.
SECTION 6.
Punitive damages. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric company” means an  electric company, as defined in ORS 757.600, that serves
more than 25,000 retail electricity consumers located in this state.
(b) “Retail electricity consumer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 31.735 (1)(b), in a civil action arising out of allegations that the
conduct of an electric company caused or  substantially contributed to a wildfire, upon the
entry of a verdict that includes an award of punitive damages:
(a) Sixty percent of the punitive damage portion of the award is payable to the State  of
Oregon for deposit in the Wildfire Recovery Fund established under  section 7 of this 2026
Act. The remaining amount of the punitive damage portion of the award shall be allocated
as provided in ORS 31.735 (1)(a) and (c).
(b) The Department of Justice and the State of Oregon become judgment creditors as to
the amounts payable under this section.
(3) In a civil action arising out of allegations that the conduct of an electric  company
caused or substantially contributed to  a wildfire, upon the entry of a verdict that includes
an award of punitive damages, the prevailing party shall provide notice of the verdict to  the
Department of Justice in the manner provided  under ORS 31.735 (3) and to the State Treas-
urer. In addition, upon entry of a judgment based on the  verdict, the prevailing party shall
provide notice of the judgment to  the Department of Justice in the manner provided under
ORS 31.735 (3) and to the  State Treasurer. The notice to the State Treasurer must be in
writing and must  be delivered to the officer of the State Treasurer within five days after the
entry of the verdict or judgment.
(4) Whenever any judgment creditor of a judgment  that includes punitive damages gov-
erned by this section receives any payment on the judgment by or on behalf of any defendant,
the judgment creditor receiving  the payment shall notify the attorney for the other judgment
creditors and all sums collected shall be applied as required by ORS 31.735 (1)(a) and  (c) and
(4) and subsection (2) of this section, unless  all affected parties, including the Department
of Justice, expressly agree otherwise, or unless that application is  contrary to the express
terms of the judgment.
[3]
SB 1553
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
SECTION 7.
Wildfire Recovery Fund. (1) The Wildfire Recovery Fund is established in the
State Treasury  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Wildfire
Recovery Fund shall be credited to the fund. The Wildfire Recovery Fund consists of moneys
deposited in the fund pursuant to section 6 of this 2026  Act and may include moneys appro-
priated, allocated, deposited or transferred  to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or oth-
erwise and interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) The first $50 million that is deposited in the Wildfire Recovery Fund pursuant to
section 6 of this 2026 Act is payable  to the Attorney General for deposit in the Criminal In-
juries Compensation Account of the Department of Justice Crime Victims’ Assistance Sec-
tion, and may be used only for the purposes set forth in ORS chapter 147.
(3) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall:
(a) Administer the Wildfire Recovery Fund; and
(b) Transfer any moneys in the fund that is payable  to the Attorney General under sub-
section (2) of this section  to the Attorney General for deposit in the Criminal Injuries Com-
pensation Account of the Department of Justice Crime Victims’ Assistance Section.
SECTION 8.
Applicability. Sections 2 to 6 of this 2026 Act apply to wildfires that are ig-
nited on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2025.
SECTION 9. Captions. The section captions used in  this 2026 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and  do not become part of the statutory law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 10. Effective date. This 2026 Act being  necessary for the immediate preserva-
tion of  the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026
Act takes effect on its passage.
[4]