Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall conduct a feasibility study to deter-
mine the viability of establishing a public boarding school in this state.
(2) When conducting the feasibility study, the department shall identify:
(a) The methods for funding a public boarding school;
(b) The characteristics of the students who would be served by a public  boarding school,
including consideration of students who are in foster care, who are homeless or  who come
from families with an income below a specified threshold;
(c) Where in this state a public boarding school would be located; and
(d) The general calendar for  a public boarding school, including considering whether the
public boarding school should be available only during the school year, or all year.
(3) For the purpose of conducting the feasibility study, the department:
(a) Shall collaborate  or enter into a contract with a national nonprofit organization that
develops partnerships with urban communities to provide innovative educational opportu-
nities.
(b) May accept contributions  of funds and assistance from any source, public or private,
and agree to conditions placed on the funds not  inconsistent with the purposes of this sec-
tion.
(4) The department shall submit a report on  the feasibility study conducted under this
section, including recommendations for legislation, to  the committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to education no later than March 1, 2018.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on December 31, 2018.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount  of $20,000, which may be expended for the purpose of the feasi-
bility study described in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4356
SB 1033
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[2]