Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Firefighter” and “volunteer firefighter” have  the meanings given those terms in ORS
652.050.
(b) “Volunteer services” means services  performed by a firefighter during work hours
and work shifts that are voluntary and that are not a condition of employment.
(2) A resident or nonresident  individual shall be allowed a credit in the amount of $1,000
against taxes that are otherwise due under ORS chapter 316  if during the tax year the indi-
vidual provides volunteer services, including training hours, to:
(a) A regularly organized fire department as defined in ORS 652.050;
(b) A rural fire protection district organized under ORS chapter 478;
(c) A municipal corporation as defined in ORS 294.311; or
(d) Any other public or private safety agency, as defined in ORS 181A.355, that provides
fire fighting services.
(3) In order  to claim a credit under this section, a taxpayer must during the tax year
complete at least two of the following as a volunteer firefighter:
(a) Respond to a minimum of 10 percent of calls for  assistance received by the volunteer
firefighter;
(b) Participate in at least 60 training hours;
(c) Participate in at least  one community engagement event not described in paragraph
(d) of this subsection;
(d) Participate in at least 20 hours of public education  service delivering information
about fire safety and prevention; or
(e) Earn a certification approved by  the Department of Public Safety Standards and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2752
SB 545
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
Training and available to a fire service professional.
(4) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules relating  to the administration and
enforcement of this section. The department shall prescribe a form that requires  the chief
of the fire protection district or fire department or the director of another public or  private
safety agency to certify that the individual qualifies for the  credit allowed under this section.
(5) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax  liability of the taxpayer
and may not be carried forward to another tax year.
(6) A nonresident shall be  allowed the credit under this section in the proportion provided
in ORS 316.117. If a change in the status of a taxpayer  from resident to nonresident or from
nonresident to resident occurs, the credit  allowed by this section shall be determined in a
manner consistent with ORS 316.117.
(7) A credit  may not be allowed under this section for any tax year for which a credit is
claimed under ORS 315.622.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]