Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 205.323 is amended to read:
205.323. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of the fees charged and collected under ORS  205.320
and other fees, the county clerk shall charge and collect the following fees for the recording  or fil-
ing of any instrument described in ORS 205.130:
(a) A fee of $1, to be credited as provided in subsection (4)(a) of this section;
(b) A fee of $10, to be credited as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section; and
(c) A fee of [ $20] $40, to be credited as provided in subsection (4)(c) of this section.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the recording or filing of the following:
(a) Instruments  that are otherwise exempt from recording or filing fees under any provision of
law;
(b) Any satisfaction of judgment or certificate of satisfaction of judgment; or
(c) Internal county government instruments not otherwise charged a recording or filing fee.
(3) Subsection (1)(c) of this section does not apply to the recording or filing of:
(a) Instruments required under ORS 517.210 to maintain mining claims;
(b) Warrants  issued by the Employment Department pursuant to ORS 657.396, 657.642 and
657.646; or
(c) A certified copy of  a judgment, a lien record abstract as described in ORS 18.170 or a sat-
isfaction of a judgment, including a judgment noticed by recordation of a lien record abstract.
(4) Of the amounts charged and collected under this section:
(a) The recording or  filing fee charged and collected under subsection (1)(a) of this section must
be deposited and credited to the Oregon Land Information System Fund established under ORS
306.132.
(b) The recording or  filing fee charged and collected under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall
be credited as follows:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3510
HB 3357
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Five percent of the fee must be credited for the benefit of the county;
(B) Five percent of the fee must be credited for the  benefit of the county clerk for the purposes
described in ORS 205.320 (2); and
(C) 90 percent of the  fee must be credited to and deposited in the County Assessment and Tax-
ation Fund created under ORS 294.187.
(c) The recording or filing fee  charged and collected under subsection (1)(c) of this section must
be credited to and deposited in the County Assessment  and Taxation Fund created under ORS
294.187.
(5) The Department of  Revenue is exempt from paying the fee under subsection (1)(c) of this
section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 458.610 is amended to read:
458.610. For purposes of ORS 458.600 to 458.665:
(1) “Affordable housing” means housing that may be purchased or rented, with  or with-
out government assistance, on a basis that is  affordable to individuals of low income or very
low income.
[(1)] (2) “Council” means the Oregon Housing Stability Council established in ORS 456.567.
[(2)] (3)  “Department” means the Housing and Community  Services Department established in
ORS 456.555.
[(3)] (4) “Low income” means income that is more than 50 percent  and not more than 80 percent
of the median family income for the area, subject  to adjustment for areas with unusually high or low
incomes or housing costs, all as determined by  the council based on information from the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
[(4)] (5) “Minority” means an individual:
(a) Who has origins in one of the black racial groups of Africa but who is not Hispanic;
(b) Who is of Hispanic culture or origin;
(c) Who has origins in any of the original  peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian
subcontinent or the Pacific Islands; or
(d) Who is an American  Indian or Alaskan Native having origins in one of the original peoples
of North America.
[(5)] (6) “Organization” means a:
(a) Nonprofit corporation established under ORS chapter 65;
(b) Housing authority established under ORS 456.055 to 456.235; or
(c) Local government as defined in ORS 197.015.
[(6)] (7) “Persons with disabilities” means persons with handicaps described in 42  U.S.C. 3602(h).
[(7)] (8) “Very low income” means income that is 50 percent or less of  the median family income
for the area,  subject to adjustment for areas with unusually high or low incomes or housing costs,
all as determined by the council based on information from the United States Department of Housing
and Urban Development.
[(8)] (9) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 458.650 is amended to read:
458.650. (1) The Emergency Housing Account shall be administered by the  Housing and Com-
munity Services Department to assist homeless persons and those persons who are at risk of be-
coming homeless. An  amount equal to 25 percent of moneys deposited in the account pursuant to
ORS 294.187 is  dedicated for expenditure for providing affordable housing and  for assistance to
veterans who are homeless or at risk of becoming homeless. For purposes  of this section,
[2]
HB 3357
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
“account” means the Emergency Housing Account.
(2) The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall  develop policy for awarding grants to organiza-
tions that shall use the funds to  provide to low and very low income persons, including but not
limited to[ ,] persons more than 65 years of age, persons with disabilities, farmworkers and Native
Americans:
(a) Emergency shelters and attendant services;
(b) Transitional housing services designed to assist persons to  make the transition from
homelessness to permanent housing and economic independence;
(c) Supportive housing  services to enable persons to continue living in their own homes or to
provide in-home services for such persons for whom suitable  programs do not exist in their ge-
ographic area;
(d) Programs that provide emergency payment of home payments, rents or utilities; or
(e) Some or all of the needs described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection.
(3)(a) The council shall require as a condition of awarding a grant that  the organization dem-
onstrate to the satisfaction of the council that the organization has the capacity to deliver  any
service proposed by the organization.
(b) Any funds granted under this section  shall not be used to replace existing funds. Funds
granted under this section may be used to supplement existing  funds. An organization may use funds
to support existing programs or to establish new programs.
(c) The council, by policy, shall give preference  in granting funds to those organizations that
coordinate services with those programs established under ORS 458.625.
(4) The department may expend funds from the account  for administration of the account as
provided for in the legislatively approved  budget, as that term is defined in ORS 291.002, for the
department.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 458.655 is amended to read:
458.655. (1) The Home Ownership Assistance Account shall be  administered by the Housing and
Community Services Department to  expand this state’s supply of homeownership housing for low and
very low income families and individuals, including, but not limited to, persons over 65 years of  age,
persons with  disabilities, minorities, veterans and farmworkers. An amount equal to 25 percent of
moneys deposited in the account pursuant to ORS  294.187 is dedicated for expenditure to provide
affordable housing and to expand this state’s supply  of homeownership housing for low and very
low income veterans and families of veterans. The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall  have a
policy  of  distributing funds statewide while concentrating funds in those areas of this state with the
greatest  need,  as determined by the council, for low and very low income homeownership housing.
However, the council’s policy of distributing  funds may differ from the distribution policy for the
Housing Development and Guarantee Account.
(2) Funds in the Home Ownership  Assistance Account shall be granted to organizations that
both sponsor and manage low income homeownership programs,  including lease-to-own programs, for
the construction of new homeownership housing or for the acquisition or rehabilitation  of existing
structures for homeownership housing for persons of low or very low income, or both.
(3) The council shall develop a policy for disbursing grants for any or all of  the following pur-
poses:
(a) To aid low income homeownership programs, including program  administration, in purchas-
ing land, providing assistance with down payment costs, or providing  homeownership training and
qualification services or any  combination thereof. Funds in the Home Ownership Assistance Account
[3]
HB 3357
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
may not be used by an organization to pay for its general operations or to pay for  more than 25
percent of construction or rehabilitation costs.
(b) To match  public and private moneys available from other sources for purposes of the pro-
vision of low or very low income homeownership housing.
(c) To administer the Home Ownership Assistance Account as provided  for in the legislatively
approved budget, as that term is defined in ORS 291.002, for the department.
(4) The council, in developing policy  under subsection (3) of this section, shall give preference
in making grants to those entities that propose to:
(a) Provide the greatest number of low and very low income  homeownership housing units con-
structed, acquired or rehabilitated for the amount of account money expended by matching  account
funds with other grant, loan or eligible in-kind contributions;
(b) Ensure the  longest use for the units as low or very low income homeownership housing units,
such as by including some form of equity recapture, land trust or  shared equity provisions, as de-
termined by the council;
(c) Include social services for occupants and proposed occupants of the proposed  housing, in-
cluding but not limited to[ ,] programs that address  home health care, mental health care, alcohol
and drug treatment and post-treatment care, child  care, homeownership training, mortgage quali-
fication service, credit repair and case management; and
(d) Support a comprehensive  strategy to reverse the decreasing rates of homeownership among
minorities, giving priority to activities that support adopted comprehensive community plans  that
incorporate recognized best  practices or demonstrate proven success in increasing homeownership
for minorities.
SECTION 5.  ORS 458.665 is amended to read:
458.665. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall administer  the General
Housing Account.
(2) The department shall disburse moneys credited to the  account to accomplish the purposes
described in ORS 456.515 to 456.725, except that 25 percent of moneys deposited in the  account
pursuant to ORS 294.187 is dedicated for expenditure to provide affordable housing and  to meet
the critical housing needs of veterans in this state.
(3) The department may disburse moneys in the account by contract, grant,  loan or otherwise
as the department determines necessary.
(4) The department may set interest rates on loans made with moneys in the account.
(5) The department shall establish guidelines for the types of  loans financed with moneys in the
account by rule.
(6) The department may use moneys in the account to pay allowable administrative expenses
incurred under ORS 456.515 to 456.725.
(7) The department may, in the director’s discretion, return moneys received for deposit in  the
account to the original source of the moneys.
(8) The department may accept moneys for deposit in the account pursuant to ORS  458.620 (4)
and enter into agreements regarding the use of moneys deposited with  the original source of the
moneys.
(9) The department shall adopt rules that:
(a) Subject to subsection (2) of this  section, govern the allocation of moneys deposited in the
account to best meet critical  housing needs and build organizational capacity of partners throughout
this state; and
[4]
HB 3357
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
(b) Consistent with subsection (10) of  this section, require equitable distribution of resources
over  time based on objective measures of need, including the number and percentage of low and very
low income households in an area.
(10) The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall adopt a  policy that provides for distribution by
the department of account moneys and account investment revenue statewide while  concentrating
account moneys and  account investment revenue in those areas of this state with the greatest need,
as determined by the council, for housing for persons with a low or very low income.
SECTION 6.  ORS 306.815 is amended to read:
306.815. (1) A city, county, district or other political subdivision  or municipal corporation of this
state shall not impose, by ordinance or other law, a tax or fee upon the  transfer of a fee estate in
real property, or measured  by the consideration paid or received upon transfer of a fee estate in real
property.
(2) A tax or fee upon the transfer of a fee estate in real  property does not include any fee or
charge that becomes due or payable at the time of transfer of a fee estate in  real property, unless
that fee or charge is imposed upon the right, privilege or act of transferring title to real property.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any fee established under ORS 203.148.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not  apply to any tax if the ordinance or other law im-
posing the tax is in effect and operative on March 31, 1997.
(5) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any tax or fee that is imposed  upon the
transfer of a fee estate in real property if the fee that is  imposed under ORS 205.323, for the re-
cording or filing of the instrument conveying the real  property being transferred, is less than [ $32]
$52.
SECTION 7.
The amendments to ORS 205.323,  306.815, 458.610, 458.650, 458.655 and 458.665
by sections 1 to 6 of this 2017 Act apply to moneys deposited in the  Emergency Housing Ac-
count, the Home  Ownership Assistance Account and the General Housing Account on or af-
ter the effective date of this 2017 Act.
[5]