Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 475C.453 is amended to read:
475C.453. (1)(a) Except as expressly authorized by this section, the authority to impose  a tax or
fee on the production,  processing or sale of marijuana items in this state is vested solely in the
Legislative Assembly.
(b) Except  as expressly authorized by this section, a county, city or other municipal corporation
or district may not adopt or enact ordinances imposing a tax or  fee on the production, processing
or sale of marijuana items in this state.
(2) Subject to subsection (4) of  this section, the governing body of a city or county may adopt
an ordinance to be referred to  the electors of the city or county as described in subsection (3) of
this section that imposes a tax or a fee  on the sale of marijuana items that are sold in the area
subject to the jurisdiction of the city or the unincorporated area subject to the jurisdiction  of a
county by a marijuana retailer that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.097.
(3) If the governing body of a city or county adopts an ordinance under  this section, the gov-
erning body shall  refer the measure of the ordinance to the electors of the city or county for ap-
proval at the next statewide general election.
(4) An ordinance adopted under this section may not impose a tax or fee:
(a) In excess of [ three] 10 percent; or
(b) On a registry identification cardholder or on a designated  primary caregiver who is pur-
chasing a marijuana item for a registry identification cardholder.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 475C.453 by  section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to taxes
imposed on marijuana items sold on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 475C.670  to
475C.734.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1324
SB 570
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
SECTION 4.
(1) If  the governing body of a city by ordinance imposes or increases a tax
or fee on the sale of marijuana items,  20 percent of the proceeds of the tax or fee collected
shall be transferred to the county in which the retail establishment  collecting the tax is lo-
cated.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies only to:
(a) Cities located in counties that are eligible under ORS 475C.726 (3)(c)  to receive
transfers from the Oregon Marijuana Account; and
(b) A tax or fee that is newly enacted after the effective  date of this 2025 Act or that
amount that is attributable to a tax or fee increase enacted  after the effective date of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]