Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 317A.123 is amended to read:
317A.123. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible pharmacy” means  a pharmacy that has nine or fewer locations under common
ownership in this state or a critical access pharmacy, as defined by the Oregon Health  Au-
thority by rule for purposes related to the Oregon Prescription Drug  Program . “Eligible
pharmacy” does not include a pharmacy that caters primarily to veterinary customers.
(b) “Pharmacy” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.005.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 317A.100, amounts received by an eligible pharmacy in receipt for  the
sale of prescription drugs are excluded from the definition of commercial activity and are  exempt
from the tax imposed under ORS 317A.116.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS  317A.123 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1167