Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 414.025, as amended by section 5, chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
414.025. As used in this chapter and ORS chapters 411 and 413,  unless the context or a specially
applicable statutory definition requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Alternative payment methodology” means a  payment other than a fee-for-services pay-
ment, used by coordinated care organizations as compensation for the provision of integrated  and
coordinated health care and services.
(b) “Alternative payment methodology” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Shared savings arrangements;
(B) Bundled payments; and
(C) Payments based on episodes.
(2) “Behavioral health assessment” means an evaluation  by a behavioral health clinician, in
person or using telemedicine, to determine a patient’s need for immediate crisis stabilization.
(3) “Behavioral health clinician” means:
(a) A licensed psychiatrist;
(b) A licensed psychologist;
(c) A licensed nurse practitioner with a specialty in psychiatric mental health;
(d) A licensed clinical social worker;
(e) A licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist;
(f) A certified clinical social work associate;
(g) An intern or resident who  is working under a board-approved supervisory contract in a
clinical mental health field; or
(h) Any other clinician whose  authorized scope of practice includes mental health diagnosis and
treatment.
(4) “Behavioral health crisis” means a disruption in an individual’s  mental or emotional stability
or functioning resulting in an urgent need for immediate outpatient treatment  in an emergency de-
partment or admission to a hospital to prevent a serious deterioration in the individual’s  mental or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1650
HB 3773
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
physical health.
(5) “Behavioral health home” means a mental health disorder or substance use  disorder treat-
ment organization, as defined by the  Oregon Health Authority by rule, that provides integrated
health care to individuals whose primary diagnoses are mental health disorders or  substance use
disorders.
(6) “Category of aid” means assistance provided by the Oregon Supplemental  Income Program,
aid granted under ORS 411.877 to 411.896 and 412.001 to 412.069  or federal Supplemental Security
Income payments.
(7) “Community health worker” means an individual who meets  qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in an  urban or rural community, either for pay or as a volunteer in association with
a local health care system;
(c) To  the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health  and increases the capacity of the
community to meet the health care needs of its residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides  health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services such as first aid or blood pressure screening.
(8) “Coordinated care organization” means an organization meeting criteria adopted by the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.572.
(9) “Dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid” means, with respect to eligibility for enrollment
in a  coordinated care organization, that an individual is eligible for health services funded by Title
XIX of the Social Security Act and is:
(a) Eligible for or enrolled in Part A of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; or
(b) Enrolled in Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.
(10)(a) “Family support specialist” means an individual who meets  qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who provides supportive services to and  has experience
parenting a child who:
(A) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(B) Is facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and  wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “family support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
(11) “Global budget” means a total amount established prospectively  by the Oregon Health Au-
thority to be paid to a coordinated care organization for the delivery  of, management of, access to
and quality of the health care delivered to members of the coordinated care organization.
(12) “Health insurance exchange” or “exchange” means an American Health  Benefit Exchange
described in 42 U.S.C. 18031, 18032, 18033 and 18041.
(13) “Health services” means at least so much of each of the following as are funded by  the
Legislative Assembly based upon the prioritized  list of health services compiled by the Health Evi-
dence Review Commission under ORS 414.690:
(a) Services  required by federal law to be included in the state’s medical assistance program in
[2]
HB 3773
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
order for the program to qualify for federal funds;
(b) Services  provided by a physician as defined in ORS 677.010, a nurse practitioner licensed
under ORS 678.375, a behavioral health clinician or other licensed practitioner  within the scope of
the practitioner’s practice as defined by state law, and ambulance services;
(c) Prescription drugs;
(d) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(e) Medical equipment and supplies;
(f) Mental health services;
(g) Chemical dependency services;
(h) Emergency dental services;
(i) Nonemergency dental services;
(j) Provider  services, other than services described in paragraphs (a) to (i), (k), (L) and (m) of
this subsection, defined by federal law that may be included in the state’s  medical assistance pro-
gram;
(k) Emergency hospital services;
(L) Outpatient hospital services; and
(m) Inpatient hospital services.
(14) “Income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704.
(15)(a) “Integrated health care” means care provided to individuals and their families in  a pa-
tient centered primary care home or behavioral health home by licensed primary care clinicians,
behavioral health clinicians and other care team members, working together to address one or more
of the following:
(A) Mental illness.
(B) Substance use disorders.
(C) Health behaviors that contribute to chronic illness.
(D) Life stressors and crises.
(E) Developmental risks and conditions.
(F) Stress-related physical symptoms.
(G) Preventive care.
(H) Ineffective patterns of health care utilization.
(b) As used in this subsection, “other care team members” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Qualified mental health professionals or  qualified mental health associates meeting require-
ments adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule;
(B) Peer wellness specialists;
(C) Peer support specialists;
(D) Community health workers who have completed a state-certified training program;
(E) Personal health navigators; or
(F) Other qualified individuals approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
(16) “Investments and savings” means  cash, securities as defined in ORS 59.015, negotiable in-
struments as defined in ORS 73.0104 and such similar investments or savings  as the department or
the authority may establish by rule  that are available to the applicant or recipient to contribute
toward meeting the needs of the applicant or recipient.
(17) “Medical assistance” means so much of the medical,  mental health, preventive, supportive,
palliative and remedial care and services as may be prescribed by the  authority according to the
standards established pursuant to ORS  414.065, including premium assistance under ORS 414.115 and
[3]
HB 3773
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
414.117, payments made for services provided under an insurance or other contractual arrangement
and money paid directly to the recipient for the purchase of health services and for services  de-
scribed in ORS 414.710.
(18) “Medical assistance”  includes any care or services for any individual who is a patient in
a medical  institution or any care or services for any individual who has attained 65 years of age
or is under 22 years of age, and who is a patient in a  private or public institution for mental dis-
eases. Except as provided in ORS 411.439 and 411.447, “medical assistance” does not include  care
or services for a resident of a nonmedical public institution.
(19) “Patient centered primary care home” means a health  care team or clinic that is organized
in accordance with the standards established by the Oregon  Health Authority under ORS 414.655
and that incorporates the following core attributes:
(a) Access to care;
(b) Accountability to consumers and to the community;
(c) Comprehensive whole person care;
(d) Continuity of care;
(e) Coordination and integration of care; and
(f) Person and family centered care.
(20) “Peer support specialist” means any  of the following individuals who meet qualification
criteria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and  who provide supportive services to a cur-
rent or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment:
(a) An individual who is a current or former consumer of mental health treatment; or
(b) An individual who is in recovery, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, from
an addiction disorder.
(21) “Peer wellness specialist” means an  individual who meets qualification criteria adopted by
the authority under ORS 414.665 and who is responsible for assessing  mental health and substance
use disorder service and support needs of a member of a coordinated care organization through
community outreach, assisting members  with access to available services and resources, addressing
barriers to services and providing education and information about available resources for  individ-
uals with mental health  or substance use disorders in order to reduce stigma and discrimination
toward consumers of mental health and substance use disorder services and to assist  the member
in creating and maintaining recovery, health and wellness.
(22) “Person centered care” means care that:
(a) Reflects the individual patient’s strengths and preferences;
(b) Reflects the clinical needs  of the patient as identified through an individualized assessment;
and
(c) Is based upon the patient’s goals and will assist the patient in achieving the goals.
(23) “Personal health navigator” means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who  provides information, assistance, tools and support to
enable a patient to make the  best health care decisions in the patient’s particular circumstances and
in light of the patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions and desired outcomes.
(24) “Prepaid managed care health services organization” means a managed  dental care, mental
health or chemical  dependency organization that contracts with the authority under ORS 414.654
or with a coordinated  care organization on a prepaid capitated basis to provide health services to
medical assistance recipients.
(25) “Quality measure” means the health outcome and quality measures and benchmarks  identi-
[4]
HB 3773
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
fied by the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee and the metrics  and scoring subcommittee in
accordance with ORS 413.017 (4) and  413.022 and the quality metrics developed by the Behavioral
Health Committee in accordance with ORS 413.017 (5).
(26)(a) “Quality of life in general measure”  means an assessment of the value, effectiveness or
cost-effectiveness of a treatment that gives greater value to a year of life lived in perfect health than
the value given to a year of life lived in less than perfect health.
(b) “Quality of life in general measure” does not  mean an assessment of the value, effectiveness
or cost-effectiveness of a treatment during a clinical trial in which a study participant is  asked to
rate the participant’s physical function, pain, general  health, vitality, social functions or other sim-
ilar domains.
(27) “Resources” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704.  For eligibility purposes, “re-
sources” does not include charitable contributions raised by a community  to assist with medical
expenses.
(28) “Social determinants of health” means:
(a) Nonmedical factors that influence health outcomes;
(b) The conditions in which individuals are born, grow, work, live and age; and
(c) The forces and systems  that shape the conditions of daily life, such as economic policies and
systems, development agendas, social norms, social policies, racism, climate  change and political
systems.
(29) “Tribal traditional health worker” means an individual who meets qualification  criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in a tribal community or an urban Indian community, either for pay or as a volunteer
in association with a local health care system;
(c) To  the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health, including physical, behavioral and
oral health, and increases the capacity of the community to meet the health  care needs of its resi-
dents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the  individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services, such as tribal-based practices.
(30) “Veteran-specific personal health navigator” means an  individual who meets quali-
fication criteria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in a veteran community, either for pay or as  a volunteer in association with
a local health care system;
(c) To the  extent practicable, shares culture, language, socioeconomic status and life
experiences with individuals of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists  members of the community to improve their health, including physical, be-
havioral and oral health, and increases the capacity of the community to meet its health care
needs and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and  information that is culturally appropriate to the indi-
[5]
HB 3773
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
viduals being served;
(f) Assists the community in receiving the care they need; and
(g) May provide information, assistance, tools and support to enable  a patient to make
the best health care decisions in the patient’s particular circumstances  in light of the
patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions and desired outcomes.
[(30)(a)] (31)(a) “Youth support specialist” means an individual who meets  qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and  who, based on a similar life experience, provides
supportive services to an individual who:
(A) Is not older than 30 years of age; and
(B)(i) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(ii) Is  facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “youth support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 414.025, as amended by section 2,  chapter 628, Oregon Laws 2021, and section
6, chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
414.025. As used in this chapter and ORS chapters 411 and 413,  unless the context or a specially
applicable statutory definition requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Alternative payment methodology” means a  payment other than a fee-for-services pay-
ment, used by coordinated care organizations as compensation for the provision of integrated  and
coordinated health care and services.
(b) “Alternative payment methodology” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Shared savings arrangements;
(B) Bundled payments; and
(C) Payments based on episodes.
(2) “Behavioral health assessment” means an evaluation  by a behavioral health clinician, in
person or using telemedicine, to determine a patient’s need for immediate crisis stabilization.
(3) “Behavioral health clinician” means:
(a) A licensed psychiatrist;
(b) A licensed psychologist;
(c) A licensed nurse practitioner with a specialty in psychiatric mental health;
(d) A licensed clinical social worker;
(e) A licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist;
(f) A certified clinical social work associate;
(g) An intern or resident who  is working under a board-approved supervisory contract in a
clinical mental health field; or
(h) Any other clinician whose  authorized scope of practice includes mental health diagnosis and
treatment.
(4) “Behavioral health crisis” means a disruption in an individual’s  mental or emotional stability
or functioning resulting in an urgent need for immediate outpatient treatment  in an emergency de-
partment or admission to a hospital to prevent a serious deterioration in the individual’s  mental or
physical  health.
(5) “Behavioral health home” means a mental health disorder or substance use  disorder treat-
ment organization, as defined by the  Oregon Health Authority by rule, that provides integrated
health care to individuals whose primary diagnoses are mental health disorders or  substance use
disorders.
[6]
HB 3773
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) “Category of aid” means assistance provided by the Oregon Supplemental  Income Program,
aid granted under ORS 411.877 to 411.896 and 412.001 to 412.069  or federal Supplemental Security
Income payments.
(7) “Community health worker” means an individual who meets  qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in an  urban or rural community, either for pay or as a volunteer in association with
a local health care system;
(c) To  the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health  and increases the capacity of the
community to meet the health care needs of its residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides  health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services such as first aid or blood pressure screening.
(8) “Coordinated care organization” means an organization meeting criteria adopted by the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.572.
(9) “Dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid” means, with respect to eligibility for enrollment
in a  coordinated care organization, that an individual is eligible for health services funded by Title
XIX of the Social Security Act and is:
(a) Eligible for or enrolled in Part A of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; or
(b) Enrolled in Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.
(10)(a) “Family support specialist” means an individual who meets  qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who provides supportive services to and  has experience
parenting a child who:
(A) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(B) Is facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and  wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “family support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
(11) “Global budget” means a total amount established prospectively  by the Oregon Health Au-
thority to be paid to a coordinated care organization for the delivery  of, management of, access to
and quality of the health care delivered to members of the coordinated care organization.
(12) “Health insurance exchange” or “exchange” means an American Health  Benefit Exchange
described in 42 U.S.C. 18031, 18032, 18033 and 18041.
(13) “Health services” means at least so much of each of the following as are funded by  the
Legislative Assembly based upon the prioritized  list of health services compiled by the Health Evi-
dence Review Commission under ORS 414.690:
(a) Services  required by federal law to be included in the state’s medical assistance program in
order for the program to qualify for federal funds;
(b) Services  provided by a physician as defined in ORS 677.010, a nurse practitioner licensed
under ORS 678.375, a behavioral health clinician or other licensed practitioner  within the scope of
the practitioner’s practice as defined by state law, and ambulance services;
(c) Prescription drugs;
[7]
HB 3773
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(e) Medical equipment and supplies;
(f) Mental health services;
(g) Chemical dependency services;
(h) Emergency dental services;
(i) Nonemergency dental services;
(j) Provider  services, other than services described in paragraphs (a) to (i), (k), (L) and (m) of
this subsection, defined by federal law that may be included in the state’s  medical assistance pro-
gram;
(k) Emergency hospital services;
(L) Outpatient hospital services; and
(m) Inpatient hospital services.
(14) “Income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704.
(15)(a) “Integrated health care” means care provided to individuals and their families in  a pa-
tient centered primary care home or behavioral health home by licensed primary care clinicians,
behavioral health clinicians and other care team members, working together to address one or more
of the following:
(A) Mental illness.
(B) Substance use disorders.
(C) Health behaviors that contribute to chronic illness.
(D) Life stressors and crises.
(E) Developmental risks and conditions.
(F) Stress-related physical symptoms.
(G) Preventive care.
(H) Ineffective patterns of health care utilization.
(b) As used in this subsection, “other care team members” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Qualified mental health professionals or  qualified mental health associates meeting require-
ments adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule;
(B) Peer wellness specialists;
(C) Peer support specialists;
(D) Community health workers who have completed a state-certified training program;
(E) Personal health navigators; or
(F) Other qualified individuals approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
(16) “Investments and savings” means  cash, securities as defined in ORS 59.015, negotiable in-
struments as defined in ORS 73.0104 and such similar investments or savings  as the department or
the authority may establish by rule  that are available to the applicant or recipient to contribute
toward meeting the needs of the applicant or recipient.
(17) “Medical assistance” means so much of the medical,  mental health, preventive, supportive,
palliative and remedial care and services as may be prescribed by the  authority according to the
standards established pursuant to ORS  414.065, including premium assistance under ORS 414.115 and
414.117, payments made for services provided under an insurance or other contractual arrangement
and money paid directly to the recipient for the purchase of health services and for services  de-
scribed in ORS 414.710.
(18) “Medical assistance”  includes any care or services for any individual who is a patient in
a medical  institution or any care or services for any individual who has attained 65 years of age
[8]
HB 3773
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or is under 22 years of age, and who is a patient in a  private or public institution for mental dis-
eases. Except as provided in ORS 411.439 and 411.447, “medical assistance” does not include  care
or services for a resident of a nonmedical public institution.
(19) “Mental health drug” means a type of legend drug, as defined  in ORS 414.325, specified by
the Oregon Health Authority by rule, including but not limited to:
(a) Therapeutic class 7 ataractics-tranquilizers; and
(b) Therapeutic class 11 psychostimulants-antidepressants.
(20) “Patient centered primary care home” means a health  care team or clinic that is organized
in accordance with the standards established  by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.655
and that incorporates the following core attributes:
(a) Access to care;
(b) Accountability to consumers and to the community;
(c) Comprehensive whole person care;
(d) Continuity of care;
(e) Coordination and integration of care; and
(f) Person and family centered care.
(21) “Peer support specialist” means any of the  following individuals who meet qualification
criteria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665  and who provide supportive services to a cur-
rent or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment:
(a) An individual who is a current or former consumer of mental health treatment; or
(b) An individual who is in recovery, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, from
an addiction disorder.
(22) “Peer wellness specialist” means an individual who  meets qualification criteria adopted by
the authority under ORS 414.665  and who is responsible for assessing mental health and substance
use disorder service and support needs of a member of a coordinated care organization through
community outreach, assisting members with access to available services  and resources, addressing
barriers  to  services and providing education and information about available resources for individ-
uals with mental health or substance use disorders in order to reduce  stigma and discrimination
toward consumers of  mental health and substance use disorder services and to assist the member
in creating and maintaining recovery, health and wellness.
(23) “Person centered care” means care that:
(a) Reflects the individual patient’s strengths and preferences;
(b) Reflects the clinical needs of the patient as identified  through an individualized assessment;
and
(c) Is based upon the patient’s goals and will assist the patient in achieving the goals.
(24) “Personal health navigator” means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who  provides information, assistance, tools and support to
enable a patient to make the  best health care decisions in the patient’s particular circumstances and
in light of the patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions and desired outcomes.
(25) “Prepaid managed care health services organization” means a managed  dental care, mental
health or chemical dependency organization that contracts with the authority under  ORS 414.654
or with a coordinated care organization on a prepaid capitated basis to provide  health services to
medical assistance recipients.
(26) “Quality  measure” means the health outcome and quality measures and benchmarks identi-
fied by the Health Plan  Quality Metrics Committee and the metrics and scoring subcommittee in
[9]
HB 3773
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
accordance with ORS 413.017 (4) and 413.022 and the quality  metrics developed by the Behavioral
Health Committee in accordance with ORS 413.017 (5).
(27)(a) “Quality of life in general measure” means an  assessment of the value, effectiveness or
cost-effectiveness of a treatment that gives greater value to a year of life lived in perfect health than
the value given to a year of life lived in less than perfect health.
(b) “Quality of life in general measure” does not  mean an assessment of the value, effectiveness
or cost-effectiveness of  a treatment during a clinical trial in which a study participant is asked to
rate the participant’s physical function, pain, general health,  vitality, social functions or other sim-
ilar domains.
(28) “Resources” has the meaning  given that term in ORS 411.704. For eligibility purposes, “re-
sources” does not include charitable  contributions raised by a community to assist with medical
expenses.
(29) “Social determinants of health” means:
(a) Nonmedical factors that influence health outcomes;
(b) The conditions in which individuals are born, grow, work, live and age; and
(c) The forces and systems  that shape the conditions of daily life, such as economic policies and
systems, development agendas, social  norms, social policies, racism, climate change and political
systems.
(30) “Tribal  traditional health worker” means an individual who meets qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in a tribal community or an urban Indian community, either for pay or as a volunteer
in association with a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life  experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health, including physical, behavioral and
oral health, and increases the capacity  of the community to meet the health care needs of its resi-
dents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides  health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services, such as tribal-based practices.
(31) “Veteran-specific personal health navigator”  means an individual who meets quali-
fication criteria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in a veteran community,  either for pay or as a volunteer in association with
a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares culture, language, socioeconomic status  and life
experiences with individuals of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health, including physical,  be-
havioral and oral health, and increases the capacity of the community to meet its health care
needs and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally  appropriate to the indi-
viduals being served;
[10]
HB 3773
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
(f) Assists the community in receiving the care they need; and
(g) May provide information, assistance,  tools and support to enable a patient to make
the best health care decisions  in the patient’s particular circumstances in light of the
patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions and desired outcomes.
[(31)(a)] (32)(a) “Youth  support specialist” means an individual who meets qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who,  based on a similar life experience, provides
supportive services to an individual who:
(A) Is not older than 30 years of age; and
(B)(i) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(ii) Is facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness services  due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “youth support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 414.665 is amended to read:
414.665. (1) As used in this section, “traditional health worker” includes any of the following:
(a) A community health worker.
(b) A personal health navigator.
(c) A peer wellness specialist.
(d) A peer support specialist.
(e) A doula.
(f) A tribal traditional health worker.
(g) A veteran-specific personal health navigator.
(2) In consultation with  the Traditional Health Workers Commission established under ORS
413.600, the Oregon Health Authority, for purposes  related to the regulation of traditional health
workers, shall adopt by rule:
(a) The qualification criteria, including  education and training requirements, for the traditional
health workers utilized by coordinated care organizations;
(b) Appropriate professional designations for supervisors of the traditional health workers; and
(c) Processes by which other occupational classifications may be approved to supervise the  tra-
ditional health workers.
(3) The criteria and requirements established under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Must be broad enough to encompass the  potential unique needs of any coordinated care or-
ganization;
(b) Must meet requirements of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services  to qualify for
federal financial participation; and
(c) May not require certification by the Home Care Commission.
[11]