Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 576.715 to
576.744.
SECTION 2. The Oregon Seed Certification Service of Oregon State University shall:
(1) Periodically produce an Oregon Seed Certification Handbook that, among other things,
describes certified seed; and
(2) Make the handbook available to the public.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 576.715 is amended to read:
576.715. As used in ORS 576.715 to 576.744:
(1) “Agricultural seed” means grass seed of a type commonly sold for use in turf lawns or as
forage seed.
(2) “Authenticate” has the meaning given that term in ORS 79.0102.
(3) “Producer” means a person that grows agricultural seed in this state on a  commercial basis
for a seed dealer.
(4) “Quality standard” means certified seed as  described in the most current version of
the Oregon Seed Certification  Handbook produced by the Oregon Seed Certification Service
of Oregon State University.
[(4)] (5) “Seed bailment contract” means a seed production  contract under which the seed dealer
retains title to all seed, seed stock and plant life grown or used by  the producer under the terms
of the contract.
[(5)] (6) “Seed dealer” means a person that in the  ordinary course of business contracts to buy
agricultural seed grown in this state by a producer or contracts with a producer for the growing
of agricultural seed in this state.
[(6)] (7) “Seed delivery” means the date on which the seed grower delivers grass seed to the seed
dealer pursuant to a notice from the dealer.
[(7)] (8) “Seed grower” means a person  that grows grass seed in this state on a commercial basis
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1431
HB 2231
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
without entering into a contract with a seed dealer prior to harvesting of the seed.
[(8)] (9) “Seed production contract” means a written agreement between a  producer and a seed
dealer for the growing of agricultural seed in this state.
[(9)] (10)  “Seed purchase contract” means a written agreement for a seed dealer to  purchase
grass seed  that has been grown by a seed grower. “Seed purchase contract” does not include a seed
production  contract.
[(10)] (11) “Variety Not Stated Seed” means agricultural  seed that is sold in unmarked plastic
bags or other unmarked containers without any reference to a variety name for the seed.
[2]