Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “cannabis” includes hemp and marijuana.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture shall advance the design of standards and iden-
tification of pilot sites for the implementation of a cannabis business certification program.
(3) The cannabis business  certification program must promote market-based approaches
that create incentives for cannabis  business operations to use low-carbon cultivation tech-
niques that use energy and water efficiently.
(4) The department may contract  with a third-party nonprofit organization that has
technical expertise in the measurement of and best  practices associated with energy and
water usage in cannabis businesses.
SECTION 2. The Oregon Liquor Control  Commission shall allocate to the State Depart-
ment of Agriculture, for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, out of the Marijuana Control and
Regulation Fund established under ORS 475B.296, the  amount of $150,000 for the purposes
described in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission  and the State Department of Agriculture may
take any action before the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section that is
necessary to enable the commission and the department to exercise, on and after the  oper-
ative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the commission and the department by sections 1 and 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1761