Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 6 of this 2018 Act:
(1) “Construction contractor” means a person holding a license endorsement listed  under
ORS 701.021 (2)(a) to (c).
(2)(a) “Energy improvement  project” means construction, reconstruction, alteration or
repair that:
(A) Reduces the energy  requirements of a residential structure through energy conser-
vation or increased energy efficiency;
(B) Replaces, or extends the economic life of, a manufactured dwelling  or makes im-
provements to the water or sewer systems serving the manufactured dwelling, as provided
under section 6 of this 2018 Act;
(C) Generates energy for a residential structure through solar technology; or
(D) Creates all or part of a solar technology system serving a community.
(b) “Energy improvement project” does not include a project related to:
(A) Ground-source heat pumps;
(B) Swimming pool heating; or
(C) Hot tubs or spas.
(3) “Low income”  and “very low income” have the meanings given those terms in ORS
458.610.
(4) “Median income” means the median family  income for an area, subject to adjustment
for areas having unusually high or low incomes or housing costs, all as determined  by the
Oregon Housing Stability Council based on information  from the United States Department
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 215
HB 4121
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of Housing and Urban Development.
(5) “Residential structure” has the meaning given that term in ORS 701.005.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall establish and
administer a program that:
(a) Provides incentive payments  under this section to construction contractors under-
taking energy improvement projects;
(b) Provides funding for activities described in section 5 (2) of this 2018 Act; and
(c) Provides grants for energy improvement projects under section 6 of this 2018 Act.
(2) The department shall  determine the incentive payment for an energy improvement
project under this section by multiplying a payment rate by the number of units  of increased
energy efficiency or energy generation resulting  from the project. For an improvement
project that  reduces electrical energy requirements, the units of increased energy efficiency
shall be  determined based on the projected reduction in electrical energy requirements
measured in kilowatt-hours. For an improvement project that reduces  natural gas energy
requirements, the units of increased energy efficiency shall be determined  based on the
projected reduction in natural gas energy requirements measured in therms. For an im-
provement project that reduces wood  or oil energy requirements, the units of increased en-
ergy efficiency shall be determined based on the  projected reduction in wood or oil energy
requirements measured in millions  of British thermal units (MMBTU). For an improvement
project that generates energy for a residential structure through solar technology  or creates
all or part of a  solar technology system serving a community, the units of increased energy
generation shall be determined based  on the amount of energy projected to be generated,
expressed in kilowatt-hours.
(3) The department shall establish payment rate schedules  by rule. The department shall
conduct a biennial review to determine  whether payment rate schedules should be modified.
The department shall adopt payment rate schedules that on  average pay incentives equal to
20 percent of the cost for an energy improvement project but  that provide higher payment
rates for energy improvement projects on properties owned  or occupied by persons or fami-
lies of median income, low income or very low income. If  the property owner had an adjusted
gross income for federal tax purposes during the most recently completed tax year of
$200,000 or more, the payment  rate for any energy improvement project on the property is
zero. The department shall condition incentive payments upon the property  owner verifying
by affidavit or other documentation that the adjusted  gross income of the property owner in
the most recently completed tax year was less than $200,000.
(4) The department shall develop and make  available means for a construction contractor
to readily estimate  the reduced energy requirements or amount of energy generation that
may be expected to result from an energy  improvement project and estimate the corre-
sponding incentive payment.  The contractor may monthly submit information to the de-
partment that includes a listing of incentive payment estimates for one or  more
improvement projects the contractor intends to carry out. The information  must be sub-
mitted in a form and manner  acceptable to the department. The contractor shall include the
amount of the estimated incentive payment for an improvement project as a line item on  a
written contract for the  improvement project. The contractor shall apply the full estimated
incentive payment amount to reduce the amount that would otherwise be owed by the prop-
erty owner under the contract.
[2]
HB 4121
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this  subsection, upon receipt of a form from a con-
struction contractor under subsection (4) of this section, the  department shall reserve
moneys for later disbursement as an incentive payment to the contractor for each  qualifying
energy improvement project listed on the form. The department may not reserve moneys  for
an incentive payment for  an improvement project if the estimated incentive payment is less
than $250. The department  shall remove the moneys for an incentive payment for an im-
provement project from reserve if the department does not receive proof, on or  before the
210th day after receiving information for the project under subsection (4) of this section, that
the improvement project has been completed. An incentive  payment for which moneys are
reserved is owed by the department upon  timely receipt of proof acceptable to the depart-
ment that the contractor has completed the improvement project. Incentive  payments for
which moneys are  not in reserve are contingent on the availability of funds and are inferior
in priority to any incentive payments for which moneys are in reserve. If the department
denies all or part of an  incentive payment due to the lack of available funds, the contractor
may not recover the denied portion of the incentive payment from the property owner.
SECTION 3.
(1) Except as provided  in sections 4 and 6 of this 2018 Act, the amount paid
from the program described in section 2 of this 2018 Act during  a calendar year for energy
improvement projects:
(a) For a single-family residence may not exceed $4,500; and
(b) For a multifamily residential structure may not exceed  $4,500 for a dwelling unit or
$45,000 total for the structure.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department may make incentive  payments
under section 2 of this 2018 Act for an energy improvement project for a rental dwelling unit
only if the landlord presents proof acceptable to the  department that the residential struc-
ture is affordable housing, as defined by the department, or is owned by  a nonprofit organ-
ization.
SECTION 4.
The amount paid from the program described in section 2 of this  2018 Act
for an energy improvement project that generates energy for a  residential structure through
solar technology or creates all or part of a solar technology  system serving a community
may not, for a single-family residence or a dwelling  unit in a multifamily residential struc-
ture, exceed:
(1) $4,500 during the 2018 calendar year;
(2) $3,000 during the 2019 calendar year;
(3) $2,000 during the 2020 calendar year; or
(4) $2,000 during the 2021 calendar year.
SECTION 5.
(1) As used in this section, “affordable  housing” includes, but is not limited
to, a residential structure owned and occupied by persons having  low income or very low
income.
(2) The  Housing and Community Services Department shall annually allocate at least 25
percent of the amount available for payment under the program described in  section 2 (1)
of this 2018 Act  for the purposes of maximizing energy efficiency, extending the usable life
of affordable housing and improving the health  and safety of occupants of affordable housing.
(3) The department may expend up to 90 percent of  the moneys allocated under sub-
section (2) of this section to:
(a) Develop improved methods for evaluating health hazards in affordable housing;
[3]
HB 4121
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Develop improved  methods for preventing or reducing health hazards in affordable
housing;
(c) Support the development of objective standards for  identifying healthy affordable
housing environments;
(d) Evaluate the long-term cost  effectiveness of activities described in paragraphs (a) to
(c) of this subsection; and
(e) Promote the incorporation of methods and standards for the development  of healthy
affordable housing environments into ongoing practices and systems, including,  but not lim-
ited to, practices and systems regarding fitness for habitation,  construction, rehabilitation
and maintenance of affordable housing.
SECTION 6. (1) Not less than 10 percent of the moneys that the Housing and Community
Services Department allocates under section  5 of this 2018 Act shall be expended in the form
of grants to replace, or extend the economic  lives of, manufactured dwellings owned and
occupied by persons of low income or very low income or to improve water or  sewer systems
serving manufactured dwellings owned and  occupied by persons of low income or very low
income. The department shall give grant preference to an  energy improvement project re-
garding a manufactured dwelling that:
(a) Was constructed prior to June 15, 1976; or
(b) Was constructed on or after June 15, 1976, and  prior to October 1, 1988, and is de-
termined by the department to be in serious disrepair.
(2) An existing or replacement manufactured dwelling for which a grant is  issued under
this section must:
(a) Be permanently installed at a site in accordance with federal  Manufactured Home
Construction and  Safety Standards (24 C.F.R. 3280) and HOME Investment Partnerships
Program property standards (24 C.F.R. 92.251);
(b) Unless subject to a rule described in subsection (5) of this section, be  located in a
manufactured dwelling park that is listed  in the department’s affordable housing portfolio
and is in good standing with the department; and
(c) Be owned by:
(A) A nonprofit organization;
(B) An entity having a nonprofit organization as its sole member;
(C) A public body as defined in ORS 174.109;
(D) An entity having a public body as its sole member; or
(E) An individual.
(3) If the energy  improvement project involves the replacement of a manufactured
dwelling:
(a) The replacement dwelling must meet or exceed the NEEM 2.0 energy efficiency spec-
ification established under the Northwest Energy Efficient Manufactured Home Program;
(b) The water  and sewer systems serving the dwelling must be in serviceable condition
or be improved in conjunction with the dwelling replacement; and
(c) The moneys  from a grant under this section may be expended for any purpose that
is related to the replacement of the dwelling, including, but not limited  to, the removal and
deconstruction of the replaced  dwelling and the purchase and installation of the replacement
dwelling.
(4) If  the energy improvement project does not involve the replacement of a manufac-
[4]
HB 4121
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
tured dwelling:
(a) The water  and sewer systems serving the dwelling must be in serviceable condition
or be improved in conjunction with the improvement project;
(b) The  manufactured dwelling must have at least 15 years of economic life remaining
immediately prior to the improvement project; and
(c) The savings resulting  from reduced energy requirements and other benefits of the
improvement project must exceed the cost of the improvement project.
(5) The department shall adopt rules establishing limits on grants for energy improve-
ment projects  under this section. The department shall cooperate with the Community
Action Partnership  of Oregon, or any successor to that organization, to identify reasonable
provisions for inclusion  in department rules regarding grants for improvement projects for
manufactured dwellings that are  sited on property having common ownership with the
dwelling.
SECTION 7. The amount of $18 million is established for  the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses by the Housing and Community Services
Department to carry out the program described in section 2 (1)  of this 2018 Act from any
moneys appropriated or otherwise provided for purposes of the program.
SECTION 8. The Housing and Community Services Department may  enter into intera-
gency agreements with other units of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111,  for the
purpose of facilitating the carrying out  of department programs that provide home
weatherization assistance.
SECTION 9. Section 10 of this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 470.
SECTION 10. The program  described in section 2 of this 2018 Act is a weatherization
program for purposes of referral to the  Housing and Community Services Department under
ORS 470.650.
SECTION 11. (1) Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 and 6 of this 2018 Act  are repealed January 2, 2022.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if the Housing and Community Services
Department reserves moneys  under section 2 of this 2018 Act on or before December 31, 2021,
for the purpose  of making an incentive payment to a construction contractor, the depart-
ment may make the incentive payment if the department receives proof, not later  than the
210th day after the department  receives the monthly form under section 2 (4) of this 2018
Act listing the energy improvement project, that the contractor has completed the project.
SECTION 12. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[5]