Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For biennia beginning on or after July  1, 2025, the aggregate amount au-
thorized for issuance of general obligation bonds under Article XI-G of  the Oregon Consti-
tution for projects at a single community college may not exceed $14,250,000.
SECTION 2.  Section 10, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  Notwithstanding any provision of law:
(1) General obligation bonds authorized to be issued under Article XI-G  of the Oregon Consti-
tution prior to January 1,  2013, for community college projects must be issued not later than June
30, 2015. Project approvals for general obligation bonds authorized to  be issued under Article XI-G
of the Oregon Constitution prior to January 1,  2013, for community college projects, expire on June
30, 2015.
(2) A community college  may not have more than one project approved for funding with general
obligation bonds authorized to be issued under Article XI-G of the Oregon  Constitution that is
awaiting matching funds, other than projects approved prior to January 1, 2013.
(3) A community college for which a project to be funded with general obligation  bonds au-
thorized to be issued under Article XI-G of the Oregon  Constitution is approved in this 2013 Act
may not request approval of an additional  project to be funded with general obligation bonds au-
thorized to be issued under Article XI-G  of the Oregon Constitution until the beginning of the reg-
ular session of the Legislative Assembly held in 2017, unless the community college withdraws  the
project approved under this 2013 Act.
[(4) For biennia beginning on or after July 1, 2015, the aggregate  amount authorized for issuance
of general obligation bonds  under Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution for projects at a single
community college may not exceed $8 million. ]
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3946
HB 3635
1
2
July 1, 2025.
[2]