Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In order to increase the number of health care providers who can  com-
municate fluently with patients in the patient’s language, the  Oregon Medical Board and the
Oregon State Board of Nursing shall, in  conjunction, establish a program to offer language
education to health care providers regulated by the boards.
(2) The boards shall collaborate, and may contract with  third parties as necessary, to
ensure that any forms required to be completed by a patient of a health care provider regu-
lated by the boards are available  in the patient’s first language or a language in which the
patient can comfortably communicate.
(3) The boards may determine by rule the specific languages in which to offer  the edu-
cation and the forms described in this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2402