Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.035 is amended to read:
336.035. (1)(a) [ The] A district school board shall [ see] ensure  that the courses of study  pre-
scribed by law and by the rules of the State Board of Education are carried out.
(b) [ The] A district school  board may establish supplemental courses that are not inconsistent
with the prescribed courses and may adopt courses of study in lieu of state courses  of study upon
approval by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(c) For each course of study offered  by a school district, the district school board shall
ensure that the curriculum of the course is made available to the public on the  school
district’s website.
(2) Any  district school board may establish a course of education concerning sexually transmit-
ted infections including recognition of causes, sources and symptoms, and the availability  of diag-
nostic and treatment centers. Any such course established may be  taught to adults from the
community served by the individual schools as well as to students  enrolled in the school. The board
shall cause the parents or guardians of minor students to  be notified in advance that the course is
to be taught. Any such parent or guardian may direct in writing that  the minor child in the care
of the parent  or guardian be excused from any class within the course. Any parent or guardian may
inspect the instructional materials to be used before or during the time the course is taught.
(3) The district school board shall coordinate the course provided in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion with the officials of the local health department and the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
Teachers holding endorsements for health education shall be used where available.  A teacher may
not be subject to discipline or removal for teaching or  refusing to teach courses concerning sexually
transmitted infections.
SECTION 2.
(1) A  district school board must first ensure compliance with the amend-
ments to ORS 336.035 by section 1 of this 2025 Act no later than August 15, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 606
HB 2368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  if a school district has an average daily
membership of 10,000 or less, the district  school board is not required to first ensure com-
pliance with the amendments to ORS 336.035 by section 1 of this 2025 Act until August 15,
2026.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]