Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Transportation shall prepare a report on the statutory
changes necessary to balance transportation cost responsibility  between light and heavy ve-
hicles. The department shall submit the report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
shall include recommendations for legislation, to the  Joint Committee on Transportation no
later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 122