Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife,  in consultation with the De-
partment of State Lands and the State Parks and Recreation Department, shall establish by
rule a grant program for the  purpose of encouraging the use of seaweed as feed for livestock.
(2) In administering the program, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife:
(a) Shall develop criteria for receiving a grant and a process for applying for  a grant; and
(b) May require a recipient  of a grant to report to the department on the use of the grant
funds.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for the
purpose of funding the grant program described in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on June 30, 2023.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3585