Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 10 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “Climate resilience” means the capability  to anticipate, prepare for, respond to and
recover from  significant climate-related threats with minimum damage to social well-being,
the economy and the environment.
(2) “Environmental justice community” has the meaning given  that term in ORS 182.535.
(3) “Natural and working lands” means:
(a) Lands:
(A) Actively used by an agricultural owner or operator for  an agricultural operation, in-
cluding but not limited to active engagement in farming or ranching;
(B) Producing forest products;
(C) Consisting of forests, woodlands, grasslands, sagebrush steppes, deserts,  freshwater
and riparian systems, wetlands, coastal and estuarine  areas or the submerged and
submersible lands within Oregon’s territorial sea and marine  habitats associated with those
lands;
(D) Used for  recreational purposes, including, but not limited to, parks, trails, greenbelts
and other similar open space lands; or
(E) Consisting of trees, other vegetation and soils in urban and near-urban  areas, in-
cluding, but not limited to, urban watersheds,  street trees, park trees, residential trees and
riparian habitats; and
(b) Lands described in paragraph (a) of this subsection that are:
(A) Held in trust by the United States for the benefit  of any of the nine federally recog-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3026
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
nized Indian tribes in this state;
(B) Held in trust by the United States for the benefit of individual members of any of the
nine federally recognized Indian tribes in this state;
(C) Within the boundaries of  the reservation of any of the nine federally recognized In-
dian tribes in this state; or
(D) Otherwise owned or controlled by any of the  nine federally recognized Indian tribes
in this state.
(4) “Natural climate  solution” means an activity that enhances or protects the ability of
natural and working lands to  sequester and store carbon, or reduces greenhouse gas emis-
sions from natural and working  lands, while maintaining or increasing climate resilience,
human well-being and biodiversity.
SECTION 2.
The Legislative Assembly declares that it is the policy of this state to:
(1) Implement  strategies to advance natural climate solutions to mitigate the future im-
pacts of climate change.
(2) Invest in research to improve our understanding of:
(a) The effects of natural  climate solutions on natural and working lands and the pro-
ducts produced by natural and working lands; and
(b) The contributions of natural climate solutions to reducing greenhouse gas  emissions,
increasing net carbon sequestration and storage and strengthening climate resilience.
(3) Direct state agencies to incentivize and implement natural climate solutions by:
(a) Securing and leveraging federal and private investments in  natural climate solutions
on natural and working lands;
(b) Prioritizing the use of existing programs to administer funds;
(c) Ensuring equitable benefits of  climate mitigation for environmental justice commu-
nities, landowners and land managers;
(d) Ensuring that a diversity  of landowners and managers are able to voluntarily partic-
ipate in incentive-based programs for natural climate solutions and climate resilience;
(e) Identifying resources to provide incentives  to land managers interested in voluntarily
adopting practices that optimize natural climate solutions;
(f) Strengthening land manager education, engagement and technical assistance efforts;
(g) Providing financial assistance for tribal governments, local governments or nongov-
ernmental organizations for the purpose of entering into voluntary transactions  with willing
landowners to acquire natural and working lands to enhance the local  benefits of natural
climate solutions;
(h) Increasing and deploying natural climate solutions in  and around our urban and built
environment; and
(i) Optimizing the social, health, ecological, climate  resilience and economic benefits of
natural climate solutions, including:
(A) Reducing heat island effects;
(B) Improving air quality;
(C) Improving flood control;
(D) Improving soil health and productivity;
(E) Improving wildfire resilience and community protection;
(F) Improving drought resilience and response;
(G) Improving wetland and riparian  functionality for enhanced water quality and quan-
[2]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tity;
(H) Increasing long-term fiber supplies;
(I) Increasing the climate resilience of fish and wildlife; and
(J) Increasing protection for coastal communities from the impacts of storm surge.
(4) Direct state agencies to incorporate natural climate solutions into  their missions,
programmatic investments and performance metrics.
(5) Direct state agencies to use metrics designed to track progress in  implementing na-
tural climate solutions.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Natural and Working Lands Fund is  established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the Natural and
Working Lands Fund shall be credited to  the fund. Moneys in the Natural and Working
Lands Fund are continuously appropriated to State Department of  Energy for the purposes
described in this section and section 4 of this 2023 Act.
(2) At the  written request of the State Department of Energy, the State Treasurer shall
transfer moneys from the balance available in the Natural and  Working Lands Fund on Au-
gust 1 of each year to the following funds in accordance with allocations established by the
department by rule under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The Agriculture Natural Climate Solutions Fund established under section 11 of  this
2023 Act.
(b) The Forestry Natural Climate Solutions Fund established under  section 12 of this 2023
Act.
(c) The Watershed Natural  Climate Solutions Fund established under section 13 of this
2023 Act.
(d) The Fish and Wildlife Natural Climate Solutions  Fund established under section 14
of this 2023 Act.
(3) The State Department of Energy shall establish by rule  the allocations under sub-
section (2) of this section. Allocations may be adjusted annually and must be based  on the
anticipated needs of the agency to which moneys are allocated. The department shall  consult
with the State Department  of Agriculture, the State Forestry Department, the State De-
partment of Fish and Wildlife and the Oregon Watershed  Enhancement Board before adopt-
ing or adjusting allocations under this subsection.
SECTION 4.
(1) Subject to subsection (2)  of this section, the State Department of Agri-
culture, the  State Forestry Department, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife and the
Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall use moneys allocated from  the Natural and
Working Lands Fund to:
(a) Provide incentives  to help landowners, land managers and environmental justice
communities adopt practices that support natural climate solutions; and
(b) Provide financial assistance for technical support for landowners, land managers and
environmental justice communities for the adoption of natural climate solutions.
(2) The State Department of Energy, in consultation with the Oregon Global Warming
Commission, the State Department of Agriculture, the State Forestry Department,  the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife and the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, shall adopt
rules to describe the areas of responsibility, in carrying out  subsection (1) of this section, for
each agency that receives an allocation from the Natural and Working Lands Fund.
(3) The State Department of Energy, the Oregon Global  Warming Commission, the State
[3]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Department of  Agriculture, the State Forestry Department, the State Department of Fish
and Wildlife and the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall jointly:
(a) Coordinate, to the maximum extent practicable, on  the development and implemen-
tation of programs and activities related to natural climate solutions to reduce duplication
and overlapping or redundant efforts;
(b) Review, at regular intervals,  progress made in implementing natural climate solutions
and barriers to future implementation;
(c) Identify opportunities for  cross-agency coordination on natural climate solutions; and
(d) Identify opportunities for leveraging natural climate solution capacities across  agen-
cies.
(4) Agencies that receive an allocation from the Natural and Working  Lands Fund under
section 3 of this 2023  Act shall provide to the Oregon Global Warming Commission an ac-
counting of the uses of moneys from the fund by the agency.
(5) The Oregon Global Warming  Commission shall provide a summary of the uses of the
Natural and Working  Lands Fund, and identify additional funding needs, in a report to the
committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to the environment, in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, no later than September 15 of each year.
SECTION 5.
(1) No later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the Oregon Global
Warming Commission, in consultation with  the State Department of Energy, the State De-
partment of Agriculture, the State Forestry Department, the  State Department of Fish and
Wildlife and the Oregon Watershed Enhancement  Board, shall submit a report, in the man-
ner provided by ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related
to the environment and the Governor. The report shall include:
(a) A list  of projects funded by the Natural and Working Lands Fund during the previous
24 months and the amount expended for each project.
(b) A  summary of state, federal and private sources of funding for natural climate sol-
utions.
(c) An assessment of projects described in paragraphs (a) and  (b) of this subsection in
light of the baseline and metrics adopted under section 6 of this 2023 Act.
(d) A list of projects, grants or other activities that are planned  for the upcoming cal-
endar year.
(e) A summary of anticipated climate threats  to Oregon’s natural and working lands in
the upcoming biennium.
(f) An assessment of gaps in programs and authorities to better fulfill the policies de-
scribed in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(g) An inventory and assessment of  existing programs that relate to natural climate
solutions.
(2) Before finalizing the report under subsection (1)  of this section, the commission shall
solicit public comment on  the report and include a summary of comments received in the
final version of the report submitted to the Legislative Assembly and Governor.
(3) The State Department of Energy shall  provide staff support to the commission for the
purpose of preparing the reports  under this section and section 4 (5) of this 2023 Act. The
department may contract  with a third party to provide staff support services described in
this subsection.
SECTION 6. (1) The State Department of Energy and the Oregon Global  Warming Com-
[4]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mission shall, in coordination with the State Forestry Department, the State Department  of
Agriculture, the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife and the Oregon Watershed En-
hancement Board, and in consultation with relevant  federal agencies, establish and maintain:
(a) A net carbon sequestration and storage baseline for natural and working lands;
(b) Activity-based metrics in accordance with subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) Community impact metrics in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Activity-based metrics shall be used to evaluate progress toward  increasing net car-
bon sequestration and storage in natural and  working lands, as measured against the net
carbon sequestration and storage baseline. Activity-based metrics  may include, but need not
be limited to, acres of lands for which certain management practices have been adopted.
(3) Community impact metrics shall be used to evaluate the  positive and negative effects,
over time, of strategies for net carbon sequestration and storage in  natural and working
lands on landowners, land  managers and communities. Community impact metrics may in-
clude, but need not be limited to:
(a) Metrics to measure the effects of net carbon sequestration and storage  strategies on
jobs, local economies, environmental integrity and public health; and
(b) Metrics to evaluate the accessibility of a diverse range  of landowners to net carbon
sequestration and storage programs.
(4) The State Department of Energy and  the Oregon Global Warming Commission, in
consultation with the State Forestry Department, the  State Department of Agriculture, the
Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board and the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife, shall,
no later than January 1, 2025, establish carbon sequestration and storage goals for  Oregon’s
natural and working lands and update those goals as new information becomes available.
(5) The State Department  of Energy may contract with a third party to assist the de-
partment in performing its duties under this section.
SECTION 7.
(1) The State Department of Energy and the Oregon Global  Warming Com-
mission, in coordination with the  State Forestry Department, the State Department of Ag-
riculture, the  Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, the Department of State Lands, the
Department of  Land Conservation and Development and federal land management partners,
shall develop a natural and working  lands net carbon sequestration and storage inventory.
The inventory must:
(a) Be based on the  best available field-based and remote sensing data on carbon
sequestration; and
(b) To  the greatest extent possible, be developed using methods consistent with methods
used to assess greenhouse gas fluxes related to land use, land change and forestry  for the
United States Environmental Protection Agency’s Inventory of  U.S. Greenhouse Gas Emis-
sions and Sinks.
(2) The State Department of Energy shall update the inventory and submit a report  de-
scribing the inventory to the Oregon Global Warming Commission no later than  December
1 of each even-numbered year.
(3) The State Department  of Energy may contract with a third party to assist the de-
partment in performing its duties under this section.
SECTION 8. (1) The State Department of Energy, in coordination with the Oregon Global
Warming Commission, shall study the workforce and training programs  needed to support
adoption of natural climate solutions on natural and working lands.
[5]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The department shall provide the results  of the study, and may include recommen-
dations for legislation, in a report to the committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to
the environment, in the manner provided under ORS  192.245, no later than September 15,
2024.
(3) The department may contract  with a third party to assist the department in per-
forming its duties under this section.
SECTION 9.
Section 8 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 10. (1) The Oregon Global Warming Commission may appoint a natural and
working lands advisory committee to advise the  commission in the performance of the
commission’s duties under sections 1 to 10 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The advisory committee shall  consist of at least 14 members, including but not limited
to representatives of:
(a) Tribal governments;
(b) Local governments;
(c) Forest products interests or organizations;
(d) Agricultural interests or organizations;
(e) Environmental justice interests;
(f) Conservation interests; and
(g) Technical service providers.
(3) The State Department of Energy shall provide staff support for the  advisory com-
mittee. The department may contract with a third party to  provide staff support services
under this subsection.
SECTION 11.
(1) The  Agriculture Natural Climate Solutions Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Agri-
culture Natural Climate Solutions Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the  fund are
continuously appropriated to State Department of Agriculture to:
(a) Provide incentives and financial  assistance as described in section 4 (1) of this 2023
Act; and
(b) For the administrative expenses  of the department in implementing section 4 of this
2023 Act, except that no more  than 10 percent of moneys may be used for administrative
expenses.
(2) The Agriculture Natural Climate Solutions  Fund consists of moneys transferred to
the fund under section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 12. (1) The Forestry Natural Climate Solutions Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the Forestry
Natural Climate Solutions Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are con-
tinuously appropriated to the State Forestry Department to:
(a) Provide incentives and financial  assistance as described in section 4 (1) of this 2023
Act; and
(b) For the administrative expenses  of the department in implementing section 4 of this
2023 Act, except that no more  than 10 percent of moneys may be used for administrative
expenses.
(2) The Forestry Natural  Climate Solutions Fund consists of moneys transferred to the
fund under section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 13.
(1) The Watershed  Natural Climate Solutions Fund is established in the
[6]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Watershed Natural Climate Solutions Fund shall  be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund
are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board to:
(a) Provide incentives and financial  assistance as described in section 4 (1) of this 2023
Act; and
(b) For the  administrative expenses of the board in implementing section 4 of this 2023
Act, except that no more than 10 percent  of moneys may be used for administrative ex-
penses.
(2) The Watershed Natural Climate Solutions Fund consists of moneys transferred to the
fund under section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 14.
(1) The Fish and Wildlife Natural Climate Solutions Fund is established in
the State  Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Fish
and Wildlife Natural Climate Solutions Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund
are continuously appropriated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife to:
(a) Provide incentives and financial assistance as described in section 4  (1) of this 2023
Act; and
(b) For the administrative expenses of the department in implementing  section 4 of this
2023 Act, except that no more than 10 percent of moneys  may be used for administrative
expenses.
(2) The Fish and Wildlife Natural Climate Solutions Fund  consists of moneys transferred
to the fund under section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 15. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[7]