Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 329A.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Early Learning  and Care shall establish and imple-
ment a child care provider incentive program for  the purpose of assisting child care provid-
ers, including micro centers, as defined in section 1, chapter  374, Oregon Laws 2023, that
commit to providing child care to the children of this state.
(2) The Early Learning Council shall prescribe by rule:
(a) Participant eligibility  criteria, including the types of child care providers who may
participate in the program;
(b) The terms and conditions of participation in the program, including the duration of
the term of any service agreement, which must be at least 12 months;
(c) The types of incentives that may be provided, which may include:
(A) Loan repayment subsidies;
(B) Stipends;
(C) Scholarships for students in early childhood professional development; and
(D) Child care and housing assistance;
(d) The priority for the distribution of funds, if the funds  allocated to the program from
the Child Care Provider Incentive Fund established under section  3 of this 2025 Act are in-
sufficient to provide assistance to  all of the applicants who are eligible to participate in the
program; and
(e) The financial penalties imposed on an individual who fails  to comply with the terms
and conditions of participation.
(3) The eligibility requirements adopted for the program by the council:
(a) Must allow providers to qualify for multiple child care provider incentives; and
(b) Must allow providers to qualify for an incentive for multiyear periods.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1321
SB 567
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
(4) The department may enter into contracts with one or more public or private entities
to administer the child care provider incentive program or parts of the program.
(5) The department shall decide no  later than September 1 of each academic year the
distribution of funds for scholarships that will be provided in the next academic year.
(6) The department may  receive gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether
public or private, to carry out the provisions of this section. Moneys received  under this
subsection shall be deposited in the Child  Care Provider Incentive Fund established under
section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
The Child Care Provider Incentive Fund is  established in the State Treasury,
separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Child Care Provider
Incentive Fund shall be credited to the  fund. The fund consists of moneys appropriated to
the fund  by the Legislative Assembly and gifts, grants or other moneys contributed to the
fund by any source, whether public  or private. Moneys in the fund are continuously appro-
priated to the Department of Early Learning and  Care to carry out section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]