Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall contract with a third party to  con-
duct a study to determine  how to promote the effective use of instructional time for the
purposes of achieving positive learning outcomes and promoting a positive classroom learn-
ing environment.
(2) As part of the study, the third party shall:
(a) Consider the following options to promote the goal described in subsection (1)  of this
section:
(A) Fully fund and support  successful research-based classroom behavioral programs,
including programs that provide support for students with  an individualized education pro-
gram or an education plan developed in accordance with section 504  of the Rehabilitation Act
of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794;
(B) Employ additional trained support staff, including trained counselors  and mental and
behavioral health professionals;
(C) Provide necessary support materials; and
(D) Implement schoolwide behavior management programs as an option for all schools
to provide safety for the students, teachers and staff.
(b) Identify any state or federal laws, regulations, policies or  procedures that prevent the
effective use of instructional  time that can lead to the achievement of positive learning
outcomes and the promotion of  a positive classroom learning environment. The obstacles
must be identified through discussions with classroom  teachers, classified staff, school ad-
ministrators, students and parents and guardians  who represent five rural schools and five
urban schools that are in:
(A) Different school districts; and
(B) Each of the congressional districts of this state.
(c) Provide an estimate of the amounts that would need to  be distributed to school dis-
tricts through  the State School Fund to implement the options identified in paragraph (a)
of this subsection.
(3) The department shall submit  a report of the findings of the study in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education no  later than September 15,
2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]