Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in sections 1 to 3 of this 2023 Act:
(a) “Block grant” means a  grant that does not identify a specific program area, allo-
cation, spending target or line  item on which a recipient must expend all or a portion of
grant moneys but instead leaves some or all decisions about  specific expenditures to the
recipient’s discretion.
(b) “Granting agency” means a state agency that receives a direct  or indirect appropri-
ation from the State Treasury for the purpose of granting  to a nonprofit organization mon-
eys necessary to meet  a need or provide a service that the Legislative Assembly has
identified as critical for the health, safety or welfare of residents of this state.
(c) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization described in section 501(c)(3) of  the
Internal Revenue Code that is exempt from  taxation under section 501(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(d) “Prequalify”  means to verify a nonprofit organization’s eligibility and responsibility
as provided in this section.
(e) “Responsible” means having met the standards of responsibility specified in section 2
of this 2023 Act.
(2)(a) A granting agency may  prequalify one or more nonprofit organizations to receive
block grants from  the granting agency for the purpose of providing specified goods or ser-
vices under the granting agency’s general oversight and supervision. A  nonprofit organiza-
tion may apply to the granting agency to request prequalification.
(b) The  Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall adopt model rules that
specify application procedures, forms for and contents of applications, required  public notice,
eligibility criteria, deadlines and other criteria for prequalifying  a nonprofit organization
under this section.  At a minimum, the rules must require as eligibility criteria for prequali-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3380
HB 2892
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
fication that the nonprofit organization:
(A) Is responsible;
(B) Received grant moneys from a granting  agency during at least three out of the pre-
vious four biennial appropriation cycles;
(C) Exercised careful stewardship over public moneys and  met the purposes and goals
specified for previous grants;
(D) Spent not more than 10 percent of  all previous grants on administration or organ-
izational overhead; and
(E) Otherwise  acted in a manner that fostered trust and respect for the nonprofit or-
ganization within the granting agency and  the community the nonprofit organization served.
(c) A granting agency  may adopt all or a portion of the department’s model rules or may
adopt the granting agency’s own rules if the rules comply with the requirements of  sections
1 to 3 of this 2023 Act. If the granting agency does  not adopt the granting agency’s own rules
under this paragraph, the granting agency is subject to the department’s model rules.
(3)(a) After receiving an application  for prequalification, the granting agency shall in-
vestigate the applicant as necessary to  determine whether prequalification for the applicant
is warranted. If an applicant  requests an early decision to allow the applicant as much time
as possible to prepare  to apply for an available grant, the granting agency shall make the
granting agency’s determination within 30 days, if practicable.
(b) In making a determination as  to whether prequalification is warranted, a granting
agency shall consider only the eligibility  criteria specified in subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(4)(a) If after evaluating a nonprofit  organization’s application for prequalification a
granting agency determines that prequalification is warranted,  the granting agency shall
notify the nonprofit organization of the prequalification and in the notice:
(A) State clearly and conspicuously that:
(i) A prequalification is not a grant and does not entitle a  nonprofit organization to a
grant or create any rights to or proprietary interest in grant moneys;
(ii) The nonprofit organization must  apply separately to the granting agency for each
grant that requires an application and must meet  any eligibility criteria required for the
grant; and
(iii) Block grants the nonprofit organization receives are subject to reporting  require-
ments and annual  audits, and the nonprofit organization must remain responsible during the
period in which the nonprofit organization makes expenditures from grant moneys;
(B) Specify any  category, classification or type of grant to which the prequalification
applies and any applicable limits on  the nonprofit organization’s eligibility to receive grant
moneys as block grants;
(C) Specify the maximum amount of grant  moneys the nonprofit may receive as a block
grant during any biennium; and
(D) Specify the period of time for which the prequalification is valid.
(b) If a granting agency determines  that prequalification for a nonprofit organization is
not warranted, the granting  agency shall notify the nonprofit organization of the granting
agency’s determination and in the notice:
(A) Explain the reasons for  denying the prequalification, with specific reference to any
standards of responsibility or eligibility criteria the nonprofit organization failed to meet; and
(B) State that the nonprofit organization has an opportunity for a hearing under  section
[2]
HB 2892
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
3 of this 2023 Act.
(c) If a nonprofit organization requests a hearing under  section 3 of this 2023 Act, the
nonprofit organization shall notify  the granting agency within three business days after re-
ceiving a notice under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(5) If a granting  agency discovers after prequalifying a nonprofit organization that the
prequalification is no longer warranted, the granting agency may revoke or modify  the pre-
qualification upon reasonable notice to the nonprofit  organization, except that a revocation
or modification is  invalid as to any grant that the nonprofit organization has already re-
ceived.
(6) A granting agency shall require  a nonprofit organization to which the granting agency
awards a block grant after prequalification to report at least quarterly  to the granting
agency concerning the  nonprofit organization’s use and expenditures of block grant moneys
in sufficient detail for the granting agency to  determine whether the nonprofit organization
is using the moneys in accordance with the purposes and goals of the  grant and is providing
adequate goods or services at an acceptable level of performance. The granting  agency shall
also conduct an annual  audit of the nonprofit organization’s use of the grant moneys. The
granting agency may set aside a portion of the grant moneys to pay the costs of conducting
the audit through an experienced contract auditor.
(7) Before making  an appropriation to a granting agency that the granting agency may
allocate to a nonprofit organization  as a block grant, the Legislative Assembly each biennium
shall identify issues, needs and  priorities that are critical for the health, safety or welfare
of residents of this state. A granting  agency that receives moneys the Legislative Assembly
appropriates to  address critical issues, needs and priorities shall allocate grants solely for
the issues, needs and priorities the Legislative Assembly identifies as critical.
(8) A granting agency shall report not later than September 15 of each year to the Joint
Legislative Audit Committee concerning prequalifications the granting agency  allowed, the
nonprofit organizations to which the granting agency  awarded block grants and the results
of all audits the granting agency conducted of block  grant recipients. The committee shall
determine the contents of the reports the granting agency must submit and  notify the
granting agency of the committee’s requirements.
SECTION 2.
(1) As part  of a granting agency’s evaluation of an application for prequali-
fication under section 1 of this 2023  Act, the granting agency shall determine whether the
applicant is responsible in accordance  with the standards of responsibility set forth in sub-
section (2) of this section. If the granting agency determines that an applicant  is not re-
sponsible, the granting agency shall provide the applicant with written notice of the  granting
agency’s determination.
(2) In order for a granting agency to determine that an applicant  for prequalification is
responsible, the applicant must demonstrate to the granting agency that the applicant:
(a) Has  available the appropriate financial, material, equipment, facility and personnel
resources and expertise, or has the ability to obtain the resources and expertise,  necessary
to provide goods and services that meet the purposes and goals of grant moneys that the
granting agency administers.
(b) Used previous grant moneys  the applicant received from the state with a satisfactory
record of performance. For purposes  of this paragraph, a satisfactory record of performance
means that the applicant met the purposes and goals of the grant and,  to the extent that the
[3]
HB 2892
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
costs associated with and time  available to meet the purposes and goals remained within the
applicant’s control, the applicant stayed within the time and budget allotted for the  grant
and otherwise performed in a satisfactory manner. The  granting agency shall document the
applicant’s record of performance if the  granting agency finds under this paragraph that the
applicant is not responsible.
(c) Has a satisfactory  record of integrity. The granting agency in evaluating the
applicant’s record of integrity may consider, among other things, whether the applicant or
an employee of the applicant has  previous criminal convictions for offenses related to ob-
taining or attempting to obtain a grant fraudulently or under false pretenses.  The granting
agency shall document the applicant’s  record of integrity if the granting agency finds under
this paragraph that the applicant is not responsible.
(d) Is legally qualified to receive a grant from  the granting agency, which qualification
includes but is not limited to possessing any required business or professional  licenses and
registering with the Secretary of State and the Attorney General,  if registration is required
under the laws of this state.
(e) Supplied all necessary  information in connection with the inquiry concerning respon-
sibility. If an applicant fails to promptly  supply information concerning responsibility that
the granting agency requests, the granting agency shall determine the applicant’s responsi-
bility based on available information or may find that the applicant is not responsible.
SECTION 3.
(1) An applicant for prequalification under section 1 of this  2023 Act may
appeal a denial of prequalification only in accordance with this section. The applicant’s appeal
is not subject to ORS chapter 183 unless this section specifically provides otherwise.
(2) Immediately after receiving an applicant’s request for a hearing under section 1  of
this 2023 Act, a granting agency shall notify the Director of the Oregon Department of  Ad-
ministrative Services and the director, after receiving notice from the granting  agency shall
promptly notify the person appealing and the granting agency of the time and place of the
hearing. The director shall conduct the hearing and  decide the appeal within 30 days after
receiving the notice from the granting agency. The  director shall set forth in writing the
reasons for the hearing decision.
(3) At the hearing the director shall consider de novo the notice  of denial, revocation or
revision of a prequalification, the  standards of responsibility specified in section 2 of this 2023
Act upon which the contracting agency based the denial, revocation  or revision of the pre-
qualification and any evidence the parties provide. In all other respects, a hearing before the
director must be conducted in the  same manner as a contested case under ORS 183.417 (1)
to (4) and (7), 183.425, 183.440, 183.450 and 183.452.
(4) The director  may allocate the director’s costs for the hearing between the person
appealing and the granting agency. The director shall base the allocation upon facts  the di-
rector finds and states in the final order that, in the director’s opinion, warrant the allo-
cation of costs. If the final order does not allocate the costs for the  hearing, the costs must
be paid as follows:
(a) If the director upholds the decision to deny,  revoke or revise a prequalification of a
person, the person appealing the granting agency’s decision shall pay the costs.
(b) If the director reverses the decision to deny, revoke  or revise a prequalification, the
granting agency shall pay the costs.
(5) A decision of the director may be reviewed only upon a petition, filed within 15 days
[4]
HB 2892
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
after the date of the decision, in the Circuit Court for  Marion County. The circuit court shall
reverse or modify the decision only if the court finds:
(a) The decision was obtained through corruption, fraud or undue means;
(b) There was evident partiality or corruption  on the part of the director that operated
to the substantial prejudice of the person appealing the decision; or
(c) An evident material miscalculation of  figures or an evident material mistake occurred
in the description of any  person, thing or property referred to in the decision, and the mis-
calculation or mistake operated to the substantial prejudice of the person appealing the de-
cision.
(6) If the court overturns the director’s decision, the court may require  the granting
agency to prequalify the person appealing the decision and may award attorney fees  and
costs to the person.
SECTION 4.
(1) Sections 1 to 3 of this 2023 Act become operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Director of the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services or a granting
agency, as defined in section 1 of this  2023 Act, may adopt rules and take any action before
the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the
director or the granting agency, on and after the operative date specified in subsection  (1)
of this section, to undertake and exercise all of  the duties, functions and powers conferred
on the director or the granting agency by sections 1 to 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]