Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 815.300 is amended to read:
815.300. This section establishes  exemptions from the requirements under ORS 815.295 to be
equipped with a certified pollution control  system. Exemptions established by this section are in
addition to any exemptions  established by ORS 801.026. The exemptions established in this section
are also applicable to requirements for certification of pollution control equipment before  registra-
tion under ORS 803.350 and 803.465. All of the following  vehicles are exempt from the requirements
under ORS 815.295:
(1) Any vehicle that is not a motor vehicle.
(2) Any vehicle unless the vehicle is registered within:
(a) The boundaries of  the metropolitan service district formed under ORS chapter 268 for the
metropolitan area, as defined in ORS 268.020, which includes the City of Portland, Oregon.
(b) Boundaries designated by the Environmental Quality Commission under ORS 468A.390.
(3) Any [ new] motor vehicle or [ new] motor vehicle engine [ when the registration results from the
initial retail sale thereof ] with a model year that predates the current year by  less than six
years.
(4) Any motor vehicle:
(a) Not registered in areas designated under subsection (2)(a) of this section, including any ex-
pansion of such boundary under subsection (2)(b) of this section, with a  model year that predates
by more than 20 years the year in which registration or renewal of registration is required; or
(b) Registered in areas designated under subsection (2)(a) of  this section, including any expan-
sion of such boundary under subsection (2)(b) of this section, with a model year of 1974 or earlier.
(5) Motor vehicles that are registered  as farm vehicles under ORS 805.300 or apportioned farm
vehicles under ORS 805.300.
(6) Special interest vehicles that are maintained as  collectors’ items and used for exhibitions,
parades, club activities and similar uses but not used primarily for the transportation of persons  or
property.
(7) Fixed load vehicles.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 946
SB 19
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(8) Vehicles that  are proportionally registered under ORS 826.009 and 826.011 in accordance
with agreements established under ORS 826.007.
(9) Electric motor vehicles. This subsection does  not exempt hybrid motor vehicles that use
electricity and another source of motive power.
(10) First  response rescue units operated by political subdivisions of this state that are not used
to transport persons who are ill or injured or who have disabilities.
(11) A vehicle that is currently registered in Oregon at  the time application for new registration
is received by the Department of Transportation if the new registration is  a result of a change in
the registration or plate type and the  application is received at least four months prior to the ex-
piration of the existing registration.
(12) Golf carts.
(13) Any Class I, Class II, Class III or Class IV all-terrain vehicle.
(14) An original  equipment manufacturer vehicle that is engineered, designed, produced and
warranted to use natural gas as its only fuel source.
(15) Racing activity vehicles.
[2]