Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Port of Hood River shall, in collaboration with  the Department of
Transportation, conduct a study of the feasibility of replacing the Hood  River-White Salmon
Interstate Bridge. The study must evaluate:
(a) Environmental impacts;
(b) Engineering requirements and design and construction options;
(c) Costs and financing options; and
(d) Project delivery methods and schedules.
(2) The  port, in collaboration with the department, shall report the findings of the study
to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to transportation no later
than December 31, 2018. The report must include recommendations for the  next steps to be
taken toward funding and constructing a replacement bridge.
SECTION 2.
The Port of Hood River and the Department of Transportation  shall, as soon
as practicable but no later than December 31, 2017, enter into a grant agreement that:
(1) Outlines methods by which the port and the department will collaborate to  conduct
the study described in section 1 of this 2017 Act;
(2) Outlines the project development work necessary for the study;
(3) Provides that the department will issue grants to the port to  reimburse the port for
expenses incurred in conducting the study, including expenses incurred before  the proceeds
of the lottery bonds authorized in section 3 of this 2017 Act  are disbursed, contingent on
satisfactory progress and documentation by the port and subject to applicable law and  any
pertinent bond requirements; and
(4) Establishes a schedule for grant payments that begins payments as soon as practica-
ble after the grant agreement is executed or after lottery bonds authorized under section 3
of this 2017 Act are issued, whichever is later.
SECTION 3.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  at the request of the Depart-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2268
HB 2749
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
ment of Transportation, the State Treasurer is  authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant
to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in  an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds and in-
terest earnings for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this  section, plus an additional
amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this  section in an amount sufficient to
provide $5 million in net proceeds and interest earnings must be transferred to the Depart-
ment of Transportation for deposit in the Hood River  Bridge Study Fund, established in
section 4 of this 2017 Act,  to be used for the purposes described in section 4 of this 2017 Act.
(3) Lottery bonds authorized under this section must be issued no later  than June 30,
2018.
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds  that the Hood River-White Salmon Interstate Bridge
is a vital component in the economy of the  Hood River region due to its essential role in the
movement of consumers and freight, and that replacement of the  bridge will lead to in-
creased business in the Hood River  region and improved freight mobility. The Legislative
Assembly thereby finds that the use  of lottery bonds will create jobs and facilitate and en-
courage economic development.
SECTION 4. (1) The Hood River Bridge Study  Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Interest earned by the Hood River Bridge
Study Fund shall be credited to the fund. The fund consists of moneys deposited into the fund
under section 3 of this 2017 Act and may include moneys appropriated,  allocated, deposited
or transferred  to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise and interest earned on
moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Transporta-
tion to be used:
(a) To issue  grants to the Port of Hood River under the grant agreement described in
section 2 of this 2017 Act; and
(b) To pay for expenses incurred by the department in complying with sections  1 and 2
of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]