Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $6,825,710
to be distributed to  the Mapleton Water District for the purpose of replacing its water dis-
tribution lines.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4260