Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office shall hire permanent staff  to
carry out the provisions of section 2, chapter 48, Oregon Laws 2022.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, for the purpose of hiring permanent  staff
under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4085