Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 171.725 to
171.785.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Government Ethics Commission shall receive  any written
findings of fact prepared by an investigator directed  by the Legislative Assembly or by leg-
islative rule to determine whether a lobbyist has engaged  in conduct prohibited under legis-
lative branch personnel rules.
(2) Upon receipt of written findings described in subsection (1) of this section, the  com-
mission shall promptly conduct proceedings and  deliberate on the written findings described
in subsection (1) of this  section. The commission shall give notice of the proceedings to the
lobbyist that is the subject of the written findings and shall allow the lobbyist  to appear and
present testimony and evidence at  the proceedings. The commission may determine that
performing its own investigation is warranted and may stay the proceedings for no  more
than 60 days to undertake its own investigation.
(3) As part of the commission’s deliberations,  the commission shall determine an appro-
priate remedy, including but not limited to:
(a) Taking no action;
(b) Reprimanding the lobbyist;
(c) Imposing a civil penalty on the lobbyist; or
(d) Revoking the lobbyist’s registration under ORS 171.740.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4085-1