Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3365
HB 2746
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 1.
It is the purpose of section 2 of this 2025 Act to  require employers and em-
ployment agencies to disclose information relating to wage ranges  in hiring and employment
processes to:
(1) Safeguard against implicit and explicit biases that may exist in salary negotiations;
(2) Provide reassurance that employees are not discriminated against  in payment of
compensation for a particular employment position;
(3) Reduce discriminatory wage-setting and hiring practices;
(4) Ensure equitable pay for employees in this state; and
(5) Allow job applicants and employees to base employment decisions on complete infor-
mation.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Employee” means an individual performing  services for an employer for
remuneration or under any contract for hire, written or oral, express or implied.
(b) “Employer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 652.210.
(c) “Employment agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.001.
(d) “Employment benefits” includes, but is not limited to, health benefits, paid time off,
retirement benefits and any other taxable benefits.
(e)(A) “Job posting”  means any solicitation intended to recruit applicants for an em-
ployment, promotion or transfer opportunity.
(B) “Job posting” does  not mean solicitations that exclude any reference to a specific
employment, promotion or transfer opportunity  or to specific qualifications for desired ap-
plicants.
(f) “Wage range” means a range from the lowest to  the highest salary or hourly wage
that an employer sets in good faith as compensation for a particular  employment position
by referencing:
(A) A predetermined compensation schedule;
(B) A predetermined range of wages for the position;
(C) The actual range of wages paid to other employees who hold equivalent positions; or
(D) An allocated budget.
(2) An employer or an employment agency may not:
(a) Fail or refuse to disclose in any internal or external job posting for an  employment,
promotion or  transfer opportunity the wage or wage range, a general description of the em-
ployment benefits and any other compensation associated with the  employment, promotion
or transfer opportunity.
(b) If an employment, promotion  or transfer opportunity has not been made available to
the applicant applying for the opportunity, fail  or refuse to provide to an applicant who is
applying for the opportunity the wage or wage  range, a general description of the employ-
ment benefits and any other compensation associated with the opportunity:
(A) Upon the request of the applicant; and
(B) Prior to extending an offer or engaging in any discussion regarding compensation.
(c) Fail or refuse to provide each employee with the current wage or wage range, a  gen-
eral description of the employment benefits and any other compensation  associated with the
same or equivalent employment positions held by other employees as follows:
(A) At the time of hire;
(B) Upon the transfer or promotion of the employee; and
[2]
HB 2746
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Once per calendar year, upon the request of the employee.
(d) Retaliate or in any  way discriminate against an individual with respect to hire or
tenure or any other term or condition of employment because the individual  has exercised
a right protected under this section.
(3)(a) An employer shall keep and maintain  records for each employee of the employer
that include information sufficient for an employer to comply with the disclosure  require-
ments of this section, including but not limited to:
(A) The wage or wage range, a general description of the  employment benefits and any
other compensation  associated with each employment, promotion and transfer opportunity
made available by the employer.
(B) The wage rate history.
(b) An employer shall retain a  record described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
throughout the duration of the employee’s employment with the  employer and for at least
two years following the date on which the employee ceases to be employed by the employer.
(4) This  section applies to positions that will be performed or are able to be performed
in whole or in part in this state.
(5) In determining whether a wage range was set by an employer in good faith, a  trier
of fact in administrative action brought under this section may consider, in addition  to any
other relevant factors, the breadth of the wage range.
(6)(a) A violation of  subsection (2) or (3) of this section is an unlawful practice under ORS
chapter 659A. An  individual alleging a violation of subsection (2) or (3) of this section may
file a complaint under ORS 659A.820 with  the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and In-
dustries. An  individual must file the complaint with the commissioner within one year of the
occurrence of the conduct that gave rise  to the complaint. The commissioner shall enforce
the provisions of this section in the  manner provided in ORS chapter 659A regarding other
unlawful practices.
(b) For a first violation, the commissioner shall issue a letter of  explanation or education
to the employer or employment agency in accordance with ORS 659A.830.
(7)(a) In addition to any other relief provided by law,  the commissioner may assess a civil
penalty against an employer or employment agency that violates subsection (2)  or (3) of this
section as follows:
(A) $1,000 for a second violation.
(B) $1,000 for a third and subsequent violation, except that the maximum civil penalty
amount may not exceed  $10,000 for any related series of violations occurring within one year
of the first violation.
(b) For purposes of assessing a  violation under this subsection, a separate violation oc-
curs:
(A) After the commissioner has issued a letter of explanation or education to  the em-
ployer or employment agency under subsection (6)(b) of this section; and
(B) With respect to each job posting  that fails to comply with the requirements under
subsection (2) of this section.
(c) Any monetary civil penalty assessed under this subsection shall  be imposed in the
manner provided by ORS 183.745.
(d) All sums collected as civil penalties under this section must first be applied toward
reimbursement of the costs incurred  in determining the violations, conducting hearings and
[3]
HB 2746
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
assessing and collecting  the penalty. The remainder, if any, shall be deposited in the Wage
Security Fund under ORS 652.409.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 659A.357 is amended to read:
659A.357. (1) It is an unlawful practice under  ORS chapter 659A for an employer [ or], prospec-
tive employer or employment agency  to seek the salary  history of an applicant or employee from
the applicant or employee or a current or former employer of the applicant or employee. This  sec-
tion is not intended to prevent an employer  or employment  agency  from requesting from a pro-
spective employee written authorization to confirm prior compensation after  the employer or
employment agency  makes an offer of employment to the  prospective employee that includes an
amount of compensation.
(2) As used in this  section, “employment agency” has the meaning given that term in
ORS 659A.001.
SECTION 4.  ORS 659A.360 is amended to read:
659A.360. (1) It is an unlawful practice for an employer or employment  agency to exclude an
applicant from an initial interview solely because of a past criminal conviction.
(2) An employer or employment agency excludes an applicant from an initial interview if the
employer or employment agency :
(a) Requires an applicant to disclose on an employment application a criminal conviction;
(b) Requires an applicant to disclose, prior to an initial interview, a criminal conviction; or
(c) If no interview is conducted, requires an  applicant to disclose, prior to making a conditional
offer of employment, a criminal conviction.
(3) Subject to subsections (1)  and (2) of this section, nothing in this section prevents an employer
or employment agency  from considering  an applicant’s conviction history when making a hiring
decision.
(4) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply:
(a) If federal, state or local law, including corresponding rules and regulations,  requires the
consideration of an applicant’s criminal history;
(b) To an employer that is a law enforcement agency;
(c) To an employer in the criminal justice system; [ or]
(d) To an employer seeking a nonemployee volunteer[ .]; or
(e) To an employment agency that undertakes to procure employees for an employer de-
scribed in paragraph (b), (c) or (d) of this subsection.
(5) As used in this  section, “employment agency” has the meaning given that term in
ORS 659A.001.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 659A.830 is amended to read:
659A.830. (1) Except as provided in subsection (5)  of this section, all authority of the Commis-
sioner of  the Bureau of Labor and Industries to conduct investigations or other proceedings to re-
solve a complaint filed under  ORS 659A.820 ceases upon the filing of a civil action by the
complainant alleging the same matters that are the basis of the complaint under ORS 659A.820.
(2)(a) Except as provided in  [ paragraph (b) ] paragraphs (b) and (c)  of this subsection, the
commissioner may dismiss a  complaint at any time after the complaint is filed. Upon the written
request of the person who filed the complaint under ORS 659A.820, the commissioner shall dismiss
the complaint. Upon dismissal of the complaint, the commissioner shall issue a 90-day notice if no-
tice is required under ORS 659A.880.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to a complaint alleging  an unlawful practice
[4]
HB 2746
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under ORS 659A.145 or 659A.421 or discrimination under federal housing law.  The commissioner
shall dismiss a complaint alleging an unlawful practice under ORS 659A.145 or  659A.421 or dis-
crimination  under  federal housing law if the commissioner finds no substantial evidence that an
unlawful practice or discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur.
(c) Upon receipt of a complaint against an employer or an employment  agency alleging
a violation of section 2 of  this 2025 Act, the commissioner shall review the past complaint
history of the employer or employment agency to  determine whether the employer or em-
ployment agency has any prior  violations of section 2 of this 2025 Act. If the commissioner
determines that the employer or employment agency does not  have any prior violations of
section 2 of this 2025 Act, the  commissioner shall dismiss the complaint. Upon dismissal of
the complaint, the commissioner shall issue a letter of explanation or education to the  em-
ployer or the employment agency.
(3) Except as provided in this section, all authority  of the commissioner to conduct investi-
gations or other proceedings to resolve a complaint filed  under ORS 659A.820 ceases one year after
the complaint  is filed unless the commissioner has issued a finding of substantial evidence under
ORS 659A.835 during the one-year period. Unless it is  impracticable to do so, the commissioner shall
make a final administrative disposition of a complaint alleging an unlawful  practice under ORS
659A.145 or 659A.421 or discrimination under federal housing law  no later than one year after re-
ceipt of the complaint.
(4) The authority of the commissioner to conduct investigations or other proceedings  to resolve
a complaint filed  under ORS 659A.820 alleging an unlawful practice under ORS 659A.403 or 659A.406
continues until the filing of a civil action by the complainant or until the  commissioner dismisses
the proceedings, enters into a settlement  agreement or enters a final order in the matter after a
hearing under ORS 659A.850.
(5) The authority of the commissioner to conduct investigations or other proceedings  to resolve
a complaint filed  under ORS 659A.820 alleging an unlawful practice under ORS 659A.145 or 659A.421
or discrimination under federal housing law does not cease upon the filing of a civil action by  the
complainant, but ceases upon the commencement of a trial in the civil action.
(6) The authority of the commissioner to conduct investigations or other proceedings  to resolve
a complaint filed under ORS 659A.820 alleging  a violation of ORS 659A.145 or 659A.421 or 659A.406
does not cease under  subsection (3) of this section if the issuance of a finding of substantial evidence
under ORS 659A.835 within the time allowed under subsection (3) of this section is  not practicable.
The commissioner shall notify the parties  in writing of the reasons that the issuance of substantial
evidence cannot be made within the time allowed.
(7) Nothing in this section affects the  ability of the commissioner to enforce any order entered
by the commissioner or to enforce any  settlement agreement signed by a representative of the
commissioner.
SECTION 6.
(1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 659A.357, 659A.360
and 659A.830 by sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Commissioner of  the Bureau of Labor and Industries may adopt rules and take
any other action before the operative  date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is
necessary to enable the commissioner, on  and after the operative date specified in subsection
(1) of this section, to undertake and exercise  all of the duties, functions and powers con-
ferred on the commissioner under section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS
659A.357, 659A.360 and 659A.830 by sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
[5]
HB 2746
1
2
3
SECTION 7.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[6]