Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
NOTICE OF FIREARM PROHIBITION
SECTION 1.
Upon charging a defendant with an  offense described in ORS 166.255 (1)(b),
the district attorney shall allege in the charging instrument one of the following relation-
ships existing between the defendant and the person alleged to  be the victim of the offense,
at the time of the offense:
(1) The defendant is the current or former spouse of the victim;
(2) The defendant is the parent or guardian of the victim;
(3) The defendant shares a child in common with the victim;
(4) The defendant is cohabiting with or has cohabited with the victim as a spouse, parent
or guardian;
(5) The defendant is a person similarly situated to  a spouse, parent or guardian of the
victim;
(6) The defendant and the victim are adults related by blood or marriage;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 201
SB 1546
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) The defendant and the victim are persons cohabiting with each other; or
(8) The defendant and the victim have been involved in a sexually intimate relationship.
SECTION 2.
(1)(a) When a defendant is charged with  an offense described in ORS 166.255
(1)(b) the district attorney shall, unless waived by the  defendant or for good cause shown,
at arraignment or no later than 45  days prior to trial or entry of a guilty or no contest plea,
serve on the defendant  and file with the court a notice stating that, due to the nature of the
relationship between the defendant and the alleged victim, the defendant will  be prohibited
from possessing firearms  if convicted of the offense. The notice must specify a type of re-
lationship listed in section 1 of this 2020 Act.
(b) When a defendant is charged  with stalking under ORS 163.732 the district attorney
shall, unless waived by the defendant or for good cause shown, at arraignment or no later
than 45 days prior to trial or entry of a guilty or no contest plea, serve on the defendant  and
file with the court a notice stating that, due to the nature of the offense, the defendant  will
be prohibited from possessing firearms if convicted of the offense.
(2) The Department of Justice, in consultation with the State  Court Administrator, shall
develop a form to be used to provide a notice described in subsection (1)  of this section. The
form must:
(a) Allow the district attorney, if applicable,  to specify the relationship between the de-
fendant and the alleged victim, and  whether the relationship between the defendant and the
alleged victim would cause the defendant to be prohibited  from possessing firearms under
federal law, Oregon law or both; and
(b) Advise  the defendant that the failure to allege any specified relationship between the
defendant and the victim, or the absence of a court determination or order under section 3
of this 2020 Act, does not  affect the lawfulness of the defendant’s possession of firearms
under ORS 166.250 or 166.255 or under federal law.
SECTION 3.
(1) If  a defendant has been charged with an offense described in ORS 166.255
(1)(b) on a charging  instrument alleging that the relationship existing between the defendant
and the person alleged to be the victim of the offense, at the time  of the offense, is a type
listed in section 1 of this 2020 Act, the specified relationship may be established as follows:
(a) At any time prior to entry of a plea of guilty or no  contest, the defendant may stip-
ulate, orally on the record or  in writing, to the nature of the relationship. Upon the stipu-
lation, the court shall find that the relationship has been established  and shall proceed under
subsection (2) of this section.
(b) If the defendant enters a plea of guilty or no contest to the  offense described in ORS
166.255 (1)(b), but does  not stipulate or admit to the nature of the relationship between the
defendant and the victim, the district attorney has the burden of proving the nature of the
relationship beyond a reasonable doubt. If the  court finds that the burden of proof has been
met, the court shall proceed under subsection (2) of this section.
(c) If the defendant proceeds to  trial on the offense described in ORS 166.255 (1)(b), the
district attorney has the burden of proving the nature of the  relationship beyond a reason-
able doubt. The fact finder  shall return a special verdict of “yes” or “no” on the issue of
whether the nature of the  relationship between the defendant and victim is as alleged. If the
fact finder returns a verdict  of “yes,” the court shall proceed under subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) If the nature of the relationship between the defendant and  the victim has been es-
[2]
SB 1546
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tablished under subsection (1) of this section, upon conviction of the offense described  in
ORS 166.255 (1)(b), the court shall:
(a) Make a written determination concerning the nature of the relationship;
(b) Enter an order prohibiting the defendant from possessing firearms; and
(c) Inform the defendant that the determination and order will be provided to the De-
partment of State Police and to the sheriff for entry into state and federal databases.
(3)(a) The court  shall cause a copy of the determination and order described in subsection
(2) of this section to be provided to the Department of State Police and the county sheriff.
(b) Upon receipt of the determination and order described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section:
(A) The Department of State Police shall enter the information into any appropriate state
or national databases; and
(B) The sheriff shall enter the information into any appropriate state or national data-
bases.
(4)(a) Upon conviction of stalking under ORS 163.732, the court shall:
(A) Enter an order prohibiting the defendant from possessing firearms; and
(B) Inform the defendant that the order will be provided to the Department of State Po-
lice and to the sheriff for entry into state and federal databases.
(b) The court shall cause a copy  of the order described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
to be provided to the Department of State Police and the county sheriff.
(c) Upon receipt of the order described in paragraph (b) of this subsection:
(A) The Department of State Police shall enter the information into any appropriate state
or national databases; and
(B) The sheriff shall enter the information into any appropriate state or national data-
bases.
(5) The State Court Administrator shall develop a form to be used for the determination
and order described in subsection (2)  of this section and the order described in subsection
(4)(a) of this section. The form must  allow the court to designate the crime of conviction,
specify the relationship between the defendant  and the victim, if applicable, and specify
whether the conviction or relationship causes the defendant to be  prohibited from possessing
firearms under federal law, Oregon law or both.
(6) The absence of a  court determination or order under this section does not affect the
lawfulness of  the defendant’s possession of firearms under ORS 166.250 or 166.255 or under
federal law.
SECTION 4.
The Department of State Police, when entering information received under
section 3 of  this 2020 Act into a state or national database, shall ensure, and shall develop
a process if  necessary to ensure, that the information specifies whether the defendant is
prohibited from possessing firearms under federal law, Oregon law or both.
SECTION 5. ORS 181A.287 is repealed.
LAW ENFORCEMENT PROFILING COMPLAINTS
SECTION 6.  ORS 131.920 is amended to read:
131.920. (1) All law enforcement agencies shall have  written policies and procedures prohibiting
profiling. The policies and procedures shall, at a minimum, include:
[3]
SB 1546
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A prohibition on profiling;
(b) Procedures allowing a complaint alleging profiling to be made to the agency:
(A) In person;
(B) In a writing signed by the  complainant and delivered by hand, postal mail, facsimile or
electronic mail; or
(C) By telephone, anonymously or through a third party;
(c) The provision of appropriate forms to use for submitting complaints alleging profiling;
(d) Procedures for submitting  a copy of each profiling complaint to the [ Law Enforcement Con-
tacts Policy and Data Review Committee ] Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  and for receiving
profiling complaints forwarded from the [ committee] commission ; and
(e) Procedures for investigating all complaints alleging profiling.
(2) A law enforcement agency shall:
(a) Investigate all complaints alleging profiling that are received by the  agency or forwarded
from the [ committee] commission .
[(b) Accept for investigation a complaint  alleging profiling that is made to the agency within 180
days of the alleged profiling incident. ]
[(c)] (b)  Respond to every complaint alleging profiling within a reasonable time after  the con-
clusion of the investigation. The response must contain a statement of the final disposition of  the
complaint.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 131.925 is amended to read:
131.925. (1)(a) A law enforcement agency shall provide to  the [ Law Enforcement Contacts Policy
and Data Review Committee ] Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  information concerning each
complaint the agency receives  alleging profiling, and shall notify the [ committee] commission  of the
disposition of the complaint, in the manner described in this subsection.
(b) The law enforcement agency shall submit to the [ committee] commission  a profiling  com-
plaint report form  summarizing each profiling complaint and the disposition of the complaint, and
a copy of each profiling complaint, once each year no later than January 31.
(c) The law enforcement agency shall submit  the form described in paragraph (b) of this sub-
section even if the agency has not received any profiling complaints.
(d) The profiling complaint report form and copies of profiling  complaints submitted to the
[committee] commission  may not include personal information concerning the complainant  or a law
enforcement officer except as to any personal information recorded on the  form as described in
subsection (4)(c) of this section.
(2)(a) A person may submit to  the [ committee] commission a complaint alleging profiling and the
[committee] commission  shall receive the complaints.
(b) The [ committee] commission  also shall receive complaints alleging profiling that are for-
warded from a law enforcement agency.
(c) The [ committee] commission  shall forward a copy  of each profiling complaint the
[committee] commission  receives to  the law enforcement agency employing the officer that is the
subject of the complaint. The forwarded complaint must  include the name of the complainant unless
the complainant requests to remain anonymous, in which case the  complainant’s name must be
redacted.
(3)(a) The [ committee] commission  may not release any personal information concerning a
complainant or a law enforcement officer who is the subject of a profiling complaint.
(b) The  personal information of complainants and of law enforcement officers who are the sub-
[4]
SB 1546
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ject of profiling complaints are exempt from public disclosure under ORS 192.355.
(4) The  [Department of State Police ] commission shall develop a standardized profiling complaint
report form. The form must provide for recording the following information:
(a) A summary of total complaints and a certification that a law enforcement  agency’s profiling
policy conforms to ORS 131.920;
(b) A summary of each complaint received by  the law enforcement agency, including the date,
time and location of the incident and the disposition of the complaint; and
(c) To the extent  known, the complainant’s gender, gender identity, age, race, ethnicity, sexual
orientation, primary language, national origin, religion, political affiliation, homeless status  and
disability status, recorded in a manner that does not identify the complainant.
(5) As used in this section, “personal information” has the meaning given that term  in ORS
807.750.
EMERGENCY VEHICLES
SECTION 8.
 ORS 801.208 is amended to read:
801.208. (1) “Commercial motor vehicle” means  a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles
and one or more vehicles that:
(a) Has a gross combination weight rating or gross  combination weight of 26,001 pounds or
more, whichever is greater, inclusive of one or more towed units, with a gross vehicle weight rating
or gross vehicle weight of more than 10,000 pounds, whichever is greater;
(b) Has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 26,001 pounds or more;
(c) Is designed to transport 16 or more persons, including the driver; or
(d) Is of any size and is used in the transportation of hazardous materials.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the term “commercial motor  vehicle” does not
include the following:
(a) An emergency fire vehicle being operated by firefighters as defined in ORS 652.050;
(b) Emergency  vehicles being operated by qualified emergency service volunteers as defined in
ORS 401.358 or police officers as defined in ORS 801.395 ;
(c) A motor home used  to transport or house, for nonbusiness purposes, the operator or the
operator’s family members or personal possessions; or
(d) A recreational vehicle that is operated solely for personal use.
DETENTION REVIEW HEARINGS
SECTION 9.
 ORS 419C.150 is amended to read:
419C.150. (1) Except as otherwise provided  in [ subsection (3) of ] this section, a youth may be
held in detention under this section and ORS 419C.145, 419C.153 and 419C.156 for a maximum of  28
days except for  good cause shown prior to the expiration of the 28-day period. If good cause for
continued  detention  is shown, the period of detention may be extended for no more than an addi-
tional 28 days unless the adjudication is continued with the express consent of the youth.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a youth alleged to be within the  jurisdiction
of the juvenile  court for having committed an act that would be murder, attempted murder, con-
spiracy to commit murder or treason if committed  by an adult and if proof of the act is evident or
the presumption strong that the  youth committed the act. The juvenile court may conduct such
[5]
SB 1546
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
hearing as the court  considers necessary to determine whether the proof is evident or the
presumption strong.
(3)(a) The time limits described in subsection (1) of this section do not apply if:
(A) The court has  stayed the proceedings on the petition alleging jurisdiction under ORS
419C.005 pursuant to ORS 419C.378;
(B) The court has not entered an order determining the youth’s fitness to proceed  pursuant to
a motion made under ORS 419C.378 or the motion has not otherwise been resolved; and
(C) The court holds the review hearings required by ORS  419C.153 and determines that de-
tention of the youth under ORS 419C.145 should continue.
(b)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the  detention of the youth
whose detention has been continued under subsection (3)(a) of this section may be extended  for no
more than 28 days upon entry of an order determining the youth’s fitness  to proceed pursuant to a
motion made under ORS 419C.378 or upon other resolution  of the motion, and if the court holds the
review hearings required by ORS 419C.153 and determines that detention of  the youth under ORS
419C.145 should continue.
(B) The detention of the youth may be  extended for more than 28 days under this paragraph if
expressly agreed to by  the youth, and if the court holds the review hearings required by ORS
419C.153 and determines that detention of the youth under ORS 419C.145 should continue.
(4)(a) The time limits described in subsection (1) of this section do not apply if:
(A) The state has filed a motion requesting waiver under ORS 419C.349;
(B) The motion has not been resolved; and
(C) The court holds the review hearings required by ORS 419C.153 and  determines that
detention of the youth should continue.
(b)(A) Except  as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the detention of youth
whose detention has been continued under paragraph (a) of this subsection may  be extended
for no more than 28 days upon entry of an order denying a motion for waiver  hearing or an
order denying waiver, and if the court holds the review hearings required by ORS 419C.153
and determines that detention of the youth should continue.
(B) The detention of the  youth may be extended for more than 28 days under this para-
graph if expressly agreed to by the  youth, and if the court holds the review hearings required
by ORS 419C.153 and determines that detention of the youth should continue.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 419C.153 is amended to read:
419C.153. (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this  section or waived by the youth
under paragraph (b) of this subsection, any youth ordered detained under ORS 419C.145, 419C.150
and 419C.156 shall have a review hearing at least every 10 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and
judicial holidays. At the review hearing the  court shall determine whether sufficient cause exists to
require continued detention of the youth. In addition,  the court may review and may confirm, revoke
or modify any order for the detention or release of the youth under this  section or ORS 419C.109,
419C.136, 419C.139, 419C.145, 419C.150 or 419C.156 and, in the event that the youth is alleged  to
have committed an offense which if committed by an adult would  be a misdemeanor or Class C fel-
ony, may do so ex parte. Release of a youth may not be revoked, however, except upon a finding that
the youth may be detained under this section or ORS 419C.145,  419C.150 and 419C.156, and after a
hearing is held in accordance with ORS  419C.109, 419C.136 and 419C.139. If the victim requests, the
district attorney or juvenile department shall notify the victim of the review hearing.
(b) Upon the filing with the court of  a written waiver signed by the youth and the youth’s
[6]
SB 1546
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
counsel, the court may waive one  or, if specifically waived by the youth, all future review
hearings under this subsection. The waiver filed with the court must  certify that the youth
and the youth’s counsel had contact no more than 10  days prior to the date the waiver is
filed.
(2)(a) Unless waived by  the youth under paragraph (b) of this subsection, any youth de-
tained under ORS 419C.145, 419C.150 and 419C.156 in whose case the state has  filed a request
for a waiver hearing  under ORS 419C.349 (1) shall have a review hearing at least every 30
days. At the review hearing  the court shall determine whether sufficient cause exists to re-
quire continued detention of the youth and to review the progress  and timelines of the case.
In addition, the court may review  and may confirm, revoke or modify any order for the de-
tention or release of the youth under this subsection or  ORS 419C.109, 419C.136, 419C.139,
419C.145, 419C.150 or 419C.156. Release of a youth may not be revoked, however,  except upon
a finding that the youth may be detained  under this section or ORS 419C.145, 419C.150 or
419C.156, and after a hearing is held in accordance with  ORS 419C.109, 419C.136 and 419C.139.
(b) Upon the filing with the court of  a written waiver signed by the youth and the youth’s
counsel, the court may waive a review hearing under this subsection. The waiver filed with
the court must certify that the youth and the youth’s  counsel had contact no more than 10
days prior to the date the waiver is filed.
(3) If a victim  requests, the district attorney or juvenile department shall notify the
victim of a review hearing under subsection (1) or (2) of this section.
WAIVER
SECTION 11.
 ORS 419C.013 is amended to read:
419C.013. (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,  a juvenile proceeding  based
on allegations of jurisdiction under ORS 419C.005 shall commence in either the county where  the
youth resides or the county in which the alleged act was committed.
(b) A juvenile proceeding described in paragraph (a) of this  subsection that is subject to
a waiver hearing under ORS 419C.319 (1) shall commence in the county where the alleged act
was committed and may not be transferred under ORS 419C.050, 419C.053 or  419C.056 unless:
(A) The court determines that the case may not be waived under ORS 419C.349; or
(B) The state stipulates  that it will not file a motion requesting waiver under ORS
419C.349 (1).
(2) Notwithstanding the  provisions of ORS 34.320, an application for a writ of habeas corpus
brought by or on behalf of a person who has been committed or placed  in a youth correction facility
which attacks the validity of the order of  commitment shall be brought in the county in which the
court that entered the order of commitment is located.
YOUTH CORRECTION FACILITIES
SECTION 12.
 ORS 420.011 is amended to read:
420.011. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) , [ and] (3)  and (4) of this  section, admissions
to the youth correction facilities are limited to youth offenders who are at least 12 but less  than
[19] 20 years of age, found by the juvenile court  to have committed an act that if committed by an
adult would constitute aggravated murder, murder, a felony or  a Class A misdemeanor and placed
[7]
SB 1546
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in the legal custody  of the Oregon Youth Authority. A youth offender admitted to a youth correction
facility may not be transferred by administrative process to any penal or correctional institution.
(2)(a) In addition to the persons  placed in the legal custody of the youth authority under ORS
419C.478 (1) or 419C.481, and  with the concurrence of the Director of the Oregon Youth Authority
or the director’s designee, persons who are committed to the  Department of Corrections under ORS
137.124 and meet the requirements of ORS 137.124 (5) may be temporarily assigned to  a youth cor-
rection  facility  as provided by ORS 137.124 (5). A person assigned on such a temporary basis remains
within the legal custody of the  Department of Corrections and such reassignment is subject to ter-
mination by the Director of  the Oregon Youth Authority by referring the person back to the De-
partment of Corrections as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) After a person is  transferred to the physical custody of the youth authority under ORS
137.124 (5), the Director of the Oregon Youth  Authority may refer the person back to the Depart-
ment of  Corrections for physical custody and placement if the director, after consulting with the
Department of Corrections, determines that the person is at least 18 years of age and:
(A) Poses a substantial danger to youth  authority staff or persons in the custody of the youth
authority; or
(B) Is not likely, in the foreseeable future, to benefit from the rehabilitation and treatment pro-
grams administered by the  youth authority and is appropriate for placement in a Department of
Corrections institution.
(3) Any person under 18 years of age at  the time of committing the crime and under 20 years
of age at the  time of sentencing and commitment who, after waiver under ORS 419C.349 (1)(b),
419C.352, 419C.364 or 419C.370 or sentencing under ORS 137.707 (5)(b)(A) or (7)(b) or 137.712, is
sentenced to a term of imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections, and any per-
son under 16 years of age who after waiver under ORS  419C.349 (1)(b), 419C.352, 419C.364 or
419C.370 or sentencing under ORS 137.707 (5)(b)(A) or (7)(b) or 137.712 is sentenced to a  term of
imprisonment in the county jail, shall be temporarily  assigned to a youth correction facility by the
Department of Corrections, or by  the sheriff to whose custody the person has been committed, pur-
suant to ORS 137.124 (6). The director  shall designate the appropriate youth correction facility or
schools for such assignment. A person assigned to a  youth correction facility under ORS 137.124 (6)
and this  subsection remains within the legal custody of the Department of Corrections or sheriff to
whose custody the person was committed. The assignment of such a person to the youth  correction
facility is subject, when  the person is 18 years of age or older, to termination by the director by
referring  the  person back to the Department of Corrections or the sheriff to serve the balance of
the person’s sentence.  Assignment to a youth correction facility pursuant to ORS 137.124 (6) and this
subsection, if not terminated earlier by the director,  shall terminate upon the person’s attaining the
age specified in ORS 420A.010 (5) setting the age limits for which  the Oregon Youth Authority may
retain legal and physical custody of the person, and the person shall be referred  to the Department
of Corrections or the sheriff having legal custody of the  person to serve the balance of the person’s
sentence.
(4)(a) Admission to youth correction facilities for youth  offenders who have been previ-
ously adjudicated, but who have not been previously placed in  custody of a youth correction
facility as a result of the adjudication, is limited to youth offenders under 19 years of age.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, admission to youth correction fa-
cilities for youth offenders who have been previously adjudicated for an act  that, if commit-
ted by  an adult, would constitute a crime listed in ORS 137.712 (1), but who have not been
[8]
SB 1546
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
previously placed in custody of a youth correction facility as a result of the adjudication, is
limited to youth offenders under 20 years of age.
[(4)] (5)  Whenever a person committed to the custody of  the Department of Corrections is tem-
porarily assigned to a youth correction facility pursuant  to this section, the youth authority may
provide  programs  and treatment for the person, and may adopt rules relating to conditions of con-
finement at the youth correction facility, as  the youth authority determines are appropriate. How-
ever, the person remains subject  to laws and rules of the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison
Supervision relating to parole.
[(5)] (6) For the purposes of determining the person’s age at the time of committing an offense
under this section:
(a) If the person is convicted of two or more offenses occurring on different days, the  person’s
age shall be calculated using the earliest date.
(b) If the person is convicted of an offense occurring within a range of dates, the person’s  age
shall be calculated using the date at the beginning of the range.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 13.
The unit captions used in this 2020 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2020 Act.
[9]