Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PROSPERITY 10,000 PROGRAM
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2022 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 660.300 to
660.364.
SECTION 2. (1) The Prosperity 10,000 Program is established to provide  career coaching,
occupational training and job placement services for at least 10,000 low-income job  seekers
who have been the most impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic.
(2) The goals of the Prosperity 10,000 program are to:
(a) Include at least 10,000 total participants;
(b) Ensure that 100 percent of the participants are individuals who receive:
(A) Supplemental nutrition assistance under ORS 411.806 to 411.845; or
(B) Temporary assistance for needy families under ORS 412.001 to 412.069;
(c) Ensure that individuals who  are historically underserved are included, including
communities of color and rural communities;
(d) Ensure that at least 50 percent of the participants are women;
(e) Ensure that individuals who are in offender reentry programs are included;
(f) Ensure that at least 80 percent of the participants  successfully complete the program;
(g) Ensure that at least 75 percent of the participants successfully  obtain employment;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 153
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and
(h) Ensure  that at least 75 percent of the participants who successfully obtain employ-
ment earn at least $15 per hour.
(3) The Prosperity 10,000 Program shall be administered  by local workforce development
boards. The local workforce development boards shall:
(a) Coordinate with nonprofit community-based organizations and  educational insti-
tutions to provide career coaching, occupational training  and job placement services to pro-
gram participants;
(b) Distribute available funds to nonprofit community-based organizations and educa-
tional institutions that provide services to program participants;
(c) Coordinate with state workforce  agencies and local workforce development boards to
provide career coaching, occupational training  and job placement services to program par-
ticipants; and
(d) Identify and conduct outreach to targeted sector businesses  and industry organiza-
tions regarding participation in the program.
(4)(a) As used in this subsection, the “SNAP Employment and Training Program”  means
the employment and training component  of the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program under 7 U.S.C. 2015(d)(4).
(b) The Department of Human Services shall:
(A) Incorporate the Prosperity 10,000 Program into the statewide  plan for the SNAP
Employment and Training Program;
(B) Seek federal reimbursement  of 50 percent of the Prosperity 10,000 Program’s costs;
and
(C) Refer individuals who receive supplemental nutrition assistance  under ORS 411.806
to 411.845 to participate in the Prosperity 10,000 Program.
(5)(a) The State  Workforce and Talent Development Board and the Department of Human
Services shall establish a joint steering committee to:
(A) Oversee the progress of the Prosperity 10,000 Program;
(B) Ensure that program goals are met;
(C) Identify areas for program improvement; and
(D) Coordinate necessary support services, including child care, rental assistance and
transportation for program participants.
(b) The board shall provide staff support for the steering committee.
(6) Not later than  60 days following the effective date of this 2022 Act, the department
shall distribute the funds specifically appropriated to the department under section 4 of  this
2022 Act to local workforce development boards to administer  the Prosperity 10,000 Program.
SECTION 3.
The Department of Human Services shall compile data  from each local
workforce development board on  the progress each board is making in carrying out the
Prosperity 10,000 Program established under section 2 of this 2022 Act and shall  submit an
annual report that includes the data, disaggregated by race, gender  and geographical area,
to the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to workforce development no
later than December 31 of each calendar year, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services, to be distributed  in consultation with the State
Workforce and Talent Development Board, for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, out of the
[2]
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
General Fund, the amount of $50,000,000, for distribution to  local workforce development
boards for the purpose of implementing  the Prosperity 10,000 Program established under
section 2 of this 2022 Act.
EXPANSION OF REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIPS
SECTION 5.
Sections 6, 8, 10 and 12 of this 2022 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
660.002 to 660.210.
SECTION 6. (1) As used in this section and section 10 of this 2022 Act:
(a) “Federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 660.300.
(b) “Local workforce development board” has the meaning given that term in ORS
660.300.
(2)(a) There is created in the Apprenticeship and Training Division  of the Bureau of La-
bor and Industries a program to make grants for the purpose of increasing diverse  partic-
ipation in apprenticeship-related training programs.
(b) The Bureau of Labor and Industries, in consultation with the Higher  Education Co-
ordinating Commission, shall award grants to local  workforce development boards, local joint
committees or trade committees that prioritize the  recruitment and registration of diverse
participants in apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs that provide training in con-
struction, health care, education and manufacturing.
(3) A  recipient of grant moneys under this section may use the funds for the following
purposes:
(a) To support recruitment and outreach activities;
(b) To provide  tuition and fee assistance for apprenticeship and preapprenticeship pro-
gram participants;
(c) To cover the costs of tools, supplies and other equipment necessary to provide  train-
ing;
(d) Technology supports, including broadband service;
(e) Culturally and linguistically relevant wraparound services; and
(f) To provide paid work  experiences, including stipends and wages, for participants in
preapprenticeshipprograms.
(4) The bureau shall disburse grant moneys to an entity under this section:
(a) Using the  same formula required under the federal Workforce Innovation and Op-
portunity Act for the allocation of funds to local workforce development boards.
(b) Not later than 60 days following the effective date of this 2022 Act.
(5) The bureau shall compile data on the use of grant funds by each recipient that  has
been awarded a grant under this section and submit  a report to the interim committees of
the Legislative Assembly related to workforce development no less than semiannually, in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245. The report must include:
(a) A detailed description of each grant recipient’s use of grant funds.
(b) The outcomes of recruitment efforts, including the number of diverse participants
who have registered in or completed an apprenticeship or preapprenticeship training program
in construction, education, health care or manufacturing.
(c) Aggregated data concerning income and the amount of taxes paid to the state  by ap-
[3]
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
prenticeship and preapprenticeship program participants.
(d) Information  necessary to determine the return on investment, if any, of the grant
program created under this section.
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Bureau of Labor and Industries, to be distributed in consultation  with the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of  $2,500,000, for the purpose of providing grants as described in sec-
tion 6 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) There is created in the Apprenticeship and Training Division of the Bu-
reau of Labor and Industries a program to make grants to community-based  organizations
to develop and implement new  registered apprenticeship or preapprenticeship programs in
construction, health care, education and manufacturing.
(2) Grants  awarded under this section may be used by recipients for the following pur-
poses:
(a) To pay for costs of convening  employers in the construction, health care, education
and manufacturing industry sectors;
(b) Development of uniform standards for any newly  established apprenticeship and pre-
apprenticeship programs;
(c) Development of curriculum and standard courses  of study for the instruction of ap-
prenticeship and preapprenticeship program participants; and
(d) Any other cost that a grant recipient identifies, in an application submitted to  the
Bureau of Labor and Industries,  as necessary for the administration or implementation of
an apprenticeship or preapprenticeship program established under this section.
(3) The bureau, in consultation with the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,
shall determine  the process for applying for grants under this section, the standards and
criteria for awarding grants and the general terms and conditions of  the grants. The stan-
dards must be informed by and consistent with  recommendations from industry and business
consortia in construction, health care, education and manufacturing.
(4) Grant moneys awarded under this section  shall be disbursed to eligible community-
based organizations not later than 60 days following the effective date of this 2022 Act.
(5) The bureau shall compile data from each recipient that has been awarded a  grant
under this  section regarding the status and use of grant funds to ensure funding is expended
on the permissible purposes. The bureau  shall submit a report summarizing the data to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to workforce  development no less
than semiannually, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245.
SECTION 9. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Bureau of Labor and Industries, to be distributed in consultation  with the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the  amount of $2,500,000, for the purpose of providing grants under section 8 of
this 2022 Act.
SECTION 10. (1) As used in this section, “culturally  specific organization” means an or-
ganization that serves a particular cultural community, that is primarily staffed and led  by
members of  that community and that demonstrates intimate knowledge of the lived experi-
ence of that community, including, but not limited to:
(a) The impact of racism or discrimination in the community;
[4]
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Specific disparities in access  to services and resources experienced by the community;
and
(c) Community strengths, cultural practices, beliefs and traditions.
(2) The Higher Education  Coordinating Commission shall administer a grant program to
award grants to local workforce development boards that  partner with culturally specific
organizations to develop new apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs in construction,
education, health  care and manufacturing and to promote equitable participation in the
programs.
(3) Not later than 30 days following the effective date of this 2022 Act, the commission
shall distribute the funds specifically appropriated to the commission  under section 11 of this
2022 Act as grants to local workforce development boards to carry out the purposes  de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section. The commission shall disburse moneys to local
workforce development board grant  recipients using the same formula as required under the
federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity  Act for the allocation of funds to local
workforce development boards.
(4) Each local workforce development board that receives  a grant under this section
shall, not more than 90 days after the moneys are  disbursed, fully expend the moneys on
facilitating partnerships with one  or more culturally specific organizations to begin develop-
ment of new apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs described in  subsection (2) of
this section.
(5) The commission shall compile data from each  recipient that has been awarded a grant
under this  section on the status and use of grant funds to ensure funding is expended on the
permissible purposes. The commission  shall submit a report to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to workforce development no less than  semiannually, in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245. The report shall:
(a) Include a summary of the data received from the grant recipients; and
(b) Identify each culturally  specific organization that has partnered with a local
workforce development board to develop a new apprenticeship or preapprenticeship program
described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 11.
In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $12,500,000, for the purpose of providing grants
as described in section 10 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 12. (1) As used in this section,  “culturally specific organization” has the
meaning given that term in section 10 of this 2022 Act.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall administer a  grant program to
directly award grants to culturally specific organizations for the development and adminis-
tration of new apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs developed  by such organiza-
tions.
(b) The commission shall establish  a competitive process for any request for proposals
by which a culturally specific organization may  apply to receive grants under this section.
The process must include eligibility requirements for applicants and the terms and conditions
of grants.
(2) The commission shall compile information from each culturally  specific organization
that has been awarded a  grant under this section about program outcomes and the use of
[5]
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
grant funds by each apprenticeship and preapprenticeship  program established by a cul-
turally specific organization. The commission  shall submit a report that summarizes the
performance and expenditure information to the interim committees of the  Legislative As-
sembly related to workforce development no less than semiannually,  in the manner provided
in ORS 192.245.
SECTION 13.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June  30,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $12,500,000, for the purpose of providing grants
under section 12 of this 2022 Act.
SUNSET
SECTION 14. Sections 2, 3, 6, 8, 10 and 12 of this 2022 Act are repealed on January 2, 2026.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 15. The unit captions used in this 2022 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2022 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 16. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[6]