Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “chronically absent” means having unexcused
absences for 10 percent or more of school days during any four-week period.
(2) The Parenting Effectiveness Program  is established within the Department of Human
Services. The  purpose of the program is to support families in this state in fostering a posi-
tive environment that promotes school attendance and academic success.
(3) In administering the program,  the department shall award grants to counties or other
local entities,  as determined by the department, to implement local parenting effectiveness
programs.
(4) The grants awarded under this section may be used to:
(a) Advocate for participating families at school meetings and appointments with  health
care providers to ensure that the  family receives culturally and linguistically appropriate
services;
(b) Provide education and support to participating families, including information about:
(A) Individual and family safety planning;
(B) Bullying prevention;
(C) Suicide awareness;
(D) De-escalation skills;
(E) Inclusion and diversity;
(F) Basic needs and housing support;
(G) Coping skills;
(H) Self-advocacy; and
(I) Mental health awareness; and
(c) Assist participating families in applying for and accessing resources, including:
(A) Supplemental nutrition assistance;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 641
HB 2374
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
(B) Temporary assistance for needy families;
(C) Women, Infants and Children Program benefits;
(D) Substance use disorder treatment;
(E) Mental health services;
(F) Vision care; and
(G) Dental care.
(5) If a student is chronically absent, the attendance supervisor  for the school district
shall refer the  student and the student’s family to the nearest local parenting effectiveness
program for a needs assessment and services, as described in subsection  (4) of this section,
for the purpose of helping the student maintain regular attendance in school.
(6) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of  this section, including
rules governing the form and process for grant applications.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 339.055 is amended to read:
339.055. (1) The  attendance supervisor when notified of a truancy or unexcused absence shall
investigate the truancy or nonattendance at  school. If the child is not exempt from compulsory
school attendance, the attendance supervisor shall proceed as provided in ORS 339.080  and 339.090.
(2) When a student is chronically absent, as defined  in section 1 of this 2025 Act, the
attendance supervisor shall refer the student and the student’s family for participation  in
the nearest local parenting effectiveness program, as provided in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
[2]