Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 238A.
SECTION 2. (1) The Public Employees Retirement Board shall  establish by rule defi-
nitions of the  terms “police officer” and “firefighter” for the sole purpose of determining
whether a  police officer, as defined in ORS 238.005, or a firefighter, as defined in ORS
238A.005, is entitled to the benefit provided in ORS 238A.125  (1)(a) or the benefit provided in
ORS 238A.125 (1)(b).
(2) In  establishing the definitions under this section, the board shall consider federal de-
finitions related to retirement of police officers and firefighters.
SECTION 3.  ORS 238A.125, as amended  by section 4, chapter 75, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended
to read:
238A.125. (1) Upon retiring at normal retirement age, a vested pension program  member shall
be paid an annual pension for the life of the member as follows:
(a) For service as a police  officer or firefighter who meets the definition of “police
officer” or “firefighter” established by the Public Employees Retirement  Board under section
2 of this 2025 Act, two percent of final average salary multiplied by the number of  years of
retirement credit attributable to service as a police officer or firefighter  who meets the de-
finition of  “police officer” or “firefighter” established by the Public Employees Retirement
Board under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[(a)] (b)  For service as a police officer or firefighter  who does not meet the  definition of
“police officer” or  “firefighter” established by the Public Employees Retirement Board under
section 2 of this  2025 Act , 1.8 percent of final average salary multiplied by the number of years
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2450
SB 751
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of retirement  credit attributable to service as a police officer or firefighter  who does not meet the
definition of “police officer” or “firefighter” established by the  Public Employees Retirement
Board under section 2 of this 2025 Act .
[(b)] (c) For  service as other than a police officer or firefighter, 1.5 percent of final average
salary multiplied by the number of years of retirement credit attributable to service as other  than
a police officer or firefighter.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of ORS 238A.100 to 238A.250,  the annual benefit payable to
a member under the pension program and  under any other tax-qualified defined benefit plan main-
tained by the participating public employer may not exceed the applicable limitations set forth in
26 U.S.C. 415(b), as in effect on  December 31, 2023. The Public Employees Retirement Board shall
adopt rules  for the administration of this limitation, including adjustments in the annual dollar lim-
itation to reflect cost-of-living adjustments authorized by the Internal Revenue Service.
(3) The board shall make no actuarial adjustment in a  member’s pension calculated under this
section by reason of the member’s retirement after normal retirement age.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 238A.125, as amended by section 4, chapter 75, Oregon Laws 2024, and section
3, chapter 101, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
238A.125. (1) Upon  retiring at normal retirement age, a vested pension program member shall
be paid an annual pension for the life of the member as follows:
(a) For service as a police officer or firefighter who meets  the definition of  “police
officer” or “firefighter” established by the Public Employees Retirement  Board under section
2 of this  2025 Act, two percent of final average salary multiplied by the number of years of
retirement credit attributable to service  as a police officer or firefighter who meets the de-
finition of “police officer” or “firefighter” established by the Public Employees  Retirement
Board under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[(a)] (b)  For  service as a police officer or firefighter  who does not meet the definition of
“police officer” or  “firefighter” established by the Public Employees Retirement Board under
section 2 of this 2025 Act , 1.8 percent of final average salary multiplied by the  number of years
of retirement  credit attributable to service as a police officer or firefighter  who does not meet the
definition of “police officer” or “firefighter” established by the  Public Employees Retirement
Board under section 2 of this 2025 Act .
[(b)] (c) For service in a hazardous position, 1.8 percent  of final average salary multiplied by the
number of years of retirement credit attributable to service in a hazardous position.
[(c)] (d) For service as other than a police officer or firefighter or in a hazardous position, 1.5
percent of final average salary multiplied  by the number of years of retirement credit attributable
to service as other than a police officer or firefighter or in a hazardous position.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of ORS  238A.100 to 238A.250, the annual benefit payable to
a member under the pension program and under any  other tax-qualified defined benefit plan main-
tained by the participating public employer may not exceed the applicable limitations set forth in
26 U.S.C. 415(b), as in effect on December 31, 2023.  The Public Employees Retirement Board shall
adopt rules for the administration of this limitation, including adjustments in the annual dollar  lim-
itation to reflect cost-of-living adjustments authorized by the Internal Revenue Service.
(3) The board shall make no  actuarial adjustment in a member’s pension calculated under this
section by reason of the member’s retirement after normal retirement age.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Task Force on Health Insurance Coverage  for Retired Police Officers
and Firefighters is established.
[2]
SB 751
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The task force consists of seven members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall  appoint one member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from  among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint five representatives as follows:
(A) A representative employed by the Public Employees Retirement System.
(B) A representative of an association that represents employees of the Oregon State
Police.
(C) A representative of an association that represents firefighters,  as defined in ORS
238.005 and 238A.005.
(D) A representative of a state employer of  police officers or firefighters, as those terms
are defined in ORS 238.005 and 238A.005.
(E) A representative of a local government employer of police officers  or firefighters, as
those terms are defined in ORS 238.005 and 238A.005.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Evaluate methods  of providing health insurance coverage to retired police officers and
firefighters, as those terms are defined in ORS  238.005 and 238A.005, including methods taken
by other states and local agencies.
(b) Review additional impediments to retirement of police  officers and firefighters, as
those terms are defined in ORS 238.005 and 238A.005.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee  of the Legislative
Assembly related to general government no later than December 15, 2026.
(11) The Public Employees Retirement Board shall provide staff support to the task force.
(12) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 6.
Section 5 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
[3]
SB 751
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
SECTION 7.
(1) The Public Employees Retirement Board shall establish definitions  of
“police officer” and “firefighter” under section 2 of this 2025 Act before January 1, 2026.
(2) The amendments to ORS  238A.125 by sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act and the defi-
nitions established under section 2 of this 2025 Act  apply to service performed on or after
January 1, 2026.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]