Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Public corporation” means an entity that the State of Oregon  creates to carry out
a public purpose by participating in activities  in which a private enterprise may also partic-
ipate in the course of the private enterprise’s business.
(2) “Terminal 6” means the container shipping facilities  that the Port of Portland owns
and designates as Terminal 6 in maps and documents that  the port produces, including all
real and personal property included within the designation that the  port leases to another
person.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) The Oregon Shipping Authority is established as an independent public
corporation with the purposes and powers set forth in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(b) The intent of sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act is that:
(A) The authority has,  as a public corporation, the operating flexibility necessary to en-
sure success while remaining  subject to principles of public accountability and fundamental
public policy; and
[2]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Although public officials appoint  the authority’s board of directors, the board of di-
rectors has the power to set the authority’s policies and manage the authority’s operations.
(2)(a) A board of directors with  12 members shall govern the authority. The county
commissioners in each region specified in paragraph  (c) of this subsection, by majority vote
of all of the county commissioners in the  region, shall appoint a director to represent the
region.
(b) A majority of the county  commissioners in the same region that a director represents
on the board of directors may remove the director for cause by majority vote  after providing
notice and a public hearing.
(c) Each director on the authority’s board of directors  represents a region that consists
of one or more counties of this state. The regions are:
Region Counties
1 Multnomah
2 Washington
3 Clackamas and Hood River
4 Clatsop, Columbia,
Tillamook and Yamhill
5 Lincoln, Polk
and Benton
6 Marion and Linn
7 Lane
8 Coos and Douglas
9 Curry, Josephine
and Jackson
10 Klamath, Lake,
Harney, Malheur,
Deschutes and Crook
11 Wasco, Sherman,
Gilliam, Morrow,
Jefferson and Wheeler
12 Umatilla, Union,
Wallowa, Grant
and Baker
(d) If a port is located within a region described in paragraph  (c) of this subsection, the
county commissioners  in the region shall obtain from the port commissioners of the port a
recommendation for a candidate or candidates before appointing a director to the authority.
A recommendation under this paragraph is a public record, but the custodian of the  record
shall redact from the record the  substance of a port commissioner’s opinions and recom-
mendations before disclosing the record, unless the  port commissioner consents to a disclo-
sure without the redaction.
[3]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) A director  must be a resident of this state and a citizen of the United States and must
have at least three years of  experience in maritime, rail or truck shipping, international
trade or importing and exporting goods.
(f) A director may not be a county commissioner or a member of the  Legislative As-
sembly and may not be an employee of the authority.
(3)(a) A director’s term of office is four years. The county commissioners in  each region
by majority vote shall appoint a successor  to represent the region before a director’s term
expires or a replacement for the  remainder of a director’s term of office if the director’s
position is vacant for any reason. A director is eligible for reappointment  but may not serve
for more than two  terms. The appointment of a successor or replacement is immediately
effective.
(b) A director is entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495.
(c)(A) Except as provided in  subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, a director of the au-
thority may not have any pecuniary  interest, other than an incidental interest that the di-
rector discloses and makes a matter of public  record at the time the county commissioners
in a region appoint the  director, in any business entity other than the authority that, during
the director’s term of office, will likely benefit, financially or otherwise, from the  authority’s
operations.
(B) A director may have a pecuniary interest in a  business entity that might benefit in
particular circumstances from the operations of the  authority if the director discloses the
interest to the authority’s board of directors and offers to refrain from participating  in a
decision of the board of directors that  might benefit the business entity in which the director
has the interest. Unless the authority’s bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors shall
exclude the director that disclosed the interest from participating in the decision.
(4) The board of directors shall select one director  as chairperson and another director
as vice chairperson for terms and with duties and powers the  board of directors considers
necessary to perform the functions of chairperson and vice chairperson.
(5) The board of directors shall meet at least  once every two months at a time and place
the board of directors designates or  at other times and places that the chairperson or a
majority of the board of directors specifies.
(6) The board  of directors shall adopt bylaws and policies for operating and managing the
authority that are consistent with applicable provisions of law.
(7) The board of directors shall appoint a president  and officers that the board deems
necessary to administer and  manage the authority. The president shall administer and
manage the authority’s affairs subject to the board’s oversight and supervision.
SECTION 3.
(1)(a) The Oregon  Shipping Authority is a governmental entity that performs
governmental functions and exercises governmental  powers, but does not have territorial
boundaries within this state and is not  a unit of local or municipal government or a state
agency for the purposes of state statutes or constitutional provisions. The  authority shall
carry out the purposes set forth  in subsection (2) of this section and has the powers, rights
and privileges that sections  1 to 22 of this 2017 Act expressly confer on the authority or that
are otherwise implied by law or are  incident to expressly conferred powers, rights and priv-
ileges.
(b) The authority shall incorporate  as a nonprofit corporation. Except to the extent set
forth in sections 1 to 22  of this 2017 Act, the authority is subject to ORS chapter 65 with
[4]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
respect to the  authority’s formation, governance, operation and dissolution and as to all
other matters  to which a nonprofit corporation would otherwise be subject. To the extent
that a provision of sections  1 to 22 of this 2017 Act conflicts with a provision of ORS chapter
65, the provisions of sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act control the operations of the authority
and supersede the provisions of ORS chapter 65.
(2) The purposes of the authority are to:
(a) Ensure shipping capability and services that allow the  state to engage fully in im-
porting, transporting and exporting goods in an efficient and  cost-effective manner, with
consideration of safety and environmental concerns;
(b) Reestablish, enhance and improve the frequency and volume of maritime container
shipping services at Terminal 6;
(c) Negotiate, renegotiate and enter  into lease arrangements with respect to Terminal 6
that improve delivery of efficient and cost-effective operations;
(d) Ensure that shipping channels in the Columbia River are deep enough for  maritime
shipping vessels to use;
(e) Advocate for statutes and rules that improve  trucking, shipping, insurance and other
necessary aspects of freight transportation in a safe and cost-effective manner;
(f) Conduct studies concerning, and advocate for,  repairs and improvements to trans-
portation infrastructure such as transload facilities for  truck and rail transportation,
short-line railroads, connections  between short-line and long-line railroads and other facili-
ties that  enhance freight transportation within this state in a safe and cost-effective manner;
(g) Conduct studies and advocate  for developing and maintaining additional shipping ter-
minals at ports within this state; and
(h) Develop a statewide freight transportation plan  that includes measures to develop,
maintain and expand existing facilities and systems for shipping  freight into, out of and
within this state.
(3) In order to carry out the purposes set forth in subsection (2)  of this section, the au-
thority has the power to:
(a) Acquire, purchase, receive, hold,  own, control, lease, rent, manage, operate, use, im-
prove, develop, construct, equip, furnish, lend, sell, convey, exchange or otherwise  dispose
of real property, personal property and intellectual property of any description or nature;
(b) Make available by  lease or other agreement, or control access to, any property, fa-
cility, asset or service the authority owns, controls or holds,  under terms the board deems
appropriate, impose and collect any fee or charge the board deems reasonable  for using the
property, facility, asset or service and terminate or deny access to the  property, facility,
asset or service in accordance with the terms of the lease or agreement  or as the board
otherwise deems appropriate;
(c) Exercise the right of eminent domain in  the state’s name and in accordance with ORS
chapter 35 under circumstances that  the authority justifies in writing to all affected persons
with specific reference to an aspect of the authority’s mission;
(d) Enter into and fully  participate in operating partnerships, joint ventures or other
business arrangements with any public or private entity;
(e) Form or acquire subsidiary entities that, in the judgment of the board of directors,
enable the authority to effectively carry out the purposes set forth in this section;
(f) Purchase, receive, subscribe for or  otherwise acquire, hold, own, vote, use, sell,
[5]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mortgage, lend, pledge, invest  in, deal in or otherwise dispose of shares of stock or other
equity in, debt or other obligations of or other interests in any other  entity, using any fund,
account or subaccount;
(g) Enter  into contracts and other agreements with entities or individuals with appro-
priate experience, expertise, capacity and knowledge  of shipping and freight transportation
and related infrastructure operation, management, maintenance, repair and service to oper-
ate or manage on the authority’s behalf any department, section, division or  other element
of the authority, property that the authority owns, leases or controls, or to perform any duty
or function the authority performs, including but not limited  to clerical, administrative, ac-
counting and other functions;
(h) Contract or otherwise agree  with a state agency to perform any of the authority’s
duties or functions or exercise any of the  authority’s powers at a level of compensation that
does not exceed the state agency’s actual cost of performing the duty or function or  exer-
cising the power;
(i) Employ, fix  compensation for, discipline, dismiss and set employment conditions,
privileges and terms in accordance with applicable law for any individual  whom the authority
deems necessary to enable the authority to effectively carry  out the purposes set forth in
this section, except that the authority may  not administer or require a political or sectarian
test as a condition of employment;
(j) Offer to employees of the authority a retirement program that is  an alternative to or
that is in addition to the Public  Employees Retirement System, notwithstanding the pro-
visions of ORS chapters 238 and 238A;
(k) Sue in the authority’s own name any public or private  entity, or be sued in the
authority’s own name by any public or private entity, in any local, state or federal forum;
(L) Solicit and receive gifts and  donations of money or property of any description from
any source for the  authority’s benefit and, subject to the terms of the gift or donation, re-
tain, invest and use the gift or donation, provided that the gift or donation does not  inure
to the benefit of any director, officer, employee or agent of the authority or  to any other
individual;
(m) Acquire, receive, hold, keep, pledge, control, manage, use, lend, expend  and invest
all funds, appropriations, gifts, bequests,  securities and revenue that the authority obtains
from any source;
(n) Borrow money in amounts, for times and on terms that the authority’s board of  di-
rectors deems appropriate;
(o) Issue bonds or other debt instruments in the  name of the State of Oregon with the
cooperation and under the supervision of the State Treasurer and in accordance  with ORS
chapter 289 and other applicable law;
(p) Purchase  insurance, operate a self-insurance program or otherwise arrange for
equivalent insurance of any nature;
(q) Indemnify and  defend the authority’s directors, officers, agents, employees or other
individuals that the authority designates to carry out the authority’s purpose;
(r) Establish, charge, collect, enforce, recover and use fees  for services and facilities the
authority provides or fines to penalize or prevent illegal activity that  hinders freight traffic
into and out of Terminal 6;
(s) Consult and cooperate, or otherwise interact, with any government agency,  including
[6]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Federal  Maritime Commission, the United States Coast Guard and the United States
Army Corps of Engineers;
(t) Adopt, amend and repeal bylaws and policies and otherwise administer and manage
the authority’s affairs;
(u) Adopt, amend and repeal administrative rules in accordance  with ORS chapter 183;
and
(v) Perform any other act in accordance with law that in the judgment of the authority’s
board of directors is necessary or appropriate to carry out the authority’s purposes.
(4) The authority  may exercise the powers set forth in this section, notwithstanding that
by exercising a power, the authority engages in activities that state or federal antitrust laws
may deem to be anticompetitive.
(5) Moneys and other  proceeds that the authority realizes from conducting activities
under subsection (3)(f) of this  section belong solely to the authority. The State of Oregon
does not have a proprietary interest in the moneys or other proceeds.
(6)(a) The authority may bring, on the authority’s own behalf, on  behalf of the state or
on behalf of any other injured person, any legal action that  is permitted under federal, state
or common law to seek damages, equitable relief  or another remedy, in any court or in any
administrative or other proceeding, for illegal activity that:
(A) Damages cargo, cargo containers or cargo transportation vehicles or equipment;
(B) Delays or hinders operations or  efforts to transport, move or otherwise handle cargo
or to use cargo containers or cargo transportation vehicles or equipment; or
(C) Injures any person who is engaged in transporting,  moving or otherwise handling
cargo or in using cargo transportation vehicles or equipment.
(b) The authority may engage legal counsel and  employ any person to investigate or
evaluate a case or bring an action under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The authority may establish a system to allocate damages the authority  recovers
from an action under this subsection to a person that has a  claim for damages, and may
retain up to 25 percent of the  recovery to compensate the authority for costs related to
bringing an action under this subsection.
(7) The authority may contract with a public safety agency or law  enforcement agency
of this  state to investigate and prosecute criminal activity that occurs in or around the
authority’s property or facilities and that affects trade within this state.
(8) Not later  than April 15 of each year, the authority shall file with the Governor and
the appropriate committees of the Legislative Assembly, or, if the Legislative Assembly  is
not in session, the appropriate interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly, a report that
describes the operations and activities of the authority during the preceding year.
SECTION 4.
(1) ORS chapters 35, 190,  192, 244 and 295 and ORS 30.260 to 30.460, 200.005
to 200.025, 200.045 to 200.090, 236.605 to 236.640, 243.650 to 243.782,  307.090 and 307.112 apply
to the Oregon Shipping Authority under the same terms as  the statutes apply to public
bodies other than the State of Oregon.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section and  except as otherwise provided by
law, ORS chapters 182,  240, 276, 279A, 279B, 279C, 282, 283, 291, 292 and 293 and ORS 35.550
to 35.575, 180.060, 180.210 to 180.235, 184.305 to 184.345, 190.430, 190.480, 190.490, 192.105, 243.696,
278.011 to 278.120, 278.315 to 278.415, 279.835 to 279.855, 283.085 to  283.092, 357.805 to 357.895
and 656.017 (2) do not apply to the authority or to a subsidiary entity  that the authority
[7]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
forms or acquires to carry out the purposes set forth in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, ORS 279A.100, 279A.105, 279A.107  and
279A.110 apply to the authority, the directors, officers and employees of the  authority and a
subsidiary entity that the authority forms or acquires as  if the authority or the subsidiary
entity were a contracting agency, as defined in ORS 279A.010.
(4) Sections 1 to 22  of this 2017 Act and other laws described in this section that apply
to the authority must be liberally construed to effect the authority’s purpose  and mission
as set forth in sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) The Oregon Shipping Authority may by rule establish a police department
and commission  employees of the authority as police officers. A police department that the
authority establishes under this section has the authority and immunity of a municipal police
department in this state.
(2) A  police officer that the authority commissions under this section has the authority
and immunity that a peace  officer or police officer in this state has and may enforce criminal
laws of this state and any administrative rules the authority adopts under sections  1 to 22
of this 2017 Act.
(3) If the authority establishes a  police department and commissions police officers under
this section, the  authority shall appoint a chief of police and in collaboration with the chief
of police shall by rule establish a process to receive and respond  to complaints against the
police department or about the conduct of police officers.
(4) The authority may enter into a contract or agreement under the terms of which:
(a) The police officers of the authority and of a political subdivision,  a municipal corpo-
ration, a department or an agency of the state provide mutual aid; or
(b) A public safety agency of the  state provides services to investigate or prosecute a
crime or violation of a rule of the authority.
SECTION 6.
(1) Legal title to real and personal property  and any facilities that the State
of Oregon acquired before the operative date of sections 1 to 22 of this 2017  Act that the
Oregon Shipping Authority uses or manages  in accordance with sections 1 to 22 of this 2017
Act remains with the State  of Oregon. The Oregon Shipping Authority has the exclusive
care, custody and control of the real and personal property and facilities  under the terms
of an exclusive leasehold interest in the  real and personal property and facilities for a term
of 99 years. The term of  the leasehold begins on the operative date of sections 1 to 22 of this
2017 Act and shall renew automatically and perpetually for consecutive 99-year terms.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of Oregon law concerning the  authority of state
agencies to lease real property and facilities, the Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices, acting on behalf of the State of Oregon, shall execute a lease for all real and  personal
property and facilities to  which the State of Oregon has title and that the Oregon Shipping
Authority uses in  accordance with sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act. The department may not
terminate the lease unless:
(a) The Oregon Shipping Authority ceases operations or ceases to exist, or the Legislative
Assembly or another operation of  law alters the purposes or powers of the authority in such
a manner as to make the lease no longer tenable;
(b) The State of  Oregon conveys or transfers title to the real or personal property and
facilities to a nongovernmental entity in accordance with applicable law; and
(c) The State of Oregon does  not place any other conditions upon the Oregon Shipping
[8]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Authority in connection with the termination.
(3) The Oregon Shipping Authority shall pay the State  of Oregon the sum of $99 as con-
sideration at the time the authority executes or renews the lease.
(4) The Oregon Shipping Authority shall manage and maintain all real and  personal
property and facilities that are subject to the lease described in this  section. The authority
may not sell or convey  legal title to, but may encumber, the real and personal property and
facilities. The State of Oregon may  encumber the real and personal property and facilities
only in a manner  that would not impair the financial condition of the authority or the rights
of any person that holds an obligation of the authority.
SECTION 7. (1) The Port of Portland shall convey all right, title, ownership and interest
in Terminal 6 to the Oregon Shipping  Authority and shall execute all necessary legal docu-
ments and other procedures necessary for the conveyance. The conveyance is  effective on
the operative date of sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall assist the Port  of Portland
and the authority in preparing all of the necessary documents and in following all the  re-
quired procedures for the conveyance.
(3) The authority shall pay  the costs for the conveyance from funds appropriated to the
authority for the purposes set forth in this section.
SECTION 8. (1) The Oregon Shipping Authority, by September 1 of each even-numbered
year, shall submit to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services a  funding request
for the  coming biennium. The department shall include and submit the authority’s request
to the Legislative Assembly as part of the Governor’s biennial budget.
(2) The Legislative Assembly shall appropriate the authority’s budget request to the de-
partment for allocation to the authority. Funds that the Legislative  Assembly appropriates
to the department for allocation to the authority are subject to any restrictions or conditions
that the Legislative  Assembly places on the funds, but the conditions and restrictions do not
apply to other funds the authority uses in the authority’s budget or operations.
(3) The authority shall prepare the authority’s budget  and any funding request under this
section in accordance  with generally accepted accounting principles. The authority’s board
of directors shall  adopt a budget for the authority in accordance with ORS 192.610 to 192.690.
SECTION 9. (1) The Oregon Shipping Authority shall promptly and in writing notify the
Legislative Assembly or the Emergency Board, if the Legislative Assembly is not in  session,
after discovering any shortfall in moneys available to pay when due an amount necessary  to
satisfy a bond or other debt obligation or an agreement  to repay moneys the authority bor-
rowed. In the notification, the authority shall specify the amount of the shortfall.
(2) In enacting this section, the Legislative Assembly acknowledges an intention to pro-
vide, from funds other  than funds previously appropriated to the authority, moneys neces-
sary to pay the debt or obligation. This subsection does  not, however, legally obligate the
Legislative Assembly or the Emergency Board to provide funds for the purpose set  forth in
this section except to the  extent that the Oregon Constitution may require the provision of
funds.
SECTION 10. (1) The Oregon Shipping Authority may adopt policies to govern access to
personnel records that are less than 25 years old.
(2) A  policy the authority adopts under subsection (1) of this section must subject per-
sonnel records to restrictions on access unless  the president of the authority finds that the
[9]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
public interest in maintaining individual rights to  privacy would not suffer by disclosing the
records. The authority may designate classes of information  or persons that are subject to
disclosure or may grant access subject to stated times and  conditions, but the authority may
not limit access to records that are more than 25 years old.
(3) The authority  may not adopt or enforce a rule or policy that denies or limits an
employee’s access to the employee’s  personnel records. The authority shall keep personnel
records in a designated location that is available to the employee.
SECTION 11. (1) Oregon Shipping Authority may authorize an officer or employee of  the
authority to receive compensation from private or public  resources, including but not limited
to income from:
(a) Consulting;
(b) Appearances and speeches;
(c) Intellectual property the officer or  employee conceives, reduces to practice or origi-
nates and that the authority owns;
(d) Providing services or other valuable consideration for a private corporation, individual
or entity, whether the officer or employee  receives cash, in-kind payment, stock or another
equity interest, or anything of value regardless of whether a licensing agreement exists be-
tween the authority and the private entity; and
(e) Performing public duties for which private organizations,  including affiliates of the
authority, pay the officer or employee and augment the officer’s or  employee’s publicly
funded compensation, provided that the authority establishes policies under  which the au-
thority permits the compensation to the officer or employee.
(2) The authority may not  authorize compensation, as described in subsection (1) of this
section, that, in the authority’s judgment,  does not comport with the mission of the au-
thority or that substantially interferes with an officer’s or  employee’s duties to the author-
ity.
(3) Compensation described and authorized under subsection (1) of this section is  official
compensation or reimbursement of expenses for the purposes of ORS 244.040 and  is not an
honorarium prohibited under ORS 244.042.  If the authority’s authorization or the officer’s
or employee’s receipt of the compensation creates  a potential conflict of interest, the officer
or employee shall report  the potential conflict in writing in accordance with policies the au-
thority adopts. The disclosure is a public record that is subject to public inspection.
(4) The authority shall adopt  standards that govern an employee’s outside employment
and activities, that define potential conflicts of interest in a  manner that is consistent with
ORS 244.020, that address resolutions and public disclosures of conflicts of  interest and that
specify procedures for reporting  and hearing complaints about potential or actual conflicts
of interest.
SECTION 12.
(1) Sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act do not impair the obligations or agree-
ments of the State of Oregon or the Oregon Department of Administrative Services with
respect to bonds, certificates of participation, financing agreements or other  agreements to
borrow money that the state or the department issued before the  operative date of sections
1 to 22 of  this 2017 Act for equipment, facilities or other property within or connected to
Terminal 6 or that otherwise passes to  or comes under the control of the Oregon Shipping
Authority on and after the  operative date of sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act. The authority
and the department shall  take all actions necessary to ensure full compliance with all
[10]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
indentures, resolutions, declarations, agreements and other documents related to  the bonds,
certificates of participation, financing agreements or  other agreements to borrow money
that the state or the department issued before the  operative date of sections 1 to 22 of this
2017 Act.  The authority and the department shall establish, in a written agreement that the
State Treasurer approves, the  authority’s responsibility to pay to the department moneys
that are  sufficient to pay when due all principal, interest and any other charges on bonds,
certificates of participation, financing agreements or  other agreements to borrow money
that the state or the department issued before the operative  date of sections 1 to 22 of this
2017 Act for equipment, facilities or  other property within or connected to Terminal 6 or that
otherwise passes to or comes under the control of the authority on and after the operative
date of sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act.
(2) A person  that holds obligations that the authority issues on or after the operative
date of sections  1 to 22 of this 2017 Act may receive payment from the rents, revenues, re-
ceipts, appropriations or other income of the  authority without priority over payments due
to a person that holds an obligation that the state or the department  issued before the op-
erative date of sections 1 to 22 of  this 2017 Act for equipment, facilities or other property
within or connected to Terminal 6 or that otherwise passes to or comes under the control
of the authority on and after the operative date of sections 1 to  22 of this 2017 Act, but only
to the extent that:
(a) The person does not have a right, lien or other interest with respect to  the rents,
revenues, receipts, appropriations or other income of the authority that  is senior or superior
to the right granted to a person that holds obligations that the state or the department is-
sued before the operative date of  sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act for equipment, facilities
or other property within or connected to Terminal 6 or that otherwise passes to or  comes
under the control of the authority on and after the operative date of sections 1 to 22 of  this
2017 Act; and
(b) The state or  the department, acting on the person’s behalf, has a lien or other secu-
rity interest in the rents, revenues, receipts, appropriations  or other income of the authority
that is not junior to and is at least proportionate with any lien or other security interest that
a person that holds  an obligation the authority issued has with respect to the rents, reven-
ues, receipts, appropriations or other income of the authority.
(3) The authority shall pay when due any expenses, including  legal expenses, judgments,
liabilities and federal arbitrage and rebate  penalties that arise from the authority’s actions
if the state or the department incurred the  expenses in connection with bonds, certificates
of participation, financing agreements or other agreements to borrow money that the state
or the department issued before the  operative date of sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act for
equipment, facilities or other property within or connected to Terminal 6 or that  otherwise
passes to or comes under the control of the authority on  and after the operative date of
sections 1 to 22 of this  2017 Act. The authority may reasonably contest the expenses. The
authority shall assist the department in making  any necessary calculations and filing any
necessary reports related to arbitrage  and rebate on the indebtedness described in this sec-
tion.
(4) Amounts  deposited as debt service in reserve accounts with the State Treasurer, the
department or the  department’s designated agents must remain with the State Treasurer,
the department or the department’s designated agents until the  bonds, certificates of par-
[11]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ticipation, financing agreements or other agreements to borrow  money for which the reserve
accounts were established have been retired or defeased, if the debt service is for bonds,
certificates of participation, financing agreements or  other agreements to borrow money
that the state or the department issued before the  operative date of sections 1 to 22 of this
2017 Act for equipment, facilities or  other property within or connected to Terminal 6 or that
otherwise passes to or comes under the control of the authority on and after the operative
date of  sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act. The authority must be credited with any investment
earnings on the reserve accounts.
SECTION 13.
(1) The Oregon Shipping Authority may from time to  time issue and sell
revenue bonds in accordance with ORS chapter 287A,  except that ORS 287A.150 (2) to (6) do
not apply to revenue bonds that the authority issues. A revenue bond the authority issues
under this section is not a general obligation of  the authority or a charge upon the
authority’s revenue or property other than any revenue or  property that the authority spe-
cifically pledges. An obligation described in  this section is not an indebtedness of the State
of Oregon.
(2) A revenue  bond that the authority issues under this section is a revenue bond of a
political subdivision of the state for the purposes of the laws of the state.
(3) The authority may  issue under ORS 287A.360 to 287A.380 refunding bonds of the same
character and tenor as the bonds that the refunding bonds replace.
(4) The authority may not issue general obligation bonds.
SECTION 14.
As used in sections 14 to 18 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Credit enhancement agreement” means an agreement or contractual  relationship
between the Oregon Shipping Authority and a bank, trust  company, insurance company,
surety bonding company, pension fund or other  financial institution that provides additional
credit on or  security for a financing agreement or certificate of participation authorized
under sections 14 to 18 of this 2017 Act.
(2) “Financing agreement” means a lease-purchase agreement, an  installment sale
agreement, a loan agreement, a note agreement,  a short-term promissory note, commercial
paper, a line of credit or similar obligation or any other agreement to:
(a) Finance real or personal property  that the authority owns and operates or will own
and operate; or
(b) Refinance previously executed financing agreements.
(3) “Personal property” means tangible personal property, software and fixtures.
(4) “Property rights” means, with respect to personal property, the rights of a  secured
party under ORS chapter 79.
(5) “Software” means software and training and maintenance contracts  related to oper-
ating computing equipment.
SECTION 15.
The Oregon Shipping Authority may enter  into financing agreements in
accordance with  sections 14 to 18 of this 2017 Act under terms that the authority deems
advantageous. Amounts the authority must pay under a financing agreement must be lim-
ited to funds the  authority specifically pledges, budgets for or otherwise makes available. If
the authority does not  have sufficient funds available to pay amounts due under a financing
agreement, a lender may exercise any property rights that the authority has  granted to the
lender in the financing agreement against the property that the authority purchased with the
proceeds of the  financing agreement. The lender may apply the amounts the lender receives
[12]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
toward payments the authority is scheduled to make under the financing agreement.
SECTION 16. The board of directors of the Oregon Shipping Authority may delegate  to
any board member, officer or  employee of the authority the power to determine maturity
dates, principal amounts,  redemption provisions, interest rates or methods for determining
variable or  adjustable interest rates, denominations and other terms and conditions of obli-
gations that the board does not appropriately determine at the time the board enacted or
adopted an authorizing resolution  for the obligation. The board may also delegate the power
to enter into a financing agreement or other  instruments authorized by law. The delegated
power must  be exercised subject to applicable requirements of law and limitations and cri-
teria the board sets forth in the authorizing resolution.
SECTION 17.
The Oregon Shipping Authority may:
(1) Enter into agreements with third parties to hold financing  agreement proceeds, pay-
ments and reserves as security for  lenders, and to issue certificates of participation in the
right to receive payments due  from the authority under a financing agreement. The board
of directors of the  authority may invest amounts the authority holds under an agreement
with the third party. The board may credit interest earned on any investments held  as se-
curity for a financing agreement  to the accounts the third party holds and may apply the
amounts as payment of sums due under a financing agreement.
(2) Enter into credit enhancement agreements related to financing agreements or cer-
tificates of participation,  provided that the credit enhancement agreements are payable
solely from funds the authority specifically pledges, budgets for or  otherwise makes available
or from amounts the lender receives as a result of exercising property rights granted under
the financing agreement.
(3) Use financing agreements to finance the costs of acquiring or refinancing  real or
personal property, plus the  costs of reserves, credit enhancements and costs associated with
obtaining the financing.
(4) Grant security interests in personal property to trustees or lenders.
(5) Make pledges for the benefit of trustees and lenders.
(6) Purchase fire and extended coverage or other casualty insurance for  property that
the authority acquires or refinances with the proceeds  of a financing agreement, assign the
proceeds of the insurance to a lender  or trustee to the extent of the lender’s or trustee’s
interest, and covenant to maintain the insurance  while the financing agreement is unpaid,
as long as available funds are sufficient to purchase the insurance.
SECTION 18.
A lease or financing agreement under  sections 14 to 18 of this 2017 Act does
not subject property to property taxation and must be disregarded in  determining whether
property is exempt from taxation under ORS chapter 307.
SECTION 19. (1) The Oregon Shipping Authority  shall establish a grant program to sup-
port projects that develop or enhance  maritime shipping facilities that ports within this state
own and operate. In establishing the grant program, the authority shall consult with port
commissioners and other port officials.
(2) The authority shall identify projects that meet criteria that the authority  establishes
for funding from the authority’s grant program and shall  seek funding for projects the au-
thority identifies from the Legislative Assembly during each  regular session of the Legisla-
tive Assembly that occurs in an even-numbered year.
(3) A port’s participation in a grant program under this section does  not prevent a port
[13]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
from seeking funding from the Legislative Assembly for projects the port intends to under-
take.
SECTION 20.
(1)(a) The Secretary of State  shall conduct an annual audit of the Oregon
Shipping Authority in accordance with ORS  297.210. As part of the audit, the Secretary of
State shall contract with a  firm that is qualified to audit accounts of the type that the au-
thority maintains.
(b) The  firm that conducts the audit required under paragraph (a) of this subsection
must be familiar with the accounting standards that apply to the reserves under review  and
shall maintain errors and  omissions insurance with limits that the Secretary of State pre-
scribes.
(c) The Secretary of State shall determine  the scope of the audit required under para-
graph (a) of this subsection, which must include, but not be limited to:
(A) Reviewing the sources and uses of moneys the authority receives and expends;
(B) Reconciling changes in reserve values from the prior year;
(C) Examining the development of reserve inadequacies or redundancies over time;
(D) Assessing the future financial viability of the authority; and
(E) Evaluating losses and loss adjustment expense reserves in accordance with  standards
developed for reasonably comparable operating and investment funds.
(d) The authority shall cooperate with the auditing firm in all respects and  shall permit
the firm full access  to all information the firm deems necessary for a true and complete
audit.
(e) The auditing firm shall  conduct the audit required under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section using generally accepted accounting principles.
(f) The authority shall pay the cost of the audit required under paragraph (a)  of this
subsection.
(2) The Secretary of  State shall provide the Governor, the President of the Senate and
the Speaker of  the House of Representatives with an annual report on the results of the
audit. The Secretary  of State shall make the report available for public inspection in ac-
cordance with the Secretary of  State’s established rules and procedures for public disclosure
of audit documents.
(3) This section does not preclude the authority from conducting an internal audit  or an
independent audit of the authority’s operations or finances whenever the authority’s  board
of directors deems an audit necessary or prudent. The authority has exclusive  discretion and
control of an audit under  this subsection, subject to ORS 297.250. An audit under this sub-
section is subject to disclosure in accordance with ORS 192.410 to 192.505.
SECTION 21.
The board of directors of the Oregon Shipping Authority shall report to  the
Secretary of State by March 15 of each year:
(1) The total amount of assets the authority holds as of December 31  of the previous
year;
(2) The balance of any reserves and surplus moneys  the board of directors established for
the authority as of December 31 of the previous year;
(3) Any funds in addition to the funds described in subsection (2) of this section as  of
December 31 of the previous year; and
(4) The total amount of  investment gain or loss the authority generated as of December
31 of the previous year.
[14]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 22. Not later than the 90th day after the Secretary of State completes  and de-
livers to the board  of directors of the Oregon Shipping Authority the results of an audit
under section 20 of this 2017 Act, the board and any subsidiary entity that the  authority
formed or acquired and that was subject to the  audit shall notify the Secretary of State in
writing of  the measures that the board or the subsidiary has taken or proposes to take, if
any, to respond to the recommendations in the audit. The Secretary of State may extend the
90-day period for good cause.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 287A.001 is amended to read:
287A.001. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Advance refunding bond” means a bond all or part of the proceeds of  which are to be used
to pay an outstanding bond one year or more after the advance refunding bond is issued.
(2) “Agreement for exchange of interest rates” means  a contract, or an option or forward com-
mitment to  enter into a contract, for an exchange of interest rates for related bonds that provides
for:
(a) Payments based on levels or changes in interest rates; or
(b) Provisions to hedge payment, rate, spread or similar exposure including, but not  limited to,
an interest rate floor or cap or an option, put or call.
(3)(a) “Bond” means a contractual  undertaking or instrument of a public body to repay borrowed
moneys.
(b) “Bond” does not mean a credit enhancement device.
(4) “Capital construction” has the meaning given that term in ORS 310.140.
(5) “Capital costs” has the meaning given that term in ORS 310.140.
(6) “Capital improvements” has the meaning given that term in ORS 310.140.
(7)(a) “Credit  enhancement device” means a letter of credit, line of credit, standby bond pur-
chase agreement, bond insurance policy,  reserve surety bond or other device or facility used to en-
hance the creditworthiness, liquidity or marketability of bonds or agreements  for exchange of
interest rates.
(b) “Credit enhancement device” does not mean a bond.
(8) “Current refunding bond” means a bond the proceeds of which are to  be used to pay or
purchase an outstanding bond less than one year after the current refunding bond is issued.
(9) “Forward current refunding” means execution and delivery of a purchase agreement  or sim-
ilar instrument under which a  public body contracts to sell current refunding bonds for delivery at
a future date that is one year or more after execution of the purchase agreement  or similar instru-
ment.
(10) “General obligation bond” means exempt bonded indebtedness, as defined in ORS 310.140,
that is secured by a commitment to levy ad valorem taxes outside the  limits of sections 11 and 11b,
Article XI, of the Oregon Constitution.
(11) “Lawfully available funds” means revenues or other moneys of a  public body including, but
not limited to, moneys credited  to the general fund of the public body, revenues from an ad valorem
tax and revenues derived from  other taxes levied by the public body that are not dedicated, re-
stricted or obligated by law or contract to an inconsistent expenditure or use.
(12) “Operative document” means  a bond declaration, trust agreement, indenture, security
agreement or other document in which a public body pledges revenue or property  as security for a
bond.
(13) “Pledge” means:
[15]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) To create a lien on property pursuant to ORS 287A.140.
(b) A lien on property created pursuant to ORS 287A.140.
(c) To create a lien on property pursuant to ORS 287A.310.
(d) A lien on property created pursuant to ORS 287A.310.
(14) “Public body” means:
(a) A county of this state;
(b) A city of this state;
(c) A local service district as defined in ORS 174.116 (2);
(d) A special government body as defined in ORS 174.117;
(e) Oregon Health and Science University;
(f) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; [ or]
(g) The Oregon Shipping Authority; or
[(g)] (h) Any other  political subdivision of this state that is authorized by the Legislative As-
sembly to issue bonds.
(15) “Refunding bond”  means an advance refunding bond, a current refunding bond or a forward
current refunding bond.
(16) “Related bond” means  a bond for which the public body enters into an agreement for ex-
change of interest rates or obtains a credit enhancement device.
(17) “Revenue”  means all fees, tolls, excise taxes, assessments, property taxes and other taxes,
rates, charges, rentals  and other income or receipts derived by a public body or to which a public
body is entitled.
(18) “Revenue bond” means a bond that is not a general obligation bond.
(19) “Termination payment” means the amount  payable under an agreement for exchange of in-
terest rates by one party to another party as a  result of the termination, in whole or part, of the
agreement prior to the expiration of the stated term.
SECTION 24.
(1) Sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act and the amendments to ORS 287A.001
by section 23 of this 2017 Act become operative January 1, 2018.
(2) Notwithstanding the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section, on or
after the effective date of this 2017 Act, in order to prepare the Oregon Shipping Authority
to begin operations as soon as practicable after  the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section and to enable  the board of directors of the authority to exercise, on and after
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the  duties, powers and
functions conferred on the board of directors by sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act and the
amendments to ORS 287A.001 by section 23 of this 2017 Act:
(a) County commissioners in  the regions described in section 2 of this 2017 Act may ap-
point directors to the authority’s board of directors on an interim or temporary basis,  sub-
ject to confirmation by majority vote in accordance with section 2 of this 2017 Act; and
(b) The board of directors may adopt rules, bylaws or policies that are  necessary to or-
ganize the authority.
(3) The Director of the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services and the Port of
Portland may adopt rules and take other actions before the operative date specified in  sub-
section (1) of this  section that are necessary to support the formation and organization of
the Oregon Shipping Authority, to secure the  authority’s management over existing property
and facilities that the state or  the port owns and to enable the director, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section, to exercise the duties, powers and
[16]
SB 530
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
functions conferred on the director by sections 1 to 22 of this 2017 Act and  the amendments
to ORS 287A.001 by section 23 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 25. Section 3 (6) of this 2017 Act applies to illegal  activity that occurs on and
after January 1, 2014 or, if the  illegal activity occurs before January 1, 2014, to illegal activity
that results in damage that occurs on or after January 1, 2014.
SECTION 26. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[17]