Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a medical science liaison
position within the authority to:
(a) Promote the recognition of racism as a public health crisis;
(b) Identify barriers to progress on health equity and justice; and
(c) Develop trauma-informed recommendations for advancing health equity and justice.
(2) The authority shall annually report to the  Legislative Assembly regarding the rec-
ommendations developed by the medical science liaison under this section.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended to carry out  the provisions
of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2412