Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 759.400 to
759.455.
SECTION 2. In any service area for which a telecommunications carrier is not receiving
moneys allocated by the Public Utility Commission  from the universal service fund estab-
lished under ORS 759.425, the telecommunications carrier is not required to:
(1) Provide a retail telecommunications service on demand;
(2) Extend a retail  telecommunications service to persons or areas that do not have ac-
cess to that retail telecommunications service; or
(3) Rebuild retail telecommunications service infrastructure or modify the provision of
a retail telecommunications service for the purpose of improving retail  telecommunications
service quality.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2017 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2017.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1005