Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Office of the Governor,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of  $  for the purpose of funding the office of the
Corrections Ombudsman described in ORS 423.400 to 423.450.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2388