Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 30.657 is amended to read:
30.657. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that individuals who  have been
wrongly convicted of crimes  and imprisoned in this state have been unable to obtain legal
redress due to a number  of substantive and technical obstacles in the law and that these
individuals should have a timely avenue to obtain compensation and a finding of  innocence
following a wrongful conviction.
[(1)] (2) A person may petition for compensation for wrongful conviction against the state if all
of the following requirements are satisfied:
(a) The person was convicted of one or more  felonies and subsequently imprisoned as a result
of the conviction or convictions;
(b)(A) The person’s conviction was reversed or vacated and  either the charges were dismissed
or on retrial the person was found not guilty; or
(B) The person received a grant of gubernatorial [ pardon] clemency;
(c) The person did not commit the crime or crimes for  which the person was convicted and was
not an accessory or accomplice to or otherwise involved in the acts that were the basis of  the
conviction; and
(d) The person did not  commit perjury, fabricate evidence or by the person’s own conduct cause
or bring about the conviction. A confession or admission  later found to be false or a guilty plea does
not constitute  committing perjury, fabricating evidence or causing or bringing about the conviction
under this paragraph.
[(2)] (3) For the purposes of subsection [ (1)] (2) of this section:
(a) Reversal or vacation of a conviction because the conviction was obtained following a  finding
of guilt by a nonunanimous jury is not sufficient to prove that the person  did not commit the crime
or crimes for which the person was convicted.
(b) A  Governor’s grant of clemency with a written statement consistent with innocence
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3111
SB 1007
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or a prior court’s finding consistent with innocence by a  preponderance of the evidence is
sufficient to prove that the person did not  commit the crime or crimes for which the person
was convicted.
[(b)] (c) “Convicted” or “conviction” includes an adjudication of a person within  the jurisdiction
of the  juvenile court under ORS 419C.005 for an act committed when the person was under 18 years
of age if the adjudication resulted in the person’s placement in custody  of the Oregon Youth Au-
thority or the Department of Corrections for at least one year.
[(3)] (4) A person may file a petition for compensation  under this section in the Circuit Court
for Marion County or  in the circuit court for the county of conviction. The petitioner shall serve
the petition  on the Attorney General, who shall represent the state in all proceedings on the peti-
tion. The petitioner shall also mail a copy of the complaint to the District  Attorney of the county
of conviction.
[(4)(a)] (5)(a) A petition under this section  is a civil action. The Oregon Rules of Civil Procedure
and the  Oregon Evidence Code apply to a petition under this section unless otherwise specified in
this section.
(b) The court, in exercising its discretion regarding the [ weight and ] admissibility of evidence
submitted under this section, may in the interest of justice give due consideration  to difficulties of
proof caused by the passage of time, the death or unavailability of witnesses, the destruction of  ev-
idence or other factors not caused by a petitioner or those acting on  a petitioner’s behalf. The court
may not diminish the petitioner’s  burden of proof as set forth in subsection [ (5)(a)] (6)(a)  of this
section.
(c) The fact finder, in exercising the fact finder’s discretion  regarding the weight of evi-
dence submitted under this section, may in the interest of justice give due  consideration to
the difficulties of proof caused  by the passage of time, the death or unavailability of wit-
nesses, the destruction  of evidence or other factors not caused by a petitioner or those act-
ing on a petitioner’s behalf.
[(c)] (d) The fact finder in a proceeding under this section may receive proof  by declarations,
depositions, oral testimony or other  competent evidence  from any proceeding arising out of the
facts or events that resulted in the petitioner’s  conviction, or arising out of the conviction
itself, including but not limited to transcripts of testimony or documents  and evidence filed with the
court [ in any proceeding that gave rise to the conviction, reversal or vacation  of the conviction, or from
retrial following reversal ].
(e) The fact finder in a proceeding under this section shall be instructed to find  that the
petitioner did not commit the crime or crimes of which the petitioner was convicted if:
(A) The petitioner presents evidence from which the fact finder can conclude by  a pre-
ponderance of the evidence that the petitioner did not commit the crime or crimes of which
the petitioner was convicted; and
(B) The rebuttal evidence offered by the state does not establish  guilt beyond a reason-
able doubt.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a) If a petitioner proves the elements of subsection [ (1)] (2) of this section by a pre-
ponderance of the evidence, the court shall enter a judgment awarding damages as follows:
(A) Except as  provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, $65,000 for each year of imprisonment
or confinement on the charge resulting in the conviction that was reversed, vacated or sub-
ject to clemency, including time  spent awaiting trial or retrial , as adjusted under subsection
[(8)] (9) of this section; and
[2]
SB 1007
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) $25,000, as adjusted under subsection [ (8)] (9) of this section, for each additional year served
on parole  [or], post-prison supervision or pretrial supervision or each additional year the petitioner
was required to register as a sex offender, whichever is greater.
(b) A petitioner is not entitled to damages for any period of  incarceration during which the
petitioner was concurrently serving a sentence for  a conviction of another crime for which the
petitioner was lawfully incarcerated.
(c) Punitive damages may not be awarded under this section.
[(6)(a)] (7)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the  court shall order that
an award under subsection [ (5)] (6) of this section be paid as a combination of an initial payment
not to exceed $100,000 or 25 percent of the  award, whichever is greater, and the remainder as an
annuity not to exceed $80,000 per year. The petitioner shall  designate a beneficiary or beneficiaries
for the annuity.
(b) The court may order that the award be paid in one lump sum if the court finds that it  is in
the best interests of the petitioner.
[(7)] (8) In addition to the damages awarded under subsection [ (5)] (6) of this section, the court:
(a) Shall award to the  petitioner reasonable attorney fees and costs , including expert witness
fees, incurred in [ connection with a petition ] an action filed under this section;
(b) Shall award to the petitioner reimbursement for all restitution, assessments, fees,  court costs
and all other sums paid by the petitioner as  required by pretrial orders, incarceration, and the
judgment and sentence in any proceeding that gave  rise to the conviction, reversal or vacation of
the conviction, or from retrial following reversal; and
(c) May award to the petitioner the costs of:
(A) Tuition, books and  fees for up to four years for the petitioner to attend a public in-
stitution as defined in ORS 352.002 or a community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(B) Participation by the petitioner in a health benefit plan  as defined in ORS 743B.005 (16)
for up to 10 years; and
(C) [Access to ] Accessing existing state, local or other programs that provide services, includ-
ing, but not limited to, counseling, housing assistance, [ eligibility for  medical assistance as defined
in ORS  414.025, educational assistance, ] job training, legal services to regain custody of children,
assistance with food and transportation and personal financial literacy assistance, as appropriate.
[(8)] (9) Beginning in 2023, and every year thereafter, the State Court Administrator shall  de-
termine the percentage increase or decrease in the cost of living for the  previous calendar year,
based on  changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items),
as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.  On or
before July 1 of the year in which the State Court Administrator makes the  determination required
by this subsection, the State Court Administrator shall adjust the amounts prescribed under  sub-
section [ (5)] (6) of this section for the following calendar year by  multiplying the amounts applicable
to the calendar year in which the adjustment is made by the percentage amount  determined under
this subsection. The adjustment may  not exceed three percent for any year. The State Court Ad-
ministrator shall round  the adjusted limitation amount to the nearest $100, but the unrounded
amount shall be used to calculate the adjustments to the amounts in  subsequent calendar years. The
adjusted amounts become effective on July 1 of the year in which the adjustment is made,  and apply
to all petitions filed under this section on or after July 1  of that year and before July 1 of the
subsequent year.
[(9)(a)] (10)(a) If, on the date a judgment is entered under subsection [ (5)] (6) of this section, the
[3]
SB 1007
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
petitioner has won a monetary award against a  public body as defined in ORS 174.109 in a separate
civil action related to the same subject, or has entered  into a settlement agreement with a public
body as defined  in ORS 174.109 related to the same subject, the amount of economic damages
awarded in the separate action or received in the settlement  agreement, less any sums paid to liti-
gate the other civil  action or obtain the settlement agreement, including, but not limited to, attorney
fees, costs and expert fees, shall be  deducted from the sum of money to which the petitioner is en-
titled under this section. The  court shall include in the judgment an award to the state of any
amount deducted pursuant to this subsection.
(b) If paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply and if, after the date the judgment is en-
tered under subsection [ (5)] (6) of this section, the petitioner wins a monetary award against a public
body as defined in ORS 174.109 in  a separate civil action related to the same subject, or enters into
a settlement agreement with a public body as defined in  ORS 174.109 related to the same subject,
the petitioner shall reimburse the state for the  sum of money paid under the judgment entered under
subsection [ (5)] (6) of this section, less any sums paid  to litigate the other civil action or obtain the
settlement agreement, including, but not limited to, attorney fees, costs and expert fees. A  re-
imbursement required  under this subsection may not exceed the amount of the economic damages
awarded in the separate civil action or received in the settlement agreement.
(c) An award under  this section shall not be offset by any expenses incurred by a public body
as defined in ORS 174.109 to secure the petitioner’s custody or conviction, or to feed, clothe, house
or provide medical services to the petitioner as a result of the petitioner’s incarceration.
[(10)] (11) Compensation awarded as a result of a petition for compensation  for wrongful con-
viction under this section is excluded from gross income and is not subject to taxation.
[(11)] (12) A petition under this section is not subject to ORS 30.260 to 30.300.
[(12)(a) If the  petitioner prevails on a petition under this section, the petitioner may request that
judgment include a certificate of innocence finding  that the petitioner was innocent of all crimes for
which the petitioner was wrongfully convicted. ]
(13)(a) If the court enters a judgment under subsection (6) of this  section, the court shall
include in the judgment a certificate of innocence stating that  the petitioner has established
by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner is  innocent of all crimes for which the
petitioner was wrongfully convicted.
(b) Upon entry of a judgment granting a petition under this section, the  court shall order the
associated convictions and arrest records be set aside  and sealed from all applicable state and fed-
eral systems pursuant to this subsection. The court  shall enter the set aside order regardless of
whether the petitioner has other criminal convictions or pending criminal cases.
[(13)] (14) Notwithstanding ORS 12.115, a petition under this  section must be filed no later than
two years after:
(a) The date of  dismissal of the criminal charges against the petitioner or finding of not guilty
on retrial, whichever is later; or
(b) The grant of [ pardon] clemency to the petitioner.
[(14)] (15) Any party to a proceeding under this section may appeal from the judgment of the
circuit  court  on a petition filed under this section by filing a notice of appeal within the time and
in the manner specified in ORS chapter 19 for civil  appeals to the Court of Appeals. Any party filing
a notice  of appeal under this subsection must note in the notice of appeal that the case is subject
to this  subsection. For purposes of any appeals under this section, the Attorney General shall rep-
resent the  state in all appellate proceedings. The party filing the notice of appeal shall serve the
[4]
SB 1007
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
notice of appeal on the Attorney General and on the district attorney for the county of conviction.
[(15)] (16) This section does not preclude the Department of Corrections from  providing reentry
services to a petitioner under this section that are provided to other  persons, including, but not
limited to, financial assistance, housing assistance, mentoring and  counseling. Services may be pro-
vided while an action is  pending and after any judgment is entered, as appropriate for the petitioner.
SECTION 2.
(1) Upon service of a petition filed under ORS 30.657, the Attorney General
shall review the claim for compensation. The review must include  consideration of any evi-
dence from the petitioner or the district attorney and any newly presented evidence  that
tends to satisfy the requirements of ORS 30.657 (2).
(2) Within 180  days after the date of service of the petition filed under ORS 30.657, the
Attorney General shall make a written determination whether the evidence, including newly
presented evidence of innocence, satisfies the requirements of ORS 30.657 (2). If the evidence,
including newly presented evidence of innocence, satisfies the requirements of ORS 30.657 (2)
by a preponderance of the evidence, the Attorney General and the petitioner shall  jointly
petition the court to enter judgment in the petitioner’s favor awarding the relief  required
by ORS 30.657 (6), (7), (8) and (13).
(3) The  Attorney General shall submit an annual report in the manner provided in ORS
192.245 to  an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly relating to the judiciary. The
report must summarize the determinations made under this section in the preceding year
and include the amount of attorney fees incurred in connection with each  notice and petition
filed in the preceding year.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 30.659 is amended to read:
30.659. (1) A person may not file  a petition under ORS 30.657 unless notice of petition is given
as required by this section.
(2) Notice of petition shall be given within 180 days after the date on which the charges were
dismissed, the person was  found not guilty on retrial or the person received a grant of pardon. The
period of time shall not include the period, not exceeding  90 days, during which the person is unable
to give notice because of injury or the period during which the person is  unable to give notice
because of minority, incompetency or other incapacity.
(3) Notice of petition required by this section is satisfied by:
(a) Formal notice of petition as provided in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Filing of a petition under ORS 30.657 by or on  behalf of the person within the applicable
period of time provided in subsection (2) of this section;
(c) Notice of claim  under ORS 30.275 for any action against a public body, as defined in ORS
174.109, or any officer, employee or agent of  the public body arising out of the facts and circum-
stances that gave rise to the wrongful conviction; or
(d) Payment of compensation for wrongful conviction by or on behalf of the state at any time.
(4) Formal notice of petition is a written communication from a claimant or representative of a
claimant containing:
(a) A statement that a petition for wrongful conviction under ORS 30.657 is or will be filed;
(b) The date on which  the charges were dismissed, the person was found not guilty on retrial
or the person received a grant of pardon; and
(c) The name of the claimant and the mailing address to which correspondence  concerning the
petition may be sent.
(5) Notice is sufficient where the communication is such that a  reasonable person would con-
[5]
SB 1007
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
clude that a particular person intends to  assert a claim against the state arising out of wrongful
conviction.
(6) Formal notice of petition shall be given by  mail, electronic mail or personal delivery to the
office of the Director of  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services. Service by mail is
complete on mailing, and service by electronic mail is complete on sending.
(7) Failure to provide timely notice shall not be a bar to suit if  good cause for the failure is
shown. Good cause shall not be unreasonably withheld.
(8) At  the time of judgment after a person’s conviction is reversed or vacated, and either the
charges are dismissed or on retrial the person is found not guilty, as  described in ORS 30.657
[(1)(b)(A)] (2)(b)(A) , the court shall advise the person of the right  to file a notice within 180 days
under this  section. If the person is not present, the court shall advise the person in writing of the
right to file a notice within 180 days under this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) The amendments to ORS 30.657 and 30.659 by sections 1 and  3 of this 2025
Act apply to petitions filed under ORS  30.657 before, on or after the effective date of this 2025
Act for which a court has not entered a final judgment before the effective date of  this 2025
Act.
(2) As  used in subsection (1) of this section, “final judgment” means a judgment that is
not subject to  further appeal or review or for which the time to file an appeal has expired
without a party filing an appeal.
SECTION 5. Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to petitions filed  under ORS 30.657 on or
after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[6]