Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, for training  and professional development of school
district personnel on the contents and implementation of the Comprehensive Guidance and
Counseling Framework adopted by the department.
SECTION 2.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1281