Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 215.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding any  other provision of this chapter or any statewide
land use planning goal or administrative  rule of the Land Conservation and Development
Commission, up to 30 percent of any tract that, as of January 1, 2025, is zoned for exclusive
farm use and is lawfully used as a golf course, including under ORS 215.213 (2)(f)  or 215.283
(2)(f) or that may be continued  as a nonconforming use under ORS 215.130 (5), may be divided
and developed as described in this section.
(2) A tract described in subsection (1) of  this section may be divided into lots or parcels
that are less than two acres, provided that each resulting lot or parcel must be, on  or before
January 1, 2036, developed for single-unit housing or middle housing as defined  in ORS
197A.420.
(3) A lot or parcel created under this section may not be used  for any use other than
farm use, residential use authorized under this section or as a golf course.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2036.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4674