Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of State Police shall establish a section dedicated  to drug
enforcement and human trafficking. The department  shall establish, fill and utilize at least
10 full-time equivalent officer positions for the section.
SECTION 2. The Department of Justice shall establish, fill and utilize  at least two full-
time equivalent attorney positions to serve as resource prosecutors for the section of  the
Department of State Police dedicated to drug enforcement and human  trafficking established
in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4243