Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 471.705 is amended to read:
471.705. (1) There  is created the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, consisting of nine
commissioners appointed by the Governor[ .] as follows:
(a)(A) One commissioner must be  from among the residents of each congressional district of this
state.
(B) One additional commissioner must be from eastern Oregon.
(C) One additional commissioner must be from western Oregon.
(D) One additional commissioner must represent the public at large.
(E) One commissioner must be from the food and alcoholic beverage retail industry.
(F) At least one of the commissioners must have a background in public health.
(b) Not more than five commissioners may be of the same political party.
(c) The Governor shall designate one commissioner to be chairperson of the commission.
(d) The commissioners are entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495.
(2) Each commissioner at the time of appointment  must be a resident of this state and must have
resided in this state for at least five years next preceding appointment and qualification. Each
commissioner must be an elector in this state and may not be less than 30 years of age. The term
of office of a commissioner terminates if the commissioner ceases to possess the residency or  in-
dustry qualification for appointment. If  the term of office of a commissioner terminates under this
subsection, the Governor shall appoint a  qualified individual to complete the unexpired term of the
commissioner.
(3) The term of office of a commissioner is four years from the time  of appointment and quali-
fication and until a successor qualifies for appointment.  The terms of the commissioners commence
April 1. If a commissioner is allowed to hold office  after the expiration of a term, the Governor shall
appoint the successor for  the remainder of the unexpired term. If a vacancy occurs in the commis-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 36
HB 4093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
sion, the Governor shall appoint the successor for the remainder  of the unexpired term. Each com-
missioner is eligible for reappointment, but an individual is not eligible  to serve for more than two
full terms.
(4) Appointments of commissioners by the Governor under  this section are subject to confirma-
tion by the Senate pursuant to [ section 4, ] Article III, section 4, of the  Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 2.
The amendments  to ORS 471.705 by section 1 of this 2024 Act apply to com-
missioners appointed to the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission on or after  the effec-
tive date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]