Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Cherriots, the Salem Area Mass Transit  District, shall collaborate with
the Department of Transportation, the Department of Environmental  Quality, community
members in the City of Salem and economists  and business leaders in the City of Salem to
study the feasibility of establishing a rail streetcar system in the City of Salem.
(2) Cherriots shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and  may in-
clude recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assem-
bly related to transportation no later than January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $250,000,  which may be distributed to
Cherriots for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3310