Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Long Term Care  Ombudsman, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund,  the amount of $  for the Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator to
provide public guardian and conservator services exclusively to veterans.
SECTION 2. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund established under ORS 406.140, to the Long Term  Care Ombudsman,
the amount of $  for the Oregon  Public Guardian and Conservator to provide public
guardian and conservator services exclusively to veterans.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of
$  is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated  from the Veterans’ Services Fund es-
tablished under ORS 406.140, to the Long Term  Care Ombudsman for the Oregon Public
Guardian and Conservator to provide  public guardian and conservator services exclusively
to veterans.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 884