Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For the biennium ending June 30, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $613,250 in net  proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2)  of this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery  bonds issued under this section shall be transferred to the
Oregon Business  Development Department for deposit in the OBDD Economic Development
Distributions Fund established under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for  distrib-
ution to the City  of St. Helens for storm water management at the St. Helens Industrial
Business Park.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that
storm water management is an integral part of the commercial and industrial  infrastructure
of this state and that improvement of storm water management at an  industrial business
park will promote economic development.
SECTION 2.
 Section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, as amended  by section 32, chapter 671,
Oregon Laws 2019, section 13, chapter 5, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), and section  53,
chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 28.  (1) The OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund  is established in the State
Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on the moneys in the OBDD
Economic Development Distributions Fund must be credited to the fund. The OBDD  Economic De-
velopment Distributions Fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund under sections 26 and  27,
chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, and section 1 of this 2022 Act  and  may include fees, revenues or
other income deposited into the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Oregon Business Development De-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 83
HB 4078
1
2
3
4
5
6
partment for purposes described in sections  26 and 27, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017 , and section
1 of this 2022 Act .
SECTION 3.
This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]