Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Primary care practice” means a health care clinic that is owned  and operated by one
or more primary care providers.
(b) “Primary care provider” means a physician licensed under  ORS chapter 677, a physi-
cian associate licensed  under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or a nurse practitioner licensed under
ORS 678.375 to 678.390 who  practices in primary care, general family medicine, pediatrics,
internal medicine or obstetrics and gynecology.
(2) The Oregon  Health Authority shall establish a primary care provider loan repayment
program for the  purpose of providing loan repayment subsidies to primary care providers
who:
(a) Provide primary care services in suburban and  urban areas of this state in which the
authority determines there is a primary care provider workforce shortage; and
(b) Are employed by or contracted with a primary care practice that meets the  financial
incentive eligibility requirements under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The  authority may receive gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether
public or private, to carry out the provisions of this section. Moneys received  under this
section shall  be deposited in the Primary Care Incentive Fund established under section 4
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) As used  in this section, “primary care practice” and “primary care pro-
vider” have the meanings given those terms in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3927
HB 3554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a primary care incentive  program to
provide financial incentives to eligible primary care practices in order to increase the pri-
mary care capacity in this state. The financial incentives provided under this  section may
include, but are not limited  to, short-term low-interest loans to eligible primary care prac-
tices in order to support necessary infrastructure for practice operation.
(3) In order to be eligible  to receive financial incentives under this section, a primary
care practice must:
(a) Include no more than 20 primary care providers;
(b) Be located in a  suburban or urban area of this state in which the authority deter-
mines there is a primary care provider workforce shortage; and
(c) Serve patients who are state medical  assistance program enrollees or Medicare
enrollees in a proportion that  is substantially equivalent to the proportion of those patients
in the geographical area in which the primary care practice is located.
(4) In providing financial  incentives under this section, the authority shall structure the
financial incentives in a manner that encourages a  primary care practice to continue its
operations in the geographical area in which it is located.
(5) The authority may receive gifts, grants or other contributions  from any source,
whether public or private, to carry out this section. Moneys received under this  section shall
be deposited in the Primary Care Incentive Fund established under section  4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electronic health record” has the meaning given that term in ORS 413.300.
(b) “Primary care practice” has the meaning given that term in section 1  of this 2025
Act.
(2) The  Oregon Health Authority shall provide low-interest loans to primary care prac-
tices for the  purpose of implementing and upgrading interoperative electronic health records
systems used by the primary care practices.
(3) In order to be eligible  for a low-interest loan under this section, a primary care
practice must meet the requirements for financial incentive eligibility under section 2 of  this
2025 Act.
(4) The authority may receive gifts, grants or other contributions  from any source,
whether public or private, to carry out this section. Moneys received under this  section shall
be deposited in the Primary Care Incentive Fund established under section  4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
The Primary Care Incentive Fund is established in  the State Treasury, sep-
arate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Primary Care Incentive
Fund shall be credited to the fund. The fund consists of moneys appropriated to the fund by
the Legislative Assembly and gifts,  grants or other moneys contributed to the fund by any
source, whether public or  private. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Health Authority to carry out sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority,  in collaboration with the Department of
Consumer and  Business Services, shall establish a centralized online portal for reporting
data on health outcome and quality measures. The portal shall:
(a) Be accessible to all health care providers in this state.
(b) Provide a standardized format for data submission.
(c) Offer real-time feedback and performance tracking.
(d) Have the capacity to communicate and exchange data  with existing electronic health
[2]
HB 3554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
record systems for automated data extraction.
(2) A coordinated  care organization, as defined in ORS 414.025, or a health insurer, as
defined in ORS 746.600, may not require a provider  to report health outcome and quality
measure data through any means other than the portal established under this section.
SECTION 6.
No later than September 15, 2026, the Oregon Health Authority and the De-
partment of  Consumer and Business Services shall report to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to health, in the manner provided  in ORS 192.245, on the im-
plementation of section 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall study:
(a) The factors that contributed to the  suspension of the authority’s program for estab-
lishing a centralized system for health care practitioner credentialing information;
(b) The extent  to which the factors described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may be
mitigated by changes to the program structure;
(c) Market research on information technology solutions for health care practitioner
credentialing information, including how  those solutions have changed since the suspension
of the program described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection and ways in which those sol-
utions could potentially be optimized;
(d) Whether current delays and administrative burdens  associated with credentialing
health care practitioners  could be meaningfully addressed by solutions other than informa-
tion technology solutions; and
(e) Whether the authority is the appropriate agency for establishing  a centralized system
for health care practitioner credentialing information.
(2) No later than September 15, 2026, the authority shall  report its findings and recom-
mendations to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health, in  the
manner provided in ORS 192.245.
SECTION 8. Section 7 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
[3]