Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Transportation, in collaboration with Tri-Met as de-
fined in ORS 267.334 and Portland & Western Railroad, shall study issues related to extending
the Westside Express Service commuter line to Salem,  including increasing the frequency
and hours of service. The study must include, but is not limited to:
(a) A review of the specific operational and locational issues for extending and  operating
the Westside  Express Service commuter line on the old Oregon Electric Railway using the
existing or  new Westside Express Service trains and the Portland & Western Railroad
tracks.
(b) Consulting cities that may be potentially served by the  service extension, including
Wilsonville, Donald, Woodburn, Keizer and Salem, to better understand local access and
other related issues.
(c) Consulting relevant transit agencies, including but not limited to South Metro  Area
Regional Transit, Woodburn  Transit Service and Salem-Keizer Transit, that would potentially
provide bus service from rail stops to Wilsonville, Donald, Woodburn, Keizer or Salem  and
exploring options for connecting rail stops with transit service.
(2) The department shall submit  a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to transportation no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Transportation, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $500,000, which may be expended  for the purpose of carrying
out the provisions of section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1441
HB 2662
1
2
July 1, 2023.
[2]