Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Agriculture shall:
(a) Study barriers to family-scale meat production and ways to promote family-scale
meat production; and
(b) Recommend legislative or regulatory  avenues to remove any barriers identified under
paragraph (a) of this subsection and promote family-scale meat production.
(2) The department shall submit a report concerning the  study and recommendations
required by subsection (1) of this section, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to  an ap-
propriate committee or interim committee of  the Legislative Assembly no later than Sep-
tember 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $_______ for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1844