Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 540.610 is amended to read:
540.610. (1) Beneficial use shall  be the basis, the measure and the limit of all rights to the use
of water  in this state. Whenever the owner of a perfected and developed water right ceases or fails
to use all or  part of the water appropriated for a period of five successive years, the failure to use
shall establish a rebuttable presumption of forfeiture of all  or part of the water right , except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section .
(2) Upon a  showing of failure to use beneficially for five successive years, the appropriator has
the burden of rebutting the presumption of forfeiture by showing one or more of the following:
(a) The water right is for use of water, or rights of use, acquired by cities and  towns in this
state, by appropriation or by purchase, for all reasonable and usual municipal purposes.
(b) A finding  of forfeiture would impair the rights of such cities and towns to the use of water,
whether acquired by appropriation or purchase, or heretofore recognized  by act of the legislature,
or which may hereafter be acquired.
(c) The use of water, or  rights of use, are appurtenant to property obtained by the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs under ORS 407.135 or 407.145 for three years after the expiration of the  period
of redemption provided for in ORS 18.964 while the land is held by the Department of  Veterans’
Affairs, even if during such time the water is not used for  a period of more than five successive
years.
(d) The use of water, or rights of use, under a water right, if the  owner of the property to which
the right is appurtenant is unable to use the water due to economic hardship as defined by  rule by
the Water Resources Commission.
(e) The  period of nonuse occurred during a period of time within which land was withdrawn
from use in accordance with [ the Act of Congress of May 28, 1956, chapter 327 (7 U.S.C. 1801-1814;
1821-1824; 1831-1837), or] the [ Federal] federal Conservation Reserve Program[ , Act of  Congress of
December 23, 1985, chapter 198 ] (16 U.S.C.  3831-3836, 3841-3845). If necessary, in a cancellation pro-
ceeding under this section, the water  right holder rebutting the presumption under this paragraph
shall provide documentation that the water right  holder’s land was withdrawn from use under a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1714
HB 2256
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
federal reserve program.
(f) The end of the alleged period of nonuse  occurred more than 15 years before the date upon
which evidence of nonuse was submitted  to the commission or the commission initiated cancellation
proceedings under ORS 540.631, whichever occurs first.
(g) The owner  of the property to which the water right was appurtenant is unable to use the
water because the use of water under the right is discontinued under an order  of the commission
under ORS 537.775.
(h) The nonuse occurred during a period of time within which the water  right holder was using
reclaimed water in lieu of using water under an existing water right.
(i) The nonuse occurred during a period  of time within which the water right holder was reusing
water through land application as authorized by  ORS 537.141 (1)(i) or 537.545 (1)(g) in lieu of using
water under an existing water right.
(j) The owner or  occupant of the property to which the water right is appurtenant was unable
to make full beneficial use of the water because water was not available. A water right holder  re-
butting the presumption under this paragraph shall provide evidence  that the water right holder
was ready, willing and able to use the water had it been available.
(k) The holder of a water right is prohibited by law from using the water.  If the prohibition is
subject to remedial action  that would allow the use of the water, the water right holder shall pro-
vide evidence that the water right holder is conducting the remedial action with reasonable dili-
gence.
(L) The nonuse occurred during a period of time within which the exercise of all or part  of the
water right was not necessary due to climatic conditions, so long as  the water right holder had a
facility capable of handling the  full allowed rate and duty, and was otherwise ready, willing and able
to use the entire amount of water allowed under the water right.
(m) The nonuse occurred during a period of time within which the water was included  in a
transfer application pending before the Water Resources Department.
(n) The nonuse of a supplemental water  right occurred during a period of time when the primary
water right used in  conjunction with that supplemental water right was leased as an in-stream water
right pursuant to ORS 537.348.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section[ ,]:
(a) If the owner of a perfected and developed water right uses less  water to accomplish the
beneficial use allowed by the right, the right is not subject to forfeiture so long as:
[(a)] (A)  The user has a facility capable of handling the entire rate and duty authorized under
the right; and
[(b)] (B)  The user is otherwise ready, willing and able to make full use of the right.
(b) A perfected and developed water right is not subject to forfeiture if the owner of the
water right ceased to use all or part of the water appropriated for a period of five successive
years because:
(A) The owner of the water right engaged in water conservation practices,  including but
not limited to practices of changing irrigation equipment or methods to conserve water; or
(B) The distribution of water that the owner of  the water right received from a water
district was less than the certificated maximum for a period  of at least five successive years.
(4) The right  of all cities and towns in this state to acquire rights to the use of the water of
natural streams and lakes, not otherwise appropriated, and subject to existing rights, for  all rea-
sonable and usual municipal purposes, and for such future reasonable and  usual municipal purposes
[2]
HB 2256
1
2
3
4
5
6
as may reasonably be anticipated by  reason of growth of population, or to secure sufficient water
supply in cases of emergency, is expressly confirmed.
(5) After  a water right is forfeited under subsection (1) of this section, the water that was the
subject  of  use shall revert to the public and become again the subject of appropriation in the manner
provided by law, subject to existing priorities.
[3]