Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 2 to 6 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “25 percent mortality rate” means the death of 25 percent of the  total population of
this state due to a pandemic, natural disaster or other similar emergency.
(2) “Essential service” has the meaning given that term by the  Oregon Health Authority
by rule.
(3) “Health care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(4) “Health care provider” means a person who operates an independent practice  location
and who is:
(a) An acupuncturist licensed under ORS 677.759;
(b) A chiropractic physician licensed under ORS chapter 684;
(c) A dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679;
(d) A massage therapist licensed under ORS 687.011 to 687.250;
(e) A naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685;
(f) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677; and
(g) A physical therapist licensed under ORS 688.010 to 688.201.
(5) “Health professional regulatory board” means:
(a) The Oregon Board of Dentistry;
(b) The Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine;
(c) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy;
(d) The Oregon Medical Board;
(e) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners; and
(f) The State Board of Massage Therapists.
(6) “Holding room” has the meaning given that term in ORS 692.010.
(7) “Local public health authority” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431.003.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3164
HB 2701
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(8) “Public or private safety agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 181A.355.
SECTION 2.
(1) A  health care facility shall maintain capacity, including sufficient
amounts of the following, to continue in normal operation for 120 days at  a 25 percent mor-
tality rate:
(a) Generators;
(b) Personal protective equipment for staff; and
(c) Ventilators.
(2)(a) A health care facility  shall report annually to the Oregon Health Authority, not
later than the date  established by the authority by rule, regarding the health care facility’s
ability to comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The authority shall compile the information received under paragraph (a) of  this
subsection and shall report annually to the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management
pursuant to rules adopted by the department.
(3) The authority may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) A local public health authority shall:
(a) Maintain capacity to continue the following in normal operation for 120 days at a 25
percent mortality rate:
(A) Essential services; and
(B) Holding rooms and mortuary refrigeration.
(b) Consult with private  businesses and housing providers within the jurisdiction of the
local public health authority regarding the private businesses’ and housing providers’ ability
to maintain capacity to continue  in normal operation for 120 days at a 25 percent mortality
rate and assist the private businesses and housing providers as needed.
(2)(a) A  local public health authority shall report annually to the Oregon Health Au-
thority, not later than the date established by the Oregon Health Authority  by rule, regard-
ing the local public health authority’s  ability to comply with the requirements of subsection
(1) of this section.
(b) The Oregon  Health Authority shall compile the information received under paragraph
(a) of this subsection and shall report annually to  the Oregon Department of Emergency
Management pursuant to rules adopted by the department.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) A health  care provider shall maintain sufficient amounts of necessary
supplies, including personal protective equipment for staff,  to continue in normal operation
for 120 days at a 25 percent mortality rate.
(2)(a) A health care provider shall report annually  to the health care provider’s health
professional regulatory board, not later than the  date established by the health professional
regulatory board by rule, regarding the health care provider’s  ability to comply with sub-
section (1) of this section.
(b) A health professional regulatory board  shall compile the information received under
paragraph (a) of this subsection and shall report annually to  the Oregon Department of
Emergency Management pursuant to rules adopted by the department.
(3) A health professional regulatory board may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 5.
(1) A public or private safety agency shall maintain sufficient amounts of
necessary supplies, including personal protective equipment for staff, to continue in  normal
operation for 120 days at a 25 percent mortality rate.
[2]
HB 2701
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
(2)(a) A public or  private safety agency shall report annually to the Oregon Health Au-
thority, not  later than the date established by the authority by rule, regarding the public or
private safety agency’s ability to comply with subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The  authority shall compile the information received under paragraph (a) of this
subsection and shall  report annually to the Oregon Department of Emergency Management
pursuant to rules adopted by the department.
(3) The authority may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 6.
(1) The  Oregon Department of Emergency Management shall annually sub-
mit a report in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 to an interim committee  of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to emergency preparedness. The department may include in the  report
recommendations for legislation.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to carry out sections 2 to 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7.
(1) Sections 2 and 6 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) Sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority and the Oregon Department  of Emergency Management
may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section that
is necessary to enable the authority and the department to exercise, on  and after the oper-
ative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the authority and the department by sections 2 and 6 of this 2025 Act.
(4) The Oregon Health Authority, the  Oregon Department of Emergency Management
and the health professional regulatory boards may take any action before  the operative date
specified in subsection (2) of this section that is necessary to enable the  authority, the
boards and the department to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in  sub-
section (2) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the authority,
the boards and the department by sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]