Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 390.124 is amended to read:
390.124. (1) In accordance  with any applicable provision of ORS chapter 183, the State Parks and
Recreation Commission may adopt rules necessary to  carry out the duties, functions and powers
imposed by law upon the commission  and the State Parks and Recreation Department. Rules adopted
pursuant to this section shall be duly entered in the minutes and records of the commission.
(2)(a) The commission may adopt by rule  a schedule setting forth the range of reasonable
charges that may be assessed for the use of areas established  and maintained by the department.
The range of user fees relating to recreational  vehicles must be 25 percent greater for nonresidents
than for residents of this state.
(b) With the approval of the commission, the State Parks and Recreation  Director may set, ad-
just and assess fees for the use of areas established and maintained by the department. Fees assessed
under this paragraph must be within  the range of reasonable charges adopted by the commission
under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The director may adjust a  fee under this paragraph no more
than four times per calendar  year. The director may also adopt rules establishing reductions in
waivers of or exemption from the charges.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection,  the commission shall authorize the
use of any state park, individual campsite or day use fee area without charge:
(A) Upon the showing of proper identification, by a person  maintaining a foster home, as defined
by ORS 418.625, and the person’s children, when accompanied by a  foster child residing in the home.
(B) Upon the showing of  proper identification, by a person maintaining a developmental disa-
bility child foster home, as defined by  ORS 443.830, and the person’s children, when accompanied
by a foster child residing in the home.
(C) If a deed to, lease of or contract to use the  property used as a state park, campsite or day
use fee area prohibits the charging of fees for use of the property.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 925
SB 378
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
(D) Upon the showing of proper identification, by either a disabled veteran or a person on leave
from military active duty status on Memorial Day, Independence Day or Veterans Day.
(E) Upon the showing of proper identification, by a person 65 years old or older  who is
a resident of the State of Oregon.
(3) The commission shall adopt any rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183 that  the commission
considers necessary to carry out ORS 273.563 to 273.591.
[2]