Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 475C.005  to
475C.525.
SECTION 2. (1) A marijuana retailer that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.097  shall
post a sign informing the public of the effects of the consumption  or use of marijuana during
pregnancy. The sign must:
(a) Contain the message: “Pregnancy and marijuana do not mix. Consuming or using
marijuana during pregnancy can cause birth defects.”
(b) Be either:
(A) A large sign, no smaller than eight and one-half inches by 11 inches  in size with let-
tering no smaller than five-eighths of an inch in height; or
(B) A reduced size sign, five by seven inches in size with lettering  of the same proportion
as the sign described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(c) Contain a graphic depiction of the message  to assist nonreaders in understanding the
message.
(d) Be in English unless a significant number of the marijuana retailer’s patrons use a
language other than English as a  primary language, in which case the sign must be in both
English and the primary language of the patrons.
(e) Be displayed on the  licensed premises as either a large sign at the point of entry to
the licensed premises or as a reduced  size sign at each point of sale on the licensed premises.
(3) A marijuana retailer may produce the sign required by  this section or may use a
standardized sign produced by the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 475C.770 to
475C.919.
SECTION 4. (1) A medical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS 475C.833 shall  post
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3929
SB 917
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a sign informing  the public of the effects of the consumption or use of marijuana during
pregnancy. The sign must:
(a) Contain the message: “Pregnancy and marijuana do not mix. Consuming or using
marijuana during pregnancy can cause birth defects.”
(b) Be either:
(A) A large sign, no smaller than eight and one-half inches by 11 inches  in size with let-
tering no smaller than five-eighths of an inch in height; or
(B) A reduced size sign, five by seven inches in size with lettering  of the same proportion
as the sign described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(c) Contain a graphic depiction of the message  to assist nonreaders in understanding the
message.
(d) Be in  English unless a significant number of the medical marijuana dispensary’s pa-
trons use a language other than English as  a primary language, in which case the sign must
be in both English and the primary language of the patrons.
(e) Be displayed at the medical marijuana dispensary as either a large sign  at the point
of entry to the medical marijuana dispensary or  as a reduced size sign at each point of sale
at the medical marijuana dispensary.
(3) A medical marijuana dispensary may produce the sign required  by this section or may
use a standardized sign produced by the Oregon Health Authority.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 475C.604 is amended to read:
475C.604. (1) As is necessary to protect the public health  and safety, and in consultation with
the Oregon Health Authority and the State Department of  Agriculture, the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission shall adopt rules establishing standards for the labeling  of marijuana items
and inhalant delivery systems that contain industrial  hemp-derived vapor items, including but not
limited to:
(a) Ensuring that usable marijuana, cannabinoid  concentrates and extracts, cannabinoid edibles,
other cannabinoid  products and inhalant delivery systems that contain industrial hemp-derived vapor
items have labeling that communicates:
(A) Health and safety warnings , including language indicating that the consumption or use
of a marijuana item or an inhalant delivery system  that contains an industrial hemp-derived
vapor item during pregnancy may be dangerous ;
(B) If applicable, activation time;
(C) Potency;
(D) For cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts,  serving size and the
number of servings included in a cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract  pack-
age; and
(E) Content of the marijuana item or inhalant delivery system that contains an  industrial
hemp-derived vapor item; and
(b) Labeling that is in accordance with applicable  state food labeling requirements for the same
type of food product or  potable liquid when the food product or potable liquid does not contain
marijuana or cannabinoids.
(2) In adopting rules under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919, the authority shall require all  usable
marijuana, cannabinoid  products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts transferred by a med-
ical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS 475C.833 to be labeled  in accordance with sub-
section (1) of this section and rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
[2]
SB 917
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(3) In adopting rules under  ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, the commission shall require all usable
marijuana, cannabinoid products and cannabinoid  concentrates and extracts sold or transferred by
a marijuana retailer that  holds a license issued under ORS 475C.097 to be labeled in accordance
with subsection (1) of this section and rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) In adopting rules under subsection (1) of this section, the commission:
(a) May establish different labeling standards  for different varieties of usable marijuana, for
different types of cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts and  for inhalant
delivery systems that contain industrial hemp-derived vapor items;
(b) May establish different minimum labeling standards for  persons registered under ORS
475C.770 to 475C.919 and persons licensed under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525;
(c) Shall  consider the cost of a potential requirement and how that cost will affect the cost to
the ultimate consumer of the  marijuana item or inhalant delivery system that contains an industrial
hemp-derived vapor item; and
(d) May not adopt rules that are more restrictive than is reasonably necessary to protect  the
public health and safety.
[3]