Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 46.405 is amended to read:
46.405. (1) Except as provided in subsection  (6) of this section, each circuit court shall have a
small claims department.
(2) Except as provided in this section, all actions for the recovery of money,  damages, specific
personal property, or  any penalty or forfeiture must be commenced and prosecuted in the small
claims department if the amount or value claimed in the action does not exceed $750.
(3) Except as provided in this section, an action for the recovery of  money, damages, specific
personal property, or any penalty or forfeiture may be commenced and prosecuted in  the small
claims department if the amount or value claimed in the action does not exceed [ $10,000] $20,000.
(4)(a) Class actions may not be commenced and prosecuted in the small claims department.
(b) An action by an  adult in custody, as defined in ORS 30.642, against another adult in custody
may not be commenced and prosecuted in the small claims department.
(5) Actions providing for statutory attorney  fees in which the amount or value claimed does not
exceed $750 may be commenced and prosecuted in the small claims department or may be  com-
menced and prosecuted in the regular department of the circuit court. This subsection does  not
apply to an action based on contract for which attorney fees are authorized under ORS 20.082.
(6) If a circuit court is  located in the same city as a justice court, the circuit court need not
have a small claims department if the circuit court and the justice court enter into an intergovern-
mental agreement that provides that only the justice court  will operate a small claims department.
If an intergovernmental agreement is entered into under  this subsection, the agreement must es-
tablish appropriate procedures for referring small claims cases to the justice court.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 46.425 is amended to read:
46.425. (1) An action in the small claims department shall be commenced  by the plaintiff’s filing
with the clerk of the court a claim in the form prescribed by the court.
(2) The claim shall:
(a) Contain the name and address of the plaintiff  and of the defendant, followed by a plain and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2719
SB 484
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
simple statement of the claim, including the amount and the date the claim allegedly accrued;
(b) State that the  plaintiff made a good faith effort to collect the claim from the defendant before
filing the claim with the clerk; and
(c) Include  an affidavit attesting to the accuracy of the statements described in paragraphs (a)
and (b)  of this subsection or a declaration under penalty of perjury in the form required by ORCP
1 E.
(3) Except in actions arising under ORS chapter 90, the plaintiff must  include in a claim all
amounts claimed from the defendant arising out of a single transaction or occurrence. Any  plaintiff
alleging damages on a transaction requiring installment payments need only claim  the installment
payments due and owing as of  the date of filing of the claim, and need not accelerate the remaining
payments. The plaintiff may include in a claim all amounts  claimed from a defendant on more than
one transaction or occurrence if the total amount of the claim does not exceed [ $10,000] $20,000.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, a  plaintiff bringing an action on assigned
claims:
(a) Need bring an action only on those  claims that have been assigned as of the date the action
is filed; and
(b) May bring separate actions for each person assigning claims to the plaintiff.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 46.461 is amended to read:
46.461. (1) The defendant in  an action in the small claims department may assert as a counter-
claim any claim that, on the date of issuance of notice pursuant to  ORS 46.445, the defendant may
have against the plaintiff and that arises out of the same transaction or occurrence that is  the
subject matter of the claim filed by the plaintiff.
(2) If the  amount or value of the counterclaim exceeds [ $10,000] $20,000, the court shall strike
the counterclaim and proceed to hear and dispose of the case as though  the counterclaim had not
been asserted unless the defendant files with the counterclaim  a motion requesting that the case be
transferred from the small  claims department to the circuit court. After the transfer the plaintiff’s
claim will not be limited to  the amount stated in the claim filed with the small claims department,
though it must involve the same controversy.
(3)(a) If the amount or value of the counterclaim exceeds that specified in subsection (2) of  this
section, and the defendant files a motion requesting transfer as  provided in subsection (2) of this
section, the case shall be transferred to the circuit court. The  clerk of the court shall notify the
plaintiff and defendant, by mail, of the  transfer. The notice to the plaintiff shall contain a copy of
the counterclaim and shall instruct the plaintiff to file with the court  and serve by mail on the de-
fendant, within 20 days following the mailing of the notice, a reply to the counterclaim and, if the
plaintiff proposes to increase the amount of  the claim originally filed with the small claims depart-
ment, an amended claim for the increased amount. Proof of service on the defendant of  the
plaintiff’s reply and amended claim may be made  by certificate of the plaintiff or plaintiff’s attorney
attached to the reply and amended claim filed  with the court. The defendant is not required to an-
swer an amended claim of the plaintiff.
(b) Upon filing the motion requesting transfer, the defendant shall pay to the clerk  of the court
an amount equal to the difference between the fee paid by  the defendant as required by ORS 46.570
and the fee required of a defendant under ORS 21.160. Upon filing a reply  to the counterclaim, the
plaintiff shall pay to the clerk of the  court an amount equal to the difference between the fee paid
by the plaintiff as required by ORS 46.570 and the fee required of a plaintiff under ORS 21.160.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 51.080 is amended to read:
[2]
SB 484
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
51.080. (1) A justice court has jurisdiction, but not exclusive, of the following actions:
(a) For the recovery of  money or damages only, when the amount claimed does not exceed
[$10,000] $20,000.
(b) For the recovery of specific personal property, when the value of the property  claimed and
the damages for the detention do not exceed [ $10,000] $20,000.
(c) For the recovery of any penalty or forfeiture, whether given  by statute or arising out of
contract, not exceeding [ $10,000] $20,000.
(d) To give judgment without action, upon the confession of the  defendant for any of the causes
specified in this section, except for a penalty or forfeiture imposed by statute.
(2) For purposes of this section, the amount claimed, value of property, damages  or any amount
in controversy does not include any amount claimed as costs and disbursements or  attorney fees as
defined by ORCP 68 A.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 55.011 is amended to read:
55.011. (1) Except as provided in subsection (8) of  this section, in each justice court created
under any law of this state there shall be a small claims department.
(2) Except as provided in this section, all actions for the recovery of money,  damages, specific
personal property, or  any penalty or forfeiture must be commenced and prosecuted in the small
claims department if the amount or value claimed in the action does not exceed $750.
(3) Except as provided in this section, an action for the recovery of  money, damages, specific
personal property, or any penalty or forfeiture may be commenced and prosecuted in  the small
claims department if the amount or value claimed in the action does not exceed [ $10,000] $20,000.
(4) Class actions may not be commenced and prosecuted in the small claims department.
(5) Actions providing for statutory attorney  fees in which the amount or value claimed does not
exceed $750 may be commenced and prosecuted in the small claims department or may be  com-
menced and prosecuted in the regular department of the justice court. This subsection does  not
apply to an action based on contract for which attorney fees are authorized under ORS 20.082.
(6) Jurisdiction of the person of the defendant in an action commenced in the small  claims de-
partment shall be deemed acquired as of the time of service of the notice and claim.
(7) Except as provided in ORS 55.065 (2)(c),  the provisions of ORS 55.020 to 55.140 shall apply
with regard to proceedings in the small claims department of any justice court.
(8) If a justice court is  located in the same city as a circuit court, the justice court need not
have a small claims department if the justice court and the circuit court enter into an intergovern-
mental agreement that provides that only the circuit court  will operate a small claims department.
If an intergovernmental agreement is entered into under  this subsection, the agreement must es-
tablish appropriate procedures for referring small claims cases to the circuit court.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 55.095 is amended to read:
55.095. (1) The defendant in an action in the small claims department may  assert as a counter-
claim any claim that, on the  date of issuance of notice pursuant to ORS 55.045, the defendant may
have against  the plaintiff and that arises out of the same transaction or occurrence that is the
subject matter of the claim filed by the plaintiff.
(2) If the amount of the counterclaim asserted by the defendant exceeds [ $10,000] $20,000, the
justice of the peace  shall strike the counterclaim and proceed to hear and dispose of the case as
though the counterclaim had not  been asserted unless the defendant files with the counterclaim a
motion requesting that the case be transferred  from the small claims department to a court of ap-
propriate jurisdiction and an amount to pay the  costs of the transfer. After the transfer the
[3]
SB 484
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
plaintiff’s claim will not be limited to the amount stated in the claim filed with the justice  of the
peace, though it must involve the same controversy.
(3)(a) If the amount or value of the counterclaim exceeds the jurisdictional  limit of the justice
court for a counterclaim and the defendant files a  motion requesting transfer and an amount to pay
the costs of transfer as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the case shall be  transferred to
the circuit court for the county in which the justice court is located and be  governed as provided
in ORS 52.320  for transfers to the circuit court. The justice court shall notify the plaintiff and de-
fendant, by mail within 10 days following the order of transfer, of the transfer. The notice to the
plaintiff shall contain a copy of the counterclaim and  shall inform the plaintiff as to further pleading
by the plaintiff in the court of appropriate jurisdiction.
(b) Upon filing the motion requesting transfer, the defendant shall pay  to the court of appro-
priate jurisdiction an amount equal to the difference between  the fee paid by the defendant as re-
quired by ORS 51.310 (1)(c) and the appearance fee  for a defendant in the court of appropriate
jurisdiction.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 133.055 is amended to read:
133.055. (1) A peace officer may issue a criminal citation to a  person if the peace officer has
probable cause to  believe that the person has committed a misdemeanor or has committed any felony
that is subject to misdemeanor treatment under ORS 161.705. The peace officer shall  deliver a copy
of the criminal citation to the person. The criminal citation shall require the person  to appear at
the court of the magistrate before whom the person would be taken pursuant to ORS 133.450  if the
person were arrested for the offense.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions  of subsection (1) of this section, when a peace officer re-
sponds to an incident of  domestic disturbance and has probable cause to believe that an assault has
occurred between family or  household members, as defined in ORS 107.705, or to believe that one
such person has placed  the other in fear of imminent serious physical injury, the officer shall arrest
and take into custody the alleged assailant or potential assailant.
(b) When the peace officer makes an  arrest under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the peace
officer is not required to arrest both persons.
(c) When a peace officer makes an arrest under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the  peace of-
ficer  shall  make every effort to determine who is the assailant or potential assailant by considering,
among other factors:
(A) The comparative extent of  the injuries inflicted or the seriousness of threats creating a fear
of physical injury;
(B) If reasonably ascertainable, the history of domestic violence between the persons involved;
(C) Whether any alleged crime was committed in self-defense; and
(D) The potential for future assaults.
(d) As used in this subsection, “assault” includes conduct constituting strangulation under ORS
163.187.
(3) Whenever any peace  officer has reason to believe that a family or household member, as
defined in ORS 107.705, has been abused as defined in ORS 107.705 or that  an elderly person or a
person with a disability has been abused as defined in ORS 124.005, that officer shall use all  rea-
sonable means to prevent further abuse, including advising each person of the availability of a
shelter or other services in the community and giving each person immediate notice of the  legal
rights and  remedies available. The notice shall consist of handing each person a copy of the fol-
lowing statement:
[4]
SB 484
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
_______________________________________________________________________________________
IF YOU ARE THE VICTIM OF  DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OR ABUSE, you can ask the district
attorney to file a criminal complaint. You also have the right to go to the circuit court and file  a
petition requesting any of the following  orders for relief: (a) An order restraining your attacker from
abusing you; (b) an  order directing your attacker to leave your household; (c) an order preventing
your attacker from  entering your residence, school, business or place of employment; (d) an order
awarding you or the other parent custody of  or parenting time with a minor child or children; (e)
an order restraining your attacker from molesting or interfering with minor children in your  cus-
tody; (f) an order awarding you other relief the court considers necessary  to provide for your or
your children’s safety, including emergency monetary assistance. Such orders are  enforceable in
every state.
You may also  request an order awarding support for minor children in your care or for your
support if the other party has a legal obligation to support you or your children.
You also have the right to sue for losses suffered as  a result of the abuse, including medical and
moving expenses, loss of earnings or support, and other out-of-pocket expenses for injuries sustained
and damage to your property. This can be done without an  attorney in the small claims department
of a court if the total amount claimed is under [ $10,000] $20,000.
Similar relief may also be available in tribal courts.
For further information you may contact: 
.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 8. The amendments to  ORS 46.405, 46.425, 46.461, 51.080, 55.011, 55.095 and
133.055 by sections 1 to 7  of this 2025 Act apply to all actions commenced in the small claims
department of a court on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act, without regard to
whether the claim for which the action is commenced arose before, on or  after the effective
date of this 2025 Act.
[5]