Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  State Forestry Department shall establish by rule a Prescribed Fire
Capacity Grant Program to:
(a) Increase the pace and scale of the use of prescribed fire and cultural burning.
(b) Reduce barriers for conducting prescribed fires and cultural burning.
(2) Under the program the department may award grants that:
(a) Support workforce development.
(b) Add capacity to conduct prescribed fires.
(c) Assist local governments and  nongovernmental organizations with funding equipment
and personnel that are needed for conducting prescribed fires.
(3) To implement the program, the department:
(a) May publish a notice that describes eligibility for the grants.
(b) Shall  collaborate with other relevant state agencies, cultural fire practitioners, the
Oregon Prescribed Fire Council and Certified Burn Managers,  as defined in ORS 526.005, to
establish guidelines governing the program and requirements for grantee  reporting and im-
plementation of grant-funded projects.
SECTION 2.
The Prescribed  Fire Capacity Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Prescribed Fire Capacity
Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the
State Forestry Department for the purposes described in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2029.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Prescribed Fire Capacity Fund that are unexpended  and
unobligated on the date specified in subsection (1) of this section shall revert  to the General
Fund.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Forestry Department, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1636
HB 2986
1
2
3
4
5
6
General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for deposit into the  Prescribed Fire Capacity Fund
established by section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]