Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.013 is amended to read:
327.013. The State School Fund distributions for school districts include the following grants:
(1) General Purpose Grant = Funding Percentage ×  Target Grant ×  District  extended ADMw.
For the purpose of the calculation made under this subsection:
(a) The funding percentage shall be calculated  by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to
distribute as nearly as practicable the total sum of money available for distribution.
(b) Target Grant =  Statewide Target per ADMw Grant + Teacher Experience Factor. For the
purpose of the calculation made under this paragraph:
(A) Statewide Target per ADMw Grant = $4,500.
(B) Teacher Experience Factor = $25 ×  {District average teacher experience − statewide av-
erage teacher experience}. As used in this  subparagraph, “average teacher experience” means the
average, in years, of teaching experience of licensed teachers as reported to the Department of  Ed-
ucation.
(c) District extended ADMw = ADMw or  ADMw of the prior year, whichever is greater. The
calculation of the district extended ADMw must  be made as provided by ORS 338.155 if a public
charter school is located in the school district. For the purpose of this paragraph:
(A) Weighted average daily membership or ADMw = average  daily membership + an additional
amount computed as follows:
(i) 1.0 for each  student in average daily membership eligible for special education as a child with
a disability under ORS 343.035,  which may not exceed 11 percent of the district’s ADM without re-
view and  approval by the Department of Education. Children with disabilities eligible for special
education in adult local correctional facilities, as defined in  ORS 169.005, or adult regional
correctional facilities, as defined in ORS 169.620, may not be included in the  calculation made under
this sub-subparagraph.
(ii) 0.5 for each student  in average daily membership eligible for and enrolled in an English
language learner program under ORS 336.079.
(iii) 0.2  for each student in average daily membership enrolled in a union high school district
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2761
HB 3004
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or in an area of  a unified school district where the district is only responsible for educating students
in grades 9 through 12 in that area.
(iv) −0.1 for each student in average daily membership enrolled in an elementary district  oper-
ating kindergarten through grade six  or kindergarten through grade eight or in an area of a unified
school district where the district is only responsible  for educating students in kindergarten through
grade eight.
(v) 0.25 times the sum of the following:
(I) The number of students who are in average  daily membership and who are also in poverty
families, as determined by the Department of Education based on rules  adopted by the State Board
of Education that incorporate poverty data published by the United States Census  Bureau, student
data provided by school districts and other data identified by the board;
(II) The number of children in foster homes in the district as determined by the  report of the
Department of Human Services to the United  States Department of Education, “Annual Statistical
Report on Children in Foster Homes and Children in Families Receiving AFDC  Payments in Excess
of the Poverty Income Level,” or its successor, for October 31 of the  year prior to the year of dis-
tribution; and
(III) The number of children in the district  in state-recognized facilities for neglected and de-
linquent children, based on information  from the Department of Human Services for October 31 of
the year prior to the year of distribution.
(vi) 1.0 for each student  in average daily membership who is homeless, as determined
under rules adopted by the State Board of Education based on standards adopted by the De-
partment of Human Services.
[(vi)] (vii) The amount determined under ORS 327.077 for each remote small elementary  school
and for each small high school in the district.
(B) All numbers of children used  for the computation in this paragraph must reflect any district
consolidations that have occurred since the numbers were compiled.
(C) The total additional  weight that shall be assigned to any student in average daily member-
ship in a district, exclusive  of students described in subparagraph (A)(v) [ and (vi) ] to (vii)  of this
paragraph, may not exceed 2.0.
(2) High cost disabilities grant  = the total amount received by a school district under ORS
327.348 for providing special education and related services to resident pupils with disabilities.
(3)(a) Transportation grant equals:
(A) 70 percent of approved transportation  costs for those school districts ranked below the 80th
percentile under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(B) 80 percent of approved transportation costs for those school districts ranked in or  above the
80th percentile but below the 90th percentile under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(C) 90 percent of approved transportation costs for those school districts ranked in or  above the
90th percentile under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall rank  school districts based on the ap-
proved transportation costs per ADM of each school district, ranking the school district with  the
highest approved transportation costs per ADM at the top of the order.
(4)(a) Facility Grant = 8 percent of total construction costs of new school buildings.
(b) A  school district shall receive a Facility Grant in the distribution year that a new school
building is first used.
(c) As used in this subsection:
[2]
HB 3004
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
(A) “New school building” includes new school buildings, structures  added onto existing school
buildings and  premanufactured structures added to a school district if those buildings or structures
are to be used for instructing students.
(B) “Construction costs” does not include costs for land acquisition.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 327.013 by section 1 of this 2021 Act  apply to State
School Fund distributions commencing with the 2021-2022 distributions.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
[3]