Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 284.101 to
284.148.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “regional cooperative”  means a regional council
of governments created under ORS chapter 190, a  city, a county, a local service district as
defined in ORS 174.116 or any other public or private entity with a public interest in, and the
ability to contribute to, the purpose and strategies  of a tourism district created under this
section.
(2)(a) In addition to the  duties and purposes of the Oregon Tourism Commission, and in
addition to other powers granted to the commission under ORS 284.101 to 284.148, the com-
mission shall identify, designate and monitor tourism districts in this state.
(b) Tourism districts must be  designated by geographical region based on criteria deter-
mined by the commission by rule including, but not limited to, the following:
(A) The existence of a cooperative strategy for tourism and recreation  activities in the
geographical region;
(B) The ability and willingness of a regional cooperative in the geographical region to
initiate, develop, implement and maintain regional projects; and
(C) The ability  and willingness of a regional cooperative in the geographical region to
make annual reports to the commission of progress made toward strategic objectives.
(3) A tourism district designated by the commission under this section may apply  to the
commission for one or more of the following:
(a) Assistance in obtaining grants from the Oregon Business  Development Department
for community development related to tourism  and recreation activities, if the purposes for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2468
HB 2758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
which grants may be made are aligned with the strategic objectives of the tourism district.
(b) Assistance in obtaining  grants from the Department of Transportation for community
transit investments recommended and approved by  the regional cooperative in the tourist
district including, but not limited to:
(A) Intracommunity transit opportunities;
(B) Development of  rural transportation routes to and from sites designated as tourism
and recreation priorities in the tourism district; and
(C) Projects  that benefit the public interest in the tourism district by increasing access
to and reliability of transit to and from areas of scenic interest in the tourism district.
(c) Assistance in applying for and obtaining  temporary waivers for a minimum period of
three years of  certain land use and building code requirements and regulations of public en-
tities where permitted under applicable state law. The temporary waivers would modify, re-
move or not apply one or  more land use regulations so as to allow the tourism district to
use property for tourism and  recreation activities that have been identified by the tourism
district as priority tourism and recreation activities, subject to  revocation upon any
noncompliant or unauthorized use.
(d) Identification and designation of a tourism and recreation activity that is  a live per-
formance as defined  in ORS 164.864 as a priority tourism and recreation activity for the
tourism district in which the live performance takes  place for purposes of ORS 164.869 and
164.873, with or without the consent of the performer of the live performance.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 164.873 is amended to read:
164.873. (1) The provisions of ORS 164.872 and 164.875 do not apply to:
(a) The production of a videotape of a motion picture that is defined  as a public record under
ORS 192.005 (5), in accordance with ORS 192.005 to 192.170 or 357.805 to 357.895.
(b) The production of a videotape of a motion picture that is defined as a legislative record un-
der ORS 171.410, in accordance with ORS 171.410 to 171.430.
(2) The provisions of ORS 164.865, 164.868, 164.869 (1) and (2)  and 164.875 do not apply to the
reproduction  of:
(a) Any recording that is used or  intended to be used only for broadcast by educational radio
or television stations.
(b) A sound  recording, or the production of a videotape of a motion picture, that is defined as
a public record under ORS 192.005 (5), with or without  charging and collecting a fee therefor, in
accordance with ORS 192.005 to 192.170 or 357.805 to 357.895.
(c) A sound recording defined as a legislative record under ORS 171.410,  with or without
charging and collecting a fee therefor, in accordance with ORS 171.410 to 171.430.
(d) Any recording of a live performance that has  been identified and designated by the
Oregon Tourism Commission as a priority tourism and recreation activity of a tourism dis-
trict, in accordance with section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[2]