Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
DNA TESTING OF ARRESTED PERSONS
SECTION 1.
(1) A law enforcement agency shall obtain a blood or buccal sample in ac-
cordance with this section from all arrested persons.
(2)(a) A blood sample may only be drawn in a medically acceptable manner  by a licensed
physician, a person acting under the direction or control of a licensed  physician, a physician
assistant licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525, a nurse licensed  under ORS chapter 678 or
a qualified medical technician.
(b) A buccal sample may be obtained by anyone authorized to do so by the arresting  law
enforcement agency. The person obtaining the buccal sample shall  follow collections proce-
dures established by the Department of State Police.
(c) A test result, or an opinion based upon a test result, of a blood  or buccal sample ob-
tained under this section is not inadmissible as evidence solely  because of deviations from
procedures adopted by the department that do not affect the reliability of the opinion or test
result.
(d) A person authorized by this section to obtain a  blood or buccal sample may not be
held civilly liable for obtaining a sample in accordance with this section.
(3) A sample is not required to be obtained under this section if:
(a) The law  enforcement agency has previously obtained an adequate blood or buccal
sample of the person;
(b) The department  notifies the law enforcement agency that the department has previ-
ously received an adequate blood or buccal sample of the person in  accordance with ORS
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1262
SB 240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
137.076, 161.325 or 419C.473; or
(c) Obtaining a sample would create a substantial and unreasonable risk to the  health
of the arrested person.
(4) The law  enforcement agency shall cause the blood or buccal sample to be transmitted
to the department within 96 hours of  collection in accordance with any procedures estab-
lished by the department.
(5) The blood or buccal sample may be analyzed during or immediately following the ar-
rest of the person,  or at any time thereafter, in accordance with procedures established by
the department.
(6) The department may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 137.076 is amended to read:
137.076. (1) This section applies to any person convicted of:
(a) A felony;
(b) Sexual abuse in the third degree or public indecency;
(c) Conspiracy or attempt to commit rape in the third  degree, sodomy in the third degree, sexual
abuse in the second degree, burglary in the second degree or promoting prostitution; or
(d) Murder or aggravated murder.
(2) When a person is convicted of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The person shall, whether or not ordered to do so by the court under  paragraph (b) of this
subsection, provide a blood or buccal sample at  the request of the appropriate agency designated in
paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(b) The court shall include in the judgment of conviction an order stating that  a blood or buccal
sample is required to be obtained at the request of the appropriate agency and, unless  the convicted
person lacks the ability to pay, that the person shall reimburse the appropriate agency for the  cost
of obtaining and transmitting the blood or  buccal sample. If the judgment sentences the convicted
person to probation, the court shall order the convicted person to submit to  the obtaining of a blood
or buccal sample as a condition of the probation.
(c) The appropriate agency shall cause a  blood or buccal sample to be obtained and transmitted
to the Department of State Police. The agency shall cause the sample to be obtained as  soon as
practicable after conviction. The agency shall obtain the  convicted person’s thumbprint at the same
time the agency  obtains the blood or buccal sample. The agency shall include the thumbprint with
the identifying information that accompanies the sample. Whenever an agency is notified by the
Department of State Police that a sample is  not adequate for analysis, the agency shall obtain and
transmit a blood sample. The appropriate agency shall be:
(A) The Department of Corrections, whenever the convicted person is committed to  the legal
and physical custody of the department.
(B) In all other cases, the law enforcement agency attending upon the court.
(3)(a) A blood sample may only be drawn in a medically acceptable  manner by a licensed phy-
sician, a person acting under the direction or  control of a licensed physician, a physician assistant
licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525, a nurse licensed under ORS chapter  678 or a qualified med-
ical technician.
(b) A  buccal sample may be obtained by anyone authorized to do so by the appropriate agency.
The person obtaining the buccal sample shall follow the collection procedures established by  the
Department of State Police.
(c) A  person authorized by this subsection to obtain a blood or buccal sample shall not be held
[2]
SB 240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
civilly liable for obtaining a sample in  accordance with this subsection and subsection (2) of this
section, ORS 161.325 and 419C.473. The sample shall also be obtained and transmitted  in accordance
with any procedures that may be established by  the Department of State Police. However, no test
result or opinion based upon a test result shall be  rendered inadmissible as evidence solely because
of deviations from procedures adopted  by the Department of State Police that do not affect the re-
liability of the opinion or test result.
(4) No sample is required to be obtained if:
(a) The Department of State Police notifies the court or the appropriate agency that [ it] the
department has previously received an adequate blood  or buccal sample obtained from the con-
victed person in accordance with this section or  ORS 161.325 or 419C.473  or section 1 of this 2023
Act; or
(b) The court determines  that obtaining a sample would create a substantial and unreasonable
risk to the health of the convicted person.
(5) The provisions of subsections (1) to  (4) of this section apply to any person who, on or after
September 29, 1991, is serving a term  of incarceration as a sentence or as a condition of probation
imposed for conviction of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section, and any such person shall
submit to the obtaining  of a blood or buccal sample. Before releasing any such person from
incarceration, the supervisory authority shall cause a blood or buccal  sample and the person’s
thumbprint to be obtained and transmitted in accordance with subsections (1) to (4) of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 181A.155 is amended to read:
181A.155. (1) The Department of State Police is authorized to:
(a) Store blood and  buccal samples received under authority of this section, ORS 137.076, 161.325
and 419C.473 (1) and section 2,  chapter 852, Oregon Laws 2001,  and section 1 of this 2023 Act  and
other physical evidence obtained from analysis of such samples;
(b) Analyze such samples for the purpose of establishing the genetic profile of the donor  or
otherwise determining the identity of persons or contract with other  qualified public or private
laboratories to conduct that analysis;
(c) Maintain a criminal identification database  containing information derived from blood and
buccal analyses;
(d) Utilize such samples to create statistical  population frequency databases, provided that ge-
netic profiles or other such  information in a population frequency database shall not be identified
with specific individuals; and
(e) Adopt rules establishing procedures for obtaining, transmitting and analyzing blood and
buccal samples and for storing and destroying blood and buccal  samples and other physical evidence
and criminal identification information obtained from such analysis.  Procedures for blood and buccal
analyses may include all techniques which the department determines are accurate and  reliable in
establishing identity, including but not limited to, analysis  of DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid), antigen
antibodies, polymorphic enzymes or polymorphic proteins.
(2) If the department is unable to analyze all  samples due to lack of funds, the department shall
analyze samples in the following order:
(a) The department shall first analyze samples from persons convicted of:
(A) Rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual penetration, sexual abuse,  public indecency, incest or using
a child in a display of sexually explicit conduct, as those offenses are defined in ORS  163.355 to
163.427, 163.465 (1)(d), 163.525 and 163.670;
(B) Burglary in the second degree, as defined in ORS 164.215;
[3]
SB 240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Promoting or compelling prostitution, as defined in ORS 167.012 and 167.017;
(D) Burglary in the first degree, as defined in ORS 164.225;
(E) Assault in the first, second or third degree, as defined in ORS 163.165, 163.175 and 163.185;
(F) Kidnapping in the first or second degree, as defined in ORS 163.225 and 163.235;
(G) Stalking, as defined in ORS 163.732;
(H) Robbery in the first, second or third degree, as defined  in ORS 164.395, 164.405 and 164.415;
(I) Manslaughter in the first or second degree, as defined in ORS 163.118 and 163.125;
(J) Criminally negligent homicide, as defined in ORS 163.145;
(K) Aggravated vehicular homicide, as defined in ORS 163.149;
(L) Conspiracy or attempt to commit any felony listed in subparagraphs (A)  to (J) of this para-
graph; or
(M) Murder, aggravated murder or an attempt to commit murder or aggravated murder.
(b) After analyzing samples from persons described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the de-
partment shall analyze samples from persons convicted of a felony  under ORS 475.752, 475.806 to
475.894, 475.904, 475.906 or 475.914.
(c) After analyzing samples from persons described in paragraphs (a)  and (b) of this subsection,
the department shall analyze samples from persons convicted of any other  felony  or from arrested
persons described in section 1 of this 2023 Act .
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of  this section, the department may analyze a sample from a
lower priority before all samples in higher priorities are analyzed if required in a particular case
for law enforcement purposes.
(4) The department may not transfer or disclose any sample, physical  evidence or criminal
identification information obtained, stored or maintained under authority of this section,  ORS
137.076, 161.325 or 419C.473 (1)  or section 1 of this 2023 Act  except:
(a) To a law enforcement agency as defined in ORS 181A.010, a  district attorney or the Criminal
Justice Division of the Department of Justice for the purpose  of establishing the identity of a person
in the course of a criminal investigation or proceeding;
(b) To a party in a criminal  prosecution or juvenile proceeding pursuant to ORS 419C.005 if
discovery or disclosure is required by a separate statutory or constitutional provision; or
(c) To a court or grand jury  in response to a lawful subpoena or court order when the evidence
is not otherwise privileged and is necessary for criminal justice purposes.
(5) The department may  not transfer or disclose any sample, physical evidence or criminal
identification information under subsection (4)  of this section unless the public agency or person
receiving the sample, physical evidence or criminal identification information  agrees to destroy the
sample, physical evidence or  criminal identification information if notified by the department that
a court has reversed the conviction, judgment or order that created the obligation to provide the
blood or buccal sample.
(6) Any  public agency that receives a sample, physical evidence or criminal identification in-
formation under authority of subsection (4) of this section may not disclose  it except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (4)  and (6) of this section, any person who is the subject of a
record within a criminal identification database maintained  under the authority of this section may,
upon request, inspect  that information at a time and location designated by the department. The
department may deny inspection if it  determines that there is a reasonable likelihood that such in-
spection would prejudice a pending criminal investigation. In any case, the department is  not re-
[4]
SB 240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
quired to allow the person or anyone acting on the person’s behalf to test any blood or  buccal
sample or other physical evidence. The department shall adopt procedures governing the  inspection
of records and samples and challenges to the  accuracy of records. The procedures shall accommo-
date the need to preserve the materials from contamination and destruction.
(8)(a) Whenever a court reverses the conviction, judgment or order that created  an obligation
to provide a blood or buccal sample under ORS 137.076 (2), 161.325 or 419C.473 (1)  and the  person
did not provide a sample under section  1 of this 2023 Act , the person who provided the sample
may request destruction of the  sample and any criminal identification record created in connection
with that sample.
(b) Upon  receipt of a written request for destruction pursuant to this section and a certified
copy of the court order reversing the conviction, judgment or order, the department  shall destroy
any sample received from the person, any physical evidence obtained from  that sample and any
criminal identification records pertaining to the person, unless the department determines that the
person has otherwise become obligated to submit a blood or buccal sample as a result of  section 1
of this 2023 Act or  a separate  conviction, juvenile adjudication or finding of guilty except for in-
sanity for an offense listed in ORS 137.076 (1). When the department destroys a sample, physical
evidence or criminal identification record  under this paragraph, the department shall notify any
public agency or person to whom  the sample, physical evidence or criminal identification informa-
tion was transferred or disclosed under subsection (4) of this section  of the reversal of the con-
viction, judgment or order.
(c) The department is not required  to destroy an item of physical evidence obtained from a blood
or buccal sample if evidence relating to another person subject to  the provisions of ORS 137.076,
161.325, 419A.260 and 419C.473  (1) and this section  and section 1 of this 2023 Act  would thereby
be destroyed. Notwithstanding this subsection, no sample,  physical evidence or criminal identifica-
tion record is affected by an order to set aside a conviction under ORS 137.225.
(9) As used in this section,  “convicted” includes a juvenile court finding of jurisdiction based
on ORS 419C.005.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 181A.160 is amended to read:
181A.160. (1)  Immediately upon the arrest of a person for a crime for which criminal offender
information must be provided under ORS 181A.165, a law enforcement agency shall:
(a) Place the arrested person’s fingerprints  and identifying data on forms prescribed or furnished
by the Department of State Police, photograph the  arrested person and promptly transmit the form
and photograph to the department.
(b) If the arrest is disposed  of by the arresting agency, cause the disposition report to be com-
pleted and promptly transmitted to the department.
(c) If  the arrest is not disposed of by the agency, cause the disposition report to be forwarded
to the court that will dispose of the charge for further action in accordance with ORS 181A.175.
(2) A law enforcement agency, immediately upon the  arrest of a person, shall obtain a
blood or buccal sample from the person in accordance with section 1 of this 2023 Act.
[(2)] (3) A law enforcement agency may record, in addition to fingerprints,  the palm prints, sole
prints, toe prints or other personal identifiers when, in the discretion of the agency, it is  necessary
to effect identification of the persons or to the investigation of the crime charged.
[(3)] (4)  A law enforcement agency, for the purpose of  identification, may record and submit to
the department the fingerprints of persons  arrested for crimes for which criminal offender informa-
tion is not required under ORS 181A.165.
[5]
SB 240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 5.
 ORS 419A.260 is amended to read:
419A.260. (1) As used in ORS 419A.260 to 419A.271:
(a) “Contact” means any instance  in which a person’s act or behavior, or alleged act or behav-
ior, which could result in a  referral to a juvenile department or a juvenile court’s assumption of
jurisdiction under ORS 419B.100 (1)(a) to (c) and (f) or  419C.005, comes to the attention of an agency
specified in paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(b) “Expunction” means:
(A) The removal by destruction of a judgment or order related to a  contact and all records and
references associated with a subject person;
(B) The removal by sealing of a judgment or  order related to a contact and all records and
references associated with a subject person;
(C) The removal by redaction of a subject person’s  name and all personal identifiers and all
references to the subject person within a record; or
(D) If a record is  kept by the Department of Human Services , the department’s affixing to the
front of the file containing  the record a stamp or statement identifying the name of the individual,
the date of expunction  and instruction that no further reference may be made to the record that is
subject to the expunction notice or order.
(c) “Person” includes a person under 18 years of age.
(d) “Record” includes a fingerprint or photograph file, report, exhibit or other material which
contains information relating  to a person’s contact with any law enforcement agency, juvenile court
or juvenile department, the Psychiatric Security Review Board, the Department of Human  Services,
the Oregon Youth Authority or the Oregon Health  Authority and is kept manually, through the use
of electronic data processing equipment, or by any other  means by a law enforcement or public in-
vestigative agency, a juvenile court or juvenile department or an agency of the State  of Oregon.
“Record” does not include:
(A) A transcript of a student’s Youth Corrections Education Program academic record;
(B) Material on file with a public  agency which is necessary for obtaining federal financial
participation regarding financial assistance or services on behalf of a person  who has had a contact;
(C) Records kept or  disseminated by the Department of Transportation, State Marine Board and
State Fish and Wildlife Commission pursuant to juvenile or adult order or recommendation;
(D) Police and court records related to an order of  waiver where the matter is still pending in
the adult court or on appeal therefrom, or to any disposition as an adult pursuant to such order;
(E) Records related to a support obligation;
(F) Medical records other than those related to a finding of responsible except for insanity under
ORS 419C.411;
(G) Records of a proposed or adjudicated termination of parental rights and adoptions;
(H) Any law enforcement record of a person  who currently does not qualify for expunction or
of current investigations or cases waived to the adult court;
(I) Records and case reports of the Oregon Supreme Court and the Oregon Court of Appeals;
(J) Any records in cases under  ORS 419C.005 in which a juvenile court found a person to be
within the jurisdiction of the court based upon the  person’s commission of an act which if done by
an adult would constitute one of the following offenses:
(i) Aggravated murder under ORS 163.095;
(ii) Murder in any degree under ORS 163.107 or 163.115;
(iii) Attempt, solicitation or conspiracy to commit murder in any degree or aggravated murder;
[6]
SB 240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree under ORS 163.118;
(v) Manslaughter in the second degree under ORS 163.125;
(vi) Criminally negligent homicide under ORS 163.145;
(vii) Assault in the first degree under ORS 163.185;
(viii) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree under ORS 163.205;
(ix) Kidnapping in the first degree under ORS 163.235;
(x) Rape in the third degree under ORS 163.355;
(xi) Rape in the second degree under ORS 163.365;
(xii) Rape in the first degree under ORS 163.375;
(xiii) Sodomy in the third degree under ORS 163.385;
(xiv) Sodomy in the second degree under ORS 163.395;
(xv) Sodomy in the first degree under ORS 163.405;
(xvi) Unlawful sexual penetration in the second degree under ORS 163.408;
(xvii) Unlawful sexual penetration in the first degree under ORS 163.411;
(xviii) Sexual abuse in the third degree under ORS 163.415;
(xix) Sexual abuse in the second degree under ORS 163.425;
(xx) Sexual abuse in the first degree under ORS 163.427;
(xxi) Promoting prostitution under ORS 167.012;
(xxii) Compelling prostitution under ORS 167.017;
(xxiii) Aggravated driving while suspended or revoked under ORS 163.196;
(xxiv) Aggravated vehicular homicide under ORS 163.149; or
(xxv) An attempt to commit a crime listed in this subparagraph other than manslaughter in  the
second degree and criminally negligent homicide;
(K) Blood  samples, buccal samples and other physical evidence and identification information
obtained, stored or maintained by the Department  of State Police under authority of ORS 137.076,
181A.155 or 419C.473  or section 1 of this 2023 Act ;
(L) Records maintained in the Law Enforcement Data System under ORS 163A.035; or
(M) Records of a law enforcement agency or public investigative agency concerning an  open or
otherwise unresolved investigation.
(e) “Termination” means:
(A) For a  person who is the subject of a record kept by a juvenile court or juvenile department,
the final disposition of a case by informal means, by a decision not to place the person on probation
or make  the person a ward of the court after the person has been found to be within the court’s
jurisdiction or by a  discontinuance of probation, of the court’s wardship or of the jurisdiction of the
Psychiatric Security Review Board, the Oregon Health Authority or the Department of Human Ser-
vices.
(B) For a person who is the subject of a record kept  by a law enforcement or public investi-
gative agency, a juvenile court or juvenile department or an  agency of the State of Oregon, the final
disposition of the person’s most recent contact with a law enforcement agency.
(2) The juvenile court or juvenile department shall make reasonable  effort to provide written
notice to a child who is within  the court’s jurisdiction under ORS 419B.100 (1)(a) to (c) and (f) or
to a youth who is within the court’s jurisdiction under  ORS 419C.005, and to the child’s or youth’s
parent, of the procedures for expunction of a record, the right to and procedure to  access counsel
under this chapter, the legal effect  of an expunction order and the procedures for seeking relief from
the duty to report as a sex offender provided under ORS 163A.130, at the following times:
[7]
SB 240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) At any dispositional hearing or at the time of entering into a formal  accountability agree-
ment;
(b) At the time of termination;
(c) Upon notice to the subject of an expunction pending pursuant to  application of a juvenile
department or motion on a juvenile court; and
(d) At the time of notice of execution of an expunction order.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 419C.473 is amended to read:
419C.473. (1) Whenever an adjudicated youth has  been found to be within the jurisdiction of the
court under ORS 419C.005  for having committed an act that if done by an adult would constitute a
felony listed in subsection (2) of this section, the court  shall order the adjudicated youth to submit
to the obtaining of a blood or buccal  sample in the manner provided by ORS 137.076. The court shall
further order that as soon as  practicable after the entry of the dispositional order, the law
enforcement agency attending upon the court shall cause a blood  or buccal sample to be obtained
and transmitted in accordance with ORS 137.076.
(2) The felonies to which subsection (1) of this section applies are:
(a) Rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual penetration, sexual abuse in the first or second degree,  public
indecency, incest or using a child in a display of sexually explicit conduct, as  those offenses are
defined in ORS 163.355 to 163.427, 163.465 (1)(d), 163.525 and 163.670;
(b) Burglary in the second degree, as  defined in ORS 164.215, when committed with intent to
commit any offense listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) Promoting or compelling prostitution, as defined in ORS 167.012 and 167.017;
(d) Burglary in the first degree, as defined in ORS 164.225;
(e) Assault in the first degree, as defined in ORS 163.185;
(f) Conspiracy or attempt to commit any Class A  or Class B felony listed in paragraphs (a) to
(e) of this subsection; or
(g) Murder or aggravated murder.
(3) No order for the obtaining and transmitting of a blood or buccal sample is required to  be
entered if:
(a) The Department of State Police notifies the court or the  law enforcement agency attending
upon the court  that [ it] the department has previously received an adequate blood or buccal sample
taken from the adjudicated youth in accordance with this section, ORS 137.076  or 161.325 (4)  or
section 1 of this 2023 Act ; or
(b) The court determines  that obtaining a sample would create a substantial and unreasonable
risk to the health of the adjudicated youth.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, blood and buccal samples and other  physical
evidence and criminal identification information obtained under authority of  this section or as a
result of analysis  conducted pursuant to ORS 181A.155 may be maintained, stored, destroyed and
released to authorized persons or agencies under the  conditions established in ORS 181A.155 and
rules adopted by the Department of State Police under the authority of that section.
(5) The court may not order the adjudicated youth or the parent  or guardian of the adjudicated
youth to pay for or to reimburse any agency for the cost of obtaining  or transmitting a blood or
buccal sample under this section.
REIMBURSEMENT OF DNA COLLECTION COSTS
[8]
SB 240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 7.
(1) When a law enforcement agency collects a blood or buccal sample  under
section 1 of this 2023 Act, the agency shall submit a written  request for reimbursement for
the cost of collecting the sample to  the Department of State Police. The request shall include
the arrested person’s name, date of birth and a case number, if applicable.
(2) Upon receipt of a request described in subsection (1) of this section, the department
shall reimburse the law enforcement agency at the rate of $20 per sample.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount  of $ , for reimbursing law enforcement agencies for blood
or buccal sample collection costs under section 7 of this 2023 Act.
TIME REQUIREMENTS FOR DNA TESTING
SECTION 9.  ORS 181A.155, as amended by section 3 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
181A.155. (1) The Department of State Police is authorized to:
(a) Store blood and  buccal samples received under authority of this section, ORS 137.076, 161.325
and 419C.473 (1) and section 2,  chapter 852, Oregon Laws 2001, and section 1 of this 2023 Act and
other physical evidence obtained from analysis of such samples;
(b) Analyze  such samples for the purpose of establishing the genetic profile of the donor or
otherwise determining the identity of  persons or contract with other qualified public or private
laboratories to conduct that analysis;
(c) Maintain a criminal identification database containing  information derived from blood and
buccal analyses;
(d) Utilize such samples to create statistical  population frequency databases, provided that ge-
netic profiles or other such information in a population frequency database  shall not be identified
with specific individuals; and
(e) Adopt rules establishing procedures for obtaining, transmitting and analyzing blood and
buccal samples and for storing and destroying blood and buccal  samples and other physical evidence
and criminal identification information obtained from such analysis.  Procedures for blood and buccal
analyses may include  all techniques which the department determines are accurate and reliable in
establishing identity, including but not limited  to, analysis of DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid), antigen
antibodies, polymorphic enzymes or polymorphic proteins.
[(2) If the department is unable to analyze all samples due to lack of funds, the department  shall
analyze samples in the following order: ]
[(a) The department shall first analyze samples from persons convicted of: ]
[(A) Rape, sodomy, unlawful  sexual penetration, sexual abuse, public indecency, incest or using a
child in  a display of sexually explicit conduct, as those offenses are defined in ORS 163.355 to 163.427,
163.465 (1)(d), 163.525 and 163.670; ]
[(B) Burglary in the second degree, as defined in ORS 164.215; ]
[(C) Promoting or compelling prostitution, as defined in ORS 167.012 and 167.017; ]
[(D) Burglary in the first degree, as defined in ORS 164.225; ]
[(E) Assault in the first, second or third degree, as defined in ORS 163.165, 163.175 and 163.185; ]
[(F) Kidnapping in the first or second degree, as defined in ORS 163.225 and 163.235; ]
[(G) Stalking, as defined in ORS 163.732; ]
[(H) Robbery in the first, second or third  degree, as defined in ORS 164.395, 164.405 and
[9]
SB 240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
164.415;]
[(I) Manslaughter in the first or second degree, as defined in ORS 163.118 and 163.125; ]
[(J) Criminally negligent homicide, as defined in ORS 163.145; ]
[(K) Aggravated vehicular homicide, as defined in ORS 163.149; ]
[(L) Conspiracy or attempt to commit any felony listed in subparagraphs (A) to (J)  of this para-
graph; or]
[(M) Murder, aggravated murder or an attempt to commit murder or aggravated murder. ]
[(b) After analyzing samples from persons described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection, the de-
partment shall analyze samples from persons convicted  of a felony under ORS 475.752, 475.806 to
475.894, 475.904, 475.906 or 475.914.]
[(c) After analyzing samples from  persons described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection,
the department shall analyze samples from persons convicted of any other felony or from arrested per-
sons described in section 1 of this 2023 Act. ]
[(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the department may  analyze a sample from a
lower priority before all samples in higher priorities are analyzed if required  in a particular case for
law enforcement purposes. ]
(2) The department shall  ensure that all blood and buccal samples described in this sec-
tion are analyzed within 96 hours of receipt.
[(4)] (3)  The  department may not transfer or disclose any sample, physical evidence or criminal
identification information obtained, stored or maintained under authority of this section,  ORS
137.076, 161.325 or 419C.473 (1) or section 1 of this 2023 Act except:
(a) To a law enforcement agency as defined in ORS 181A.010, a  district attorney or the Criminal
Justice Division of the Department of Justice for the purpose  of establishing the identity of a person
in the course of a criminal investigation or proceeding;
(b) To a party in a criminal  prosecution or juvenile proceeding pursuant to ORS 419C.005 if
discovery or disclosure is required by a separate statutory or constitutional provision; or
(c) To a court or grand jury  in response to a lawful subpoena or court order when the evidence
is not otherwise privileged and is necessary for criminal justice purposes.
[(5)] (4) The department may not transfer or disclose any sample, physical evidence  or criminal
identification information under subsection [ (4)] (3)  of this section unless the public  agency or per-
son receiving the sample, physical evidence or criminal identification information agrees to  destroy
the sample, physical evidence or  criminal identification information if notified by the department
that a court has reversed the conviction, judgment or order that created the obligation  to provide
the blood or buccal sample.
[(6)] (5)  Any public  agency that receives a sample, physical evidence or criminal identification
information under authority of subsection [ (4)] (3) of this section may not disclose  it except as pro-
vided in subsection [ (4)] (3) of this section.
[(7)] (6) Notwithstanding subsections [ (4)] (3) and [ (6)] (5) of this section, any  person who is the
subject of a record  within a criminal identification database maintained under the authority of this
section may, upon request, inspect that information at a time and location designated by  the de-
partment. The department may deny  inspection if it determines that there is a reasonable likelihood
that such inspection would prejudice a pending criminal investigation. In  any case, the department
is not required to allow the  person or anyone acting on the person’s behalf to test any blood or
buccal sample or other physical  evidence. The department shall adopt procedures governing the in-
spection of records and samples and challenges to the accuracy of records. The procedures shall
[10]
SB 240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
accommodate the need to preserve the materials from contamination and destruction.
[(8)(a)] (7)(a)  Whenever a court reverses the conviction, judgment or order that created  an ob-
ligation to provide a blood or buccal sample under ORS 137.076 (2), 161.325 or 419C.473 (1)  and the
person did  not provide a sample under section 1 of this 2023 Act, the person who provided the
sample may request  destruction of the sample and any criminal identification record created in
connection with that sample.
(b) Upon receipt of a written request for destruction pursuant to this section and a  certified
copy of the  court order reversing the conviction, judgment or order, the department shall destroy
any sample received from the  person, any physical evidence obtained from that sample and any
criminal identification records pertaining to the person, unless the department determines that the
person has otherwise become obligated to submit a blood or buccal sample  as a result of section 1
of this 2023 Act or a separate conviction, juvenile adjudication or  finding of guilty except for in-
sanity for an offense listed in ORS 137.076 (1). When the department destroys a sample, physical
evidence or criminal identification record under this paragraph, the  department shall notify any
public agency or person to whom the sample, physical  evidence or criminal identification informa-
tion was transferred or disclosed under subsection [ (4)] (3)  of this section of the reversal of the
conviction, judgment or order.
(c) The department is not required  to destroy an item of physical evidence obtained from a blood
or buccal sample if evidence relating  to another person subject to the provisions of ORS 137.076,
161.325, 419A.260 and 419C.473 (1) and this section and section 1 of this 2023 Act would thereby  be
destroyed. Notwithstanding this subsection, no sample, physical evidence  or criminal identification
record is affected by an order to set aside a conviction under ORS 137.225.
[(9)] (8)  As used in this section, “convicted” includes a juvenile court finding  of jurisdiction
based on ORS 419C.005.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 181A.324 is amended to read:
181A.324. (1) The Department of State Police shall adopt rules concerning  the prioritization of
testing untested sexual assault forensic evidence kits in the department’s possession. The  rules must
contain :
(a) A  [ requirement to test all nonanonymous kits and a ] prohibition on the testing of anonymous
kits.
(b) A  requirement that all nonanonymous kits be tested within seven days of receipt by
the department.
(2) The department shall test any untested sexual  assault forensic evidence kits, other than
anonymous kits, in the department’s possession in  accordance with the rules adopted pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) The department shall designate an entity,  position or class of positions to receive inquiries
from law enforcement agencies and victims seeking information concerning the testing of sexual
assault forensic evidence kits.
(b) The department shall prohibit victims from directly contacting a forensic  laboratory per-
forming testing of sexual assault forensic evidence  kits and may not publicize a means for victims
to contact the laboratory.
[(4)(a)] (4)  As soon as practicable, the department shall ensure that the results from  testing
sexual assault forensic evidence kits that are eligible to be entered into the Combined DNA Index
System are entered into the system after the testing results are obtained.
[(b) No later than July 1, 2019, the department shall provide a written report to the interim  com-
[11]
SB 240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary, in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245,
describing the  department’s progress in entering results from testing sexual assault forensic evidence
kits into the Combined DNA Index System. ]
(5) No later than January 15 of each calendar year, the department  shall provide a written re-
port to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245. The report must detail the progress made on the backlog of untested sexual
assault forensic evidence kits and include the number of new kits that have been  received during
the previous calendar year, the number of kits that have been tested during the previous calendar
year, and the number of remaining untested kits in the possession of the department.
SECTION 11.
(1) The Department of  State Police may hire permanent or temporary staff
and may enter into contracts with persons or entities in order to enable the  department to
ensure that all blood or buccal samples are analyzed within 96 hours of receipt and  all sexual
assault forensic evidence kits are tested within seven days of receipt.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may, until one year after
the effective date of this 2023 Act, waive hiring requirements  or restrictions in order to en-
able the department to ensure that all blood or buccal samples are analyzed within 96  hours
of receipt and all sexual assault forensic evidence kits are tested within seven  days of re-
ceipt.
SECTION 12. Section 11 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
APPLICABILITY
SECTION 13. Section 1 of this  2023 Act and the amendments to ORS 137.076, 181A.155,
181A.160, 419A.260 and 419C.473 by sections 2 to 6 of this 2023 Act apply to arrests  occurring
on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 14. (1) The amendments to ORS 181A.155 and 181A.324 by sections 9 and 10 of
this 2023 Act become operative on January 1, 2025.
(2) The Department of State Police may take any action before the  operative date speci-
fied in subsection (1) of this section that is  necessary to enable the department to exercise,
on and after  the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the department by the amendments to ORS 181A.155 and
181A.324 by sections 9 and 10 of this 2023 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 15. The unit captions used in this 2023 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 16. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2023
[12]
SB 240
1
2
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[13]