Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 653.256 is amended to read:
653.256. (1) In addition to any  other penalty provided by law, the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries may assess a civil penalty not to exceed  $1,000 against any person that
willfully violates ORS 653.025, 653.030, 653.045, 653.050, 653.060, 653.261, 653.265, 653.606, 653.611,
653.616, 653.621, 653.626, 653.631 or 653.636 or section 5, chapter 537,  Oregon Laws 2015, or any rule
adopted thereunder.
(2) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, the commissioner may assess a civil penalty
not to exceed $1,000 against any person  that intentionally violates ORS 653.077 or any rule adopted
thereunder.
(3) Civil  penalties authorized by this section shall be imposed in the manner provided in ORS
183.745.
(4)(a) All sums collected as penalties under this section shall be first applied toward reimburse-
ment of costs incurred in determining the  violations, conducting hearings under this section and
addressing and collecting the penalties.
(b) The remainder, if any, of the sums collected as penalties under  subsection (1) of this section
shall be paid over by the commissioner [ to the Department of State Lands for the benefit  of the Com-
mon School  Fund of this state. The department shall issue a receipt for the money to the
commissioner.] as follows:
(A) Fifty percent of the remainder of the moneys shall be credited and paid into the Bu-
reau of Labor and Industries Account under ORS 651.160 for the purpose of providing  tech-
nical assistance to employers; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 81
HB 4087
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Fifty percent of the remainder of the moneys shall be paid into  the State Treasury
and credited to the Wage Security Fund under ORS 652.409.
(c) The remainder, if any, of the sums collected as penalties under subsection  (2) of this section
shall be paid over by the commissioner [ to the  Department of Human Services for the benefit of the
Breastfeeding Mother Friendly Employer Project. The department  shall issue a receipt for the moneys
to the commissioner. ] as follows:
(A) Fifty percent of the remainder of the moneys shall be credited and paid into the Bu-
reau of Labor and Industries Account under ORS 651.160 for the purpose of providing  tech-
nical assistance to employers; and
(B) Fifty percent of the remainder of the moneys shall be paid into  the State Treasury
and credited to the Wage Security Fund under ORS 652.409.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 653.370 is amended to read:
653.370. (1) In addition to any  other penalty provided by law, the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries may impose upon any person who violates  ORS 653.305 to 653.370, or any
rule adopted by the  Bureau of Labor and Industries under ORS 653.305 to 653.370 or 653.400, a civil
penalty not to exceed $1,000 for each violation.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 183.482, any petition for review of an order imposing a civil penalty
under this section must  be filed within 30 days following the date the order upon which the petition
is based is served.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, civil penalties  under this section shall be im-
posed as provided in ORS 183.745.
(4) All sums collected as  penalties pursuant to this section shall be first applied toward re-
imbursement of the costs incurred in determining the  violations, conducting hearings under this
section and assessing and  collecting such penalties. The remainder, if any, of the sums collected as
penalties pursuant to  this section shall be paid over by the commissioner [ to the Department of State
Lands for the benefit of the Common School Fund  of this state. The department shall issue a receipt
for the money to the commissioner. ] as follows:
(a) Fifty percent of the remainder of the  moneys shall be credited and paid into the Bu-
reau of Labor and Industries Account under ORS 651.160 for the purpose of providing  tech-
nical assistance to employers; and
(b) Fifty percent of  the remainder of the moneys shall be paid into the State Treasury
and credited to the Wage Security Fund under ORS 652.409.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the commissioner may  not impose a civil
penalty pursuant to this section upon any person who provides evidence satisfactory to the  com-
missioner that:
(A) The person has paid a civil penalty to the United States  Department of Labor for violation
of the child labor provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. 201 et seq.); and
(B) The civil penalty involved the same factual circumstances at issue  before the commissioner.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection  (1) of this section, the commissioner shall refund any civil pen-
alty previously imposed on and  collected from any person pursuant to this section if the person
provides evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that:
(A) The person has paid a  civil penalty to the United States Department of Labor for violation
of the child labor provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. 201 et seq.); and
(B) The civil penalty involved the same factual circumstances underlying the  commissioner’s
imposition of a civil penalty.
[2]
HB 4087
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 3.
 ORS 652.414 is amended to read:
652.414. Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(1) When an employee files a wage claim under this  chapter for wages earned and unpaid[ ,] and
the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries :
(a) Determines that the employer  against whom the claim was filed has ceased doing business
and is without sufficient  assets to pay the wage claim and the wage claim cannot otherwise be fully
and promptly paid, the commissioner, after determining that the claim is  valid, shall pay the claim-
ant, to the extent provided in subsection (2) of this section:
[(a)] (A) The unpaid amount of wages earned within 60 days before the date of the cessation of
business; or
[(b)] (B) If the claimant filed a  wage claim before the cessation of business, the unpaid amount
of wages earned within 60 days before the last day the claimant was employed[ .]; or
(b) Obtains a judgment or issues a final order, including an order of determination that
has become  final, under ORS 652.332 on the wage claim, the commissioner shall pay the
claimant, to the extent provided in subsection  (2) of this section, the amount of wages due
pursuant to the judgment or the final order.
(2) The commissioner shall pay the unpaid amount of wages earned as provided in  subsection (1)
of this  section only to the extent of $10,000 from such funds as may be available pursuant to ORS
652.409 (2).
(3) The commissioner may commence an appropriate action,  suit or proceeding to recover from
the employer, or other persons or property liable for the unpaid wages,  amounts paid from the Wage
Security Fund under subsection (1) of this section. In addition to costs and disbursements, the  com-
missioner is entitled to recover reasonable attorney fees at trial  and on appeal, together with a
penalty of 25 percent of the amount of  wages paid from the Wage Security Fund or $200, whichever
amount is the greater.  All amounts recovered by the commissioner under this subsection and sub-
section (4) of this  section are appropriated continuously to the commissioner to carry out the pro-
visions of this section.
(4) The commissioner has a lien on the personal property of the employer for the benefit of the
fund when the claim is paid under subsection (1) of this section for the  amount so paid and the
penalty referred to in subsection (3) of this section. The commissioner may cause to be filed a veri-
fied written notice of  claim of lien with the recording officer of the county in which the employer
has its principal place of business no later than 30 days after the  date the claim was paid under
subsection (1) of this section. The notice of claim of lien shall contain:
(a) A true statement of the sums paid to wage claimants and the amount  of the penalty provided
for in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) The name of the owner of the personal property to be charged with the lien;
(c) A description of the personal property to be charged  with the lien sufficient for identifica-
tion. If a lien is being claimed against all personal property of the  employer, the description is suf-
ficient if it states that all personal property of the employer is covered; and
(d) The date the wage claim was paid.
(5) Liens created by subsection (4) of this section shall be recorded in the same manner as pro-
vided for in ORS 87.246 and may be foreclosed in the manner provided for in ORS 87.262.
(6) Liens created by subsection (4) of this section shall have priority  over any other liens or
security interests perfected after the date the notice  of claim is filed with the county recording of-
ficer under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
[3]
HB 4087
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(7) The commissioner shall promulgate rules to carry  out the provisions of this section that in-
clude, but are not limited to, prescribing procedures for a timely and cost efficient method  for the
payment of wage claims from the Wage Security Fund and procedures  for prorating wage claims if
insufficient funds are available for payment.
(8) Nothing in this section is intended to require the  commissioner to pay wage claims for which
moneys are not available under ORS 652.409 (2).
SECTION 4.
The Bureau of Labor and Industries shall conduct a study  of provisions of
state law relating to employee rights and protections. The bureau shall:
(1) Identify existing statutes that impose penalties, including  fines and civil penalties,
against employers  who violate or fail to comply with statutory requirements concerning
employee rights, including, but not limited to, the right to meal  periods and rest periods
under ORS 653.261; and
(2) Explore options and recommend legislative changes to provide a means, through  civil
action or otherwise, by which an employee may be compensated for any loss  or harm due to
an employer’s failure to comply  with any statutory requirements relating to employee rights
and protections.
SECTION 5. No later than September 15, 2022, the Commissioner  of the Bureau of Labor
and Industries shall submit a report, in the manner provided  in ORS 192.245, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly relating to business and labor that:
(1) Describes how the moneys credited to the Bureau  of Labor and Industries Account
under ORS 653.256 and 653.370 were spent on providing technical assistance to employers; and
(2) Includes the results of  the study conducted under section 4 of this 2020 Act along with
any recommended legislative changes.
SECTION 6. Sections 4 and 5 of this 2020 Act are repealed on January 1, 2023.
[4]