Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A person commits the crime of grooming if the  person knowingly, by
using any means described in  subsection (2) of this section, seduces, solicits, lures or entices,
or attempts to seduce, solicit, lure, or  entice, a child, a child’s guardian or another person
believed by the person to be a child or a child’s guardian, to:
(a) Commit a sex crime;
(b) Distribute an image of the sex organs of the child; or
(c) Engage in unlawful sexual conduct with  a child or with another person believed by the
person to be a child.
(2) As used in subsection (1) of this section, “means” means:
(a) By using a computer online system, Internet service,  local bulletin board service or
any other device capable of electronic data storage or transmission;
(b) By performing an act:
(A) In person; or
(B) By conduct through a third party; or
(c) By using written communication.
(3) Grooming is a Class C felony.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Child” means a person under 17 years of age.
(b) “Image” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163.472.
(c) “Sex crime” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
(d) “Sexual conduct” means sexual intercourse, oral or  anal sexual intercourse or sexual
contact, as those terms are defined in ORS 163.305.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 161.005 is amended to read:
161.005. ORS 161.005 to 161.055, 161.065, 161.085 to 161.125, 161.150  to 161.175, 161.190 to
161.275, 161.290 to 161.373, 161.405 to 161.485, 161.505 to 161.585, 161.605, 161.615 to 161.685, 161.705
to 161.737, 162.005, 162.015 to 162.035, 162.055 to 162.115, 162.135  to 162.205, 162.225 to 162.375,
162.405 to 162.425, 162.465, 163.005, 163.095, 163.107, 163.115, 163.125 to 163.145,  163.149, 163.160 to
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1899
HB 3425
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
163.208, 163.191, 163.196, 163.215 to 163.257, 163.261, 163.263,  163.264, 163.266, 163.275, 163.285,
163.305 to 163.467, 163.429, 163.432, 163.433, 163.472, 163.505 to 163.575, 163.665  to 163.693, 163.700,
163.701, 163.715, 164.005, 164.015 to 164.135, 164.138, 164.140, 164.205 to 164.270, 164.305 to 164.377,
164.395 to 164.415, 164.805, 164.857, 164.886, 165.002 to 165.102, 165.109, 165.118,  165.805, 165.815,
166.005 to 166.095,  166.119, 166.125, 166.128, 166.350, 166.382, 166.384, 166.660, 167.002 to 167.027,
167.057, 167.060 to 167.100, 167.117, 167.122 to 167.162, 167.203 to 167.252,  167.310 to 167.340, 167.350,
167.810 and 167.820 and section 1 of this 2025 Act  shall be  known and may be cited as Oregon
Criminal Code of 1971.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 163A.005, as amended  by section 1, chapter 63, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended
to read:
163A.005. As used in ORS 163A.005 to 163A.235:
(1) “Another United States court” means  a federal court, a military court, the tribal court of a
federally recognized Indian tribe or a court of:
(a) A state other than Oregon;
(b) The District of Columbia;
(c) The Commonwealth of Puerto Rico;
(d) Guam;
(e) American Samoa;
(f) The Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands; or
(g) The United States Virgin Islands.
(2) “Attends” means is enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis.
(3)(a) “Correctional facility” means any place used for the confinement of persons:
(A) Charged with or convicted of a crime or otherwise confined under a court order.
(B) Found to be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court  for having committed an act that
if committed by an adult would constitute a crime.
(b) “Correctional facility” applies  to a state hospital or a secure intensive community inpatient
facility only as to  persons detained therein charged with or convicted of a crime, or detained therein
after being found guilty except for  insanity under ORS 161.290 to 161.373 or responsible except for
insanity under ORS 419C.411.
(4) “Institution of higher education” means a  public or private educational institution that pro-
vides a program of post-secondary education.
(5) “Sex crime” means:
(a) Rape in any degree;
(b) Sodomy in any degree;
(c) Unlawful sexual penetration in any degree;
(d) Sexual abuse in any degree;
(e) Incest with a child victim;
(f) Using a child in a display of sexually explicit conduct;
(g) Encouraging child sexual abuse in any degree;
(h) Transporting child pornography into the state;
(i) Paying for viewing a child’s sexually explicit conduct;
(j) Compelling prostitution;
(k) Promoting prostitution;
(L) Kidnapping in the first degree if the victim was under 18 years of age;
(m) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a minor;
[2]
HB 3425
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(n) Sexual misconduct if the offender is at least 18 years of age;
(o) Possession of materials depicting sexually explicit conduct of a child in the first degree;
(p) Kidnapping in the second degree  if the victim was under 18 years of age, except by a parent
or by a person found to be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court;
(q) Online sexual corruption of a  child in any degree if the offender reasonably believed the
child to be more than five years younger than the offender;
(r) Luring a minor, if:
(A) The offender reasonably believed the minor or, in the  case of a police officer or agent of a
police officer posing as a minor, the purported minor to be more than five years younger than the
offender or under 16 years of age; and
(B) The court designates in the judgment that the offense is a sex crime;
(s) Sexual assault of an animal;
(t) Public indecency or private indecency, if  the person has a prior conviction for a crime listed
in this subsection;
(u) Trafficking in persons as described in ORS 163.266 (1)(b) or (c);
(v) Purchasing sex with  a minor if the court designates the offense as a sex crime pursuant to
ORS 163.413 (3)(d), or the offense is the defendant’s second  or subsequent conviction under ORS
163.413 (3)(b)(B);
(w) Invasion of personal privacy in the first degree, if the court designates the offense as a sex
crime pursuant to ORS 163.701 (3);
(x) Sexual abuse by fraudulent representation;
(y) Abuse of a corpse in the first degree as described in ORS 166.087 (1)(a);
(z) Grooming;
[(z)] (aa)  Any  attempt to commit any of the crimes listed in paragraphs (a) to [ (y)] (z)  of this
subsection;
[(aa)] (bb)  Burglary, when committed with intent to commit any  of the offenses listed in para-
graphs (a) to [ (y)] (z)  of this subsection; or
[(bb)] (cc)  Criminal conspiracy if the offender agrees with one or more persons to  engage in or
cause the performance of an offense listed in paragraphs (a) to [ (y)] (z)  of this subsection.
(6) “Sex offender” means a person who:
(a) Has been convicted of a sex crime;
(b) Has been found guilty except for insanity of a sex crime;
(c) Has been convicted in another United States court of a crime:
(A) That would constitute a sex crime if committed in this state; or
(B) For which the person would have  to register as a sex offender in that court’s jurisdiction,
or as required under federal law, regardless of whether the crime would  constitute a sex crime in
this state; or
(d) Is described in ORS 163A.025 (1).
(7) “Works”  or “carries on a vocation” means full-time or part-time employment for more than
14 days within one calendar year whether financially compensated, volunteered or  for the purpose
of governmental or educational benefit.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 163A.115, as amended  by section 2, chapter 63, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended
to read:
163A.115. Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(1) A person who is a sexually violent dangerous offender under ORS 137.765:
[3]
HB 3425
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
(a) Must be classified as a level three sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (3); and
(b) Is not eligible for relief from the obligation to report as  a sex offender or reclassification as
a level two sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (2), pursuant to a petition filed under ORS 163A.125.
(2) A person who has been convicted or found guilty except for insanity of one of the  following
offenses is not eligible for relief from the obligation to report as  a sex offender pursuant to a peti-
tion filed under ORS 163A.125 (1):
(a) Rape in the first degree;
(b) Sodomy in the first degree;
(c) Unlawful sexual penetration in the first degree;
(d) Kidnapping in the first degree as described in ORS 163.235 (1)(e) or when the  victim is under
18 years of age; or
(e) Burglary in the first degree when committed with the intent to  commit any of the offenses
listed in ORS 163A.005 (5)(a) to [ (y)] (z) .
(3) A person classified as a level three sex offender  under section 7 (2)(b), chapter 708, Oregon
Laws 2013, is not eligible for relief from the obligation to report as a  sex offender pursuant to a
petition filed under ORS 163A.125 (1).
[4]