Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a grant program for  the
purpose of making grants from the Pregnancy  Assistance Fund established under section 2
of this 2025 Act. Under the program, the authority shall make grants to entities:
(a) That are qualified as specified in subsection (2) of this section; and
(b)(A) That inform pregnant or postpartum persons  about agencies or organizations that
provide services described in subsection (3) of this section;
(B) That refer pregnant or postpartum persons  to agencies or organizations that provide
services described in subsection (3) of this section;
(C) That assist, in a manner not described in  subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this para-
graph, pregnant or postpartum persons  in receiving services from agencies or organizations
that provide services described in subsection (3) of this section; or
(D) That directly provide services described in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) To be qualified to receive a grant under this section, an entity must:
(a) Be a private nonprofit organization.
(b) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the authority that the entity:
(A) Provides for the proper supervision of activities conducted by the entity;
(B) Primarily will use grant moneys to encourage or assist pregnant persons  in carrying
their pregnancies to term; and
(C) Will not use grant moneys to encourage or assist pregnant persons in  having
abortions unless an abortion is  necessary to avoid impairment of a pregnant person’s major
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 987
HB 2382
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
bodily functions.
(c) Provide each pregnant person  who receives assistance from the entity with informa-
tion on:
(A) Fetal development, including a week-by-week description of fetal characteristics;
(B) Adequate medical care for pregnant persons and newborns; and
(C) Adequate nutrition for pregnant persons and newborns.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1)(b)  of this section, an entity may assist a pregnant or
postpartum person in receiving services from an  agency or organization that provides, or an
entity may directly provide, one or more of the following services:
(a) Medical care for pregnant or postpartum persons;
(b) Nutritional support services for pregnant or postpartum persons;
(c) Adoption services;
(d) Parenting education;
(e) Parenting support services;
(f) Assistance in acquiring housing; or
(g) Assistance in acquiring further education or finding employment.
(4) The authority may pay expenses incurred by  the authority in administering this sec-
tion out of moneys that are available to the authority for the purpose  of making grants un-
der this section.
(5) The authority may adopt rules necessary to administer this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Pregnancy Assistance Fund is  established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the Pregnancy Assistance
Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority for
purposes described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The authority may accept  from any source any grant, donation or gift of moneys for
deposit in the fund.
SECTION 3. At a  minimum, the following amounts of moneys shall be appropriated to the
Oregon Health Authority for deposit in the Pregnancy Assistance Fund  established under
section 2 of this 2025 Act:
(1) For the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, the average amount of moneys per biennium
expended by the authority on reimbursing abortions as part of the state’s medical assistance
program during the biennia beginning July 1, 2009, July 1, 2011, July 1,  2013, July 1, 2015, July
1, 2017, July 1, 2019, and July 1, 2021; and
(2) For each biennium subsequent to the biennium beginning on July 1, 2025:
(a) The amount of moneys appropriated for the preceding biennium; and
(b) An amount of moneys equal to  any percentage increase in the cost of living, based
on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region  (All Items), published
by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department  of Labor, that has oc-
curred since the beginning of  the preceding biennium multiplied by the amount of moneys
appropriated for the preceding biennium.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority may  reimburse abortions as part of the
state’s medical assistance program only if the abortion is performed  for one of the following
reasons:
(a) The abortion is necessary to avoid impairment of the pregnant  person’s major bodily
[2]
HB 2382
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
functions; or
(b) The pregnancy is the result of rape or incest.
(2) The authority shall  adopt rules necessary to verify that reimbursement of abortions
as part of the state’s medical assistance program is in compliance with this section.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act shall be submitted to the people for their  approval or rejection
at the next regular general election held throughout this state.
[3]