Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 336.071 is amended to read:
336.071. (1) All schools are required to [ instruct and] drill  and instruct  students on emergency
procedures so that the students can prepare for and respond to an emergency and the immediate
effects of an emergency without confusion or panic.
(2) [ The emergency procedures shall include ] Drills and  instruction shall be provided  on  the
following emergency procedures:
(a) Fires;
(b) Earthquakes, which shall include tsunami drills and instruction in schools in a tsunami haz-
ard zone; [ and]
(c) Safety threats[ .]; and
(d) Natural disasters.
[(2)(a)] (3)(a) Drills and instruction on fire emergencies shall include routes and  methods of ex-
iting the school building.
(b) Drills and instruction on earthquake emergencies shall include the earthquake emergency
response procedure known as “drop, cover and hold on.” A  school may drill earthquake emergency
response procedures in addition to “drop, cover and hold on” when  the school determines, based on
evaluation of specific engineering and  structural issues related to a building, that “drop, cover and
hold on” may not be the most effective earthquake emergency response procedure to prevent or limit
injury or loss of life.
(c) Drills and instruction on tsunami emergencies shall include immediate evacuation after an
earthquake when appropriate or after a tsunami warning  to protect students against inundation by
tsunamis.
(d) Drills and instruction on safety threats shall include:
(A) Procedures related to lockdown, lockout, shelter in place and evacuation; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 202
HB 2229
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Other appropriate actions to take when there is a threat to safety.
(e) Drills and instruction on natural disasters  shall address preparation for a natural
disaster and survival in the days and weeks  after a natural disaster, including addressing
water shortages. Schools shall  provide drills and instruction on natural disasters that include
floods and heavy snow.
(4)(a) In addition  to the drills and instruction on emergency procedures described in
subsection (2)(b) of this  section, each school district shall provide age-appropriate instruction
on earthquake and tsunami safety.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a  school district may decline to
provide instruction on earthquake and tsunami safety by providing written notice  to the
State Resilience  Officer prior to the beginning of each school year. Nothing in this para-
graph allows a school district to not provide drills and instruction on emergency  procedures
related to earthquakes and tsunamis as required under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(c) The Department  of Education shall develop curriculum related to earthquake and
tsunami safety and make the curriculum available to  school districts for the purpose of
providing instruction under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(3)(a)] (5)(a) At least [ 30 minutes] four hours  in each school [ month] year shall be used [ to in-
struct students on the emergency procedures ] for drills and instruction on emergency procedures
described in subsection [ (1)] (2) of this  section  and the instruction described in subsection (4)
of this section .
(b) At least two drills on earthquakes shall be conducted each year.
(c) At least two drills on safety threats shall be conducted each year.
(d) In schools in a tsunami hazard zone, at least three drills on earthquakes and tsunamis shall
be conducted each year.
[(4)] (6) All schools shall maintain all exit doors so that the doors  can be opened from the inside
without a key during school hours.
[(5)] (7) Units of local government and state agencies associated with emergency  procedures
training and planning shall:
(a) Review drills and instruction on  emergency procedures proposed by schools; and
(b) Assist schools in the drills and instruction [ and drilling ] of students [ in] on emergency pro-
cedures.
[(6)] (8) As used in this section, “school” means any:
(a) Kindergarten through grade 12 public or private school; or
(b) Educational institution having an average daily attendance of 50 or more students.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of  $_______, which may be expended for developing and distribut-
ing the curriculum described in ORS 336.071 (4)(c).
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments to  ORS 336.071 by section 1 of this 2019 Act become
operative on July 1, 2020.
(2) The amendments to ORS 336.071 by section 1 of this 2019 Act first  apply to the
2020-2021 school year.
(3) The Department  of Education may take any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the department  to exercise, on
and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section, all of the duties,
[2]
HB 2229
1
2
3
4
5
functions and powers conferred on the department by ORS 336.071 (4)(c).
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[3]