Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management  shall study the po-
tential effects of a solar event on the well-being of the population of this state.
(2) The department may consult with any other entities, including state  agencies, aca-
demic institutions and private entities, in carrying out the study.
(3) The department shall submit a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to emergency management no later than September 15, 2026.
(4) As used in this section, “solar  event” means a solar flare or coronal mass ejection
resulting in geomagnetic effects on the earth.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1496