Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Qualifying grant”  means federal research moneys offered to post-secondary insti-
tutions of education:
(A) On a competitive basis; and
(B) With  a requirement that in order to receive the federal moneys, the post-secondary
institution of education must provide additional  moneys from private industry, state or other
sources.
(b) “Qualifying institution” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; or
(B) The Oregon Health and Science University.
(2) In order to be eligible  to receive moneys from the University Research Fighting Fund
established in section 2 of this  2017 Act, a qualifying institution shall, at the time the quali-
fying institution applies for a qualifying grant:
(a) Notify the Governor that the qualifying institution has applied for a qualifying  grant;
and
(b) Apply to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for moneys from the Uni-
versity Research Fighting Fund.
(3) The application submitted under subsection (2)(b) of this section must include a de-
tailed description on how receiving the qualifying grant would:
(a) Contribute to the economic development and commercialization of products or ideas;
(b) Assist in the solution of local, state, national or international problems;
(c) Further innovation; or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1067
HB 2582
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Create or advance general knowledge, information and well-being.
(3) A qualifying institution may apply for a federal research grant individually or  in
partnership with:
(a) Any other qualifying institution or institutions; or
(b) Any other research university located in the United States.
(4) The commission by rule shall develop a  process for reviewing and determining which
applications submitted under subsection (2)(b) of this section should be awarded moneys from
the University Research Fighting Fund.
(5) When  awarding moneys from the University Research Fighting Fund, the commission
shall ensure that:
(a) A qualifying institution may not receive moneys from the fund until the  institution
is awarded the qualifying grant.
(b) There is no limit on the number of applications for which a qualifying institution  may
be awarded moneys from the fund.
(c) There is  an anticipated return on investment of at least two-to-one on any state
moneys invested. This requirement may be reduced through the use  of moneys provided by
private industry or philanthropy.
(d) No more than $10,000,000 may be awarded from the fund to a single application.
(e) No more than $2,000,000 during a biennium may be awarded from the fund to  appli-
cations for grants of less than $500,000.
(f) No more than $10,000,000 during a  biennium may be awarded from the fund for the
purpose of capital construction.
(6) Grants or moneys provided under  this section do not qualify as matching funds for
the purposes of Article XI-G bonds.
(7) The commission shall  report to the Legislative Assembly one time per calendar
quarter regarding the awarding of moneys from the University Research Fighting Fund.
SECTION 2.
(1) The University Research Fighting  Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated or allocated to the Higher  Education
Coordinating Commission for deposit into the fund and any donations or grants received by
the commission for a purpose of the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission for the purpose of carrying out  the provisions of section 1 of this 2017
Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used  in this section “ending balance” has the meaning given that term
in ORS 293.146.
(2)(a) If an  ending balance remains following the transfer of General Fund moneys to the
Oregon Rainy  Day Fund under ORS 293.146 (2), an amount necessary to ensure that the
balance of the  University Research Fighting Fund established by section 2 of this 2017 Act
is equal to $20,000,000 shall be transferred to the University Research Fighting Fund.
(b) If the  ending balance following the transfer of moneys to the Oregon Rainy Day Fund
is not sufficient  to enable the balance of the University Research Fighting Fund to equal
$20,000,000, an amount equal to the ending balance following the transfer of moneys  to the
Oregon Rainy Day Fund shall be transferred to the University Research Fighting Fund.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for
[2]
HB 2582
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000 for
deposit into the University Research Fighting  Fund established by section 2 of this 2017 Act
for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2017.
[3]