Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services shall award a grant  of $2,000,000 to the City of Klamath Falls for the
purpose of securing an agreement with a commercial airline  to provide air service to the
Crater Lake-Klamath Regional Airport.
(2) Before the city may receive the grant under  subsection (1) of this section, the city
shall enter into a grant agreement with the department.
(3) The  grant agreement must include terms obligating the city to repay the grant, and
specifying the date by which the funds must be returned, if  the department finds that the
city was unable to secure an agreement for commercial air service,  as described in sub-
section (1) of this section, before June 30, 2027.
(4) If the department receives funds under subsection (3) of  this section, the department
shall deposit the funds into the General Fund.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000,  which may be expended for car-
rying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4842