Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall  conduct a study
of government efficiency in this state.
(2) The department shall report the findings of the study to an  appropriate committee
or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4536