Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
HOSPITAL SIGNAGE REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 654.412 to
654.423.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) Every health care employer that is a hospital shall post signage in-
forming the public about the hospital’s workplace safety standards. At  a minimum, the
signage shall inform the public that it is a crime under ORS 163.165 to cause physical injury
to another person who is working in a  hospital in the performance of their official duties.
The hospital shall post the signage:
(A) Within 15 feet  of all hospital public entrances in areas that are clearly visible to the
public.
(B) At a minimum, in English and the languages most commonly spoken  by at least one
percent of the residents in the county where the hospital is located.
(b) The Director  of the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall make
available to hospitals  model signage that meets the requirements of this subsection. The
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 246
HB 4088
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
model signage must be made available in at least the five languages that are most  commonly
spoken in this state.
(2)(a) In addition to the  signage required under subsection (1) of this section, every
health care employer that  is a hospital shall post signage that informs hospital employees
of:
(A) The rights and protections afforded to employees  under ORS chapter 654 with respect
to reporting an  incident of assault committed against a hospital employee on hospital prem-
ises; and
(B) The procedures, including the necessary contact information, for reporting  an inci-
dent of assault to law enforcement.
(b) The hospital shall post the signage:
(A) In a conspicuous and accessible location where the hospital  typically notifies em-
ployees of their workplace rights.
(B) In English and the five  most commonly spoken languages in the county where the
hospital is located.
(c) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall make available to
hospitals model signage that meets the requirements of this subsection.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 441.096 is amended to read:
441.096. (1)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a health care practi-
tioner working at a health care facility  and providing direct care to a patient shall wear an iden-
tification badge indicating the practitioner’s name and professional title.
(b) No person working in a hospital shall be required to wear an identification badge that
includes the worker’s last name unless  the worker specifically requests that the badge in-
clude the worker’s last name.
(2) A health care  facility shall develop policies that specify the size and content of the identifi-
cation badge required by subsection (1) of this section.
(3) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Health care facility” means a health care facility as defined in ORS 442.015  or a mental
health facility, alcohol treatment facility or drug treatment facility licensed or operated under  ORS
chapter 426 or 430.
(b) “Hospital” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 654.182 is amended to read:
654.182. (1) In carrying out ORS 654.176, the Director  of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services shall adopt rules that include, but are not limited to, provisions:
(a) Prescribing the membership of the committees to ensure equal numbers of employees,  who
are volunteers or are  elected by their peers, and employer representatives and specifying the fre-
quency of meetings.
(b) Requiring employers to make adequate written records  of each meeting and to file and
maintain the records subject to inspection by the director.
(c) Requiring employers to compensate employee representatives on  safety committees at the
regular hourly wage while the employees are engaged  in safety committee training or are attending
safety committee meetings.
(d) Prescribing the duties and functions of safety  committees, which include, but are not limited
to:
(A) Establishing procedures for workplace safety inspections by the committee.
[2]
HB 4088
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Establishing procedures for investigating all safety incidents, accidents,  illnesses and deaths.
(C) Evaluating accident and illness prevention programs.
(e) Prescribing guidelines for the training of safety committee members.
(f) Prescribing alternate forms of safety  committees and safety meetings to meet the special
needs of small employers, agricultural employers and employers with mobile worksites.
(g) Requiring an employer that is a hospital to permit a representative of a labor union
that represents the interests of the hospital staff  to attend safety meetings and serve as a
nonvoting member of the employer’s safety committee.
(2) An employer that is a member of a multiemployer group operating  under a collective bar-
gaining agreement that contains  provisions regulating the formation and operation of a safety com-
mittee that meets or exceeds the minimum requirements of this  section and ORS 654.176 shall be
considered to have met the requirements of this section and ORS 654.176.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 654.414 is amended to read:
654.414. (1) A health care employer shall:
(a) Conduct periodic security and safety assessments to identify existing  or potential hazards for
assaults committed against employees;
(b) Develop  and implement an assault prevention and protection program for employees based
on assessments conducted under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Provide assault prevention and protection training on a regular and ongoing  basis for em-
ployees.
(2) An assessment conducted under  subsection (1)(a) of this section shall include, but need not
be limited to:
(a) A measure of the frequency of assaults committed against  employees that occur on the
premises of a health care employer or in the home of a patient  receiving home health care services
during the preceding five years or for the years that records  are available if fewer than five years
of records are available; and
(b) An identification of the causes and consequences of assaults against employees.
(3) An  assault prevention and protection program developed and implemented by a health care
employer under subsection (1)(b)  of this section shall be based on an assessment conducted under
subsection (1)(a) of this section and shall address security considerations related to the following:
(a) Physical attributes of the health care setting;
(b) Staffing plans, including security staffing;
(c) Personnel policies;
(d) First aid and emergency procedures;
(e) Procedures for reporting assaults; and
(f) Education and training for employees.
(4)(a) Assault prevention and protection training required under subsection (1)(c)  of this section
shall address the following topics:
(A) General safety and personal safety procedures;
(B) Escalation cycles for assaultive behaviors;
(C) Factors that predict assaultive behaviors;
(D) Techniques for obtaining medical history from a patient with assaultive behavior;
(E) Verbal and physical techniques to de-escalate and minimize assaultive behaviors;
(F) Strategies for avoiding physical harm and minimizing use of restraints;
(G) Restraint techniques consistent with regulatory requirements;
[3]
HB 4088
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(H) Self-defense, including:
(i) The amount of  physical force that is reasonably necessary to protect the employee or a third
person from assault; and
(ii) The use of least restrictive procedures necessary under the circumstances,  in accordance
with an approved behavior management plan, and any other methods of response  approved by the
health care employer;
(I) Procedures for documenting and reporting incidents involving assaultive behaviors;
(J) Programs for post-incident counseling and follow-up;
(K) Resources available to employees for coping with assaults; and
(L) The health care employer’s workplace assault prevention and protection program.
(b) A health care employer shall provide assault prevention  and protection training to a new
employee within 90 days of the employee’s initial hiring date.
(c) A health care employer may use classes,  video recordings, brochures, verbal or written
training or other training that  the employer determines to be appropriate, based on an employee’s
job duties, under the assault prevention and protection program developed by the employer.
(5) At least once every two years, a health care employer shall establish, in coordination with
the health  care employer’s workplace safety committee as described in ORS 654.176, a process by
which the committee shall review the health care  employer’s assault prevention and protection
program developed and implemented under  subsection (1)(b) of this section in order to evaluate the
efficacy of the program and consider any changes to the program.
(6) On  or before September 30 of each year, beginning in 2024, a health care employer
that is a hospital shall annually prepare and submit:
(a) To the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to behavioral health
and health care, a report summarizing the status of the hospital’s assault  prevention and
protection program, including any measurable outcomes demonstrating a reduction in:
(A) The number of incidents of assaults committed  against employees on hospital prem-
ises;
(B) The number of employee-reported physical injuries resulting from assaults  that oc-
curred on hospital premises; and
(C) Employee turnover rates attributable to workplace violence.
(b) To the Director of the Department of Business  Services, the number of root cause
analyses conducted under the hospital’s assault prevention and protection program, if  any,
to determine  the root causes of assaults committed against hospital employees on hospital
premises. A  report submitted under this paragraph need only include the date of the root
cause analysis and the nature of the assaultive behavior.
ASSAULT
SECTION 6.
 ORS 163.165 is amended to read:
163.165. (1) A person commits the crime of assault in the third degree if the person:
(a) Recklessly causes serious physical injury to  another by means of a deadly or dangerous
weapon;
(b) Recklessly causes serious physical injury to another under circumstances manifesting  ex-
treme indifference to the value of human life;
(c) Recklessly causes physical injury to another by means of a deadly or dangerous weapon un-
[4]
HB 4088
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
der circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life;
(d) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes, by  means other than a motor vehicle, physical
injury to the operator of a public transit vehicle while the operator is in control of or operating the
vehicle. As used in this  paragraph, “public transit vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS
166.116;
(e) While being aided by another person actually  present, intentionally or knowingly causes
physical injury to another;
(f) While committed to  a youth correction facility, intentionally or knowingly causes physical
injury to another knowing the other person is a staff member while  the other person is acting in the
course of official duty;
(g) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes physical injury to an emergency medical ser-
vices provider, as defined in ORS 682.025, while the  emergency medical services provider is per-
forming official duties;
(h) Being at least 18 years of age, intentionally or knowingly causes physical injury to a  child
10 years of age or younger;
(i) With knowledge that another person is working  in a hospital, intentionally or know-
ingly causes physical injury  to the working person while the working person is performing
official duties;
[(i)] (j) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes, by means other than a motor vehicle,
physical injury to the operator of a taxi while the operator is in control of the taxi; or
[(j)] (k) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes physical  injury to a flagger or a highway
worker while the flagger or highway worker is performing official duties.
(2)(a) Assault in the third degree is a Class C felony.
(b) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, assault in the third degree under sub-
section (1)(a) or (b) of this section is a Class B felony if:
(A) The assault resulted from the operation of a motor vehicle; and
(B) The defendant was the driver of the  motor vehicle and was driving while under the influence
of intoxicants.
(3) A person may not be charged under subsection (1)(i) of this section  if the person, at
the time of the alleged offense, is experiencing an intellectual disability, developmental  disa-
bility, delirium, dementia, traumatic brain injury, severe and persistent  mental illness or
other condition that significantly impairs the person’s judgment or behavior.
[(3)] (4) As used in this section:
(a) “Flagger” has the meaning given that term in ORS 811.230.
(b) “Highway worker” has the meaning given that term in ORS 811.230.
(c) “Hospital” has  the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015, except for a hospital that
primarily provides inpatient mental health treatment to adults and adolescents who are be-
tween nine and 17 years of age and emergency psychiatric care for adults 18 years of age  or
older.
[(c)] (d) “Staff member” means:
(A) A corrections officer  as defined in ORS 181A.355, a youth correction officer, a youth cor-
rection facility staff member, a Department of  Corrections or Oregon Youth Authority staff member
or a person employed pursuant to a contract with the department or youth authority to work  with,
or in the vicinity of, adults in custody, youths or adjudicated youths; and
(B) A volunteer authorized by the department,  youth authority or other entity in charge of a
[5]
HB 4088
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
corrections facility to work with, or in the vicinity of,  adults in custody, youths or adjudicated
youths.
[(d)] (e) “Youth correction facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 162.135.
PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 7.
(1) No  later than September 1, 2024, the Oregon Health Policy Board shall
enter into an agreement with the Oregon Health and Science University  to administer a pilot
program to research, analyze and develop recommendations for the purposes of:
(a) Establishing a  statewide program to train hospital staff on procedures to prevent and
respond to incidents of workplace violence; and
(b) Developing a grant program to assist hospitals in implementing the program.
(2) In conducting the pilot program, the Oregon Health and Science University shall:
(a) Explore options for providing training and education on:
(A) Handling firearms or any other  weapons encountered by hospital staff in the
workplace; and
(B) Managing incidents involving hostile,  angry and violent behavior using de-escalation,
physical and nonphysical intervention techniques and trauma-informed approaches;
(b) Compare the incidence rates of workplace violence in rural versus urban hospital
settings;
(c) Consider and identify  the challenges unique to implementing the program in rural
versus urban hospital settings;
(d) Examine the effectiveness of metal detectors and  other weapons screening measures
in preventing hospital workplace violence; and
(e) Study and identify evidence-based best practices for:
(A) The delivery of violence prevention training and information  in various languages;
and
(B) Teaching safety committees  and hospital staff how to engage with law enforcement
regarding:
(i) The filing of police reports;
(ii) Expected response times; and
(iii) The level of engagement of law enforcement in security incidents involving patients,
including the appropriate time when law enforcement may intervene to take physical custody
of a patient.
(3) Not later than September 1, 2025, the  Oregon Health and Science University shall
submit a report on  the nature of the pilot program and the recommendations for establishing
a statewide violence prevention program,  which may include recommendations for legis-
lation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health care.
SECTION 8.
Section 7 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 9. Section 2 of this 2024 Act and the amendments to ORS 441.096 and  654.182
by sections 3 and 4 of this 2024 Act become operative on January 1, 2025.
SECTION 10. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[6]