Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 2, chapter 47, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) This section applies to any meeting of the governing body of  the following public
bodies and any labor negotiations conducted by or on behalf of the following public bodies :
(a) A common or union high school district;
(b) An education service district;
(c) A community college district; or
(d) A public university described in ORS 352.002.
(2) A public body subject to this section must:
(a) Notwithstanding ORS 192.650, make a video recording of  all of its meetings and labor ne-
gotiations; and
(b) Within seven days following [ the] a  meeting  or  labor negotiations , post a video recording
of the meeting or labor negotiations  on the public body’s website or social media site.
(3) If the facilities of the public body lack broadband Internet access, the public body may
comply  with  this section by posting an audio recording of governing body meetings , and any labor
negotiations, on the public [ body] body’s website or social media site.
(4) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not apply to:
(a) Any meeting or portion of a meeting that is conducted in executive session; or
(b) A school district with a resident average daily membership of less than 50 students.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, subsections (2) and (3) of this section
apply to labor negotiations conducted by or on  behalf of a public body, regardless of whether
the negotiations are conducted in open meetings or in executive session.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4003