Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 458.
SECTION 2. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall  provide a grant
for a shared-equity homeownership pilot program to develop affordable housing with  inno-
vative ownership structures.
(2) The department shall make the grant available to a religious  or public-benefit
nonprofit corporation to develop affordable housing for two pilot  projects, one in an urban
area and one in a rural  area in an adjacent county. The grant may be used to purchase and
develop land, purchase or develop housing or provide support services to residents of the
housing.
(3) Each of the two pilot projects must require that:
(a) The pilot project consists of at least 15 dwelling units.
(b) The land on which the housing is sited will be owned by the nonprofit corporation.
(c) The housing  units will be subject to a long-term ground lease between the nonprofit
corporation and a separate business entity for each pilot project, in which:
(A) Each member of the entity must be a tenant of the housing;
(B) Each tenant of  the housing must hold an equal membership share and voting rights
in the entity;
(C) Membership may  only be granted to persons who, at the time of obtaining member-
ship, are in families with low or very low income, as defined in ORS 458.610; and
(D) The entity agrees to limit the costs of rent and membership in the entity  to an
amount that is affordable to persons with low or very low income.
(4) In awarding a grant  under this section, the department may adopt preferences for
applications that would:
(a) Provide the greatest number of affordable  housing units for the funding provided,
without consideration of the square footage of the units.
(b) Provide an innovative ownership structure.
(c) Provide innovative housing, including tiny home villages or cottage clusters.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3616
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(d) Ensure the longest possible use of the qualified property as affordable housing units.
(e) Optimize duration of the affordability of the housing to the extent possible considering
the ownership structure.
(f) Reduce the cost of developing affordable housing, including  through volunteer labor
or donated materials.
(g) Serve smaller households, individuals who are homeless or at  risk of homelessness,
veterans or historically underserved communities, including communities of color.
(h) Ensure the quality of construction of the housing.
(i) Provide or make available support services to the residents of  the housing necessary
to maintain a stable tenancy.
SECTION 3.
The Housing  and Community Services Department shall report to an ap-
propriate interim committee of the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in ORS
192.245 on the lessons learned from the shared-equity homeownership pilot program  under
section 2 of this 2021 Act no later than:
(1) September 15, 2022; and
(2) September 15, 2024.
SECTION 4.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2021 Act are repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, to provide  a grant for a shared-
equity homeownership pilot program under section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]