Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 682.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Air  ambulance” means a privately or publicly owned aircraft that is regularly pro-
vided or offered to be  provided for the emergency transportation of persons who are ill or
injured or who have disabilities.
(b) “Qualified air ambulance base” means an  entity that is responsible for, or has ex-
pertise in, emergency preparedness and is:
(A) A local government;
(B) A special government body;
(C) Qualified for federal tax-exempt status under section  501(c)(3) of the Internal Re-
venue Code; or
(D) A private organization wholly owned or controlled by  the entities described in sub-
paragraphs (A) to (C) of this paragraph.
(2)(a) There is  established in the Oregon Department of Emergency Management the air
ambulance readiness program to ensure that air ambulance services are available to respond,
and are effective in  responding, to emergencies, especially in rural areas of this state. The
program must provide  subsidies on an annual basis to qualified air ambulance bases in this
state to support the operational readiness  of the air ambulances stationed at the qualified
air ambulance base.
(b) In order to receive the subsidies described  in this subsection, a qualified air ambu-
lance base must apply annually to the program and operate at least 5,000 hours per year.
(c) Subsidies provided under this subsection may be used to offset the costs  of operating
air ambulances and air ambulance services, including but not limited to:
(A) Equipment costs;
(B) Aircraft maintenance costs;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 970
HB 2857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(C) Personnel training and certification costs; and
(D) Operational costs of the qualified air ambulance base.
(3) A qualified  air ambulance base that receives subsidies under subsection (2) of this
section shall annually submit to the department  information about how the qualified air
ambulance base used the subsidies received during the immediately preceding  calendar year.
(4) In order to  ensure the program established under subsection (2) of this section meets
the objectives of the program and is able to adapt to changing needs and challenges, the de-
partment shall continually assess the program  and biennially prepare a report on the pro-
gram. Not later than September 15 of each odd-numbered year, the department  shall submit
the report in the manner provided by ORS  192.245, and may include recommendations for
legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health care.
SECTION 3.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Emergency Manage-
ment, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$_______ for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. The report required under section 2 of this 2025 Act is first due on Septem-
ber 15, 2027.
SECTION 5. (1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Department of  Emergency Management may take any action before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary to enable the de-
partment to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, all of the  duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by section 2 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]