Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall study recidivism rates of
persons granted a pardon.
(2) The commission shall provide the results of the study, including any  recommended
legislative changes, in  a report to the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than December 31, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2878