Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 51.025 is amended to read:
51.025. (1) [ Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, ] Any justice court may become a
court of record by:
(a) The passage of an ordinance by the governing body of the county in which the court is lo-
cated; and
(b) The entry of an order by the Supreme Court acknowledging the  filing of the declaration re-
quired under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Before a justice court may become a court of record, the governing body of the  county in
which the court is located must file a declaration with the Supreme Court that includes:
(a) A statement  that the justice court satisfies the requirements of this section for becoming a
court of record;
(b) The address and telephone number of the clerk of the justice court; and
(c) The date on which the justice court will commence operations as a court of record.
(3) The Supreme Court may not charge  a fee for filing a declaration under subsection (2) of this
section. Not later than 30 days after a declaration is filed under subsection (2) of this section, the
Supreme Court shall enter an order acknowledging the filing of the declaration  and give notice of
the order of acknowledgment to the county and the public.
(4) The county shall provide a court reporter  or an audio recording device for each justice court
made a court of record under this section.
(5) The appeal from a judgment entered in a justice court  that becomes a court of record under
this section shall be as provided in ORS chapters 19 and 138  for appeals from judgments of circuit
courts.
(6) As a qualification for the office, the justice  of the peace for any justice court that becomes
a court of record must be a member of the Oregon State Bar.
[(7) A justice court may not  become a court of record under the provisions of this section if the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2484
HB 2766
1
2
3
4
court is located within 50 driving miles of the circuit court for the county in which  the justice court is
located, measured by the shortest distance by public roads between the justice court and the  circuit
court.]
[2]