Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) There is appropriated to the Legislative Assembly, for the biennium  be-
ginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $___ to support one  year-round
legislative assistant position  for each member of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly of the
State of Oregon.
(2) There is appropriated to the Legislative Assembly, for the biennium beginning  July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $___ to support one year-round legislative
assistant position for each member of the Eighty-fourth  Legislative Assembly of the State
of Oregon.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4586