Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 327.013, the ADMw  for a school district that expe-
rienced a decrease in average  daily membership, as defined in ORS 327.006, as a result of the
wildfires in 2020 shall equal the greater of:
(a) The school district’s ADMw; or
(b) The school district’s ADMw for the 2019-2020 school year.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of  this section apply whenever ADMw is calculated
under ORS 327.013 for the purpose of distributing state moneys to school  districts, including
distributions of the State School Fund and the Fund for Student Success.
(3)(a) For the purposes of this section, the Department of Education shall determine  if
a decrease in average daily membership was  a result of wildfires in 2020 based on rules
adopted by the State Board of Education.
(b) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules  necessary for the administration of
this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1 of this 2021 Act applies to distributions of the State  School
Fund and the Fund for Student Success commencing with the 2020-2021 distributions.
(2) The Department of Education shall adjust the distributions  to a school district to
reflect any differences between distributions made before the effective date  of this 2021 Act
and the amount calculated for distributions as provided by section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. The repeal of section 1 of this 2021 Act by section 3 of  this 2021 Act applies
to distributions of  the State School Fund and the Fund for Student Success commencing with
the 2025-2026 distributions.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2297