Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall conduct a study  of the
Commercialization Gap Fund program administered by the Oregon Innovation Council. The
department shall submit a  report of its findings to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to economic development in the manner provided under ORS 192.245  no
later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3363