Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 455.612 is amended to read:
455.612. (1) For the high wildfire hazard zone in  the wildland-urban interface that is identified
[pursuant to ] under  ORS 477.490, the Department of Consumer and Business  Services shall adopt
wildfire hazard mitigation building code standards that  apply to new dwellings and the accessory
structures of dwellings, as described in section  R327 of the 2021 Oregon Residential Specialty Code.
(2) The department shall amend section R327 of the Oregon  Residential Specialty Code to in-
clude standards for additions to existing dwellings and accessory structures  and for replacement of
existing exterior elements covered in section R327 of the 2021 Oregon Residential Specialty Code.
(3) The department shall incorporate the standards described in subsections (1)  and (2) of this
section into any updates to the Oregon Residential Specialty Code.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section, a local government  that before
July 19, 2021, adopted and continues to enforce wildfire hazard mitigation building code
standards described in section R327 of the 2021 Oregon Residential Specialty  Code is not
subject to restrictions based  on the wildfire hazard classifications described in subsection (1)
of this section. The local government  shall adhere to the version of section R327 of the
Oregon Residential Specialty Code that the local government most recently adopted.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3456