Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Water Resources Department shall study water  management in the
Chewaucan River watershed. The department shall submit a report, and  may include rec-
ommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related
to water in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3262