Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ESTABLISHMENT OF
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4360
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
THE HEALTH CARE
FOR ALL OREGON PLAN
SECTION 1. (1) The Health Care for All Oregon Plan is established to:
(a) Ensure access  to comprehensive, quality, patient-centered, equitable and affordable
publicly funded health care for all individuals living or working in Oregon;
(b) Improve the public’s health; and
(c) Control the cost of health care for the benefit of individuals, families,  businesses and
society.
(2) An individual is eligible to participate in the plan if the individual:
(a) Resides in Oregon;
(b) Is employed in Oregon full-time and pays any  personal income tax dedicated to the
plan;
(c) Is an  immediate family member or dependent of an individual described in paragraph
(a) or (b) of this subsection, as defined by rule by the Health Care for All Oregon Board; or
(d) Meets other criteria established by the board.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Health Care for All Oregon Board shall design  the delivery and fi-
nancing of health care funded by the Health Care for All Oregon Plan in order to:
(a) Provide universal access to comprehensive care at the appropriate time.
(b) Ensure transparency and accountability.
(c) Enhance primary care.
(d) Allow the choice of health care provider.
(e) Respect the primacy of the patient-provider relationship.
(f) Provide for continuous improvement of health care quality and safety.
(g) Reduce administrative costs.
(h) Have financing that is sufficient, fair and sustainable.
(i) Ensure adequate compensation of health care providers.
(j) Incorporate community-based systems.
(k) Include effective cost controls.
(L) Provide universal access to care even if the participant is outside of this state.
(m) Provide seamless birth-to-death access to care.
(n) Minimize medical errors.
(o) Focus on preventive health care.
(p) Integrate physical, dental, vision and mental health care.
(q) Include long term care.
(r) Provide equitable access to health care, according to a participant’s needs.
(s) Be affordable for individuals, families, businesses and society.
(2) The board shall administer the plan according to all of the following principles:
(a) Health care, as a human right, must be accessible to everyone without exception.
(b) Health care resources and  services must be distributed and accessed according to
people’s needs. Health, income, employment, age, race, gender, immigration status  and other
factors should not create any barriers to health care or disparities in health outcomes.
(c) The health care system must be accountable to the people it serves. It must  ensure
effective delivery of care and stewardship of resources that improve  individual and overall
population health and provide the means to maintain human rights standards in  the distrib-
[2]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ution and delivery of health care.
(d) The health care system must be open to the public with  regard to information,
decision-making and management.
(e) The health care system must enable meaningful public participation  in all decisions
affecting people’s right to health care.
(f) Health care, as a fundamental element of a just  society, must not be rationed by cost
as a commodity in private markets, but must be secured to the people on an equitable basis
by public means, similar to public education, public safety and public utilities.
(3) The plan shall pay the costs of health services that are medically necessary  or med-
ically appropriate for the maintenance of health, the prevention of health problems and the
diagnosis, treatment or rehabilitation of health  conditions, within the scope of coverage
prescribed by the board, including but not limited to the  following categories of health ser-
vices:
(a) Primary and preventive care, including health education;
(b) Specialty care;
(c) Inpatient and outpatient hospital care and emergency care;
(d) Home health care;
(e) Prescription drugs according to a drug formulary;
(f) Durable medical equipment, including prosthetics;
(g) Mental and behavioral health services;
(h) Substance abuse treatment;
(i) Dental services;
(j) Chiropractic and naturopathic services;
(k) Women’s health services;
(L) Ophthalmic services, as well as basic vision and vision correction;
(m) Diagnostic imaging, laboratory services and other diagnostic and evaluation  services;
(n) Inpatient and outpatient rehabilitative services, including physical, speech and occu-
pational therapy;
(o) Emergency transportation;
(p) Translation of spoken and written language;
(q) Palliative and hospice care;
(r) Podiatry;
(s) Acupuncture;
(t) Dialysis; and
(u) Telemedicine, as it becomes available and effective.
(4) The board shall determine the details for the plan’s coverage of health services, in-
cluding schedules  for preventive, diagnostic and maintenance health care services and pre-
scription drugs, in accordance with the following criteria:
(a) The  plan must cover all services required by Medicare, Medicaid or the Patient Pro-
tection and Affordable Care Act (P.L. 111-148), as amended by the Health Care and Education
Reconciliation Act (P.L. 111-152), and by any other federal program  that provides funds for
the plan.
(b) The plan must cover all services that were covered  by the health benefit plans offered
by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board and  the Public Employees’ Benefit Board on the ef-
fective date of this 2017 Act, unless  there is strong medical evidence that coverage of specific
[3]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
services should be discontinued.
(c) The board shall consider:
(A) The short-term  clinical effectiveness and cost-effectiveness of a service, based upon
multiple sources of evidence;
(B) Safety;
(C) In  addition to symptoms and the immediate causes of symptoms, the underlying fac-
tors that result in the need for care; and
(D) The importance of a patient’s  comfort with, and acceptance of, a service as clinically
valuable.
(d) The plan must cover health services that:
(A) Are evidence-based and cost-effective in promoting health; and
(B) Emphasize disease prevention and health promotion.
(e) Subject  to the requirements to provide comprehensive care and all medically neces-
sary and medically appropriate care, the board may set limits on the reimbursement paid  for
medical equipment and devices in  order to encourage the use of the most economical equip-
ment and devices. If the board limits the reimbursement paid for medical  equipment and
devices, the board shall have a procedure that allows a plan participant  to apply the re-
imbursement amount toward the cost of a more costly  type of equipment or device if, in the
discretion of the participant’s health care provider, the equipment or device is medically
necessary or medically appropriate for the participant’s health needs.
(f) Health care services that are cosmetic  may be covered if necessary for the participant
to obtain employment, to improve mental health or to function in society.
(5) Copayments, deductibles  or other forms of cost sharing may not be imposed on par-
ticipants under the plan.
(6) Participants in the plan may choose any  health care provider licensed, certified or
registered in this state or in another state for services within the scope of the  provider’s
license or certification.
(7) Within the scope of services covered within each category, participants  and their
health care providers shall determine whether a  treatment is medically necessary or med-
ically appropriate.
(8) The plan and any health care provider reimbursed by the  plan may not discriminate
against any participant on the basis of race, religion,  sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
national origin, age, income or any basis prohibited by the civil rights laws of this state.
(9) The plan may not discriminate  against any health care provider who is licensed, cer-
tified or registered in this state and who is acting within the provider’s scope of practice.
(10) A health care provider reimbursed by the plan  may not be required to offer any
particular service unless denial of  the service amounts to discrimination against a partic-
ipant or class of participants.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (4)(e) of this section, a health care provider shall
accept payment from the plan for services covered  by the plan as payment in full and may
not bill a patient for an amount exceeding the reimbursement amount under the plan.
(12)(a) Administrative costs of the plan may not exceed:
(A) Twelve percent  of the total costs of the plan during the first two years of plan op-
eration.
(B) Eight percent of the total costs of the plan during the third  and fourth years of plan
[4]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
operation.
(C) Five percent of the total costs of the plan during the fifth and  subsequent years of
plan operation.
(b) During the first four years of plan operation, total costs include transition  costs and
the costs of retraining provided to workers displaced by the plan, as  described in section 10
of this 2017 Act.
(13) A participant’s loss  of eligibility due to no longer meeting the criteria specified in
section 1  of this 2017 Act is a qualifying event for the purpose of continuation coverage re-
quired by 29  U.S.C. 1161. The Oregon Health Authority shall be considered to be a plan
sponsor of a group health plan and shall notify the  participant losing coverage and the im-
mediate family members of the participant losing coverage of the option to continue coverage
at the participant’s own expense.
SECTION 3.
No later than October 1, 2021, the Health Care  for All Oregon Board estab-
lished under section 7 of this 2017 Act  shall develop and submit to the Legislative Assembly
a recommendation for the coverage of long term care services by the Health Care for All
Oregon Plan.
SECTION 4.
Sections 5 and 6 of this 2017 Act are added to and made  a part of the In-
surance Code.
SECTION 5.  Notwithstanding any  other provision of law, an insurer with a certificate of
authority to  transact insurance in this state may not offer in this state a policy or certificate
of health insurance that reimburses the costs of health  services covered under the Health
Care for All Oregon Plan.
SECTION 6. Actions taken by insurers may not  be considered to be the transaction of
insurance for purposes of the Insurance Code if the actions are:
(1) Taken in accordance  with the requirements adopted pursuant to sections 2, 9 and 11
of this 2017 Act; and
(2) Approved by the Oregon Health Authority or the Health Care for All Oregon Board.
HEALTH CARE FOR ALL OREGON BOARD
SECTION 7. (1) There is established the Health Care for All Oregon Board, consisting of
nine members appointed by the  Governor and subject to confirmation by the Senate in the
manner prescribed by ORS 171.562 and 171.565. The membership must represent  every con-
gressional district in this state and include:
(a) Two licensed health care providers, one of whom is not a  physician licensed under
ORS chapter 677;
(b) Two persons with significant education and experience in public health;
(c) Two persons with extensive demonstrated  experience in health care consumer advo-
cacy;
(d) A representative of organized labor;
(e) A representative of business; and
(f) A representative of the general public.
(2)(a) During the tenure of a member of the board and the period immediately preceding
the member’s appointment to the board, the member may not have a direct or  indirect fi-
nancial or pecuniary interest or investment in, or be employed by, a  pharmaceutical com-
[5]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
pany, health insurer or medical supply company.
(b) This subsection does not  prohibit a person from having a financial interest resulting
from investments made by a pension fund  or through mutual funds, blind trusts or similar
investments where the person does not exercise control over the nature, amount  or timing
of the investment.
(c) A board member shall sign an  agreement that the member will not be employed by,
or have  voting or decision-making power for, a pharmaceutical company, health insurer or
medical supplier for a period of five years after tenure as a board member ceases.
(3) The term of office of each member is four  years and begins on the January 2 next
following appointment. A new term begins on the expiration of the previous term. A  member
is eligible for reappointment for a new term. The Governor shall appoint a person  to fill any
vacancy, subject  to confirmation by the Senate. Any appointment to a vacant position shall
become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) The  board shall select one of its members as chairperson and another as vice chair-
person, for such terms  and with duties and powers necessary for the performance of the
functions of such offices as the board determines.
(5) A majority of the members of the board  constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(6) The  board shall meet at a place, day and hour determined by the chairperson or a
majority of the members of the board.
(7) Consistent with ORS chapter 244, the  board shall adopt rules of ethics and definitions
of conflicts of interest for determining the circumstances under  which members of the board
must recuse themselves from voting.
(8) A member of the board is entitled to  compensation and expenses as provided in ORS
292.495 for participation in board, committee and subcommittee meetings.
(9)(a) The board  may establish such advisory and technical committees as the board
considers necessary. The committees may be continuing or temporary. The board shall de-
termine the representation,  membership, terms and organization of the committees and shall
appoint their members.
(b) Members of  advisory and technical committees, other than board members, are not
entitled to compensation, but in the discretion of  the board may be reimbursed from funds
available to the  board for actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred by them
in the performance of their official duties in the manner and amount provided in ORS 292.495.
(10) In accordance with applicable provisions of ORS chapter  183, the board may adopt
rules necessary  for the administration of the laws that the board is charged with adminis-
tering.
(11) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff support for the board  and its com-
mittees and subcommittees  until the board hires an executive director under section 9 of this
2017 Act. The executive director  and the executive director’s subordinates shall provide staff
support once the executive director and subordinates are in place.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding section 7 of this 2017 Act:
(1) The members first appointed to the Health Care for All Oregon Board shall  be ap-
pointed as soon as practicable after the effective date of this 2017 Act and:
(a) Two shall serve for terms ending December 31, 2019.
(b) Three shall serve for terms ending December 31, 2020.
[6]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Four shall serve for full terms.
(2) The two members described  in subsection (1)(a) of this section and the three members
described in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be determined by a random drawing.
(3) During the two-year period beginning  upon the appointment of all of the members of
the board, the board shall  meet every business day until the Transition Commission is dis-
solved by the Governor under section 25 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 9.
 (1) The Health Care for All Oregon Board is the policy-making body respon-
sible for planning and oversight of the development, implementation and  management of the
Health Care for All Oregon Plan, including but not limited to all of the following:
(a) Seeking all waivers, exemptions and agreements from federal, state and local  gov-
ernment sources that are  necessary to provide funding for the plan, including funding from
Medicare for the participation of Medicare recipients in the plan.
(b) Determining and regularly updating the scope  of coverage within each category de-
scribed in section 2 (3) of this  2017 Act in consultation with plan participants and guided by
evidence-based practices that integrate clinical expertise, patient values and  current re-
search.
(c) Determining the package of benefits covered in the plan in accordance with  section
2 of this 2017 Act.
(d) Managing the Health Care for All Oregon Fund.
(e) Determining policies and adopting rules to guide the operation of the plan, including
but not limited to:
(A) Establishing eligibility  standards for participation, including standards for
presumptive eligibility determinations;
(B) Developing quality of care indicators;
(C) Ensuring meaningful access by participants to quality health services;
(D) Establishing policies regarding conflicts of interest for health  care providers and
health care facilities providing health services to participants in the plan;
(E) Regularly  soliciting input from the public, including individuals with specialized
health care needs, through  regional advisory committees appointed under section 17 of this
2017 Act and other means; and
(F) Ensuring that the plan is implemented in accordance with section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(f) Hiring an executive director who  serves at the pleasure of the board and who, subject
to approval by the board, shall appoint all subordinate officers and employees that the  exec-
utive director deems necessary, prescribing their duties and fixing their compensation.
(g) Approving contracts for  items and services provided by health care providers to par-
ticipants in the plan.
(h) Partnering with public health agencies to take steps to improve the health of  the
overall population.
(i) Reporting, at least annually, to the Legislative Assembly during a regular session  on
the performance of the plan, and recommending needed legislative changes.
(j) Submitting  to the Legislative Assembly recommendations for adjusting tax rates as
necessary for taxes imposed to finance the plan.
(k) Ensuring that an annual financial audit of  the revenues and expenses of the plan is
conducted.
(L) Establishing policies and procedures to ensure that  health care providers receive fair,
[7]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
adequate and timely reimbursement for services covered by the plan, and that the  plan pro-
motes the effective and efficient delivery of health services.
(m)(A) Establishing policies, and determining the allocation of  resources through the
regional planning process under sections 16  and 17 of this 2017 Act, to promote regional eq-
uity in access to health care facilities and  to prevent unnecessary duplication of medical
equipment and facilities.
(B) Requiring a health care provider organization or  health care facility that has a gross
revenue exceeding an amount determined by the board to adopt separate budgets for its
capital expenditures and operational expenditures in order to:
(i) Promote transparency about costs and the sources of costs;
(ii) Facilitate regional planning for the statewide distribution of capital resources that  is
effective and cost-efficient for participants in the region; and
(iii) Support public accountability and public participation in planning for the distribution
of health care facilities and resources.
(n) Establishing  and implementing procedures to ensure that plan participants are bona
fide residents of this state or are employed full-time in this  state, or are dependents of such
residents or employees.
(2) The board and the board’s advisory committees shall:
(a) Investigate alternative methods for  reimbursing health care providers, including
global budgets, capitation payments and fee-for-service payments, to  determine the appro-
priate method for reimbursing providers in a manner that  best promotes the policies and
principles described in section 2 of this 2017 Act;
(b) Investigate the feasibility of making the plan the  single conduit for processing all
claims for health care reimbursement in this state;
(c) Use data from  the Oregon Health Authority’s all-claims, all-payer database, described
in ORS 413.032, to assess clinical effectiveness and safety, and  investigate ways to make re-
porting information to the database less burdensome on health care providers; and
(d) Seek federal approval as necessary to reform the use  of federal funds in financing
health care in this state, in order to emphasize efficiency, transparency and  accountability
without risking substantial federal health care funding.
(3) The board is authorized  to purchase stop loss coverage to pay for catastrophic costs
incurred by the plan.
(4)(a) The board may establish criteria under which an individual residing  or working in
this state may be exempt from participating in the Health Care for All Oregon  Plan if the
individual:
(A) Is enrolled in a health benefit plan offered to  federal employees or is enrolled in an-
other out-of-state plan; and
(B) Would be adversely affected by enrolling in the Health Care for All Oregon Plan.
(b) For individuals who are exempt under  this subsection, the board may allow payments
from the Health Care for All Oregon Fund to:
(A) Supplement the reimbursement paid to the individual’s  health care provider by the
individual’s health benefit plan, up to  the amount of reimbursement allowed by the Health
Care for All Oregon Plan; or
(B) Provide to the individual an amount to  reimburse the individual’s copayment or other
cost-sharing under the individual’s health benefit plan.
[8]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) The board may delegate any of the duties described in  this section to the Oregon
Health Authority subject to any conditions imposed by the board.
SECTION 10. (1) The Health Care for All Oregon Board, in consultation with the Transi-
tion Commission established under section 25 of  this 2017 Act, shall establish a program to
be operated for a four-year period beginning on the operative date specified in section 112
of this 2017 Act, to pay or reimburse the costs of retraining for workers displaced by the
implementation of the Health Care for All Oregon Plan. The Oregon  Health Authority shall
administer the program.
(2) Each worker is eligible for up to 24 months of retraining under this section.
(3) The board shall apply for any federal and private gifts and  grants that may be avail-
able to operate the program. If federal  and private gifts and grants are insufficient to meet
the cost of the program, the board may use moneys deposited in  the Health Care for All
Oregon Fund for the purposes of this section.
DUTIES OF THE
OREGON HEALTH AUTHORITY IN ADMINISTERING
THE HEALTH CARE FOR ALL OREGON PLAN
SECTION 11.
The Oregon Health Authority, under the direction,  policies and oversight
of the Health Care for All Oregon Board, shall:
(1) Adopt rules necessary for carrying out this section and sections 1, 2, 9 and 16 of  this
2017 Act;
(2) Direct ongoing, effective communication and outreach to ensure that Oregonians  are
well informed about the Health Care for All Oregon Plan;
(3) Process applications and determine eligibility for individuals seeking to participate or
to renew participation in the plan;
(4) Propose goals, objectives and standards to achieve  quality and affordable health care
accessible to all Oregonians, and propose major policy changes to the board;
(5) Establish systems to monitor and evaluate the access to, and the  quality and cost of,
health services provided to Oregonians;
(6) Make recommendations to the board  for ensuring equity in the delivery of culturally
sensitive health services to all Oregonians;
(7) Assist the board in negotiations  with the federal government, with local governments
and with other state agencies as necessary to implement the plan;
(8) Direct research to improve health and health services;
(9) Identify legislation needed to improve the health services covered under the plan;
(10) Establish collaborative partnerships with other public health agencies;
(11) Develop a biennial budget to recommend to the board;
(12) Administer the legislatively approved budget for the plan;
(13) Report periodically to the board, the Governor and the Legislative Assembly on  the
progress of implementing the plan and on the financial status of the plan;
(14) Arrange for appropriate and timely support that allows the board to carry out the
board’s functions;
(15) Ensure prompt payment for all plan expenditures;
(16) Subject to the board’s approval, enter  into contracts with entities to process health
[9]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
care claims and payments;
(17) Contract for actuarial, legal, technical or other professional services as needed;
(18) Enter into contracts with health care providers to provide  health services on favor-
able terms and prices;
(19) Establish a system for monitoring the health services covered by the plan  to ensure
that the services are  medically necessary or medically appropriate, and take remedial actions
as necessary to correct the  underutilization, overutilization or inappropriate delivery of
health services; and
(20) Perform any other functions delegated to the authority by the board.
HEALTH CARE FOR ALL OREGON OMBUDSMAN
SECTION 12.
(1) The office of the Health Care for All Oregon Ombudsman is established
in the office of the Governor.
(2) The Governor shall  appoint a Health Care for All Oregon Ombudsman, who shall serve
at the pleasure of the Governor for a term of four years. The ombudsman  may be reap-
pointed for additional terms.
(3) The ombudsman may appoint a deputy ombudsman and  any other subordinate officers
and employees necessary for  the performance of the duties of the ombudsman and shall
prescribe their duties and fix their compensation.
(4) The ombudsman shall adopt  contested case procedures, in accordance with ORS
chapter 183, for a health care provider or a participant in the Health  Care for All Oregon
Plan to file a complaint to contest  any adverse actions by the Health Care for All Oregon
Board, the Oregon Health Authority or any person contracting  with the board or the au-
thority, with respect to eligibility for,  services and coverage under and payments made in the
plan.
(5) The ombudsman shall  address complaints from health care providers, participants and
contractors. In the investigation of  any complaint, the ombudsman may subpoena any person
to give sworn testimony or to produce documents or other evidence that  is reasonably ma-
terial to the investigation.
(6) By September 1 of each even-numbered year, the ombudsman  shall submit to the
Oregon Department of  Administrative Services a funding request for the next biennium. The
funding request shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted  accounting princi-
ples. If the department approves the request, the department shall direct  the Health Care
for All Oregon Board to transfer the moneys from the Health Care  for All Oregon Fund to
the department to be made  available to the ombudsman for the operating expenses and ad-
ministration of the office of the Health Care for All Oregon Ombudsman.
HEALTH CARE FOR ALL OREGON FUND
SECTION 13. (1) The Health Care for All Oregon Fund is  established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund, consisting of moneys  received under
sections 10, 14 and 27 of this 2017 Act, moneys  appropriated by the Legislative Assembly and
moneys received from federal,  state, county and local governments and private sources to
pay for health services covered  by the Health Care for All Oregon Plan. Moneys in the Health
[10]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Care for All Oregon Fund are continuously appropriated to the Health  Care for All Oregon
Board to administer the Health Care for All Oregon  Plan and to carry out the provisions of
this section and sections 1, 2, 7, 9 to 12, 14, 16 and 17  of this 2017 Act. Notwithstanding ORS
293.190, moneys in the Health Care for All Oregon Fund do not revert to the General Fund.
(2) The board  shall transfer from the Health Care for All Oregon Fund to the office of
the Health Care for All Oregon Ombudsman established  in section 12 of this 2017 Act, the
amount approved by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services under section 12 (6)
of this 2017 Act for the operating expenses and administration of the office.
SECTION 14. (1) The  Health Care for All Oregon Plan shall be the primary payer of re-
imbursement for health services covered by the plan, including  but not limited to
compensable medical services  covered by workers’ compensation insurance under ORS
656.245.
(2) The Oregon Health  Authority is subrogated to the rights of any participant that has
a claim against an insurer, tortfeasor, employer, third party administrator, pension manager,
public or private corporation, government entity or any other person that  may be liable for
the cost of health services provided to the participant and paid for by the  Health Care for
All Oregon Plan.
(3) The authority may  enter into an agreement with any person for the prepayment of
claims anticipated to arise under subsection (2) of this section during a biennium.  At the end
of each biennium, the authority shall appropriately charge or refund to the payer the  dif-
ference between the amount prepaid and the amount due.
(4) All moneys recovered pursuant to this section  shall be deposited in the Health Care
for All Oregon Fund established in section 13 of this 2017 Act  and may be used for any pur-
poses specified for the fund.
FINANCING OF
THE HEALTH CARE
FOR ALL OREGON PLAN
SECTION 15.
(1) The Health Care for All Oregon Board shall develop recommendations
for dedicated funding mechanisms to finance the Health Care for All Oregon Plan. The rec-
ommendations shall be based on the results of the study conducted under section 1, chapter
712, Oregon Laws 2013. In lieu of premiums, copayments,  coinsurance, deductibles or other
forms of cost-sharing, the plan must be  financed by a system of dedicated, progressive taxes
that are based on the payer’s ability to pay.
(2) Funding sources must be assessed based on the capacity of the source to generate
sufficient revenue to finance the plan. The burden of  the assessments must be distributed
according to ability to pay.
(3) The board shall report its recommendations to the appropriate interim  committees
of the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 no later than  September
30, 2018.
REGIONAL HEALTH PLANNING
SECTION 16.
(1) As used in this section, “health care facility” has the meaning given that
[11]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
term in ORS 442.015, excluding long term care facilities.
(2) The Health  Care for All Oregon Board shall divide this state into geographic regions,
each encompassing an area of a size that will  facilitate the planning, allocation and coordi-
nation of  health services for the residents in the region. There must be at least one region
for each congressional district.
(3) For each region, the  board shall establish a Regional Planning Board consisting of
seven members who reside in the region and include:
(a) At least two individuals with extensive health care consumer advocacy experience;
(b) Individuals with significant expertise in public health and planning and in the delivery
of health care; and
(c) Individuals selected from among  recommendations submitted in response to an ex-
tensive solicitation to a broad range of health care provider and consumer  advocacy organ-
izations.
(4) The purposes of the Regional Planning Boards are to:
(a) Ensure that  the distribution of health resources, including health care facilities, ma-
chines, devices and services, is equitable throughout this state in order to  achieve optimal
population health; and
(b) Promote accountability, transparency and public participation in  the expenditure of
public and private funds in the health care industry.
(5) Before an entity purchases equipment,  expands a health care facility or constructs a
new health care facility, the  cost of which exceeds a threshold established by the Health Care
for All Oregon Board, the entity shall submit the proposal to the Regional  Planning Board
for the area where the equipment  or facility is located. The Oregon Health Authority may
prescribe the form and manner for the submission of the proposal. The proposal must include
an estimate of  any projected changes in operating costs resulting from the purchase or
construction and other information requested by the Regional Planning Board.
(6) Each Regional Planning Board shall, following widespread public  notice, conduct a
public hearing to solicit input from the members  of the community regarding each proposal
submitted under subsection  (5) of this section. The Regional Planning Board shall compile
the input into a report, submit the report to the proposer and to the Health Care for  All
Oregon Board and make the report readily available to the  public. If the entity is requesting
public funding for the proposal, the Regional Planning Board  shall submit recommendations
to the Health Care for All Oregon Board, which shall decide whether to approve the request
and the amount of funding to be provided.
(7) All meetings of the Regional Planning Boards are subject to ORS 192.610 to 192.690.
(8) In identifying regional  needs for services, equipment and health care facilities, a Re-
gional Planning Board shall hold public hearings and solicit advice from:
(a) Regional advisory committees described in section 17 of this 2017 Act;
(b) Coordinated care organizations with members residing in the region;
(c) Health care provider groups and professional and trade organizations;
(d) Patient and health care consumer advocacy organizations; and
(e) Other organizations and groups operating in the region as necessary to  obtain advice
that is representative of the interests of residents in the region.
(9) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff  support to the Regional Planning
Boards and to each regional advisory committee.
[12]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 17. The Health Care for All Oregon Board shall appoint  a regional advisory
committee for each region described in section 16 of this 2017 Act.  Each committee shall
consist of residents of the region who will  advise the board and the Regional Planning Board
for the region. The regional advisory committees shall:
(1) Solicit input from the public;
(2) Receive and investigate complaints from residents of the region about  health care
providers or services and forward complaints, as the committee  deems appropriate, to the
Health Care for All Oregon Ombudsman;
(3) Conduct public hearings; and
(4) Assist the Health Care for All  Oregon Board and the Regional Planning Boards as
necessary to ensure that the health service needs of the region’s residents can be met.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 431.120 is amended to read:
431.120. In addition to the duties described in ORS 431.115, the Oregon Health Authority shall:
(1) Enforce the laws, rules and policies of this state related to health.
(2) Routinely conduct epidemiological  investigations for each case of sudden infant death syn-
drome, including the identification of risk factors such  as birth weight, maternal age, prenatal care,
history of apnea and socioeconomic characteristics. The  authority may conduct the investigations
through local  health departments only upon adoption by rule of a uniform epidemiological data col-
lection method.
(3) Adopt rules related to loans and grants awarded under  ORS 285B.560 to 285B.599 or 541.700
to 541.855 for the improvement of drinking water systems for the purpose of maintaining compliance
with applicable state and federal drinking water  quality standards. In adopting rules under this
subsection, the authority shall coordinate the  authority’s rulemaking process with the Water Re-
sources Department and the Oregon Business Development Department to ensure that  rules adopted
under this subsection are consistent with rules adopted under ORS 285B.563 and 541.845.
[(4) Control health care capital expenditures by administering the state certificate of  need program
under ORS 442.325 to 442.344. ]
SECTION 19.
 ORS 441.025 is amended to read:
441.025. (1)(a) Upon receipt of a license fee and an application to operate  a health care facility
other than a long term care facility, the  Oregon Health Authority shall review the application and
conduct an on-site inspection of the  health care facility. The authority shall issue a license if it finds
that the applicant and health care facility comply with ORS 441.015 to 441.063  and 441.196 and the
rules of the authority provided that the authority does not receive within the time  specified a cer-
tificate of noncompliance issued by the State Fire Marshal, deputy, or  approved authority pursuant
to ORS 479.215.
(b) The authority shall, following  payment of the fee, annually renew each license issued under
this subsection unless:
(A) The health care facility’s license has been suspended or revoked; or
(B) The State Fire  Marshal, a deputy or an approved authority has issued a certificate of non-
compliance pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(2)(a) Upon receipt of a license fee and an application to operate  a long term care facility, the
Department of Human Services shall review the application and conduct an on-site inspection of the
long term care facility. The department shall  issue a license if the department finds that the appli-
cant and long term care facility comply with ORS 441.015 to 441.063, 441.087 and 441.196  and the
rules of the department provided that it does not receive within the  time specified a certificate of
[13]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
noncompliance  issued  by the State Fire Marshal, deputy, or approved authority pursuant to ORS
479.215.
(b) The department shall, following an on-site inspection and payment of the fee,  annually renew
each license issued under this subsection unless:
(A) The long term care facility’s license has been suspended or revoked;
(B) The  long term care facility is found not to be in substantial compliance following the on-site
inspection;  or
(C) The State Fire  Marshal, a deputy or an approved authority has issued a certificate of non-
compliance pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(3) Each license shall be issued only for the premises and  persons or governmental units named
in the application and shall not be transferable or assignable.
(4) Licenses shall be  posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises as prescribed by
rule of the authority or the department.
(5) [ No] A  license [ shall] may not  be issued or  renewed for any health care facility or health
maintenance organization that [ is required to obtain a certificate of need under ORS 442.315 until  a
certificate of need has been granted. An ambulatory surgical center is not subject  to the certificate of
need requirements in ORS 442.315 ] fails to comply with the requirements  of section 16 of this
2017 Act .
(6) No license  shall be issued or renewed for any skilled nursing facility or intermediate care
facility, unless the applicant has included in the application the name and such other  information
as may be necessary to establish the  identity and financial interests of any person who has incidents
of ownership in  the facility representing an interest of 10 percent or more thereof. If the person
having such interest is a corporation, the  name of any stockholder holding stock representing an
interest in the facility of 10 percent or more shall also be included in the application. If  the person
having such interest is any  other entity, the name of any member thereof having incidents of own-
ership representing an interest of  10 percent or more in the facility shall also be included in the
application.
(7) A license may be denied to any applicant for a license or renewal  thereof or any stockholder
of any such applicant who has incidents of ownership in the health care facility representing an
interest of 10 percent or more thereof, or an interest of 10 percent or more of a lease agreement for
the facility, if during the five years prior to the application the applicant or any stockholder of  the
applicant had an interest of 10 percent or more in the facility or of a lease for the facility  and has
divested that interest after  receiving from the authority or the department written notice that the
authority or the department  intends to suspend or revoke the license or to decertify the facility from
eligibility to receive payments for services provided under this section.
(8) The Department of Human Services may not issue or renew a license  for a long term care
facility, unless the applicant has included in the application the  identity of any person who has in-
cident of ownership in the long term care facility who also has  a financial interest in any pharmacy,
as defined in ORS 689.005.
(9) The authority shall adopt rules for each type of health care facility, except long  term care
facilities, to carry out the purposes of ORS 441.015 to 441.087 including, but not limited to:
(a) Establishing classifications and descriptions for the different types of health care facilities
that are licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.087; and
(b) Standards for patient care and safety,  adequate professional staff organizations, training of
staff for whom no other state  regulation exists, suitable delineation of professional privileges and
[14]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
adequate staff analyses of clinical records.
(10) The  department shall adopt rules for each type of long term care facility to carry out the
purposes of ORS 441.015 to 441.087 including, but not limited to:
(a) Establishing classifications and descriptions  for the different types of long term care facili-
ties that are licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.087; and
(b) Standards for patient care and safety,  adequate professional staff organizations, training of
staff for whom no other state  regulation exists, suitable delineation of professional privileges and
adequate staff analyses of clinical records.
(11) The authority or department may not adopt a rule requiring a health care facility to  serve
a specific food as long as the necessary nutritional food elements  are present in the food that is
served.
(12) A health care facility licensed by the authority or department may not:
(a) Offer or provide services beyond the scope of the license  classification assigned by the au-
thority or department; or
(b) Assume a descriptive title or  represent itself under a descriptive title other than the classi-
fication assigned by the authority or department.
(13) A health care facility must  reapply for licensure to change the classification assigned or the
type of license issued by the authority or department.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 441.060 is amended to read:
441.060. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall make or cause to be made on-site  inspections of
health care facilities licensed under ORS 441.025 (1) at least once every three years.
(2) Any licensee or prospective applicant desiring  to make alterations or additions to its
health care facilities or  to construct new health care facilities shall, before commencing such
alteration, addition or new construction, comply with section 16 of this 2017 Act.
[(2)] (3) [ The authority and ] The Department of Human Services may prescribe by rule that any
licensee or prospective  applicant desiring to make specified types of alteration or addition to its
long term care or residential care  facilities or to  construct new facilities shall, before commenc-
ing such alteration, addition or new construction, either prior to or after receiving  a certificate of
need pursuant to ORS 442.315, if required, submit plans and specifications  therefor to the [ authority
or the ] department for preliminary inspection and approval or recommendations with  respect to
compliance with the rules authorized by ORS 441.025 and 443.420 and for compliance  with National
Fire Protection Association standards when the facility is also  to be Medicare or Medicaid certified.
[(3)] (4) The  authority or the department may require by rule payment of a fee for project review
services at a variable rate, dependent on total project cost.
[(4)] (5) For health care facilities, the authority  shall develop a review fee schedule as minimally
necessary to support the staffing level and expenses required to administer the program.
[(5)] (6) For long term care facilities and residential care facilities, the  department shall develop
a review fee schedule as minimally necessary to support the staffing level and  expenses required to
administer the program. The fee for project review of residential care facilities shall equal two-
thirds that required of health care facilities.
[(6)] (7)  The authority or the department may also conduct an on-site review  of projects as a
prerequisite to licensure of new facilities, major renovations and expansions. The authority and  the
department shall, at least annually, with the advice  of the facilities covered by the review, present
proposed rule changes regarding  facility design and construction to such agencies for their consid-
eration.
[15]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(7)] (8)  The authority shall publish a state submissions guide for health care facility projects
and advise project sponsors of applicable  requirements of federal, state and local regulatory agen-
cies.
[(8)] (9)  The department shall publish a state submissions guide for long term care  facility and
residential care facility projects and  advise project sponsors of applicable requirements of federal,
state and local regulatory agencies.
SECTION 21.  ORS 442.315 is amended to read:
442.315. (1) Any new [ hospital or new ] skilled nursing or intermediate  care service or facility
[not excluded pursuant to ] other than a facility described in  ORS 441.065, and any long term care
facility for which a license was surrendered under section 15, chapter  608, Oregon Laws 2013, shall
obtain a certificate of need from the [ Oregon Health  Authority ] Department of Human Services
prior to an offering or development.
(2) The [ authority] department  shall adopt rules specifying criteria and procedures  for making
decisions as to the need for the new services or facilities.
(3)(a) An applicant for a certificate of need shall  apply to the [ authority] department  on forms
provided for this purpose by [ authority rule ] the department .
(b) An applicant shall pay a fee prescribed as provided in this section.  Subject to the approval
of the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services, the [ authority] Department of Human Ser-
vices shall prescribe application fees, based on the complexity and scope of the proposed project.
(4) The [ authority] Department of Human Services  shall be the decision-making authority for
the purpose of certificates of need. The [ authority] department may  establish an expedited review
process for an application for a certificate of need to rebuild  a long term care facility, relocate
buildings that are part of a long term care  facility or relocate long term care facility bed capacity
from one long term care  facility to another. The [ authority] department shall issue a proposed order
not later than 120 days after the date a complete application for expedited review  is received by the
[authority] department.
(5)(a) An applicant or any affected person who is dissatisfied  with the proposed decision of the
[authority] department is entitled to an informal hearing in the course  of review and before a final
decision is rendered.
(b) Following a final decision being rendered by the [ authority] department, an applicant or any
affected person may request a reconsideration hearing pursuant to ORS chapter 183.
(c) In any proceeding brought by an affected person or  an applicant challenging [ an authority ]
a department  decision under this subsection, the [ authority] department  shall follow procedures
consistent with the provisions of ORS chapter 183 relating to a contested case.
(6) Once a certificate of need has been issued, it  may not be revoked or rescinded unless it was
acquired by fraud or deceit. However, if the [ authority] department finds that a person is offering
or developing a project that is not within the scope of the  certificate of need, the [ authority] de-
partment may  limit the project as specified in the issued certificate of need or reconsider the ap-
plication. A certificate of need is not transferable.
(7) Nothing in this section applies to any [ hospital,] skilled nursing or intermediate care service
or facility that seeks to replace equipment with equipment of  similar basic technological function
or an upgrade that improves the  quality or cost-effectiveness of the service provided. Any person
acquiring such replacement or upgrade shall file a  letter of intent for the project in accordance with
the rules of the [ authority] department  if the price  of the replacement equipment or upgrade ex-
ceeds $1 million.
[16]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(8) Except as required in subsection (1) of this section for a new hospital  or new skilled nursing
or intermediate care service or facility not operating as a Medicare swing bed program, nothing in  this
section requires a rural hospital as defined in ORS 442.470 (5)(a)(A) and (B) to  obtain a certificate of
need.]
[(9) Nothing in this section applies to basic health services, but basic health services do not
include:]
[(a) Magnetic resonance imaging scanners; ]
[(b) Positron emission tomography scanners; ]
[(c) Cardiac catheterization equipment; ]
[(d) Megavoltage radiation therapy equipment; ]
[(e) Extracorporeal shock wave lithotriptors; ]
[(f) Neonatal intensive care; ]
[(g) Burn care; ]
[(h) Trauma care; ]
[(i) Inpatient psychiatric services; ]
[(j) Inpatient chemical dependency services; ]
[(k) Inpatient rehabilitation services; ]
[(L) Open heart surgery; or ]
[(m) Organ transplant services. ]
[(10)] (8) In addition to any other remedy  provided by law, whenever it appears that any person
is engaged  in, or is about to engage in, any acts that constitute a violation of this section, or any
rule or order issued by the [ authority] department  under this section, the [ authority] department
may institute proceedings in the circuit courts to enforce obedience  to such statute, rule or order
by injunction or by other processes, mandatory or otherwise.
[(11) As used in this section, “basic health services” means health services offered  in or through
a hospital licensed under ORS chapter 441,  except skilled nursing or intermediate care nursing facili-
ties or services and those services specified in subsection (9) of this section. ]
SECTION 22.  ORS 442.315, as amended by  section 23, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, is
amended to read:
442.315. (1) Any new [ hospital or new ] skilled nursing or intermediate care service or facility
[not excluded pursuant to ] other than a  facility described in ORS 441.065 shall obtain a certificate
of need from the [ Oregon Health Authority ] Department of Human Services  prior to an  offering
or development.
(2) The [ authority] department  shall adopt rules specifying criteria and procedures for making
decisions as to the need for the new services or facilities.
(3)(a) An applicant for a certificate of need  shall apply to the [ authority] department on forms
provided for this purpose by [ authority rule ] the department .
(b) An applicant shall pay  a fee prescribed as provided in this section. Subject to the approval
of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the [ authority] Department of  Human Ser-
vices shall prescribe application fees, based on the complexity and scope of the proposed project.
(4) The [ authority] Department of Human Services shall be the decision-making authority for
the purpose of certificates  of need. The [ authority] department may establish an expedited review
process for an application for a certificate  of need to rebuild a long term care facility, relocate
buildings that are part of a long term care facility  or relocate long term care facility bed capacity
from one long term care  facility to another. The [ authority] department shall issue a proposed order
[17]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
not later than 120 days after the date a complete application for expedited review  is received by the
[authority] department.
(5)(a) An applicant or any affected person  who is dissatisfied with the proposed decision of the
[authority] department is entitled to an informal hearing in the course  of review and before a final
decision is rendered.
(b) Following a final decision being rendered by the [ authority] department, an applicant or any
affected person may request a reconsideration hearing pursuant to ORS chapter 183.
(c) In any proceeding brought by  an affected person or an applicant challenging [ an authority ]
a department  decision under this  subsection, the [ authority] department  shall follow procedures
consistent with the provisions of ORS chapter 183 relating to a contested case.
(6) Once a certificate of need has been issued, it  may not be revoked or rescinded unless it was
acquired by fraud or deceit. However, if the [ authority] department finds that a person is offering
or developing a project that is not  within the scope of the certificate of need, the [ authority] de-
partment may limit the project as specified in the issued certificate of need or reconsider the  ap-
plication. A certificate of need is not transferable.
(7) Nothing in this section applies to any [ hospital,] skilled nursing or intermediate care service
or facility that seeks to  replace equipment with equipment of similar basic technological function
or an upgrade that improves the quality or cost-effectiveness of  the service provided. Any person
acquiring such replacement or upgrade shall file a  letter of intent for the project in accordance with
the rules of the [ authority] department  if the  price of the replacement equipment or upgrade ex-
ceeds $1 million.
[(8) Except as required in subsection (1) of this section for a new hospital  or new skilled nursing
or intermediate care service or facility not operating as a Medicare swing bed program, nothing in  this
section requires a rural hospital as defined in ORS 442.470 (5)(a)(A) and (B) to  obtain a certificate of
need.]
[(9) Nothing in this section applies to basic health services, but basic health services do not
include:]
[(a) Magnetic resonance imaging scanners; ]
[(b) Positron emission tomography scanners; ]
[(c) Cardiac catheterization equipment; ]
[(d) Megavoltage radiation therapy equipment; ]
[(e) Extracorporeal shock wave lithotriptors; ]
[(f) Neonatal intensive care; ]
[(g) Burn care; ]
[(h) Trauma care; ]
[(i) Inpatient psychiatric services; ]
[(j) Inpatient chemical dependency services; ]
[(k) Inpatient rehabilitation services; ]
[(L) Open heart surgery; or ]
[(m) Organ transplant services. ]
[(10)] (8) In addition to any other remedy  provided by law, whenever it appears that any person
is engaged  in, or is about to engage in, any acts that constitute a violation of this section, or any
rule or order issued by the [ authority] department  under this section, the [ authority] department
may institute proceedings in the circuit courts to enforce obedience  to such statute, rule or order
by injunction or by other processes, mandatory or otherwise.
[18]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(11) As used in this section, “basic health services” means health services offered  in or through
a hospital licensed under ORS chapter 441,  except skilled nursing or intermediate care nursing facili-
ties or services and those services specified in subsection (9) of this section. ]
SECTION 23.  ORS 442.362 is amended to read:
442.362. The  Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules requiring reporting entities within the
state to publicly report proposed capital  projects  to the Regional Planning Boards established in
section 16 of this 2017 Act . Rules adopted under this section must:
(1) Require a reporting entity to establish on the home page of  its website a prominently labeled
link to information about proposed  or pending capital projects. The information posted must include
but is not limited to a report of the community benefit  for the project, its estimated cost and a
means for interested persons  to submit comments. When a reporting entity posts the information
required under this subsection, the reporting entity  must notify the [ authority] Regional Planning
Board of the posting in the manner prescribed by the authority.
(2) If a reporting entity does not have a website, require the  reporting entity to publish notice
of the proposed  capital project in a major newspaper or online equivalent serving the region in
which the proposed capital project will be located. The notice must include but is not limited  to a
report of the community benefit for the project, its estimated cost and  a means for interested per-
sons to submit comments. When a reporting entity  publishes the information required under this
subsection, the reporting entity must notify the [ authority] Regional Planning Board  of the publi-
cation in the manner prescribed by the authority.
(3) Establish a publicly available resource for information collected under this section.
SECTION 24.
 Section 15, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 15.  (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(a) A significant amount of public and private funds are expended each year for long term care
services provided to Oregonians;
(b) Oregon has established itself as the national leader  in providing a choice of noninstitutional
care to low income Oregonians in  need of long term care services by developing an extensive system
of home health care and community-based care; and
(c) Long term care facilities continue to provide  critical services to some of Oregon’s most frail
and vulnerable residents with complex needs. Increasingly, long term care facilities are filling  a
need for transitional care between hospitals and home settings  in a cost-effective manner, reducing
the overall costs of long term care.
(2) The Legislative Assembly declares its support  for collaboration among state agencies that
purchase health services and private  health care providers in order to align financial incentives
with the goals of achieving better patient  care and improved health status while restraining growth
in the per capita cost of health care.
(3) It is the goal of  the Legislative Assembly that the long term care facility bed capacity in
Oregon be reduced by 1,500 beds by  December 31, 2015, except for bed capacity in nursing facilities
operated by the Department of Veterans’ Affairs and  facilities that either applied to the Oregon
Health Authority  for a certificate of need between August 1, 2011, and December 1, 2012, or sub-
mitted a letter of intent under ORS 442.315 (7) between January 15, 2013, and January 31, 2013.
(4) In order to reduce the long term  care facility bed capacity statewide, the Department of
Human Services may permit an operator of a long term care facility to purchase another  long term
care facility’s entire bed capacity if:
(a) The long term care facility bed capacity  being purchased is not in an essential long term
[19]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
care facility; and
(b) The long term care facility’s entire bed capacity is purchased and the  seller agrees to sur-
render the long term care facility’s license on the earlier of the date that:
(A) The last resident is transferred from the facility; or
(B) Is 180 days after the date of purchase.
(5) If a long term care facility’s entire bed capacity is purchased, the  facility may not admit new
residents to the facility except in accordance with criteria adopted  by the Department of Human
Services by rule.
(6) Long term care bed capacity purchased under this section may not be transferred to another
long term care facility.
(7) The Department of Human Services may convene meetings with representatives of entities
that include, but are not limited to,  long term care providers, nonprofit trade associations and state
and local governments to collaborate in strategies to reduce long term  care facility bed capacity
statewide. Participation shall be  on a voluntary basis. Meetings shall be held at a time and place
that is convenient for the participants.
(8) The Department of Human Services may conduct surveys of entities  and individuals specified
in subsection (7) of this section concerning  current long term care facility bed capacity and strate-
gies for increasing future capacity.
(9) Based on the findings in subsection (1) of this  section and the declaration expressed in sub-
section (2) of this  section, the Legislative Assembly declares its intent to exempt from state antitrust
laws and provide immunity from federal antitrust laws  through the state action doctrine individuals
and entities that engage in transactions, meetings or surveys described in subsections (4),  (7) and (8)
of this section that might otherwise be constrained by such laws.
(10) The Director of Human Services or the director’s designee  shall engage in appropriate state
supervision necessary to promote  state action immunity under state and federal antitrust laws, and
may inspect or request additional documentation to verify that the individuals and entities  acting
pursuant to subsection (4), (7) or (8) of this section are acting in  accordance with the legislative
intent expressed in this section.
(11) The Director of Human Services or the director’s  designee, in consultation with the Long
Term Care Ombudsman, shall engage [ in regional planning ] Regional Planning Boards in  their
deliberations as  necessary to promote the safety and dignity of residents living in a long term care
facility that surrenders its license under this section.
TRANSITION COMMISSION
SECTION 25.
(1) There is established a Transition Commission consisting of seven mem-
bers appointed by the Governor from individuals recommended by health  care providers and
health care consumer advocacy organizations. Collectively, the members must  have exten-
sive experience and knowledge in:
(a) Health care delivery, planning, financing and administration;
(b) Health economics; and
(c) Public finance and administration.
(2) The commission shall advise and assist the Health Care for  All Oregon Board in de-
signing and implementing the Health  Care for All Oregon Plan, including advice and assist-
ance regarding the following:
[20]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Developing an effective and efficient administrative structure to implement the plan.
(b) Proposing simple application procedures to promote timely access to health care.
(c) Designing a quality assurance system.
(d) Developing policies and procedures to ensure fair and adequate compensation  for
health care providers and to create incentives  to expand the availability of primary care. In
developing these policies and procedures, the commission shall encourage the full partic-
ipation of health care providers and consumer advocacy organizations.
(e) Proposing a cost-effective, transparent and  accountable method for financing the
plan, including measures to detect and reduce fraud.
(f) Advising the board on:
(A) The integration of information systems;
(B) The integration of physical, mental and dental health services;
(C) Negotiating with the federal government to obtain necessary waivers of  federal laws;
and
(D) Implementing a program to retrain displaced workers in accordance with section  10
of this 2017 Act. The program shall include coordination with appropriate  state agencies and
nonprofit organizations.
(g) Developing recommendations to resolve the tension  between the ideal of a medical
home and the ideal of freedom to choose one’s health care provider.
(h) Developing recommendations with respect to the impact on employee wages with  the
implementation of  the plan and policies to ensure fair wages and salaries given the impact
of the plan.
(i) Determining, in collaboration with the Health Care  for All Oregon Board and the
Oregon Health Policy Board, how to merge or complement the functions of the boards.
(j) As deemed necessary by the Health Care for All  Oregon Board, reporting to the Leg-
islative Assembly on the  progress in establishing the administrative structure, rules and
procedures for the plan.
(3) All appointments to the commission must  be completed by the Governor no later than
90 days after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
(4) A majority of  the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(5) Official action by the commission requires the  approval of a majority of the members
of the commission.
(6) The commission shall elect one of its members to  serve as chairperson and one of its
members to serve as vice chairperson.
(7) If there is a  vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment to be-
come immediately effective.
(8) The commission shall meet regularly at times and places specified by the call  of the
chairperson, the Health Care for All Oregon Board or a majority  of the members of the
commission.
(9) The commission may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the commission.
(10) Members of the commission  are entitled to compensation and expenses fixed by the
board and paid out of funds appropriated to the board for the purposes of the commission.
(11) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff support to the commission.
(12) The Governor shall dissolve the commission when its work  is completed, but no later
[21]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
than December 31, 2021.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the commission in the  performance of its duties and, to the extent permitted by laws relating
to confidentiality, to  furnish such information and advice as the members of the commission
consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 26. The Oregon Health  Authority may apply to any circuit court for an order
compelling compliance with any rule adopted by  the Health Care for All Oregon Board under
sections 5, 7,  9 and 11 of this 2017 Act. If the court finds that the defendant is not complying
with any rule  so adopted, the court shall grant an injunction requiring compliance. The
court, on motion and affidavits, may grant a preliminary injunction ex parte upon  such
terms as are just. The authority need not give security before  the issuance of an injunction
under this section.
SECTION 27. (1) In addition to  any other liability or penalty provided by law, the Director
of the Oregon Health Authority may impose a civil penalty on  a person for violation of sec-
tion 2 or 11 of this  2017 Act or any rule or general order of the Health Care for All Oregon
Board or Oregon Health Authority adopted  or issued in accordance with sections 5, 7, 9 and
11 of this 2017 Act.
(2) A civil penalty imposed under this section may be remitted  or reduced upon such
terms and conditions as the director considers proper.
(3) All penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and
credited to the Health Care for All Oregon Fund.
PUBLIC EMPLOYEE PARTICIPATION IN
THE HEALTH CARE FOR ALL OREGON PLAN
(Public Employees’ Benefit Board)
SECTION 28.  ORS 238.538 is amended to read:
238.538. (1) A judge member who elects to retire under ORS 238.535 (1)(b):
(a) Shall continue to be eligible as a nonretired employee for supplemental health benefit plans
contracted for under ORS 243.135 during the time that the judge member is serving as a pro tem
judge under ORS 238.535 (1)(c); and
(b) Subject to availability of  funding, shall continue to receive the monthly state contribution
as payment of all or part of the cost of a supplemental health benefit plan during the time that the
judge member is serving as a pro tem judge under ORS 238.535 (1)(c).
(2) A judge member receiving the monthly state contribution as payment of all or part of  the
cost of a supplemental health benefit plan under this  section is not eligible for payments against
the cost of Medicare supplemental insurance under ORS 238.420 until such time as the judge member
is no longer serving as a pro tem judge under ORS 238.535 (1)(c).
SECTION 29.
 ORS 243.105 is amended to read:
243.105. As used in ORS 243.105 to 243.285, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Benefit plan” includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Contracts for insurance or other benefits, including  supplemental medical, dental[ ,] or vi-
sion, life[ , disability and  other health care recognized by state law, and related services and
supplies;] or disability insurance or other benefits; and
[(b) Comparable benefits for employees who rely on spiritual means of healing; and ]
[22]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(c) Self-insurance programs managed by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board. ]
(b) The Health Care for All Oregon Plan or comparable benefits for employees  who rely
on spiritual means of healing.
(2) “Board” means the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(3) “Carrier” means an insurance company or health care  service contractor holding a valid
certificate of authority from the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services,  or
two or more companies or  contractors acting together pursuant to a joint venture, partnership or
other joint means of operation, or a board-approved guarantor of benefit plan coverage and  com-
pensation.
(4)(a) “Eligible employee” means an officer or employee of a state agency  or local government
who elects to participate in one  of the [ group] supplemental health benefit plans described in ORS
243.135. [The term ] “Eligible employee”  includes, but is  not limited to, state officers and employees
in the exempt, unclassified and classified service, and state officers and employees, whether  or not
retired, who:
(A) Are receiving a service retirement allowance, a disability retirement allowance or a  pension
under the Public Employees Retirement System or  are receiving a service retirement allowance, a
disability retirement allowance or a pension under any other retirement  or disability benefit plan
or system offered by the State of Oregon for its officers and employees;
(B) Are eligible to receive a service retirement allowance under the Public Employees  Retire-
ment System and have reached earliest retirement age under ORS chapter 238;
(C) Are eligible to receive a pension under ORS 238A.100  to 238A.250, and have reached earliest
retirement age as described in ORS 238A.165; or
(D) Are eligible to receive a service retirement  allowance or pension under another retirement
benefit plan or system offered by the State of Oregon and have  attained earliest retirement age
under the plan or system.
(b) “Eligible employee” does not include individuals:
(A) Engaged as independent contractors;
(B) Whose periods of employment in emergency work are on an intermittent or irregular basis;
(C) Who  are employed on less than half-time basis unless the individuals are employed in posi-
tions classified  as job-sharing positions, unless the individuals are defined as eligible under rules of
the board;
(D) Appointed under ORS 240.309;
(E) Provided sheltered employment or make-work by the state in an employment or industries
program maintained for the benefit of such individuals;
(F) Provided student health care services in  conjunction with their enrollment as students at a
public university listed in ORS 352.002; or
(G) Who are members of  a collective bargaining unit that represents police officers or fire-
fighters.
(5) “Family member” means  an eligible employee’s spouse and any unmarried child or stepchild
within age limits and other conditions imposed by the board with regard  to unmarried children or
stepchildren.
(6) “Local government”  means any city, county or special district in this state or any intergov-
ernmental entity created under ORS chapter 190.
(7) “Payroll disbursing officer” means the officer or official authorized to disburse moneys in
payment of salaries and wages of employees of a state agency or local government.
[23]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(8) “Premium” means the monthly or other periodic charge for a benefit plan.
(9) “State agency” means every state officer, board,  commission, department or other activity
of state government.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 243.107 is amended to read:
243.107. A person  employed by a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon Health
and Science University may be  considered an eligible employee for participation in one of the
[group] supplemental health  benefit plans described in ORS 243.135 if the governing board of the
public university, or the  Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors for Oregon
Health and Science University employees, determines that funds are available therefor and if:
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 243.105 (4)(b)(F), the person is a student  enrolled in an institution of
higher education and is employed as a graduate teaching  assistant, graduate research assistant or
a fellow at the institution and elects to participate; or
(2) Notwithstanding  ORS 243.105 (4)(b)(B) or (C), the person is employed on a less than half-time
basis in an unclassified instructional or research support capacity and elects to participate.
SECTION 31.  ORS 243.125 is amended to read:
243.125. (1) The Public Employees’ Benefit Board shall prescribe rules for  the conduct of its
business and for carrying out ORS 243.256. The  board shall study all matters connected with the
providing of adequate benefit plan coverage for eligible employees on the best basis possible  with
relation both to the welfare of  the employees and to the state and local governments. The board
shall design benefits, devise specifications, analyze carrier responses to advertisements for bids  and
decide on the award of contracts. Contracts shall be  signed by the chairperson on behalf of the
board.
(2) In carrying out its duties under subsection (1) of this section, the goal of the board shall be
to provide a high quality plan of health and other benefits  for employees at a cost affordable to both
the employer and the employees.
(3) Subject to ORS chapter 183, the board may  make rules not inconsistent with ORS 243.105 to
243.285 and 292.051 to determine the terms and conditions  of eligible employee participation and
coverage.
(4) The board shall prepare specifications, invite bids and do acts necessary to  award contracts
for supplemental health benefit plan and supplemental dental benefit plan coverage of eligible
employees in accordance with the criteria set forth in ORS 243.135 [ (1)] (2).
(5) The executive director of  the board shall report to the Director of the Oregon Health Au-
thority.
(6) The board may retain consultants, brokers or other advisory personnel when necessary  and,
subject to the State Personnel Relations Law, shall  employ such personnel as are required to per-
form the functions of the board.
SECTION 32.  ORS 243.129 is amended to read:
243.129. (1) The governing body of a local  government may elect to participate in a benefit plan
offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(2) The decision of the governing body of  a local government to participate in a benefit plan
offered by the board is in the discretion of the governing body of the local government  and is a
permissive subject of collective bargaining.
[(3) If the governing body of a local  government elects to offer a benefit plan through the board,
the governing body may elect one time  only to provide alternative group health and welfare insurance
benefit plans to eligible employees if: ]
[24]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(a) The alternative benefit plan is offered through the health  insurance exchange under ORS
741.310 (1)(b); and ]
[(b) The participation of the local government is not precluded  under federal law on or after Jan-
uary 1, 2017. ]
SECTION 33.  ORS 243.135, as amended by section 4,  chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
243.135. (1) Any person who is eligible to enroll in a health benefit plan available to  state
employees pursuant to ORS 243.105 to 243.285 and 292.051 shall participate in the Health Care
for All Oregon Plan.
[(1)] (2)  [ Notwithstanding any other benefit plan contracted for and offered by the Public
Employees’ Benefit Board ] If the Public Employees’ Benefit  Board contracts for health benefit
plans to supplement the coverage provided in the Health Care for All Oregon Plan , the  board
shall contract for a supplemental health benefit plan or plans best designed  to meet the needs and
provide for the welfare of eligible  employees, the state and the local governments. In considering
whether to enter into a contract for a  supplemental health benefit  plan, the board shall place
emphasis on:
(a) Employee choice among high quality plans;
(b) A competitive marketplace;
(c) Plan performance and information;
(d) Employer flexibility in plan design and contracting;
(e) Quality customer service;
(f) Creativity and innovation;
(g) Plan benefits as part of total employee compensation;
(h) The improvement of employee health; and
(i) Health outcome and quality measures, described in ORS 413.017 (4),  that are reported by the
plan.
[(2)] (3)  The board may approve more than one carrier for  each type of supplemental health
benefit plan contracted for and offered , but the number of carriers shall be held to a number con-
sistent with adequate service to eligible employees and their family members.
[(3)] (4)  Where appropriate for a contracted and offered  supplemental health benefit plan, the
board shall provide options under which an eligible  employee may arrange coverage for family
members.
[(4)] (5) Payroll deductions for costs that are  not payable by the state or a local government
may be made upon receipt of a signed authorization from the employee indicating an  election to
participate in the supplemental health benefit  plan or plans selected and the deduction of a cer-
tain sum from the employee’s pay.
[(5)] (6)  In developing any supplemental health benefit plan, the board may provide  an option
of additional coverage for eligible employees and their family  members at an additional cost or
premium.
[(6)] (7) Transfer of enrollment from one supplemental health benefit plan to another  shall be
open to all eligible employees and their family members under rules adopted by the board. [Because
of the special problems that may arise in individual instances under comprehensive  group practice plan
coverage involving acceptable provider-patient relations between a particular  panel of providers and
particular eligible employees  and their family members, the board shall provide a procedure under
which any eligible employee may apply  at any time to substitute a health service benefit plan for par-
[25]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ticipation in a comprehensive group practice benefit plan. ]
[(7)] (8)  The board shall evaluate a supplemental health benefit plan that serves a limited ge-
ographic region of this  state according to the criteria described in subsection [ (1)] (2) of this section.
SECTION 34.  ORS 243.160 is amended to read:
243.160. A retired state or local government officer or employee  is not required to participate
in one of the [ group] supplemental health benefit plans described  in ORS 243.135 in order to obtain
supplemental dental benefit plan coverage. The Public Employees’ Benefit Board  shall establish by
rule standards of eligibility for retired officers  or employees to participate in a supplemental dental
benefit plan.
SECTION 35.  ORS 243.163 is amended to read:
243.163. A member of the  Legislative Assembly who is receiving a pension or annuity under ORS
238.092 (1)(a) or  238A.250 (1) shall be eligible to participate as a retired state officer in one of the
[group] supplemental health benefit plans described in ORS 243.135 after the member ceases  to be
a member  of the Legislative Assembly if the member applies to the Public Employees’ Benefit Board
within 60 days after the member ceases to be a member of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 36.  ORS 243.215 is amended to read:
243.215. Any eligible employee unable to  participate in one or more of the plans described in
ORS 243.135 [ (1)] solely  because the employee is assigned to perform duties outside the state may
be eligible to receive  the monthly state or local government contribution, less administrative ex-
penses, as payment of  all or part of the cost of a [ health] benefit plan of choice, subject to the ap-
proval of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board and such rules as the board may adopt.
SECTION 37.  ORS 243.221 is amended to read:
243.221. (1) In addition to the powers  and duties otherwise provided by law to provide employee
benefits, the  Public Employees’ Benefit Board may provide, administer and maintain flexible benefit
plans under  which eligible employees may choose among taxable and nontaxable benefits as provided
in the federal Internal Revenue Code.
(2) In providing flexible benefit plans, the board may offer:
(a) Supplemental health or dental benefits as provided in ORS 243.125 and 243.135.
(b) Other insurance benefits as provided in ORS 243.275.
(c) Dependent care assistance as provided in ORS 243.550.
(d) Expense reimbursement as provided in ORS 243.560.
(e) Any other benefit  that may be excluded from an employee’s gross income under the federal
Internal Revenue Code.
(f) Any part or all  of the state or local government contribution for employee benefits in cash
to the employee.
(3) In developing flexible benefit plans under this section, the board shall design the plan on the
best basis possible with relation to the welfare of employees, the state and the local governments.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 243.275 is amended to read:
243.275. (1) [In addition to contracting for health and dental benefit plans, ] The Public  Employees’
Benefit Board may contract with carriers to provide , at the expense of participating eligible em-
ployees and with or without state or local government participation  for coverage, benefit plans
including , but not limited  to, insurance or other benefit based on life, supplemental medical, sup-
plemental dental, [ optical] supplemental vision, accidental death or disability insurance plans.
(2) The monthly contribution  of each eligible employee for [ other benefit plan or plans coverage,
as] coverage under a benefit  plan described in subsection (1) of this section[ ,] shall be the total
[26]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cost per month of the [ benefit] coverage afforded the employee under  the plan [ or plans ], for which
the employee exercises an option, including the  cost of enrollment and administrative expenses  for
the plan.
(3) For any benefit plan [ or plans ] described in subsection (1) of this section in which the state
or a local government participates, the monthly  contribution of each eligible employee for the ben-
efit plan, for which the employee exercises an option and there is state or local government partic-
ipation, shall  be reduced by an amount equal to the portion contributed by the state or the local
government, including the cost of enrollment and administrative expenses.
(4) The board may withdraw  approval of any such additional benefit plan coverage in the same
manner as [ it] the board  withdraws approval [ of health benefit plans as  described and  authorized
by] under ORS 243.145.
(5) If any state agency or local  government contracts for any of the benefits described in sub-
section (1) of this  section on behalf of any eligible employees, the administrative expenses of the
contract shall be paid by assessment  of the participating employees. The contracts are subject to
approval of the board before they become operative. The board may withdraw approval for  any such
benefit in the same manner as [ it] the board withdraws approval under ORS 243.145.
SECTION 39.
 ORS 292.051 is amended to read:
292.051. (1) Except as authority over contracts for  supplemental health benefit  plans described
in ORS 243.135 is vested in the Public Employees’ Benefit  Board, upon receipt of the request in
writing of an officer  or employee so to do, the state official authorized to disburse funds in payment
of the salary or wages of the officer or employee may deduct from the salary or wages of the  officer
or employee an amount of money indicated in the request for payment of the applicable amount  set
forth in benefit plans selected by the officers or employees or in their behalf for:
(a) Group life insurance, including life insurance for dependents of officers or employees.
(b) [ Group] Supplemental dental and related services and supplies,  or any other remedial care
recognized by state law and related services and supplies, other than medical,  surgical or hospital
care, recognized under state  law, including such insurance for dependents of state officers or em-
ployees.
(c) Group indemnity insurance for accidental death and dismemberment and  for loss of income
due to accident, sickness or other disability, including such  insurance for dependents of state offi-
cers or employees.
(d) Automobile  casualty insurance under a monthly payroll deduction program endorsed or of-
fered by an employee organization  representing 500 or more state employees. Membership in the
employee organization is not a requirement for participation in this program.
(e) Legal insurance under a monthly payroll deduction  program endorsed or offered by an em-
ployee organization representing 500 or more state employees.
(f) Self-insurance programs that are approved and provided by  the Public Employees’ Benefit
Board.
(2) The  Oregon Health Authority may establish and collect a fee to cover costs of administering
this section.
(3) No state official authorized to disburse funds in payment of salaries or wages is required  to
make deductions as authorized by subsection (1) of this section  for more than one benefit plan of the
type referred to in each of the paragraphs in subsection (1) of this section per eligible employee.
(4) Moneys deducted under subsection (1) of this section shall be paid over promptly:
(a) To the insurance companies, agencies or hospital associations, or  persons responsible for
[27]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
payment of premiums to the companies, agencies or associations, in accordance with the terms of
the contracts made by the officers or employees or in their behalf; or
(b) With respect to self-insurance benefits, in accordance with rules, procedures and directions
of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(5) As  used in this section, “officer or employee” means all persons who receive salaries or
wages disbursed by any state official.
(Oregon Educators Benefit Board)
SECTION 40.
 ORS 243.860 is amended to read:
243.860. As used in ORS 243.860 to 243.886, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Benefit plan” includes but is not limited to:
(a) Contracts for  insurance or other benefits, including  supplemental medical, dental[ ,] or vi-
sion, life[ , disability and other health care recognized by state law, and  related services and
supplies;] or disability insurance or other benefits; and
[(b) Self-insurance programs managed by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board; and ]
[(c) Comparable benefits for employees who rely on spiritual means of healing. ]
(b) The Health  Care for All Oregon Plan or comparable benefits for employees who rely
on spiritual means of healing.
(2) “Carrier” means an insurance company  or health care service contractor holding a valid
certificate of authority from the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services,  or
two or more companies or contractors acting together pursuant to a  joint venture, partnership or
other joint means of operation, or a board-approved provider  or guarantor of benefit plan coverage
and compensation.
(3) “District” means a common school district, a union high school district,  an education service
district, as defined in ORS 334.003, or a community college district, as defined in ORS 341.005.
(4)(a) “Eligible employee” includes:
(A) An officer or employee of a district or a  local government who elects to participate in one
of the benefit plans described in ORS 243.864 to 243.874; and
(B) An officer or employee of a district or a local government, whether or not retired, who:
(i) Is receiving a service retirement allowance, a disability retirement allowance or  a pension
under the Public Employees  Retirement System or is receiving a service retirement allowance, a
disability retirement allowance or a pension under any other retirement  or disability benefit plan
or system offered by the district or local government for its officers and employees;
(ii) Is eligible to receive a  service retirement allowance under the Public Employees Retirement
System and has reached earliest service retirement age under ORS chapter 238;
(iii) Is eligible to receive a pension under ORS 238A.100 to 238A.250  and has reached earliest
retirement age as described in ORS 238A.165; or
(iv) Is eligible to receive a service retirement allowance or pension under any other  retirement
benefit plan or system offered by  the district or local government and has attained earliest retire-
ment age under the plan or system.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, “eligible employee” does  not in-
clude an individual:
(A) Engaged as an independent contractor;
(B) Whose periods of employment in emergency work  are on an intermittent or irregular basis;
[28]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or
(C) Who is employed  on less than a half-time basis unless the individual is employed in a posi-
tion classified as a job-sharing position or unless the individual is defined as eligible under rules of
the Oregon Educators Benefit Board or under a collective bargaining agreement.
(5) “Family member” means an eligible  employee’s spouse or domestic partner and any unmar-
ried child or stepchild of an eligible employee within age limits and other conditions imposed by the
Oregon Educators Benefit Board with regard to unmarried children or stepchildren.
(6) “Local government” means any city, county or special district in this state.
(7) “Payroll disbursing officer” means the officer or official authorized to disburse moneys in
payment of salaries and wages of officers and employees of a district or a local government.
(8) “Premium” means the monthly or other periodic charge, including administrative fees of  the
Oregon Educators Benefit Board, for a benefit plan.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 243.864 is amended to read:
243.864. (1) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board:
(a) Shall adopt rules for the conduct of its business and for carrying out ORS 243.879; and
(b) May adopt rules  not inconsistent with ORS 243.860 to 243.886 to determine the terms and
conditions of eligible employee participation in and coverage under benefit plans.
(2) The board shall study all matters connected  with the provision of adequate benefit plan
coverage for eligible employees on the best basis possible with  regard to the welfare of the em-
ployees and affordability for the  districts and local governments. The board shall design benefits,
prepare specifications, analyze carrier responses to advertisements for  bids and award contracts.
Contracts shall be signed by the chairperson on behalf of the board.
(3) In carrying out its duties under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the goal of the board
is to provide high-quality [ health, dental and other ] benefit plans for eligible employees at a  cost af-
fordable to the districts and local governments, the employees and the taxpayers of Oregon.
(4) The  board shall prepare specifications, invite bids and take actions necessary to award con-
tracts for [ health and dental ] benefit  plan coverage of eligible employees in accordance with the
criteria set forth in ORS 243.866  [ (1)] (2). The Public Contracting Code does not apply to contracts
for benefit plans provided  under ORS 243.860 to 243.886. The board may not exclude from competi-
tion to contract for  a benefit plan an Oregon carrier solely because the carrier does not serve all
counties in Oregon.
(5) The board may retain consultants, brokers  or other advisory personnel when necessary and
shall employ such personnel as are required to perform the functions of the board.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 243.866, as amended by section 5,  chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
243.866. (1) Any person who is eligible to enroll in a health benefit plan under ORS  243.860
to 243.886 shall participate in the Health Care for All Oregon Plan.
[(1)] (2) If  the Oregon Educators Benefit Board contracts for health benefit plans to  sup-
plement coverage provided in the Health Care for All Oregon Plan, the board  shall  contract
for benefit plans best designed to meet the needs and provide for the  welfare of eligible employees,
the districts and local governments. In considering  whether to enter into a contract for a supple-
mental benefit plan, the board shall place emphasis on:
(a) Employee choice among high-quality plans;
(b) Encouragement of a competitive marketplace;
(c) Plan performance and information;
[29]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) District and local government flexibility in plan design and contracting;
(e) Quality customer service;
(f) Creativity and innovation;
(g) Plan benefits as part of total employee compensation;
(h) Improvement of employee health; and
(i) Health outcome and quality measures, described in ORS 413.017 (4),  that are reported by the
plan.
[(2)] (3)  The board may approve  more than one carrier for each type of supplemental health
benefit plan offered, but the board shall limit the number of carriers to a number consistent  with
adequate service to eligible employees and family members.
[(3)] (4)  When appropriate, the  board shall provide options under which an eligible employee
may arrange coverage for family members under a supplemental health benefit plan.
[(4)] (5) A district or a local government shall provide that payroll  deductions for supplemental
health benefit plan costs  that are not payable by the district or local government may be made upon
receipt of a signed authorization from  the employee indicating an election to participate in the
supplemental health  benefit plan or plans selected and allowing the deduction of those costs from
the employee’s pay.
[(5)] (6) In developing any supplemental health benefit plan, the board may provide an option
of additional coverage for eligible employees and family members at an additional premium.
[(6)] (7)  The board shall adopt rules  providing that transfer of enrollment from one supple-
mental health  benefit plan to  another is open to all eligible employees and family members. Be-
cause of the special problems that may arise involving  acceptable provider-patient relations between
a particular panel of providers and a particular eligible employee or family member under a  com-
prehensive group practice benefit plan, the board  shall provide a procedure under which any eligible
employee may apply at any time to  substitute another benefit plan for participation in a compre-
hensive group practice benefit plan.
[(7) An eligible employee who is  retired is not required to participate in a health benefit plan of-
fered under this section in order to obtain dental benefit plan coverage. The  board shall establish by
rule standards of eligibility for retired employees to participate in a dental benefit plan. ]
(8) The board shall evaluate a supplemental health  benefit plan that  serves a limited ge-
ographic region of this  state according to the criteria described in subsection [ (1)] (2) of this section.
SECTION 43.
 ORS 243.867 is amended to read:
243.867. (1) The governing body of a local  government may elect to participate in a benefit plan
offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board.
(2) The decision of the governing body of  a local government to participate in a benefit plan
offered by the board is in the discretion of the governing body of the local government  and is a
permissive subject of collective bargaining.
[(3) If the governing body of a local  government elects to offer a benefit plan through the board,
the governing body may elect one time  only to provide alternative group health and welfare insurance
benefit plans to eligible employees if: ]
[(a) The alternative benefit plan is offered through the health  insurance exchange under ORS
741.310 (1)(b); and ]
[(b) The participation of the local government is not precluded  under federal law on or after Jan-
uary 1, 2017. ]
SECTION 44.  ORS 243.868 is amended to read:
[30]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
243.868. (1) [In addition to contracting for health and dental benefit plans, ] The Oregon  Educators
Benefit Board may contract with carriers to provide  [ other] benefit plans including, but not limited
to, insurance or other benefits based on life, supplemental medical, supplemental  dental, supple-
mental vision, accidental death or disability insurance plans.
(2) The premium for each eligible employee for coverage  under a benefit plan [ other than a
health or dental benefit plan ] described in subsection (1) of this section shall be the  total cost per
month of the  coverage afforded the employee under the plan for which the employee exercises an
option, including the cost of enrollment and administrative expenses for the plan.
(3) The board may withdraw approval of any additional  benefit plan in the same manner as [ it]
the board  withdraws approval [ of a health or dental benefit plan as described and  authorized by ]
under ORS 243.878.
(4) If the board does not contract for a benefit plan described in subsection (1) of this  section,
a district or a local government may contract for the benefit plan on behalf of any district or  local
government employees. The administrative expenses of the plan shall  be paid in accordance with the
negotiated agreement between  the employees and the district or local government. Benefit plans
entered into by a district or  local government are subject to approval by the board before they be-
come operative. The board may withdraw approval of any such benefit plan  in the same manner as
[it] the board withdraws approval [ of a benefit plan ] under ORS 243.878.
SECTION 45.  ORS 243.874 is amended to read:
243.874. (1) In addition to the powers and duties otherwise provided by  law to provide benefit
plans for eligible employees, the  Oregon Educators Benefit Board may provide and administer flex-
ible benefit plans under which eligible  employees may choose among taxable and nontaxable benefits
as provided in the federal Internal Revenue Code.
(2) In providing flexible benefit plans, the board may offer:
(a) Supplemental health or dental benefits as described in ORS 243.864 and 243.866.
(b) Other insurance benefits as described in ORS 243.868.
(c) Any other benefit that may be excluded from an employee’s gross income  under the federal
Internal Revenue Code.
(d) Any part or all of the district or local government contribution  for employee benefits in cash
to the employee.
(3) In developing flexible benefit plans, the board shall design  the plans on the best basis pos-
sible with regard to the welfare of the employees and affordability  for the districts and local gov-
ernments.
(4) The board may pay some or all of the cost of administering  flexible benefit plans from funds
authorized to pay general administrative expenses incurred by the board.
(5) The  board shall adopt rules as the board considers necessary for the establishment and ad-
ministration of flexible benefit plans.
(6) The  board may contract with private organizations for administration of flexible benefit plans
in accordance with rules adopted under subsection (5) of this section.
SECTION 46.
 ORS 243.886 is amended to read:
243.886. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3) and (4) of this section,  a district may not
provide  or  contract for a benefit plan and eligible employees of districts may not participate in a
benefit plan unless the benefit plan:
(a) Is provided and administered by the Oregon Educators  Benefit Board under ORS 243.860 to
243.886; or
[31]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(b) Is offered through the health insurance exchange under ORS 741.310 (1)(b)(B). ]
(b) Is the Health Care for All Oregon Plan.
(2)(a) Except for community college districts, a district that was  self-insured before January 1,
2007, or a district that had an independent health insurance trust established  and functioning before
January 1, 2007, may provide or contract for benefit plans other than  benefit plans provided and
administered by the board if the premiums for  the benefit plans provided or contracted for by the
district are equal to or less than the premiums for comparable benefit plans provided  and adminis-
tered by the board.
(b) A community college district may provide or  contract for benefit plans other than benefit
plans provided and administered by the board.
(c) In accordance with procedures adopted by the board to extend benefit  plan coverage under
ORS 243.864 to 243.874 to eligible employees of a self-insured district, a district with  an independent
health insurance trust or a community college district, these districts may choose to offer benefit
plans that are provided and administered by the board. Once employees of a district  participate in
benefit plans provided and administered by the board,  the district may not thereafter provide or
contract for benefit plans other than those provided and administered by the board.
(3)(a) A district, other than a district claiming the exception in subsection (2)(a) of  this section,
that has not offered  benefit plans provided and administered by the board before June 23, 2009, may
provide or contract for benefit plans  other than benefit plans provided and administered by the
board if the premiums for the benefit plans provided or contracted for by the district are  equal to
or less than the premiums for comparable  benefit plans provided and administered by the board.
Once employees of a  district or an employee group within a district participates in benefit plans
provided and administered by the board,  the district may not thereafter provide or contract for
benefit plans for those employees or employee groups other than those provided and administered
by the board.
(b) If requested by the district or a labor organization representing eligible employees of  the
district, the board shall perform an actuarial analysis of the district.
(c) As used in this subsection, “district” does not include a community college district.
(4) Nothing  in ORS 243.860 to 243.886 may be construed to expand or contract collective bar-
gaining rights or collective bargaining obligations.
SECTION 47.
 ORS 731.036 is amended to read:
731.036. Except as provided in ORS 743.029 or as specifically provided by law, the Insurance
Code does not apply to any of the following to the extent of the subject matter of the exemption:
(1) A bail bondsman, other than a corporate surety and its agents.
(2) A fraternal benefit society that has maintained lodges  in this state and other states for 50
years prior to January 1, 1961, and for  which a certificate of authority was not required on that
date.
(3) A  religious organization providing insurance benefits only to its employees, if the organiza-
tion is in existence and exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of  the federal Internal Revenue
Code on September 13, 1975.
(4) Public bodies,  as defined in ORS 30.260, that either individually or jointly establish a self-
insurance program for tort liability in accordance with ORS 30.282.
(5) Public bodies, as defined in ORS 30.260, that either individually or jointly establish  a self-
insurance program for property damage in accordance with ORS 30.282.
(6) Cities, counties,  school districts, community college districts, community college service dis-
[32]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tricts or districts, as defined in ORS 198.010 and 198.180, that either individually or jointly [ insure
for] self-insure a  supplemental health insurance coverage  program, excluding disability insurance,
their employees or retired employees, or  their dependents, or students engaged in school activities,
or combination of employees and dependents,  with or without employee or student contributions, if
all of the following conditions are met:
(a) The [ individual or jointly self-insured ] program meets the following minimum requirements:
(A) In the case of a  school district, community college district or community college service
district, the number of covered  employees and dependents and retired employees and dependents
aggregates at least 500 individuals;
(B) In the case of an individual public body program  other than a school district, community
college district or  community college service district, the number of covered employees and depen-
dents and retired employees and dependents aggregates at least 500 individuals; and
(C) In the case of a joint  program of two or more public bodies, the number of covered em-
ployees and dependents and retired employees and dependents aggregates at least 1,000  individuals;
(b) The [ individual or jointly self-insured health insurance ] program  includes all coverages and
benefits required of group health insurance policies under ORS chapters 743, 743A and 743B;
(c) The [ individual or jointly self-insured ] program must have program documents that define
program benefits and administration;
(d) Enrollees must be provided copies of summary plan descriptions including:
(A) Written general information about services provided, access to services, charges and  sched-
uling applicable to each enrollee’s coverage;
(B) The program’s grievance and appeal process; and
(C) Other group health plan enrollee rights, disclosure or written procedure requirements es-
tablished under ORS chapters 743, 743A and 743B;
(e) The financial  administration of [ an individual or jointly self-insured ] the  program must in-
clude the following requirements:
(A) Program contributions and reserves  must be held in separate accounts and used for the ex-
clusive benefit of the program;
(B) The program must maintain adequate reserves. Reserves  may be invested in accordance with
the provisions of ORS chapter 293. Reserve adequacy must  be calculated annually with proper
actuarial calculations including the following:
(i) Known claims, paid and outstanding;
(ii) A history of incurred but not reported claims;
(iii) Claims handling expenses;
(iv) Unearned contributions; and
(v) A claims trend factor; and
(C) The program  must maintain adequate reinsurance against the risk of economic loss in ac-
cordance  with  the provisions of ORS 742.065 unless the program has received written approval for
an alternative arrangement for protection against economic  loss from the Director of the Depart-
ment of Consumer and Business Services;
(f) The [ individual or jointly  self-insured ] program must have sufficient personnel to service the
employee benefit program or must contract with  a third party administrator licensed under ORS
chapter 744 as a third party administrator to provide such services;
[(g) The individual or jointly self-insured program shall be subject to  assessment in accordance
with section 2, chapter 698, Oregon Laws 2013; ]
[33]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(h)] (g) The public body,  or the program administrator in the case of a joint [ insurance] program
of two or more public bodies, files with the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business
Services copies of all documents creating and  governing the program, all forms used to communicate
the coverage to beneficiaries, the schedule of payments established to support the  program and,
annually, a financial report showing the total incurred cost of the program  for the preceding year.
A copy of the annual audit  required by ORS 297.425 may be used to satisfy the financial report filing
requirement; and
[(i)] (h)  Each public body in a joint [ insurance] program is liable only to  its own employees and
no others for benefits under the program  in the event, and to the extent, that no further funds, in-
cluding funds from insurance policies obtained by the pool, are available in the joint  insurance pool.
(7) All ambulance services.
(8) A  person providing any of the services described in this subsection. The exemption under this
subsection does not apply to an  authorized insurer providing such services under an insurance pol-
icy. This subsection applies to the following services:
(a) Towing service.
(b) Emergency road service, which means adjustment, repair or replacement  of the equipment,
tires or mechanical parts of a motor vehicle in order  to permit the motor vehicle to be operated
under its own power.
(c) Transportation and arrangements for the transportation  of human remains, including all
necessary and appropriate preparations for and actual  transportation provided to return a
decedent’s remains from the  decedent’s place of death to a location designated by a person with
valid legal authority under ORS 97.130.
(9)(a) A person described in this subsection who, in an agreement  to lease or to finance the
purchase of a motor vehicle, agrees to waive for no additional charge the amount  specified in par-
agraph (b) of this subsection upon total loss of the motor vehicle because of  physical damage, theft
or other occurrence, as specified in the agreement.  The exemption established in this subsection
applies to the following persons:
(A) The seller of the motor vehicle, if the sale is made pursuant to a motor  vehicle retail in-
stallment contract.
(B) The lessor of the motor vehicle.
(C) The lender who finances the purchase of the motor vehicle.
(D) The assignee of a person described in this paragraph.
(b) The amount waived pursuant to the agreement shall be the  difference, or portion thereof,
between the amount received by the seller, lessor, lender or  assignee, as applicable, that represents
the actual  cash value of the motor vehicle at the date of loss, and the amount owed under the
agreement.
(10) A self-insurance program for tort liability or property damage  that is established by two or
more affordable housing  entities and that complies with the same requirements that public bodies
must meet under ORS 30.282 (6). As used in this subsection:
(a) “Affordable housing” means housing projects in which some of the dwelling units may be
purchased or rented, with or without government assistance, on a basis that is affordable to indi-
viduals of low income.
(b) “Affordable housing entity” means any of the following:
(A) A housing  authority created under the laws of this state or another jurisdiction and any
agency or instrumentality of a housing authority, including but not  limited to a legal entity created
[34]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to conduct a self-insurance program for housing authorities that complies with ORS 30.282 (6).
(B) A nonprofit corporation that is engaged in providing affordable housing.
(C) A partnership or limited liability company that is engaged in providing  affordable housing
and that is affiliated  with a housing authority described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph or
a nonprofit corporation  described in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph if the housing authority or
nonprofit corporation:
(i) Has, or has the right to acquire, a financial or ownership interest in  the partnership or lim-
ited liability company;
(ii) Has the power to direct the management or policies of the partnership or limited  liability
company;
(iii) Has entered into a contract  to lease, manage or operate the affordable housing owned by
the partnership or limited liability company; or
(iv) Has any other material relationship with the partnership or limited liability company.
(11) A community-based  health care initiative approved by the Oregon Health Authority under
ORS 735.723 operating a community-based health care improvement program approved by the  au-
thority.
(12) Except as provided in ORS 735.500 and 735.510, a person certified by the Department of
Consumer and Business Services to operate a retainer medical practice.
SECTION 48.
 ORS 731.036, as amended by section 37,  chapter 698, Oregon Laws 2013, and
section 42, chapter 318, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
731.036. Except as provided in ORS 743.029 or as specifically provided by law, the Insurance
Code does not apply to any of the following to the extent of the subject matter of the exemption:
(1) A bail bondsman, other than a corporate surety and its agents.
(2) A fraternal benefit society that has maintained lodges  in this state and other states for 50
years prior to January 1, 1961, and for  which a certificate of authority was not required on that
date.
(3) A  religious organization providing insurance benefits only to its employees, if the organiza-
tion is in existence and exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of  the federal Internal Revenue
Code on September 13, 1975.
(4) Public bodies,  as defined in ORS 30.260, that either individually or jointly establish a self-
insurance program for tort liability in accordance with ORS 30.282.
(5) Public bodies, as defined in ORS 30.260, that either individually or jointly establish  a self-
insurance program for property damage in accordance with ORS 30.282.
(6) Cities, counties,  school districts, community college districts, community college service dis-
tricts or districts, as defined in ORS 198.010 and 198.180, that either individually or jointly [ insure
for] self-insure a  supplemental health insurance coverage  program, excluding disability insurance,
their employees or retired employees, or  their dependents, or students engaged in school activities,
or combination of employees and dependents,  with or without employee or student contributions, if
all of the following conditions are met:
(a) The [ individual or jointly self-insured ] program meets the following minimum requirements:
(A) In the case of a  school district, community college district or community college service
district, the number of covered  employees and dependents and retired employees and dependents
aggregates at least 500 individuals;
(B) In the case of an individual public body program  other than a school district, community
college district or  community college service district, the number of covered employees and depen-
[35]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dents and retired employees and dependents aggregates at least 500 individuals; and
(C) In the case of a joint  program of two or more public bodies, the number of covered em-
ployees and dependents and retired employees and dependents aggregates at least 1,000  individuals;
(b) The [ individual or jointly self-insured health insurance ] program  includes all coverages and
benefits required of group health insurance policies under ORS chapters 743, 743A and 743B;
(c) The [ individual or jointly self-insured ] program must have program documents that define
program benefits and administration;
(d) Enrollees must be provided copies of summary plan descriptions including:
(A) Written general information about services provided, access to services, charges and  sched-
uling applicable to each enrollee’s coverage;
(B) The program’s grievance and appeal process; and
(C) Other group health plan enrollee rights, disclosure or written procedure requirements es-
tablished under ORS chapters 743, 743A and 743B;
(e) The financial  administration of [ an individual or jointly self-insured ] the  program must in-
clude the following requirements:
(A) Program contributions and reserves  must be held in separate accounts and used for the ex-
clusive benefit of the program;
(B) The program must maintain adequate reserves. Reserves  may be invested in accordance with
the provisions of ORS chapter 293. Reserve adequacy must  be calculated annually with proper
actuarial calculations including the following:
(i) Known claims, paid and outstanding;
(ii) A history of incurred but not reported claims;
(iii) Claims handling expenses;
(iv) Unearned contributions; and
(v) A claims trend factor; and
(C) The program  must maintain adequate reinsurance against the risk of economic loss in ac-
cordance  with  the provisions of ORS 742.065 unless the program has received written approval for
an alternative arrangement for protection against economic  loss from the Director of the Depart-
ment of Consumer and Business Services;
(f) The [ individual or jointly  self-insured ] program must have sufficient personnel to service the
employee benefit program or must contract with  a third party administrator licensed under ORS
chapter 744 as a third party administrator to provide such services;
(g) The public body, or the program administrator in  the case of a joint insurance program of
two or more public bodies, files with the Director of the Department  of Consumer and Business
Services copies of all documents creating and  governing the program, all forms used to communicate
the coverage to beneficiaries, the schedule of payments established to support the  program and,
annually, a financial report showing the total incurred cost of the program  for the preceding year.
A copy of the annual audit  required by ORS 297.425 may be used to satisfy the financial report filing
requirement; and
(h) Each public body in a joint [ insurance] program is liable only to its own employees and no
others for benefits under the program in the event, and  to the extent, that no further funds, in-
cluding funds from insurance policies obtained by the pool, are available in the joint  insurance pool.
(7) All ambulance services.
(8) A  person providing any of the services described in this subsection. The exemption under this
subsection does not apply to an authorized insurer providing such  services under an insurance pol-
[36]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
icy. This subsection applies to the following services:
(a) Towing service.
(b) Emergency road service, which means adjustment, repair or replacement  of the equipment,
tires or mechanical parts of a motor vehicle in order  to permit the motor vehicle to be operated
under its own power.
(c) Transportation and arrangements for the transportation  of human remains, including all
necessary and appropriate preparations for and actual  transportation provided to return a
decedent’s remains from the  decedent’s place of death to a location designated by a person with
valid legal authority under ORS 97.130.
(9)(a) A person described in this subsection who, in an agreement  to lease or to finance the
purchase of a motor vehicle, agrees to waive for no additional charge the amount  specified in par-
agraph (b) of this subsection upon total loss of the motor vehicle because of  physical damage, theft
or other occurrence, as specified in the agreement.  The exemption established in this subsection
applies to the following persons:
(A) The seller of the motor vehicle, if the sale is made pursuant to a motor  vehicle retail in-
stallment contract.
(B) The lessor of the motor vehicle.
(C) The lender who finances the purchase of the motor vehicle.
(D) The assignee of a person described in this paragraph.
(b) The amount waived pursuant to the agreement shall be the  difference, or portion thereof,
between the amount received by the seller, lessor, lender or  assignee, as applicable, that represents
the actual  cash value of the motor vehicle at the date of loss, and the amount owed under the
agreement.
(10) A self-insurance program for tort liability or property damage  that is established by two or
more affordable housing  entities and that complies with the same requirements that public bodies
must meet under ORS 30.282 (6). As used in this subsection:
(a) “Affordable housing” means housing projects in which some of the dwelling units may be
purchased or rented, with or without government assistance, on a basis that is affordable to indi-
viduals of low income.
(b) “Affordable housing entity” means any of the following:
(A) A housing  authority created under the laws of this state or another jurisdiction and any
agency or instrumentality of a housing authority, including but not  limited to a legal entity created
to conduct a self-insurance program for housing authorities that complies with ORS 30.282 (6).
(B) A nonprofit corporation that is engaged in providing affordable housing.
(C) A partnership or limited liability company that is engaged in providing  affordable housing
and that is affiliated  with a housing authority described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph or
a nonprofit corporation  described in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph if the housing authority or
nonprofit corporation:
(i) Has, or has the right to acquire, a financial or ownership interest in  the partnership or lim-
ited liability company;
(ii) Has the power to direct the management or policies of the partnership or limited  liability
company;
(iii) Has entered into a contract  to lease, manage or operate the affordable housing owned by
the partnership or limited liability company; or
(iv) Has any other material relationship with the partnership or limited liability company.
[37]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(11) A community-based  health care initiative approved by the Oregon Health Authority under
ORS 735.723 operating a community-based health care improvement program approved by the  au-
thority.
(12) Except as provided in ORS 735.500 and 735.510, a person certified by the Department of
Consumer and Business Services to operate a retainer medical practice.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 49.  ORS 291.229 is amended to read:
291.229. (1) As part of the development of the legislatively adopted budget in  each odd-numbered
year regular session of the Legislative Assembly, the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services
shall make a report to  the Joint Committee on Ways and Means on the actions taken by state
agencies during the previous biennium to attain  a ratio of at least 11 nonsupervisory employees to
every supervisory employee, as defined in ORS 243.650.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “State  agency” means all state officers, boards, commissions, departments, institutions,
branches, agencies,  divisions and other entities, without regard to the designation given to those
entities, that are within the executive branch  of government as described in Article III, section 1,
of the Oregon Constitution.
(b) “State agency” does not include:
(A) The legislative department as defined in ORS 174.114;
(B) The judicial department as defined in ORS 174.113;
(C) The Public Defense Services Commission;
(D) The Secretary of State and  the State Treasurer in the performance of the duties of their
constitutional offices;
(E) Semi-independent state agencies listed in ORS 182.454;
(F) The Oregon Tourism Commission;
(G) The Oregon Film and Video Office;
(H) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002;
(I) The Oregon Health and Science University;
(J) The Travel Information Council;
(K) Oregon Corrections Enterprises;
(L) The Oregon State Lottery Commission;
(M) The State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation;
(N) The Oregon Utility Notification Center;
(O) Oregon Community Power;
(P) The Citizens’ Utility Board;
(Q) A special government body as defined in ORS 174.117;
(R) Any  other public corporation created under a statute of this state and specifically designated
as a public corporation; [ and]
(S) Any other semi-independent state agency denominated by statute as  a semi-independent state
agency ; and
(T) The Health Care for All Oregon Board .
SECTION 50.
 ORS 291.231 is amended to read:
291.231. (1) Notwithstanding  ORS 291.229, a state agency that employs more than 100 employees
[38]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and has not,  by April 11, 2012, attained a ratio of at least 11 to 1 of employees of the state agency
who are not supervisory employees to supervisory employees:
(a) May not fill the position of a supervisory  employee until the agency has increased the
agency’s ratio of employees  to supervisory employees so that the ratio is at least one additional
employee to supervisory employees; and
(b) Shall, not later than October 31, 2012, lay off or reclassify  the number of supervisory em-
ployees necessary to attain the increase  in the ratio specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection if
the increase in that ratio is not attained under paragraph (a) of this subsection or  through attrition.
(2) Notwithstanding  ORS 291.229, a state agency that employs more than 100 employees and has
complied with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, but has not attained a ratio  of at
least 11 to 1 of employees of the state  agency who are not supervisory employees to supervisory
employees:
(a) May not fill the position of a supervisory  employee until the agency has increased the
agency’s ratio of employees to supervisory employees by at least one additional employee; and
(b) Not later than October 31 of each subsequent year, shall lay off or reclassify the number of
supervisory employees necessary to increase the agency’s ratio of  employees to supervisory em-
ployees so that the ratio is at least one additional employee to supervisory employees.
(3) Layoffs or reclassifications  required under this section must be made in accordance with the
terms of any  applicable collective bargaining agreement. A supervisory employee who is reclassified
into a classified position pursuant to this section shall be compensated in the salary range for the
classified position unless otherwise provided by an applicable collective bargaining agreement.
(4) Upon application from a state agency, the Director of the Oregon Department of  Adminis-
trative Services may grant a state agency  an exception from the requirements of subsections (1) to
(3) of this section. The director may grant an exception under this section that:
(a) Applies to a particular position if  the director determines the exception is necessary to allow
the state agency to maintain public or state agency employee safety;
(b) Applies to a division, unit, office, branch or other smaller part of the state agency if the  di-
rector  determines  the exception is necessary to allow the state agency to maintain public or state
agency employee safety or because of the  geographic location of the division, unit, office, branch
or other smaller part of the state agency; or
(c) The director determines is warranted  because the state agency has supervisory employees
exercising authority over personnel who are not employees  of the state agency, the state agency has
a significant number  of part-time or seasonal employees or the state agency has another unique
personnel need.
(5) Not later than five business  days before the director proposes to grant an exception under
this section, the director shall notify each collective bargaining agent of the public or state  agency
employees in the appropriate bargaining unit for the state agency requesting an exception.
(6) The department shall report all exceptions granted  under this section to the Joint Committee
on Ways and Means, the Joint Interim Committee on Ways and Means or the Emergency Board.
(7) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “State agency” means  all state officers, boards, commissions, departments, institutions,
branches, agencies, divisions and other entities, without regard to the designation given to  those
entities, that are within the executive branch of government as  described in Article III, section 1,
of the Oregon Constitution.
(B) “State agency” does not include:
[39]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) The legislative department as defined in ORS 174.114;
(ii) The judicial department as defined in ORS 174.113;
(iii) The Public Defense Services Commission;
(iv) The Secretary of State and the State Treasurer  in the performance of the duties of their
constitutional offices;
(v) Semi-independent state agencies listed in ORS 182.454;
(vi) The Oregon Tourism Commission;
(vii) The Oregon Film and Video Office;
(viii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002;
(ix) The Oregon Health and Science University;
(x) The Travel Information Council;
(xi) Oregon Corrections Enterprises;
(xii) The Oregon State Lottery Commission;
(xiii) The State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation;
(xiv) The Oregon Utility Notification Center;
(xv) Oregon Community Power;
(xvi) The Citizens’ Utility Board;
(xvii) The Health Care for All Oregon Board;
[(xvii)] (xviii) A special government body as defined in ORS 174.117;
[(xviii)] (xix) Any other public corporation created under a statute of  this state and specifically
designated as a public corporation; and
[(xix)] (xx)  Any other semi-independent state  agency denominated by statute as a semi-
independent state agency.
(b) “Supervisory employee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 243.650.
SECTION 51.
 ORS 352.237 is amended to read:
352.237. (1) The governing board of each public university listed in ORS 352.002 shall  provide
group insurance to employees of  the university through the Public Employees’ Benefit Board [ or may
elect to provide an alternative group health and welfare insurance benefit plan  to employees of the
university on or  after October 1, 2016, if the benefit plan is offered through the health insurance ex-
change under ORS 741.310, unless their participation is precluded by federal law ].
(2) For the purposes of ORS 243.555 to 243.575, if the governing board of a  public university
listed in ORS 352.002 chooses not to participate in the benefit plans  offered through the Public
Employees’ Benefit Board,  the governing board may have the authority granted to the Public
Employees’ Benefit Board under ORS 243.555 to  243.575 for the administration of an appropriate
expense reimbursement plan.
(3) The governing  board of each public university listed in ORS 352.002 shall offer one or more
deferred compensation plans to employees of  the university. The governing board shall choose
whether to offer its employees the  state deferred compensation plan established under ORS 243.401
to 243.507 or another deferred compensation plan  that the governing board elects to make available
to the employees of the university.
SECTION 52.  ORS 408.370 is amended to read:
408.370. (1) In addition to the other uses for the Oregon Housing Fund  set forth in ORS 458.600
to 458.665, financial support for an Oregon Veterans’ Home is a permitted use of moneys  from the
Oregon Housing Fund.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 442.315 [ and 442.325], an Oregon Veterans’ Home is not subject to any
[40]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
certificate of need  requirement  or any requirement of a Regional Planning Board under section
16 of this 2017 Act .
SECTION 53.  ORS 408.380 is amended to read:
408.380. (1) The Oregon Veterans’ Home authorized by section 1, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 1995,
is subject to all state laws  and administrative rules and all federal laws and administrative regu-
lations to which  long term care facilities operated by nongovernmental entities are subject, except
for the requirement to obtain a certificate of need under ORS 442.315 [ from the  Oregon Health Au-
thority].
(2) As used in this section,  “long term care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS
442.015.
SECTION 54.  ORS 411.400 is amended to read:
411.400. (1) An application for any category of aid shall  also constitute an application for med-
ical assistance.
(2) [Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, ] The Department of Human Services  and
the Oregon Health Authority shall accept an application for  medical assistance and any required
verification of eligibility from the applicant, an adult who is in the applicant’s  household or family,
an authorized representative of  the applicant or, if the applicant is a minor or incapacitated, some-
one acting on behalf of the applicant:
(a) Over the Internet;
(b) By telephone;
(c) By mail;
(d) In person; and
(e) Through other commonly available electronic means.
(3) The department and the authority may require an  applicant or person acting on behalf of
an applicant to provide only the information necessary for the purpose of making an eligibility  de-
termination or for a purpose directly connected to the administration of medical assistance [ or the
health insurance exchange ].
(4) The  department and the authority shall provide application and recertification assistance to
individuals with disabilities, individuals with limited English proficiency, individuals  facing physical
or geographic barriers and  individuals seeking help with the application for medical assistance or
recertification of eligibility for medical assistance:
(a) Over the Internet;
(b) By telephone; and
(c) In person.
[(5)(a) The  Department of Human Services and the authority shall promptly transfer information
received under this section to the Department of Consumer and Business Services, the  United States
Department of Health and Human  Services or the Internal Revenue Service as necessary for the de-
termination of eligibility for  the health insurance exchange, premium tax credits or cost-sharing re-
ductions.]
[(b)] (5)  The Department of  Human Services shall promptly transfer information received under
this section to the authority for individuals who are eligible for medical assistance  [ because they
qualify for public assistance ] or for the Health Care for All Oregon Plan .
[(6) The Department of Human Services and the authority shall accept from  the Department of
Consumer and Business Services an application and any verification that  was submitted to the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services by  an applicant or on behalf of an applicant in order for
[41]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Department of Human Services or the  authority to determine the applicant’s eligibility for medical
assistance.]
SECTION 55.  ORS 411.402 is amended to read:
411.402. (1) The Department of Human Services  and the Oregon Health Authority shall adopt
by rule,  consistent with federal requirements, the procedures for verifying eligibility for medical
assistance, including but not limited to all of the following:
(a) The department and the authority shall access all  relevant state and federal electronic da-
tabases for any eligibility information available through the databases.
(b) The department and the authority shall verify the following factors through self-attestation:
(A) Pregnancy;
(B) Date of birth;
(C) Household composition; and
(D) Residency.
(c) The department and the  authority may not use self-attestation to verify citizenship and im-
migration status.
(d) The department and the authority may require the applicant to  provide verification in addi-
tion to the verification specified in this subsection only if  the department and the authority are
unable to obtain the  information electronically or if the information obtained electronically is not
reasonably compatible with information provided by or on behalf of the applicant.
(e) The department and the authority shall use methods of  administration that are in the best
interests of applicants  and recipients and that are necessary for the proper and efficient operation
of the medical assistance program.
(2) Information obtained by the department or the authority under  this section may be ex-
changed [ with the health insurance exchange  and ] with other state or federal agencies for the pur-
pose of:
(a) Verifying eligibility for medical assistance[ , participation in the exchange ] or  other health
benefit programs;
[(b) Establishing the amount of any tax credit due to the  person, cost-sharing reduction or premium
assistance;]
[(c)] (b) Improving the provision of services; and
[(d)] (c) Administering health benefit programs.
SECTION 56.
 ORS 411.406 is amended to read:
411.406. (1) A medical assistance recipient shall immediately  notify the Department of Human
Services or the Oregon Health Authority, if required, of the receipt or possession of property or
income or other change in circumstances that directly affects the eligibility of  the recipient to re-
ceive medical assistance, or that directly  affects the amount of medical assistance for which the
recipient is eligible. Failure to give the notice shall  entitle the department or the authority to re-
cover from the recipient the amount of assistance improperly disbursed by reason thereof.
(2)(a) The department or  the authority shall redetermine the eligibility of a medical assistance
recipient at intervals specified by federal law.
(b) The department and  the authority shall redetermine eligibility under this subsection on the
basis of information available to the department and  the authority and may not require the recipient
to provide information if the department or the authority is able to  determine eligibility based on
information in the recipient’s record or through other information that is available  to the depart-
ment or the authority.
[42]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if  the department or the authority receives
information about  a change in a medical assistance recipient’s circumstances that may affect eligi-
bility for medical assistance, the department or the authority shall promptly redetermine  eligibility.
(4) If the department or the authority determines that a  medical assistance recipient no longer
qualifies for the medical assistance program in which the recipient is enrolled, the department  or
the authority must determine eligibility for other medical assistance  programs[ ,] and potential el-
igibility for the [ health insurance exchange, premium tax credits and cost-sharing reductions ] Health
Care for All Oregon Plan  before terminating the recipient’s medical assistance. [ If the recipient
appears to qualify for the exchange, premium tax credits or cost-sharing reductions, the department  or
the authority shall promptly transfer the recipient’s record to the exchange to process those benefits. ]
SECTION 57.  ORS 413.011, as amended by section 6,  chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
413.011. (1) The duties of the Oregon Health Policy Board are to:
(a) Be the policy-making and  oversight body for the Oregon Health Authority established in ORS
413.032 and all of the authority’s departmental divisions.
[(b) Develop and submit a plan to the Legislative Assembly by  December 31, 2010, to provide and
fund access to affordable, quality health care for all Oregonians by 2015. ]
[(c) Develop a program  to provide health insurance premium assistance to all low and moderate
income individuals who are legal residents of Oregon. ]
[(d)] (b) Publish health outcome and quality measure data collected  by the Oregon Health Au-
thority at aggregate levels that  do not disclose information otherwise protected by law. The infor-
mation published must report, for each coordinated care organization and each health benefit  plan
sold through the health insurance exchange or offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board  or
the Public Employees’ Benefit Board:
(A) Quality measures;
(B) Costs;
(C) Health outcomes; and
(D) Other information that is necessary for members of the public to evaluate the value of health
services delivered by each coordinated care organization and by each health benefit plan.
[(e)] (c)  Establish evidence-based clinical standards and practice  guidelines that may be used by
providers.
[(f)] (d)  Approve and monitor community-centered health initiatives  described in ORS 413.032
(1)(h) that are  consistent with public health goals, strategies, programs and performance standards
adopted by the Oregon Health Policy Board to improve the health of all Oregonians,  and shall reg-
ularly report to the Legislative Assembly on the accomplishments and needed changes to the  initi-
atives.
[(g)] (e)  Establish cost containment mechanisms to reduce health care costs.
[(h)] (f)  Ensure that Oregon’s health care  workforce is sufficient in numbers and training to
meet the demand that will be created by the expansion in health coverage, health  care system
transformations, an increasingly diverse population and an aging workforce.
[(i)] (g)  Work with the Oregon congressional delegation to advance the adoption of changes in
federal law or policy to promote Oregon’s comprehensive health reform plan.
[(j) Establish a health benefit  package in accordance with ORS 741.340 to be used as the baseline
for all health benefit plans offered through the health insurance exchange. ]
[(k) Investigate and report annually to the Legislative Assembly on the feasibility and  advisability
[43]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of future changes to the health insurance market in  Oregon, including but not limited to the
following: ]
[(A) A requirement for every resident to have health insurance coverage. ]
[(B) A payroll  tax as a means to encourage employers to continue providing health insurance to
their employees.]
[(L)] (h)  Meet cost-containment goals by  structuring reimbursement rates to reward compre-
hensive management of diseases, quality outcomes  and the efficient use of resources by promoting
cost-effective procedures, services and  programs including, without limitation, preventive health,
dental and primary care services, web-based office  visits, telephone consultations and telemedicine
consultations.
[(m)] (i)  Oversee the expenditure of moneys  from the Health Care Workforce Strategic Fund to
support grants  to primary care providers and rural health practitioners, to increase the number of
primary care educators and to support efforts to create and develop career ladder opportunities.
[(n)] (j)  Work with  the Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee, administrators of the med-
ical assistance program  and the Department of Corrections to identify uniform contracting standards
for health benefit plans that achieve maximum quality and cost outcomes and align the  contracting
standards for all state programs to the greatest extent practicable.
[(o)] (k)  Work with the Health Information Technology Oversight Council  to foster health in-
formation technology systems and practices that promote the Oregon Integrated and  Coordinated
Health Care Delivery System  established by ORS 414.620 and align health information technology
systems and practices across this state.
(2) The Oregon Health Policy Board is authorized to:
(a) Subject to the approval of the Governor  and the Health Care for All  Oregon Board es-
tablished in section 7 of this 2017 Act , organize and reorganize the authority as the Oregon
Health Policy Board considers necessary to properly conduct the work of the authority.
(b) Submit directly to the Legislative Counsel,  no later than October 1 of each even-numbered
year, requests for measures necessary to provide statutory authorization to carry out  any of the
board’s duties or to implement any of the board’s recommendations. The  measures may be filed prior
to the beginning of the legislative session in accordance with the  rules of the House of Represen-
tatives and the Senate.
(3) If the board or  the authority is unable to perform, in whole or in part, any of the duties
described  in  ORS 413.006 to 413.042 [ and 741.340] without federal approval, the authority is author-
ized to request, in accordance with ORS 413.072,  waivers or other approval necessary to perform
those duties. The authority shall implement any portions of those duties not requiring legislative
authority or federal approval, to the extent practicable.
(4) The enumeration of duties, functions and powers in this section is not  intended to be exclu-
sive nor to limit the duties, functions and powers imposed on the board by ORS 413.006  to 413.042
[and 741.340] and by other statutes.
[(5) The board shall consult with the  Department of Consumer and Business Services in completing
the tasks set forth in subsection (1)(j) and (k)(A) of this section. ]
SECTION 58.
 ORS 413.017, as amended by  section 2, chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
413.017. (1) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall establish the committees described in sub-
sections (2) to (4) of this section.
(2)(a) The Public Health  Benefit Purchasers Committee shall include individuals who purchase
[44]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
health care for the following:
(A) The Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(B) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board.
(C) Trustees of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(D) A city government.
(E) A county government.
(F) A special district.
(G) Any private nonprofit organization  that receives the majority of its funding from the state
and requests to participate on the committee.
(b) The Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee shall:
(A) Identify and make  specific recommendations to achieve uniformity across all public health
benefit plan designs based on the best available clinical evidence, recognized best practices  for
health promotion and disease management, demonstrated  cost-effectiveness and shared demographics
among the enrollees within the pools covered by the benefit plans.
(B) Develop an action plan for ongoing collaboration to implement the benefit design alignment
described in subparagraph (A) of  this paragraph and shall leverage purchasing to achieve benefit
uniformity if practicable.
(C) Continuously review and report to the  Oregon Health Policy Board on the committee’s
progress in aligning benefits while minimizing the cost shift to individual purchasers of  insurance
without shifting costs to the private sector [ or the health insurance exchange ].
(c) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall work with  the Public Health Benefit Purchasers
Committee to identify uniform provisions for state and  local public contracts for health benefit plans
that achieve maximum quality and  cost outcomes. The board shall collaborate with the committee
to develop steps to implement joint contract provisions. The committee shall identify  a schedule for
the implementation of contract  changes. The process for implementation of joint contract provisions
must include a review process to protect against unintended cost shifts to enrollees or agencies.
(3)(a) The Health Care Workforce Committee  shall include individuals who have the collective
expertise, knowledge and experience in a broad range  of health professions, health care education
and health care workforce development initiatives.
(b) The Health Care Workforce Committee shall coordinate efforts to recruit and  educate health
care professionals and retain a quality workforce to meet the demand that will be created  by the
expansion in health care coverage, system transformations and an increasingly diverse population.
(c) The Health Care Workforce Committee shall conduct an inventory of all  grants and other
state resources available for addressing the need to expand the health care workforce to meet the
needs of Oregonians for health care.
(4)(a) The  Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee shall include the following members appointed
by the Governor:
(A) An individual representing the Oregon Health Authority;
(B) An individual representing the Oregon Educators Benefit Board;
(C) An individual representing the Public Employees’ Benefit Board;
(D) An individual representing the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(E) Two health care providers;
(F) One individual representing hospitals;
(G) One  individual representing insurers, large employers or multiple employer welfare ar-
rangements;
[45]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(H) Two individuals representing health care consumers;
(I) Two individuals representing coordinated care organizations;
(J) One individual with expertise in health care research;
(K) One individual with expertise in health care quality measures; and
(L) One individual with expertise in mental health and addiction services.
(b) The committee shall work collaboratively with the Oregon  Educators Benefit Board, the
Public Employees’  Benefit Board, the Oregon Health Authority and the Department of Consumer and
Business Services to adopt health  outcome and quality measures that are focused on specific goals
and provide value to  the state, employers, insurers, health care providers and consumers. The com-
mittee shall be  the single body to align health outcome and quality measures used in this state with
the requirements of health care data reporting to ensure that the measures and  requirements are
coordinated, evidence-based and focused on a long term statewide vision.
(c) The committee shall use a public process that includes an opportunity for public comment
to identify health outcome and quality measures that may be applied to services provided by coor-
dinated care organizations or [ paid for by health benefit plans sold through the health insurance  ex-
change or offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board or the Public  Employees’ Benefit Board ] the
Health Care for All Oregon Plan . [ The Oregon Health  Authority, the Department of Consumer and
Business Services, the Oregon Educators Benefit  Board and the Public Employees’ Benefit Board
are] The Health Care for All Oregon Board is  not required to adopt all of  the health outcome and
quality measures identified by the committee but may not  adopt any health outcome and quality
measures that are different from the measures identified by the  committee. The measures must take
into account the  recommendations of the metrics and scoring subcommittee created in ORS 414.638
and the differences in the populations served by  coordinated care organizations and by commercial
insurers.
(d) In identifying health  outcome and quality measures, the committee shall prioritize measures
that:
(A) Utilize existing state and  national health outcome and quality measures, including measures
adopted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid  Services, that have been adopted or endorsed
by other state or national organizations and have a relevant state or national benchmark;
(B) Given the context  in which each measure is applied, are not prone to random variations
based on the size of the denominator;
(C) Utilize existing data systems,  to the extent practicable, for reporting the measures to mini-
mize redundant reporting and undue burden on the state, health benefit plans  and health care pro-
viders;
(D) Can be meaningfully adopted for a minimum of three years;
(E) Use a common format in the collection of the data and facilitate the  public reporting of the
data; and
(F) Can be reported in  a timely manner and without significant delay so that the most current
and actionable data is available.
(e) The  committee shall evaluate on a regular and ongoing basis the health outcome and quality
measures adopted under this section.
(f) The committee may convene subcommittees to focus on gaining expertise in particular  areas
such as data collection, health  care research and mental health and substance use disorders in order
to aid the committee in the  development of health outcome and quality measures. A subcommittee
may include stakeholders and  staff from the Oregon Health Authority, the Department of Human
[46]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Services, [ the Department of Consumer and Business Services, ] the Early  Learning Council or any
other agency staff with the appropriate expertise in the issues addressed by the subcommittee.
(g) This subsection does not prevent the Oregon Health  Authority[ , the Department of Consumer
and Business Services, commercial insurers, the Public Employees’ Benefit  Board or the Oregon Edu-
cators Benefit Board ] or the Health Care  for All Oregon Board  from establishing programs that
provide financial incentives to providers for meeting specific health outcome  and quality measures
adopted by the committee.
(5) Members of the committees described in subsections  (2) to (4) of this section who are not
members of the Oregon Health Policy Board are not entitled  to compensation but shall be reim-
bursed from funds available to the board for actual and  necessary travel and other expenses in-
curred  by  them by their attendance at committee meetings, in the manner and amount provided in
ORS 292.495.
SECTION 59.  ORS 413.032, as amended by section 7,  chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
413.032. (1) The Oregon Health Authority is established. The authority shall:
(a) Carry out  policies adopted by the Oregon Health Policy Board  and the Health Care for
All Oregon Board ;
(b) Administer the Oregon Integrated and  Coordinated Health Care Delivery System established
in ORS 414.620;
(c) Administer the Oregon Prescription Drug Program;
(d) Develop the policies for and the provision of publicly funded medical care and  medical as-
sistance in this state;
(e) Develop the policies for and the provision of  mental health treatment and treatment of ad-
dictions;
(f) Assess, promote and protect the health of the public as specified by state and federal law;
(g) Provide regular reports to the Oregon Health Policy Board  with respect to the performance
of health services contractors serving recipients of medical assistance, including reports of  trends
in health services and enrollee satisfaction;
(h) Guide and support, with the  authorization of the Oregon Health Policy  Board, community-
centered  health  initiatives designed to address critical risk factors, especially those that contribute
to chronic disease;
(i) Be the state Medicaid agency for the administration of  funds from Titles XIX and XXI of the
Social Security Act and administer medical assistance under ORS chapter 414;
(j) In consultation with the Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services, pe-
riodically review and recommend standards and methodologies to the Legislative Assembly for:
(A) Review of administrative expenses of health insurers;
(B) Approval of rates; and
(C) Enforcement of rating rules adopted by the Department of  Consumer and Business Services;
(k) Structure reimbursement rates for providers  that serve recipients of medical assistance to
reward comprehensive management of diseases,  quality outcomes and the efficient use of resources
and to promote cost-effective procedures, services and programs including, without  limitation, pre-
ventive health, dental and primary  care services, web-based office visits, telephone consultations and
telemedicine consultations;
(L) Guide and support community three-share agreements in which an  employer, state or local
government and an individual all contribute a portion  of a premium for a community-centered health
[47]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
initiative or for insurance coverage;
(m) Develop, in consultation with the Department of  Consumer and Business Services, one or
more products designed to provide more affordable options for the small group market;
(n) Implement policies and programs to expand the skilled, diverse workforce as described in
ORS 414.018 (4); and
(o) Implement a process for collecting the health outcome and quality measure data  identified
by the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee and report the data to the Oregon  Health Policy
Board.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority is authorized to:
(a) Create an  all-claims, all-payer database to collect health care data and monitor and evaluate
health care reform in Oregon and to  provide comparative cost and quality information to consumers,
providers and purchasers of health care about Oregon’s health care  systems and health plan net-
works in order to provide comparative information to consumers.
(b) Develop uniform contracting standards for  the purchase of health care, including the fol-
lowing:
(A) Uniform quality standards and performance measures;
(B) Evidence-based guidelines for major chronic  disease management and health care services
with unexplained variations in frequency or cost;
(C) Evidence-based effectiveness guidelines for select new technologies and  medical equipment;
and
(D) A statewide drug formulary that may be used by publicly funded health benefit plans.
(3) The enumeration of duties,  functions and powers in this section is not intended to be exclu-
sive nor to limit the duties, functions and  powers imposed on or vested in the Oregon Health Au-
thority by ORS 413.006 to 413.042 and [ 741.340] section 11 of this 2017 Act  or by other statutes.
SECTION 60.
 ORS 413.037 is amended to read:
413.037. (1) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority, each deputy director and authorized
representatives of the director may administer oaths, take depositions and issue subpoenas to compel
the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents or  other written information necessary
to carry out the provisions of ORS 413.006 to 413.042 and [ 741.340] section 11 of this 2017 Act .
(2) If any person fails to comply with a subpoena issued under this section  or refuses to testify
on matters on which the person lawfully may be interrogated,  the director, deputy director or au-
thorized representative may follow the procedure set out in ORS 183.440 to compel obedience.
SECTION 61.
 ORS 414.025, as amended by  section 9, chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
414.025. As used in this chapter and ORS chapters 411 and 413,  unless the context or a specially
applicable statutory definition requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Alternative payment methodology” means a  payment other than a fee-for-services pay-
ment, used by coordinated care organizations as compensation for the provision of integrated  and
coordinated health care and services.
(b) “Alternative payment methodology” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Shared savings arrangements;
(B) Bundled payments; and
(C) Payments based on episodes.
(2) “Behavioral health clinician” means:
(a) A licensed psychiatrist;
[48]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A licensed psychologist;
(c) A certified nurse practitioner with a specialty in psychiatric mental health;
(d) A licensed clinical social worker;
(e) A licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist;
(f) A certified clinical social work associate;
(g) An intern or resident who is working under a  board-approved supervisory contract in a
clinical mental health field; or
(h) Any other clinician whose  authorized scope of practice includes mental health diagnosis and
treatment.
(3) “Behavioral health home” means a mental health disorder or substance use  disorder treat-
ment organization, as defined by the  Oregon Health Authority by rule, that provides integrated
health care to individuals whose primary diagnoses are mental health disorders or  substance use
disorders.
(4) “Category of aid” means assistance provided by the Oregon Supplemental  Income Program,
aid granted under ORS 411.877 to 411.896 and 412.001 to 412.069  or federal Supplemental Security
Income payments.
(5) “Community health worker” means an individual who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in an urban or rural community, either for pay or as a volunteer  in association with
a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life  experi-
ences with the residents of the community where the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health  and increases the capacity of the
community to meet the health care needs of its residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the  individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services such as first aid or blood pressure screening.
(6) “Coordinated care organization” means an organization meeting criteria adopted by the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.625.
(7) “Dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid” means, with respect to eligibility for enrollment
in a coordinated care organization, that an individual is eligible for health services funded by  Title
XIX of the Social Security Act and is:
(a) Eligible for or enrolled in Part A of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; or
(b) Enrolled in Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.
(8) “Global budget” means a total amount established prospectively  by the Oregon Health Au-
thority to be paid to a  coordinated care organization for the delivery of, management of, access to
and quality of the health care delivered to members of the coordinated care organization.
[(9) “Health insurance exchange” or “exchange” means an American  Health Benefit Exchange de-
scribed in 42 U.S.C. 18031, 18032, 18033 and 18041. ]
[(10)] (9) “Health services” means at least so much of each of the following  as are funded by the
Legislative Assembly based upon the prioritized  list of health services compiled by the Health Evi-
dence Review Commission under ORS 414.690:
(a) Services  required by federal law to be included in the state’s medical assistance program in
[49]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
order for the program to qualify for federal funds;
(b) Services provided by a physician  as defined in ORS 677.010, a nurse practitioner certified
under ORS 678.375 or other licensed practitioner within the scope of the practitioner’s practice as
defined by state law, and ambulance services;
(c) Prescription drugs;
(d) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(e) Medical equipment and supplies;
(f) Mental health services;
(g) Chemical dependency services;
(h) Emergency dental services;
(i) Nonemergency dental services;
(j) Provider  services, other than services described in paragraphs (a) to (i), (k), (L) and (m) of
this subsection, defined by federal law that may be included in the state’s  medical assistance pro-
gram;
(k) Emergency hospital services;
(L) Outpatient hospital services; and
(m) Inpatient hospital services.
[(11)] (10) “Income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704.
[(12)(a)] (11)(a)  “Integrated health  care” means care provided to individuals and their families
in a patient centered primary care home or behavioral health home  by licensed primary care
clinicians, behavioral health clinicians and other  care team members, working together to address
one or more of the following:
(A) Mental illness.
(B) Substance use disorders.
(C) Health behaviors that contribute to chronic illness.
(D) Life stressors and crises.
(E) Developmental risks and conditions.
(F) Stress-related physical symptoms.
(G) Preventive care.
(H) Ineffective patterns of health care utilization.
(b) As used in this subsection, “other care team members” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Qualified mental health professionals or  qualified mental health associates meeting require-
ments adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule;
(B) Peer wellness specialists;
(C) Peer support specialists;
(D) Community health workers who have completed a state-certified training program;
(E) Personal health navigators; or
(F) Other qualified individuals approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
[(13)] (12) “Investments and savings” means cash, securities as  defined in ORS 59.015, negotiable
instruments as  defined in ORS 73.0104 and such similar investments or savings as the department
or the authority may establish by rule that are available to the applicant  or recipient to contribute
toward meeting the needs of the applicant or recipient.
[(14)] (13)  “Medical assistance” means so much of the medical,  mental health, preventive, sup-
portive, palliative and remedial  care and services as may be prescribed by the authority according
to the standards established pursuant to ORS 414.065, including  premium assistance and payments
[50]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
made for services provided under an insurance or other contractual arrangement  and money paid
directly to the recipient  for the purchase of health services and for services described in ORS
414.710.
[(15)] (14) “Medical assistance” includes any care or services for any  individual who is a patient
in a medical institution or any care or services for any individual who  has attained 65 years of age
or is under 22 years of age, and who is a patient in a  private or public institution for mental dis-
eases. Except as provided in ORS 411.439 and 411.447, “medical assistance” does not include  care
or services for a resident of a nonmedical public institution.
[(16)] (15) “Patient centered primary care home” means a health care team  or clinic that is or-
ganized in accordance with the standards established by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS
414.655 and that incorporates the following core attributes:
(a) Access to care;
(b) Accountability to consumers and to the community;
(c) Comprehensive whole person care;
(d) Continuity of care;
(e) Coordination and integration of care; and
(f) Person and family centered care.
[(17)] (16)  “Peer support specialist” means any of the following individuals who  provide sup-
portive services to a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment:
(a) An individual who is a current or former consumer of mental health treatment;
(b) An individual who is in recovery, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, from
an addiction disorder; or
(c) A family member of a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment.
[(18)] (17) “Peer wellness specialist” means  an individual who is responsible for assessing mental
health and  substance use disorder service and support needs of a member of a coordinated care or-
ganization through community outreach, assisting  members with access to available services and
resources,  addressing  barriers to services and providing education and information about available
resources for individuals  with mental health or substance use disorders in order to reduce stigma
and discrimination toward consumers of mental health and substance use disorder  services and to
assist the member in creating and maintaining recovery, health and wellness.
[(19)] (18) “Person centered care” means care that:
(a) Reflects the individual patient’s strengths and preferences;
(b) Reflects the clinical needs of the patient as identified  through an individualized assessment;
and
(c) Is based upon the patient’s goals and will assist the patient in achieving the goals.
[(20)] (19) “Personal health navigator” means an individual who provides information, assistance,
tools and support  to enable a patient to make the best health care decisions in the patient’s par-
ticular circumstances and in light of  the patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions and
desired outcomes.
[(21)] (20)  “Prepaid managed care health services organization”  means a managed dental care,
mental health or chemical dependency organization that contracts with  the authority under ORS
414.654 or with a coordinated care organization on a  prepaid capitated basis to provide health ser-
vices to medical assistance recipients.
[(22)] (21) “Quality measure” means the health outcome and  quality measures and benchmarks
identified by the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee and the  metrics and scoring subcommittee
[51]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in accordance with ORS 413.017 (4) and 414.638.
[(23)] (22) “Resources” has the meaning given that term in ORS  411.704. For eligibility purposes,
“resources” does not  include charitable contributions raised by a community to assist with medical
expenses.
SECTION 62.  ORS 414.115 is amended to read:
414.115. (1) In lieu of  providing one or more of the health care and services available under
medical assistance by direct payments to providers thereof and in lieu of providing such health care
and services made  available pursuant to ORS 414.065, the Oregon Health Authority may use avail-
able medical assistance funds  to purchase and pay premiums on policies of insurance, or enter into
and pay  the expenses on health care service contracts, or medical or hospital service contracts that
provide one or more of the health care and services available  under medical assistance.
Notwithstanding other specific provisions, the use of  available medical assistance funds to purchase
health care and services may provide the following insurance or contract options:
(a) Differing  services or levels of service among groups of eligibles as defined by rules of the
authority; and
(b) Services and  reimbursement for these services may vary among contracts and need not be
uniform.
(2) The policy of insurance or the contract  by its terms, or the insurer or contractor by written
acknowledgment to the authority must guarantee:
(a) To provide health  care and services of the type, within the extent and according to standards
prescribed under ORS 414.065;
(b) To pay providers of health care and services the amount due, based on  the number of days
of care and the fees, charges and costs established under ORS 414.065, except as  to medical or
hospital service contracts which employ a method of accounting  or payment on other than a fee-
for-service basis;
(c) To provide health care and services under policies of insurance or contracts in  compliance
with all laws, rules and regulations applicable thereto; and
(d) To provide such statistical data, records and  reports relating to the provision, administration
and costs of providing health care and services to the authority as  may be required by the authority
for its records, reports and audits.
[(3) The authority may  purchase insurance under this section through the health insurance ex-
change.]
SECTION 63.
 ORS 414.736 is amended to read:
414.736. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Designated area” means a geographic area of the state defined  by the Oregon Health Au-
thority by rule that is served by a prepaid managed care health services organization.
(2) “Fully capitated health plan” means an organization that contracts with  the authority on a
prepaid capitated basis under ORS 414.618.
(3) “Physician care organization” means an organization that contracts with the authority on  a
prepaid capitated basis under ORS 414.618 to provide the health  services described in ORS 414.025
[(10)(b)] (9)(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g) and (j). A  physician care organization may also contract with the
authority on a prepaid  capitated basis to provide the health services described in ORS 414.025
[(10)(k)] (9)(k)  and (L).
SECTION 64.
 ORS 414.740 is amended to read:
414.740. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 414.738 (1), the Oregon Health Authority  shall contract under
[52]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 414.651 with a prepaid group practice health plan that serves at least 200,000 members in this
state and that has been issued  a certificate of authority by the Department of Consumer and Busi-
ness Services as a health care service contractor to provide  health services as described in ORS
414.025 [(10)(b)] (9)(b) , (c), (d), (e), (g) and (j). A health plan may also contract with the  authority
on a prepaid  capitated basis to provide the health services described in ORS 414.025 [ (10)(k)] (9)(k)
and (L). The authority may accept financial contributions from  any public or private entity to help
implement and administer the contract. The authority shall seek federal matching funds for any fi-
nancial contributions received under this section.
(2) In a designated area, in addition to the contract described in subsection (1) of this section,
the authority shall  contract with prepaid managed care health services organizations to provide
health services under this chapter.
SECTION 65.
 ORS 430.315 is amended to read:
430.315. The Legislative Assembly finds alcoholism  or drug dependence is an illness. The alco-
holic  or  drug-dependent person is ill and should be afforded treatment for that illness. To the
greatest extent possible, the  least costly settings for treatment, outpatient services and residential
facilities shall be widely available and  utilized except when contraindicated because of individual
health care needs. State agencies that purchase treatment for alcoholism or  drug dependence shall
develop criteria consistent with this policy in consultation with the Oregon Health Authority. In
reviewing applications for certificate of need, the [ Director of the Oregon Health  Authority ] De-
partment of Human Services  shall take this policy into account.
SECTION 66.
 ORS 441.065 is amended to read:
441.065. (1)  ORS 441.015 to 441.063 and 441.196 or the rules adopted pursuant thereto do not
authorize the supervision, regulation or control of the remedial  care or treatment of residents or
patients in any home or institution that is described under subsection (2) of this  section and is
conducted for those who rely upon treatment solely by prayer or spiritual means, except as to  the
sanitary and safe conditions of the premises, cleanliness of operation and its physical equipment.
This section does not exempt such a home or institution from the licensing  requirements of ORS
441.015 to  441.087, 441.525 to 441.595, 441.815, 441.820, 441.990[ , 442.342, 442.344 ] and 442.400 to
442.463.
(2) To qualify under subsection (1) of this section, a home or institution must:
(a) Be owned by an entity that is registered with the  Secretary of State as a nonprofit corpo-
ration and that does not own, hold a financial interest in, control or operate any facility,  wherever
located, of a type providing medical health care and services; and
(b) Provide 24 hour a day availability of nonmedical care and services.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Medical health care and services” means medical  screening, examination, diagnosis,
prognosis, treatment and drug administration. “Medical health care and services” does not include
counseling or the provision of social services or dietary services.
(b) “Nonmedical care and services”  means assistance or services, other than medical health care
and services, provided by attendants for  the physical, mental, emotional or spiritual comfort and
well being of residents or patients.
SECTION 67.
 ORS 441.550 is amended to read:
441.550. Except as otherwise provided in ORS 441.545,  an authority shall have all powers nec-
essary to accomplish the purpose of providing hospital facilities for the people of Oregon,  including
without limitation the power:
[53]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) To sue and be sued in its own name.
(2) To acquire  by purchase, construction, exchange, gift, lease, or otherwise, and to improve,
extend, maintain, equip and furnish hospital facilities, which hospital facilities  may be either within
or without the corporate limits of the municipality by which the authority is created.
(3) To lease such hospital facilities to any one or more political subdivisions of this state  or any
private nonprofit corporations which  are operating or propose to operate an inpatient care facility
subject to the licensing  and supervision requirements of ORS 441.015 to 441.087, 441.525 to 441.595,
441.815, 441.820, 441.990[, 442.342, 442.344] and 442.400 to  442.463 upon such terms and conditions
as the  board deems appropriate, to charge and collect rents and to terminate any such lease upon
default of the lessee.
(4) To enter into options and agreements  for the renewal or extension of such leases of hospital
facilities or for the conveyance of such hospital facilities.
(5) To sell, exchange, donate and convey any or all of its hospital facilities or other assets.
(6) To borrow money and to issue notes and revenue bonds for the purpose of carrying out  its
powers.
(7) To mortgage and pledge its assets,  or any portion thereof, whether then owned or thereafter
acquired, to pledge the revenues and receipts from such assets, to acquire, hold, and  dispose of
mortgages and other similar documents relating to hospital facilities, and  to arrange and provide for
guarantee and other security agreements therefor.
(8) To loan money for the construction of and improvements to hospital facilities.
(9) To enter into contracts, leases and other undertakings in its own name.
(10) To adopt and amend ordinances and resolutions.
SECTION 68.
 ORS 441.710 is amended to read:
441.710. (1) In addition to any other  liability or penalty provided by law, the Director of Human
Services may impose a civil penalty on a person for any of the following:
(a) Violation of any of the terms  or conditions of a license issued under ORS 441.015 to 441.087,
441.525 to 441.595, 441.815, 441.820, 441.990[, 442.342, 442.344] and 442.400 to 442.463 for a long term
care facility, as defined in ORS 442.015.
(b) Violation of any rule or general order of the Department of Human  Services that pertains
to a long term care facility.
(c) Violation of any final order of the director that  pertains specifically to the long term care
facility owned or operated by the person incurring the penalty.
(d) Violation of ORS 441.605 or of rules required to be adopted under ORS 441.610.
(e) Violation of ORS 443.880  or 443.881 if the facility is a residential care facility, residential
training facility or residential training home.
(2) In addition to any other liability or penalty provided by law,  the Director of the Oregon
Health Authority may impose a civil penalty on a person for  a violation of ORS 443.880 or 443.881
if the facility is a residential treatment facility or a residential treatment home.
(3) The Director of Human  Services may not impose a penalty under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion for violations other than those involving direct patient care or feeding, an  adequate staff to
patient ratio, sanitation involving direct patient care  or a violation of ORS 441.605 or 443.880 or
443.881 or of the rules  required to be adopted by ORS 441.610 unless a violation is found on two
consecutive surveys of a long term care facility. The Director  of Human Services in every case shall
prescribe a reasonable time for elimination of a violation:
(a) Not to exceed 30 days after first notice of a violation; or
[54]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) In cases where the violation  requires more than 30 days to correct, such time as is specified
in a plan of correction found acceptable by the director.
(4) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority  may not impose a penalty under subsection (2)
of this section for violations other than those involving  direct patient care or feeding, an adequate
staff to patient ratio, sanitation involving direct patient  care or a violation of ORS 443.880 or
443.881. The Director of the Oregon Health Authority in every case shall prescribe a reasonable
time for elimination of a violation:
(a) Not to exceed 30 days after first notice of a violation; or
(b) In cases where the violation  requires more than 30 days to correct, such time as is specified
in a plan of correction found acceptable by the director.
SECTION 69.
 ORS 442.015 is amended to read:
442.015. As used in ORS chapter 441 and this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Acquire” or “acquisition” means obtaining  equipment, supplies, components or facilities by
any means, including purchase, capital or operating lease, rental  or donation, for the purpose of
using such equipment, supplies, components or  facilities to provide health services in Oregon. When
equipment or other materials are obtained outside of this state,  acquisition is considered to occur
when the equipment  or other materials begin to be used in Oregon for the provision of health ser-
vices or when such services are offered for use in Oregon.
(2) “Affected persons” has the same meaning as given to “party” in ORS 183.310.
(3)(a) “Ambulatory surgical center” means a facility or portion of a facility that  operates ex-
clusively for the purpose of providing surgical services to patients who do not  require
hospitalization and for whom the expected duration of services does not exceed 24 hours  following
admission.
(b) “Ambulatory surgical center” does not mean:
(A) Individual or group practice offices of private physicians or dentists  that do not contain a
distinct area used  for outpatient surgical treatment on a regular and organized basis, or that only
provide surgery routinely provided in a physician’s or  dentist’s office using local anesthesia or
conscious sedation; or
(B) A portion of a licensed hospital designated for outpatient surgical treatment.
(4) “Delegated credentialing agreement” means a written agreement  between an originating-site
hospital and a  distant-site hospital that provides that the medical staff of the originating-site hospi-
tal will rely upon the credentialing and privileging decisions  of the distant-site hospital in making
recommendations to the governing body of the originating-site hospital as to whether  to credential
a telemedicine  provider, practicing at the distant-site hospital either as an employee or under con-
tract, to provide telemedicine services to patients in the originating-site hospital.
(5) “Develop”  means to undertake those activities that on their completion will result in the
offer of a new institutional health service or the incurring of  a financial obligation, as defined under
applicable state law, in relation to the offering of such a health service.
(6) “Distant-site hospital” means  the hospital where a telemedicine provider, at the time the
telemedicine provider is providing telemedicine services, is practicing  as an employee or under
contract.
(7) “Essential long term care facility” means an individual long term care facility  that serves
predominantly rural and frontier communities, as designated by the Office  of Rural Health, and
meets other criteria established by the Department of Human Services by rule.
(8) “Expenditure” or “capital expenditure” means the actual expenditure, an obligation to  an
[55]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
expenditure, lease or similar arrangement  in lieu of an expenditure, and the reasonable value of a
donation or grant in lieu of an expenditure but not including any interest thereon.
(9) “Freestanding  birthing center” means a facility licensed for the primary purpose of per-
forming low risk deliveries.
(10) “Governmental unit” means the state, or any county, municipality or  other political subdi-
vision, or any related department, division, board or other agency.
(11) “Gross revenue” means the sum of daily hospital service charges,  ambulatory service
charges, ancillary service charges and other operating revenue. “Gross revenue” does not include
contributions, donations, legacies or bequests made to a hospital without restriction by the donors.
(12)(a) “Health care facility” means:
(A) A hospital;
(B) A long term care facility;
(C) An ambulatory surgical center;
(D) A freestanding birthing center; or
(E) An outpatient renal dialysis center.
(b) “Health care facility” does not mean:
(A) A residential facility licensed by the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 443.415;
(B) An establishment furnishing primarily domiciliary care as described in ORS 443.205;
(C) A residential facility licensed or approved under the rules of the Department of Corrections;
(D) Facilities established by ORS 430.335 for treatment of substance abuse disorders; or
(E) Community mental health  programs or community developmental disabilities programs es-
tablished under ORS 430.620.
(13) “Health maintenance organization” or “HMO” means a public organization or a  private
organization organized under the laws of any state that:
(a) Is a qualified HMO under section 1310 (d) of the U.S. Public Health Services Act; or
(b)(A) Provides or otherwise makes available  to enrolled participants health care services, in-
cluding at least the following basic health care services:
(i) Usual physician services;
(ii) Hospitalization;
(iii) Laboratory;
(iv) X-ray;
(v) Emergency and preventive services; and
(vi) Out-of-area coverage;
(B) Is compensated,  except for copayments, for the provision of the basic health care services
listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph to enrolled participants on  a predetermined periodic
rate basis; and
(C) Provides physicians’ services primarily directly  through physicians who are either employees
or partners of such organization,  or through arrangements with individual physicians or one or more
groups of physicians organized on a group practice or individual practice basis.
(14) “Health services” means clinically related  diagnostic, treatment or rehabilitative services,
and includes alcohol, drug or controlled substance abuse and mental  health services that may be
provided either directly or indirectly on an inpatient or ambulatory patient basis.
(15) “Hospital” means:
(a) A facility with an organized medical staff and a permanent building  that is capable of pro-
[56]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
viding 24-hour inpatient care to two or more individuals who  have an illness or injury and that
provides at least the following health services:
(A) Medical;
(B) Nursing;
(C) Laboratory;
(D) Pharmacy; and
(E) Dietary; or
(b) A special inpatient care facility as that term is defined by the authority by rule.
(16) “Institutional health services” means health services  provided in or through health care
facilities and includes the entities in or through which such services are provided.
(17) “Intermediate care facility” means a facility  that provides, on a regular basis, health-related
care and services to individuals who do not require the degree of care  and treatment that a hospital
or skilled  nursing facility is designed to provide, but who because of their mental or physical con-
dition require care and services above the level  of room and board that can be made available to
them only through institutional facilities.
(18)(a) “Long term care facility” means a permanent facility with inpatient beds, providing:
(A) Medical services,  including nursing services but excluding surgical procedures except as
may be permitted by the rules of the Director of Human Services; and
(B) Treatment for two or more unrelated patients.
(b) “Long term care facility” includes  skilled nursing facilities and intermediate care facilities
but does not include facilities licensed and operated pursuant to ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
[(19) “New hospital” means: ]
[(a) A facility that did not offer hospital services on a regular basis within its service area within
the prior 12-month period and is initiating or proposing to initiate such services; or ]
[(b) Any replacement of an existing hospital that involves a substantial increase or change in the
services  offered. ]
[(20)] (19) “New skilled nursing or intermediate care service  or facility” means a service or fa-
cility that did not offer long term care services on a regular basis by or  through the facility within
the prior 12-month period and is initiating  or proposing to initiate such services. “New skilled
nursing or intermediate care service  or facility” also includes the rebuilding of a long term care
facility, the relocation of buildings that are a part of a  long term care facility, the relocation of long
term care beds from one  facility to another or an increase in the number of beds of more than 10
or 10 percent of the bed capacity, whichever is the lesser, within a two-year period in  a facility that
applied for a certificate of need between August 1, 2011,  and December 1, 2012, or submitted a letter
of intent under ORS 442.315 (7) between January 15, 2013, and January 31, 2013.
[(21)] (20)  “Offer” means that the health care facility holds itself out as capable  of providing,
or as having the means for the provision of, specified health services.
[(22)] (21)  “Originating-site hospital” means a hospital in which  a patient is located while re-
ceiving telemedicine services.
[(23)] (22) “Outpatient renal  dialysis facility” means a facility that provides renal dialysis ser-
vices directly to outpatients.
[(24)] (23) “Person” means an  individual, a trust or estate, a partnership, a corporation (includ-
ing associations, joint stock companies and insurance companies), a state, or a  political subdivision
or instrumentality, including a municipal corporation, of a state.
[(25)] (24) “Skilled nursing facility” means a facility or a distinct part of a facility, that is pri-
[57]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
marily engaged in providing to inpatients skilled nursing care and  related services for patients who
require medical or nursing care, or an institution that provides  rehabilitation services for the re-
habilitation of individuals who are injured or sick or who have disabilities.
[(26)] (25) “Telemedicine” means the provision of health services to patients by physicians and
health care practitioners from a distance using electronic communications.
SECTION 70.  ORS 442.015, as amended by  section 22, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, is
amended to read:
442.015. As used in ORS chapter 441 and this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Acquire” or “acquisition” means obtaining equipment,  supplies, components or facilities by
any means, including purchase, capital or operating  lease, rental or donation, for the purpose of
using such equipment, supplies, components or  facilities to provide health services in Oregon. When
equipment or other materials are obtained  outside of this state, acquisition is considered to occur
when the equipment or other materials begin to be used in Oregon for the provision of  health ser-
vices or when such services are offered for use in Oregon.
(2) “Affected persons” has the same meaning as given to “party” in ORS 183.310.
(3)(a) “Ambulatory surgical  center” means a facility or portion of a facility that operates ex-
clusively  for  the purpose of providing surgical services to patients who do not require
hospitalization  and  for whom the expected duration of services does not exceed 24 hours following
admission.
(b) “Ambulatory surgical center” does not mean:
(A) Individual or group practice offices  of private physicians or dentists that do not contain a
distinct area used for outpatient surgical treatment on a regular and organized basis, or  that only
provide surgery routinely provided in a physician’s  or dentist’s office using local anesthesia or
conscious sedation; or
(B) A portion of a licensed hospital designated for outpatient surgical treatment.
(4) “Delegated credentialing agreement” means a written agreement  between an originating-site
hospital and a distant-site hospital that provides that the medical staff of the  originating-site hospi-
tal will rely upon the credentialing and  privileging decisions of the distant-site hospital in making
recommendations to the  governing body of the originating-site hospital as to whether to credential
a telemedicine provider, practicing at the distant-site hospital either as an employee or under  con-
tract, to provide telemedicine services to patients in the originating-site hospital.
(5) “Develop” means to undertake those activities that on their completion will result in  the
offer of a new institutional health service or the incurring of  a financial obligation, as defined under
applicable state law, in relation to the offering of such a health service.
(6) “Distant-site hospital” means the hospital where a telemedicine provider, at  the time the
telemedicine provider is providing telemedicine services,  is practicing as an employee or under
contract.
(7) “Expenditure”  or “capital expenditure” means the actual expenditure, an obligation to an
expenditure, lease or similar arrangement in lieu of an expenditure, and the  reasonable value of a
donation or grant in lieu of an expenditure but not including any interest thereon.
(8) “Freestanding birthing center” means a facility licensed for the primary purpose of  per-
forming low risk deliveries.
(9) “Governmental unit” means the state, or any county, municipality or other political subdi-
vision, or any related department, division, board or other agency.
(10) “Gross revenue”  means the sum of daily hospital service charges, ambulatory service
[58]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
charges, ancillary service charges and other operating revenue. “Gross revenue” does not include
contributions, donations, legacies or bequests made to a hospital without restriction by the donors.
(11)(a) “Health care facility” means:
(A) A hospital;
(B) A long term care facility;
(C) An ambulatory surgical center;
(D) A freestanding birthing center; or
(E) An outpatient renal dialysis center.
(b) “Health care facility” does not mean:
(A) A residential facility licensed by the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 443.415;
(B) An establishment furnishing primarily domiciliary care as described in ORS 443.205;
(C) A residential facility licensed or approved under the rules of the Department of Corrections;
(D) Facilities established by ORS 430.335 for treatment of substance abuse disorders; or
(E) Community mental health  programs or community developmental disabilities programs es-
tablished under ORS 430.620.
(12) “Health maintenance organization” or “HMO” means a public organization or a  private
organization organized under the laws of any state that:
(a) Is a qualified HMO under section 1310 (d) of the U.S. Public Health Services Act; or
(b)(A) Provides or otherwise makes available  to enrolled participants health care services, in-
cluding at least the following basic health care services:
(i) Usual physician services;
(ii) Hospitalization;
(iii) Laboratory;
(iv) X-ray;
(v) Emergency and preventive services; and
(vi) Out-of-area coverage;
(B) Is compensated,  except for copayments, for the provision of the basic health care services
listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph to enrolled participants on  a predetermined periodic
rate basis; and
(C) Provides physicians’ services primarily directly  through physicians who are either employees
or partners of such organization,  or through arrangements with individual physicians or one or more
groups of physicians organized on a group practice or individual practice basis.
(13) “Health services” means clinically related  diagnostic, treatment or rehabilitative services,
and includes alcohol, drug or controlled substance abuse and mental  health services that may be
provided either directly or indirectly on an inpatient or ambulatory patient basis.
(14) “Hospital” means:
(a) A facility with an organized medical staff and a permanent building  that is capable of pro-
viding 24-hour inpatient care to two or more individuals who  have an illness or injury and that
provides at least the following health services:
(A) Medical;
(B) Nursing;
(C) Laboratory;
(D) Pharmacy; and
(E) Dietary; or
[59]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A special inpatient care facility as that term is defined by the authority by rule.
(15) “Institutional health services” means health services  provided in or through health care
facilities and includes the entities in or through which such services are provided.
(16) “Intermediate care facility” means a facility  that provides, on a regular basis, health-related
care and services to individuals who do not require the degree of care  and treatment that a hospital
or skilled  nursing facility is designed to provide, but who because of their mental or physical con-
dition require care and services above the level  of room and board that can be made available to
them only through institutional facilities.
(17)(a) “Long term care facility” means a permanent facility with inpatient beds, providing:
(A) Medical services,  including nursing services but excluding surgical procedures except as
may be permitted by the rules of the Director of Human Services; and
(B) Treatment for two or more unrelated patients.
(b) “Long term care facility” includes  skilled nursing facilities and intermediate care facilities
but does not include facilities licensed and operated pursuant to ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
[(18) “New hospital” means: ]
[(a) A facility that did not offer hospital services on a regular basis within its service area within
the prior 12-month period and is initiating or proposing to initiate such services; or ]
[(b) Any replacement of an existing hospital that involves a substantial increase or change in the
services  offered. ]
[(19)] (18) “New skilled nursing or intermediate care service  or facility” means a service or fa-
cility that did not offer long term care services on a regular basis by or  through the facility within
the prior 12-month period and is initiating  or proposing to initiate such services. “New skilled
nursing or intermediate care service  or facility” also includes the rebuilding of a long term care
facility, the relocation of buildings that are a part of a  long term care facility, the relocation of long
term care beds from one  facility to another or an increase in the number of beds of more than 10
or 10 percent of the bed capacity, whichever is the lesser, within a two-year period.
[(20)] (19)  “Offer” means that the health care facility holds itself out as capable  of providing,
or as having the means for the provision of, specified health services.
[(21)] (20)  “Originating-site hospital” means a hospital in which  a patient is located while re-
ceiving telemedicine services.
[(22)] (21) “Outpatient renal  dialysis facility” means a facility that provides renal dialysis ser-
vices directly to outpatients.
[(23)] (22) “Person” means an  individual, a trust or estate, a partnership, a corporation (includ-
ing associations, joint stock companies and insurance companies), a state, or a  political subdivision
or instrumentality, including a municipal corporation, of a state.
[(24)] (23) “Skilled nursing facility” means a facility or a distinct part of a facility, that is pri-
marily engaged in providing to inpatients skilled nursing care and  related services for patients who
require medical or nursing care, or an institution that provides  rehabilitation services for the re-
habilitation of individuals who are injured or sick or who have disabilities.
[(25)] (24) “Telemedicine” means the provision of health services to patients by physicians and
health care practitioners from a distance using electronic communications.
SECTION 71.
 ORS 479.210, as amended by section 51,  chapter 106, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
479.210. As used in ORS  479.215 to 479.220, unless the context requires otherwise, “institution”
means:
[60]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) A child-caring facility that provides residential care and that receives state aid under  ORS
412.001 to 412.161, 418.005 to  418.025, 418.205 to 418.327, 418.470, 418.475, 418.625 to 418.685, 418.647
and 418.950 to 418.970;
(2) An inpatient care facility required to be licensed under ORS 441.015  to 441.087, 441.525 to
441.595, 441.815, 441.820, 441.990[, 442.342, 442.344] and 442.400 to 442.463; or
(3) A residential facility subject to licensure under ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
SECTION 72.
 ORS 677.450 is amended to read:
677.450. The Oregon  Medical Board may release information received under ORS 441.820 con-
cerning the revocation or restriction of a physician’s activities at a health care facility to  any other
health care  facility licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.087, 441.525 to 441.595, 441.815, 441.820,
441.990[, 442.342, 442.344 ] and 442.400 to 442.463  at which that physician holds or has applied for
staff privileges or other right to practice medicine or podiatry at the facility.
SECTION 73.  ORS 742.400 is amended to read:
742.400. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Claim” means a written demand for payment from or on behalf of a covered  practitioner for
an injury  alleged to have been caused by professional negligence that is made in a complaint filed
with a court of appropriate jurisdiction.
(b) “Covered practitioner” means a  chiropractic physician, physician or physician assistant li-
censed under ORS chapter 677, nurse practitioner, optometrist, dentist, dental hygienist or
naturopath.
(c) “Disposition of a claim” means:
(A) A judgment or award against the covered practitioner by a court, a jury or an arbitrator;
(B) A withdrawal or dismissal of the claim; or
(C) A settlement of the claim.
(d) “Reporter” means:
(A) A primary insurer;
(B) A public body required to defend, save harmless and indemnify an officer, employee or  agent
of the public body under ORS 30.260 to 30.300;
(C) An entity that self-insures or indemnifies for claims alleging  professional negligence on the
part of a covered practitioner; or
(D) A health maintenance organization as defined in ORS 750.005.
(2) Within 30 days after receiving notice of a claim, a reporter shall report the claim to the
appropriate board, as follows:
(a) The Oregon Medical Board if the covered practitioner is a physician  or physician assistant
licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(b) The Oregon State Board of Nursing if the covered practitioner is a nurse practitioner;
(c) The Oregon Board of Optometry if the covered practitioner is an optometrist;
(d) The Oregon Board of Dentistry if the covered practitioner is a dentist or dental hygienist;
(e) The Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine if the covered practitioner is a naturopath; or
(f) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners if  the covered practitioner is a chiropractic
physician.
(3) The report required under subsection (2) of this section shall include:
(a) The name of the covered practitioner;
(b) The name of the person that filed the claim;
(c) The date on which the claim was filed; and
[61]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) The reason or reasons for the claim, except that the report may not disclose  any data that
is privileged under ORS 41.675.
(4) Within 30 days after the date of an action taken in  disposition of a claim, a reporter shall
notify the appropriate board identified in subsection (2) of this section of the disposition.
(5)(a) A board that receives a report of a claim under  this section shall publicly post the report
on the board’s website  if the claim results in a judicial finding or admission of liability or a money
judgment, award or settlement that involves  a payment to the claimant. The board may not publicly
post information about claims that did not result  in a judicial finding or admission of liability or a
money judgment, award or settlement that involves a payment to the  claimant but shall make the
information available to the public upon request.
(b) If a board discloses information about a claim that is the subject of a report  received under
this section, the board shall indicate in the disclosure whether the claim resulted in a judicial
finding or an admission of liability or a money judgment, an award  or a settlement that involves a
payment to the claimant. A board may not  publicly disclose or publish any allegations or factual
assertions included in the claim unless the complaint resulted in  a judicial finding or an admission
of liability or a money judgment, an  award or a settlement that involves a payment to the claimant.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, “judicial finding” means a finding of liability by a court,  a
jury or an arbitrator.
(6) A board that receives a report  under this section shall provide copies of the report to each
health care  facility licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.087, 441.525 to 441.595, 441.815, 441.820,
441.990, [442.342, 442.344] and 442.400 to 442.463 that employs or grants staff privileges to  the cov-
ered practitioner.
(7) A person that reports in good faith concerning any matter  required to be reported under this
section is immune from civil liability by reason of making the report.
SECTION 74.
 ORS 743A.001 is amended to read:
743A.001. (1) [ Except as  provided in subsection (4) of this section, ] Any statute described in sub-
section (2) of this section :
(a) That becomes effective on or after July 13, 1985,  is repealed on the sixth anniversary of the
effective date of the statute, unless the Legislative Assembly specifically provides otherwise[ .]; and
(b) Does not apply to any  insurer with respect to services covered in the Health Care for
All Oregon Plan.
(2) This section governs any statute that applies to individual  or group health insurance policies
and does any of the following:
(a) Requires  the insurer to include coverage for specific physical or mental conditions or specific
hospital, medical, surgical or dental health services.
(b) Requires the insurer to include coverage for specified persons.
(c) Requires the insurer to provide payment or reimbursement to specified providers  of services
if the services are within the lawful scope of practice of the provider and the insurance policy pro-
vides payment or reimbursement for those services.
(d) Requires the insurer to provide any specific coverage on a nondiscriminatory basis.
(e) Forbids the insurer to exclude from payment or reimbursement any covered services.
(f) Forbids the insurer  to exclude coverage of a person because of that person’s medical history.
(3) A repeal of a statute under subsection (1) (a) of this section does not  apply to any insurance
policy in effect  on the effective date of the repeal. However, the repeal of the statute applies to a
renewal or extension of an existing insurance policy  on or after the effective date of the repealer
[62]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
as well as to a new policy issued on or after the effective date of the repealer.
(4) [ This section ] Subsection (1)(a) of this section  does not apply to ORS 743A.020, 743A.080,
743A.100, 743A.104 and 743A.108.
SECTION 75.  ORS 743A.012 is amended to read:
743A.012. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Emergency medical condition” means a medical condition:
(A) That manifests itself by acute symptoms  of sufficient severity, including severe pain, that a
prudent layperson possessing an average knowledge of health and  medicine would reasonably expect
that failure to receive immediate medical attention would:
(i) Place the health of a person, or an unborn  child in the case of a pregnant woman, in serious
jeopardy;
(ii) Result in serious impairment to bodily functions; or
(iii) Result in serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part; or
(B) With respect to a pregnant woman who is  having contractions, for which there is inadequate
time to effect a safe transfer to another hospital before delivery or for  which a transfer may pose
a threat to the health or safety of the woman or the unborn child.
(b) “Emergency medical screening exam” means  the medical history, examination, ancillary tests
and medical determinations required to ascertain the nature and extent  of an emergency medical
condition.
(c) “Emergency services” means, with respect to an emergency medical condition:
(A) An emergency medical  screening exam that is within the capability of the emergency de-
partment of  a hospital, including ancillary services routinely available to the emergency department
to evaluate such emergency medical condition; and
(B) Such further medical examination and treatment as are required under 42  U.S.C. 1395dd to
stabilize a patient, to the extent the examination and treatment are  within the capability of the staff
and facilities available at a hospital.
(d) “Grandfathered health plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(e) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(f) “Prior authorization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.001.
(g) “Stabilize” means to provide medical treatment as necessary to:
(A) Ensure that, within reasonable medical probability, no material deterioration  of an emer-
gency medical condition is likely to occur during or  to result from the transfer of the patient from
a facility; and
(B) With respect to a pregnant woman  who is in active labor, to perform the delivery, including
the delivery of the placenta.
(2) All  insurers offering a health benefit plan shall provide coverage without prior authorization
for emergency services.
(3) Except as provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act,  a  health benefit plan, other than a
grandfathered health plan, must provide coverage required by subsection (2) of this section:
(a) For the services of participating providers, without regard to any term  or condition of cov-
erage other than:
(A) The coordination of benefits;
(B) An affiliation period or waiting period permitted under  part 7 of the Employee Retirement
Income Security Act, part A of Title  XXVII of the Public Health Service Act or chapter 100 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
[63]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) An exclusion other than an exclusion of emergency services; or
(D) Applicable cost-sharing; and
(b) For the services of a nonparticipating provider:
(A) Without imposing  any administrative requirement or limitation on coverage that is more
restrictive than requirements or limitations that apply to participating providers;
(B) Without imposing a copayment amount or coinsurance rate  that exceeds the amount or rate
for participating providers;
(C) Without imposing a deductible,  unless the deductible applies generally to nonparticipating
providers; and
(D) Subject only to an out-of-pocket maximum that applies to all services  from nonparticipating
providers.
(4) All insurers offering a health benefit plan shall provide information to enrollees  in plain
language regarding:
(a) What constitutes an emergency medical condition;
(b) The coverage provided for emergency services;
(c) How and where to obtain emergency services; and
(d) The appropriate use of 9-1-1.
(5) An insurer offering a health benefit plan may not discourage appropriate  use of 9-1-1 and
may not deny coverage for emergency services solely because 9-1-1 was used.
(6) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 76.
 ORS 743A.063 is amended to read:
743A.063. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act,  a prescription drug benefit
program, or a prescription drug benefit offered under a health benefit plan as defined in  ORS
743B.005, must provide for  reimbursement for up to a 90-day supply of a prescription drug dispensed
by a pharmacy, as defined in ORS 689.005, if:
(a) The prescription drug is covered by the program or plan;
(b) An initial 30-day supply of  the prescription drug has been previously dispensed to the pro-
gram or plan member; and
(c) The quantity of the prescription drug dispensed does not exceed the total  remaining quantity
of the prescription drug that the prescribing practitioner authorized to  be dispensed through refills.
(2) The coverage required by subsection (1) of this section may  be limited by the terms and
conditions of a pharmacy network contract, or a prescription drug benefit program or health  benefit
plan, that are related to the reimbursement rate of the prescription drug.
(3) The coverage required by subsection  (1) of this section may be limited by formulary re-
strictions that are related to the prescription drug.
(4) This section does not apply to  the reimbursement of prescription drugs classified as a con-
trolled substance in Schedule II.
(5) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 77.
 ORS 743A.070 is amended to read:
743A.070. (1) Except as provided in  section 5 of this 2017 Act,  all policies providing health
insurance, as  defined in ORS 731.162, except those policies whose coverage is limited to expenses
from accidents  or specific diseases that are unrelated to the coverage required by this section, shall
include coverage for a nonprescription elemental enteral formula  for home use, if the formula is
medically necessary for the treatment of severe intestinal malabsorption and  a physician has issued
a written order for  the formula and the formula comprises the sole source, or an essential source,
[64]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of nutrition.
(2) The  coverage required by subsection (1) of this section may be made subject to provisions
of the policy that  apply to other benefits under the policy including, but not limited to, provisions
related to deductibles and coinsurance. Deductibles and coinsurance  for elemental enteral formulas
shall be no greater than those for any other treatment for the condition under the policy.
(3) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 78.
 ORS 743A.080 is amended to read:
743A.080. (1)  As used in this section, “pregnancy care” means the care necessary to support a
healthy pregnancy and care related to labor and delivery.
(2) Except as provided in section 5 of  this 2017 Act,  all health benefit plans as defined in
ORS 743B.005 must provide payment or  reimbursement for expenses associated with pregnancy care
and childbirth. Benefits provided under this section shall  be extended to all enrollees, enrolled
spouses and enrolled dependents.
SECTION 79.  ORS 743A.100 is amended to read:
743A.100. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act,  every health insurance  policy
that covers hospital, medical or surgical expenses, other  than coverage limited to expenses from
accidents or specific diseases, shall provide coverage of mammograms as follows:
(a) Mammograms  for the purpose of diagnosis in symptomatic or high-risk women at any time
upon referral of the woman’s health care provider; and
(b) An annual mammogram for the purpose of early detection for a  woman 40 years of age or
older, with or without referral from the woman’s health care provider.
(2) An insurance policy  described in subsection (1) of this section must not limit coverage of
mammograms to the schedule provided in subsection (1) of this section if the  woman is determined
by her health care provider to be at high risk for breast cancer.
SECTION 80.  ORS 743A.104 is amended to read:
743A.104. Except as provided in section  5 of this 2017 Act,  all policies providing health in-
surance, except those policies whose coverage  is limited to expenses from accidents or specific dis-
eases that are unrelated to the coverage required by  this section, shall include coverage for pelvic
examinations and Pap smear examinations as follows:
(1) Annually for women 18 to 64 years of age; and
(2) At any time upon referral of the woman’s health care provider.
SECTION 81.
 ORS 743A.105 is amended to read:
743A.105. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act,  all health  benefit plans, as
defined in ORS  743B.005, shall include coverage of the human papillomavirus vaccine for female
beneficiaries  under  the health benefit plan who are at least 11 years of age but no older than 26
years of age.
(2) ORS 743A.001 does not apply to this section.
SECTION 82.
 ORS 743A.108 is amended to read:
743A.108. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of  this 2017 Act,  a health insurance policy that
covers  hospital,  medical or surgical expenses, other than coverage limited to expenses from acci-
dents or specific diseases, shall provide coverage for a  complete and thorough physical examination
of the breast, including but not limited to a clinical breast  examination, performed by a health care
provider to check for lumps and other changes for the purpose of early detection and  prevention of
breast cancer as follows:
(a) Annually for women 18 years of age and older; and
[65]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) At any time at the recommendation of the woman’s health care provider.
(2) An insurance policy must provide coverage of physical examinations of the  breast as de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this  section regardless of whether a health care provider performs other
preventative women’s health examinations or makes a referral for other preventative women’s health
examinations at the same time the health care provider performs the breast examination.
(3) This  section applies to health care service contractors, as defined in ORS 750.005, and trusts
carrying out a multiple employer welfare arrangement, as defined in ORS 750.301.
SECTION 83.
 ORS 743A.110 is amended to read:
743A.110. (1)  As used in this section, “mastectomy” means the surgical removal of all or part
of a breast or a breast tumor suspected to be malignant.
(2) Except as provided in section 5 of this  2017 Act,  all insurers offering a health benefit plan
as defined in  ORS 743B.005 shall provide payment, coverage or reimbursement for mastectomy and
for the following  services related to a mastectomy as determined by the attending physician and
enrollee to be part of the enrollee’s course or plan of treatment:
(a) All  stages of reconstruction of the breast on which a mastectomy was performed, including
but not limited to nipple reconstruction, skin grafts and stippling of the nipple and areola;
(b) Surgery and reconstruction of the other breast to produce a symmetrical appearance;
(c) Prostheses;
(d) Treatment of physical complications of the mastectomy, including lymphedemas; and
(e) Inpatient care related to the mastectomy and post-mastectomy services.
(3) An insurer providing coverage under subsection (2) of  this section shall provide written no-
tice describing the coverage to the enrollee  at the time of enrollment in the health benefit plan and
annually thereafter.
(4) A health benefit plan must provide  a single determination of prior authorization for all ser-
vices related to a mastectomy covered under subsection (2) of  this section that are part of the
enrollee’s course or plan of treatment.
(5) When an enrollee requests an external review of an adverse benefit determination as defined
in ORS 743B.001 by the insurer regarding services described in subsection  (2) of this section, the
insurer or the  Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services must expedite the
enrollee’s case pursuant to ORS 743B.252 (5).
(6) The coverage required under subsection (2) of this section  is subject to the same terms and
conditions in the plan that apply to other benefits under the plan.
(7) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 84.
 ORS 743A.120 is amended to read:
743A.120. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act,  an  insurer offering a health
insurance  policy  that covers hospital, medical or surgical expenses, other than coverage limited to
expenses from  accidents or specific diseases, shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening
examinations including a digital rectal examination and a prostate-specific antigen test:
(a) For men who are 50 years of age or older biennially or as determined by the treating  phy-
sician; and
(b) For men younger  than 50 years of age who are at high risk for prostate cancer as determined
by the treating physician, including African-American men and men with a family medical history
of prostate cancer.
(2) Health care service contractors, as defined in ORS 750.005, and trusts carrying out a multiple
employer welfare arrangement,  as defined in ORS 750.301, are subject to subsection (1) of this sec-
[66]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion.
SECTION 85.  ORS 743A.124, as amended by section 1, chapter 206, Oregon Laws  2015, is
amended to read:
743A.124. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this  2017 Act,  a health benefit plan, as de-
fined in ORS 743B.005, shall provide  coverage for all colorectal cancer screening examinations and
laboratory tests assigned either a grade of A  or a grade of B by the United States Preventive Ser-
vices Task Force.
(2) If an insured is 50 years of age or older, an insurer may not impose cost sharing on the
coverage required by subsection (1) of this section and the coverage shall include, at a minimum:
(a)(A) Fecal occult blood tests;
(B) Colonoscopies, including the removal of polyps during a screening procedure; or
(C) Double contrast barium enemas; and
(b) A colonoscopy, including the removal of polyps during the procedure, if the  insured has a
positive result on any fecal test assigned either a grade of  A or a grade of B by the United States
Preventive Services Task Force.
(3) If an insured  is at high risk for colorectal cancer, the coverage required by subsection (1)
of this  section shall include colorectal cancer screening examinations and laboratory tests as re-
commended by the treating physician.
(4) For the purposes of subsection (3) of this section, an individual is  at high risk for colorectal
cancer if the individual has:
(a) A family medical history of colorectal cancer;
(b) A prior occurrence of cancer or precursor neoplastic polyps;
(c) A prior  occurrence of a chronic digestive disease condition such as inflammatory bowel dis-
ease, Crohn’s disease or ulcerative colitis; or
(d) Other predisposing factors.
(5) Subsection (2)(b) of this section does not apply to a high deductible health plan  described in
26 U.S.C. 223.
SECTION 86.
 ORS 743A.141 is amended to read:
743A.141. (1) As used in this section,  “hearing aid” means any nondisposable, wearable instru-
ment or device designed to aid or compensate for impaired human hearing and any  necessary ear
mold, part, attachments or accessory for the instrument or device, except batteries and cords.
(2) Except as provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act,  a  health benefit plan, as defined in ORS
743B.005, shall provide payment, coverage  or reimbursement for one hearing aid per hearing im-
paired ear if:
(a) Prescribed, fitted and dispensed by  a licensed audiologist with the approval of a licensed
physician; and
(b) Medically necessary for the treatment of hearing loss in an enrollee in the plan who is:
(A) 18 years of age or younger; or
(B) 19 to 25 years of age and enrolled in a secondary school or an accredited educational  in-
stitution.
(3)(a) The maximum benefit amount required by this section is $4,000 every  48 months, but a
health benefit plan may offer a benefit  that is more favorable to the enrollee. An insurer shall adjust
the benefit amount on  January 1 of each year to reflect the increase since January 1, 2010, in the
U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for All Urban  Consumers for medical care as published by
the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
[67]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) An insurer may not impose  any financial or contractual penalty upon an audiologist if an
enrollee elects to purchase a hearing aid priced higher than the benefit amount  by paying the dif-
ference between the benefit amount and the price of the hearing aid.
(4) The payment, coverage  or reimbursement required under this section may be subject to
provisions  of  the health benefit plan that apply to other durable medical equipment benefits covered
by the plan, including but not limited to provisions relating to deductibles,  coinsurance and prior
authorization.
(5) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 87.
 ORS 743A.144, as amended by section 4, chapter 11, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
743A.144. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act,  all  individual and group health
insurance policies providing coverage for hospital, medical  or surgical expenses, other than limited
benefit coverage, shall include coverage for prosthetic and  orthotic devices that are medically nec-
essary to restore or maintain the ability to complete activities of  daily living or essential job-related
activities and that are not  solely for comfort or convenience. The coverage required by this sub-
section includes all services and supplies medically necessary for the effective use of  a prosthetic
or orthotic device,  including formulating its design, fabrication, material and component selection,
measurements, fittings, static  and dynamic alignments, and instructing the patient in the use of the
device.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Orthotic  device” means a rigid or semirigid device supporting a weak or deformed leg, foot,
arm, hand, back or  neck, or restricting or eliminating motion in a diseased or injured leg, foot, arm,
hand, back or neck.
(b) “Prosthetic device” means an artificial limb device or appliance  designed to replace in whole
or in part an arm or a leg.
(3) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall adopt  and annually
update rules listing the prosthetic and orthotic devices covered under this  section. The list shall be
no more restrictive than the list of  prosthetic and orthotic devices and supplies in the Medicare fee
schedule for Durable Medical Equipment, Prosthetics, Orthotics and Supplies, but only to the extent
consistent with this section.
(4) The  coverage required by subsection (1) of this section may be made subject to, and no more
restrictive than, the provisions of a health insurance policy that apply to  other benefits under the
policy.
(5) The coverage  required by subsection (1) of this section shall include any repair or replace-
ment of  a prosthetic or orthotic device that is determined medically necessary to restore or maintain
the ability to complete activities of daily living or essential job-related activities and that is  not
solely for comfort or convenience.
(6) If coverage under subsection (1) of this section is provided through a managed care plan,  the
insured shall have access to medically necessary clinical care and  to prosthetic and orthotic devices
and technology from not less than two distinct Oregon  prosthetic and orthotic providers in the
managed care plan’s provider network.
SECTION 88.
 ORS 743A.148, as amended by section 5, chapter 11, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
743A.148. (1) The Legislative Assembly declares that all  group health insurance policies pro-
viding hospital,  medical or surgical expense benefits, other than limited benefit coverage, include
[68]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
coverage for maxillofacial prosthetic services considered necessary for adjunctive treatment  unless
the coverage is available through the Health Care for All Oregon Plan .
(2) As used  in this section, “maxillofacial prosthetic services considered necessary for adjunctive
treatment” means restoration and management of head and  facial structures that cannot be replaced
with living tissue and that are defective  because of disease, trauma or birth and developmental
deformities when such restoration and management are performed for the purpose of:
(a) Controlling or eliminating infection;
(b) Controlling or eliminating pain; or
(c) Restoring facial configuration or functions such as speech, swallowing  or chewing but not
including cosmetic procedures rendered to improve on the normal range of conditions.
(3) The coverage required by subsection (1) of this section may be made subject to  provisions
of the policy that apply to other benefits under the policy including, but not  limited to, provisions
relating to deductibles and coinsurance.
(4) The services described in this section shall  apply to individual health policies entered into
or renewed on or after January 1, 1982.
SECTION 89.
 ORS 743A.160, as amended by section 6, chapter 11, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
743A.160. Except as provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act,  a health insurance policy provid-
ing coverage for hospital or medical expenses, other than limited benefit  coverage, shall provide, at
the request of the applicant, coverage for  expenses arising from treatment for alcoholism. The fol-
lowing conditions apply to the requirement for such coverage:
(1) The applicant shall be informed of the applicant’s option to request this coverage.
(2) The inclusion of the  coverage may be made subject to the insurer’s usual underwriting re-
quirements.
(3) The coverage may be made subject to provisions of the policy that  apply to other benefits
under the policy, including but not limited to provisions relating to deductibles and coinsurance.
(4) The policy may limit hospital expense coverage to treatment provided by  the following fa-
cilities:
(a) A health care facility licensed as required by ORS 441.015.
(b) A health care facility accredited by the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals.
(5) Except as permitted by subsection (3) of this  section, the policy shall not limit payments
thereunder for alcoholism to an amount less than $4,500 in any 24-consecutive month period and  the
policy shall provide coverage, within the limits of  this subsection, of not less than 80 percent of the
hospital and medical expenses for treatment for alcoholism.
SECTION 90.
 ORS 743A.168, as amended by section 7, chapter 11, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
743A.168. Except as  provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act,  a group health insurance policy
providing coverage for hospital or medical expenses, other  than limited benefit coverage, shall pro-
vide coverage for expenses arising from treatment for  chemical dependency, including alcoholism,
and for mental or nervous conditions at the same level as, and subject to limitations no more  re-
strictive than, those imposed on coverage or reimbursement of expenses  arising from treatment for
other medical conditions. The following apply to coverage for chemical dependency and for mental
or nervous conditions:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Chemical dependency” means the addictive relationship with any  drug or alcohol charac-
[69]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
terized by a physical or psychological relationship, or both, that interferes on  a recurring basis with
the individual’s  social, psychological or physical adjustment to common problems. For purposes of
this section, “chemical dependency” does not include addiction  to, or dependency on, tobacco, to-
bacco products or foods.
(b) “Facility” means a corporate or governmental entity or  other provider of services for the
treatment of chemical dependency or for the treatment of mental or nervous conditions.
(c) “Group health  insurer” means an insurer, a health maintenance organization or a health care
service contractor.
(d) “Program” means a particular type or level of service that  is organizationally distinct within
a facility.
(e) “Provider” means a person that:
(A) Has met the credentialing requirement of a group health insurer, is otherwise eligible to
receive reimbursement for coverage under the policy and is:
(i) A health facility as defined in ORS 430.010;
(ii) A residential facility as defined in ORS 430.010;
(iii) A day or partial hospitalization program as defined in ORS 430.010;
(iv) An outpatient service as defined in ORS 430.010; or
(v) An  individual behavioral health or medical professional licensed or certified under Oregon
law; or
(B) Is a provider  organization certified by the Oregon Health Authority under subsection (13)
of this section.
(2) The coverage may be  made subject to provisions of the policy that apply to other benefits
under the policy, including  but not limited to provisions relating to deductibles and coinsurance.
Deductibles and coinsurance for treatment in health facilities or residential facilities may not be
greater than those under the policy for expenses of hospitalization in the  treatment of other medical
conditions. Deductibles and coinsurance for  outpatient treatment may not be greater than those
under the policy for expenses of outpatient treatment of other medical conditions.
(3) The coverage may not be made subject  to treatment limitations, limits on total payments for
treatment, limits on duration of treatment  or financial requirements unless similar limitations or
requirements are  imposed on coverage of other medical conditions. The coverage of eligible expenses
may be limited to  treatment that is medically necessary as determined under the policy for other
medical conditions.
(4)(a) Nothing in this section requires coverage for:
(A) Educational or  correctional services or sheltered living provided by a school or halfway
house;
(B) A long-term residential mental health program that lasts longer than 45 days;
(C) Psychoanalysis or psychotherapy received as part of  an educational or training program,
regardless of diagnosis or symptoms that may be present; or
(D) A court-ordered sex offender treatment program.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(A) of  this subsection, an insured may receive covered outpa-
tient services under the terms of  the insured’s policy while the insured is living temporarily in a
sheltered living situation.
(5) A provider is eligible for reimbursement under this section if:
(a) The provider is approved or certified by the Oregon Health Authority;
(b) The provider is accredited for the particular level of care for which reimbursement is  being
[70]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
requested by the Joint Commission  on Accreditation of Hospitals or the Commission on Accredi-
tation of Rehabilitation Facilities;
(c) The patient  is staying overnight at the facility and is involved in a structured program at
least eight hours per day, five days per week; or
(d) The provider is providing a covered benefit under the policy.
(6) Payments may not be made under this section for support groups.
(7) If specified in the policy, outpatient coverage may include follow-up  in-home service or out-
patient services. The policy may limit  coverage for in-home service to persons who are homebound
under the care of a physician.
(8) Nothing in this section prohibits a group health  insurer from managing the provision of
benefits through common methods, including but not limited  to selectively contracted panels, health
plan benefit differential designs, preadmission screening, prior authorization  of services, utilization
review or other mechanisms designed to limit  eligible expenses to those described in subsection (3)
of this section.
(9) The Legislative Assembly has found that health care cost containment is necessary  and in-
tends to encourage insurance policies designed to achieve cost  containment by ensuring that re-
imbursement is  limited to appropriate utilization under criteria incorporated into such policies,
either directly or by reference.
(10)(a) Subject to the patient or client confidentiality provisions of ORS 40.235 relating  to phy-
sicians, ORS 40.240 relating to nurse practitioners, ORS 40.230 relating to psychologists, ORS  40.250
and 675.580 relating to licensed clinical social workers and ORS 40.262 relating to licensed profes-
sional counselors and licensed marriage  and family therapists, a group health insurer may provide
for review for level of treatment of admissions and continued stays for treatment  in health facilities,
residential  facilities,  day or partial hospitalization programs and outpatient services by either group
health insurer staff or personnel under contract to  the group health insurer, or by a utilization re-
view contractor, who shall have the authority to certify for or deny level of payment.
(b) Review  shall be made according to criteria made available to providers in advance upon re-
quest.
(c) Review shall be performed by or under  the direction of a medical or osteopathic physician
licensed by the Oregon Medical Board, a  psychologist licensed by the State Board of Psychologist
Examiners, a clinical social worker licensed  by the State Board of Licensed Social Workers or a
professional counselor or marriage and family therapist licensed  by the Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors and Therapists, in accordance with standards  of the National Committee for
Quality Assurance or Medicare review standards of the  Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Ser-
vices.
(d) Review may involve  prior approval, concurrent review of the continuation of treatment,
post-treatment review or any  combination of these. However, if prior approval is required, provision
shall be made to allow for payment of urgent or  emergency admissions, subject to subsequent re-
view. If prior approval is not required, group health insurers shall  permit providers, policyholders
or persons acting on their behalf to  make advance inquiries regarding the appropriateness of a
particular admission to a treatment program. Group health insurers shall provide a  timely response
to such inquiries. Noncontracting providers must cooperate with  these procedures to the same ex-
tent as contracting providers to be eligible for reimbursement.
(11) Health maintenance organizations may limit the receipt of covered services by enrollees  to
services provided by  or upon referral by providers contracting with the health maintenance organ-
[71]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ization. Health maintenance organizations and health care service contractors may create substan-
tive plan benefit and reimbursement differentials at the same level as, and subject to limitations  no
more restrictive than, those imposed on coverage  or reimbursement of expenses arising out of other
medical conditions and apply them to contracting and noncontracting providers.
(12) Nothing in this section prevents a group health insurer  from contracting with providers of
health care services to furnish services to policyholders or certificate holders  according to ORS
743B.460 or 750.005, subject to the following conditions:
(a) A group health insurer is not required  to contract with all providers that are eligible for
reimbursement under this section.
(b) An insurer or health care service contractor shall,  subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, pay benefits toward the covered charges of noncontracting providers of services  for the
treatment of chemical dependency or mental or nervous conditions.  The insured shall, subject to
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, have the right to use the services of a noncontracting provider
of services for the treatment of chemical dependency or  mental or nervous conditions, whether or
not the services for chemical dependency or mental  or nervous conditions are provided by con-
tracting or noncontracting providers.
(13) The Oregon Health Authority  shall establish a process for the certification of an organiza-
tion described in subsection (1)(e)(B) of this section that:
(a) Is not otherwise subject to licensing or certification by the authority; and
(b) Does not contract with the authority, a subcontractor of  the authority or a community
mental health program.
(14) The  Oregon Health Authority shall adopt by rule standards for the certification provided
under subsection (13) of this section to ensure that a certified provider organization  offers a distinct
and specialized program for the treatment of mental or nervous conditions.
(15) The Oregon Health  Authority may adopt by rule an application fee or a certification fee,
or both, to be imposed on any provider organization that applies for certification under  subsection
(13) of this  section. Any fees collected shall be paid into the Oregon Health Authority Fund estab-
lished in ORS 413.101  and shall be used only for carrying out the provisions of subsection (13) of this
section.
(16) The intent of the Legislative Assembly in adopting  this section is to reserve benefits for
different types of care to encourage cost effective care  and to ensure continuing access to levels
of care most appropriate for the insured’s condition and progress. This section does not  prohibit an
insurer from requiring a provider organization certified by the Oregon Health Authority under sub-
section  (13)  of this section to meet the insurer’s credentialing requirements as a condition of enter-
ing into a contract.
(17) The Director of the Department of  Consumer and Business Services and the Oregon Health
Authority, after notice and  hearing, may adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section
that are considered necessary for the proper administration of this section.
SECTION 91.
 ORS 743A.170 is amended to read:
743A.170. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act,  a health benefit plan as defined
in ORS 743B.005 must provide payment, coverage or reimbursement of at  least $500 for a tobacco
use cessation program for a person enrolled in the plan who is 15 years of age or older.
(2) As used in this section, “tobacco use cessation program” means a program recommended by
a physician that follows the United States  Public Health Service guidelines for tobacco use cessa-
tion. “Tobacco use cessation program” includes education and  medical treatment components de-
[72]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
signed to assist a person in ceasing the use of tobacco products.
(3) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 92.
 ORS 743A.175 is amended to read:
743A.175. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this  2017 Act,  a health benefit plan, as de-
fined in ORS 743B.005, shall provide coverage  of medically necessary therapy and services for the
treatment of traumatic brain injury.
(2) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 93.
 ORS 743A.184 is amended to read:
743A.184. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act, and  subject to other terms,
conditions and benefits in the plan, group health  benefit plans as described in ORS 743B.005 shall
provide payment, coverage  or reimbursement for supplies, equipment and diabetes self-management
programs associated with the treatment of insulin-dependent diabetes, insulin-using  diabetes,
gestational diabetes and  noninsulin-using diabetes prescribed by a health care professional legally
authorized to prescribe such items.
(2) As used in this  section, “diabetes self-management program” means one program of assess-
ment and training after diagnosis and no more than three hours per year of assessment and  training
upon a material change of condition, medication or treatment that is provided by:
(a) An education program  credentialed or accredited by a state or national entity accrediting
such programs; or
(b) A program provided by a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677, a registered  nurse, a
nurse practitioner,  a certified diabetes educator or a licensed dietitian with demonstrated expertise
in diabetes.
SECTION 94.  ORS 743A.188 is amended to read:
743A.188. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act,  all  individual and group health
insurance policies providing coverage for hospital, medical or surgical expenses, other than coverage
limited to expenses from accidents or  specific diseases, shall include coverage for treatment of in-
born errors of metabolism that involve amino acid, carbohydrate and  fat metabolism and for which
medically standard methods of diagnosis, treatment and monitoring  exist, including quantification
of metabolites in blood, urine or spinal fluid or enzyme or  DNA confirmation in tissues. Coverage
shall include expenses of diagnosing, monitoring and  controlling the disorders by nutritional and
medical assessment, including but not limited to clinical visits,  biochemical analysis and medical
foods used in the treatment of such disorders.
(2) As used in this section, “medical foods” means foods that are formulated to be consumed  or
administered enterally under the supervision of a physician, as defined in ORS 677.010,  that are
specifically processed or formulated to be  deficient in one or more of the nutrients present in typical
nutritional counterparts, that are for  the medical and nutritional management of patients with lim-
ited capacity  to metabolize ordinary foodstuffs or certain nutrients contained therein or have other
specific nutrient requirements as established by medical evaluation and that are essential to  opti-
mize growth, health and metabolic homeostasis.
(3) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 95.
 ORS 743A.190 is amended to read:
743A.190. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of  this 2017 Act,  a health benefit plan, as de-
fined in ORS 743B.005, must cover for  a child enrolled in the plan who is under 18 years of age and
who has been diagnosed with a pervasive developmental disorder all medical services,  including re-
habilitation services, that are medically necessary and are otherwise covered under the plan.
[73]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The  coverage required under subsection (1) of this section, including rehabilitation services,
may be made subject to other provisions of the health benefit plan that apply  to covered services,
including but not limited to:
(a) Deductibles, copayments or coinsurance;
(b) Prior authorization or utilization review requirements; or
(c) Treatment limitations regarding the number of visits or the duration of treatment.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Medically necessary” means in accordance with the definition of medical necessity that is
specified in the policy, certificate or contract for the health benefit plan and that  applies uniformly
to all covered services under the health benefit plan.
(b) “Pervasive developmental disorder”  means a neurological condition that includes autism
spectrum disorder, developmental delay, developmental disability or mental retardation.
(c) “Rehabilitation services” means physical therapy, occupational  therapy or speech therapy
services to restore or improve function.
(4) The provisions of ORS 743A.001 do not apply to this section.
(5) The definition  of “pervasive developmental disorder” is not intended to apply to coverage
required under ORS 743A.168 or section 2, chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013.
SECTION 96.
 ORS 743A.190, as amended by section 20, chapter 771,  Oregon Laws 2013, is
amended to read:
743A.190. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this  2017 Act,  a health benefit plan, as de-
fined in ORS 743B.005, must cover for  a child enrolled in the plan who is under 18 years of age and
who has been  diagnosed with a pervasive developmental disorder all medical services, including re-
habilitation services, that are medically necessary and are otherwise covered under the plan.
(2) The coverage required under subsection (1) of this section, including rehabilitation  services,
may be made subject  to other provisions of the health benefit plan that apply to covered services,
including but not limited to:
(a) Deductibles, copayments or coinsurance;
(b) Prior authorization or utilization review requirements; or
(c) Treatment limitations regarding the number of visits or the duration of treatment.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Medically necessary” means in accordance with the definition of medical necessity that is
specified in the policy, certificate or contract for the health benefit plan and that  applies uniformly
to all covered services under the health benefit plan.
(b) “Pervasive developmental disorder” means a neurological condition  that includes autism
spectrum disorder, developmental delay, developmental disability or mental retardation.
(c) “Rehabilitation services” means physical  therapy, occupational therapy or speech therapy
services to restore or improve function.
(4) The provisions of ORS 743A.001 do not apply to this section.
(5) The definition of “pervasive developmental disorder” is not intended to apply  to coverage
required under ORS 743A.168.
SECTION 97.
 ORS 743A.192 is amended to read:
743A.192. (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this  2017 Act,  a health benefit plan, as de-
fined in ORS 743B.005:
(a) Shall provide coverage for the routine costs of the care of patients  enrolled in and partic-
ipating in approved clinical trials;
[74]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) May not exclude, limit or impose additional conditions on  the coverage of the routine costs
for items and services furnished in connection with participation in an approved clinical trial; and
(c) May not include provisions that discriminate  against an individual on the basis of the
individual’s participation in an approved clinical trial.
(2) As used in this section, “routine costs”:
(a) Means all medically necessary conventional care, items or  services consistent with the cov-
erage provided by the health benefit plan if typically provided to  a patient who is not enrolled in
a clinical trial.
(b) Does not include:
(A) The drug,  device or service being tested in the approved clinical trial unless the drug, device
or service would be covered for that indication by the health benefit plan  if provided outside of an
approved clinical trial;
(B) Items or  services required solely for the provision of the drug device or service being tested
in the clinical trial;
(C) Items or services required solely  for the clinically appropriate monitoring of the drug, device
or service being tested in the clinical trial;
(D) Items or services that are provided solely to satisfy  data collection and analysis needs and
that are not used in the direct clinical management of the patient;
(E) Items or services customarily provided by a clinical  trial sponsor free of charge to any
participant in the clinical trial; or
(F) Items or services that are not covered by the health benefit plan  if provided outside of the
clinical trial.
(3) As used in this section, “approved clinical trial” means a clinical trial that is:
(a) Funded by the National Institutes of Health, the  Centers for Disease Control and Prevention,
the Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality, the Centers  for Medicare and Medicaid Services,
the United States Department of Defense or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs;
(b) Supported by a center or cooperative  group that is funded by the National Institutes of
Health, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the Agency for Healthcare Research and
Quality, the  Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the United States Department of Defense
or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs;
(c) Conducted as an investigational new drug application, an investigational  device exemption
or a  biologics license application subject to approval by the United States Food and Drug Adminis-
tration; or
(d) Exempt by federal law from the  requirement to submit an investigational new drug applica-
tion to the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(4) The coverage required by this section may be subject to provisions of the  health benefit plan
that apply to other benefits within the same category,  including but not limited to copayments,
deductibles and coinsurance.
(5) An insurer that provides coverage required by  this section is not, based upon that coverage,
liable for any adverse effects of the approved clinical trial.
(6) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 98.
 ORS 743A.252 is amended to read:
743A.252. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child abuse medical assessment” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.782.
(b) “Community assessment center” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.782.
[75]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(2) Except as provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act,  a health  benefit plan shall provide pay-
ment to or reimburse a community assessment center for the services provided by the center:
(a) In conducting a child abuse medical assessment of a child enrolled in the plan; and
(b) That are related to the child abuse medical assessment including, but not limited to:
(A) A forensic interview; and
(B) Mental health treatment.
(3) The payment or reimbursement  made in accordance with this section must be proportionate
to the scope and intensity of the services provided by the community assessment center.
(4) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 99.
 ORS 743B.005 is amended to read:
743B.005. For purposes of ORS 743.004, 743.007, 743.022, 743.535,  743B.003 to 743B.127 and
743B.128:
(1) “Actuarial certification” means a written statement by a member of  the American Academy
of Actuaries or other  individual acceptable to the Director of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services that a carrier is in compliance with the  provisions of ORS 743B.012 based upon
the person’s  examination, including a review of the appropriate records and of the actuarial as-
sumptions and methods used by the carrier in establishing premium rates for  small employer health
benefit plans.
(2) “Affiliate” of, or person “affiliated” with, a specified person  means any carrier who, directly
or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls or is controlled by  or is under common
control with a specified person. For purposes  of this definition, “control” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 732.548.
(3) “Affiliation period” means,  under the terms of a group health benefit plan issued by a health
care service contractor, a period:
(a) That is applied uniformly and without regard to any health  status related factors to an
enrollee or late enrollee;
(b) That must expire before any coverage becomes effective under the plan  for the enrollee or
late enrollee;
(c) During which no premium shall be charged to the enrollee or late enrollee; and
(d) That begins on the enrollee’s or late enrollee’s first date of  eligibility for coverage and runs
concurrently with any eligibility waiting period under the plan.
(4) “Bona fide association” means an association that:
(a) Has been in active existence for at least five years;
(b) Has been formed and maintained in good faith for purposes other than obtaining insurance;
(c) Does not condition  membership in the association on any factor relating to the health status
of an individual or the individual’s dependent or employee;
(d) Makes health insurance  coverage that is offered through the association available to all
members of the association  regardless of the health status of the member or individuals who are
eligible for coverage through the member;
(e) Does not make health insurance coverage that is offered through  the association available
other than in connection with a member of the association;
(f) Has a constitution and bylaws; and
(g) Is not owned or controlled by a carrier, producer or affiliate of a carrier or producer.
(5) “Carrier” means any person who provides health benefit plans in this state, including:
[76]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A licensed insurance company;
(b) A health care service contractor;
(c) A health maintenance organization;
(d) An association or group of employers that provides benefits by means of a multiple employer
welfare arrangement and that:
(A) Is subject to ORS 750.301 to 750.341; or
(B) Is fully  insured and otherwise exempt under ORS 750.303 (4) but elects to be governed by
ORS 743B.010 to 743B.013; or
(e) Any  other person or corporation responsible for the payment of benefits or provision of ser-
vices.
(6) “Dependent” means  the spouse or child of an eligible employee, subject to applicable terms
of the health benefit plan covering the employee.
(7) “Eligible employee” means  an employee who is eligible for coverage under a group health
benefit plan.
(8) “Employee” means any individual employed by an employer.
(9) “Enrollee” means an employee, dependent of the employee  or an individual otherwise eligible
for a group or individual health benefit  plan who has enrolled for coverage under the terms of the
plan.
[(10) “Exchange” means an American Health Benefit Exchange described in 42 U.S.C. 18031,
18032, 18033 and 18041.]
[(11)] (10) “Exclusion period”  means a period during which specified treatments or services are
excluded from coverage.
[(12)] (11) “Financial impairment” means that a carrier is not insolvent and is:
(a) Considered by the director to be potentially unable to fulfill its contractual obligations; or
(b) Placed under an  order of rehabilitation or conservation by a court of competent jurisdiction.
[(13)(a)] (12)(a)  “Geographic average rate” means the arithmetical average of the  lowest pre-
mium and the corresponding highest premium to be charged by a  carrier in a geographic area es-
tablished by the director for the carrier’s:
(A) Group health benefit plans offered to small employers; or
(B) Individual health benefit plans.
(b) “Geographic average rate” does not include premium differences that are due  to differences
in benefit design, age, tobacco use or family composition.
[(14)] (13) “Grandfathered health plan” has the  meaning prescribed by the United States Secre-
taries of Labor, Health and Human Services and the Treasury pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 18011(e).
[(15)] (14) “Group eligibility waiting period” means, with respect  to a group health benefit plan,
the period of employment or membership with  the group that a prospective enrollee must complete
before plan coverage begins.
[(16)(a)] (15)(a) “Health benefit plan” means any:
(A) Hospital expense, medical expense or hospital or medical expense policy or certificate;
(B) Subscriber contract of a health care service contractor as defined in ORS 750.005; or
(C) Plan provided by a  multiple employer welfare arrangement or by another benefit arrange-
ment defined in the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974,  as amended, to the
extent that the plan is subject to state regulation.
(b) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(A) Coverage for accident only, specific disease or condition only, credit or disability income;
[77]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the federal government;
(C) Medicare supplement insurance policies;
(D) Coverage of TRICARE services pursuant to contracts with the federal government;
(E) Benefits delivered through a  flexible spending arrangement established pursuant to section
125 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, when  the benefits are provided in addition
to a group health benefit plan;
(F) Separately  offered long term care insurance, including, but not limited to, coverage of nurs-
ing home care, home health care and community-based care;
(G) Independent, noncoordinated, hospital-only  indemnity insurance or other fixed indemnity in-
surance;
(H) Short term health  insurance policies that are in effect for periods of 12 months or less, in-
cluding the term of a renewal of the policy;
(I) Dental only coverage;
(J) Vision only coverage;
(K) Stop-loss coverage that meets the requirements of ORS 742.065;
(L) Coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance;
(M) Insurance arising out of a workers’ compensation or similar law;
(N) Automobile medical payment  insurance or insurance under which benefits are payable with
or without regard to fault and that is statutorily  required to be contained in any liability insurance
policy or equivalent self-insurance; [ or]
(O) Any employee welfare benefit plan  that is exempt from state regulation because of the fed-
eral Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ; or
(P) Coverage provided by the Health Care for All Oregon Plan .
(c) For purposes of this subsection, renewal of a short term health insurance policy includes the
issuance of a new  short term health insurance policy by an insurer to a policyholder within 60 days
after the expiration of a policy previously issued by the insurer to the policyholder.
[(17)] (16) “Individual health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan:
(a) That is issued to an individual policyholder; or
(b) That provides individual coverage through a trust, association or  similar group, regardless
of the situs of the policy or contract.
[(18)] (17)  “Initial enrollment period” means a period of at least  30 days following commence-
ment of the first eligibility period for an individual.
[(19)] (18)  “Late enrollee”  means an individual who enrolls in a group health benefit plan sub-
sequent to the initial enrollment period during which the individual was eligible for coverage  but
declined to enroll. However, an eligible individual shall not be considered a late enrollee if:
(a) The individual  qualifies for a special enrollment period in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 300gg
or as prescribed by rule by the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(b) The individual applies for coverage during an open enrollment period;
(c) A court issues an order that coverage be provided for  a spouse or minor child under an
employee’s employer sponsored health benefit plan and request for enrollment  is made within 30
days after issuance of the court order;
(d) The individual is employed by an employer that  offers multiple health benefit plans and the
individual elects a different health benefit plan during an open enrollment period; or
(e) The individual’s coverage under Medicaid, Medicare, TRICARE, Indian Health Service or  a
publicly sponsored or subsidized health  plan, including, but not limited to, the medical assistance
[78]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
program under ORS chapter 414, has been involuntarily terminated within  63 days after applying for
coverage in a group health benefit plan.
[(20)] (19)  “Multiple  employer welfare arrangement” means a multiple employer welfare ar-
rangement as defined in section 3 of the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974,
as amended, 29 U.S.C. 1002, that is subject to ORS 750.301 to 750.341.
[(21)] (20) “Preexisting condition exclusion” means:
(a) Except for a grandfathered health plan, a  limitation or exclusion of benefits or a denial of
coverage based on a medical condition being present  before the effective date of coverage or before
the date coverage is denied, whether or not any medical advice, diagnosis, care or  treatment was
recommended or received for the condition before the date of coverage or denial of coverage.
(b) With respect to a grandfathered health plan,  a provision applicable to an enrollee or late
enrollee that excludes coverage for services, charges  or expenses incurred during a specified period
immediately following enrollment for a condition for which medical advice, diagnosis, care or treat-
ment was  recommended or received during a specified period immediately preceding enrollment. For
purposes of this paragraph pregnancy and genetic information do  not constitute preexisting condi-
tions.
[(22)] (21)  “Premium” includes insurance premiums or other fees charged for a  health benefit
plan, including the  costs of benefits paid or reimbursements made to or on behalf of enrollees cov-
ered by the plan.
[(23)] (22) “Rating period” means the 12-month calendar period for which premium rates estab-
lished by a carrier are in effect, as determined by the carrier.
[(24)] (23) “Representative” does not include an insurance producer  or an employee or author-
ized representative of an insurance producer or carrier.
[(25)] (24) “Small employer”  has the meaning given that term in 42 U.S.C. 18024 unless otherwise
prescribed by the department by rule in accordance with guidance  issued by the United States De-
partment of Health and Human  Services, the United States Department of Labor or the United
States Department of the Treasury.
SECTION 100.
 ORS 743B.010 is amended to read:
743B.010. (1) If an affiliated  group of employers is treated as a single employer under section
414 (b), (c), (m) or (o) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, a carrier may issue a single group health
benefit plan  to the affiliated group on the basis of the number of employees in the affiliated group
if the group requests such coverage.
(2) Subsequent to  the issuance of a health benefit plan to a small employer, [ other than a plan
issued through the health insurance exchange, ] a carrier shall determine annually the number of em-
ployees  of  the employer for purposes of determining the employer’s ongoing eligibility as a small
employer.
(3)[(a)] ORS 743B.010 to 743B.013  shall continue to apply to a health benefit plan issued [ outside
of the exchange ] to a small employer until the plan anniversary date following the date  the employer
no longer meets the definition of a small employer.
[(b) ORS 743B.010 to 743B.013 shall continue to  apply to an employer that receives coverage
through the exchange until the employer no longer receives coverage  through the exchange and is no
longer a small employer. ]
SECTION 101. ORS 743B.128 is amended to read:
743B.128. Notwithstanding ORS 743B.012,  743B.013 and 743B.105, a carrier is not required to
actively market:
[79]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) A health benefit plan sold only to a bona fide association,  to groups that are not members
of the bona fide association;
(2) A grandfathered health plan, to a group or individual who  is not eligible for coverage under
the plan;
(3) A group health benefit plan, to a group that is not eligible for coverage under the plan;  or
[(4) A qualified health plan sold only through the health insurance exchange, to an  individual or
group outside of the exchange; or ]
[(5)] (4) A policy of group health insurance that may be delivered  or issued for delivery in this
state without the approval of the Director  of the Department of Consumer and Business Services
under ORS 742.003 (1).
SECTION 102. ORS 743B.020 is amended to read:
743B.020. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall  adopt by rule a method
for determining whether:
(a) An employee is an eligible employee as defined in ORS 743B.005; and
(b) An employer is a small employer as defined in ORS 743B.005.
(2) The method adopted by the department under subsection (1)  of this section must be consist-
ent with corresponding federal requirements [ for the Small  Business Health Options Program as de-
fined in ORS 741.300 ].
SECTION 103.
 ORS 743B.505 is amended to read:
743B.505. (1) An insurer offering a health benefit plan in this  state that provides coverage to
individuals or to small employers, as defined in ORS 743B.005, through a specified  network of health
care providers shall:
(a) Contract  with or employ a network of providers that is sufficient in number, geographic
distribution and types of providers to ensure that all covered services under the health benefit plan,
including mental health and substance  abuse treatment, are accessible to enrollees without unrea-
sonable delay.
[(b)(A) With respect  to health benefit plans offered through the health insurance exchange under
ORS 741.310, contract with a sufficient number and geographic distribution of essential community
providers, where available, to ensure reasonable and timely access to a broad range of essential com-
munity providers for low-income, medically underserved individuals  in the plan’s service area in ac-
cordance with the network adequacy standards established by the Department of Consumer and
Business Services; ]
[(B) If the health benefit plan offered through the  health insurance exchange offers a majority of
the covered services through physicians employed by the insurer  or through a single contracted medical
group, have a sufficient  number and geographic distribution of employed or contracted providers and
hospital facilities to ensure reasonable and timely access  for low-income, medically underserved
enrollees in the plan’s service area, in accordance with network adequacy  standards adopted by the
Department of Consumer and Business Services; or ]
[(C) With respect to health benefit plans offered outside of the health insurance exchange,  contract
with or employ a network of providers that is sufficient in number, geographic distribution and  types
of providers to ensure access to  care by enrollees who reside in locations within the health benefit
plan’s service area that are designated by the Health Resources and Services Administration of the
United States Department of Health  and Human Services as health professional shortage areas or
low-income zip codes. ]
[(c)] (b) Annually report to the Department of Consumer and Business Services, in the  format
[80]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
prescribed by the  department, the insurer’s plan for ensuring that the network of providers for each
health benefit plan meets the requirements of this section.
(2)(a) An insurer may not discriminate with respect to participation under a  health benefit plan
or coverage under the plan against any health  care provider who is acting within the scope of the
provider’s license or certification in this state.
(b) This  subsection does not require an insurer to contract with any health care provider who
is willing to  abide by the insurer’s terms and conditions for participation established by the insurer.
(c) This subsection does not prevent an insurer from  establishing varying reimbursement rates
based on quality or performance measures.
(d) Rules  adopted by the Department of Consumer and Business Services to implement this sec-
tion shall be consistent with the provisions of 42 U.S.C. 300gg-5 and the rules adopted  by the United
States Department of Health and Human  Services, the United States Department of the Treasury
or the United States Department of Labor to carry out 42 U.S.C. 300gg-5.
(3) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall use one of the following  methods
in evaluating whether the  network of providers available to enrollees in a health benefit plan meets
the requirements of this section:
(a) An approach by which an insurer submits evidence that the insurer is complying with at
least one of the factors prescribed by the department by rule from each  of the following categories:
(A) Access to care consistent with the needs of the enrollees served by the network;
(B) Consumer satisfaction;
(C) Transparency; and
(D) Quality of care and cost containment; or
(b) A nationally  recognized standard adopted by the department and adjusted, as necessary, to
reflect the age demographics of the enrollees in the plan.
(4) This section does not  require an insurer to contract with an essential community provider
that refuses to accept the insurer’s generally applicable payment rates for services covered by the
plan.
(5) This section does not require an insurer to submit provider  contracts to the department for
review.
SECTION 104.
 Section 11, chapter 8, Oregon Laws 2012, as amended by  section 2, chapter 368,
Oregon Laws 2013, and section 55, chapter 3, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 11.  In each calendar quarter, the Oregon Health Authority shall report to the appropriate
committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly:
(1) On the implementation of the Oregon Integrated and Coordinated Care Delivery System;
(2) On the progress in implementing an arbitration process in accordance with ORS 414.635 (7);
(3) For the  purpose of developing a baseline with which to compare future costs, per member
costs for each category of service;  and
(4) The administrative costs to the authority in the implementation of the  system and the ag-
gregate financial information reported to the authority by  coordinated care organizations, including
but not limited to the coordinated care organizations’:
(a) Payments for each category of service as prescribed by the authority; and
(b) Reserves, projected  cash flows and other financial information prescribed by the authority
by rule[;].
[(5) On efforts made, in collaboration with the Department of Consumer and Business  Services and
the United States Department of Health and Human Services, to coordinate eligibility  determination
[81]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and enrollment processes for qualified health plans and the state medical assistance program; and ]
[(6) On the transfer of the information technology for the  state medical assistance program from the
health insurance exchange to the authority. ]
SECTION 105. Section 2, chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended  by section 9, chapter 674,
Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) As used in this section and section 3a, chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013:
(a)(A) “Applied behavior  analysis” means the design, implementation and evaluation of environ-
mental modifications, using behavioral  stimuli and consequences, to produce significant improvement
in human social behavior, including the use of direct  observation, measurement and functional
analysis of the relationship between environment and behavior, that is provided by:
(i) A licensed health care professional as defined in [ section 1 of this 2015 Act ] ORS 676.802;
(ii) A behavior  analyst or assistant behavior analyst licensed under [ section 3 of this 2015 Act ]
ORS 676.810; or
(iii) A behavior analysis interventionist registered under [ section 4  of this 2015 Act ] ORS 676.815
who receives ongoing training and supervision  by a licensed behavior analyst, by a licensed assist-
ant behavior analyst or by a licensed health care professional.
(B) “Applied behavior analysis” does not mean psychological testing,  neuropsychology,
psychotherapy, cognitive therapy, sex therapy, psychoanalysis, hypnotherapy  and long-term coun-
seling as treatment modalities.
(b) “Autism spectrum disorder” has  the meaning given that term in the fifth edition of the Di-
agnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM-5) published by the  American Psychiatric
Association.
(c) “Diagnosis” means medically necessary assessment, evaluation or testing.
(d) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS [ 743.730] 743B.005.
(e) “Medically necessary” means in accordance with the definition of medical necessity that  is
specified in the policy or certificate for the health benefit plan  and that applies to all covered ser-
vices under the plan.
(f) “Treatment for autism spectrum disorder”  includes applied behavior analysis for up to 25
hours per week and any other mental health or medical services identified in the individualized
treatment plan, as described in subsection (6) of this section.
(2) Except as provided in section 5 of this 2017 Act,  a  health benefit plan shall provide cov-
erage of:
(a) The screening  for and diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder by a licensed neurologist,
pediatric neurologist, developmental pediatrician, psychiatrist or psychologist, who  has experience
or training in the diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder; and
(b) Medically necessary treatment for autism spectrum disorder  and the management of care, for
an individual who begins treatment  before nine years of age, subject to the requirements of this
section.
(3) This section does not require coverage for:
(a) Services provided by a family or household member;
(b) Services that  are custodial in nature or that constitute marital, family, educational or
training services;
(c) Custodial or respite  care, equine assisted therapy, creative arts therapy, wilderness or ad-
venture camps,  social counseling, telemedicine, music therapy, neurofeedback, chelation or
hyperbaric chambers;
[82]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Services provided under  an individual education plan in accordance with the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.;
(e) Services provided through community or social programs; or
(f) Services provided by  the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority,
other than employee benefit plans offered by the department and the authority.
(4) An insurer may not terminate coverage or refuse to issue or renew coverage for  an individ-
ual solely because the individual has received a diagnosis  of autism spectrum disorder or has re-
ceived treatment for autism spectrum disorder.
(5) Coverage under  this section may be subject to utilization controls that are reasonable in the
context of individual determinations of medical necessity. An insurer may require:
(a) An autism spectrum disorder diagnosis by a professional described in  subsection (2)(a) of this
section if the original diagnosis was not made by a professional described in subsection (2)(a) of  this
section.
(b) Prior authorization for coverage  of a maximum of 25 hours per week of applied behavior
analysis recommended in an individualized  treatment plan approved by a professional described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section for an individual  with autism spectrum disorder, as long as the
insurer makes a prior authorization determination no later  than 30 calendar days after receiving the
request for prior authorization.
(6) If an individual is receiving applied behavior analysis, an insurer may require submission  of
an individualized treatment plan, which shall include all elements  necessary for the insurer to ap-
propriately determine coverage under the health benefit plan. The individualized treatment plan
must be based on evidence-based screening criteria. An insurer may require an  updated individual-
ized treatment plan,  not more than once every six months, that includes observed progress as of the
date the updated plan was prepared, for the purpose of performing utilization review  and medical
management. The insurer may require the individualized  treatment plan to be approved by a pro-
fessional described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, and to include the:
(a) Diagnosis;
(b) Proposed treatment by type;
(c) Frequency and anticipated duration of treatment;
(d) Anticipated outcomes stated as  goals, including specific cognitive, social, communicative,
self-care and behavioral goals that are  clearly stated, directly observed and continually measured
and that address the characteristics of the autism spectrum disorder; and
(e) Signature of the treating provider.
(7)(a) Once coverage for applied behavior analysis has been  approved, the coverage continues
as long as:
(A) The individual continues  to make progress toward the majority of the goals of the individ-
ualized treatment plan; and
(B) Applied behavior analysis is medically necessary.
(b) An insurer may require periodic review of an  individualized treatment plan, as described in
subsection (6) of this section,  and modification of the individualized treatment plan if the review
shows that the individual receiving the treatment is not making substantial clinical progress toward
the goals of the individualized treatment plan.
(8) Coverage under this section may be subject to requirements and  limitations no more re-
strictive than those imposed on coverage or reimbursement of expenses arising from the  treatment
of other medical conditions under the policy or certificate, including but not limited to:
[83]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Requirements and limitations regarding in-network providers; and
(b) Provisions relating to deductibles, copayments and coinsurance.
(9) This section applies to coverage for up to 25 hours per week of applied behavior analysis for
an individual if the coverage is first requested when the individual is under nine years of age.  This
section does not limit coverage for any services that are otherwise  available to an individual under
ORS 743A.168 or 743A.190, including but not limited to:
(a) Treatment for autism spectrum disorder  other than applied behavior analysis or the services
described in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Applied behavior analysis for more than 25 hours per week; or
(c) Applied behavior analysis for an  individual if the coverage is first requested when the indi-
vidual is nine years of age or older.
(10) Coverage  under this section includes treatment for autism spectrum disorder provided in the
individual’s home  or a licensed health care facility or, for treatment provided by a licensed health
care professional as defined in [ section 1 of this 2015 Act ] ORS 676.802 or a behavior analyst or
assistant behavior analyst licensed under [ section 3 of this 2015 Act ] ORS 676.810 , in a setting ap-
proved by the health care professional, behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst.
(11) An  insurer that provides coverage of applied behavior analysis in accordance with a deci-
sion of an  independent review organization that was made prior to January 1, 2016, shall continue
to provide  coverage, subject to modifications made in accordance with subsection (7) of this section.
(12) ORS 743A.001 does not apply to this section.
APPROPRIATION
SECTION 106.
There is  appropriated to the Health Care for All Oregon Board, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $_______ for deposit
in the Health Care for All Oregon Fund established by  section 13 of this 2017 Act, to be used
for the purposes of the Health Care for All Oregon Board and for  administering the Health
Care for All Oregon Plan.
TRANSFER OF ENROLLEES FROM HEALTH INSURANCE
EXCHANGE TO HEALTH CARE FOR ALL OREGON PLAN
SECTION 107. (1) The Department of Consumer  and Business Services and the Oregon
Health Authority shall  collaborate to ensure that enrollees in qualified health plans, as de-
fined in ORS 741.300, and employees of small employers that have  purchased qualified health
plans through  the Small Business Health Options Program, as defined in ORS 741.300, on
December 31, 2019, are, without interruption in coverage, transferred to the Health  Care for
All Oregon Plan on the operative date specified in section 112 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The department and the authority may take any steps necessary prior to the  opera-
tive date specified in  section 112 of this 2017 Act that are necessary to ensure that individ-
uals described in subsection (1) of this section are enrolled in the Health Care for All  Oregon
Plan on the operative date specified in section 112 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 108. The moneys in the Health Insurance Exchange Fund and the unexpended
balances of amounts authorized to be expended by the Department of Consumer and Business
Services for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from revenues dedicated, continuously  ap-
[84]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
propriated or otherwise made available for the purpose  of administering the health insurance
exchange shall revert to the General  Fund on the operative date specified in section 112 of
this 2017 Act.
REPEALS
SECTION 109. Section 25 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2022.
SECTION 110. ORS 243.142,  413.085, 442.325, 442.342, 442.344, 442.347, 741.001, 741.002,
741.003, 741.004, 741.008, 741.102, 741.105, 741.220, 741.222,  741.300, 741.310, 741.340, 741.342,
741.381, 741.390, 741.400, 741.500, 741.510,  741.520, 741.540, 741.800, 741.801, 741.802, 741.900,
743.826 and 743B.130 are repealed.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 111. The unit captions  used in this 2017 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 112. Sections 1, 4 to 6, 11, 12, 16 and 17 of this 2017 Act, the amendments to
ORS 238.538, 243.105, 243.107, 243.125, 243.129, 243.135, 243.160, 243.163, 243.215, 243.221, 243.275,
243.860, 243.864, 243.866, 243.867, 243.868, 243.874, 243.886,  291.229, 291.231, 292.051, 352.237,
408.370, 408.380, 411.400, 411.402, 411.406,  413.011, 413.017, 413.032, 413.037, 414.025, 414.115,
414.736, 414.740, 430.315, 431.120, 441.025, 441.060, 441.065,  441.550, 441.710, 442.015, 442.315,
442.362, 479.210, 677.450, 731.036, 742.400, 743A.001, 743A.012,  743A.063, 743A.070, 743A.080,
743A.100, 743A.104, 743A.105, 743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.120,  743A.124, 743A.141, 743A.144,
743A.148, 743A.160, 743A.168, 743A.170,  743A.175, 743A.184, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192,
743A.252, 743B.005, 743B.010, 743B.020, 743B.128 and 743B.505 and section 11, chapter 8, Oregon
Laws 2012, section 15, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 2, chapter 771, Oregon
Laws 2013, by sections 18 to 24 and 28 to  105 of this 2017 Act and the repeal of ORS 243.142,
413.085, 442.325, 442.342, 442.344, 442.347, 741.001, 741.002,  741.003, 741.004, 741.008, 741.102,
741.105, 741.220, 741.222, 741.300, 741.310,  741.340, 741.342, 741.381, 741.390, 741.400, 741.500,
741.510, 741.520, 741.540, 741.800, 741.801, 741.802, 741.900, 743.826 and 743B.130 by section 110
of this 2017 Act become operative on January 1, 2020.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 113.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the  immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[85]