Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 18.395, as amended by section 4, chapter 100, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
18.395. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a homestead is exempt  from
sale on execution, from the lien of every judgment and from liability in  any form for the debts of the
owner to the amount  in value of $150,000, except as otherwise provided by law. The exemption is
effective without the necessity of a claim thereof by  the judgment debtor. When two or more mem-
bers of a household are judgment debtors whose interests in  the homestead are subject to sale on
execution, the lien of a judgment or liability in any form, their combined  exemptions under this
section shall not exceed $300,000.
(b) A homestead is exempt from sale on execution, from the lien of every judgment and from  li-
ability in any form for the debts of the owner  arising out of a child support or spousal support ob-
ligation or a money award judgment that includes  restitution to the amount in value of $40,000,
except as otherwise provided by law. The exemption is effective  without the necessity of a claim
thereof by the judgment  debtor. When two or more members of a household are judgment debtors
whose interests in the homestead are subject to sale on execution, the lien  of a judgment or liability
in any form, their combined exemptions under this section shall not exceed $50,000.
(c) To qualify for the exemption under paragraph (a) or (b) of this  subsection, the homestead
must be the actual abode of and occupied by the owner, or the owner’s spouse, parent or  child, but
the exemption shall not be impaired by:
(A) Temporary removal or temporary absence with the intention to reoccupy the  same as a
homestead;
(B) Removal or absence from the property; or
(C) The sale of the property.
(d)(A) The State Court Administrator shall index the  amounts identified as exempt from exe-
cution under paragraph (a) of  this subsection each year on or before July 1 to reflect increases or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2763
HB 3184
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
decreases  in  the cost of living for the previous calendar year, based on changes in the Consumer
Price  Index  for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor or a successor agency. The  State Court Ad-
ministrator shall publish the adjusted  exemption limitations on the Judicial Department website. In
adjusting the amounts, the State Court Administrator shall round to the nearest $100, but  shall use
unrounded adjusted amounts to calculate the amounts of the exemptions  during the succeeding year.
The new amounts become effective  on July 1 of the year in which the State Court Administrator
makes the adjustment.
(B) The indexing described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph does not apply to the  amount
of any exemption specified for a debt that arises out of a child support  or spousal support obligation
or a money award judgment that includes restitution.
(2) The exemption  extends to the proceeds derived from selling the homestead in the amount
that is applicable under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, if the proceeds are held for  a period
not exceeding one year and held with the intention to procure another homestead therewith.
(3) The exemption period under  subsection (1)(c)(B) and (C) of this section is one year from the
removal, absence or sale, whichever occurs first.
(4) When the owner of a homestead  has been granted a discharge in bankruptcy or has conveyed
the homestead property, the value thereof, for  the purpose of determining a leviable interest in ex-
cess of the homestead exemption, is the value on the date of the  petition in bankruptcy, whether the
value is determined  in the bankruptcy proceedings or not, or on the date the conveyance becomes
effective, whichever occurs first. However, with respect to judgments  not discharged in the bank-
ruptcy, or entered  against the owner after discharge, the value on the effective date of conveyance
is controlling.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, a homestead that is the actual abode of
and occupied  by the judgment debtor, or that is the actual abode of and occupied by a spouse, de-
pendent parent or dependent child of the judgment debtor, may not be sold on  execution to satisfy
a judgment that at the time of entry does not exceed  [ $3,000] the amount of the homestead ex-
emption applicable under subsection (1) of this section . However, such judgment remains a lien
upon the real property, and the property may be sold on execution:
(a) At any time after the sale of the property by the judgment debtor; and
(b) At any time after the  property is no longer the actual abode of and occupied by the judgment
debtor or the spouse, dependent parent or dependent child of the judgment debtor.
(6) The limitation on execution sales imposed by subsection (5) of this section is  not impaired
by temporary removal or temporary absence with the intention to reoccupy the property  as a
homestead.
(7) The limitation on  execution sales imposed by subsection (5) of this section does not apply if
two or more judgments are owing to a single  judgment creditor and the total amount owing to the
judgment creditor,  determined by adding the amount of each individual judgment as of the date the
judgment was entered, is greater than [ $3,000] the amount of the homestead exemption applica-
ble under subsection (1) of this section .
(8) Upon the issuance of an order authorizing sale as required by ORS 18.904, and in conform-
ance with subsection (5) of this section, the sheriff may proceed to sell  the property. If the home-
stead exemption applies, the sheriff shall pay the homestead owner out of the proceeds  the
applicable amount under subsection  (1)(a) or (b) of this section and apply the balance of the proceeds
on the execution. However, the sheriff may  not sell the homestead if an exemption applies unless the
[2]
HB 3184
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sum bid for the homestead exceeds the sum of the costs of the sale and the  amount of the applicable
exemption. If no such bid is received, the petitioner shall bear the expense of the sale.
(9) The homestead exemption provided by this  section applies to a purchaser’s interest under a
land sale contract, as defined by ORS 18.960.
(10) The homestead exemption provided by this section applies to:
(a) A floating home, as defined by ORS 830.700; and
(b) A manufactured dwelling, as defined by ORS 446.003.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 18.908 is amended to read:
18.908. (1) At least 10 days before the hearing on a motion filed under ORS 18.906, the judgment
creditor  must:
(a) Serve the judgment debtor in the manner provided by ORCP 7 with a copy of  the motion and
the supporting affidavit, and with a notice of the time and place of the hearing; and
(b) Send a copy of the motion and the notice by first class mail to the property  at the mailing
address for the property.
(2) The notice required by subsection (1) of this  section must be in substantially the following
form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
NOTICE OF HEARING ON SHERIFF’S
SALE OF YOUR PROPERTY
This is to notify you that 
 has asked the court to order the sheriff to sell property lo-
cated at  to satisfy a judgment against .
Before deciding whether to order the sale, the court will hold a hearing on , 2 , at
 a.m./p.m., in Room , .
The law provides that property is your homestead if the  property is actually used as a home by
you, your spouse,  a dependent parent or a dependent child. If you are temporarily absent from the
property but intend to move back in, the property is still your homestead.
The law provides that if the property is your homestead,  then $  of its value may not be
taken to satisfy a judgment against you. In addition,  a homestead usually may not be sold to satisfy
a judgment for [ $3,000] the amount of the homestead exemption applicable under ORS 18.395
(1), or less.
The law provides that property may be sold despite the fact that  it is your homestead and all
of its value may be taken to satisfy a judgment against you if the judgment is for child support.
IF YOU WISH  TO PROTECT THIS PROPERTY FROM A SHERIFF’S SALE, YOU SHOULD
COME TO THE COURT HEARING.
IF YOU HAVE ANY QUESTIONS, YOU SHOULD SEE A LAWYER AT ONCE.
If you do not own this property, please give this  notice and the papers served with it to the
owner.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 3.
 ORS 18.912 is amended to read:
18.912. (1) Whether or not  the judgment debtor appears at the hearing, the court shall inquire
as to the facts alleged in a motion  filed under ORS 18.906 and make a summary determination on
the motion.
[3]
HB 3184
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
(2) The court shall authorize sale of the property pursuant to a motion filed under  ORS 18.906
unless the court finds:
(a) That the property is the homestead of the judgment debtor;
(b) That the judgment is subject to the homestead exemption; and
(c) That the amount of the judgment or judgments was [ $3,000] the amount of the  homestead
exemption applicable under ORS 18.395 (1)  or less at the time of entry of the judgment or judg-
ments as described in ORS 18.395 (7).
(3) If the court authorizes the sale of residential property, the  order must state whether the
homestead exemption  applies to the property. If the homestead exemption does apply to the property,
the order must state the allowed amount of the exemption.
(4) If the court authorizes the sale of residential property, the judgment creditor may  recover
the costs of service of the motion and notice under ORS 18.908 as part of the costs of the sale.
SECTION 4.
The amendments to  ORS 18.395, 18.908 and 18.912 by sections 1 to 3 of this
2025 Act apply to judgments entered on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[4]