Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.071 is amended to read:
336.071. (1) As used in this section, “school” means any:
(a) Kindergarten  through grade 12 public or private school, including a public charter
school; or
(b) Educational institution having an average daily attendance of 50 or more students.
(2) Every school is required to have emergency safeguards to  protect the safety and
well-being of students and staff at the school. The emergency safeguards must include:
[(1)] (a) [ All schools are required to instruct  and drill students ] Drills and instruction  on
emergency procedures so that [ the] students can respond to an emergency without confusion or
panic.
(b) Policies and procedures relating to school building security.
(3) The [ emergency procedures  shall include ] drills and instruction on emergency procedures
required by this section must be on:
(a) Fires;
(b) Earthquakes, which shall include tsunami drills and instruction in schools in a tsunami haz-
ard zone; and
(c) Safety threats.
[(2)(a)] (4)(a) Drills and instruction on fire emergencies shall include routes and  methods of ex-
iting the school building.
(b) Drills and instruction on earthquake emergencies shall include the earthquake emergency
response procedure known as “drop, cover and hold on.” A  school may drill earthquake emergency
response procedures in addition to “drop, cover and hold on” when  the school determines, based on
evaluation of specific engineering and  structural issues related to a building, that “drop, cover and
hold on” may not be the most effective earthquake emergency response procedure to prevent or limit
injury or loss of life.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4589
HB 3562
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Drills and instruction on tsunami emergencies shall include immediate evacuation after an
earthquake when appropriate or after a tsunami warning  to protect students against inundation by
tsunamis.
(d) Drills and instruction on safety threats shall include:
(A) Procedures related to lockdown, lockout, shelter in place  and evacuation, including the
procedures described in ORS 339.324; and
(B) Other appropriate actions to take when there is a threat to safety.
[(3)(a)] (5)(a) At  least 30 minutes in each school month shall be used to instruct students on the
drills and instruction on  emergency procedures described in subsection [ (1)] (3) of this section.
(b) At least two drills on earthquakes shall be conducted each year.
(c) At least two drills on safety threats shall be conducted each year.
(d) In schools in a tsunami hazard zone, at least three drills on earthquakes and tsunamis shall
be conducted each year.
[(4)(a)] (6)(a) In addition to the instruction required under  subsection [ (3)] (5) of this section,
schools are encouraged to instruct students,  in an age-appropriate manner, on preparing for and
recovering from events that are:
(A) Described in subsection [ (1)] (3) of this section; and
(B) Natural disasters specific to the region where the school is  located, including any relevant
weather-related events such as flooding, drought or excessive snowfall.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, the Department of Education shall:
(A) Develop, in consultation with the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management, guidance
that may be used for the instruction and make the guidance available to [ school districts ] schools ;
and
(B) Provide, when requested, professional development to teachers and administrators  relating
to the guidance.
(7) The policies and procedures relating to school building security required by  this sec-
tion must include  the creation and maintenance of school maps that are made available to
local and state public safety agencies responsible for emergency services at the school.  The
school maps must:
(a) Be in formats that:
(A) Conform to, integrate with, and are  accessible within software platforms used by the
agencies and in local public safety answering points;
(B) Do not require the agencies to purchase additional software or pay fees to access the
data; and
(C) Are  capable of being printed, shared electronically and digitally integrated into
interactive mobile platforms.
(b) Include the following features:
(A) True north orientation and a grid with “x” and “y” coordinates for reference.
(B) Accurate floor plans overlaid on current, certified aerial imagery of the school.
(C) Site-specific labeling for school structures, including  room names, hallway desig-
nations, exterior doors and stairwell numbers.
(D) Identification of the locations of hazards, critical utility controls, key  boxes, auto-
mated external defibrillators and trauma kits.
(E) The school grounds, including parking areas, athletic fields,  surrounding roads and
neighboring properties.
[2]
HB 3562
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
(c) Be verified for accuracy by  the entity producing the maps through an on-site
walkthrough of the school buildings and grounds.
[(5)] (8) All schools shall maintain all exit doors so that the doors  can be opened from the inside
without a key during school hours.
[(6)] (9) Units of local government and state agencies associated with emergency  procedures
training and planning shall:
(a) Review emergency [ procedures ] safeguards proposed by schools; and
(b) Assist schools in the instruction and drilling of students in emergency procedures.
[(7) As used in this section, “school” means any: ]
[(a) Kindergarten through grade 12 public or private school; or ]
[(b) Educational institution having an average daily attendance of 50 or more students. ]
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______,  which may be expended for the purpose of reimburs-
ing school districts for the costs of producing school maps, as required by ORS  336.071, as
amended by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[3]