Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Pursuant to  Article IX, section 14 (6)(a), of the Oregon Constitution, the
Legislative Assembly increases the amount of the estimate of revenues that will be  received
from other than corporate income and excise taxes, as described in Article  IX, section 14 (4),
of the Oregon Constitution, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, to $19,224,951,000.
SECTION 2. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of  this section, any positive differ-
ence between the actual amount of revenues collected from  other than corporate income and
excise taxes, as described in Article IX, section 14 (4),  of the Oregon Constitution, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, and the estimate of revenues made for that biennium pur-
suant to Article IX, section 14 (1), of the Oregon  Constitution, shall be distributed as follows:
(a) $260 million to the Department of Transportation for design and construction  of the
Interstate 205: Stafford Road to State Highway 213  Project, formerly known as the Interstate
205 Abernethy Bridge Project, as developed under chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2017; and
(b) After the distribution required  in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the balance shall
be evenly distributed between the Clean Diesel Engine Fund  established in ORS 468A.801 and
the Zero Emission Fund established in section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(2) If the actual amount of revenues collected from other than corporate  excise and in-
come taxes for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, exceeds the amount of the  adjusted es-
timate made in section 1 of this 2019 Act by two percent or more:
(a) The difference between the actual amount of  revenues collected and the adjusted es-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4422
HB 3440
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
timate in section 1 of this 2019 Act shall be returned to  personal income taxpayers in the
manner provided in ORS 291.349; and
(b) The difference  between the adjusted estimate in section 1 of this 2019 Act and the
estimate made for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, pursuant to Article  IX, section 14 (1),
of the Oregon Constitution, shall be distributed as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3. (1) The Zero Emission Fund is established in the State  Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Zero Emission Fund shall be
credited to the fund. Moneys in the  fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services for the  purpose of supporting the development and
construction of infrastructure  for zero emission or low emission vehicles. The department
by rule, and in consultation with the Department of Transportation, the State Department
of Energy and the Department of Environmental Quality, shall establish policies for the dis-
tribution of the moneys in the fund.
(2) The Secretary of State shall conduct an annual audit of  the fund to ensure appropri-
ate use of the moneys in the fund.
SECTION 4.
No later than June 30, 2020,  the Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices shall adopt rules, as provided in section  3 of this 2019 Act, for the distribution of
moneys in the Zero Emission Fund established in section 3 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 5.  ORS 468A.803 is amended to read:
468A.803. (1) The  Department of Environmental Quality shall use the moneys in the Clean Diesel
Engine Fund to award:
(a) Grants and loans to the owners and operators of  motor vehicles powered by diesel engines,
and equipment powered by nonroad diesel engines, for [ up to 25  percent of the ] certified costs of
qualifying replacements as described in ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799;
(b) Grants and loans to the owners and operators of diesel  engines for [ up to 100 percent of
the] certified costs of qualifying retrofits as described in ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799;
(c) Grants and loans  to the owners and operators of nonroad diesel engines for [ up to 25 percent
of the ] certified costs of qualifying repowers as described in ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799; and
(d) Grants to the owners of Oregon diesel truck engines to scrap those engines.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission [ by rule may  set grant or loan award rates at a per-
centage that is  greater than a percentage allowed under subsection (1) of this section, provided that the
grant or loan assistance will not exceed  the cost-effectiveness threshold, if the higher percentage award
rate would: ]
[(a) Benefit sensitive populations or areas  with elevated concentrations of diesel particulate matter;
or]
[(b) Otherwise increase participation by those categories of owners or operators. ] shall by rule set
the percentage of certified costs for  which a grant or loan may be awarded under subsection
(1) of this section. In adopting rules under this subsection, the commission shall  be advised
by the advisory committee required under ORS 468A.807.
(3) In determining the amount of a grant or loan under this section, the  department must reduce
the incremental cost of a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit by the value of any existing
financial  incentive  that directly reduces the cost of the qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit,
including tax credits, other grants or loans, or any other public financial assistance.
(4) The department may certify third parties to perform qualifying  replacements, repowers and
retrofits and may contract with  third parties to perform such services for [ the] certified costs of
[2]
HB 3440
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
qualifying replacements, repowers and retrofits. The department may  also contract with institutions
of higher education or other public bodies as defined by ORS 174.109 to train and certify third par-
ties to perform qualifying replacements, repowers and retrofits.
(5) The department may not award a grant or loan for  a replacement, repower or retrofit under
subsection (1) of this section unless the grant or loan applicant  demonstrates to the department’s
satisfaction that the resulting equivalent motor  vehicle, equivalent equipment, repowered nonroad
diesel engine or retrofitted diesel engine will  undergo at least 50 percent of its use in Oregon, as
measured by miles driven or hours  operated, for the three years following the replacement, repower
or retrofit.
(6) The department may not award a grant  to scrap an Oregon diesel truck engine under sub-
section (1) of this section unless the engine was manufactured  prior to 1994 and the engine is in
operating condition at the time of the grant application or, if repairs are needed, the owner dem-
onstrates to the department’s satisfaction that the engine can  be repaired to an operating condition
for less  than its commercial scrap value. The commission shall adopt rules for a maximum grant
awarded under subsection (1) of this section for an  engine in a heavy-duty truck and for an engine
in a medium-duty truck. A grant awarded under subsection (1) of this section  may not be combined
with any other tax credits, grants or loans, or any other public financial assistance, to scrap  an
Oregon diesel truck engine.
(7) Subject to and consistent with federal law, any moneys  received from the federal government
that are deposited in the Clean Diesel Engine Fund under ORS 468A.801 (2)(b) must  be used for in-
itiatives to reduce emissions from  diesel engines. Subsections (1) to (6) of this section and ORS
468A.797 and 468A.799 do not apply to use of moneys in the fund received from  the federal govern-
ment.
(8) Any moneys received by the State of Oregon pursuant to a  voluntary written agreement or
a settlement approved in an administrative or judicial proceeding that are deposited in  the Clean
Diesel Engine Fund must be used by the department for activities consistent with the terms and
conditions of the agreement or settlement. Subsections (1)  to (6) of this section and ORS 468A.797
and 468A.799 do not apply to the use of moneys in the fund received pursuant to this subsection.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the department may use the  moneys in
the Clean Diesel  Engine Fund to pay expenses of the department in administering the program de-
scribed in ORS 468A.795 to 468A.807.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 468A.807 is amended to read:
468A.807. (1) The Environmental Quality  Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement
ORS 468A.795 to 468A.807.
(2) Rules adopted under  this section must include, but need not be limited to, rules that establish
preferences for awarding grants and loans under ORS 468A.803 (1) based upon:
(a) A percentage of diesel engine use in Oregon;
(b) Whether a grant or loan applicant will provide matching funds;
(c) Whether scrapping, replacement, repowering  or retrofitting an engine will benefit sensitive
populations or areas with elevated concentrations of diesel particulate matter; or
(d) Other criteria as the commission may establish.
(3) The commission shall  appoint an advisory committee composed of the following seven
members to make recommendations to the commission for rules adopted pursuant to this
section and ORS 468A.803 (2):
(a) One member of  the public who is an elected official of a government entity having
[3]
HB 3440
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
jurisdiction in an area with elevated concentrations of diesel particulate matter;
(b) Two members of the public who represent organizations concerned with  the impacts
of diesel emissions on health and communities;
(c) One member of the public who represents the trucking or freight industry;
(d) One member of the public who represents a  business that operates equipment that
is likely to be powered by diesel engines;
(e) One member of the public who  represents contractors or businesses that retain the
services of subcontractors that operate motor vehicles or equipment powered by diesel en-
gines; and
(f) One member of the public who represents environmental justice communities.
[(3)] (4)  Rules adopted by the commission under this section must  reserve a portion of the fi-
nancial assistance available each year for applicants that own or operate a  small number of diesel
engines or Oregon diesel truck engines  and must provide for simplified access to financial assistance
for those applicants.
[(4)] (5)  The Department of  Environmental Quality may perform activities necessary to ensure
that recipients of grants and loans from the Clean Diesel Engine Fund  comply with applicable re-
quirements. If the department determines that a recipient has not complied with applicable require-
ments, the department may order the recipient  to refund all grant or loan moneys and may impose
penalties pursuant to ORS 468.140.
SECTION 7.
Rules adopted by the Environmental Quality Commission as required  by the
amendments to ORS 468A.803 and 468A.807 by sections 5 and 6 of  this 2019 Act must first
become operative no later than June 30, 2020.
SECTION 8. Section 9 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 468A.795 to
468A.807.
SECTION 9.  The Secretary of State shall conduct an  annual audit of the Clean Diesel
Engine Fund pursuant to ORS 297.210. The scope of the audit  may not include an audit of the
use of moneys described in ORS 468A.803 (7) and (8).
SECTION 10. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]