Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Rural area” means an area located in this state that is entirely  outside the ac-
knowledged Portland Metropolitan Area Regional Urban  Growth Boundary and the acknowl-
edged urban growth boundaries of all cities with populations of 30,000 or more.
(b) “Rural county” means an Oregon county with a population of 75,000 or less.
(2) There is created the Oregon Rural Service Center within the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department for  the purpose of assisting rural counties, and cities and special dis-
tricts located in rural  areas, to learn about, successfully apply for and manage grants and
other funding opportunities available from any public or private source in order  to attain the
staffing and financial and technical capacity necessary to carry out proactive strategies for
workforce and economic development in their communities.
(3) The Oregon Business Development Department may  enter into an agreement with the
Association of Oregon Counties and the League  of Oregon Cities pursuant to which the as-
sociation and the league will operate the Oregon Rural Service Center and  carry out the
purposes of this section. The  agreement must require the department to supervise and audit
the performance of the association and the league under the agreement.
(4) The Oregon  Rural Service Center shall assist rural counties, and cities and special
districts located in rural areas, by means that include, but are not limited to:
(a) Outreach to  the counties, cities and special districts about grants and other funding
opportunities;
(b) Employment  of grant writers to provide direct assistance to the counties, cities and
special districts in applying for grants and other funding opportunities; and
(c) Direct assistance in managing funding obtained  by the counties, cities and special
districts.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2845
HB 3110
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
(5)(a) Not later than September 15 of each year, the Oregon  Business Development De-
partment shall provide a  report, in the manner required under ORS 192.245, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to economic development, that describes in
detail the activities and results of the Oregon Rural Service Center’s activities in  carrying
out the duties and authority conferred on the center under this section.
(b) If the Association of Oregon Counties and  the League of Oregon Cities operate the
center pursuant to an agreement entered into  under subsection (3) of this section, the report
shall include the department’s findings from its supervision and  auditing of the performance
of the association and league in operating the center.
(c) In addition, the report shall identify, at a minimum,  for the previous 12-month period:
(A) The counties, cities and special districts that requested assistance from the center;
(B) The counties, cities and special districts that received assistance from the center;
(C) The populations served by  the counties, cities and special districts that requested
assistance from the center;
(D) The populations served by the counties, cities and special districts that received as-
sistance from the center;
(E) The number of funding opportunities, and the dollar amount of  private and public
funds, separately stated, that the counties, cities and special districts applied for with  as-
sistance from the center;
(F) The number of funding opportunities, and the dollar amount of private and  public
funds, separately stated,  that the counties, cities and special districts received with assist-
ance from the center; and
(G) Any other information  that the department considers important to include in the
report.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $  for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2019 Act.
[2]