Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission shall study the establishment
of the Family Preservation  Project pilot program at the Coffee Creek Correctional Facility
to provide services to parents serving sentences of incarceration at the  facility, children of
the parents and caregivers of the children.
(2) The commission shall submit a report with the results of the study in the  manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to the judiciary no later than September 15,
2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 734