Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As  used in this section, “state agency” means a state officer, board,
commission, bureau, department, or  division thereof, in the executive branch of state gov-
ernment, except that “state agency” does not include the office of the Secretary of  State or
office of the State Treasurer.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsection  (3) of this section, the annual salary or wages paid
to any officer or employee of a state agency may not exceed 10 times the lowest annual sal-
ary or wages paid to a full-time officer or employee of the state agency.
(b) For purposes of this section, the  annual salary and wages of an officer or employee
does not include amounts paid to the officer or  employee from private, nongovernmental
sources.
(3) An agency  may request an exemption from the Workers’ Compensation
Management-Labor Advisory Committee to allow the agency  to pay an officer or employee
in excess of the amount allowed under subsection (2) of this section for a  three-year period.
If the  committee grants the exemption under this subsection, the agency may request one
two-year extension of the exemption.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “agency” means  the Secretary of State, the State
Treasurer, the Oregon Health and Science University and the Oregon State Bar.
(2) An agency shall submit  annually to the Legislative Fiscal Officer a list of officers or
employees of the agency whose salary or wages exceeds  10 times the lowest annual salary
or wages paid to a full-time officer or employee of the agency.
SECTION 3. A state agency, as defined in  section 1 of this 2025 Act, shall submit to the
Legislative Fiscal Officer, no later than January 1, 2027, a list of officers or employees of the
agency whose salary or wages exceeds 10 times the lowest annual  salary or wages paid to a
full-time officer or employee of the agency.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1097
HB 2459
1
2
SECTION 4.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2028.
[2]