Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business  Development Department shall conduct a study of
economic development in Oregon. The department shall submit a report of  the study to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to economic  development in the
manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2680