Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Health care practitioner” means a:
(A) Physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(B) Dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679;
(C) Nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
(D) Physician assistant licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525; or
(E) Certified registered nurse anesthetist licensed under ORS chapter 678.
(b) “Prospective health care practitioner” means a person  who has been accepted into,
but has not yet started, a qualifying health profession degree program.
(c) “Qualifying health profession degree program” means a degree program  at Oregon
Health and Science University that meets the educational requirements for  licensure as a
physician, dentist, nurse practitioner, physician assistant or certified nurse anesthetist.
(d) “Recipient” means a person who has been selected by  Oregon Health and Science
University to receive an Indian Health Scholarship under subsection (5) of this section.
(e) “Service agreement” means  the agreement executed by a prospective health care
practitioner under subsection (3) of this section.
(f) “Tribal service site” means a health care facility that is located:
(A) On a federally recognized Oregon Indian reservation; or
(B) In Oregon and serves a patient population that is  at least 50 percent members of a
federally recognized Indian tribe.
(2) There is created the Indian Health Scholarship  Program, to be administered by the
university pursuant to rules adopted by the university. The university  shall determine who
shall receive scholarships under subsection (5) of this section.
(3) A prospective health care practitioner who wishes  to participate in the program shall
submit an application to the university  in accordance with rules adopted by the university.
To be eligible to receive an Indian Health Scholarship,  a prospective health care practitioner
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2267
SB 293
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
must:
(a) Be a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe; and
(b) Execute a service agreement stating that:
(A) Immediately upon the recipient’s completion of the health profession degree,  resi-
dency or training, as established for each degree by the university by  rule, the recipient will
practice as a health care practitioner at a tribal service site for at least the number  of years
that the recipient was enrolled in the health profession degree program for which the recip-
ient received a scholarship; and
(B) While practicing as a health care practitioner at a tribal service site,  the recipient
must meet other requirements established by the university by rule.
(4) Oregon  Health and Science University may select recipients from among the pro-
spective health  care practitioners who submit applications as provided in subsection (3) of
this section. The university shall give preference, in the following order of  priority, to a
prospective health care practitioner who is:
(a) A member of a federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe; or
(b) A resident of this state.
(5) The university shall provide a scholarship covering the entire cost  of tuition and fees
for a recipient’s education in a qualifying health profession degree program.
(6)(a) A recipient who fails  to complete the health profession degree for which the
scholarship was awarded shall repay the amount received to the university.
(b) A recipient  who fails to complete the terms of the service agreement shall repay the
amount received to the university. The total amount to be paid under this paragraph shall
be reduced on a pro rata basis for every full month that the recipient complied  with the
service agreement.
(c) Upon the death of a recipient, any obligation  of the recipient under this subsection
to repay the university shall be canceled.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any case of extreme hardship or for
other good cause shown, the university may  waive, in whole or in part, the right of the
university to recover moneys made available under this section.
(7) In the event that a recipient is  required to repay the university under subsection (6)
of this section, the university may:
(a) Collect any amounts due;
(b) Have any amounts due be collected by the Collections Unit in  the Department of Re-
venue under ORS 293.250; or
(c) Contract with a collections agency to collect any amounts due.
(8) Any  moneys received or collected by the university under subsections (6) and (7) of
this section shall be deposited into a separate fund held by the university for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of this section. The university  may not use the moneys in that
fund for any other purpose.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2019 Act first applies to the 2020-2021 academic year.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to Oregon Health and Science University, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $_______ for the
purpose of administering the Indian Health Scholarship Program created in section 1 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
[2]
SB 293
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2019.
[3]