Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 293.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3149
SB 681
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 2.
(1)(a) The State Treasurer may  not renew investments in or make new in-
vestments in a private market fund if the managers of the  fund have stated an intention to
invest in fossil fuels.
(b) The State Treasurer shall monitor private market funds in  which the State Treasurer
has made investments or may make investments to ensure compliance with this section.
(c) The  State Treasurer shall ensure that contracts with managers of private market
funds are consistent with the requirements of this section.
(2) The State Treasurer shall carry out the duties imposed by this section without  in-
curring material contractual penalty and in  a reasonable and prudent manner by investment
in acceptable institutions at comparable or better rates and returns in  light of the risk and
investment horizon appropriate for each investment fund.
(3) Nothing in this section  is intended to abrogate the fiduciary responsibilities of the
State Treasurer as described in ORS 293.721 and 293.726.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Invest in fossil fuels” means  to make investments, or to intend to actively consider
making investments, of at least 10 percent of assets under management  in companies en-
gaged in any combination of:
(A) Producing, exploring for or extracting fossil fuels;
(B) Transmitting or exporting fossil fuels;
(C) Creating, maintaining or dealing in infrastructure dedicated to  fossil fuels, including
pipelines and terminals; and
(D) Refining or processing crude oil or natural gas.
(b) “Investment” means the commitment of funds or other  assets to a company, includ-
ing a loan or other extension of credit made to that company,  or the ownership or control
of a share or interest in that company or of a bond or other debt instrument issued by that
company.
(c) “Private market fund” includes privately placed investment funds and private  assets,
information about which is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.355.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2031.
SECTION 4. (1) On or before January 15 of each  year, the State Treasurer shall report
to the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 on the subjects  described
in subsection (2) of this section. The State Treasurer shall make reports under this section
publicly available on the website of the State Treasurer.
(2) The report must include descriptions of:
(a) Actions taken by the State Treasurer and the  Oregon Investment Council in the
previous year pursuant to the provisions of section 2 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Actions taken  to reduce the systemic risk of fossil fuels and climate change on the
overall portfolio, including any collaborations with investors or others in order to reduce the
risk of climate change; and
(c) Actions taken to include just transition  principles in the State Treasury’s
decarbonization efforts.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Just transition” means efforts to ensure that the transition to a low-carbon economy
is fair, inclusive and socially equitable, including managing the transition in a way  that pro-
tects workers, communities and vulnerable groups.
[2]
SB 681
1
2
3
(b) “Systemic risk” means large-scale  threats that can affect the entire economy rather
than just one company or sector.
[3]