Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Judicial Department shall establish a Family Treatment Court Pro-
gram in Coos County, Clackamas  County, Douglas County, Jackson County and Marion
County.
(2) The purpose of the program  is to improve outcomes in child welfare cases that result
from a parent’s or  caregiver’s alleged substance use disorder by minimizing or eliminating
the amount of time a  child requires protective custody and by protecting children from abuse
and neglect by addressing the comprehensive needs  of children, parents and family members
through an integrated, court-based collaboration  of court, child welfare, treatment and social
service providers who work as a team  to achieve timely decisions, coordinated treatment and
ancillary services, judicial oversight and safe and permanent placements.
(3)(a) A person is eligible for the program if:
(A) The juvenile  court in one of the counties identified in subsection (1) of this section
has jurisdiction over the person’s child under ORS 419B.100; and
(B) The basis of the juvenile court’s jurisdiction arises from  the person’s alleged sub-
stance use disorder.
(b) A person may not be denied eligibility  to participate in a program under this section
solely for the reason that the  person is taking, or intends to take, medication prescribed by
a licensed health care practitioner for the treatment of drug use or dependency.
(4) The court shall give priority for participation in the program  to persons who have
received treatment support from the pilot project described in section 9, chapter 583, Oregon
Laws 2019.
(5) The presiding judge for the court  shall ensure that each program includes the fol-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 275
HB 4040
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
lowing components:
(a) One judge  dedicated to the program who oversees the program’s court proceedings
and convenes staffing meetings at least  one time each week and program review meetings
at least one time each month;
(b) Prioritized docket time for Family Treatment Court Program cases;
(c) Program  adherence to the following key components and treatment court best prac-
tice standards:
(A) Integration of alcohol and other  drug treatment services with the justice system case
processing;
(B) Use of a nonadversarial approach;
(C) Prosecution  and defense counsel promotion of public safety while protecting
participants’ due process rights; and
(D) Early identification of eligible participants and prompt placement  of participants in
the program;
(d) Participant access to a continuum of alcohol and other drug treatment  and rehabili-
tation services that include an array of culturally responsive support services, including but
not limited to case management, child  care, parenting education, recovery housing, employ-
ment, transportation, mental health, peer support and doula services;
(e) Prioritized access to residential treatment programs that allow infants  and toddlers
to reside with parents;
(f) Ongoing monitoring of participant drug and alcohol abstinence;
(g) A coordinated strategy to govern drug court responses to participants’ compliance;
(h) Continuing interdisciplinary education to promote effective  drug court planning, im-
plementation and operations;
(i) Ongoing judicial interaction with each participant;
(j) Ongoing monitoring and evaluation of program effectiveness; and
(k) Leveraging partnerships among drug courts,  public agencies and community-based
organizations to generate local support and enhance program effectiveness.
(6) The State Court Administrator shall:
(a) Provide regular training programs, peer-to-peer  learning opportunities and periodic
conventions for judges and other stakeholder groups who participate in the program;
(b) Develop state standards and practices for the program;
(c) Provide technical assistance and support to the program;
(d) Coordinate the development and dissemination of performance measures and statis-
tical reports on the program; and
(e) Contract with an external evaluator to conduct process and outcome evaluations.
(7) The administrator shall submit biennial reports to the interim  committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to child welfare no later than September 15 of  each even-
numbered year regarding the status and efficacy  of the programs established under this
section. The reports must include the following information:
(a) The number of families served by each program;
(b) Key child welfare outcome data for program participants; and
(c) The number of participants who successfully completed a treatment program.
(8) The administrator may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
The Public Defense Services Commission  established under ORS 151.213 shall
[2]
HB 4040
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
develop and maintain a Parent-Child Representation Program for the delivery  of legal ser-
vices in the Family Treatment Court Program described in section 1 of this 2020 Act to
persons who are entitled to and financially eligible for court-appointed counsel at state  ex-
pense.
SECTION 3.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium ending June  30, 2021, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $_________ for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1
of this 2020 Act.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Department of Human Services, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $_________ for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1
of this 2020 Act.
(3) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Public Defense Services Commission,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $_________ for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section
2 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 4.
The report described in section 1 (7) of this 2020  Act is first due September
15, 2022.
SECTION 5. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2020 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 6. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2020 Act become operative on January 1, 2021.
(2) The State Court Administrator and the Public  Defense Services Commission may take
any action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is neces-
sary for the  administrator or the commission to exercise, on and after the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers  conferred
on the administrator or the commission by sections 1 and 2 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]