Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 646.605 is amended to read:
646.605. As used in ORS 336.184 and 646.605 to 646.652:
(1) “Appropriate court” means the circuit court of a county:
(a) [ Where one or more of the defendants reside ] In which a defendant resides ;
(b) [ Where one  or more of the defendants maintain ] In which a defendant maintains  a principal
place of business;
(c) [ Where one  or more of the defendants are ] In which a defendant is  alleged to have committed
an act prohibited by ORS 336.184 and 646.605 to 646.652; or
(d) With [ the] a  defendant’s consent, [ where] in which  the prosecuting attorney maintains an
office.
(2) “Documentary material” means the original or a copy of any book, record,  report, memo-
randum, paper, communication, tabulation, map, chart,  photograph, mechanical transcription, or
other tangible document or recording, wherever [ situate] located.
(3) “Examination” [ of documentary material includes inspection, study ] means inspecting,
studying or  copying [ of any such ] documentary material[ ,] and taking testimony under oath or ac-
knowledgment [ regarding any documentary material or  copy thereof ] about the documentary ma-
terial or a copy of the documentary material .
(4) “Person” means  a natural [ persons, corporations, trusts, partnerships, ] person, a corporation,
a trust, a partnership, an  incorporated or unincorporated [ associations] association and any other
legal entity except [ bodies or  officers ] a body or officer that is  acting under  the statutory authority
of this state or the United States.
(5) “Prosecuting attorney” means the Attorney General or the district attorney of any  county
in which a violation of ORS 336.184 and 646.605 to 646.652 is alleged to have occurred.
(6)(a) “Real estate, goods or services” means [ those] real estate, goods or services, including
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3281
SB 728
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
insurance, that are or may be obtained primarily  for personal, family or household purposes  that,
with respect to insurance, are or may be obtained for purposes other than  personal, family
or household purposes, or that are or  may be obtained for any purposes as a result of a telephone
solicitation, and includes loans and extensions of credit[ ,] and franchises, distributorships  and other
similar business opportunities[ , but does not include insurance ].
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection[ :],
[(A) “Real estate” does not cover conduct covered by ORS chapter 90. ]
[(B)] “loans and extensions of credit” does not include transactions [ involving] that involve  a
pawnbroker, as defined in ORS 726.010, that [ is required to ] must  be licensed under ORS  chapter
726.
(7) “Telephone  solicitation” means a solicitation [ where] in which a person, in the course of the
person’s business, vocation or occupation, uses a telephone or an automatic dialing-announcing de-
vice to initiate  telephonic contact with a potential customer and the person is not one of the fol-
lowing:
(a) [ A person who is ] A broker-dealer or salesperson licensed  under ORS 59.175, or a mortgage
banker or mortgage broker licensed under ORS 86A.106, [ when] if  the solicitation is for a security
qualified for sale [ pursuant to ] under ORS 59.055.
(b) A real estate licensee or a person who is otherwise authorized to engage  in professional real
estate activity [ pursuant to ] under ORS chapter 696, [ when] if the solicitation involves professional
real estate activity.
(c) A person licensed or exempt from licensure as a builder [ pursuant to ] under  ORS chapter
701, [when] if the solicitation involves [ the construction, alteration, repair, improvement  or demolition
of] constructing, altering, repairing, improving or demolishing  a structure.
[(d) A person licensed or otherwise authorized to sell  insurance as an insurance producer pursuant
to ORS chapter 744, when the solicitation involves insurance. ]
[(e)] (d)  A person [ soliciting] that  solicits  the sale of a newspaper of general circulation, a
magazine or membership in a book or record club who complies with ORS 646.611, [ when] if  the
solicitation involves newspapers, magazines or membership in a book or record club.
[(f)] (e)  A person [ soliciting] that solicits,  without the intent to complete , and who does not
complete [ the] a  sales presentation during the telephone  solicitation and [ who] that  only completes
the sales presentation at a later face-to-face meeting between  the [ solicitor] person  and the pro-
spective purchaser.
[(g)] (f)  A supervised financial institution or parent, subsidiary or affiliate  [ thereof] of a super-
vised financial institution. As  used in this paragraph, “supervised financial institution” means any
financial institution or trust company, as those terms  are defined in ORS 706.008, or any personal
property broker, consumer finance lender, commercial finance lender or insurer that  is subject to
regulation by an official or agency of this state or of the United States.
[(h)] (g)  A person [ who] that  is authorized to conduct prearrangement or preconstruction fu-
neral or cemetery sales[ , pursuant to ] under  ORS chapter 692, [ when] if  the  solicitation involves
prearrangement or preconstruction funeral or cemetery plans.
[(i)] (h)  A person [ who] that  solicits the services [ provided by ] that  a cable  television system
licensed or franchised [ pursuant to ] under state, local or federal law  provides, [ when] if  the solic-
itation involves cable television services.
[(j)] (i)  A  person or affiliate of a person whose business is regulated by the Public Utility Com-
mission [ of Oregon ].
[2]
SB 728
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(k)] (j)  A person who sells farm products , as defined [ by] in  ORS 576.006 , if  the [ solicitation
neither intends to nor actually results ] person does not intend to complete a sale and the  solic-
itation does not actually result  in a sale that costs the purchaser in excess of $100.
[(L)] (k)  An issuer or subsidiary of an issuer that has a class of  securities that is subject to
section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and that is either registered or exempt from  reg-
istration under paragraph (A), (B), (C), (E), (F), (G) or (H) or subsection (g) of that section.
[(m)] (L)  A person [ soliciting exclusively ] that solicits only  the sale of telephone answering
services [ to be provided  by ] that  the  person or [ that] the  person’s employer [ when] will provide, if
the solicitation involves answering services.
[(n)] (m)  A telecommunications utility with access lines of 15,000  or less or a cooperative tele-
phone association , [ when] if the solicitation involves regulated goods or services.
(8) “Trade” and “commerce” mean advertising, offering or distributing, whether by sale, rental
or otherwise, any real estate, goods or services, and include  any trade or commerce  that  directly
or indirectly [ affecting] affects  the people of this state.
(9) “Unconscionable tactics”  means actions that  include, but are not limited  to, actions [ by]
in which a person:
(a) Knowingly takes advantage of  a customer’s physical infirmity, ignorance, illiteracy or ina-
bility to understand the language of the agreement;
(b) Knowingly permits a customer to enter into a transaction from  which the customer will
derive no material benefit;
(c) Permits  a customer to enter into a transaction [ with knowledge that there is no reasonable
probability of payment of the attendant financial obligation in full by the customer  when due ] knowing
that the customer does not have a reasonable probability of paying the attendant  financial
obligation in full when due ; or
(d) Knowingly takes advantage of  a customer who is a disabled veteran, a disabled
servicemember or a servicemember in active service, or the  spouse of a disabled veteran, disabled
servicemember or servicemember in active service. For purposes of this paragraph:
(A) “Disabled veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(B) “Disabled servicemember” means a servicemember, as defined  in 50 U.S.C. App. 511 as in
effect on [ January 1, 2010 ] the effective date of this 2019 Act , who may be entitled to disability
compensation under laws administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
(C) “Servicemember in active service” means:
(i) A servicemember called into active service under Title 10 or Title 32 of the United States
Code as in effect on [ January 1, 2010 ] the effective date of this 2019 Act ; or
(ii) A servicemember on state active duty, as defined in the Oregon Code of Military Justice.
(10) [ A willful violation occurs when the person committing the violation knew or should have
known that the conduct of the person was a violation ] “Willful”  means a state of mind in which
a person that commits a violation knew or should have known that the  person’s conduct was
a violation.
[(11) A loan is made “in close connection with the sale of a manufactured dwelling” if: ]
[(a) The lender directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by or is under common control with the
seller, unless the relationship is remote and is not a factor in the transaction; ]
[(b) The lender gives a commission, rebate or  credit in any form to a seller who refers the borrower
to the lender, other than payment of the proceeds of the loan jointly to the seller and the borrower; ]
[(c) The lender is related to the seller by blood or marriage; ]
[3]
SB 728
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(d) The seller directly and materially assists the borrower in obtaining the loan; ]
[(e) The seller prepares documents that are  given to the lender and used in connection with the
loan; or]
[(f) The lender supplies documents to the seller used by the borrower in obtaining the loan. ]
SECTION 2.  ORS 646.608 is amended to read:
646.608. (1) A person engages in an unlawful practice if in the course of the  person’s business,
vocation or occupation the person does any of the following:
(a) Passes off real estate, goods or services as the real estate, goods or services of another.
(b) Causes likelihood  of confusion or of misunderstanding as to the source, sponsorship, ap-
proval, or certification of real estate, goods or services.
(c) Causes likelihood of confusion  or of misunderstanding as to affiliation, connection, or asso-
ciation with, or certification by, another.
(d) Uses deceptive representations or designations of  geographic origin in connection with real
estate, goods or services.
(e) Represents that real estate,  goods or services have sponsorship, approval, characteristics,
ingredients, uses, benefits, quantities or  qualities that the real estate, goods or services do not have
or that a person  has a sponsorship, approval, status, qualification, affiliation, or connection that the
person does not have.
(f) Represents that real estate or goods are original or new if the real estate or  goods are de-
teriorated, altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used or secondhand.
(g) Represents that real estate,  goods or services are of a particular standard, quality, or grade,
or that real estate or goods are of a particular  style or model, if the real estate, goods or services
are of another.
(h) Disparages the real estate, goods, services, property or business of  a customer or another
by false or misleading representations of fact.
(i) Advertises  real estate, goods or services with intent not to provide the real estate, goods or
services as advertised, or  with intent not to supply reasonably expectable public demand, unless the
advertisement discloses a limitation of quantity.
(j) Makes false or misleading representations of fact  concerning the reasons for, existence of,
or amounts of price reductions.
(k) Makes false or misleading representations concerning credit availability or the nature of the
transaction or obligation incurred.
(L) Makes false or misleading representations relating  to commissions or other compensation to
be paid in exchange for permitting real estate, goods or  services to be used for model or demon-
stration purposes or in exchange for submitting names of potential customers.
(m) Performs service on or dismantles any goods or real estate if the owner  or apparent owner
of the goods or real estate does not authorize the service or dismantling.
(n) Solicits potential customers by telephone or door to door as a seller  unless the person pro-
vides the information required under ORS 646.611.
(o) In a sale, rental or other disposition of real estate, goods or  services, gives or offers to give
a rebate or  discount or otherwise pays or offers to pay value to the customer in consideration of
the customer giving to the person the names of prospective purchasers, lessees, or  borrowers, or
otherwise aiding the person in making a sale, lease, or loan to  another person, if earning the rebate,
discount  or  other value is contingent upon an event occurring after the time the customer enters
into the transaction.
[4]
SB 728
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(p) Makes any false or misleading statement about a prize, contest or promotion used  to publi-
cize a product, business or service.
(q) Promises to deliver real estate, goods or  services within a certain period of time with intent
not to deliver the real estate, goods or services as promised.
(r) Organizes or induces or attempts to induce membership in a pyramid club.
(s) Makes false or misleading representations of fact concerning the  offering price of, or the
person’s cost for real estate, goods or services.
(t) Concurrent with tender or delivery of any real estate,  goods or services fails to disclose any
known material defect or material nonconformity.
(u) Engages in any other unfair or deceptive conduct in trade or commerce.
(v) Violates any of the provisions relating to auction  sales, consignment sales, auctioneers,
consignees or auction marts under ORS  698.640, whether in a commercial or noncommercial situ-
ation.
(w) Manufactures mercury fever thermometers.
(x) Sells or supplies mercury fever thermometers  unless the thermometer is required by federal
law, or is:
(A) Prescribed by a person licensed under ORS chapter 677; and
(B) Supplied with instructions on the careful handling of  the thermometer to avoid breakage and
on the proper cleanup of mercury should breakage occur.
(y) Sells a  thermostat that contains mercury unless the thermostat is labeled in a manner to
inform the purchaser that mercury is present in the thermostat and  that the thermostat may not be
disposed of until the mercury is removed, reused, recycled or  otherwise managed to ensure that the
mercury does not become part of the solid waste stream or wastewater. For purposes of this  para-
graph, “thermostat” means a device commonly used to sense and, through  electrical communication
with heating, cooling or ventilation equipment, control room temperature.
(z) Sells or offers for sale a motor vehicle manufactured after January 1, 2006, that  contains
mercury light switches.
(aa) Violates the provisions of ORS 803.375, 803.385 or 815.410 to 815.430.
(bb) Violates ORS 646A.070 (1).
(cc) Violates any requirement of ORS 646A.030 to 646A.040.
(dd) Violates the provisions of ORS 128.801 to 128.898.
(ee) Violates ORS 646.883 or 646.885.
(ff) Violates ORS 646.569.
(gg) Violates the provisions of ORS 646A.142.
(hh) Violates ORS 646A.360.
(ii) Violates ORS 646.553 or 646.557 or any rule adopted pursuant thereto.
(jj) Violates ORS 646.563.
(kk) Violates ORS 759.680 or any rule adopted pursuant thereto.
(LL) Violates the provisions  of ORS 759.705, 759.710 and 759.720 or any rule adopted pursuant
thereto.
(mm) Violates ORS 646A.210 or 646A.214.
(nn) Violates any provision of ORS 646A.124 to 646A.134.
(oo) Violates ORS 646A.095.
(pp) Violates ORS 822.046.
(qq) Violates ORS 128.001.
[5]
SB 728
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(rr) Violates ORS 646A.800 (2) to (4).
(ss) Violates ORS 646A.090 (2) to (5).
(tt) Violates ORS 87.686.
(uu) Violates ORS 646A.803.
(vv) Violates ORS 646A.362.
(ww) Violates ORS 646A.052 or any rule adopted under ORS 646A.052 or 646A.054.
(xx) Violates ORS 180.440 (1) or 180.486 (1).
(yy) Commits the offense of acting as a vehicle dealer without a certificate under ORS 822.005.
(zz) Violates ORS 87.007 (2) or (3).
(aaa) Violates ORS 92.405 (1), (2) or (3).
(bbb) Engages in an unlawful practice under ORS 646.648.
(ccc) Violates ORS 646A.365.
(ddd) Violates ORS 98.853, 98.854, 98.856 or 98.858 or a rule adopted under ORS 98.864.
(eee) Sells a gift card in violation of ORS 646A.276.
(fff) Violates ORS 646A.102, 646A.106 or 646A.108.
(ggg) Violates ORS 646A.430 to 646A.450.
(hhh) Violates a provision of ORS 744.318 to 744.384.
(iii) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.702 to 646A.720.
(jjj) Violates ORS 646A.530 30 or more days after a recall notice, warning or  declaration de-
scribed in ORS 646A.530 is issued for the children’s product, as defined in ORS 646A.525, that is the
subject of the violation.
(kkk) Violates a provision of ORS 697.612, 697.642, 697.652, 697.662, 697.682, 697.692 or 697.707.
(LLL) Violates the consumer protection provisions of the Servicemembers  Civil Relief Act, 50
U.S.C. App. 501 et seq., as in effect on January 1, 2010.
(mmm) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.480 to 646A.495.
(nnn) Violates ORS 646A.082.
(ooo) Violates ORS 646.647.
(ppp) Violates ORS 646A.115.
(qqq) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.405.
(rrr) Violates ORS 646A.092.
(sss) Violates a provision of ORS 646.644.
(ttt) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.295.
(uuu) Violates ORS 646A.564.
(vvv) Engages in the business of, or acts in the capacity of,  an immigration consultant, as de-
fined in ORS 9.280, in this state and for compensation, unless federal law authorizes the person to
do so or unless the person is an active member of the Oregon State Bar.
(www) Violates ORS 702.012, 702.029 or 702.054.
(xxx) Violates ORS 646A.806.
(yyy) Violates ORS 646A.810 (2).
(zzz) Violates a provision of sections 1 to 7, chapter 523, Oregon Laws 2015.
(aaaa) Violates ORS 443.376.
(bbbb) Violates a provision of ORS 746.230.
(2) A representation under subsection (1) of this section or  ORS 646.607 may be any manifesta-
tion of any assertion by words or conduct, including, but not limited to, a failure to  disclose a fact.
(3) In order to prevail in an action or suit under ORS 336.184 and  646.605 to 646.652, a prose-
[6]
SB 728
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cuting attorney need not prove competition between the parties or actual confusion  or misunder-
standing.
(4) An action or suit may not be brought under subsection (1)(u) of this  section unless the At-
torney General has  first established a rule in accordance with the provisions of ORS chapter 183
declaring the conduct to be unfair or deceptive in trade or  commerce.  The Attorney General may
not adopt a rule under this  subsection with respect to conduct that is subject to the Insur-
ance Code unless the Attorney General first submits the proposed rule to  the Director of the
Department of Consumer and Business Services for review and approval.
(5) Notwithstanding any  other provision of ORS 336.184 and 646.605 to 646.652, if an action or
suit is brought under subsection (1)(xx) of this section by a person other than a prosecuting  attor-
ney, relief  is limited to an injunction and the prevailing party may be awarded reasonable attorney
fees.
SECTION 3.  ORS 646.608, as amended by section 10, chapter 523, Oregon Laws 2015,  section
15, chapter 113, Oregon Laws 2017,  section 3, chapter 241, Oregon Laws 2017, section 16, chapter
480, Oregon Laws 2017, and section 6, chapter 656, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
646.608. (1) A person engages in an unlawful practice if in the course of the  person’s business,
vocation or occupation the person does any of the following:
(a) Passes off real estate, goods or services as the real estate, goods or services of another.
(b) Causes likelihood  of confusion or of misunderstanding as to the source, sponsorship, ap-
proval, or certification of real estate, goods or services.
(c) Causes likelihood of confusion  or of misunderstanding as to affiliation, connection, or asso-
ciation with, or certification by, another.
(d) Uses deceptive representations or designations of  geographic origin in connection with real
estate, goods or services.
(e) Represents that real estate,  goods or services have sponsorship, approval, characteristics,
ingredients, uses, benefits, quantities or  qualities that the real estate, goods or services do not have
or that a person  has a sponsorship, approval, status, qualification, affiliation, or connection that the
person does not have.
(f) Represents that real estate or goods are original or new if the real estate or  goods are de-
teriorated, altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used or secondhand.
(g) Represents that real estate,  goods or services are of a particular standard, quality, or grade,
or that real estate or goods are of a particular  style or model, if the real estate, goods or services
are of another.
(h) Disparages the real estate, goods, services, property or business of  a customer or another
by false or misleading representations of fact.
(i) Advertises  real estate, goods or services with intent not to provide the real estate, goods or
services as advertised, or  with intent not to supply reasonably expectable public demand, unless the
advertisement discloses a limitation of quantity.
(j) Makes false or misleading representations of fact  concerning the reasons for, existence of,
or amounts of price reductions.
(k) Makes false or misleading representations concerning credit availability or the nature of the
transaction or obligation incurred.
(L) Makes false or misleading representations relating  to commissions or other compensation to
be paid in exchange for permitting real estate, goods or  services to be used for model or demon-
stration purposes or in exchange for submitting names of potential customers.
[7]
SB 728
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(m) Performs service on or dismantles any goods or real estate if the owner  or apparent owner
of the goods or real estate does not authorize the service or dismantling.
(n) Solicits potential customers by telephone or door to door as a seller  unless the person pro-
vides the information required under ORS 646.611.
(o) In a sale, rental or other disposition of real estate, goods or  services, gives or offers to give
a rebate or  discount or otherwise pays or offers to pay value to the customer in consideration of
the customer giving to the person the names of prospective purchasers, lessees, or  borrowers, or
otherwise aiding the person in making a sale, lease, or loan to  another person, if earning the rebate,
discount  or  other value is contingent upon an event occurring after the time the customer enters
into the transaction.
(p) Makes any false or misleading statement about a prize, contest or promotion used  to publi-
cize a product, business or service.
(q) Promises to deliver real estate, goods or  services within a certain period of time with intent
not to deliver the real estate, goods or services as promised.
(r) Organizes or induces or attempts to induce membership in a pyramid club.
(s) Makes false or misleading representations of fact concerning the  offering price of, or the
person’s cost for real estate, goods or services.
(t) Concurrent with tender or delivery of any real estate,  goods or services fails to disclose any
known material defect or material nonconformity.
(u) Engages in any other unfair or deceptive conduct in trade or commerce.
(v) Violates any of the provisions relating to auction  sales, consignment sales, auctioneers,
consignees or auction marts under ORS  698.640, whether in a commercial or noncommercial situ-
ation.
(w) Manufactures mercury fever thermometers.
(x) Sells or supplies mercury fever thermometers  unless the thermometer is required by federal
law, or is:
(A) Prescribed by a person licensed under ORS chapter 677; and
(B) Supplied with instructions on the careful handling of  the thermometer to avoid breakage and
on the proper cleanup of mercury should breakage occur.
(y) Sells a  thermostat that contains mercury unless the thermostat is labeled in a manner to
inform the purchaser that mercury is present in the thermostat and  that the thermostat may not be
disposed of until the mercury is removed, reused, recycled or  otherwise managed to ensure that the
mercury does not become part of the solid waste stream or wastewater. For purposes of this  para-
graph, “thermostat” means a device commonly used to sense and, through  electrical communication
with heating, cooling or ventilation equipment, control room temperature.
(z) Sells or offers for sale a motor vehicle manufactured after January 1, 2006, that  contains
mercury light switches.
(aa) Violates the provisions of ORS 803.375, 803.385 or 815.410 to 815.430.
(bb) Violates ORS 646A.070 (1).
(cc) Violates any requirement of ORS 646A.030 to 646A.040.
(dd) Violates the provisions of ORS 128.801 to 128.898.
(ee) Violates ORS 646.883 or 646.885.
(ff) Violates ORS 646.569.
(gg) Violates the provisions of ORS 646A.142.
(hh) Violates ORS 646A.360.
[8]
SB 728
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) Violates ORS 646.553 or 646.557 or any rule adopted pursuant thereto.
(jj) Violates ORS 646.563.
(kk) Violates ORS 759.680 or any rule adopted pursuant thereto.
(LL) Violates the provisions  of ORS 759.705, 759.710 and 759.720 or any rule adopted pursuant
thereto.
(mm) Violates ORS 646A.210 or 646A.214.
(nn) Violates any provision of ORS 646A.124 to 646A.134.
(oo) Violates ORS 646A.095.
(pp) Violates ORS 822.046.
(qq) Violates ORS 128.001.
(rr) Violates ORS 646A.800 (2) to (4).
(ss) Violates ORS 646A.090 (2) to (5).
(tt) Violates ORS 87.686.
(uu) Violates ORS 646A.803.
(vv) Violates ORS 646A.362.
(ww) Violates ORS 646A.052 or any rule adopted under ORS 646A.052 or 646A.054.
(xx) Violates ORS 180.440 (1) or 180.486 (1).
(yy) Commits the offense of acting as a vehicle dealer without a certificate under ORS 822.005.
(zz) Violates ORS 87.007 (2) or (3).
(aaa) Violates ORS 92.405 (1), (2) or (3).
(bbb) Engages in an unlawful practice under ORS 646.648.
(ccc) Violates ORS 646A.365.
(ddd) Violates ORS 98.853, 98.854, 98.856 or 98.858 or a rule adopted under ORS 98.864.
(eee) Sells a gift card in violation of ORS 646A.276.
(fff) Violates ORS 646A.102, 646A.106 or 646A.108.
(ggg) Violates ORS 646A.430 to 646A.450.
(hhh) Violates a provision of ORS 744.318 to 744.384.
(iii) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.702 to 646A.720.
(jjj) Violates ORS 646A.530 30 or more days after a recall notice, warning or  declaration de-
scribed in ORS 646A.530 is issued for the children’s product, as defined in ORS 646A.525, that is the
subject of the violation.
(kkk) Violates a provision of ORS 697.612, 697.642, 697.652, 697.662, 697.682, 697.692 or 697.707.
(LLL) Violates the consumer protection provisions of the Servicemembers  Civil Relief Act, 50
U.S.C. App. 501 et seq., as in effect on January 1, 2010.
(mmm) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.480 to 646A.495.
(nnn) Violates ORS 646A.082.
(ooo) Violates ORS 646.647.
(ppp) Violates ORS 646A.115.
(qqq) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.405.
(rrr) Violates ORS 646A.092.
(sss) Violates a provision of ORS 646.644.
(ttt) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.295.
(uuu) Violates ORS 646A.564.
(vvv) Engages in the business of, or acts in the capacity of,  an immigration consultant, as de-
fined in ORS 9.280, in this state and for compensation, unless federal law authorizes the person to
[9]
SB 728
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
do so or unless the person is an active member of the Oregon State Bar.
(www) Violates ORS 702.012, 702.029 or 702.054.
(xxx) Violates ORS 646A.806.
(yyy) Violates ORS 646A.810 (2).
(zzz) Violates ORS 443.376.
(aaaa) Violates a provision of ORS 746.230.
(2) A representation under subsection (1) of this section or  ORS 646.607 may be any manifesta-
tion of any assertion by words or conduct, including, but not limited to, a failure to  disclose a fact.
(3) In order to prevail in an action or suit under ORS 336.184 and  646.605 to 646.652, a prose-
cuting attorney need not prove competition between the parties or actual confusion  or misunder-
standing.
(4) An action or suit may not be brought under subsection (1)(u) of this  section unless the At-
torney General has  first established a rule in accordance with the provisions of ORS chapter 183
declaring the conduct to be unfair or deceptive in trade or  commerce. The Attorney General may
not adopt a rule under this  subsection with respect to conduct that is subject to the Insur-
ance Code unless the Attorney General first submits the proposed rule to  the Director of the
Department of Consumer and Business Services for review and approval.
(5) Notwithstanding any  other provision of ORS 336.184 and 646.605 to 646.652, if an action or
suit is brought under subsection (1)(xx) of this section by a person other than a prosecuting  attor-
ney, relief  is limited to an injunction and the prevailing party may be awarded reasonable attorney
fees.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 646.612 is amended to read:
646.612. ORS 646.607 and 646.608 do not apply to:
(1) Conduct [ in compliance ] that complies  with [ the] orders , [ or] rules  [ of,] or a statute [ admin-
istered by ] that  a federal, state or local governmental agency  administers.
(2) Acts [ done by the ] that a  publisher,  owner, agent or employee of a newspaper, periodical,
telephone directory or radio or  television station [ in the publication or dissemination of ] does in
publishing or disseminating an advertisement, [ when] if  the publisher,  owner, agent or employee
did not [ have knowledge of ] know the false, misleading or deceptive character  of the advertisement.
(3) Conduct for which ORS chapter 90 provides a remedy.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 646.636 is amended to read:
646.636. [The] A  court may make [ such] additional orders or judgments [ as may be ] that  the
court deems  necessary to restore to any person in interest any moneys or property, real or per-
sonal, of which the person was deprived by means of any practice declared to be unlawful in  ORS
646.607 or 646.608, [ or as may be necessary ] to ensure cessation of unlawful trade  practices  and to
provide any other equitable relief to the person in interest that the court deems
appropriate.
SECTION 6.  ORS 646.638 is amended to read:
646.638. (1) Except as provided in subsections (8) and (9) of this section, a person  that suffers
an ascertainable loss of money or property, real or personal, as a  result of another person’s willful
use or employment of a method, act or practice  declared unlawful under ORS 646.608, may bring an
individual action in an appropriate  court to recover actual damages or statutory damages of $200,
whichever is greater , and to obtain appropriate equitable relief . The court or  the jury may award
punitive damages and the court may provide  any equitable relief the court considers necessary or
proper.
[10]
SB 728
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) A person that brings an action under subsection (1) of this section shall  mail a copy of the
complaint or other initial pleading to the  Attorney General at the time the action commences and,
upon entry of  any judgment in the action, shall mail a copy of the judgment to the Attorney General.
Failure to mail a copy of the complaint is not a jurisdictional defect, but a court may  not enter
judgment for the plaintiff  until proof of mailing is filed with the court. Proof of mailing may be by
affidavit or by return receipt  of mailing.  As soon as is practicable, the Attorney General shall
provide the Director  of the Department of Consumer and Business Services with a copy of
any complaint or  other initial pleading, and any judgment, that the Attorney General re-
ceives under this subsection in connection with an action that is related  to insurance or in-
volves a method, act or practice that is also subject to the Insurance Code.
(3) The court may award reasonable attorney fees and costs at trial and on appeal to  a pre-
vailing plaintiff in an action under this section. The court may award  reasonable attorney fees and
costs at trial and  on appeal to a prevailing defendant only if the court finds that an objectively
reasonable basis for bringing the action or asserting the ground for appeal did not exist.
(4) The court may not award attorney fees to a prevailing defendant under the provisions  of
subsection (3) of this section  if the action under this section is maintained as a class action pursuant
to ORCP 32.
(5) Any permanent injunction or final judgment or order the court makes under  ORS 646.632 or
646.636 is prima facie evidence in an action brought under this section that the respondent used or
employed a method, act or practice declared unlawful under ORS 646.608, but an assurance of  vol-
untary compliance, whether or not approved by the court, is not evidence of the violation.
(6) Actions brought under this  section must be commenced within one year after the discovery
of the unlawful method, act or practice. Notwithstanding this limitation, if a prosecuting  attorney
filed a complaint to prevent, restrain or punish a violation of ORS 646.608, the complaint tolls  the
statute of limitations with respect to every private right of action under this section that is based
in whole or in part on any matter set forth in the  prosecuting attorney’s complaint for the period
of time in which the proceeding that the prosecuting attorney initiated is pending.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (6) of this section,  in any action that a seller or lessor brings
against a purchaser or lessee of real estate, goods or services, the purchaser or  lessee may assert
any counterclaim that  the purchaser or lessee has arising out of a violation of ORS 336.184 and
646.605 to 646.652.
(8) A class action may be maintained under this section. In any class action under this section:
(a) Statutory damages under subsection (1) of this section may be recovered on behalf  of class
members only if the plaintiffs in the action establish that the members have  sustained an
ascertainable loss of money or property as a result of a reckless or knowing use or  employment by
the defendant of a method, act or practice declared unlawful by ORS 646.608;
(b) The trier of fact may award punitive damages; and
(c) The court may award appropriate equitable relief.
(9) This section does not apply to:
(a) Any method, act or  practice described in ORS 646.608 (1)(aa). Actions for violation of laws
relating to odometers are provided under ORS 815.410 and 815.415.
(b) A violation of ORS 86.726 (1)(a) or (2), 86.729 (4) or 86.732 (1) or (2).
SECTION 7.
 ORS 646.648 is amended to read:
646.648. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Buyer” means a person who buys or agrees to buy a manufactured dwelling from a manu-
[11]
SB 728
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
factured dwelling dealer.
(b) “Cash sale price” means the price for which a manufactured dwelling dealer  would sell to
a buyer, and the buyer would buy from a dealer, a manufactured dwelling that is covered by  a
purchase agreement, if the sale were a sale for cash instead of a retail installment sale.
(c) “Manufactured dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 446.003.
(d) “Manufactured dwelling dealer” means a person licensed under ORS 446.691 or 446.696 or a
temporary manufactured structure dealer licensee under ORS 446.701.
(e) “Person” means a natural person, a corporation,  a trust, a partnership, an incorpo-
rated or unincorporated association or any other legal entity.
[(e)] (f)  “Retail installment sale” has the meaning given that term in ORS 83.510.
(2) A manufactured dwelling dealer engages in an unlawful practice when, in  a sale of a manu-
factured dwelling, the dealer does any of the following:
(a) Misrepresents to a buyer that, as a condition of financing, the buyer must purchase:
(A) Credit life insurance;
(B) Credit disability insurance;
(C) Credit unemployment insurance;
(D) Credit property insurance;
(E) Health insurance;
(F) Life insurance; or
(G) An extended warranty.
(b) In close connection with the sale, misrepresents to a lender:
(A) The cash sale price;
(B) The amount of the buyer’s down payment; or
(C) The buyer’s credit or employment history.
(3) For purposes of subsection (2)(b) of this section, a loan is made in  close connection
with the sale of a manufactured dwelling if:
(a) The lender directly or indirectly controls, is  controlled by or is under common control
with the seller, unless the relationship is remote and is not a factor in the transaction;
(b) The lender gives a commission, rebate or credit in any  form to a seller who refers the
borrower to the lender, other than paying the proceeds of the loan jointly to the  seller and
the borrower;
(c) The lender is related to the seller by blood or marriage;
(d) The seller directly and materially assists the borrower in obtaining the loan;
(e) The seller prepares documents that are given to the  lender and used in connection
with the loan; or
(f) The lender supplies documents  to the seller that the borrower uses in obtaining the
loan.
SECTION 8.
Section 9 of this  2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 646.605 to
646.652.
SECTION 9. A prosecuting attorney may not take action under ORS 646.618 or 646.632
with respect to an act or practice declared to be unlawful under ORS 646.607 or 646.608 if the
act or practice  is related to insurance and otherwise subject to the Insurance Code unless
the Director of the Department  of Consumer and Business Services first requests the pros-
ecuting attorney to  take action. The director may elect to be named as a party in any action
or proceeding that the prosecuting attorney commences at the director’s request.
[12]
SB 728
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
SECTION 10. Section 9 of this 2019  Act and the amendments to ORS 646.605, 646.608,
646.612, 646.636, 646.638 and 646.648 by sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act  apply to proceedings
that begin on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 11. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[13]