Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Department of Education shall hire and place in public schools clin-
ical social workers licensed under ORS 675.530 for the purposes of:
(a) Reducing student absenteeism;
(b) Improving student academic achievement levels;
(c) Reducing bullying; and
(d) Reducing drug use by students.
(2) The department shall make a reasonable effort to ensure that the  placement of li-
censed clinical social workers is geographically egalitarian and shall consider when making
placements, among other factors the department determines  are relevant, the number of
students enrolled in a school.
(3) The department shall  report on the impacts of clinical social workers in the schools
to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to education not later than
December 30 of each year. The report must include, but need not be limited to, findings on:
(a) Reduction in student absenteeism;
(b) Improved levels of academic achievement;
(c) Reduction in bullying; and
(d) Reduction in drug use by students.
(4) The State Board of Education may adopt  rules necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $4,000,000, which may be expended for the purposes of section
1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2020.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2041
HB 2174
1
[2]