Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Oregon Commission on Artificial Intelligence is established. The
purpose of the commission is to:
(a) Serve as a central resource  for legislators to monitor trends in and impacts from the
use of artificial intelligence technologies; and
(b) Identify and report on long-term policy implications in the use of artificial intelligence
technologies to assist policymakers  in making strategic, well-informed decisions that foster
innovation while safeguarding the well-being of Oregonians.
(2) The commission shall:
(a) Conduct a literature review of public policy issues around the use  of artificial intelli-
gence technologies, including the benefits and risks to the broader public and historically
disadvantaged communities, taking into consideration  equity, workforce impacts and ethical
concerns;
(b) Conduct a review of existing protections under federal,  state and local laws of
individuals’ data and privacy rights, civil rights, intellectual property rights and safety, and
how federal, state and local laws that apply to  artificial intelligence technologies align, differ,
conflict or interact;
(c) Identify uses of artificial intelligence systems that present  or create a high risk to
individuals, such as risks to individuals’ safety, employment rights,  civil rights or constitu-
tional rights;
(d) Identify opportunities to support or promote innovation in  artificial intelligence
technologies through the use of grants or incentives;
(e) Provide recommendations on appropriate uses and limitations on  the use of artificial
intelligence;
(f) Identify current and future economic opportunities that are  available in this state and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 715
HB 3592
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
policies to maximize those opportunities, including workforce development;
(g) Identify impacts from the use of artificial  intelligence systems on privacy interests
of individuals in this state and what policies are needed to protect individuals’ privacy  in-
terests from any diminution caused  by the use of artificial intelligence systems in the private
or public sector;
(h) Identify impacts from the use of artificial intelligence systems on jobs and  incomes
in this state and policies needed to protect jobs and incomes from adverse effects  from the
use of artificial intelligence systems;
(i) Review the state of education in this state around  the uses of artificial intelligence
systems at the primary, secondary and post-secondary education levels  and identify at what
level of education different subjects that  incorporate information about artificial intelligence
technologies, including ethics, are taught;
(j) Provide recommendations relating to the industry-wide standards and legal use of data
to train artificial intelligence models;
(k) Conduct a review of issues around unlawful discrimination, on the basis of race, color,
national origin, creed, religion,  sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, age, vet-
eran or military status, marital status, family status or any other protected class, from  the
use of  artificial intelligence systems and provide recommendations for mitigating or pro-
tecting against such discrimination;
(L) Provide recommendations on prioritizing transparency to improve  the understanding
of the behavior  and functional components of artificial intelligence systems and enable the
identification of performance issues,  safety and privacy concerns, biases, exclusionary prac-
tices and unintended outcomes;
(m) Conduct a review of legal and contractual protections for individual personhood
against the use of artificial intelligence systems  to create an artificial replica, including an
artificial replica of a person’s voice, image or likeness; and
(n) Conduct a review  on the use of artificial intelligence systems to support or make
decisions around employment.
(3) The commission shall consist of 14 voting members and  three nonvoting members as
follows:
(a) The Governor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by  the Senate in the manner
prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565, the following voting members:
(A) Three members who represent business leagues, including trade or  professional as-
sociations.
(B) Three members who represent workers,  including from organized labor and trade or
professional associations.
(C) One member who represents consumer advocacy groups.
(D) One member who represents the public universities listed in ORS  352.002 or commu-
nity colleges and has expertise in the design and effects of artificial intelligence systems.
(E) One member who represents  the education system from early learning through high
school.
(F) One member who represents communities that are disproportionately  vulnerable to
being harmed by algorithmic bias.
(G) One member who has expertise in ethics and technology.
(H) One member who has expertise in privacy and data protection.
[2]
HB 3592
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(I) One member who represents public safety.
(J) One member who represents tribal governments.
(b) The nonvoting members shall be:
(A) The Chief Artificial Intelligence Officer or the officer’s designee.
(B) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries or  the commissioner’s
designee.
(C) The Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee.
(4) The voting members of the commission must have experience in technology policy.
(5) The term of office of each voting member is three years. A voting member serves
at the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term  of a voting member, the
Governor shall appoint a successor whose term begins on  January 1 of the following year.
A voting member may be reappointed.  If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall
make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(6)(a) The commission may establish one or more advisory subcommittees to advise  in
an area impacted by artificial intelligence. An advisory  subcommittee may be established for
an ongoing or limited duration. In establishing an advisory subcommittee, the commission
shall define the  advisory subcommittee’s charge, subject area of focus and scope of activity.
An advisory subcommittee’s subject area of focus  may include, but is not limited to, one or
more of the following areas:
(A) Workforce and labor;
(B) Privacy and data;
(C) Ethics and bias in health  care, housing, law enforcement, education, civil rights or
employment;
(D) Education; or
(E) Innovation.
(b) Members of  an advisory subcommittee are appointed by the chairperson of the com-
mission subject to approval by a majority of the voting members of the commission.
(c) An advisory subcommittee shall consist of no more than seven members.
(d) Members of an advisory subcommittee must represent a broad  and diverse cross
section of stakeholders in the area advised on by the advisory subcommittee  and include, at
a minimum, the following members:
(A) One member who has industry expertise relevant to the advisory  subcommittee’s
subject area of focus.
(B) One member who represents an advocacy group.
(C) One member who represents an organization that represents work in an  area that is
relevant to the advisory subcommittee’s subject area of focus.
(e) Members of the commission may not serve on an advisory subcommittee.
(7) In carrying out  the commission’s duties, the commission shall seek input from com-
munity members and  state agencies, including the Department of Education, Department of
Consumer and Business Services, Oregon Health Authority and State Department  of Energy
and any other state agency.
(8) On or before September 1 of each year, the commission shall submit a report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, regu-
lations or policies, to the Legislative Assembly.
(9) A majority of  voting members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the
[3]
HB 3592
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
transaction of business.
(10) The commission shall elect one of its  voting members to serve as chairperson of the
commission.
(11) The commission shall meet at least  once every three months at times and places
specified by the call of the chairperson  or of a majority of voting members of the commis-
sion.
(12) Members of the commission  shall be paid compensation and expenses as provided in
ORS 292.495 from such funds as may be available to the commission.
(13) The Chief Artificial Intelligence Officer shall provide  resources and staffing required
by the commission to carry out the commission’s duties.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding the term of  office specified in section 1 (5) of this 2025 Act,
of the voting members first appointed to the commission:
(1) Four shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2028.
(2) Five shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2029.
(3) Five shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2030.
SECTION 3.
(1) The State Chief  Information Officer shall appoint a Chief Artificial In-
telligence Officer.
(2) The Chief Artificial Intelligence Officer shall:
(a) Assist  and advise the Oregon Commission on Artificial Intelligence established under
section 1 of this 2025 Act; and
(b) Provide policy and support staff to the commission to  assist the commission in car-
rying out the commission’s duties.
SECTION 4.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may  charge an assess-
ment to a state or local agency, officer, board or commission for the cost  incurred by the
department or the Oregon Commission on Artificial Intelligence in providing services related
to artificial intelligence  systems requested by a state or local agency, officer, board or com-
mission.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Chief Artificial Intelligence Officer, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may  be expended by the Chief Artificial
Intelligence Officer to hire additional full-time employees to enable the Chief  Artificial In-
telligence Officer  to carry out the Chief Artificial Intelligence Officer’s duties under sections
1 and 3 of this 2025 Act.
[4]