Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Early Learning Division shall develop  a plan to coordinate the pro-
vision of services to children zero through six years of age.
(2) The division shall report on  the plan to an appropriate interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly no later than September 1, 2021.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2021.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3479