Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “performance audit” has  the meaning given that
term in ORS 297.070.
(2) The Division of Audits shall conduct  a performance audit of the Department of
Transportation relating to the use of moneys in the State Highway Fund.
(3) The division shall complete the performance audit on or before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2916