Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall conduct a study to examine the im-
pact of biennial legislative appropriations that are less than the  amount of moneys deter-
mined by the Quality Education Commission to be sufficient to ensure that the  state’s
system of kindergarten through grade 12 public education meets state quality goals.
(2) The department shall report the results of the study in the  manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to  an interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4219