Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Secretary of State shall publish each month on  the website main-
tained by the secretary a  statistical report on voter registrations for each county in this
state.
(2) The report published under  subsection (1) of this section must include, for the pre-
ceding month:
(a) The number of registration cards, as defined in ORS 247.002, received;
(b) The number of registration cards rejected;
(c) The number of voter registration transactions as follows:
(A) New voter registrations;
(B) Address changes;
(C) Political party affiliation changes; and
(D) Name changes;
(d) The number of registration cancellations for the following reasons:
(A) Residential address changes outside of the county;
(B) Death; and
(C) Any other reason identified by the secretary in the report; and
(e) The number of political party affiliations, listed by political party, as of the end of  the
reporting period, including:
(A) Active registrations;
(B) Inactive registrations; and
(C) Total number of active and inactive registrations.
(3) The secretary shall establish by rule the process by which each  county clerk in this
state shall provide each month to the secretary the information required under subsection
(2) of this section to be published in the report required under  subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The Secretary of State may take any action before the operative date  specified in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1204
HB 2435
1
2
3
4
subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the secretary to  exercise, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section, all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the secretary by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
[2]