Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any authorization to issue  general obli-
gation bonds under ORS 286A.035, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, at the request of
the State Forestry Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue general obligation
bonds under Article XI-E  of the Oregon Constitution, in accordance with the provisions of
ORS 530.210 to 530.280, in an amount that produces up to $500 million in net proceeds for the
purpose specified in subsection (2) of this section, plus an amount  estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds  of bonds issued under this section must be deposited in the State
Treasury as  described in ORS 530.240 and used for the purposes described in section 2 of this
2025 Act.
(3) As used  in this section, “bond-related costs” has the meaning given that term in ORS
530.005.
SECTION 2.
(1) The State Forestry Department  shall establish a Strategic Carbon
Sequestration and Forestry Sustainability Program.
(2) The State Board of Forestry shall appoint a Strategic Carbon Sequestration  and
Forestry Sustainability Advisory Board to advise the program.
(3) The program shall:
(a) Facilitate public-private  partnerships related to forest management, forest rehabili-
tation and reforestation; and
(b) Promote longer-term forest growth  cycles and other forest management strategies
that sequester carbon.
(4) The State Board of Forestry shall adopt rules to administer the program.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2039