Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Agency adoption” means  an adoption facilitated by an Oregon licensed adoption
agency.
(b) “Birth parent” means a person who has placed the person’s child for adoption.
(c) “Expectant parent”  means a person who is pregnant or the biological parent of the
unborn child of a pregnant person.
(d) “Home study” has the meaning given that term in ORS 109.266.
(2) The Department of  Human Services shall establish the Adoption Awareness Program.
The department shall contract with a nonprofit organization or  agency to administer the
program. The nonprofit organization or agency must:
(a) Be  in good standing with the Secretary of State and registered to do business in this
state;
(b) Be capable of providing, directly or through subcontractors,  the services described in
this section; and
(c) Not be an abortion provider or an entity that promotes, refers for  or assists pregnant
persons in obtaining abortions.
(3) The program administrator shall provide the following resources and services:
(a) Marketing to provide awareness of adoption and specific adoption resources  available
in this state, including the creation of printed brochures and a  website providing information
on adoption and a directory of licensed adoption agencies that facilitate agency adoptions;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2095
HB 3057
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A telephone hotline that provides information about adoption resources and  services,
including:
(A) Information about the adoption process  and the practical aspects of adoption that are
pertinent to an expectant parent;
(B) Contact information for  resources and support that are available for expectant par-
ents, birth parents and adopted children;
(C) The rights and legal protections for expectant parents considering placing  a child for
adoption and birth parents; and
(D) Contact information for licensed adoption agencies in this state; and
(c) Adoption education and training resources for doctors,  nurses, hospitals, medical
clinics, birthing centers and pregnancy resource centers, including, at a minimum:
(A) A directory of professionals and organizations that serve pregnant persons and  pro-
vide support for a pregnant person considering placing a child for adoption;
(B) A directory  of licensed adoption agencies in this state that can facilitate the place-
ment of a child for adoption; and
(C) Suggested best practices for how to discuss the adoption process and the  available
adoption resources and support with expectant parents.
(4) The department shall provide copies  of the marketing materials developed by the
program administrator under subsection (3) of this section to:
(a) Public health offices;
(b) High schools and middle schools;
(c) Charitable clinics where a diagnosis of pregnancy may be made;
(d) Persons obtaining testing through public health offices for sexually transmitted in-
fections;
(e) Pregnant persons applying for Medicaid; and
(f) Parents of children in the care or custody of the department.
(5) To be eligible to receive services from the program, an expectant  parent or a birth
parent must be a resident of this state and an individual who meets at least one  of the fol-
lowing criteria:
(a) A biological parent of an unborn child;
(b) A parent of a child under two years of age;
(c) A parent of a child in the care or custody of the department; or
(d) A parent of a minor child who is the biological parent of an unborn child.
(6) The department  shall adopt by rule a process for the program to provide reimburse-
ments to:
(a) Prospective adoptive parents for expenses associated with the adoption  process, in-
cluding expenses incurred to qualify  as a foster parent or respite provider and for home
studies; and
(b) Birth parents and expectant parents for expenses incurred for any counseling services
that are required for an adoption to be approved by the court.
(7) The program administrator shall submit monthly reports to the department  describ-
ing:
(a) The number of individuals who obtained services from the program;
(b) The number and types of services provided by the program; and
(c) The number and types of referrals made by the program.
[2]
HB 3057
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
(8) The department shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to  the
interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly related to human services no later than
September 15 of each  even-numbered year summarizing the information reported to the de-
partment under subsection (7) of this section, after redacting  any private medical informa-
tion and any  other privileged information associated with expectant parents, birth parents,
unborn children and any other children served by the program.
(9) The department’s contract with the program administrator must:
(a) Allow the program administrator to use program moneys for:
(A) Expenses necessary to provide the services described in this section;
(B) A marketing campaign within this state to promote adoption;
(C) Administrative overhead and other indirect costs associated with the program; and
(D) Administrative expenses related  to administrative overhead and other indirect ex-
penses if the  administrative expenses are approved by the department and do not exceed 15
percent of the total moneys distributed to the program by the department.
(b)(A) Require the department to distribute moneys to the  program to cover the
program’s anticipated quarterly expenses in advance on a quarterly basis;
(B) Require the program administrator to provide the department with a reconciliation
of the program’s actual quarterly expenses with the  anticipated quarterly expenses no later
than 10 days following the end of the quarter; and
(C) Direct  the department to offset any difference between the anticipated and actual
quarterly expenses identified by the program  administrator against future quarterly distrib-
utions.
(10)(a) The  department may not require the program administrator or its employees to
violate rights guaranteed by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution  or Ar-
ticle I, section 8, of the Oregon Constitution.
(b) The program administrator and its employees may refuse to  offer information or
services regarding reproductive  health care, as defined in ORS 435.190, to program partic-
ipants to the extent that providing the information or services is contrary to  the personal
or religious beliefs of the program administrator or employee. Notwithstanding ORS 435.225,
if the  program administrator or employee refuses to offer information or services under this
subsection, the program administrator and its  employee are not required to notify the de-
partment of the refusal or to  make arrangements for the program participant to receive the
information or services from another officer, employee or agent of the department.
(c) A program administrator may offer religious  or sectarian services or programs if the
services or programs are not supported by moneys distributed to the  program by the de-
partment.
[3]