Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this  section, “participatory budgeting” means the delegation
of budgeting power directly to students to make determinations about how to spend a portion
of a school district budget.
(2) The Department of Education shall establish and administer a pilot program  that
provides for participatory budgeting in the preparation of the budget of a school  district
under ORS 328.542.
(3) Under the pilot program, the department shall award grants to public  schools in this
state to:
(a) Recruit and train students to participate in participatory budgeting; and
(b) Maximize the shared decision-making among students, teachers and administrators.
(4)(a) The State Board of Education  shall adopt by rule the requirements for a school
district to apply for a grant under  this section and the amounts of grants to be awarded
under this section.
(b) When adopting rules as provided by this subsection, the board  shall consult with a
nonprofit organization with experience in implementing participatory budgeting.
(5) The department shall first award a grant under this section no  later than October 1,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2376
SB 749
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
2025.
(6) The department shall submit reports concerning the pilot program to  the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education as follows:
(a) A progress report must be submitted no later than September 15, 2026; and
(b) A final report must be submitted no later  than September 15, 2028, to summarize the
outcomes of the program.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $500,000, which  may be expended for the pilot program estab-
lished under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]