Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of State Police shall study locations where controlled
substances can be incinerated.
(2) The department shall provide the results of the  study, including any recommended
legislative changes, in  a report to the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4546