Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
No later than December  1, 2020, the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services shall submit a report to the Joint Interim  Committee on Ways and Means regarding
procedures for developing the biennial state budget. The  report may include recommen-
dations for legislative changes.
SECTION 2. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 132