Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Water Resources Department,  for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for the purposes of:
(1) Planning water use on local and regional bases;
(2) Developing a system for identifying  local and regional water use needs and prioritizing
among local and regional water use needs; and
(3) Implementing local and regional water use strategies and plans.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2434