Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall provide one or
more grants to a nonprofit organization for the  purposes of developing or improving
infrastructure for a manufactured dwelling park.
(2) A nonprofit organization eligible for  grants under this section must own or have made
plans to purchase or develop a manufactured dwelling park in Springfield, Oregon.
(3) A nonprofit organization receiving grants  under this section shall enter into an
agreement with the department  and a local housing authority that requires the nonprofit to:
(a) Ensure that the  manufactured dwelling park primarily supports residents who are low
income or who have been displaced by the recent closure of an existing park;
(b) Provide a report to the department on or before November 15, 2020, that includes:
(A) The nonprofit organization’s accounting and use of grant moneys under this  section;
(B) Identification of other moneys or other assistance that the nonprofit  organization
was able to obtain or plans to obtain to support the  acquisition and development of the park
or to acquire manufactured  dwellings made available for rent or purchase by the nonprofit
organization in the park;
(C) Identification  of other moneys or other assistance that the nonprofit organization
obtained, or assisted the residents of the park in obtaining,  that provided direct support to
the park’s low income and  displaced residents, including outreach and counseling, and ac-
quisition, rehabilitation, transportation or demolition of manufactured dwellings;
(D) Outreach, counseling and other  resources that the nonprofit has provided or plans
to provide to the park’s low income and displaced residents; and
(E) Lessons learned and any best practices identified  by the nonprofit regarding subpar-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2303
HB 3313
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
agraphs (A) to (D) of this paragraph; and
(c) Meet any other requirements that the department may establish.
SECTION 2.
In addition to the funds appropriated by  section 8 of this 2019 Act,
notwithstanding ORS 456.579 (1) and 456.581,  the Housing and Community Services Depart-
ment may use moneys available  in the Manufactured Dwelling Parks Account established
under ORS 458.579 to fund grants under section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2019 Act are repealed on June 30, 2023.
SECTION 4. (1) The Mobile  Home Parks Purchase Account is renamed the Manufactured
Dwelling Parks Account.
(2) Whenever, in any statutory law or resolution of the Legislative Assembly or in any
rule, document, record or  proceeding authorized by the Legislative Assembly, reference is
made to the Mobile  Home Parks Purchase Account, the reference is considered to be a ref-
erence to the Manufactured Dwelling Parks Account.
(3) For the purpose  of harmonizing and clarify statutory law, the Legislative Counsel may
substitute for words designating the “Mobile Home Parks Purchase Account,” wherever  they
occur in statutory law, words designating the “Manufactured Dwelling Parks Account.”
SECTION 5.  ORS 456.579 is amended to read:
456.579. (1) There is established separate and distinct from the General Fund an  account to be
known as the [ Mobile Home Parks Purchase ] Manufactured Dwelling Parks  Account. [ Except as
otherwise provided by law, all Moneys credited to the Mobile  Home Parks Purchase ] Moneys in the
account are continuously appropriated [ continuously] to the [ Director of the ] Housing and  Commu-
nity Services Department for the purpose of  carrying out the duties and responsibilities imposed
upon the [ Housing and Community Services ] department under ORS 90.800 to 90.850 and 456.581 and
this section. Interest earned on [ moneys in ] the account [ must be] is  credited to the account.
(2) Except for loans provided  in ORS 90.840, moneys in the account described in subsection (1)
of this section may not be connected to or commingled in any way with the moneys in the fund de-
scribed in ORS 456.720.
(3) For the purpose of  carrying out the provisions of ORS 90.800 to 90.850 and 456.581 and this
section, the [ Housing and Community Services ] department may seek moneys  from any lawful source.
Moneys obtained by the  department pursuant to this subsection must be credited to the [ Mobile
Home Parks Purchase ] account.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 456.581 is amended to read:
456.581. The [ Mobile Home Parks Purchase ] Manufactured Dwelling Parks Account established
in ORS 456.579 shall be used by the Housing and Community Services Department to provide:
(1) Technical assistance  to tenants’ associations, manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooper-
atives, tenants’  association supported nonprofit organizations and housing authorities and to help
tenants in activities related to the purchase or preservation of  a mobile home park or a manufac-
tured dwelling park  by a tenants’ association, a manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperative,
a tenants’ association supported nonprofit organization,  a housing authority or a corporate entity
legally capable of purchasing real property that is formed by or associated with tenants pursuant
to ORS 90.844.
(2) By rule,  loans for initial costs for purchasing a mobile home park or manufactured dwelling
park or the development of infrastructure for a newly purchased park  that the department
determines has a  significant percentage of tenants who are individuals of lower income  or who have
been displaced by the recent closure of an existing park . Loans provided under this section may
[2]
HB 3313
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
be made only if the department is of the opinion that the purchase is economically feasible and only
to:
(a) A tenants’ association,  a manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperative, a tenants’ asso-
ciation supported nonprofit organization or a housing authority; or
(b) A corporate entity legally capable of purchasing  real property that is formed by or associ-
ated with tenants pursuant to ORS 90.844  and that includes more than 50 percent of the tenants
residing in the park.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 90.840 is amended to read:
90.840. (1) The Director of the  Housing and Community Services Department may lend funds
available to the Housing and Community Services Department to provide funds necessary  to carry
out the provisions of ORS 456.581 (2). Such  funds advanced shall be repaid to the Housing and
Community Services Department as determined by the director.
(2) Notwithstanding any budget limitation, the director  may spend funds available from the
[Mobile Home Parks  Purchase ] Manufactured Dwelling Parks  Account to employ personnel to
carry out the provisions of ORS 456.581 (1).
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, for deposit into the Manufactured
Dwelling Parks  Account established under ORS 456.579 to fund grants under section 1 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 9. No later than  December 15, 2020, the Housing and Community Services De-
partment shall provide a report to  the Legislative Assembly or an appropriate committee of
the Legislative Assembly  in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 on the use of grant
moneys under section 1 of this 2019 Act,  including the information reported by the nonprofit
organization that received grant moneys under section 1 (3)(b) of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 10. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]