Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall study ways to  increase access to
substance abuse and behavioral health treatment.
(2) The authority shall provide  the results of the study, including any recommended leg-
islative changes, in a report to  the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than May 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 298