Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 671.010 is amended to read:
671.010. As used in ORS 671.010 to 671.220:
(1) “Architect” means a registered architect or a foreign architect.
(2) “Architectural firm” means a business entity that,  for compensation, provides the services
of an architect or engages in the practice of architecture.
(3) “Building” means a structure that has the purpose of  supporting or sheltering any use or
occupancy.
(4) “Business entity” means a partnership, limited  partnership, corporation, professional corpo-
ration, limited liability company, business trust, joint venture or other form of business organization
the constituent parts of which share a common economic interest.
(5) “Commercial interior design” means:
(a) The art and science of designing, in whole  or in part, the interior and layout of a
building, office, retail establishment or other space that is open to  the public or that is used
in commerce, manufacturing or other businesses, for the purpose  of enhancing the
functionality, aesthetic value or usability of the building, office,  retail establishment or other
space; and
(b) Providing services related to the  functions described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section, including planning, developing concepts, preparing technical submissions and other
documents and coordinating with other  consultants and professionals to complete work on
the interior of a building, office, retail establishment or other space described in  paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1197
HB 2141
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(5)] (6)  “Construction phase services” means services an architect provides for the purpose of
determining that construction work on a building is proceeding  generally in accordance with re-
quirements set forth in a technical submission.
[(6)] (7)  “Foreign architect” means a  person that has a valid license or registration from a ju-
risdiction other than this state that authorizes the person to engage in the practice of  architecture
within the jurisdiction that issued the license or registration.
[(7)] (8)  “Foreign  architectural firm” means a business entity that has a valid license or regis-
tration from a jurisdiction other than this state  that authorizes the business entity to engage in the
practice of architecture within the jurisdiction that issued the license or registration.
[(8)] (9) “Practice of architecture” means  engaging in the art and science of designing, in whole
or in part, buildings and  the space within and appurtenant to buildings and providing related ser-
vices  that  include, but are not limited to, planning, developing design concepts, preparing technical
submissions and other  documents that define a building’s form and function, coordinating con-
struction work and the work of other consultants and providing construction phase services.
[(9)] (10) “Registered architect” means an individual who has a valid  certificate of registration
issued by the State Board of Architect Examiners under ORS 671.010 to 671.220  that authorizes the
individual to engage in the practice of architecture within this state.
[(10)] (11)  “Registered architectural firm”  means a business entity that has a valid certificate
of registration issued by the State Board of Architect Examiners under  ORS 671.010 to 671.220 that
authorizes the business entity to engage in the practice of architecture within this state.
(12) “Registered commercial interior designer” means an individual  who has a certificate
of registration as a  registered commercial interior designer that the State Board of Archi-
tect Examiners issued under ORS 671.050 or renewed under ORS 671.080.
[(11)] (13) “Responsible  control” means a degree of control over an operation that is consistent
with the scope of  a registered architect’s professional knowledge and the application of a registered
architect’s professional standard of care  or, as appropriate, is within the scope  of a registered
commercial interior designer’s professional knowledge .
[(12)] (14) “State building code” has the meaning given that term in ORS 455.010.
[(13)] (15) “Technical submission” means a plan, design, drawing, blueprint or other document
that an  architect prepares in connection with the practice of architecture , or that a registered
commercial interior designer prepares within  the scope of practice designated for a regis-
tered commercial interior designer,  and submits  to a regulatory authority to comply with the
state building code, a municipal building code or related rules, ordinances,  resolutions or other
regulatory requirements.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 671.020 is amended to read:
671.020. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an individual  or business entity
that does not have a valid certificate of registration from the  State Board of Architect Examiners
may not:
(a) Engage in the practice of architecture within this state;
(b) Assume or  use a title, form of address or other designation within this state that indicates
or reasonably could  be understood to indicate that the individual is an architect or that the indi-
vidual or business entity engages in the practice of architecture; or
(c) State, declare, represent or otherwise purport in any title,  sign, card, device, advertisement
or other indication of the individual’s  or the business entity’s business or occupation that the indi-
vidual is an architect or that the individual or business entity engages in the practice of  architec-
[2]
HB 2141
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ture within this state.
(2) An individual who does not have the certificate of registration  under subsection (1) of this
section may engage in the practice of architecture within this state and use a designation that in-
dicates  that  the individual is an architect or engages in the practice of architecture if the individual:
(a) Is a foreign architect;
(b) Has a written agreement  of affiliation with a registered architect or registered architectural
firm under which the registered architect  or registered architectural firm has responsible control
over all aspects of the architectural services the individual provides; and
(c) Uses the designation “foreign architect, in consultation with” followed by the name of a
registered  architect  and the registered architect’s registered architectural firm, if any, on all tech-
nical submissions, advertisements or other communications that purport  to identify the foreign
architect’s profession, occupation or business within this state.
(3) Upon receiving a certificate of registration from the  board, a registered architect shall ob-
tain a stamp that conforms  with a design that the board specifies by rule. The stamp, when accom-
panied by the  registered architect’s signature on any technical submission, constitutes the registered
architect’s attestation that  the registered architect has responsible control over the content of the
technical submission. The registered architect is responsible for controlling the custody  and use of
the stamp.
(4) A registered architect may engage in the practice  of architecture only under the registered
architect’s own name, as that name appears  on the certificate of registration, except that the reg-
istered architect may practice under the name or assumed  business name of a registered architec-
tural firm, as provided in ORS 671.041.
(5) Upon receiving a certificate of registration  from the board, a registered commercial
interior designer shall obtain a stamp that  conforms with a design that the board specifies
by rule. The stamp,  when accompanied by the registered commercial interior designer’s sig-
nature on any technical submission, constitutes the  registered commercial interior
designer’s attestation that the registered commercial interior designer has responsible con-
trol over the content  of the technical submission. The registered commercial interior de-
signer is responsible for controlling the custody and use of the stamp.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 671.010 to
671.220.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Engineer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 672.002.
(b) “Commercial contractor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 701.005.
(c) “Municipality” has the meaning given that term in ORS 455.010.
(d) “Specialty code” has the meaning given that term in ORS 455.010.
(2) A registered commercial interior designer may  submit to a municipality or other
regulatory authority a technical submission for work that falls within the scope of practice
for a registered commercial interior  designer. The municipality or regulatory authority shall
accept the work as within the scope of practice of a registered  commercial interior designer
and may not require the stamp, signature  or other attestation of an architect, engineer or
commercial contractor on the  technical submission, or as necessary for the issuance of a
permit or license, if the technical submission would otherwise require the  stamp, signature
or other attestation of an architect, engineer or commercial contractor  to issue the license
or permit. The municipality  or other regulatory authority may condition acceptance of a
[3]
HB 2141
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
technical submission under this subsection on whether the technical submission:
(a) Bears the stamp and signature of the registered commercial interior designer;
(b) Is sufficiently clear to indicate  the nature and extent of the proposed work, that the
proposed work falls within the scope of practice for a registered commercial interior designer
and that the work conforms with the requirements of ORS 671.010 to 671.220, the  state
building code and any other applicable laws and ordinances; and
(c) Has an identification that consists of:
(A) The project name and location, including the street address of the project;
(B) The name, address and phone number of the person that prepared  the technical
submission, including the name, address and phone number of  a person who prepared the
technical submission on behalf of another person;
(C) The name, address and phone number of the project owner; and
(D) The date on which the technical submission was completed and delivered.
(3) Each jurisdiction that requires the issuance of a permit  as a condition precedent to
the construction, alteration, improvement or repair  of any building or structure and requires
as a  condition of issuing the permit that the application for the permit include a technical
submission from a  registered commercial interior designer shall also require the signature
of a registered commercial  interior designer and an impression of the stamp described in
ORS 671.020 (5) on the technical submission from a person authorized to prepare the tech-
nical submission.
(4) A registered commercial interior designer’s stamp and signature on a technical sub-
mission constitute compliance with this section.
(5) A registered commercial  interior designer shall retain, for a period of not less than
10 years following the completion of the project for which the registered commercial interior
designer submitted technical submissions, records and documentation that demonstrate  the
registered commercial interior designer’s responsible  control over the preparation of the
technical submissions.
(6) A municipality or other regulatory authority may permit a registered  commercial
interior designer to supervise the  preparation of plans or designs for work that is not within
the scope of practice of an architect, an engineer or a commercial contractor.
(7) A registered commercial interior designer  may stamp, sign and submit a technical
submission under this section if  the project for which the registered commercial interior
designer submitted the technical submission is not  within a high hazard group H occupancy
classification under the specialty code.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 671.030 is amended to read:
671.030. (1) ORS 671.010 to 671.220 do not apply  to the practice of marine, naval or landscape
architecture.
(2) ORS 671.010 to 671.220 do not prohibit:
(a) An employee of  a registered architect from acting under the registered architect’s instruc-
tion, control  or supervision. An employee who is not a registered architect may not use the desig-
nation “architect,” “registered  architect” or “foreign architect” or the words “architecture” or
“architectural” to describe the employee’s work unless a rule of the State Board  of Architect Ex-
aminers provides otherwise.
(b) A person that is not an architect from  preparing technical submissions or providing con-
struction phase services related  to erecting, enlarging or altering a building or an appurtenance to
[4]
HB 2141
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a building if the building or the appurtenance:
(A) Is a single family residential dwelling or farm building;
(B) Is a structure used in connection with or auxiliary to a  single family residential dwelling
or farm building, including but not limited to a three-car garage, barn or shed or a  shelter used for
the housing of domestic animals or livestock; or
(C) Has a ground area of 4,000 square feet or less and is not more than  20 feet in height from
the top surface of lowest flooring to the highest interior overhead finish.
(c) A person  from planning, designing, specifying or observing the alterations or repairs to a
building if:
(A) The structural part of the building, including but  not limited to the foundation walls, floors,
roof, footings, bearing partitions, beams, columns and joists, is not involved;
(B) The building code classification by use or occupancy of the building is not changed; and
(C) The building code classification by type of construction of the building is not changed.
(d) A contractor from directing the work of  erecting, enlarging or altering a building, or an
appurtenance to a building, under the observation of a registered architect.
(e) A person practicing  marine, naval or landscape architecture from purporting to be a marine,
naval or landscape architect if the work is confined and limited to those classifications.
(f) A construction contractor licensed under ORS chapter 701  from offering services constituting
the practice of architecture if:
(A) The construction contractor’s offer discloses in writing that  the construction contractor is
not an architect and identifies the registered architect or registered architectural firm that  will
provide the architectural services;
(B) The services are ancillary to construction services  the construction contractor will provide;
and
(C) A registered  architect or registered architectural firm provides the services constituting the
practice of architecture.
(g) A person who is not a registered commercial interior designer from engaging  in the
practice of commercial interior design.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 671.050 is amended to read:
671.050. (1)  Any individual desiring the right to engage in the practice of architecture in this
state or to register as a registered commercial interior designer in this state  shall  apply to
the State Board of Architect Examiners for a certificate of  registration. To obtain a certificate of
registration, the individual must:
(a) Complete an application with documentation that, in the board’s judgment, shows  that the
applicant successfully completed an  education program, an experience program and an examination
that meet standards the board specifies by rule; and
(b) Pay an application fee in an amount the board specifies by rule.
(2) The board by rule shall specify:
(a) The manner in which  and the procedures under which an individual may apply for a certif-
icate of registration under subsection (1) of this section;
(b) The form and content of all application materials;
(c) The period during which a registration remains valid , except that a registration as  a
registered commercial interior designer remains valid for two years after the date  on which
the board issued the certificate of registration ;
(d) Fees to apply for registration and to renew registration;
[5]
HB 2141
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Conditions or qualifications under which the board grants or denies registration; and
(f) Any other matter related to the registration  of an individual that the board deems necessary
to specify.
(3) If the board determines that the  individual is qualified to engage in the practice of archi-
tecture in this state  or is qualified to register as a registered commercial interior  designer in
this state , the board shall issue a certificate of registration to the individual.
(4) In specifying standards  for an examination  to register an architect  under this section, the
board may adopt the examination and the  recommended grading procedures of the National Council
of Architectural Registration Boards.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 671.080 is amended to read:
671.080. (1)(a) A registered architect  must periodically renew the registration described in ORS
671.020 by submitting to the State Board of Architect Examiners,  on or before the renewal date the
board establishes by rule:
(A) An application for renewal;
(B) Any fees the board authorizes under ORS 671.085; and
(C) Evidence satisfactory to the board that the registered architect has complied  with any con-
tinuing education requirements  the board adopted under ORS 671.125, unless the board waives the
continuing education requirements.
(b) The board shall renew the  registered architect’s certificate of registration after the applicant
complies with the requirements described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) If a registered architect  does not renew the certificate of registration on or before the re-
newal deadline the board establishes by rule,  the certificate of registration expires on the 61st day
after the renewal deadline.
(3)(a) A  person is no longer a registered architect and forfeits the right to engage in the practice
of architecture in  this state if, for a period of more than 60 days after a renewal deadline, the person
fails to pay a renewal fee or any late fee the board imposes or if the person fails to submit  evidence
satisfactory to the board of the person’s compliance with continuing education requirements  the
board adopts under ORS 671.125, unless the board waives the continuing education requirements.
(b) The board may reinstate as a registered architect  a person that failed to renew the person’s
certificate of registration only if the person passes any examination  the board requires, the person
complies with any continuing education requirements the board adopted  under ORS 671.125 and the
person pays all outstanding renewal fees, late fees and penalties.
(4) The  board may grant inactive status to any registered architect who ceases to engage in the
practice of architecture and, while in good standing,  submits to the board a written request for in-
active status. The registered architect  may resume practice by passing any examinations the board
requires, complying with any continuing education requirements the board adopts under ORS 671.125
and paying any required fees and penalties.
(5)(a) A registered commercial interior designer must renew a  certificate of registration
described in ORS  671.020 not later than two years after the date on which the board issued
the certificate to the registered commercial interior designer. An applicant for  renewal must
submit to the board before the date on which the applicant’s registration expires:
(A) An application for renewal;
(B) Any fees the board authorizes under ORS 671.085; and
(C) Evidence satisfactory  to the board that the registered commercial interior designer
is in good standing and has complied with  any continuing education requirements the board
[6]
HB 2141
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
adopted under ORS 671.125, unless the  board waives the continuing education requirements
or the requirement for good standing.
(b) The board shall renew the registered commercial interior designer’s certificate of
registration after the applicant complies with the requirements described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection.
(c) If a registered commercial interior designer does not renew the  certificate of regis-
tration on or before the renewal deadline, the certificate of registration expires on the 61st
day after the renewal deadline.
(d) The board may reinstate as  a registered commercial interior designer a person that
failed to renew the person’s certificate of registration only if the person passes any  exam-
ination the  board requires, the person complies with any continuing education requirements
the board adopted under ORS 671.125 and the person pays all outstanding renewal fees, late
fees and penalties.
(e) A person is no longer a registered commercial interior designer  if, for a period of
more than 60 days after a renewal deadline, the person  fails to pay a renewal fee or any late
fee the board imposes or if the person fails to submit  evidence satisfactory to the board of
the person’s compliance  with continuing education requirements the board adopts under ORS
671.125, unless the board waives the continuing education requirements.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 671.085 is amended to read:
671.085. The State Board of Architect  Examiners may impose fees that are reasonable and nec-
essary to aid in the administration of ORS 671.010 to 671.220 and  to regulate the practice of archi-
tecture  or  the practice of commercial interior design  in this state. The fees may include, but are
not limited to, fees for accepting  and processing applications , [and] issuing and renewing certificates
of registration  and bringing actions under ORS 671.220 to enforce  ORS 671.010 to 671.220 or to
prevent or restrain unauthorized practices .
SECTION 9.  ORS 671.100 is amended to read:
671.100. (1) Any person may submit to the State Board of  Architect Examiners a complaint
against a registered architect  or a registered commercial interior  designer. The complaint must
be in writing and  be sworn to by the complainant. The board shall review the complaint at the next
regular board meeting following receipt of the complaint.
(2) Submitting a complaint under subsection (1) of this section does not give the claimant  a
particular priority for  resolution of the complaint or restrict or prevent the board from acting on
a complaint other than the complaint submitted under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 10.  ORS 671.120 is amended to read:
671.120. The State Board of Architect Examiners shall operate as a semi-independent state
agency subject to ORS 182.456 to 182.472 for the purpose of carrying out ORS 671.010 to 671.220.
The board [ shall be composed of seven ] consists of 11  members appointed by the Governor to four-
year terms with three terms maximum. Before a member’s term expires, the Governor shall  appoint
a member with a term that  is effective on September 1 of the year in which the previous member’s
term expires. If a vacancy occurs on the board for any  cause, the Governor shall appoint a member
for the remainder of the unexpired term. The chair of the board must be elected by  the board from
among the current members. The board shall have as members:
(1) Five architects who are residents of this state; [ and]
(2) Three registered commercial interior designers; and
[(2)] (3) [ Two] Three  members of the general public.
[7]
HB 2141
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 11.
 ORS 671.125 is amended to read:
671.125. (1) In accordance with ORS chapter 183, the State Board of Architect Examiners may:
[(1)] (a)  Adopt reasonable rules necessary for the administration of the laws  the board is
charged with administering; and
[(2)] (b) Adopt reasonable rules prescribing standards of  professional conduct for architects and
rules requiring continuing  professional education for architects. In adopting rules under this sub-
section, the board shall consider national standards  and practices as a means of facilitating recip-
rocal registration and licensing  of architects among jurisdictions recognized by the board. The board
shall also consider local practices.
(2)(a) The three members of the board who are registered commercial interior  designers
shall:
(A) Specify qualifications for registration as a registered commercial  interior designer,
which may include specifications of required education, training and experience;
(B) Establish and administer or approve an examination to  demonstrate competence in
technical and ethical standards and professional  practices as qualifications for registration
as a registered commercial interior designer;
(C) Specify subject areas and required hours of  continuing education necessary to main-
tain a registration as a registered commercial interior designer; and
(D) Recommend for registration  as a registered commercial interior designer, or recom-
mend for a renewal of registration, as appropriate, an individual who demonstrates satisfac-
tory compliance with applicable ethical  standards, possesses adequate technical and
professional competence, has a  reputation for good faith and fair dealing within the profes-
sion, has  a passing score on the examination described in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection
and meets such other standards as the members of the board  who are registered commercial
interior designers determine are appropriate to qualify for good standing.
(b) The three members of the board who  are registered commercial interior designers
may establish specialties or practice  areas within the field of commercial interior design and
specify qualifications for registration within the specialty or practice area.
(3) Before adopting as a  policy of the board, or as rules under subsection (1)(a) of this
section, a  qualification, examination, specification, specialty, practice area or recommen-
dation that members of the board who are  registered commercial interior designers establish
under subsection (2)  of this section, the entire board must vote upon and approve the quali-
fication, examination, specification, specialty, practice area or recommendation.
(4)(a) The board by rule shall establish, in cases of conflict or uncertainty, boundaries
between the respective scopes of practice of an architect and a registered commercial inte-
rior designer.
(b) The State Board of Architect Examiners, for  the purpose of jointly developing
boundaries between the scope of practice of a registered  commercial interior designer and
the scopes of practice of other registered professionals,  shall consult and cooperate with the
following boards:
(A) The State Board of Examiners for Engineering and  Land Surveying, to jointly develop
boundaries between the scope of  practice of a registered commercial interior designer and
the scope of practice of an engineer, professional engineer or registered  professional engi-
neer;
(B) The State Landscape Architect Board, to  jointly develop boundaries between the
[8]
HB 2141
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
scope of  practice of a registered commercial interior designer and the scope of practice of a
landscape architect or registered landscape architect; and
(C) The Construction Contractors Board, to jointly develop boundaries between the scope
of practice of a registered commercial  interior designer and the scope of practice of a com-
mercial contractor.
(c) The State Board of Architect Examiners  by rule shall establish the scope of practice
for a registered commercial interior designer based on the board’s consultation with the
other boards listed in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) A person that performs work that is within the scope of practice of  a registered
commercial interior designer need not register as an architect under ORS 671.010  to 671.220,
as an engineer, professional engineer or registered professional engineer under  ORS 672.002
to 672.325, as a landscape architect  under ORS 671.310 to 671.459 or as a commercial con-
tractor under ORS chapter 671.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 671.220 is amended to read:
671.220. (1) If  the State Board of Architect Examiners determines that a person is engaging in
or is about to engage in an activity that violates  a prohibition on engaging in the practice of
architecture without obtaining a certificate of registration as an architect or foreign  archi-
tect under ORS 671.090 or another act related to the practice of architecture that is  prohib-
ited under  ORS 671.020 or 671.041, the board may bring an action  to restrain the activity or
proposed  activity.  An appropriate circuit court may issue an injunction without proof of actual
damages, but the  injunction does not relieve the defendant in the action from the imposition of a
civil penalty for a violation of ORS 671.010 to 671.220.
(2) A person  may not bring or maintain an action related to the practice of architecture in a
court of this state unless the person alleges  and proves that at the time the person engaged in the
practice of architecture, the person was a registered  architect or was a foreign architect acting in
compliance with ORS 671.020. An architectural firm may not bring or maintain  an action related to
the practice of architecture in a court of this state  unless the architectural firm was a registered
architectural firm at the time the architectural firm engaged in the practice of architecture.
(3) ORS  671.010 to 671.220 do not prevent a person from representing the person’s membership
in or affiliation  with any bona fide professional or trade organization unless the person makes the
representation to advance the person’s unlawful practice of architecture or unlawful attempt  to en-
gage in the practice of architecture.
(4)(a) The board may impose a civil penalty in accordance with ORS 183.745  against a
person that falsely uses the title of registered commercial interior  designer or that repres-
ents falsely that the person  is a registered commercial interior designer. The amount of a
civil penalty under this paragraph may not exceed:
(A) $1,000 for a first offense.
(B) $2,000 for a second or subsequent offense.
(C) $2,000 per day for each day of a continuing offense after a third or subsequent of-
fense.
(b) The board may bring an action in a circuit court of this state  to restrain a person’s
false use of the title of registered  commercial interior designer. The court may issue an in-
junction without  proof of actual damages, but the injunction does not relieve the defendant
in the action from the imposition of a civil penalty under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 13.
Section 14 of this 2025 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 671.010 to
[9]
HB 2141
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
671.220.
SECTION 14.
 Notwithstanding the requirement under ORS 671.120 (2) that  members of
the State Board of Architect Examiners must be registered commercial  interior designers,
the Governor,  in choosing the first members of the board to fill the positions reserved for
registered commercial interior designers, need not appoint  registered commercial interior
designers, but may consider for appointment:
(1) Residents of this state who hold or, within the previous five years, held a registration
from another state as a commercial interior  designer, or the equivalent in the other state;
or
(2) Residents of this state whom a professional association or trade association for com-
mercial interior designers recommend as having the necessary education, training, experi-
ence and probity to serve as impartial members and carry out the functions, duties  and
responsibilities conferred on members of the board.
SECTION 15.
(1) Sections 4 and 14 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 671.010,
671.020, 671.030, 671.050, 671.080, 671.085, 671.100, 671.120, 671.125 and 671.220 by sections 1, 2
and 5 to 12 of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The State Board of Architect Examiners, the  State Board of Examiners for Engi-
neering and Land  Surveying, the State Landscape Architect Board and the Construction
Contractors Board may adopt rules and take any  other action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the board, on and after
the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section, to undertake and exercise all
of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the board by  sections 4 and 14 of this 2025
Act and the amendments to ORS 671.010, 671.020, 671.030, 671.050, 671.080, 671.085, 671.100,
671.120, 671.125 and 671.220 by sections 1, 2 and 5 to 12 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The Governor may appoint members to the State Board  of Architect Examiners be-
fore the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 16.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[10]