Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 418.746 to
418.796.
SECTION 2. The Child Abuse  Assessment Account is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the account shall be  cred-
ited to the account. The account consists  of moneys deposited into the account under ORS
418.796 and may include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or  transferred to the ac-
count by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise. The moneys in  the account are continuously
appropriated to the Department of Justice for the purposes specified in ORS 418.786.
SECTION 3.  ORS 418.746 is amended to read:
418.746. (1) The Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Account is  established separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned, if any, shall  inure to the benefit of the account.
The account consists  of moneys deposited into the account under ORS 418.796 and may in-
clude moneys appropriated, allocated,  deposited or transferred to the account by the Legis-
lative Assembly or otherwise.  All moneys deposited in the account are  continuously appropriated
to the Department of Justice for the purposes of ORS 418.751 and this section.
(2) The Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program, with the advice  of the Advisory
Council on Child Abuse Assessment, created by ORS 418.784, shall allocate moneys from the  Child
Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Account to eligible  county child abuse multidisciplinary teams
formed under ORS 418.747, or entities designated  by the teams, serving the counties from which the
moneys were collected. The program may award only  one grant per county. The moneys shall be
allocated by the same formula as, or a formula similar to, the formula used by the Attorney  General
for equitable distribution of the  fund for victim’s assistance programs under ORS 147.227 (1). Moneys
allocated under this subsection  may not be used as replacement revenues for currently available
funds previously allocated by the county for child abuse intervention.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1988
HB 2826
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The Child Abuse  Multidisciplinary Intervention Program shall determine eligibility of the
applicants and:
(a) Allocate funds if the applicant is deemed eligible;
(b) Conditionally allocate funds, with appropriate conditions, when necessary to establish  eligi-
bility; or
(c) Deny funding.
(4) In making the eligibility determination, the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Pro-
gram shall consider the following nonexclusive list of factors:
(a) Whether the services offered by an applicant substantially further the  goals and purposes
of ORS 418.747, 418.790 and 418.792;
(b) Whether the county child abuse multidisciplinary team or the entity designated by the  team
has properly allocated other available funds;
(c) Any evaluations of previously funded services as required by subsection (7) of this section;
(d) The extent to  which the county’s coordinated child abuse multidisciplinary intervention plan
provides for comprehensive services to the victims of child abuse;
(e) Whether  the funds are being used as replacement revenues as prohibited by subsection (2)
of this section;
(f) Whether there is a children’s advocacy center  or similar advocacy center in existence or
proposed for the county; and
(g) The extent to which funding a children’s advocacy center is given priority in the intervention
plan as required under subsection (5) of this section.
(5)(a) At least  once a biennium, the county child abuse multidisciplinary team shall submit to
the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program a coordinated child  abuse multidisciplinary
intervention plan. The intervention plan must:
(A) Describe  all sources of funding, other than moneys that may be allocated from the Child
Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Account, including in-kind contributions that are  available for
the intervention plan;
(B) Describe the critical needs of victims of child  abuse in the county, including but not limited
to child abuse assessment, advocacy and treatment, and how the intervention plan addresses  those
needs in a comprehensive manner;
(C) Include the county’s written protocol and agreements required by ORS  418.747 (2) and
418.785; and
(D) Describe how the  intervention plan gives priority to funding a children’s advocacy center
and how the funding supports the center.
(b) When submitting the intervention plan, the county  child abuse multidisciplinary team shall
also submit:
(A) Those applications  for funding received from entities under subsection (6) of this section that
the team  determines best meet the needs of the county’s intervention plan and a recommendation
that the applications for funding be granted; and
(B) If the team  is seeking funding from the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program,
an application setting forth the information required by rule of the program.
(6) An entity wishing to apply for funding from the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention
Program shall  submit an application to the county child abuse multidisciplinary team for the county
in which the entity proposes to provide services. The application shall:
(a) Describe the  services to be funded with moneys from the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary
[2]
HB 2826
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Intervention Program according to the coordinated child abuse multidisciplinary intervention plan
and the anticipated outcomes in terms of benefits to children and families; and
(b) Describe how the services further the goals  and purposes of ORS 418.747, 418.790 and
418.792.
(7)(a) A designated entity providing services according to a coordinated child abuse multidisci-
plinary intervention plan funded with moneys from the Child  Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention
Program shall submit an annual report to the county child abuse multidisciplinary team. A  county
child abuse multidisciplinary team shall submit an annual report to  the Child Abuse Multidiscipli-
nary Intervention Program.
(b) The annual report filed by the county child abuse multidisciplinary team must:
(A) Document how the moneys were  utilized and describe to what extent the services were able
to meet anticipated outcomes in terms of benefits to children and families.
(B) Include local and state issues and recommendations relating to the prevention of  child
fatalities identified in the fatality review process under ORS 418.785.
(c) A county child abuse multidisciplinary team receiving a  report from a designated entity shall
review  the  report and take into account success of the entity at meeting service outcomes before
making future recommendations regarding allocation of moneys.
(d) The  Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program shall review reports received under
this section before making future eligibility and allocation decisions  and when evaluating services
funded under this section.
(8) Two or more county child abuse multidisciplinary teams may join together to develop  joint
child abuse multidisciplinary  intervention plans. The joint intervention plans shall be submitted as
provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(9) The Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program may adopt rules to  carry out the
provisions of ORS 418.751 and this section including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Notices and time limits for applications;
(b) Method of review and the role of advisory bodies; and
(c) Reallocation of moneys not applied for or disbursed.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 418.786 is amended to read:
418.786. (1) To accomplish the purpose described in ORS 418.780, with the assistance of the
Advisory Council on Child  Abuse Assessment, the administrator of the Child Abuse Multidiscipli-
nary Intervention Program shall develop and administer a grant program , separate  from the grant
program described in ORS 418.746,  to establish and maintain  children’s advocacy centers and re-
gional children’s advocacy centers, to support training and technical assistance  efforts for county
child abuse multidisciplinary teams and children’s advocacy centers and to  provide coordination and
support for the work of regional children’s advocacy centers.
(2) The Child Abuse  Multidisciplinary Intervention Program shall allocate moneys from
the Child Abuse Assessment Account established by section  2 of this 2021 Act to eligible
children’s advocacy centers under ORS 418.746 to 418.796. The  moneys shall be allocated by
using the same formula as, or  a formula similar to, the formula used by the Attorney Gen-
eral for equitable distribution of the account for  victims’ assistance programs under ORS
147.227 (1), taking into consideration the size of each children’s advocacy center’s service
area and the associated  increased cost of equitably providing services to all victims within
that area. Moneys allocated under this subsection may not be used  as replacement revenues
for currently available funds previously allocated by the county  for children’s advocacy cen-
[3]
HB 2826
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ters.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 418.788 is amended to read:
418.788. (1) Subject to the availability of funds under the provisions of ORS 418.786 and 418.796,
the administrator of the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program shall make  grants for
the establishment and maintenance of children’s advocacy centers or regional  children’s advocacy
centers.
(2)(a) A public or private agency may apply to the administrator for a grant to:
(A) Establish and maintain a children’s advocacy center or regional children’s  advocacy center;
(B) Provide training and technical  assistance to children’s advocacy centers or county child
abuse multidisciplinary teams; or
(C) Provide coordination and support to regional children’s advocacy centers.
(b) The administrator may consolidate applications from more than one public or private agency
or may return the application with the recommendation that the application be consolidated.
(3) The administrator  shall by rule establish criteria for awarding grants to establish and
maintain children’s advocacy centers or regional children’s advocacy  centers, including but not
limited to:
(a) Expenses eligible for reimbursement from funds under ORS  418.786 and 418.796;
(b) The extent to which the applicant’s  proposal will best accomplish the purposes of ORS
418.746 to 418.796;
(c) The extent to which an applicant meets criteria for receiving a grant to:
(A) Establish and maintain a children’s advocacy center or regional children’s  advocacy center;
(B) Provide training and technical assistance to children’s  advocacy centers and county child
abuse multidisciplinary teams; or
(C) Provide coordination and support to regional children’s advocacy centers;
(d) Minimum facility standards for children’s  advocacy centers and regional children’s advocacy
centers consistent with national accreditation standards  to ensure that children receive consistent,
evidence-based intervention services statewide;
(e) Minimum forensic  interview training standards that are consistent with national forensic
interview training standards, evidence-based and supported by current  forensic interview research;
and
(f) For a regional children’s advocacy center, the extent to which the applicant’s proposal meets
the documented needs of the communities, children’s advocacy  centers and county child abuse
multidisciplinary teams in the region or regions to be served by the center.
(4) The administrator  is not required to fund any grant in the total amount requested in the
application.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 418.796 is amended to read:
418.796. The  Advisory Council on Child Abuse Assessment may solicit and accept contributions
of funds and assistance from the United States, its agencies or from other  sources, public or private,
and agree to conditions not inconsistent with the purposes  of ORS 418.746 to 418.796. All funds re-
ceived are to  aid in financing the functions of the advisory council and the purposes of ORS 418.746
to 418.796. [and shall be deposited in the General Fund of the State Treasury to the credit of a separate
account and are continuously appropriated to the Child  Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program
established by ORS 418.783  for the purposes of ORS 418.746 to 418.796. ] The advisory council may
deposit moneys the advisory council collects under this  section into the Child Abuse Multi-
disciplinary Intervention Account under ORS  418.746 or the Child Abuse Assessment Account
[4]
HB 2826
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
under section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 147.391 is amended to read:
147.391. Notwithstanding ORS 147.390, when the moneys provided from the Criminal Injuries
Compensation Account for the purposes of ORS  147.390 are expended for any cumulative time period
within any biennium, the Criminal Injuries Compensation Account shall have no further  obligations
under ORS 147.390 for that time  period. However, if [ the Criminal Injuries Compensation Account has
unexpended moneys provided for at the end of any biennium, the balance shall be transferred to the
account created ] at the end of  the biennium there are unexpended moneys in the account and
those unexpended moneys were allocated to the account for the purposes of ORS 147.390, the
balance of those unexpended moneys may be deposited as provided  by ORS 418.796.
SECTION 8.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the Gen-
eral Fund,  the amount of $6,000,000 for deposit in the Child Abuse Assessment Account
established by section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of
$6,000,000 is established  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of  Justice for the grant program established under
ORS 418.786 from the Child Abuse Assessment Account established by section  2 of this 2021
Act.
SECTION 10. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]