Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of  Human Services shall study options for establishment
of a grant program to provide resources to  parents of children who have been victims of sex
abuse, including relocation assistance  if necessary to ensure the safety of the child victim.
The department shall submit a report in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245, and may in-
clude recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assem-
bly related to human services no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2517