Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “state forestlands” means lands managed by  the
State Forester under ORS 530.050.
(2) In carrying out the management of  state forestlands under ORS 530.050, the State
Forester shall ensure that timber is sold  each calendar year for harvesting from those lands
in an amount that, on a board feet basis, is equal to  or greater than 125 percent of the
amount of timber sold for harvesting from state forestlands during the 2016 calendar year.
(3) The State Forester shall annually estimate the board feet of timber  that will be sold
for harvesting from state forestlands during the calendar year. The  State Forester shall
complete the annual  estimate prior to the first sale that year of timber for harvesting from
state forestlands.  The State Forester shall determine, based upon the estimated board feet
of timber to be sold during  the year, the fraction of the estimated timber sales that repres-
ents an  increase from the amount of timber that was sold for harvesting from state
forestlands in 2016.
(4) For any moneys  received from a timber sale under ORS 530.050, the State Forester
shall determine the sum obtained by multiplying the amount of the  moneys by the fraction
determined by the State Forester  under subsection (3) of this section for the year of the sale.
Notwithstanding ORS 530.110, when moneys from the timber sale are  paid into the State
Treasury and credited to the State Forestry Department Account, the sum determined  as
provided in  this subsection shall be placed in a separate subaccount and distributed as fol-
lows:
(a) Twenty-five percent to the Department of Education, for awarding grants  under the
Career and Technical Education Revitalization Grant Program established by ORS 344.075.
(b) Twenty-five percent to the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission, for deposit in
the Community College Support Fund to be distributed to community colleges  and commu-
nity college service districts for career and technical education programs.
(c) Twenty-five percent  to the Department of Education for deposit to the STEM In-
vestment Grant Program, to be distributed as described  in ORS 327.380 to public universities.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2839
SB 441
1
2
3
4
5
(d) Twenty-five percent to the State School Fund  for distribution as described in ORS
327.013.
(5) Any amount deposited as provided under subsection (4) of  this section shall be disre-
garded for the purpose of calculating any other distribution to be made under ORS 530.110.
[2]