Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 254.476 is amended to read:
254.476. (1)(a) The county clerk may employ personnel as  necessary to open envelopes, handle
ballots, prepare ballots for counting and count ballots. The personnel may not all be members of  the
same political party.
(b) Except as provided in  paragraph (c) of this subsection,  a candidate who appears on the
ballot at an election[ , other than an incumbent candidate for county clerk, ] or a person who  is a
member of  the household, spouse, domestic partner, child, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, parent,
mother-in-law, father-in-law, sibling, brother-in-law,  sister-in-law, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew,
stepparent or stepchild of any candidate who appears on the ballot  may not be employed and may
not serve as  a volunteer [ in the capacity described in this section ] for the duties described in par-
agraph (a) of this subsection .
(c) An incumbent candidate for county clerk who appears on the ballot may be  employed,
and a precinct committeeperson who appears  on the ballot may serve as a volunteer, for the
duties described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) As used in this section, “member of the household”  has the meaning given that term in ORS
244.020.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2679