Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “public corporation” means an entity that the
State of Oregon creates to carry out a  public purpose by participating in activities in which
a private enterprise may also participate in the course of the private enterprise’s business.
(2) The Oregon Cash  Depository Corporation is created as an independent public corpo-
ration with the purposes and  powers set forth in section 2 of this 2021 Act. The corporation
may register an assumed business name under ORS chapter 648 and  use the assumed busi-
ness name in the corporation’s operations, advertisements and communications.
(3) The Governor shall appoint, subject to Senate confirmation under Article III, section
4, of the Oregon Constitution, a board of five directors  for the Oregon Cash Depository
Corporation as follows:
(a) One director  who has extensive experience with secure facilities that handle or
transact business in large amounts of cash or other valuable property;
(b) One director who represents Oregon businesses that  conduct transactions primarily
in cash;
(c) One director who has  extensive experience in cash management and cash accounting;
(d) One director who has extensive experience in tax accounting; and
(e) One director who has extensive experience in logistics.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a director of  the Oregon
Cash Depository Corporation may not have any  pecuniary interest, other than an incidental
interest that the director discloses and makes a matter of  public record at the time the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1234
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Governor appoints the director, in any business  entity other than the corporation that,
during the director’s term of office, will likely  benefit, financially or otherwise, from the
corporation’s operations.
(b) A director appointed under subsection (3)(b) or (c) of  this section may have a
pecuniary interest in a business entity that might benefit in  particular circumstances from
the operations  of the corporation if the director discloses the interest to the corporation’s
board of directors and offers to refrain from participating in a decision of the board  of di-
rectors that might benefit the business entity in which the director has an interest. Unless
the corporation’s bylaws  provide otherwise, the board of directors shall exclude the director
who disclosed the interest from participating in the decision.
(5) A director’s term of office is four years, but the director  serves at the pleasure of the
Governor. The Governor shall appoint a successor before a director’s term  expires or a re-
placement for the remainder of a director’s term  of office if the director’s position is vacant
for any reason. The Governor’s appointment of  a successor or replacement is immediately
effective but is subject to Senate confirmation under Article  III, section 4, of the Oregon
Constitution. A director is eligible for reappointment.
(6) A director is entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495.
(7) The board of directors shall select one director  as chairperson and another director
as vice chairperson for terms and with duties and powers the  board of directors considers
necessary to perform the  functions of chairperson and vice chairperson. A majority of the
members of the board of directors constitutes a quorum for transacting business.
(8) The board of directors shall meet at  least once every three months at a time and
place the board of  directors designates or at other times and places that the chairperson or
a majority of the board of directors specifies.
(9) The board of directors shall establish bylaws and policies for operating and  managing
the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation that:
(a) Promote the purposes of the corporation; and
(b) Are consistent with applicable provisions of the laws of this state.
(10) Not later than April 15 of each year, the board of directors shall file  with the Gov-
ernor and the Legislative Assembly a report that describes the operations  and activities of
the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation during the preceding year.
(11) The board of directors shall appoint a president and  officers whom the board deems
necessary to  administer and manage the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation. The president
and officers shall administer and manage the corporation’s affairs subject to the  board’s
oversight and supervision.
SECTION 2.
(1)(a) The Oregon Cash Depository Corporation is a governmental entity that
performs governmental functions and exercises governmental powers, but does  not have
territorial boundaries within this state and is not a  unit of local or municipal government
or a state agency for the purposes of state statutes or  constitutional provisions. The corpo-
ration shall  carry out the purposes set forth in subsection (2) of this section and has the
powers, rights and privileges that sections 1 to 16 of this 2021 Act expressly confer on  the
corporation or that are otherwise implied by the laws of  this state or are incident to ex-
pressly conferred powers, rights and privileges.
(b) The corporation shall incorporate as a nonprofit corporation.  Except to the extent set
forth in sections 1 to  16 of this 2021 Act, the corporation is subject to ORS chapter 65 with
[2]
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
respect to the corporation’s  formation, governance, operation and dissolution and as to all
other matters  to which a nonprofit corporation would otherwise be subject. To the extent
that a provision of sections  1 to 16 of this 2021 Act conflicts with a provision of ORS chapter
65, the provision of sections 1 to 16  of this 2021 Act controls the governance and operations
of the corporation and supersedes the provision of ORS chapter 65.
(2) The purposes of the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation are to:
(a) Provide secure depositories for cash deposits, cash management services and  secure
handling and storage of other valuable  property at locations throughout this state where
cash depository and cash management services are necessary, convenient and practicable  to
provide and maintain;
(b) Provide sound, transparent and reliable accounting procedures and  practices that
build trust and demonstrate a fiduciary concern for the corporation’s depositors and other
customers;
(c) Develop and maintain a practice and reputation  of trustworthiness and reliability that
can command the confidence of the corporation’s depositors, other  customers and other
concerned members of the community;
(d) Provide needed cash management consultation services and other assistance to indi-
viduals and businesses in this state that conduct transactions and fund operations  primarily
in cash;
(e) Provide or assist in providing secure transportation facilities and services for trans-
porting cash deposits and other valuable property  to and from the corporation’s secure de-
positories and to other destinations as needed;
(f) Cooperate  with local governments and law enforcement agencies, community organ-
izations and other institutions and entities in preventing  and deterring theft and criminal
activity related to transporting, depositing and storing cash and  other valuable property and
in acting  promptly and effectively to respond to and remedy the consequences and effects
of theft and criminal activity that occurs;
(g) Enter  into partnerships, joint ventures, cooperative arrangements, contracts and
other agreements with public and private entities in order  to attract investment and exper-
tise necessary to build secure  facilities for cash deposits, giving priority to providing depos-
itories in a wide array of geographic  locations within this state and to providing depositories
in communities or regions of this state that are underserved or  in need of cash depository
services;
(h) Explore, develop and use various financing options to carry out the purposes of this
subsection while minimizing financial, legal  and operational risks to the state, to local gov-
ernments, to state and local government agencies and to public institutions;
(i) Hold title in the name of the state to facilities, structures,  vehicles and infrastructure
related to the corporation’s activities and to transfer the title  to an appropriate state agency
at the Governor’s direction;
(j) Manage and invest the corporation’s funds and other assets, or funds and assets
committed to the corporation’s care, prudently and with consideration for the long-term so-
cial and economic consequences of the corporation’s management and investment activities;
(k) Maintain  public accountability and responsible stewardship of public and private
funds; and
(L) Operate in such a way as to ensure the corporation’s continued viability.
[3]
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) To carry out the purposes  set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the Oregon Cash
Depository Corporation has the power to:
(a) Acquire, purchase, receive, hold, own, control, lease, rent,  manage, operate, use, im-
prove, develop,  construct, equip, furnish, lend, sell, convey, exchange or otherwise dispose
of real and personal property of any description or nature;
(b) Exercise the right of eminent domain  in the state’s name and in accordance with ORS
chapter 35 under circumstances that the corporation justifies in writing to all affected per-
sons with specific reference to an aspect of the corporation’s purposes as set forth in this
section;
(c) Enter  into partnerships, joint ventures or other business arrangements with any
public or private entity;
(d) Form  or acquire subsidiary entities that, in the judgment of the board of directors,
enable the corporation to effectively carry out the purposes set forth in this section;
(e) Enter into  contracts and other agreements with entities or individuals with appro-
priate experience, expertise, capacity and knowledge related  to secure transportation facili-
ties and other  facilities the corporation uses to transport and store cash or engage in cash
transactions, to  cash accounting and cash management procedures and to any other aspect
of the corporation’s functions;
(f) Employ, fix compensation for, discipline, dismiss  and set employment conditions and
privileges in accordance with applicable law for any individual whom the corporation  deems
necessary to enable the corporation to carry out effectively the purposes set  forth in this
section;
(g) Serve as a consultant to any individual or business that uses cash  for operations or
that conducts transactions primarily in cash;
(h) Investigate the source or provenance of cash or other valuable property deposited  or
stored at the corporation’s offices, facilities or business locations to  the extent necessary to
determine that the cash or other valuable property is not stolen or obtained  by means that
are contrary to the laws of this state;
(i) Establish, assess, charge, collect and deposit fees, commissions, compensation for
costs and expenses and any other charge or  consideration for transporting, depositing, se-
curing, storing, holding, dispensing and otherwise handling  cash, providing consultation ser-
vices and  providing any other service to depositors and other customers that is consistent
with the corporation’s purposes under this section, provided  that the fee, commission, com-
pensation, charge or consideration is:
(A) Reasonable and calculated to ensure  that the corporation’s depositors and other
customers can afford and continue to use the corporation’s services;
(B) Amenable to financing, structuring, negotiation or adjustment to meet depositors’
or other customers’ specific circumstances or hardships when necessary; and
(C) Adequate to ensure  the corporation’s financial and operational solvency, viability and
continued existence;
(j) Sue any  public or private individual or entity in the corporation’s own name or be sued
by any public or private individual or entity in the  corporation’s own name in any local, state
or federal forum;
(k) Solicit and receive gifts and donations of money or property of  any description or
nature from any source for  the corporation’s benefit and, subject to the terms of the gift
[4]
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or donation, retain, invest and use the gift or donation;
(L) Acquire, receive, hold, keep, pledge, control, manage, use,  lend, expend and invest all
funds, appropriations, gifts,  bequests, securities and revenue that the corporation obtains
from any source;
(m) Borrow money in amounts,  for times and on terms that the corporation’s board of
directors deems appropriate;
(n) Issue bonds or other debt instruments  in the name of the State of Oregon with the
cooperation and under the supervision of the State Treasurer and in accordance  with ORS
chapter 289 and other applicable law;
(o) Seek and implement to the extent practicable methods by  which the corporation may
interconnect with financial institutions  and banking services to enable funds transfers and
other financial services, to the extent that the services are in accordance with law and do
not put the moneys and property of the corporation or depositors or other  customers of the
corporation at substantial risk of loss or seizure;
(p) Submit to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services by September 1 of each
even-numbered year a budget request prepared according  to generally accepted accounting
principles for the department to submit as part of the Governor’s budget request;
(q) Purchase  insurance, operate a self-insurance program or otherwise arrange for
equivalent insurance of any nature  that is adequate for the risks that the corporation as-
sumes in the corporation’s governance and operations;
(r) Indemnify and defend, in cooperation with the Department  of Justice, the
corporation’s directors, officers, agents or employees;
(s) Adopt, amend and  repeal bylaws, administrative rules in accordance with ORS chapter
183, orders and policies and otherwise administer and manage the corporation’s affairs;
(t) Perform any other act that in the judgment of the corporation’s  board of directors is
necessary or appropriate to carry out the corporation’s purposes; and
(u) Exercise the powers set forth in this subsection, notwithstanding  that by exercising
the powers, the corporation engages in  activities that state or federal antitrust laws may
deem anticompetitive.
(4)(a) The Oregon Cash  Depository Corporation shall acquire or lease real property and
construct or  renovate offices, facilities, business locations and other improvements that are
capable of providing for secure  handling and storage of cash deposits or other valuable
property. The offices, facilities or business locations that the corporation constructs or
renovates must, to the extent practicable given the corporation’s purposes and  the likely
market for  the corporation’s services, meet the most stringent industry standards for se-
curing cash and other valuable property. The corporation shall make the  facilities available
to depositors and other customers at regular hours and in locations  that the corporation
determines have a need for the corporation’s services. The corporation shall also ensure  to
the maximum extent practicable that the facilities enable  depositors and other customers
of the corporation to enter onto and exit from the premises of an office, facility or business
location of the corporation  without becoming subject to criminal activity and a consequent
loss of the depositor’s or other customer’s property.
(b) In determining suitable sites for the corporation’s offices, facilities  and business lo-
cations, the corporation, consistent with the corporation’s determination of need under par-
agraph (a) of this subsection  and after taking into account the corporation’s fiscal and
[5]
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
operational capacity, shall endeavor to provide adequate local  access to the corporation’s
offices, facilities and business locations in all counties of this state.
SECTION 3.
(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, ORS 279.835 to 279.855 and ORS
chapters 240, 276, 279A, 279B, 279C, 282, 283, 291, 292 and 293 do not apply to the  Oregon Cash
Depository Corporation. Notwithstanding that ORS chapters 279A, 279B and  279C do not ap-
ply to the corporation, the corporation shall  subscribe to the policy set forth in ORS 279A.015
with respect to the corporation’s contracting activities and shall commit to openness,  im-
partiality and competition in awarding contracts. The corporation, by rule  and policy, shall
develop practices that  are appropriate for the corporation and that encourage affirmative
action, recycling, purchasing goods and services from qualified  nonprofit agencies for indi-
viduals with disabilities,  paying prevailing wages that the Bureau of Labor and Industries
specifies, providing or  requiring workers’ compensation insurance for workers on contracts
and ensuring  that disadvantaged business enterprises, minority-owned businesses, woman-
owned businesses, businesses that service-disabled veterans  own and emerging small busi-
nesses participate in contracts with the corporation or the  corporation’s subsidiaries or
contractors.
(2) The Oregon Cash Depository Corporation may contract or agree  with any state
agency to perform duties and functions and to exercise powers imposed  by law or otherwise
committed to or conferred upon the corporation.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, ORS 293.240, 293.260, 293.262 and 293.505
(2) apply to  the directors, officers, employees and accounts of the Oregon Cash Depository
Corporation and any subsidiary corporation that the Oregon Cash  Depository Corporation
forms or acquires to the same extent that the statutes apply to a state agency.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, ORS 200.005 to 200.075,  200.090,
279A.100, 279A.105, 279A.107, 279A.110 and 279A.112 apply  to the Oregon Cash Depository
Corporation and the directors, officers and employees of the corporation as if the corporation
were a contracting agency as defined in ORS 279A.010.
(5) ORS  30.260 to 30.460, 236.605 to 236.640, 243.650 to 243.806, 297.040, 307.090 and 307.112
and ORS chapters 35, 190, 192, 244 and 295 apply to the Oregon Cash Depository  Corporation
under the same terms as the statutes apply to public bodies, as defined in ORS  174.109, other
than the State of Oregon.
SECTION 4. (1) Legal title to real and personal property  and any facilities that the State
of Oregon acquired before the effective date of this 2021 Act that the Oregon Cash Depository
Corporation uses or manages in accordance with sections  1 to 16 of this 2021 Act remains
with the State of Oregon.  The corporation has the exclusive care, custody and control of the
real and personal property and  facilities under the terms of an exclusive leasehold interest
in the real  and personal property and facilities for a term of 99 years, subject to an earlier
termination if the corporation is  dissolved or is otherwise unable to care for or maintain
custody or  control of the real or personal property. The term of the leasehold begins on the
operative date of this section and, subject to the Governor’s approval, may be renewed for
consecutive 99-year terms.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of  the laws of this state concerning the au-
thority of state agencies to lease real property and facilities, the Oregon Department of  Ad-
ministrative Services, acting on behalf of the State of Oregon, shall execute a lease for  all
real and personal property and facilities to which the State of Oregon has title  and that the
[6]
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Oregon Cash Depository  Corporation uses in accordance with sections 1 to 16 of this 2021
Act. The department may not terminate the lease unless:
(a) The corporation ceases  operations or ceases to exist, or the Legislative Assembly or
another operation of law dissolves  the corporation or alters the purposes of the corporation
in such a manner as to make the lease no longer tenable;
(b) The State of Oregon conveys or transfers title to the real or  personal property and
facilities to a nongovernmental entity in accordance with applicable law; and
(c) The State  of Oregon does not place any other conditions upon the corporation in
connection with the termination.
(3) The Oregon Cash Depository Corporation shall pay the State of  Oregon the sum of
$99 as consideration for each lease at the time the corporation executes the lease.
(4) The  Oregon Cash Depository Corporation shall manage and maintain all real and
personal property and facilities that are subject to a lease  described in this section. The
corporation may not sell or convey  legal title to, but may encumber, the real and personal
property and facilities. The State of Oregon may  encumber the real and personal property
and facilities only in a manner that would  not impair the financial condition of the corpo-
ration or the rights of any person that holds an obligation of the corporation.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Oregon Cash Depository Corporation shall promptly and in writing
notify the Legislative  Assembly or the Emergency Board, if the Legislative Assembly is not
in session, after discovering any shortfall  in moneys available to pay when due an amount
necessary to satisfy a bond or other debt obligation or an agreement  to repay moneys the
corporation borrowed. In the notification, the  corporation shall specify the amount of the
shortfall.
(2) In enacting this section, the Legislative Assembly acknowledges an intention to pro-
vide, from funds other than funds previously appropriated  to the Oregon Cash Depository
Corporation, moneys necessary to pay the debt or obligation. This subsection does  not,
however, legally obligate the Legislative Assembly or the Emergency Board to provide  funds
for the purposes set forth in this section except to  the extent that the Oregon Constitution
may require the provision of funds.
(3)(a) A director, officer or employee of the  Oregon Cash Depository Corporation who has
reason to believe that a defalcation has occurred at  any office, facility or business location
that the corporation operates or maintains has an affirmative duty  to report the defalcation
and any information that forms the  basis of the belief to the appropriate law enforcement
officer or agency with jurisdiction of the matter.
(b) The corporation and a law enforcement agency described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall notify  the Secretary of State and the Attorney General within five days after
discovering a defalcation at any of the corporation’s offices, facilities or business locations.
(c) The Secretary of State may conduct  an immediate audit of the corporation’s finances
and operations at the office, facility or business location where the defalcation occurred.
(d) An audit under paragraph (c) of  this subsection does not constrain or prevent the
corporation from conducting an internal  audit of the operations of any of the offices, facili-
ties or business locations at which a defalcation occurs.
SECTION 6. (1) The Oregon Cash Depository Corporation shall conduct transactions  with
depositors and other customers in a secure manner, with due regard for:
(a) The laws of this state;
[7]
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The privacy and security of the corporation’s depositors and other customers; and
(c) The effect of the  corporation’s business on the persons and locations in which the
corporation operates.
(2) The corporation  shall devise and use a system by which the corporation can identify
the corporation’s depositors and other customers reliably, securely and privately and by
means of which depositors and other customers can conduct  transactions with the corpo-
ration and obtain account balances and  statements of account and all other information
necessary to transact business  with the corporation. In devising the system, the corporation
may not use a Social Security number or other identifying  number that places a depositor’s
or other customer’s identity or assets  at risk of theft, unlawful or unauthorized use, seizure
or other risk.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  the corporation may declare
and treat  as abandoned and may appropriate for the corporation’s own use moneys or other
valuable property that a depositor or other customer leaves in the care of the  corporation
for a period of more than one year during which the depositor or other customer does not:
(A) Transact any business with  the corporation, including making any withdrawals from
or deposits to the depositor’s or other customer’s account;
(B) Respond to any statements of account, communications or notices  from the corpo-
ration;
(C) Keep  a current address or other contact information on file with the corporation in
a manner that causes  statements of account, communications or notices from the corpo-
ration to be returned as undeliverable; and
(D) Otherwise remain available  for identification, location and communication by com-
mercially reasonable means.
(b) The corporation shall offer a depositor or other customer  the opportunity to desig-
nate a beneficiary or assignee of the moneys or other  valuable property in the depositor’s
or other customer’s account if certain specified events occur. The  corporation shall act in
a fiduciary capacity and make all commercially reasonable efforts to locate the beneficiary
or assignee and to transfer the moneys or property to the beneficiary  or assignee in ac-
cordance with the  terms of the designation described in this paragraph before declaring in
accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection that the moneys or property are abandoned.
(c) The corporation shall measure the beginning of the period described in paragraph  (a)
of this subsection from the date of the corporation’s last transaction or communication with
the depositor or other customer.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Oregon Cash Depository Corporation Fund  is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest,  dividends or other income
earned on the moneys in the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation Fund must be credited  to
the fund.
(2) Except for moneys otherwise designated by statute, the Oregon  Cash Depository
Corporation shall pay all  fees, commissions, compensation for costs and expenses, assess-
ments, charges,  proceeds, gifts, donations and any other charge, consideration or moneys the
corporation receives to the State Treasury and  to the credit of the Oregon Cash Depository
Corporation Fund. All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the corporation
for the purposes set forth in sections 1 to 16 of this 2021 Act.
(3) Subject to the terms, conditions or limits  specified for a particular gift or donation,
[8]
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation may invest the moneys in  the Oregon Cash Depos-
itory Corporation Fund in accordance with standards set forth in section 9 of this 2021 Act.
(4) The Oregon Cash Depository Corporation may establish accounts  and subaccounts
within the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation Fund if the  corporation’s board of directors
determines that accounts or subaccounts are necessary. The board of directors  may credit
any account  or subaccount within the fund with interest, dividends or other income. The
board of  directors shall keep a record of the moneys deposited into the fund and shall indi-
cate by separate cumulative accounts and subaccounts the sources from  which the moneys
are derived and the activity, program or other expenditure against  which each withdrawal
is charged.
SECTION 8.
(1) The Oregon Cash Depository Corporation, with an affirmative vote of  the
corporation’s board of directors after due consideration of  the provisions of this section, the
operational needs of the corporation and  the interests of the corporation’s depositors and
other customers, may specify 60 percent or more of the average daily amount of  moneys on
deposit with the  corporation as a reserve amount that the corporation must retain securely
at the corporation’s offices, facilities or business locations at  all times to satisfy the needs
of the corporation’s depositors and other customers for liquidity and access to  deposited
moneys.
(2) The Oregon Cash  Depository Corporation may invest in accordance with section 9 of
this 2021 Act the amount of the moneys that are not in  the reserve described in subsection
(1) of this section. In making investments under this section, the corporation shall:
(a) Identify investment targets and expected returns on investment with specific refer-
ence to the corporation’s financial and operational needs; and
(b) Favor short-term investments that the corporation can liquify easily and  immediately
to the extent necessary to meet the needs of the corporation’s depositors and  other cus-
tomers.
(3) Before investing the moneys described  in subsection (2) of this section, the Oregon
Cash Depository Corporation  shall obtain legal, financial and other advice necessary to ap-
prise the  corporation of the legalities and risks of using the moneys and making any planned
investments. The corporation, for the duration of each investment of the  moneys described
in subsection (2) of this  section, shall obtain and keep in place insurance, reserve funds and
other protections against loss or seizure of the moneys.
(4) After returning when  necessary the principal amounts the Oregon Cash Depository
Corporation invested under this section to the corporation’s  offices, facilities or business
locations, the corporation shall deposit into the Oregon  Cash Depository Corporation Fund
any proceeds in excess of the principal amounts  that the corporation realizes from investing
moneys under this section.
(5) The Oregon Cash Depository  Corporation shall replace any losses from investments
the corporation makes under this  section from, as appropriate, insurance or other risk
management measures or from reserve amounts the corporation holds for this  purpose in
the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation Fund.
(6) To the extent permitted under applicable law  and with consideration of the needs and
interests of the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation’s depositors  and other customers, the
corporation may conduct investment transactions under this section in cash and  in curren-
cies, including digital currencies, of the corporation’s own choosing or that the  corporation
[9]
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
specifies in agreements with entities in which the  corporation invests and in agreements
with the corporation’s depositors and other customers.
SECTION 9.
(1) The board of directors of  the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation may
invest moneys in the Oregon Cash  Depository Corporation Fund and shall manage the in-
vestments that the board of directors makes as a prudent investor would do under  the cir-
cumstances then prevailing and in light of the  purposes, terms, distribution requirements
and laws that govern the fund. The board of directors may contract with or delegate au-
thority to another person to invest the moneys or manage the investments if the board  of
directors requires the other person to invest the moneys or manage the investments in ac-
cordance with this section.
(2) For purposes of this section, investing the moneys of the Oregon  Cash Depository
Corporation or managing investments as a prudent investor would do means that  the
corporation’s board of directors, or a person  with which the board of directors contracts or
to which the board of directors delegates authority, shall:
(a) Exercise reasonable care, skill, prudence and caution in the context of  each invest-
ment;
(b) Manage each investment as part of an  overall investment strategy that incorporates
risk and return objectives that are reasonably suited to the goals of the board of directors;
(c) Favor investments within this state and in entities  or institutions that are subject to
the laws of this state;
(d) Refrain from investing if an investment or the source of the moneys for an  invest-
ment would put moneys in or from the Oregon Cash Depository  Corporation Fund at sub-
stantial risk of loss, diversion or seizure; and
(e) Otherwise invest the moneys in accordance with the requirements of law.
(3) The board of directors of the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation,  and any person
with which the board of directors contracts or to  which the board of directors delegates
authority to invest  the moneys in the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation Fund or manage
the investments that the board of directors makes, has a duty to diversify the  investments
unless diversification is not prudent under the circumstances. In addition  to the duty to di-
versify investments, the board of directors or the person:
(a) Has the fiduciary duties of  loyalty and impartiality with respect to the interests of
the corporation;
(b) Shall act with prudence in deciding whether and how to delegate authority and in
selecting and supervising agents; and
(c) Shall incur only costs that are reasonable in amount and appropriate to the invest-
ment responsibilities imposed by law.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a  member of the board of
directors of the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation, or a person with which the  board of
directors has contracted  or to which the board of directors has delegated authority to invest
moneys and manage investments, within three  business days after becoming aware that an
investment decision or other matter that  is pending before the board of directors might lead
to a private pecuniary benefit or detriment to the member,  the person, a relative of the
member or person or  to a business with which the member, the person or the relative is
associated, shall notify the board of directors in writing that  the member’s or the person’s
action, decision or recommendation might constitute an actual or  potential conflict of in-
[10]
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
terest.
(b) The requirement under paragraph (a) of this subsection for a  member of the board
of directors to  notify the board of directors of an actual or potential conflict of interest does
not apply if the member’s pecuniary benefit or detriment arises out of:
(A) An  interest or membership in a particular business, industry, occupation or class
that the member must have in order to be a member of the board of directors;
(B) An  action the member would take in the member’s official capacity as a member of
the board of directors that would affect to  the same degree a class that consists of all resi-
dents of this state or a smaller  class that consists of an industry, occupation or other group
with which the member is associated or with which a relative of the member  is associated;
or
(C) Membership in, or membership on the board of directors of, a  nonprofit corporation
that is tax exempt under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(5) A member of the board of directors of the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation  shall
resolve an actual or potential conflict of interest described in this  section in accordance with
the procedure set forth in ORS 244.120.
SECTION 10.
(1) The  Oregon Cash Depository Corporation Fund is a trust fund that is
exclusively for the uses and purposes  declared in sections 1 to 16 of this 2021 Act, except that
this provision does not amend or impair the force or effect of any law of this state that
specifically authorizes the Oregon Cash Depository  Corporation to invest moneys from the
fund.
(2)(a) Subject to the right of the State of Oregon to direct legislatively the disposition
of any surplus that exceeds reserves or that exceeds any amount that is necessary  to ensure
the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation’s  fiscal soundness for current operations and future
capital needs,  the State of Oregon declares that the state does not have a proprietary in-
terest in the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation Fund.
(b) To the extent that surplus moneys exist in the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation
Fund that are subject to disposition in accordance with paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the
Legislative Assembly shall direct the disposition to  fund economic development in this state.
SECTION 11. (1) The Oregon Cash Depository Corporation shall set aside a portion  of the
interest and other income the corporation receives  from investing moneys from the Oregon
Cash Depository Corporation Fund in an amount the corporation considers necessary to
maintain one  or more reserve accounts. The corporation shall maintain and use the reserve
accounts to offset gains and losses of invested capital.
(2) The Oregon  Cash Depository Corporation may amortize gains and losses of capital
that the corporation invests whenever the corporation  determines that amortization is
preferable to offsetting the gain or loss with moneys from a reserve  account described in
subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 12.
(1)(a) The Secretary of State  shall conduct an annual audit of the Oregon
Cash Depository Corporation and the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation Fund in accord-
ance with ORS 297.210. As part of the audit, the  Secretary of State shall contract with a firm
that is qualified to audit accounts of the type that the corporation maintains.
(b) The firm that conducts the audit required under paragraph (a) of this  subsection
must be familiar with the accounting standards that apply to the reserves under review  and
shall maintain errors and omissions insurance with limits that the Secretary  of State pre-
[11]
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
scribes.
(c) The Secretary of State shall determine the scope  of the audit required under para-
graph (a) of this subsection, which must include, but not be limited to:
(A) Reviewing the sources and uses of the moneys in the fund;
(B) Reconciling changes in reserve values from the prior year;
(C) Examining the development of reserve inadequacies or redundancies over time;
(D) Assessing the future financial viability of the fund; and
(E) Evaluating losses and loss adjustment expense reserves in accordance with  standards
developed for reasonably comparable operating and investment funds.
(d) The corporation shall cooperate with  the auditing firm in all respects and shall permit
the firm full access  to all information the firm deems necessary for a true and complete
audit.
(e) The auditing firm shall  conduct the audit required under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section using generally accepted accounting principles.
(f) The corporation shall  pay the cost of the audit required under paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(2) The Secretary of  State shall provide the Governor, the President of the Senate and
the Speaker of  the House of Representatives with an annual report on the results of the
audit. The Secretary  of State shall make the report available for public inspection in ac-
cordance with the Secretary of  State’s established rules and procedures for public disclosure
of audit documents.
(3) This section does not preclude the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation from con-
ducting an internal audit or independent audit of the corporation’s operations or of the
Oregon Cash Depository Corporation Fund whenever the corporation’s board  of directors
deems an audit necessary or prudent.
SECTION 13.
The board of directors of the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation shall
report to the Secretary of State by March 15 of each year:
(1) The total amount of assets in the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation  Fund as of
December 31 of the previous year;
(2) The reserves and surplus moneys the board of directors established for the fund;
(3) Any funds in addition to the funds described in subsection (2) of this section; and
(4) The total amount  of investment gain or loss the fund generated during the previous
year that ended on December 31.
SECTION 14.
Not later than the 90th day after the Secretary of State completes  and de-
livers to the appropriate  authority an audit under section 12 of this 2021 Act, the Oregon
Cash Depository Corporation or any  subsidiary corporation that the Oregon Cash Depository
Corporation formed or acquired shall notify the Secretary of State in writing of the measures
that the corporation or the subsidiary  has taken or proposes to take, if any, to respond to
the recommendations in the audit. The Secretary of State may extend  the 90-day period for
good cause.
SECTION 15. The Oregon Cash Depository  Corporation, every four years after the oper-
ative date of this section, shall:
(1) Engage at the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation’s expense an independent public
or private agency, including but  not limited to a university, an auditing firm or another re-
sponsible authority with appropriate capability, to  conduct a comprehensive study of the
[12]
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
corporation’s operations and financial condition and the operations and  financial condition
of any of the corporation’s subsidiaries. The study, at a minimum, must:
(a) Apply the methods and categories of evaluation  that the Secretary of State applies in
an audit under section 12 of this 2021 Act;
(b) Evaluate the management and operations of the corporation and  the corporation’s
subsidiaries in accordance with standards that would apply to businesses with similar  or re-
lated purposes, similar size and scope of operations and other appropriate criteria;
(c) Make recommendations  for improvements or remedial measures necessary to ensure
that the corporation fulfills the purposes set forth under section 2 of this 2021 Act; and
(d) Evaluate,  at a minimum, the current utility and need for the corporation and the
corporation’s subsidiaries, the prospects for the continued financial and operational viability
of the corporation and the corporation’s subsidiaries  and the soundness of the financial and
operational management of the corporation and the corporation’s subsidiaries.
(2) Ensure by contract or agreement  that the entity that prepares the study described
in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Explains in the study the methodology and assumptions  the individual or entity used
in preparing the study;
(b) Includes all information necessary to support the conclusions in the study; and
(c) Provides an executive summary of the study and the conclusions in the study.
(3) Provide, not later than December 31 of the year in which the Oregon Cash Depository
Corporation commissions the  study described in this section, copies of the study to the
President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, each committee of  the
Legislative Assembly that  is concerned with financial institutions and the Legislative Fiscal
Officer.
SECTION 16.
(1) The Attorney General shall:
(a) Defend  a director, officer or employee of the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation
against any civil claim or criminal charge brought or alleged against  the director, officer or
employee as a consequence of the director’s, officer’s or employee’s performance of  a duty
or function that is in accordance with the purposes set forth for the corporation  in sections
1 to 16 of this 2021 Act and that otherwise complies with the laws of this state; and
(b) Defend against an in rem proceeding brought to claim  any moneys or property of the
corporation or deposited in the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation Fund.
(2) The Attorney General shall provide the defense described  in subsection (1) of this
section at no charge to the Oregon Cash Depository Corporation or  to a director, officer or
employee of the corporation and otherwise  to the same extent that the Attorney General
defends an agency or  instrumentality of the state that functions or performs duties in ac-
cordance with the laws of this state.  The Attorney General shall pay for the costs of com-
plying with the provisions of this section with moneys appropriated to the Attorney General
for the purposes set forth in this section.
(3) This  section does not apply to an action or charge brought against the Oregon Cash
Depository Corporation or a director, officer or  employee of the corporation for a violation
of a law of this state, a failure to carry out  a duty that a law of this state or a bylaw, policy
or directive of the corporation imposes on the director, officer or employee or a violation of
a bylaw, policy or directive of the corporation.
SECTION 17.
(1) Sections 1 to 16 of this 2021 Act become operative January 1, 2022.
[13]
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
(2) Notwithstanding the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section, on or
after the effective date of this 2021 Act, in order to prepare the Oregon  Cash Depository
Corporation to begin operations as soon as practicable after the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section and to enable the  corporation’s board of directors to exercise
or undertake, on and after the  operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all
of the duties, powers and functions conferred on the board of directors by sections  1 to 16
of this 2021 Act:
(a) The Governor  may appoint directors to the corporation’s board of directors on an
interim or temporary basis, pending confirmation by the Senate; and
(b) The board of  directors may adopt rules, bylaws or policies that are necessary to or-
ganize the corporation.
(3) The Director of the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services may adopt rules
and take other actions before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section
that are necessary to support the formation and organization of the Oregon Cash Depository
Corporation, to secure the corporation’s management over any state property  to which the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services retains title but which the  department allows
the corporation to lease, rent or  use and to enable the director, on and after the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section, to exercise  the duties, powers and functions
conferred on the director by sections 1 to 16 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 18.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[14]