Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for deposit in  the Place-Based Water Planning Fund
established under ORS 537.872.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $___ for distribution  to the Seal Rock Water District to support
implementation of its state-recognized place-based integrated water resources plan.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $___ for distribution  to the Harney County Watershed Council
to support  implementation of its state-recognized place-based integrated water resources
plan.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $___ for distribution to  Union County to support implementa-
tion of its state-recognized place-based integrated water resources plan.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the
General Fund,  the amount of $___ for distribution to the Gilliam County Soil and Water
Conservation District to  support implementation of its state-recognized place-based inte-
grated water resources plan.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2748