Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Office of Substitute  Teachers is established in the Department of
Education.
(2) The office shall:
(a) Develop, communicate and coordinate best practices for  the recruitment, licensure,
professional development and retention of substitute teachers.
(b) Provide resources and support to school districts for the recruitment, retention and
engagement of substitute teachers.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2294