Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the Gen-
eral Fund,  the amount of $400,000, for distribution to the Attorney General’s Sexual Assault
Task Force for purposes of managing the Oregon SAE/SANE Certification  Commission, in-
cluding outreach, training, technical assistance,  establishing competencies and standards,
membership oversight and  multidisciplinary work with entities including law enforcement
agencies, hospitals and community-based victim services organizations.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2985