Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 414.572 is amended to read:
414.572. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt  by rule the qualification criteria and re-
quirements for a coordinated care organization  and shall integrate the criteria and requirements
into each contract with a coordinated  care organization. Coordinated care organizations may be
local, community-based organizations  or statewide organizations with community-based participation
in governance or  any combination of the two. Coordinated care organizations may contract with
counties or with other public or private entities to provide services to members. The authority  may
not contract with only one statewide organization.  A coordinated care organization may be a single
corporate structure or a network of providers organized through contractual relationships. The  cri-
teria and requirements adopted by the authority under this section must include, but are  not limited
to, a requirement that the coordinated care organization:
(a) Have demonstrated experience and a capacity for managing financial risk and  establishing
financial  reserves.
(b) Meet the following minimum financial requirements:
(A) Maintain restricted reserves of $250,000 plus an amount equal to 50  percent of the coordi-
nated care organization’s total actual or projected liabilities above $250,000.
(B) Maintain capital or surplus of not less than  $2,500,000 and any additional amounts necessary
to ensure the solvency of the coordinated care organization, as specified by the authority by rules
that are consistent with ORS 731.554 (6), 732.225, 732.230 and 750.045.
(C) Expend a portion of the annual net income or reserves  of the coordinated care organization
that exceed the financial requirements specified  in this paragraph on services designed to address
health disparities and the social determinants of  health consistent with the coordinated care
organization’s community health improvement plan and transformation plan and  the terms and con-
ditions of the Medicaid  demonstration project under section 1115 of the Social Security Act (42
U.S.C. 1315).
(c) Operate within a fixed global budget and  other payment mechanisms described in subsection
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 915
HB 2317
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) of this section and spend on primary care,  as defined by the authority by rule, at least 12 percent
of the coordinated care organization’s total expenditures for physical and mental health  care pro-
vided to members, except for expenditures on prescription drugs, vision care and dental care.
(d) Develop and implement alternative payment methodologies that are based on  health care
quality and improved health outcomes.
(e) Coordinate the delivery of physical health  care, behavioral health care, oral health care and
covered long-term care services.
(f) Engage community members  and health care providers in improving the health of the com-
munity and addressing regional, cultural, socioeconomic and racial  disparities in health care that
exist among the coordinated care organization’s members and in the coordinated care organization’s
community.
(2) In addition to the criteria  and requirements specified in subsection (1) of this section, the
authority  must adopt by rule requirements for coordinated care organizations contracting with the
authority so that:
(a) Each  member of the coordinated care organization receives integrated person centered care
and services designed to provide choice, independence and dignity.
(b) Each member has a consistent and stable relationship with a care team  that is responsible
for comprehensive care management and service delivery.
(c) The supportive and therapeutic needs of each member  are addressed in a holistic fashion,
using patient centered primary  care homes, behavioral health homes or other models that support
patient centered primary care and behavioral  health care and individualized care plans to the extent
feasible.
(d) Members receive comprehensive  transitional care, including appropriate follow-up, when en-
tering and leaving an acute care facility or a long term care setting.
(e) Members are provided:
(A) Assistance in navigating the health care delivery system;
(B) Assistance in accessing community and social support services and statewide resources;
(C) Meaningful language  access as required by federal and state law including, but not limited
to, 42 U.S.C. 18116, Title VI of the  Civil Rights Act of 1964, Title VI Guidance issued by the United
States Department of Justice and  the National Standards for Culturally and Linguistically Appro-
priate Services  in Health and Health Care as issued by the United States Department of Health and
Human Services; and
(D) Qualified health care interpreters or certified health care  interpreters listed on the health
care interpreter registry, as those terms are defined in ORS 413.550.
(f) Services  and supports are geographically located as close to where members reside as possi-
ble and are, if available, offered in  nontraditional settings that are accessible to families, diverse
communities and underserved populations.
(g) Each coordinated care organization uses health  information technology to link services and
care providers across the continuum of care to the greatest extent practicable and if financially vi-
able.
(h) Each coordinated care organization complies with the safeguards  for members described in
ORS 414.605.
(i) Each coordinated care organization convenes a community advisory council that meets  the
criteria specified in ORS 414.575.
(j) Each coordinated care organization  prioritizes working with members who have high health
[2]
HB 2317
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
care needs, multiple chronic conditions or behavioral health conditions and  involves those members
in accessing and managing appropriate preventive, health, remedial  and supportive care and ser-
vices, including the services  described in ORS 414.766, to reduce the use of avoidable emergency
room visits and hospital admissions.
(k) Members have a choice of providers within  the coordinated care organization’s network and
that providers participating in a coordinated care organization:
(A) Work together to develop best practices for care and service delivery to reduce  waste and
improve the health and well-being of members.
(B) Are educated about the integrated  approach and how to access and communicate within the
integrated system about a patient’s treatment plan and health history.
(C) Emphasize prevention, healthy lifestyle choices, evidence-based  practices, shared decision-
making and communication.
(D) Are permitted to participate in the networks of multiple coordinated care organizations.
(E) Include providers of specialty care.
(F) Are selected by coordinated care organizations using universal application and  credentialing
procedures and objective  quality information and are removed if the providers fail to meet objective
quality standards.
(G) Work together to develop best practices for culturally and linguistically  appropriate care
and service delivery to reduce waste, reduce health disparities and improve the  health and well-
being of members.
(L) Each coordinated care organization  reports on outcome and quality measures adopted under
ORS 413.022 and participates in the health care data reporting system established  in ORS 442.372
and 442.373.
(m) Each coordinated care  organization uses best practices in the management of finances,
contracts, claims processing, payment functions and provider networks.
(n) Each coordinated care organization participates in the learning  collaborative described in
ORS 413.259 (3).
(o) Each coordinated care organization has a governing  body that complies with ORS 414.584
and that includes:
(A) At least one member representing persons  that share in the financial risk of the organiza-
tion;
(B) A representative of a  dental care organization selected by the coordinated care organization;
(C) The major components of the health care  delivery system , including at least one repre-
sentative of a federally qualified health center ;
(D) At least two health care providers in active practice, including:
(i) A physician licensed under  ORS chapter 677 or a nurse practitioner licensed under ORS
678.375, whose area of practice is primary care; and
(ii) A behavioral health provider;
(E) At  least two members from the community at large, to ensure that the organization’s
decision-making is consistent with the values of the members and the community; [ and]
(F) At least two members of the community advisory council, one of whom is or  was within the
previous six months a recipient of medical assistance and is at least 16 years of age or a  parent,
guardian or primary caregiver of  an individual who is or was within the previous six months a re-
cipient of medical assistance ; and
(G) At least one senior public health official, including a  local public health administrator
[3]
HB 2317
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
as defined in ORS 431.003, a local health  officer as defined in ORS 431.003 or a communicable
disease nurse supervisor .
(p) Each coordinated care organization’s governing  body establishes standards for publicizing
the activities  of the coordinated care organization and the organization’s community advisory
councils, as necessary, to keep the community informed.
(q) Each coordinated care organization publishes on a website maintained by or on behalf of  the
coordinated care organization,  in a manner determined by the authority, a document designed to
educate members about best practices,  care quality expectations, screening practices, treatment
options and other support resources available for members who have mental  illnesses or substance
use disorders.
(r) Each coordinated care organization works with the Tribal Advisory Council  established in
ORS 414.581 and has a dedicated tribal liaison, selected by the council, to:
(A) Facilitate a resolution  of any issues that arise between the coordinated care organization
and a provider of Indian health  services within the area served by the coordinated care organiza-
tion;
(B) Participate  in the community health assessment and the development of the health im-
provement plan;
(C) Communicate regularly with the Tribal Advisory Council; and
(D) Be available for training by the office within  the authority that is responsible for tribal af-
fairs, any federally recognized tribe in Oregon and the urban Indian health program that is  located
within the area  served by the coordinated care organization and operated by an urban Indian or-
ganization pursuant to 25 U.S.C. 1651.
(3) The authority shall consider the participation of area agencies and other nonprofit agencies
in the configuration of coordinated care organizations.
(4) In selecting one or more coordinated care organizations to serve a  geographic area, the au-
thority  shall:
(a) For members and potential members, optimize access to care and choice of providers;
(b) For providers, optimize choice in contracting with coordinated care organizations; and
(c) Allow more than one coordinated  care organization to serve the geographic area if necessary
to optimize access and choice under this subsection.
(5) On or  before July 1, 2014, each coordinated care organization must have a formal contractual
relationship with any dental care organization that serves members of the coordinated care organ-
ization in the area where they reside.
(6) In addition to global budgets, the authority may employ other payment mechanisms  to reim-
burse coordinated care organizations for specified health services during limited periods of time if:
(a) Global  budgets remain the primary means of reimbursing coordinated care organizations for
care and services provided to the coordinated care organization’s members;
(b) The other payment mechanisms are consistent with the legislative intent expressed  in ORS
414.018 and the system design described in ORS 414.570 (1); and
(c) The payment mechanisms are employed only for health-related social needs services, such
as housing supports, nutritional assistance and climate-related assistance,  approved for the demon-
stration project under 42 U.S.C. 1315 by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]