Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall provide a loan
to ____ for the purpose of developing no fewer than 200 housing units divided among  three
or four multifamily dwellings. The borrower shall develop at least one multifamily  dwelling
in a rural, a coastal and an urban part of the state.
(2) Each multifamily dwelling developed under this section must be:
(a) Scaled modular or prefabricated construction; and
(b) Subject to an affordability  restriction that maintains the properties as affordable to
households with moderate incomes, as defined in  ORS 458.610, for a period of at least 30
years.
(3) The loan under subsection (1)  of this section shall have a maturity date of seven years
from the date that the loan is made and bear interest at one percent per year.
(4) The department shall make a grant to the borrower receiving a  loan under subsection
(1) of this section to be used to:
(a) Partner with Oregon and out-of-state  modular housing companies and manufacturers
to cultivate the modular housing industry;
(b) Work with state agencies on expediting the permitting process for modular housing;
(c) Work closely with larger employers in areas in which the multifamily dwellings  are
located to better understand the industry need for employee housing and challenges  to pro-
viding such housing; and
(d) Create a template for the potential use of  modular and prefabricated construction in
moderate income housing projects.
(5) The borrower under subsection  (1) of this section shall deliver a report to the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services on or before September 15, 2025, that includes:
(a) A description of the activities and findings under this section; and
(b) An assessment  of the effectiveness of the grant and loan provided under this section
and any recommendations for improvement.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2773
SB 632
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund:
(1) The amount of $22,000,000, to provide a loan under section 1 (1) of this 2023 Act.
(2) The amount of $2,000,000 to provide a grant under section 1 (4) of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[2]