Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 652.
SECTION 2. (1) ORS 652.120, 652.140, 652.150 and 653.055 do not apply to wages earned and
unpaid for  hours worked or work time lost due to the application of an employer’s time-
rounding policies, provided that the employer’s time-rounding policies are  in accordance with
the rounding standards established under federal law.
(2) As  used in this section, “work time” has the meaning given that term in ORS 653.010.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 729