Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human Services, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000,  which shall be expended for the development
of gatekeeper programs statewide with the objective of involving local communities in the
safety and support of seniors and people with disabilities.
(2) The department shall distribute the moneys  to area agencies, as defined in ORS
410.040, throughout this state to use in their local communities.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3018