Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 9 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Abortion” means the use or prescription of any instrument, medicine, drug or  any
other substance or device to terminate the pregnancy of a person known to be pregnant,  if
the intention is other than to increase the probability  of a live birth, to preserve the life or
health of the child after live birth or to remove a dead unborn child who died as the  result
of natural causes in utero,  accidental trauma or a criminal assault on the pregnant person
or their unborn child, and that use or prescription causes the premature termination  of the
pregnancy.
(2) “Attempt to perform or induce an abortion” means  an act, or an omission of a
statutorily required act, that, under the circumstances as the  actor believes them to be,
constitutes a substantial  step in a course of conduct planned to culminate in the perform-
ance or induction of an abortion.
(3) “Fertilization” means the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum.
(4) “Health care provider” means:
(a) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(b) A physician assistant licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525; and
(c) A nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390.
(5) “Partial birth abortion” means an abortion in which the person performing  the
abortion partially vaginally delivers a  living unborn child before killing the unborn child and
completing the delivery.
(6) “Probable gestational age” means the duration of the pregnancy at the  time the
abortion is to be performed or induced.
(7) “Rape or incest” means  any of the following, regardless of whether the person ac-
cused of committing the act has been charged with or convicted of committing the act:
(a) Incest under ORS 163.525.
(b) Rape in the third degree under ORS 163.355.
(c) Rape in the second degree under ORS 163.365.
(d) Rape in the first degree under ORS 163.375.
(e) Sodomy in the third degree under ORS 163.385.
(f) Sodomy in the second degree under ORS 163.395.
(g) Sodomy in the first degree under ORS 163.405.
[2]
SB 666
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) Sexual abuse in the third degree under ORS 163.415.
(i) Sexual abuse in the second degree under ORS 163.425.
(j) Sexual abuse in the first degree under ORS 163.427.
(k) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a minor under ORS 163.435.
(L) Sexual misconduct under ORS 163.445.
(8) “Reasonable medical judgment” means a medical judgment  that would be made by a
reasonably prudent health care provider who is knowledgeable about the pregnant  person’s
case and the treatment possibilities with respect to the medical conditions involved.
(9) “Telemedicine” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.723.
(10) “Unborn child” means an individual organism of the species Homo sapiens  from
fertilization until live birth.
SECTION 2.
(1) A pregnant person’s condition is a medical emergency  for purposes of
sections 3 and 4  of this 2025 Act if, in the reasonable medical judgment of the health care
provider:
(a) Failure to immediately terminate the pregnancy is reasonably likely  to result in the
pregnant person’s death; or
(b) The delay necessary to determine the probable gestational age  as required under
sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act is reasonably  likely to create a serious risk of substantial
and irreversible  physical impairment of one or more of the pregnant person’s major bodily
functions, not including psychological or emotional functions.
(2) The likelihood that a pregnant person will engage in conduct that would  result in the
pregnant person’s death or in the substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major
bodily function of the pregnant person does not constitute:
(a) A medical emergency for purposes of this section or section 3 or 4 of this 2025 Act;
(b) A risk of the pregnant person’s death  or of a substantial and irreversible physical
impairment of a major bodily  function of the pregnant person under section 4 (2)(c)(B) of this
2025 Act; or
(c) A reasonable basis for performing a partial birth abortion under section 4 (2)(e) of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) Except in the case of  a medical emergency that prevents compliance with
this section, a person may not perform or induce, or attempt to perform  or induce, an
abortion unless a health care provider has first made a determination of the  probable
gestational age of the unborn child.
(2) In making the determination required by subsection (1) of this section, the health
care provider shall make the inquiries of the person who is pregnant and  perform or cause
to be performed the medical examinations and tests that a reasonably prudent health care
provider who is knowledgeable about the case and the medical  conditions involved would
make and perform to make an accurate diagnosis with  respect to the probable gestational
age.
SECTION 4.
(1) A person may not perform or  induce, or attempt to perform or induce,
an abortion unless:
(a) A health care provider has determined under section  3 of this 2025 Act that the
probable gestational age of the unborn child is less than 15 weeks;
(b) The pregnant person’s condition is a medical emergency; or
(c) The pregnancy is a result of rape or incest.
[3]
SB 666
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) If an abortion permitted under subsection (1) of this section involves  an unborn child
with a probable gestational age of 15 or more weeks:
(a) The abortion may not be performed using telemedicine, including the prescribing  of
medication by telemedicine or  the filling of medication prescribed by telemedicine, if the
prescribing health care provider intends the medication to result in an abortion.
(b) The abortion must be performed or induced by  a health care provider in a hospital
licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.119 and 441.993 or an ambulatory surgical  center as defined
in ORS 442.015  that has a majority ownership by a hospital licensed under ORS 441.015 to
441.119 and 441.993.
(c) The health care provider shall consider all available procedures and perform or  in-
duce, or attempt to perform  or induce, the termination of pregnancy using the procedure
that, in the health care provider’s reasonable medical judgment, provides:
(A) The greatest opportunity for the unborn child to survive; and
(B) The least risk of the pregnant person’s death or of the substantial and irreversible
physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant person, other than psycho-
logical or emotional functions.
(d)(A) Except where the pregnant person’s condition constitutes a  medical emergency as
described under section 2 of this 2025 Act, in addition to the health care provider performing
or inducing the abortion, there must be  another health care provider in attendance who shall
take control of and provide immediate care for a child  born alive as a result of the abortion.
(B)(i) During the performance or induction of the abortion, the health  care provider
performing or inducing the abortion shall take all reasonable steps in keeping with good
medical practice, consistent with the  procedure used, to preserve the life and health of the
unborn child; and
(ii) After the abortion, the  health care provider required by this paragraph to be in at-
tendance shall take all reasonable steps in keeping with good  medical practice to preserve
the life and health of a child born alive as a result of the abortion.
(e) The health care provider may only knowingly or intentionally perform a  partial birth
abortion if a  physician reasonably believes that performing the partial birth abortion is nec-
essary to save the pregnant person’s life and that no other medical procedure is sufficient
to save the pregnant person’s life.
(f) The health care provider must obtain the  written consent of the pregnant person or,
if required under ORS 109.640, the pregnant person’s parent or legal guardian.
(g) The  health care provider must certify in writing to the hospital or ambulatory sur-
gical center in which the abortion  is to be performed or induced the facts supporting the
criteria permitting the abortion under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Any child born alive shall be treated as a person under the law, and  the State
Registrar of the Center for Health Statistics shall issue a birth  certificate certifying the
child’s birth even if the child may  subsequently die, in which event a registrar shall issue a
death certificate. Failure to take all reasonable  steps, in keeping with good medical practice,
to preserve the life and health of a child born alive shall subject the responsible persons to
Oregon laws  governing homicide, manslaughter and civil liability for wrongful death and
medical malpractice.
(4) If a health care provider reasonably  believes that a pregnancy is a result of rape or
incest, the health care provider shall:
[4]
SB 666
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) If the pregnant person is  at least 18 years of age, report any known or suspected
trafficking in persons under ORS 163.266 to a local law enforcement agency; or
(b) If the pregnant  person is under 18 years of age, report the suspected child abuse as
required under ORS 419B.010.
SECTION 5.
(1) In addition to the reporting  requirements under ORS 432.075 and 435.496,
a health care provider who performs or induces, or attempts to perform or  induce, an
abortion, shall report to the Oregon Health Authority in accordance with  rules adopted by
the authority. The report must include:
(a) If a determination of probable  gestational age was made, the probable gestational age
determined and the method and basis of the determination;
(b) If a determination of probable gestational age was not made or the  probable
gestational age was determined to be 15 or more weeks,  the basis of the determination that
a medical emergency existed or that the abortion was otherwise permitted under section  4
of this 2025 Act;
(c) The method used for the abortion and, in the case of a termination performed when
the probable gestational age was determined to be 15 or more weeks:
(A) Whether the  method used was one that, in reasonable medical judgment, provided the
best opportunity for the unborn child to survive; or
(B) If the method used did not  provide the best opportunity for the unborn child to sur-
vive, the basis of  the determination that termination of the pregnancy in that manner would
pose a greater  risk of the death of the pregnant person or of the substantial and irreversible
physical impairment of a major bodily function of the person,  other than psychological or
emotional functions, than other available methods;
(d) Whether an intra-fetal injection was used in an attempt to induce fetal demise; and
(e) The age and race of the person whose pregnancy was  terminated or attempted to be
terminated.
(2) The reports required by this section:
(a) May not include the  name, address or other information that individually identifies
the person whose pregnancy was terminated or attempted to be terminated.
(b) Must include a unique medical  record identifying number that correlates to the
person’s medical record.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this  subsection, the reports submitted under
this section are confidential and exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(b) The reports submitted under this section may be released:
(A) To the Attorney General or a district attorney with appropriate  jurisdiction pursuant
to a civil or criminal investigation; or
(B) Pursuant to a court order in an action brought under section 6 of this 2025 Act.
(4) The authority may adopt rules to carry out this section, including rules regarding  the
schedule on which a health care provider described in this  section is required to submit the
report described in this section.
SECTION 6.
Intentional or reckless failure  by a health care provider to meet the re-
quirements of section 5 of this 2025 Act:
(1) Constitutes unprofessional conduct for purposes of ORS 677.190.
(2) May be the basis for disciplinary action under ORS 678.111.
SECTION 7.
(1) On or before June 30 of each year, the Oregon Health Authority shall
[5]
SB 666
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
issue a public report of statistics relating to abortion. The public report must include:
(a) Statistics for the previous calendar year compiled from the reports submitted under
section 5 of this 2025 Act.
(b) Statistics for all previous calendar years in which reports were submitted  under sec-
tion 5 of this 2025 Act, adjusted  to reflect any additional information from late or corrected
reports.
(2) The authority may not include individually identifiable information  in the public re-
port.
SECTION 8.
(1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a person whose
pregnancy was terminated or attempted to be terminated in violation of  section 3 or 4 of this
2025 Act, or the  person responsible for the fertilization that resulted in the pregnancy that
is the subject of the abortion, may maintain an action  against the health care provider who
performed or induced, or attempted to perform or induce, the abortion for  actual and puni-
tive damages.
(b) Damages may not be awarded under this subsection if the  pregnancy described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection was the result of criminal conduct by the  person responsible
for fertilization that resulted in the pregnancy described in this subsection.
(2) A cause of action for injunctive relief against a health  care provider who intentionally
or recklessly violates  section 3 or 4 of this 2025 Act may be brought against the health care
provider by:
(a) A person whose pregnancy was terminated or attempted  to be terminated, if the
person was not at least 18 years of age at the time of the abortion;
(b) The representative of a  person whose pregnancy was terminated or attempted to be
terminated if the person died as a result of the abortion;
(c) The person responsible for the fertilization that resulted  in the pregnancy of the
person whose pregnancy was terminated or attempted to be terminated;
(d) A prosecuting attorney with competent jurisdiction; or
(e) The Attorney General.
(3) Injunctive relief may not be granted to the  person responsible for fertilization that
resulted in the pregnancy that is the subject of  the abortion described in subsection (1)(a)
of this section if the pregnancy is the result of criminal conduct  by the person described in
this subsection.
(4) If the plaintiff prevails in the action described  in this section, the court shall also
award reasonable attorney fees to the plaintiff.
(5) If the defendant prevails in the action described in this section,  and the court finds
that the action was frivolous and brought  in bad faith, the court shall award attorney fees
to the defendant.
SECTION 9.
(1) In any action or  proceeding brought under section 8 of this 2025 Act, the
court shall determine whether the  anonymity of a person whose pregnancy was terminated
or attempted to be terminated must  be exempt from public disclosure under ORS 192.311 to
192.478 if the person does not consent to disclosure.
(2) If the court determines that the person’s  anonymity must be preserved, the court
shall issue orders to the parties, witnesses and counsel, direct the sealing of  the record and
order exclusion from the courtroom or  hearing room all persons who are not parties, wit-
nesses or counsel. The orders described in this subsection must be  accompanied by written
[6]
SB 666
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
findings that explain why the person’s anonymity must be preserved, why  the order is es-
sential to that end, how the order is narrowly tailored to  serve that interest and why no
reasonable less-restrictive alternative exists.
(3) If the person described in subsection  (1) of this section does not consent to disclose
the person’s identity, any person other than a public  official who brings an action under
section 8 of this 2025  Act that is related to the person’s pregnancy shall bring the action
under a pseudonym.
(4) This section may not be construed to conceal the identity of the plaintiff or witnesses
from the defendant or defendant’s counsel.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 435.210 is amended to read:
435.210. Every individual has a fundamental right to make decisions about the individual’s re-
productive health, including the right to make decisions about the  individual’s reproductive health
care, to use or refuse  contraception, to continue the individual’s pregnancy and give birth or , sub-
ject to the limitations in section 4 of this 2025 Act,  to terminate the individual’s pregnancy.
SECTION 11.  ORS 435.496 is amended to read:
435.496. (1) Each induced termination of pregnancy which occurs in  this state, regardless of the
length of gestation, shall be reported to the Center for Health Statistics within 30  days by the per-
son in charge of the institution in which the induced termination  of pregnancy was performed. If the
induced termination of pregnancy was  performed outside an institution, the attending physician or
the naturopathic physician shall prepare and file the report.
(2) If the person who is required  to file the report under subsection (1) of this section has
knowledge  that  the person [ who underwent the induced termination of pregnancy ] whose pregnancy
was terminated also underwent a follow-up visit or had follow-up contact with a health  care pro-
vider, the person  shall include the fact of the follow-up visit or contact, and whether any compli-
cations were noted, in the report. If the person filing the report is not personally aware of the
follow-up visit  or contact but was informed of the visit or contact, the person shall include the
source of that information in the report.
(3) Reports submitted under this section  [ shall] may  not disclose the [ names or identities of the
parents] name or identity of the person whose pregnancy was terminated .
SECTION 12.
 ORS 677.190 is amended to read:
677.190. The Oregon Medical Board may refuse to grant, or may suspend or revoke, a  license
to practice for any of the following reasons:
(1)(a) Unprofessional or dishonorable conduct.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the use of  an alternative medical treatment shall not by it-
self constitute unprofessional conduct. For purposes of this paragraph:
(A) “Alternative medical treatment” means:
(i) A treatment that the treating physician, based  on the physician’s professional experience, has
an objective basis to believe has a reasonable  probability for effectiveness in its intended use even
if the treatment is outside recognized scientific guidelines, is unproven, is no  longer used as a gen-
erally recognized or standard treatment or lacks the approval of the United States Food  and Drug
Administration;
(ii) A treatment that is  supported for specific usages or outcomes by at least one other physician
licensed by the Oregon Medical Board; and
(iii) A treatment that poses no greater risk to a patient  than the generally recognized or
standard treatment.
[7]
SB 666
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) “Alternative medical  treatment” does not include use by a physician of controlled substances
in the treatment of a person for chemical dependency resulting from the use  of controlled sub-
stances.
(2) Employing any person to solicit patients for  the licensee. However, a managed care organ-
ization, independent practice association, preferred provider organization or other  medical service
provider organization may contract for patients on behalf of physicians.
(3) Representing to a patient that  a manifestly incurable condition of sickness, disease or injury
can be cured.
(4) Obtaining any fee by fraud or misrepresentation.
(5) Willfully or negligently divulging a professional secret without the written consent of  the
patient.
(6)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, conviction of any offense
punishable by  incarceration in a Department of Corrections institution or in a federal prison, subject
to ORS 670.280. A copy  of the record of conviction, certified to by the clerk of the court entering
the conviction, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction.
(b) The board may not suspend  or revoke a person’s license, or refuse to grant a license to a
person, because of a conviction resulting solely from  the person’s provision of a reproductive or
gender-affirming health care service that is otherwise lawful in this state  but unlawful in the juris-
diction in which the person provided the service,  so long as the service provided was performed in
accordance with the standard of care applicable to the service.
(7) Impairment as defined in ORS 676.303.
(8) Fraud or misrepresentation in applying for or  procuring a license to practice in this state,
or in connection with applying for or procuring registration.
(9) Making statements  that the licensee knows, or with the exercise of reasonable care should
know, are false or misleading, regarding skill or the efficacy or value of the medicine,  treatment or
remedy prescribed or administered by the licensee or  at the direction of the licensee in the treat-
ment of any disease or other condition of the human body or mind.
(10) Impersonating  another licensee licensed under this chapter or permitting or allowing any
person to use the license.
(11) Aiding or abetting the practice of medicine or podiatry by a person  not licensed by the
board, when the licensee knows, or with the exercise of reasonable care should know, that the per-
son is not licensed.
(12) Using the name of the licensee under the designation “doctor,” “Dr.,” “D.O.”  or “M.D.,”
“D.P.M.,” “Acupuncturist,” “P.A.” or any similar designation in any form of advertising  that is
untruthful or is intended to deceive or mislead the public.
(13) Gross negligence or repeated negligence in the practice of medicine or podiatry.
(14) Incapacity to practice medicine or podiatry. If the board has  evidence indicating incapacity,
the board may order a licensee to  submit to a standardized competency examination. The licensee
shall have access to the result of the examination and to the criteria used for grading and  evaluat-
ing the  examination. If the examination is given orally, the licensee shall have the right to have the
examination recorded.
(15)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, disciplinary action by another
state of a license to practice, based upon acts by  the licensee similar to acts described in this sec-
tion. A  certified copy of the record of the disciplinary action of the state is conclusive evidence
thereof.
[8]
SB 666
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The board may not suspend  or revoke a person’s license, or refuse to grant a license to a
person, because of a disciplinary action by another state resulting solely  from the person’s provision
of a reproductive or gender-affirming  health care service that is otherwise lawful in this state but
unlawful in the jurisdiction  in which the person provided the service, so long as the service provided
was performed in accordance with the standard of care applicable to the service.
(16) Failing to  designate the degree appearing on the license under circumstances described in
ORS 677.184 (3).
(17) Willfully violating any provision of this chapter  or any rule adopted by the board, board
order, or failing to comply with a board request pursuant to ORS 677.320.
(18) Failing to report the change of the location of practice of the licensee as  required by ORS
677.172.
(19) Imprisonment as provided in ORS 677.225.
(20) Making a fraudulent claim.
(21)(a) Performing psychosurgery.
(b) For purposes of this subsection and ORS 426.385, “psychosurgery” means any operation de-
signed to produce an irreversible lesion or destroy  brain tissue for the primary purpose of altering
the thoughts, emotions or behavior of a human being. “Psychosurgery” does not include procedures
which may produce an irreversible lesion or destroy brain tissues  when undertaken to cure well-
defined disease states such as brain tumor, epileptic foci and certain chronic pain syndromes.
(22) Refusing an invitation for an informal interview  with the board requested under ORS
677.415.
(23) Violation of the federal Controlled Substances Act.
(24) Prescribing controlled substances without a legitimate medical purpose, or prescribing
controlled substances without following accepted procedures  for examination of patients, or pre-
scribing controlled substances without following accepted procedures for record keeping.
(25) Providing written documentation for purposes of ORS 475C.783 without having  legitimately
diagnosed a debilitating medical condition, as defined in ORS 475C.777, or  without having followed
accepted procedures for the examination of patients or for keeping records.
(26) Failure by the licensee to report to the board any adverse action taken against  the licensee
by another licensing jurisdiction or any peer  review body, health care institution, professional or
medical society or association, governmental agency, law enforcement agency or  court for acts or
conduct similar to acts or conduct  that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action as described
in this section.
(27) Failure by the licensee to notify the board of the  licensee’s voluntary resignation from the
staff of a health care institution or voluntary limitation of a licensee’s staff privileges at the  insti-
tution if that action occurs while the licensee  is under investigation by the institution or a com-
mittee thereof  for any reason related to medical incompetence, unprofessional conduct, physical
incapacity or impairment.
(28) Violation of section 3 or 4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 678.111 is amended to read:
678.111. In the manner prescribed in ORS chapter 183 for a contested case, and except as pro-
vided in ORS 678.138:
(1) The  Oregon State Board of Nursing may refuse to issue a license to practice nursing by ex-
amination or indorsement  or a nurse internship license or may revoke or suspend a license, issue
a limited license, censure or reprimand or place on probation, subject to any  conditions imposed by
[9]
SB 666
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
the board, a person issued a license, for any of the following causes:
(a) Conviction of the licensee of crime where the crime bears demonstrable relationship to  the
practice of nursing. A copy of the record of the conviction, certified to by the  clerk of the court
entering the conviction, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction.
(b) Gross incompetence or gross negligence  of the licensee in the practice of nursing at the level
for which the licensee is licensed.
(c) Any willful  fraud or misrepresentation in applying for or procuring a license or renewal of
a license.
(d) Fraud or deceit of the licensee in the practice of nursing  or in admission to the practice of
nursing.
(e) Impairment as defined in ORS 676.303.
(f) Conduct derogatory to the standards of nursing.
(g) Violation of any  provision of ORS 678.010 to 678.448 or rules adopted under ORS 678.010 to
678.448.
(h) Revocation or suspension of a license  to practice nursing by any state or territory of the
United States, or  any foreign jurisdiction authorized to issue nursing credentials whether or not that
license or credential was relied upon in issuing that license in this  state. A certified copy of the
order of revocation or suspension shall be conclusive evidence of the revocation or suspension.
(i) Physical condition that makes the licensee unable to conduct safely the practice  for which
the licensee is licensed.
(j) Violation of any condition imposed by the board when issuing a limited license.
(k) Violation of section 3 or 4 of this 2025 Act.
(2) A license may be  denied, suspended or revoked for the reasons stated in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) A license in inactive status may be denied, suspended or revoked  for the reasons stated in
subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A license in retired status may be denied, suspended or revoked for any  cause stated in
subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 14.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[10]