Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business  Development Department shall conduct a study of
business services in Oregon. The department shall submit a report  of the study to the in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to business in the manner provided
under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3336