Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of  $1,000,000 for deposit in the Wolf Management Compen-
sation and Proactive Trust Fund established under ORS 610.155.
SECTION 2. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 202