Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Early Learning Division and the Department of Human Services shall
jointly conduct a study on employment-related child care.
(2) The division and department shall jointly report  the results of the study, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to  an appropriate interim committee of the Legis-
lative Assembly no later than September 1, 2021.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2021.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3423