Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Reparations is established.
(2) The task force consists of 15 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the  Senate shall appoint two members from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint 11 members as follows:
(A) Two members of groups that  advocate for reparations for Oregonians of African-
American descent;
(B) Two members from groups that advocate for civil rights and human rights;
(C) One member from a labor organization;
(D) One member from a faith community;
(E) One member from an institution of higher education;
(F) One member from an historical research institution;
(G) Two members from Oregon civic and fraternal organizations; and
(H) One member representing the Commission on Black Affairs.
(3)(a) The task force shall:
(A) Study and develop proposals for  financial and nonfinancial reparations for Oregonians
of African-American descent;
(B) Develop appropriate methods for educating the public about the task force’s findings;
and
(C) Recommend appropriate remedies based on the task force’s findings.
(b) In  carrying out the functions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the task
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2414
HB 2995
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
force shall develop an interim report on the task  force’s findings for public review. In the
report, the task force  shall identify governmental actions that have resulted in harm to
Oregonians of African-American descent in the following categories of systemic discrimi-
nation:
(A) Enslavement;
(B) Racial terror;
(C) Political disenfranchisement;
(D) Housing segregation;
(E) Separate and unequal education;
(F) Racism related to the environment and infrastructure;
(G) Pathologizing the Black family;
(H) Control over creative cultural and intellectual life;
(I) Stolen labor and hindered opportunity;
(J) An unjust legal system;
(K) Mental and physical harm and neglect; and
(L) The wealth gap.
(4) The task force may:
(a) Identify methods for eliminating racial bias in employment  and advancement, espe-
cially for Oregonians of African-American descent who  seek public employment or promotion
to higher paying positions in government;
(b) Identify methods for eliminating anti-Black discrimination policies in artistic,  cul-
tural, creative, athletic and intellectual life; and
(c) Identify individuals who should be compensated financially and with services, at no
charge to the individual, that seek to remedy damage to the individual’s mental or  physical
health from anti-Black healthcare systems and treatments, such as  forced sterilization,
medical experimentation, racist  sentencing disparities, police violence, environmental racism
and race-related stress that causes psychological harm.
(5) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to human rights no later than September 15, 2026.
(12) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall provide  staff support to the task
force.
(13) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
[2]
HB 2995
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]