Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Oregon Independent Science Review Board is created. The board
consists of seven members appointed by the Governor.
(2) Persons appointed members of the board must possess the following attributes:
(a) Scientific or technical expertise, which may  include legal or policy expertise, relevant
to a broad range of natural resource disciplines;
(b) A willingness to engage with stakeholders  in natural resource issues and maintain
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2216
SB 198
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
transparency with regard to the work of the board;
(c) An ability to communicate complex technical issues in a straightforward manner;
(d) An ability to extract meaningful, addressable scientific questions from complex na-
tural resource issues;
(e) Objectivity and familiarity with independent scientific review processes;
(f) An ability to chair an  independent science review process that involves receiving input
from a large number of experts effectively and efficiently;
(g) Familiarity with the state of Oregon’s natural  resources and the communities and
sectors that rely on Oregon’s natural resources for their well-being; and
(h) An ability to identify and engage the needed expertise for each issue being  addressed
in the course of independent science review.
(3) The term of office of each  member of the board is four years, but a member serves
at the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term of a  member, the Gover-
nor shall appoint  a successor whose term begins on January 1 next following. A member is
eligible for reappointment, but may serve as a member for no more than two consecutive
terms.  If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment to be-
come immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) At the first meeting of each year, the board shall elect one of  its members to serve
as chairperson. The chairperson shall have a term of  one year, with duties and powers that
the board determines are necessary for the performance of the functions that  the board as-
signs to the chairperson.
(5) A majority of the members of the board  constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(6) Official action by the board requires the approval of a majority of the members of  the
board.
(7) The board shall meet at times and places  specified by the call of the chairperson or
of a majority of the members of the board.
(8) The board may adopt rules necessary for operation of the board.
(9) A member of the board is entitled to  compensation and expenses as provided in ORS
292.495.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding the term of  office specified by section 1 of this 2017 Act,
of the members first appointed to the Oregon Independent Science Review Board:
(1) Two shall serve for terms ending January 1, 2020.
(2) Two shall serve for terms ending January 1, 2021.
(3) Two shall serve for terms ending January 1, 2022.
(4) One shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2023.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Independent Science Review Board shall:
(1) Receive, evaluate and direct the Independent Scientific Review Secretariat to convene
independent scientific review panels to address requests by state agencies, local governments
and private persons  for independent scientific review of complex, multidisciplinary natural
resource issues that require the involvement of multiple agencies.
(2) Assist the secretariat in identifying, recruiting and selecting persons to serve on in-
dependent scientific review panels.
(3) Assist in framing the questions to be addressed by independent scientific review pan-
els.
[2]
SB 198
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) Provide for leadership and management of independent scientific review panels  by
developing a process by which individual members of the board shall be assigned to serve as
chairperson for individual independent scientific review panels.
(5) Provide other advice and direction as necessary to  support the activities of the
secretariat.
(6) Approve the final membership of each independent scientific review panel as desig-
nated by the secretariat.
(7) Establish policy  and procedures for the secretariat and programs and activities ad-
ministered by the secretariat.
SECTION 4.
(1) The  Independent Scientific Review Secretariat is established as an ad-
ministrative section within the Institute for Natural Resources established at Oregon  State
University under ORS 352.808,  subject to the supervision of the Administrator of the Inde-
pendent Scientific Review Secretariat and the  policies and procedures established by, and
recommendations of, the Oregon Independent Science Review Board.
(2) The secretariat consists of the administrator and all personnel  employed in the
secretariat.
(3) Subject to subsection (1) of this section,  the secretariat shall develop and administer
programs as set forth in this section  and section 5 of this 2017 Act and administer funds
available in the Independent Scientific Review Fund created in section 7 of this 2017 Act.
(4) The secretariat shall provide the board with staff  and other assistance as necessary
for the board to perform its duties.
SECTION 5. (1) The Independent Scientific Review Secretariat shall:
(a) Assist the Oregon Independent Science Review Board in identifying  the type of inde-
pendent scientific review necessary to address a particular issue presented to the board.
(b) Serve as the primary  point of contact for members of the public for matters related
to the activities of the board and the secretariat.
(c) Supervise and assist in establishing  the scope of work and other administrative mat-
ters applicable to independent scientific review panels.
(d) Maintain a list of experts available to participate as members of independent scientific
review panels.
(2) The secretariat may:
(a) Conduct hearings and conferences to develop facts, to explain programs and  activities
and to obtain advice.
(b) Enter into agreements with other public bodies, as defined in  ORS 174.109, or associ-
ations or private persons for services to assist the secretariat and the board.
(c) Enter  into agreements with other public bodies, as defined in ORS 174.109, the federal
government, associations or private persons for  cooperative endeavors that further pro-
grams administered by the secretariat.
(d) Obtain assistance or data from any state agency.
(e) Perform any other act necessary to carry out the duties of the secretariat.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Governor, upon consultation with  the Oregon Independent Science
Review Board, shall appoint an Administrator of the Independent Scientific Review
Secretariat who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.
(2) The Governor shall set the compensation of the administrator.
(3) The administrator shall be the administrative head of the secretariat.
[3]
SB 198
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(4) The administrator shall hire the staff necessary to allow the secretariat to carry out
its duties. In accordance with the State Personnel  Relations Law, the administrator and any
manager hired by the administrator shall be in the unclassified service.
SECTION 7. (1) The Independent Scientific Review Fund is  established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the Independent
Scientific Review Fund shall be credited to the fund.  Moneys in the Independent Scientific
Review Fund are continuously appropriated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commis-
sion to be distributed to Oregon State University for the purposes of sections 1 to 6 of  this
2017 Act.
(2) The Independent Scientific Review Fund consists of all moneys appropriated  or
transferred to the  fund and moneys received as gifts, grants or contributions from any
source, whether public or private.
SECTION 8.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]