Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 58, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 58.  (1)  In lieu of amending its urban growth boundary under any other process provided
by sections 49 to 59 , chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024  [ of this 2024 Act ], Metro or a city outside of
Metro may amend its urban growth  boundary to add one or more sites described in section 51 (1)(a)
and (b) , chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024,  [ of this 2024  Act ] to the urban growth boundary and to
remove one or more tracts of land from the urban growth boundary as provided in this section.
(2) The acreage of the added site and removed lands must be roughly equivalent.
(3) The removed lands must have been zoned for residential uses.
(4) The added site must be zoned for residential uses at the same or greater density  than the
removed lands.
(5)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, land may be removed from an urban
growth boundary under this section without landowner consent.
(b) A landowner may not  appeal the removal of the landowner’s land from an urban growth
boundary under this section unless the landowner agrees  to enter into a recorded agreement with
Metro or the  city in which the landowner would consent to annexation and development of the land
within 20 years if the land remains in the urban growth boundary.
(6) Review of an exchange of lands made under this section may only be made by:
(a) For cities outside of Metro, the county as provided in section 50 (2) , chapter 110,  Oregon
Laws 2024, [of this  2024 Act ] and by the Department of Land Conservation and Development, subject
to judicial review, as provided in section 57 , chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024  [ of this 2024 Act ]; or
(b) For Metro, the Department of  Land Conservation and Development, subject to judicial re-
view, as provided in section 57 , chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024  [ of this 2024 Act ].
(7)(a) Sections 50 (1)(d) to (g), 52, 53, 54, 55  and 56 , chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024,  [ of this
2024 Act ] do not apply to a site addition made under this section.
(b) Section 50 (1)(b), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, does not apply to a site addition
made under this section for a city with a population of 20,000 or fewer.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4109
HB 3709
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
SECTION 2.
 Section 60, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 60. (1) Sections 49 to [ 59] 57, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024,  [ of this 2024  Act ] are re-
pealed on January 2, 2033.
(2) Section 58, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section  1 of this 2025 Act,
is repealed on January 2, 2033.
(3) Section 59, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, is repealed on January 2, 2033.
[2]