Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Department of Transportation shall  create a program by which a
person who has had the person’s driving privileges reinstated pursuant to  a court order un-
der section 2 of this 2017 Act may apply for  the reduction or waiver of any moneys owed to
the department.
(2) The department shall create an application process and criteria for the  reduction or
waiver of moneys owed for the program described in subsection (1) of this section. The  cri-
teria must  take into consideration a court finding pursuant to section 2 of this 2017 Act that
the person is unable to pay any moneys owed to the department.
(3) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) A person who is on probation, post-prison supervision or parole  after
conviction of a crime and  who is experiencing barriers to employment, education or treat-
ment due to the  suspension of the person’s driving privileges may file a petition in the circuit
court in which the person was  convicted for an order reinstating the person’s driving privi-
leges.
(2) The district attorney of the  county in which the person was convicted shall be named
and served as the respondent in the petition.
(3) The court shall hold a hearing on a petition  filed in accordance with subsection (1)
of this section. In determining whether to grant the petition, the court shall consider:
(a) The nature of the offense for which the person was convicted;
(b) Other criminal  and relevant noncriminal behavior of the person both before and after
the conviction that resulted in the suspension;
(c) The person’s compliance with the sentence of the court;
(d) The recommendation of the person’s probation, post-prison supervision or  parole of-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2119
HB 2424
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ficer; and
(e) Any other relevant factors.
(4)(a) The court  shall order a petitioner’s driving privileges reinstated if, after a hearing
described in subsection (3) of this section, the court finds  by clear and convincing evidence
that the person:
(A) Is rehabilitated;
(B) Does not pose a threat to the safety of the public; and
(C) Would be better able to comply with  the conditions of the person’s supervision upon
the reinstatement of the person’s driving privileges.
(b) The court may include in the order:
(A) A finding that the person is unable to  pay the reinstatement fee established under
ORS 807.370; or
(B) A finding that the person is unable  to pay any moneys owed to the Department of
Transportation.
(5) Upon receiving a court  order to reinstate a person’s driving privileges, the Depart-
ment of Transportation shall reinstate driving privileges in accordance with ORS 809.380.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 809.380 is amended to read:
809.380. All of the following apply to a person whose driving privileges have been suspended:
(1) The period of suspension shall last as long as provided for that particular suspension  by law.
(2) During the period of suspension, the person  is not entitled to exercise any driving privileges
in this state except as provided under this  subsection. Unless otherwise specifically provided by law,
a person whose driving privileges are suspended may obtain, if the  person qualifies, a hardship
driver permit under ORS 807.240, and exercise driving privileges under the driver permit.
(3) Upon expiration of the suspension, the Department of Transportation  shall reissue, upon re-
quest of the person, the suspended driving privileges and  any license or driver permit that evidences
the driving privileges. The reissuance shall be  without requalification by the person except that the
department may require  the person to furnish evidence satisfactory to the department that the per-
son is qualified  to continue to exercise driving privileges in this state before the department reissues
the driving privileges.
(4) The department may not issue  or reinstate  any driving privileges in contradiction to this
section  except as required by section 2 of this 2017 Act .
(5) If the person  fails to surrender to the department any license or driver permit issued as ev-
idence of driving privileges that are suspended,  the person is subject to the penalties under ORS
809.500.
(6) No reinstatement of suspended driving privileges will be  made by the department until the
fee for reinstatement  of suspended driving privileges established under ORS 807.370 is paid to or
waived by the department. The department may waive the reinstatement fee for any of  the following
reasons:
(a) The suspension occurred under ORS 809.419 for failure  to take an examination upon request
of the department under ORS 807.340.
(b) The suspension occurred under ORS 809.419 for failure  to obtain required medical clearance
upon request of the department under ORS 807.070 or 807.090.
(c) The suspension occurred under ORS 809.419 for  incompetence to drive a motor vehicle or
having a mental or  physical condition or impairment that affects the person’s ability to safely op-
erate a motor vehicle.
[2]
HB 2424
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) The suspension occurred under ORS 809.419 upon notification  by the superintendent of a
hospital under ORS 807.700 that a person should not drive.
(e) The suspension occurred under ORS 809.419 upon notification by a  court under ORS 810.375
that a person charged with a traffic offense has been found guilty except for insanity.
(f) The department committed an error in issuing the suspension.
(g) The suspension was the result of an error committed by an  insurance company in issuing or
failing to issue a certification of insurance or in canceling a certification of insurance filed with  the
department under ORS 806.270.
(h) The department issued the suspension without error because the  person failed to respond as
required under ORS 806.160 or to furnish proof of exemption under ORS  806.210 from the filing re-
quirement of ORS 806.200, but the department later determines that the  person in fact was in com-
pliance with financial responsibility requirements as of the date  of the department’s letter of
verification under ORS 806.150 or at the time of an accident described in ORS 806.200.
(i) The department issued the suspension  without error because the person was not in compli-
ance with financial responsibility requirements as  of the date of the department’s letter of verifica-
tion under ORS 806.150 or at the time of an accident described in ORS 806.200, but the department
later determines that the person reasonably and in good faith believed that the person  was in com-
pliance with financial responsibility requirements  on the date of the department’s letter of verifica-
tion or at the time of the accident.
(j) The suspension was the result of an error committed by an insurance  company in notifying
the department regarding the correctness of a certification under ORS 806.150.
(k) The suspension occurred because the person failed to make future responsibility filings but
the department later determines that the reason for  the failure was that the person was a military
reservist or a member of a national  guard unit that was ordered to active military duty to a location
outside of the United States. The effective date of the military orders must be prior to the effective
date of a suspension issued by the department for failure to make a future responsibility filing.
(L) The department issued the suspension without error because  the department received a no-
tice to suspend from a court under ORS 809.210 or 809.220,  but the department later determines that
the person in fact was in compliance with the requirements of  the court prior to the effective date
of the suspension.
(m) The court finds that the person is unable to pay the reinstatement  fee in an order
under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(7) The department shall waive the reinstatement fee for a person whose driving privileges  were
suspended under ORS 809.423 (3) if the person:
(a) Has graduated from high school and provides  the department with proof of graduation sat-
isfactory to the department; or
(b) Has received a General Educational Development (GED) certificate from a community col-
lege and provides the department with proof of the certificate satisfactory to the department.
SECTION 4.
(1) A person who is on probation, post-prison supervision or parole  after
conviction of a crime and who is experiencing barriers to employment due to the revocation
of the person’s occupational or professional license  may file a petition in the circuit court
in which the person was convicted for an order directing the licensing  board, commission or
agency to reverse the revocation.
(2) The district attorney of the  county in which the person was convicted shall be named
and served as the respondent in the petition.
[3]
HB 2424
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The court shall hold a hearing  on a petition filed in accordance with subsection (1)
of this section. In determining whether to grant the petition, the court shall consider:
(a) The nature of the offense for which the person was convicted;
(b) Other criminal  and relevant noncriminal behavior of the person both before and after
the conviction that resulted in the suspension;
(c) The person’s compliance with the sentence of the court;
(d) The recommendation  of the person’s probation, post-prison supervision or parole of-
ficer; and
(e) Any other relevant factors.
(4) The court  shall issue an order directing the licensing board, commission or agency
to reverse the revocation of the person’s occupational or professional license if, after a
hearing described in subsection (3) of this section, the  court finds by clear and convincing
evidence that the person:
(a) Is rehabilitated;
(b) Does not pose a threat to the safety of the public;
(c) Is not disqualified from holding the occupational or  professional license for some
other lawful reason; and
(d) Would be better able to comply with the conditions of the  person’s supervision and
obtain or maintain employment upon reversal of the revocation of the person’s  occupational
or professional license.
(5) Upon receiving the court order described in  subsection (4) of this section, the appli-
cable licensing board, commission or agency  shall reinstate the occupational or professional
license that was revoked due to the person’s conviction.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 670.280 is amended to read:
670.280. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “License” includes a registration, certification or permit.
(b) “Licensee” includes a registrant or a holder of a certification or permit.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 342.143 (3) or 342.175 (3), a licensing board, commission or
agency :
(a) May not deny, suspend or revoke an occupational or professional license solely for  the rea-
son that  the applicant or licensee has been convicted of a crime, but it may consider the relationship
of the facts [ which] that  support the conviction  and all intervening circumstances to the specific
occupational or professional standards in determining the fitness of the person to  receive or hold
the license.
(b) Shall reverse a revocation  of a person’s occupation or professional license upon re-
ceipt of a court order described in section 4 of this 2017 Act.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 342.143 (3)  and 342.175 (3), a licensing board, commission or
agency may deny an occupational or professional license or impose discipline on a licensee based
on conduct that is not undertaken directly in the course of the licensed  activity, but that is sub-
stantially related to the fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to engage  in the activity for
which the license  is required. In determining whether the conduct is substantially related to the
fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to engage in the activity for which the  license is re-
quired, the licensing board, commission or  agency shall consider the relationship of the facts with
respect to the conduct and all intervening circumstances to  the specific occupational or professional
standards.
[4]
HB 2424
1
[5]