Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 5 of this 2023 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
90.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 5 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “Consumer reporting agency” means a consumer reporting agency  that compiles and
maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis as used in 15 U.S.C. 1681a.
(2) “Financial education course” means an educational class, including an online class,
that provides information to tenants about the importance of building  and maintaining good
credit and that may be  provided by or through a bank, a nonprofit organization, the Housing
and Community Services Department, a local government or a housing authority.
(3) “Pilot program” or  “program” means the Rent Reporting Pilot Program established
under sections 2 to 5 of this 2023 Act.
(4) “Program administrator” means the organization contracted to administer the  pilot
program under section 3 (2) of this 2023 Act.
(5) “Rent payment information” means information concerning a tenant’s timely,  late or
missed payments of rent but not of other payments allowed under ORS 90.140.
SECTION 3. (1) The Rent Reporting Pilot Program is established within the Housing  and
Community Services Department to facilitate  the reporting of rent payment information to
consumer reporting agencies by participant landlords for their participant tenants.
(2) The department shall contract with a third party to administer the pilot program.
(3) On or before November 1, 2023, the program administrator, with the assistance of the
department or statewide landlord associations, shall identify and recruit participant landlords
to the pilot program. To the extent practicable,  the contractor shall recruit participant
landlords with:
(a) A variety of types of dwellings for rent or lease, including dwelling units  of various
sizes;
(b) Dwellings for rent or lease that are located in diverse areas of this state;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3300
HB 3088
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) At least five dwellings for rent; and
(d) A large proportion of  tenants who are from populations underrepresented in
homeownership.
(4) During the term of the pilot program, participant landlords must agree to:
(a) Assist in the recruitment of participant tenants;
(b) Report the rent payment information of a participant tenant to a consumer reporting
agency for at least 12 months after the tenant begins participation in the program;
(c) Not charge a tenant to participate in the program;
(d) Comply with rules adopted by the department to administer the program; and
(e) Provide information to the department  and the program administrator concerning the
program for the purpose of informing the report required by section 5 of this 2023 Act.
(5) No later than February 1,  2024, the program administrator, with assistance from the
participant landlords, shall recruit no fewer than 100 participant tenants  to the program. To
participate in the pilot program, tenants must:
(a) Be a tenant of a participant landlord; and
(b) Complete a financial education course approved by the department.
(6) A tenant may end participation in the program at any time and for any reason  by
providing notice to their landlord but may not resume participation thereafter.
(7) The program administrator shall:
(a) Provide education to participant landlords concerning the requirements  of partic-
ipation in the pilot program; and
(b) Provide information to  participant landlords to help recruit participant tenants, in-
cluding information concerning how tenants may  participate in the pilot program and the list
of financial education courses adopted under section 4 (1) of this 2023 Act.
(8) The department may provide compensation to landlords  who have completed the re-
quirements of the pilot program under subsection (4) of this section,  as certified by the
program administrator.
SECTION 4.
On or before October 15, 2023, the Housing and Community Services De-
partment shall adopt rules implementing the  Rent Reporting Pilot Program. The rules must:
(1) Include a list of financial education courses that a  tenant may complete to participate
in the program and contact information for the providers of the courses.
(2) Require that participant  landlords report rent payment information concerning a
participant tenant after a tenant has elected to participate  in the program and has met the
educational requirements.
(3) Establish amounts, schedules and terms of compensation for participant landlords.
(4) Establish a  form or format, including an online form, by which participant tenants
may elect to participate or end participation in the program that must include:
(a) A statement that the participant tenant’s participation in the program is voluntary;
(b) A  statement that all of the participant tenant’s rent payment information will be re-
ported to a consumer reporting agency, regardless of whether the payments are timely,  late
or missed;
(c) Instructions  describing how a participant tenant may elect to end participation in the
program; and
(d) A statement that if the participant  tenant elects to end participation in the program,
the tenant may not resume participation.
[2]
HB 3088
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
SECTION 5.
(1) No later than September 15, 2025, the Housing and Community Services
Department, in consultation with the program administrator,  shall provide a report to an
interim committee of the Legislative Assembly relating to housing in  the manner provided
in ORS 192.245 on the pilot project established under sections 2 to 5 of this 2023  Act. The
report must include:
(a) The number of participant landlords;
(b) The number of landlords that expressed interest in participating;
(c) The number of participant tenants, including those who ended participation in the
program;
(d) The demographics  of participant tenants, including race, ethnicity, gender, income
and age, as may be voluntarily provided by participant tenants;
(e) The cost of administering the program;
(f) The number of residential properties offered by each participant landlord;
(g) For each participant landlord:
(A) The nature of the reporting mechanism used to report participant  tenants’ rent
payment information to consumer reporting agencies; and
(B) The city and county of each property offered by the participant landlord;
(h) A short narrative of challenges faced by participant landlords and participant tenants
during the program; and
(i) Aggregate  data and assessment of how participation in the program positively or
negatively affected participant tenants’ credit.
(2) In addition, the report may include the department’s recommendations  concerning
the continuation of the pilot program.
(3) The department shall maintain a copy of the report on its public website.
SECTION 6.
Sections 2 to 5 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1, for the pilot program established under
sections 2 to 5 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]