Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) If an amendment to the Oregon Constitution  is referred to the people by
the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly during its 2024 regular session under Article XVII,
section 1, of the Oregon Constitution, or if an Act of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly
that passes both houses of the Legislative Assembly during  its 2024 regular session is re-
ferred to the people by the Legislative Assembly  under Article IV, section 1 (3)(c), of the
Oregon Constitution:
(a) Notwithstanding ORS 250.035,  250.067, 250.075 (2) and 250.085, the ballot title for a
measure described in this subsection shall be prepared by  the joint legislative committee
appointed under section 6 of this  2024 Act and filed with the Secretary of State not later than
the date set by  the Secretary of State by rule. The word limits described in ORS 250.035 (2)
do not apply  to a ballot title for a measure described in this subsection that is prepared by
the joint legislative committee  under this subsection. Unless modified under section 4 of this
2024 Act, the ballot title prepared by the committee under  this subsection shall be the ballot
title printed in the voters’ pamphlet and printed on, or included with, the ballot.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 251.205,  251.215, 251.225, 251.230 and 251.235, the explanatory
statement to be printed in the voters’ pamphlet for  a measure described in this subsection
shall be prepared by the joint legislative committee appointed under section 6 of this  2024
Act and filed with the Secretary of State not later than the date set by the Secretary of State
by rule. Unless modified under section 5 of this 2024 Act,  the explanatory statement pre-
pared by the committee under this subsection shall be  the explanatory statement printed in
the voters’ pamphlet.
(2) The joint legislative committee may begin preparation of the ballot title  or explana-
tory statement on the date the measure is filed with the Secretary of State.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in sections 1 to 7  of this 2024 Act, ORS chapters 250,
251 and 254 apply to an election held on a measure described in subsection (1) of this  section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 314
HB 4166
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) As used in sections 1 to 7 of this 2024 Act, “measure” has the meaning given  that
term in ORS 250.005.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Secretary of  State shall cause to be printed in the voters’ pamphlet
the number, ballot title and text of  a measure described in section 1 of this 2024 Act and the
financial estimate, explanatory statement and arguments relating to the measure. The Sec-
retary of State shall also cause to be  printed in the voters’ pamphlet any other information
required by law.
(2) For purposes of sections 1  to 7 of this 2024 Act, the election referred to in ORS 251.295
is the general election.
SECTION 3.
(1) Notwithstanding the deadline specified in ORS 254.085, the Secretary of
State shall prepare and deliver to each county  clerk by the most expeditious means practi-
cable a certified statement of a measure described in section 1 of this  2024 Act. The Secre-
tary of State shall include with  the statement the number, financial estimate and ballot title
of the measure and any other information required by law. The Secretary of State shall keep
a copy of the statement.
(2) Each county clerk shall print on  the ballot the number, financial estimate and ballot
title of the measure, along with any other information  required by law. In lieu of printing
the financial estimate, the summary portion of the ballot  title or other information required
by law on  the ballot, each county clerk may include with the ballot the complete text of the
ballot title, the financial estimate and any other information required by law.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding ORS 250.085:
(1) Any elector dissatisfied with the ballot title for a measure described in section  1 of
this 2024 Act prepared by the joint legislative committee  appointed under section 6 of this
2024 Act may petition the Supreme  Court seeking a different ballot title. The petition shall
state the reasons that  the ballot title filed with the Secretary of State does not substantially
comply with the requirements of ORS 250.035 and section 1 of this 2024 Act.
(2) The petition shall name the Attorney General as the respondent and  must be filed not
later than the fifth business day after the joint legislative  committee files the ballot title
with the Secretary of State.
(3) An elector filing a petition under this section shall  notify the Secretary of State in
writing that the petition has been filed.  The notice must be received in the office of the
Secretary of State not later than 5 p.m. on the next business day following  the day the pe-
tition is filed.
(4) The Supreme  Court shall review the ballot title for substantial compliance with the
requirements of ORS 250.035 and section 1 of this 2024 Act.
(5) The review by the Supreme Court shall be conducted expeditiously to ensure the or-
derly and timely conduct of  the election at which the measure is to be submitted to the
electors.
(6) If the Supreme Court determines that the  ballot title prepared by the joint legislative
committee substantially complies with the requirements of ORS 250.035 and  section 1 of this
2024 Act, the court shall certify the ballot title to the Secretary of State. If  the Supreme
Court determines that the ballot title prepared by  the joint legislative committee does not
substantially comply with the requirements of ORS 250.035 and section 1 of  this 2024 Act, the
court shall modify the ballot title and certify the  ballot title to the Secretary of State or
refer the ballot title to the Attorney General for modification.
[2]
HB 4166
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
(7) Not later than five  business days after the Supreme Court refers a ballot title to the
Attorney General for modification  under this section, the Attorney General shall certify a
modified ballot title  to the Secretary of State. The modified ballot title is not subject to ju-
dicial review.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding ORS 251.235:
(1) Any person dissatisfied with the  explanatory statement for a measure described in
section 1 of this 2024 Act prepared by the joint legislative committee appointed  under section
6 of this 2024  Act may petition the Supreme Court seeking a different explanatory statement
and stating the reasons the explanatory statement is insufficient or unclear.
(2) The court shall  review the explanatory statement and certify an explanatory state-
ment to the Secretary  of State if the petition is filed and served as required in subsection
(4) of this  section not later than the fifth business day after the joint legislative committee
files the explanatory statement with the Secretary of State.
(3) Failure to file and serve the petition within the time prescribed in subsection (2)  of
this section precludes Supreme Court review and certification of an  explanatory statement.
If the court considers the petition, the  court may allow oral argument. The review by the
Supreme Court shall be conducted expeditiously to ensure the orderly and timely conduct of
the election at which the measure is to be submitted  to the electors. The explanatory
statement  certified  by the court shall be the explanatory statement printed in the voters’
pamphlet.
(4) At the time a person petitions  the Supreme Court under subsection (1) of this section,
the person also shall serve a copy of the petition on:
(a) The Attorney General; and
(b) The Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 6.
(1) For each measure described in section 1 of  this 2024 Act, a joint legisla-
tive committee consisting  of three Senators and three Representatives shall be appointed to
prepare and file with the Secretary of  State the ballot title and explanatory statement for
the measure.
(2)(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint three members of a committee  from
among members of the Senate, two from the majority party and one from a minority party.
(b) The Speaker of the House  of Representatives shall appoint three members of a com-
mittee from  among members of the House of Representatives, two from the majority party
and one from a minority party.
SECTION 7. The Secretary of State shall adopt rules governing  the procedures for con-
ducting an election on  a measure described in section 1 of this 2024 Act as may be necessary
to implement sections 1 to 7 of this 2024 Act. Rules adopted under this section may  not re-
quire the joint legislative committee appointed under section 6 of this 2024 Act to:
(1) Prepare or make publicly available a draft ballot title; or
(2) File a ballot title with the Secretary of State before June 4, 2024.
SECTION 8.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]