Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Employment Department shall study issues related to  laws concerning
job-protected leave from work. The department shall submit a report in  the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to business and labor no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2529