Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 244.
SECTION 2. A member of the Legislative Assembly shall file annually with  the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission a form listing:
(1) Each relative or  member of the household of the member of the Legislative Assembly
who receives a  salary for serving on the personal legislative staff of the member of the
Legislative Assembly.
(2) The amount of the salary each individual identified under subsection (1) of this section
receives for serving on the personal legislative staff of the member of the  Legislative As-
sembly.
(3) For any relative who resides with  the member of the Legislative Assembly, the per-
centage of any amount provided to the member as an allowance for the appointment  of per-
sonal staff that is used for the relative’s salary.
SECTION 3.  ORS 244.177 is amended to read:
244.177. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) to (4) of this section:
(a) A public official may not appoint, employ or promote a relative or member of the  household
to, or discharge,  fire or demote a relative or member of the household from, a position with the
public body that the public official serves or over which the public official exercises jurisdiction or
control, unless the public official  complies with the conflict of interest requirements of this chapter.
(b) A public official may not participate as a public official in any interview, discussion  or de-
bate regarding the appointment, employment or promotion of a  relative or member of the household
to, or the discharge, firing or demotion of a relative or member of the household from,  a position
with the public body that the public official serves or over which the public official exercises juris-
diction or control. As used in this paragraph, “participate” does not include serving  as a reference,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3137
HB 2850
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
providing  a  recommendation or performing other ministerial acts that are part of the normal job
functions of the public official.
(2) Subject to section 2 of  this 2025 Act,  a member of the Legislative Assembly may appoint,
employ, promote, discharge, fire  or demote, or advocate for the appointment, employment, promotion,
discharge, firing or demotion of, a relative or member of the  household to or from a position on the
personal legislative staff of the member of the Legislative Assembly.
(3)(a) A public  official may appoint, employ, promote, discharge, fire or demote, or advocate for
the appointment, employment, promotion, discharge, firing or demotion of,  a relative or member of
the household to  or from a position as an unpaid volunteer with the public body that the public of-
ficial serves or over which the public official exercises jurisdiction or control.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not  apply to the appointment, employment, promotion,
discharge, firing or demotion of a relative or member of the household  to a position as an unpaid
member of  a governing body of the public body that the public official serves or over which the
public official exercises jurisdiction or control.
(c) A relative or member  of the household described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may
receive reimbursement of expenses provided in the ordinary course of business to  similarly situated
unpaid volunteers.
(4) This  section does not prohibit a public body from appointing, employing, promoting, dis-
charging, firing or demoting a person who is a relative or member of the household of  a public of-
ficial serving the public body.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 244.179 is amended to read:
244.179. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 659A.309 and except as provided in  subsections (2) to (4) of
this section,  a public official acting in an official capacity may not directly supervise a person who
is a relative or member of the household.
(2) Subject to section 2 of this 2025  Act,  a member of the Legislative Assembly may directly
supervise a person who:
(a) Is a relative or member of the household; and
(b) Serves  as a public official in a position on the personal legislative staff of the member of the
Legislative  Assembly.
(3)(a) A public official acting in an official capacity may directly supervise a person who is a
relative or member of the household if the person serves as an unpaid volunteer.
(b) Paragraph (a)  of this subsection does not apply to service by a person in a position as an
unpaid member of  a governing body that a public official of whom the person is a relative or member
of the household serves or over which the public official exercises jurisdiction or control.
(c) A  relative or member of the household serving as an unpaid volunteer described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection may receive reimbursement of  expenses provided in the ordinary course of
business to similarly situated unpaid volunteers.
(4) A public body may adopt  policies specifying when a public official acting in an official ca-
pacity may directly supervise a person who is a relative or member of the household.
SECTION 5.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 244.177 and  244.179
by sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act apply to members of the Legislative Assembly  who have
relatives or members of the household receiving a salary for  serving on the personal legis-
lative staff of the member  of the Legislative Assembly on or after the effective date of this
2025 Act.
[2]