Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 215.780 is amended to read:
215.780. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the following  minimum lot or
parcel sizes apply to all counties:
(a) For land zoned for exclusive farm use and not designated rangeland, at least 80 acres;
(b) For land zoned for exclusive farm use and designated rangeland, at least 160 acres; and
(c) For land designated forestland, at least 80 acres.
(2) A county may adopt a lower minimum lot or parcel size than that described in subsection  (1)
of this section in any of the following circumstances:
(a) When the county can demonstrate to the Land  Conservation and Development Commission
that the county can adopt a lower minimum lot or parcel size while continuing to meet the re-
quirements of ORS 215.243 and 527.630 and the land use  planning goals adopted under ORS 197.230.
(b) To  divide by partition an area of land zoned for forest use to create a parcel for a dwelling
that has existed since before June 1, 1995, subject to the following requirements:
(A) The parcel created may not be larger than five acres, except  as necessary to recognize
physical factors such as roads or streams, in which case the parcel may not be  larger than 10 acres;
and
(B) The parcel that does  not contain the dwelling is not entitled to a dwelling unless subse-
quently authorized by law or goal and the parcel either:
(i) Meets the minimum lot or parcel size of the zone; or
(ii) Is consolidated with another  parcel, and together the parcels meet the minimum lot or parcel
size of the zone.
(c) To divide by partition an area of land zoned for mixed farm and forest use to create  a parcel
for a dwelling that has existed since before June 1, 1995, subject to the following requirements:
(A) The parcel created may not be larger than five acres, except  as necessary to recognize
physical factors such as roads or streams, in which case the parcel may not be  larger than 10 acres;
(B) The parcel that does  not contain the dwelling is not entitled to a dwelling unless subse-
quently authorized by law or goal and the parcel either:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1316
SB 337
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Meets the minimum lot or parcel size of the zone; or
(ii) Is consolidated with another  parcel, and together the parcels meet the minimum lot or parcel
size of the zone;
(C) The minimum tract eligible under this paragraph is 40 acres;
(D) The tract must be predominantly in forest use and that portion in forest use qualified for
special assessment under a program under ORS chapter 321; and
(E) The remainder of the tract does not qualify for any uses allowed under  ORS 215.213 and
215.283 that are not allowed on forestland.
(d) To allow a division by partition of forestland to facilitate a forest practice  as defined in ORS
527.620 that results in a parcel  that does not meet the minimum area requirements of subsection
(1)(c) of  this section or paragraph (a) of this subsection. Parcels created pursuant to this subsection:
(A) Are not eligible for siting of a new dwelling;
(B) May not serve as the justification for the siting of a  future dwelling on other lots or parcels;
(C) May not, as  a result of the land division, be used to justify redesignation or rezoning of re-
source lands; and
(D) May not result in  a parcel of less than 35 acres, unless the purpose of the land division is
to:
(i) Facilitate an exchange of lands involving a governmental agency; or
(ii) Allow transactions in  which at least one participant is a person with a cumulative ownership
of at least 2,000 acres of forestland.
(e) To allow a division by partition of a lot or parcel zoned for forest use or mixed farm and
forest use under a statewide planning goal protecting forestland if:
(A) At least two dwellings lawfully existed on the lot or parcel prior to November 4, 1993;
(B) Each dwelling complies with the criteria for a replacement dwelling under ORS 215.291;
(C) Except for one  parcel, each parcel created under this paragraph is between two and five
acres in size;
(D) At least one dwelling is located on each parcel created under this paragraph; and
(E) The landowner of a parcel created under this paragraph provides evidence that a restriction
prohibiting the landowner and the  landowner’s successors in interest from further dividing the par-
cel has been recorded with the county clerk of the county in which the  parcel is located. A re-
striction imposed under this paragraph is irrevocable unless a statement of release is signed  by the
county planning director of  the county in which the parcel is located indicating that the compre-
hensive plan or land use regulations applicable to the parcel have been  changed so that the parcel
is no longer subject to  statewide planning goals protecting forestland or unless the land division is
subsequently authorized by law or by a  change in a statewide planning goal for land zoned for forest
use or mixed farm and forest use.
(f) To  allow a proposed division of land in a forest zone or a mixed farm and forest zone as
provided in ORS 215.783.
(g) To allow a division of land resulting in parcels, all of which must be  subject to a re-
striction prohibiting the landowner and the landowner’s successors in interest from further
dividing the parcels as described in paragraph (e)(E) of this subsection, with a maximum  size
of:
(A) For land zoned  for exclusive farm use and not designated rangeland, no less than the
average size of lots and parcels in the county zoned  for exclusive farm use and not desig-
nated rangeland;
[2]
SB 337
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
(B) For land  zoned for exclusive farm use and designated rangeland, no less than the
average size  of lots and parcels in the county zoned for exclusive farm use and designated
rangeland; and
(C) For land designated for forest use, no less than the average size of  lots and parcels
in the county designated for forest use.
(3) A county planning director shall maintain a record of lots and  parcels that do not qualify for
division under the restrictions imposed under subsections (2)(e)  or (g)  and (4) of this  section. The
record must be readily available to the public.
(4) A lot or parcel may not be divided under subsection (2)(e) or (g) of this section if an existing
dwelling on the lot or parcel was approved under:
(a) A statute, an administrative rule  or a land use regulation as defined in ORS 197.015 that
required removal of the dwelling or that prohibited subsequent division of the lot or parcel; or
(b) A farm  use zone provision that allowed both farm and forest uses in a mixed farm and forest
use zone under a statewide planning goal protecting forestland.
(5) A county with a minimum  lot or parcel size acknowledged by the commission pursuant to
ORS 197.251 after January 1, 1987, or acknowledged pursuant  to periodic review requirements under
ORS 197.628 to 197.651 that is smaller than those prescribed in  subsection (1) of this section need
not comply with subsection (2) of this section.
(6)(a) An applicant for the  creation of a parcel pursuant to subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this sec-
tion shall provide evidence that a  restriction on the remaining parcel, not containing the dwelling,
has been recorded with the county  clerk of the county where the property is located. An applicant
for the creation of a parcel pursuant to subsection (2)(d) of this section shall  provide evidence that
a restriction on the newly created parcel has been recorded with  the county clerk of the county
where the property is located. The restriction may not allow a dwelling unless authorized by  law
or goal on land zoned for forest use except as permitted under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) A restriction imposed under this subsection is irrevocable unless a statement of release is
signed by the county  planning director of the county where the property is located indicating that
the comprehensive plan  or land use regulations applicable to the property have been changed in
such a manner that the parcel is no longer subject to statewide  planning goals pertaining to agri-
cultural land or forestland.
(c) The county  planning director shall maintain a record of parcels that do not qualify for the
siting of  a new dwelling under restrictions imposed by this subsection. The record must be readily
available to the public.
(7) A landowner allowed  a land division under subsection (2) of this section shall sign a state-
ment that must be recorded with the county clerk  of the county in which the property is located,
declaring  that  the landowner and the landowner’s successors in interest will not in the future com-
plain about accepted farming or forest practices on nearby lands devoted to farm or forest use.
[3]