Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 5, chapter 532, Oregon Laws 2023,  and section 21, chapter 606,
Oregon Laws 2023, are repealed.
SECTION 2.  ORS 537.797, as amended by section 3,  chapter 532, Oregon Laws 2023, and section
19, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
537.797. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “District” means:
(A) An irrigation district formed under ORS chapter 545;
(B) A drainage district formed under ORS chapter 547;
(C) A water improvement district formed under ORS chapter 552; or
(D) A water control district formed under ORS chapter 553.
(b) “Registered geologist” has the meaning given that term in ORS 672.505.
(c) “Registered professional engineer”  and “registered professional land surveyor” have
the meanings given those terms in ORS 672.002.
(2) The  Water Resources Commission by rule shall establish criteria for [ the certification of
geologists, as defined in ORS 672.505, and persons engaged in the practice of engineering  and the
practice of land surveying, as those terms are defined in ORS 672.005, ] certification under ORS
537.798 to conduct surveys  to determine whether a permittee has completed all work necessary to
perfect an appropriation of water under ORS 537.230, 537.630 and 540.530.
(3) An individual may apply for certification  under ORS 537.798 if the individual meets the
criteria established by rule by the commission and is a:
(a) Registered professional engineer;
(b) Registered professional land surveyor;
(c) Registered geologist; or
(d) District employee who:
(A) Is, at the time of applying, employed full-time by a district;
(B) Has been employed by a district for seven or more years; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3606
HB 3502
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
(C) Has seven or more years of relevant technical experience conducting similar work.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 537.798, as amended by section 4,  chapter 532, Oregon Laws 2023, and section
20, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
537.798. (1) The State Board of Examiners for Engineering and Land Surveying may  issue a
water right  examiner certificate to [ a registered professional land surveyor, registered professional
engineer or registered geologist who  meets the criteria established by the Water Resources Commission
under] an applicant described in  ORS 537.797. The board shall  require an applicant for the certif-
icate to pass an examination establishing the qualification of the applicant to be a water right ex-
aminer. The Water Resources Department shall prepare, administer and score the examination.
(2) The board shall establish fees for the examination, certification and  renewal of certification
of water right  examiners. The fees shall be based upon the expenses of the board and the department
in conducting the certification program. The board shall  reimburse the department for department
expenses related to the preparation, administration and scoring of the examination.
(3) The board may adopt rules to regulate persons certified  as water right examiners. The rules
may include, but need not be limited to, rules establishing standards of professional conduct  and
rules establishing professional development or continuing education requirements.
(4) Upon receipt of  a complaint, or upon its own initiative, the board may investigate any al-
leged or suspected  violation by a water right examiner of ORS 672.002 to 672.325, the criteria es-
tablished under ORS 537.797, Water Resources Commission rules  or a board rule adopted under
this section or ORS 672.255. If the  board finds that a violation has occurred, in addition to any other
disciplinary  or  regulatory authority of the board, the board may suspend, revoke or modify a cer-
tificate issued under this section. Board action to suspend, revoke or modify the certificate is subject
to the provisions of ORS chapter 183 relating to contested cases.
[2]