Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 215.
SECTION 2. For an application to establish  a renewable energy facility under ORS 215.446
that is filed with a county on or before June 1, 2025, and that is  pending on the effective date
of this 2025 Act:
(1) ORS 215.296, the statewide land use planning goal related to agriculture and  any pro-
visions of an administrative  rule, comprehensive plan or land use regulations adopted to
implement ORS 215.296 or the goal do not apply.
(2) A county may not require the  applicant to adopt an exception under ORS 197.732 to
a statewide land use planning goal relating to agricultural land.
(3) A county shall  approve an application that meets the standards under ORS 215.446 (3)
and may not apply any other standards.
(4) A county’s approval of an application may only be reviewed on appeal under  the
standards under ORS 215.446 (3)(a)(A) and (b) and the approval is entitled to deference  if
there is any evidence to support the decision.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4969