Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the wildlife laws.
SECTION 2. (1) The State Department of Fish  and Wildlife shall allow a person possess-
ing a valid hunting license to hunt game mammals using a crossbow if the person:
(a) Applies with the department;
(b) Holds a hunting and fishing permit issued by the department to a  person with a dis-
ability;
(c) Is in compliance with all provisions of the wildlife laws, including license, tag  and
permit requirements under ORS chapter 497;
(d) Meets qualifications the department establishes for use of  a draw lock device that
attaches to a bow; and
(e) Provides proof that:
(A) The person has a permanent physical impairment, certified by a health  care profes-
sional, that prevents the person from holding or using a bow other than a crossbow; and
(B) The person has a medical release  issued by a health care professional stating that the
person is physically able to hunt using a crossbow.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this  section apply during a hunting season in which
a person may use all legal weapons.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4529