Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Government  Ethics Commission shall study Oregon’s govern-
ment ethics laws. The commission shall submit a report in  the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to government ethics not later than September 15, 2025.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 271