Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon  Business Development Department shall provide grants and
loans to entities to  begin or expand production capacity for the development of modular
housing and components to support home builders and developers in meeting  housing de-
mand.
(2) The department shall establish a temporary advisory committee under ORS  285A.060
to advise the department on providing grants and loans under this section.
(3) The department shall establish the terms for any loans under this  section. Proceeds
from loans must be deposited in the General Fund.
(4) Entities receiving loans or grants under this section must agree  to terms established
by the department requiring that the entities prioritize supplying  modular housing compo-
nents to meet demand from:
(a) First, state and local governments following a wildfire or other disaster;
(b) Second, low income housing construction in this state; and
(c) Third, moderate income housing construction in this state.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $25,000,000, to make loans and grants to entities
to develop modular housing and component capacity under section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1152