Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Public Utility Commission shall study the rate impacts associated with
implementing the  reduction of greenhouse gas emissions required by House Bill 2021 (2021)
(ORS 469A.400 to 469A.475).  The commission shall submit a report in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to energy no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1307