Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 215.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding any minimum  lot size under ORS chapter 197 or this
chapter, a county shall approve under this section, the partition or  subdivision under ORS
chapter 92 of any lot or parcel that:
(a) Is larger than three acres;
(b) Contains a lawfully established dwelling unit; and
(c) Is not within an urban growth boundary or urban or rural reserve.
(2) A partition or subdivision under this section must create between two and five re-
sulting lots or parcels, each of which must contain a dwelling unit, including  a manufactured
dwelling or  a small home as defined in ORS 455.616 and including the previously established
dwelling unit.
(3) Notwithstanding any other  provision of ORS chapter 197 or this chapter, a dwelling
unit may be established on a lot or parcel developed under this section.
(4) Any recorded  instrument consisting of or creating a final or tentative subdivision,
partition, plat or replat under this section  must include a notice in substantially the follow-
ing form:
This instrument is subject to being rendered void under section 3 of this  2025 Act if all de-
velopment is not substantially completed on or before December 31, 2028.
SECTION 3. (1) If, on or before December 31, 2028, each  dwelling unit that is required
under section 2 (2) of  this 2025 Act is not substantially developed, a partition or subdivision
of land made under section 2 of this 2025 Act is void and without effect and any lots or par-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4373
HB 3757
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
cels created by the subdivision or partition are unlawful. The original  lot or parcel divided
under section 2 of this 2025 Act shall remain a lawful unit of land.
(2) If the partition or subdivision is rendered void under this section,  any dwellings or
buildings developed or partially developed that could not have been  developed but for section
2 of this 2025 Act  are unlawful. Such buildings are subject to remedies against buildings in
violation of an ordinance as described in ORS 215.185.
SECTION 4.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
[2]