Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Imagination  Library Project is established for the purpose
of improving third-grade reading proficiency  and high school graduation rates by providing
free books to young children in this state.
(2)(a) The Early  Learning Division shall develop, implement and administer the project.
The division shall ensure that, under the project, every enrolled child has the  opportunity
to receive an age-appropriate book each month.
(b) A child is eligible to be enrolled if  the child is at least four years of age and has not
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2857
HB 2247
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
started kindergarten.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph  (b) of this subsection, the division may determine that
children younger than four years of age may be eligible to be  enrolled if resources are
available to enroll younger children.
(3) For  the purpose of administering the project, the division may enter into a contract
with:
(a) A national book gifting foundation that works  in collaboration with local nonprofit
organizations and government agencies to provide free books to children from  birth until the
children begin school.
(b) One or more school districts, nonprofit organizations  or other entities that are ex-
empt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to collaborate  with
the division to:
(A) Provide outreach to local communities about the project;
(B) Recruit volunteers to assist in the  implementation and administration of the project;
(C) Solicit donations, gifts and other funding to financially support the project;
(D) Develop a process for enrolling children in the project; or
(E) Enroll children in the project.
(4) The division may require that any nonprofit organization or other  entity that is ex-
empt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the  Internal Revenue Code and that enters into
a contract with the division provide a matching  amount of at least 50 percent of the funds
required to carry out the project as described in the contract.
(5) The division may create an advisory committee to advise the division and make rec-
ommendations on how best to develop, implement and administer the project.
(6) The Early Learning Council, in  consultation with the division, may adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Imagination Library Account is established within  the Early
Learning Division Fund. Separate records shall be maintained for moneys in  the account.
Interest earned by the account shall be credited to the account.
(2) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Early Learning Division
for the Oregon Imagination Library Project described in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]