Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 260.
SECTION 2. (1) A not-for-profit corporation that is tax exempt under section 501(c) of
the Internal Revenue Code may not make a contribution,  including but not limited to a
monetary contribution or an in-kind contribution, directly or indirectly from any treasury
funds to a candidate or political committee during a biennium in which the  not-for-profit
corporation directly receives moneys from the state.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Contributions organized exclusively to support or oppose a ballot measure;
(b) Communications on any subject by the not-for-profit corporation to the  shareholders
and executive or administrative personnel of  the corporation and the families of the share-
holders and executive or administrative personnel of the corporation; and
(c) Nonpartisan registration and get-out-the-vote campaigns by the not-for-profit  corpo-
ration that are aimed at the shareholders and  executive or administrative personnel of the
corporation and the families of the shareholders and executive or administrative personnel
of the corporation.
(3) The Secretary of State may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Moneys” includes but is not limited to moneys that are appropriated by the  Legis-
lative Assembly for allocation to, and that are received by, a not-for-profit corporation.
(b) “State” means state government as defined in ORS 174.111.
SECTION 3.
Section 2  of this 2023 Act first applies to not-for-profit corporations that
directly receive moneys from the state during the 2023-2025 biennium.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3644