Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The State Forestry Department  shall deposit any revenues received by the
department as the result of  a Good Neighbor Authority Agreement project described in sec-
tion 1, chapter 96, Oregon Laws 2018, into the Good Neighbor Authority  Agreement Project
Subaccount established in ORS 526.060. The department  shall expend moneys deposited to the
subaccount only for the purposes of supporting Good Neighbor  Authority Agreement goals,
which may include but need not be limited to  the carrying out of additional Good Neighbor
Authority Agreement projects in accordance with section 1, chapter 96, Oregon Laws 2018.
SECTION 2.  ORS 526.060 is amended to read:
526.060. (1)  Except as provided in ORS 526.121, 530.147 and 530.280, all assessments, federal ap-
portionments  or  contributions, and other moneys received by the forester or State Board of Forestry,
shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the State Forestry Department  Account, which
is established separate and distinct from the General Fund. All  moneys in the State Forestry De-
partment Account are continuously appropriated, and shall be  used by the forester, under the
supervision and direction of the board, for the purposes authorized by law.
(2) The forester shall keep a record of  all moneys deposited in the State Forestry Department
Account. The record shall indicate by separate cumulative accounts the source from which the
moneys are derived and the  individual activity or program against which each withdrawal is
charged. All moneys in  the account received pursuant to ORS 527.610 to 527.770 and 527.992 shall
be used only for carrying out the duties, functions and powers of the State Forestry  Department in
administering ORS 527.610 to 527.770 and 527.992.
(3) The Urban and Community Forestry  Subaccount is established as a subaccount of the State
Forestry Department Account.  Moneys in the Urban and Community Forestry Subaccount are con-
tinuously appropriated to the  State Forestry Department to be used for urban and community forest
activities described in ORS 469.634 and 469.652.
(4) The State Forest Enhancement Donation Subaccount is established as a subaccount to  the
State Forestry Department Account. Moneys in the State Forest Enhancement Donation  Subaccount
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2937
HB 2952
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
are continuously appropriated  to the State Forestry Department to be used for the purposes de-
scribed in ORS 526.065.
(5) The State Forest Nursery Subaccount is established as a subaccount  to the State Forestry
Department Account. Moneys in  the State Forest Nursery Subaccount are continuously appropriated
to the State Forestry Department to be used for the purposes described in ORS 526.235.
(6) The  State Forest Tree Seed Bank Subaccount is established as a subaccount to the State
Forestry Department Account. Moneys in the State Forest Tree Seed Bank Subaccount  are contin-
uously appropriated to the State Forestry Department  to be used for the purposes described in ORS
526.470.
(7) The State Forest Tree Seed Orchard Subaccount is established as a subaccount to the  State
Forestry Department Account. Moneys in the State Forest  Tree Seed Orchard Subaccount are con-
tinuously appropriated to the State Forestry Department to be used for the purposes described in
ORS 526.472.
(8) The Good Neighbor Authority Agreement Project Subaccount is established as a  sub-
account to the State  Forestry Department Account. Moneys in the Good Neighbor Authority
Agreement Project Subaccount are continuously appropriated to  the State Forestry Depart-
ment to be used for the purposes described in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
[(8)] (9) Notwithstanding ORS 291.238, the moneys credited to  the subaccounts established under
subsections (5)[ , (6) and (7) ] to (8)  of this section shall be continuously available on a revolving ba-
sis.
SECTION 3.
Section 1  of this 2019 Act applies to State Forestry Department revenues
received on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
[2]