Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 807.070 is amended to read:
807.070. The Department of Transportation shall administer an examination to establish  quali-
fication for each class of license and endorsement. The examination for each class  of license or
endorsement must include all of the following as described:
(1) A test of the applicant’s eyesight.  This subsection does not apply to an applicant with a
limited vision condition as defined in ORS 807.355.
(2) A test of the applicant’s knowledge and understanding of the traffic laws of this  state, safe
driving practices and factors  that cause accidents. This subsection does not apply to an applicant
who holds a valid driver license from another jurisdiction  or whose driver license from another ju-
risdiction is expired less than one year. The following all apply to the test under this subsection:
(a) The test may not cover any subject that is not presented in the publications of the  depart-
ment intended for the instruction of applicants for licenses and driver permits.
(b) The test for each class of license and endorsement  must include, but is not limited to, a test
of knowledge  and understanding of traffic laws that relate specifically to the type of driving privi-
leges granted under the specific class of license or endorsement sought.
(c) The test must include, but is not limited to, the following subjects:
(A) Rights of pedestrians who are blind.
(B) The meaning of official traffic signs and signals.
(C) Proper operating procedure in emergency situations.
(D) Vehicle safety equipment and its use.
(E) Practices necessary for safe operation of a vehicle around pedestrians and bicyclists.
(F) Practices necessary for safe operation of a vehicle around motorcyclists.
(d) The test must include at least two questions  pertaining to the practices necessary for safe
operation of a vehicle around motorcyclists.
(e) The test may include a question regarding fuel efficient driving techniques.
(f) The department may waive the test under circumstances described in ORS 807.072.
(3) A test  that is an actual demonstration of the applicant’s ability to operate a motor vehicle
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3344
HB 3898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
without endangering the safety of persons or property. The following apply to this subsection:
(a) The actual demonstration for each class of license shall be performed in a  vehicle that may
be operated under the class of license  sought, but that may not be operated under lower classes of
license.
(b) An actual demonstration for a  passenger endorsement shall be performed in a vehicle that
may be operated under the endorsement.
(c) An actual demonstration for a school bus endorsement shall be performed in a school bus.
(d) An actual demonstration required for a commercial driver license may be  performed by a
person only if the person has held for at least 14 days a commercial learner  driver permit that was
issued by the department or by another jurisdiction that authorizes operation  of the vehicle used for
testing.
(e) The department may waive the demonstration under  circumstances described in ORS 807.072.
(4) Any other examination or test, including demonstrations, that the department  determines
may be necessary to  assist the department in establishing whether the applicant is eligible for a li-
cense under ORS 807.060 or whether the applicant is fit to operate a motor vehicle safely on  the
highways of this state. In any examination or test  under this subsection, the department shall only
conduct an investigation for facts relating directly to the ability of the applicant to operate a motor
vehicle safely or other facts that  are specifically required to show the fitness of the applicant for
license.
(5) The department shall offer any written examination in English and  Spanish when the
examination is administered to an applicant seeking commercial driving privileges.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 807.070 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to ex-
aminations administered on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[2]