Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 247.016 is amended to read:
247.016. (1) Subject  to this section, an otherwise qualified person who is at least 16 years of age
may register to vote.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,  a person who  registers to vote under
subsection (1) of  this section may not vote in an election until the person attains the age of 18 years.
(3) A person who registers to vote under subsection (1) of  this section not later than 21
days before the date of the primary election and who will attain the age of 18 years after the
primary election  but on or before the date of the general election may participate in the
primary election for the purpose of selecting the nominees of a major political party:
(a) With which the person who registered to vote under subsection (1)  of this section is
affiliated; and
(b) That has provided under ORS 254.365 for a primary election that  includes persons
affiliated with the party who will  attain the age of 18 years after the primary election but
on or before the date of the general election.
[(3)] (4)  If a person who registers to vote under subsection (1) of this section will  be under 18
years of age on the date of the next election held  on a date listed in ORS 171.185 or the next special
election, the person’s voter registration  information, including but not limited to the person’s name
and any identifying information, may not  be disclosed as a public record under ORS 192.311 to
192.478.
SECTION 2.  ORS 254.365 is amended to read:
254.365. (1) An elector is not qualified or permitted to vote at any primary  election for any
candidate of a major political party, and it is unlawful for the elector to offer to do so, unless:
(a) The elector  is registered as being affiliated with one of the major political parties nominating
or electing its candidates for public office at the primary election; or
(b) The elector is  registered as not being affiliated with any political party and wishes to vote
in the primary election of a major political party that has provided under subsection  (3) of this
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3035
HB 2694
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section for a primary election that admits electors not affiliated with any political party.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 254.470 (3), any elector offering to vote  at the primary election
shall be given a  ballot of the major political party with which the elector is registered as being af-
filiated. The elector may not be given a ballot of any other political party at that primary  election.
An elector not affiliated  with any political party and offering to vote at the primary election shall
be given the ballot of  the major political party in whose primary election the elector wishes to vote
if that party has provided under subsection (3) of this section for a primary election  that admits
electors not affiliated with any political party. An elector not affiliated with any political party  who
is given a ballot of the major  political party associates with the party for the purpose of voting in
that primary election.
(3)(a) Not later than the 90th day before the date  of the primary election, a major political party
may file with the Secretary of State a certified copy of the current party rule allowing :
(A) An elector not affiliated with any political party to vote in the  party’s primary election ;
or
(B) A person  who is registered to vote and affiliated with the major political party and
who will attain the age of 18 years after the primary election but on or before the date of
the general election to participate in the  primary election for the purpose of selecting the
nominees of the party .
(b) The party may not  repeal the rule as filed during the 90 days before the primary election.
The rule shall continue to be effective after the date of the  primary election until the party gives
written notice to  the Secretary of State that the rule has been repealed. Except as provided in
paragraph [ (b)] (c)  of this subsection, a party rule under  this subsection may limit the candidates for
whom an elector who is not affiliated with any political party may vote.
[(b)] (c)  The party rule shall allow any elector who is permitted to vote for  the most numerous
branch of the Legislative Assembly also to vote in federal legislative elections, consistent with sec-
tion 2, Article I, and the Seventeenth Amendment to the United States Constitution.
(4) If the primary election ballot includes city,  county or nonpartisan offices or measures, and
it is given to an elector who is not eligible to vote for party candidates, the ballot shall be  marked
“non-affiliated.”
SECTION 3.
 ORS 254.115 is amended to read:
254.115. (1) The official primary election ballot shall be  styled “Official Primary Nominating
Ballot for the  Party.” and shall state:
(a) The name of the county for which it is intended.
(b) The date of the primary election.
(c) The names of all candidates for nomination at the primary election whose  nominating pe-
titions or declarations of candidacy have been made and filed, and who have not died, withdrawn
or become disqualified.
(d) The names of candidates for election as precinct committeeperson.
(e) The names of candidates for the party nomination for President  of the United States who
qualified for the ballot under ORS 249.078.
(2) Except as  provided in subsection (3) of this section,  the primary election ballot may in-
clude any city, county or nonpartisan office or the number, ballot  title and financial estimates under
ORS 250.125 of any measure.
(3) The primary election  ballot provided pursuant to ORS 247.016 and 254.365 to a person
who is under 18 years old shall be  limited to stating the information set forth in subsection
[2]
HB 2694
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) of this section.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a)  The ballot may not contain the  name of any person other than those referred to
in subsections (1) [ and (2)] to (3)  of this section.
(b) The name of each candidate for  whom a nominating petition or declaration of candidacy has
been filed shall be printed on the ballot in but one  place, except in circumstances where a candidate
may hold more than one office or nomination without violating ORS 249.013.
(c) In the event that two  or more candidates for the same nomination or office have the same
or similar surnames, the location of their places of  residence shall be printed with their names to
distinguish one from another.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 253.540 is amended to read:
253.540. (1) Any military or overseas elector may secure a  ballot by submitting an application
as specified in subsection (2) of this section to the clerk of  the county of the military or overseas
elector’s residence, or to the Secretary of State. If the application is  addressed to the Secretary of
State, the secretary shall forward it to the appropriate county clerk.
(2) An application for a ballot by a military or overseas  elector shall be made in the form of a
written request and may be submitted  by mail, electronic mail, a facsimile machine or other means
identified by the Secretary  of State by rule. The application shall be valid for every subsequent
election until the elector otherwise notifies the clerk or is  no longer an elector of the county. The
application shall be signed by the applicant and contain:
(a) The name and current mailing address of the applicant;
(b) A statement that the applicant is a citizen of the United States;
(c) A statement that the applicant will be 18 years of age or older on the date of  the general
election;
(d) A  statement that for more than 20 days preceding the election the applicant’s home residence
has been in this state, and giving the address of the last home residence;
(e) A statement of the facts that qualify the applicant as a military  or overseas elector or as the
spouse or a dependent of a military or overseas elector;
(f) A  statement that the applicant is not requesting a ballot from any other state and is not
voting in any other manner in the election except by the requested ballot; and
(g) If the applicant desires to vote in a primary election, a designation of the applicant’s political
party affiliation or a statement that the applicant is not affiliated with  any political party. An ap-
plicant not affiliated  with any political party may request a ballot for a major political party. The
applicant shall be sent  the ballot for the political party that the applicant requested if that political
party has provided  under ORS 254.365 for a primary election that admits electors not affiliated with
any political party.
(3) The primary election ballot provided pursuant to ORS 247.016 and  254.365 to a military
or overseas elector under this section who is under 18 years of  age shall be limited to stating
the information set forth in ORS 254.115 (1).
SECTION 5.
 ORS 253.565 is amended to read:
253.565. (1) Any military or overseas elector may secure a  special ballot for a primary election
or general election by making an application under this section if the elector believes that:
(a) The elector will be residing, stationed  or working outside the territorial limits of the United
States and the District of Columbia; and
(b) The elector will be unable to vote and return a  regular ballot by normal mail delivery within
the period provided for regular absent electors.
[3]
HB 2694
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) A military or overseas elector shall make  the application for a special ballot in the form of
a written request, which may be submitted by mail, electronic  mail, a facsimile machine or other
means identified by the Secretary  of State by rule. The elector shall submit the application before
the date of the applicable election  to the clerk of the county of the military or overseas elector’s
residence or to the Secretary of State. If the application is addressed to the Secretary of State, the
secretary shall forward  it to the appropriate county clerk. The application shall be signed by the
applicant and contain:
(a) The name and current mailing address of the applicant;
(b) A designation of the election for which the applicant requests a special ballot;
(c) A statement that the applicant is a citizen of the United States;
(d) A  statement that the applicant will be 18 years of age or older on the date of the general
election;
(e) A statement  that for more than 20 days preceding the election the applicant’s home residence
has been in this state, and giving the address of the last home residence;
(f) A statement of the facts that qualify the applicant as a military or overseas elector or as the
spouse or a dependent of a military or overseas elector;
(g) A statement of the facts that qualify the applicant to vote by means of a special ballot;
(h) A statement that the applicant is not  requesting a ballot from any other state and is not
voting in any other manner in the election except by the requested special ballot; and
(i) If the applicant requests a ballot for a primary election, a designation of the applicant’s pol-
itical party affiliation or a statement that the applicant is not affiliated with any  political party.
An applicant not affiliated with any political party may request a ballot for a  major political party.
The applicant shall be sent the ballot for the political party that the applicant  requested if that
political party has provided under ORS 254.365 for a primary election that  admits electors not af-
filiated with any political party.
(3) An application for a special ballot shall be valid only for the election specified  in the appli-
cation.
(4) The county clerk shall list on the special  ballot the offices and measures scheduled to appear
on the regular ballot, if known when the ballot is prepared, and provide space in which the elector
may write in the elector’s preference.
(5) The primary election ballot provided pursuant to ORS 247.016 and  254.365 to a military
or overseas elector under this section who is under 18 years of  age shall be limited to stating
the information set forth in ORS 254.115 (1).
[(5)] (6)  The  elector may write in the name of any eligible candidate for each office to be filled
or for which nominations will  be made at the election, and , except as provided in subsection (5)
of this section,  may vote on any measure submitted at the election.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 254.370 is amended to read:
254.370. The county clerk shall maintain:
(1) A monthly registration record of  all electors registered as not being affiliated with any pol-
itical party;
(2) At each primary election, a record of the number of electors who voted from each major
political party;
(3) A record of the  number of all persons under the age of 18 who are registered as af-
filiated with a major political party and who  participate in selecting the nominees of the
political party at a primary election pursuant to a rule adopted by the political party  under
[4]
HB 2694
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 254.365;
[(3)] (4)  A record of all electors registered as not being affiliated with any political party  who
vote in a primary election of a major  political party that has provided under ORS 254.365 for a
primary election that admits electors not affiliated with any political party; and
[(4)] (5)  A record of all electors registered as not being affiliated with any political party  who
vote in the general election.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 254.470 is amended to read:
254.470. (1) The Secretary of State by rule shall establish requirements  and criteria for the
designation of places of deposit for the ballots cast in an election. The rules shall also specify the
dates and times the places of deposit must be open  and the security requirements for the places of
deposit. At a minimum, the places designated under this section shall be  open on the date of the
election for a period of eight or more hours,  but must be open until at least 8 p.m. At each place
of deposit  designated under this section, the county clerk shall prominently display a sign stating
that the location is an official ballot drop site.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) to (d) of this subsection, the county clerk shall mail
by nonforwardable mail  an official ballot with a return identification envelope and a secrecy envel-
ope not sooner than the 20th day before the  date of an election and not later than the 14th day
before the date of the election, to each active elector of the electoral  district as of the 21st day
before the date of the election.
(b) If the county clerk  determines that an active elector of the electoral district as of the 21st
day before the date of the election does not receive daily mail service from the United  States Postal
Service, the county clerk shall mail by nonforwardable mail an  official ballot with a return iden-
tification envelope and a  secrecy envelope to the elector not sooner than the 20th day before the
date of an election and not later than the 18th day before the date of the election.
(c) In the case of ballots to be mailed to addresses outside this state to electors who are not
military or overseas electors,  the county clerk may mail the ballots not sooner than the 29th day
before the date of the election.
(d) The county clerk is not required to mail  a secrecy envelope under this subsection if the
Secretary of State has approved a different procedure under ORS 254.458 that  provides substantially
the same degree of secrecy.
(3) For an election held on the date of a primary election:
(a) The county clerk shall mail the official ballot of a major political party  to each elector who
is registered as being affiliated with the major  political party as of the 21st day before the date of
the election.
(b) The county clerk shall mail the  official ballot of a major political party to an elector not
affiliated with  any political party if the elector has applied for the ballot as provided in this sub-
section and that party has provided under ORS 254.365 for a primary election that  admits electors
not affiliated with any political party.
(c) The county clerk shall mail the portion of the  official ballot of a major political party
stating the information set forth in ORS 254.115 (1) to a person who has not attained the age
of 18 years, but who the party has provided under ORS 254.365 is eligible to  participate in the
primary election for the purpose of selecting the nominees of the party.
[(c)] (d)  An elector not affiliated with any political party who wishes to vote  in the primary
election of a major political party shall apply to the county clerk in writing. The  application must
be completed, signed and submitted by the elector electronically, in person or by mail, in a manner
[5]
HB 2694
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
determined by the secretary by rule and must indicate which major political party ballot the  elector
wishes to  receive. Except for electors described in subsection (4) of this section, and subject to ORS
247.203, the application must be  received by the county clerk not later than 5 p.m. of the 21st day
before the date of the election.
[(d)] (e)  If the primary election ballot includes city, county or  nonpartisan offices or measures,
the county clerk shall mail to each elector who is not eligible to vote for party candidates a  ballot
limited to those offices and measures for which the elector is eligible to vote.
(4)(a) For each elector who updates a voter registration after the deadline in ORS  247.025, the
county clerk shall make the official  ballot, the return identification envelope and the secrecy en-
velope available either by mail or at the county clerk’s  office or at another place designated by the
county clerk. An elector to whom this subsection applies must request a  ballot from the county
clerk.
(b) The county clerk is not  required to make available a secrecy envelope under this subsection
if the Secretary of State has approved a different  procedure under ORS 254.458 that provides sub-
stantially the same degree of secrecy.
(5) The ballot shall contain the following warning:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Any person who, by use  of force or other means, unduly influences an elector to vote in any
particular manner or to refrain from voting is subject to a fine.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(6)(a) Upon receipt of any ballot described in this section, the elector shall mark the ballot,  sign
the return identification envelope supplied with  the ballot and comply with the instructions provided
with the ballot.
(b) The elector may return the marked ballot to the county  clerk by United States mail or by
depositing the ballot at  the office of the county clerk, at any place of deposit designated by the
county clerk or at any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474.
(c) The ballot must be returned in the return identification envelope.
(d) Subject to paragraph  (e) of this subsection, if a person returns a ballot for an elector, the
person shall deposit the ballot in a manner  described in paragraph (b) of this subsection not later
than two days after receiving the ballot.
(e) If the elector deposits the ballot at the office of the county clerk,  at any place of deposit
designated by the county clerk or at any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474, the ballot
must be received at the office of the county clerk, at the designated place of deposit or at any  lo-
cation described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474 not later than the end of  the period determined under
subsection (1) of this section on the date of the election. If the elector returns the ballot by mail:
(A) The ballot  must be received at the office of the county clerk not later than the end of the
period determined under subsection (1) of this section on the date of the election; or
(B) The ballot must:
(i) Have a postal indicator showing that the  ballot was mailed not later than the date of the
election; and
(ii) Be  received at the office of the county clerk not later than seven calendar days after the
date of the election.
(f) If a county clerk receives a marked ballot for an elector who does not reside  in the clerk’s
[6]
HB 2694
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
county, the ballot shall be forwarded to the county clerk of the county in  which the elector resides
not later than the eighth day after the election.
(7) The following shall appear on the return identification envelope:
(a) Space for the elector to sign the envelope.
(b) A notice designed by rule by the Secretary of State, in consultation  with the county clerks,
explaining that by  signing the ballot the elector is attesting under penalty of perjury that the ballot
was mailed no later than the date of the election.
(c) A summary of the applicable penalties  for knowingly making a false statement, oath or affi-
davit under the election laws.
(8) If the elector returns the ballot by mail, and a postal indicator is not  present or legible, the
ballot shall be considered to be mailed on the date of the election and may be counted if  the ballot
is received no later than seven calendar days after the election.
(9) An elector may obtain a replacement ballot if the ballot is destroyed, spoiled,  lost or not
received by the  elector. Replacement ballots shall be issued and processed as described in this
section  and  ORS 254.480. The county clerk shall keep a record of each replacement ballot provided
under this subsection. Notwithstanding any deadline for mailing ballots in subsection  (2) of this
section, a replacement ballot may be mailed, made available in the office of the county clerk or made
available at one central location in the electoral district  in which the election is conducted. The
county clerk shall designate the central location. A  replacement ballot need not be mailed after the
fifth day before the date of the election.
(10) A ballot shall be counted only if:
(a) It is returned in the return identification envelope;
(b) The envelope is signed  by the elector to whom the ballot is issued, unless a certified state-
ment is submitted under ORS 254.431; and
(c) The signature is verified as provided in subsection (11) of this section.
(11) The county clerk shall verify the signature of  each elector on the return identification en-
velope with the signature on the  elector’s registration record, according to the procedure provided
by rules adopted by the  Secretary of State. If the county clerk determines that an elector to whom
a replacement ballot has been issued has voted more than once, the county  clerk shall count only
one ballot cast by that elector.
(12) At 8 p.m. on election day, electors who are at the county clerk’s office, a  place of deposit
designated under subsection (1) of this section or  any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474
and who are in line waiting to vote or deposit a voted ballot shall be  considered to have begun the
act of voting.
(13)(a)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the  name of the Secretary
of State may not appear in the secretary’s official capacity on the return identification envelope  or
on any instructions or materials included with the ballot if the  secretary is a candidate in the
election for which the ballot is printed.
(B) This paragraph does  not prohibit the name of the Secretary of State from appearing in the
secretary’s official capacity in the voters’ pamphlet.
(b) The name of the county clerk or other filing officer  may not appear in the official capacity
of the county clerk  or filing officer on the return identification envelope or on any instructions or
materials included with  the ballot if the county clerk or filing officer is a candidate in the election
for which the ballot is printed.
(c) As used in this subsection, “filing officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 254.165.
[7]
HB 2694
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
(14) As used in  this section, “postal indicator” means a postmark or other indicator on a mailed
ballot, identified by the Secretary of State by rule, that  demonstrates the date or time at which a
ballot was mailed.
SECTION 8.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the  amount of $_______, to be allocated to county clerks for the purpose of carrying
out the amendments to  ORS 247.016, 254.115, 254.365, 254.370 and 254.470 by sections 1 to 3,
6 and 7 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 9. The amendments to ORS 247.016, 253.540, 253.565,  254.115, 254.365, 254.370 and
254.470 by sections 1 to  7 of this 2023 Act apply to primary elections held on or after the ef-
fective date of this 2023 Act.
[8]