Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2019 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 458.
SECTION 2. (1) The Housing and  Community Services Department shall establish a pro-
gram to provide loans to  individuals to buy and site manufactured dwellings that replace
older and less energy efficient manufactured dwellings.
(2) The department may make  loans under the program only to individual borrowers who:
(a) Are members  of households with income that complies with income restrictions de-
termined at the advice and consent  of the Oregon Housing Stability Council, but not to ex-
ceed the  greater of 100 percent of the statewide or local area median income adjusted for
household size as determined annually  by the Housing and Community Services Department
using United States Department of Housing and Urban Development information; and
(b) Will purchase a manufactured dwelling that:
(A) Meets energy efficiency  standards as prescribed by rule by the Oregon Housing Sta-
bility Council;
(B) Will be sited in a manufactured dwelling park that has registered with the  Office of
Manufactured Dwelling Park Community Relations and has entered into a recorded regula-
tory agreement with the department; and
(C) Will be the primary residence of the borrower.
(3) A loan under this program:
(a) May not require the borrower to make any interest payments on the loan;
(b) May not require the borrower to make any principal payments on the loan;
(c) Shall have its principal balance reduced by 1/120 of  the original balance each month
until the balance is zero;
(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) or (b) of this section, the unpaid balance must be re-
paid in full upon:
(A) The borrower’s sale or voluntary transfer of the manufactured  dwelling without the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2804
HB 2894
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
Housing and Community Services Department’s written consent; or
(B) The relocation  of the manufactured dwelling without the department’s written con-
sent;
(e) Must be subordinate to any other purchase money loan secured by  the manufactured
dwelling; and
(f) May not exceed  percent of the costs of the manufactured dwelling  and its
installation.
(4) In  servicing loans under this program, the department shall deposit all moneys re-
ceived into the Manufactured  Home Replacement and Decommissioning Fund established in
section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(5) The council may establish priorities for evaluating loan applications and shall give
consideration to prioritizing loans to borrowers who are:
(a) From low income households; and
(b) Decommissioning and replacing manufactured dwellings that are  older or less re-
source or energy efficient.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Manufactured Home Replacement  and Decommissioning Fund is es-
tablished within the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest
earned by the Manufactured Home Replacement and Decommissioning  Fund shall be credited
to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Manufactured Home Replacement and Decommissioning Fund consists
of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated  or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Amounts received from state or federal sources to be deposited into the fund;
(d) Income derived from moneys in the fund; and
(e) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Housing and Community
Services Department to:
(a) Carry out the provisions of section 2 of this 2019 Act; and
(b) Pay the administrative costs associated with the fund  and with implementing and
maintaining the program under section 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, for deposit into the Manufactured
Home Replacement and Decommissioning Fund established in section 3 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]