Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Consulting provider” has the meaning given that term in ORS 127.800.
(b) “Hospice program” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.850.
(c) “Prescribing provider” has the meaning given that term in ORS 127.800.
(2) A hospice program shall publicly disclose its  current policy regarding the Oregon
Death With Dignity Act, including:
(a) Whether a patient  receiving services from the hospice program may elect to end the
patient’s life as provided under the Oregon Death With Dignity Act;
(b) Whether hospice  program staff may be present at the time the patient intends to
ingest medication to end the patient’s life in accordance  with the Oregon Death With Dignity
Act; and
(c) Whether  the hospice program permits its staff, as a function of the staff’s position
with the hospice program, to act as  a prescribing provider or consulting provider under the
Oregon Death With Dignity Act.
(3) The notification described in this  section must be provided to patients of the hospice
program upon admission and posted on the hospice program’s website.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section, “health care facility” means a facility that pro-
vides health care services directly to patients, including but not limited to a  hospital, clinic
or nursing home.
(2) A  health care facility, other than a hospice program as defined in ORS 443.850, shall
publicly disclose its current policy regarding a  patient exercising the patient’s rights under
the Oregon Death With Dignity Act. The disclosure  must be posted on the health care
facility’s website.
SECTION 3.  ORS 127.800 is amended to read:
127.800. [ §1.01 Definitions. ] Definitions. The following words and phrases,  whenever used in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2797
SB 1003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 127.800 to 127.897, have the following meanings:
(1) “Adult” means an individual who is 18 years of age or older.
[(2) “Attending physician” means the physician who has primary responsibility  for the care of the
patient and treatment of the patient’s terminal disease. ]
[(3)] (2)  “Capable” means that in the opinion of a court or in the opinion of the patient’s [ at-
tending physician ] prescribing provider  [ or consulting physician ], psychiatrist or psychologist,  a
patient has the ability to make and  communicate health care decisions to health care providers,
including communication through persons familiar with  the patient’s manner of communicating if
those persons are available.
[(4)] (3)  [ “Consulting physician” ] “Consulting provider”  means a [ physician] provider who is
qualified by specialty or experience to make a professional diagnosis  and prognosis regarding the
patient’s disease.
[(5)] (4)  “Counseling” means one or more consultations  as necessary between a [ state licensed ]
psychiatrist or licensed psychologist and a patient for the purpose of determining that the patient
is capable and not suffering from a psychiatric or psychological disorder or  depression causing im-
paired judgment.
[(6)] (5)  “Health care provider” means a person licensed, certified  or otherwise authorized or
permitted by the law of this state to administer health care or  dispense medication in the ordinary
course of business or practice of a profession, and includes a health care facility.
(6) “Hospice care” means hospice services, as defined in ORS 443.850.
(7) “Hospice program” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.850.
[(7)] (8)  “Informed decision” means a decision by a qualified patient, to request and  obtain a
prescription to end his or her life in a humane and dignified  manner, that is based on an appreci-
ation of  the relevant facts and after being fully informed by the [ attending physician ] prescribing
provider of:
(a) His or her medical diagnosis;
(b) His or her prognosis;
(c) The potential risks associated with taking the medication to be prescribed;
(d) The probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed; and
(e) The feasible alternatives, including, but not limited to, comfort care, hospice care  and pain
control.
[(8)] (9)  “Medically  confirmed” means the medical opinion of the [ attending physician ] pre-
scribing provider has been confirmed by a consulting  provider. [ physician who has  examined the
patient and the patient’s relevant medical records. ]
[(9)] (10) “Patient” means a person who is under the care of a [ physician] provider.
[(10) “Physician” means a doctor licensed to practice medicine under ORS 677.100 to 677.228. ]
(11) “Prescribing provider” means the provider who has primary responsibility  for the
care of the patient under the Death With Dignity Act.
(12) “Provider” means:
(a) A physician licensed under ORS 677.100 to 677.228;
(b) A physician assistant licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525; and
(c) A nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390.
[(11)] (13) “Qualified patient” means a capable adult who has satisfied the requirements  of ORS
127.800 to 127.897 in order to obtain a prescription for medication to end his  or her life in a humane
and dignified manner.
[2]
SB 1003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(12)] (14)  “Terminal disease” means [ an incurable and irreversible disease ] a terminal  illness
that has been medically confirmed and will, within reasonable medical judgment, produce  death
within six months.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 127.805 is amended to read:
127.805. [§2.01. Who  may initiate a written request for medication. ] Who may initiate a written
request for medication.  (1) An adult who is capable and has been determined by the [ attending
physician] prescribing provider and consulting  [physician] provider to be suffering from a terminal
disease, and who has voluntarily expressed his or her wish to die, may make  a written request for
medication for the purpose of ending his or her life in a  humane and dignified manner in accordance
with ORS 127.800 to 127.897.
(2) No person shall qualify under the  provisions of ORS 127.800 to 127.897 solely because of age
or disability.
SECTION 5.  ORS 127.810 is amended to read:
127.810. [§2.02. Form of the written  request. ] Form of the written request.  (1) A valid request
for medication under ORS 127.800 to 127.897 shall be in substantially the form described in ORS
127.897, signed and  dated by the patient and witnessed by at least two individuals who, in the
presence of the  patient, attest that to the best of their knowledge and belief the patient is capable,
acting voluntarily, and is not being coerced to sign the request.
(2) One of the witnesses shall be a person who is not:
(a) A relative of the patient by blood, marriage or adoption;  or
(b) A person who at the time the request is signed would be  entitled to any portion of the estate
of the qualified patient upon death under any will or by operation of law .[; or ]
[(c) An owner, operator or employee of  a health care facility where the qualified patient is receiving
medical treatment or is a resident. ]
(3) The patient’s [ attending physician ] prescribing provider  at the time the request is signed
shall not be a witness.
[(4) If the patient is a patient in a long term care facility at  the time the written request is made,
one of the witnesses shall be an individual  designated by the facility and having the qualifications
specified by the Department of Human Services by rule. ]
SECTION 6.
 ORS 127.815 is amended to read:
127.815. [ §3.01. Attending physician responsibilities. ] Prescribing provider responsibilities.  (1)
The [ attending physician ] prescribing provider shall:
(a) Make the initial  determination of whether a patient has a terminal disease[ ,] and shall make
the determination of whether a patient is capable[ ,] and has made the request voluntarily;
(b) To ensure that the patient is making an informed decision, inform the patient of:
(A) His or her medical diagnosis;
(B) His or her prognosis;
(C) The potential risks associated with taking the medication to be prescribed;
(D) The probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed; and
(E) The feasible alternatives, including,  but not limited to, comfort care, hospice care and pain
control;
(c) Refer the patient to a consulting [ physician] provider  for medical confirmation of the
diagnosis[, and for a determination that the patient is capable and acting voluntarily ];
(d) Refer the patient for counseling if appropriate pursuant to ORS 127.825;
(e) Recommend that the patient notify next of kin;
[3]
SB 1003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) Counsel the patient about the importance of  having another person present when the patient
takes the medication prescribed  pursuant to ORS 127.800 to 127.897 and of not taking the medication
in a public place;
(g) Inform the patient that he or she has an opportunity to rescind the request at  any time and
in any manner,  and offer the patient an opportunity to rescind at the time the patient makes the
patient’s second oral request pursuant to ORS 127.840;
(h) Verify, immediately prior to writing the  prescription for medication under ORS 127.800 to
127.897, that the patient is making an informed decision;
(i) Fulfill the medical record documentation requirements of ORS 127.855;
(j) Ensure  that all appropriate steps are carried out in accordance with ORS 127.800 to 127.897
prior to writing a prescription for medication to enable a qualified patient  to end his or her life in
a humane and dignified manner; and
(k)(A) Dispense medications directly,  including ancillary medications intended to facilitate the
desired effect to minimize the patient’s discomfort, provided the [ attending physician ] prescribing
provider is registered as a  dispensing physician , as defined in ORS 677.010,  with the Oregon
Medical Board, has  a current Drug Enforcement Administration certificate and complies with any
applicable administrative rule; or
(B) With the patient’s written consent[ :]
[(i)] contact a pharmacist [ and], inform the pharmacist  of the prescription[ ;] and deliver the
prescription to the pharmacist in person, by mail, by facsimile or electronically.
[(ii) Deliver  the written prescription personally or by mail to the pharmacist, who will dispense the
medications to either the patient, the attending physician or an expressly identified  agent of the
patient.]
(2) A pharmacist may dispense the medications prescribed by  the prescribing provider to
either the patient, the prescribing provider or an expressly identified agent of the patient:
(a) If the  prescribing provider delivers the written prescription personally or by mail to
the pharmacist; or
(b) If the prescribing provider causes the  written prescription to be delivered by facsimile
or electronically, after the pharmacist confirms the prescription with  the prescribing pro-
vider verbally in person or by telephone or other two-way electronic communication device.
[(2)] (3)  Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the [ attending physician ] prescribing pro-
vider may sign the patient’s report of death.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 127.820 is amended to read:
127.820. [§3.02. Consulting physician confirmation. ] Confirmation of diagnosis.  Before a  patient
is qualified under ORS 127.800 to 127.897, [ a consulting physician  shall examine the patient and his
or her relevant medical records and confirm, in  writing, ] the attending [ physician’s] provider’s diag-
nosis that the patient is  suffering from a terminal disease[ , and verify that the patient is capable, is
acting voluntarily and has made an informed decision. ] must be confirmed by a consulting pro-
vider. The consulting provider’s confirmation of the patient’s diagnosis must be documented:
(1) In writing after the consulting provider has  evaluated the patient and the patient’s
relevant medical records; or
(2) By reviewing and signing a hospice program’s certification of the patient’s  terminal
illness.
SECTION 8.  ORS 127.825 is amended to read:
127.825. [ §3.03. Counseling referral. ] Counseling referral.  If in the opinion of the [ attending
[4]
SB 1003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
physician] prescribing provider or the consulting [ physician] provider a patient may be  suffering
from a psychiatric or psychological disorder or  depression causing impaired judgment, either [ phy-
sician] provider shall refer the patient for counseling. No medication to end a patient’s life  in a
humane and dignified manner  shall be prescribed until the person performing the counseling deter-
mines that the patient is not suffering from a  psychiatric or psychological disorder or depression
causing impaired judgment.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 127.830 is amended to read:
127.830. [§3.04. Informed decision. ] Informed decision.  No person  shall receive a prescription
for medication  to end his or her life in a humane and dignified manner unless he or she has made
an informed decision as defined in ORS  127.800 [(7)] (8). Immediately prior to writing a prescription
for medication  under ORS 127.800 to 127.897, the [ attending physician ] prescribing provider shall
verify that the patient is making an informed decision.
SECTION 10.  ORS 127.835 is amended to read:
127.835. [ §3.05. Family notification. ] Family notification. The [ attending physician ] prescribing
provider shall recommend  that the patient notify the next of kin of his or her request for medication
pursuant to ORS 127.800 to 127.897. A patient who declines  or is unable to notify next of kin shall
not have his or her request denied for that reason.
SECTION 11.  ORS 127.840 is amended to read:
127.840. [§3.06. Written and oral requests. ] Written  and oral requests.  (1) In order to receive
a prescription for medication to end his or her life in a humane  and dignified manner, a qualified
patient shall have made an oral request and a written request, and  reiterate the oral request to his
or her [ attending physician ] prescribing provider no less than [ 15 days ] 48 hours  after making the
initial oral request.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  if the qualified patient’s [ attending physician ]
prescribing provider has medically  confirmed that the qualified patient will, within reasonable
medical judgment, die within [ 15 days ] 48 hours  after making the  initial oral request under this
section, the qualified patient may reiterate  the oral request to his or her [ attending physician ] pre-
scribing provider at any time after making the initial oral request.
(3) At the time the qualified patient makes his or her second  oral request, the [ attending physi-
cian] prescribing provider shall offer the patient an opportunity to rescind the request.
SECTION 12.  ORS 127.845 is amended to read:
127.845. [§3.07. Right to rescind  request. ] Right to rescind request.  A patient may rescind his
or her request at any time and in any manner without regard to his or her mental state. No pre-
scription for medication under ORS 127.800 to 127.897  may be written without the [ attending physi-
cian] prescribing provider offering the qualified patient an opportunity to rescind the request.
SECTION 13.  ORS 127.850 is amended to read:
127.850. [§3.08. Waiting periods. ] Waiting periods.  (1) No less than [ 15 days ] 48 hours  shall
elapse between the patient’s initial oral request and the writing of a  prescription under ORS 127.800
to 127.897. [ No less than 48 hours shall elapse between the patient’s  written request and the writing
of a prescription under ORS 127.800 to 127.897. ]
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  if the qualified patient’s [ attending physician ]
prescribing provider has medically  confirmed that the qualified patient will, within reasonable
medical judgment, die before the expiration [ of at least one ] of the waiting  [periods] period described
in subsection  (1) of this section, the prescription for medication under ORS 127.800 to 127.897 may
be written at any  time following the later of the qualified patient’s written request or second oral
[5]
SB 1003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
request under ORS 127.840.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 127.855 is amended to read:
127.855. [ §3.09. Medical record documentation requirements. ] Medical record documentation
requirements. The following shall be documented or filed in the patient’s medical record:
(1) All oral requests by a patient for medication to end his or her life in a humane and dignified
manner;
(2) All written requests by a patient  for medication to end his or her life in a humane and dig-
nified manner;
(3) The [ attending physician’s ] prescribing provider’s  diagnosis and prognosis, determination
that the patient is capable, acting voluntarily and has made an informed decision;
(4) The consulting [ physician’s] provider’s confirmation of the  patient’s diagnosis [ and
prognosis, and verification that the patient is capable, acting  voluntarily and has made an informed
decision];
(5) A report of the outcome and determinations made during counseling, if performed;
(6) Any medically confirmed certification of the imminence of the patient’s death;
(7) The [ attending physician’s ] prescribing provider’s offer  to the patient to rescind his or her
request at the time of the patient’s second oral request pursuant to ORS 127.840; and
(8) A note by the [ attending physician ] prescribing provider  indicating that all  requirements
under ORS 127.800 to 127.897 have been met and indicating  the steps taken to carry out the request,
including a notation of the medication prescribed.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 127.865 is amended to read:
127.865. [ §3.11. Reporting requirements. ] Reporting requirements.  (1)(a) The Oregon  Health
Authority shall annually  review a sample of records maintained pursuant to ORS 127.800 to 127.897.
(b) The authority shall require any health care provider  upon dispensing medication pursuant
to ORS 127.800 to 127.897 to file a copy of the dispensing record with the authority.
(2) The authority shall make rules to facilitate the collection of  information regarding compli-
ance with ORS 127.800 to 127.897. The authority’s rules adopted under this  subsection must
permit health care providers to file any required records electronically.  Except as otherwise
required by law, the information collected shall not be a public  record and may not be made avail-
able for inspection by the public.
(3) The authority shall generate and make available to the public an annual statistical report
of information collected under subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 16.  ORS 127.880 is amended to read:
127.880. [§3.14. Construction of Act. ] Construction of Act.  Nothing in ORS  127.800 to 127.897
shall be construed to authorize a [ physician] provider or  any other person to end a patient’s life by
lethal injection, mercy killing or active euthanasia. Actions taken in accordance with ORS  127.800
to 127.897 shall not, for any purpose, constitute suicide, assisted suicide, mercy killing or  homicide,
under the law.
SECTION 17.  ORS 127.885 is amended to read:
127.885. [§4.01. Immunities.] Immunities. Except as provided in ORS 127.890:
(1) No person shall be subject to civil or criminal liability or professional disciplinary action  for
participating in good faith compliance with ORS 127.800  to 127.897. This includes being present
when a qualified patient takes the prescribed medication to end his or her life in a humane and
dignified manner.
(2) No  professional organization or association, or health care provider, may subject a person
[6]
SB 1003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to censure, discipline, suspension, loss of license, loss of privileges, loss of membership or other
penalty for participating or refusing to participate in good faith compliance with ORS 127.800 to
127.897.
(3) No request by a patient for or provision by [ an attending physician ] a prescribing provider
of medication in good faith compliance  with the provisions of ORS 127.800 to 127.897 shall constitute
neglect for any  purpose of law or provide the sole basis for the appointment of a guardian or
conservator.
(4) No health care provider shall be under any duty, whether by contract, by statute or  by any
other legal requirement to participate in the provision to a qualified patient of medication to  end
his or her life in a humane and dignified  manner. If a health care provider is unable or unwilling
to carry out a patient’s request under ORS 127.800 to 127.897, and the patient transfers his  or her
care to a new health care provider, the prior health care provider shall transfer, upon request,  a
copy of the patient’s relevant medical records to the new health care provider.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a health care  provider may prohibit another
health care provider  from participating in ORS 127.800 to 127.897 on the premises of the prohibiting
health care  provider if the prohibiting health care  provider has notified the health care provider
of the prohibiting provider’s policy regarding participating in ORS 127.800 to 127.897. Nothing  in
this paragraph prevents a health care provider from providing health care services to a patient that
do not constitute participation in ORS 127.800 to 127.897.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of  subsections (1) to (4) of this section, a health care provider
may subject another health  care provider to the sanctions stated in this paragraph if the sanctioning
health care  provider has notified the sanctioned provider prior to participation in ORS 127.800 to
127.897 that it prohibits participation in ORS 127.800 to 127.897:
(A) Loss  of privileges, loss of membership or other sanction provided pursuant to the medical
staff bylaws, policies and procedures of the sanctioning health  care provider if the sanctioned
health care  provider is a member of the sanctioning  health  care  provider’s medical staff and par-
ticipates in ORS 127.800 to 127.897  while on the health care facility premises, as defined in ORS
442.015, of the sanctioning health care provider, but not  including the private medical office of a
[physician] provider or other [ provider] private medical office not owned or  operated by the
sanctioning health care provider ;
(B) Termination of lease or other property  contract or other nonmonetary remedies provided by
lease contract, not including loss or restriction of medical staff privileges or exclusion from a  pro-
vider panel, if the sanctioned health care provider participates in ORS 127.800 to 127.897 while  on
the premises of the sanctioning health care provider or on property that is  owned by or under the
direct control of the sanctioning health care provider; or
(C) Termination of  contract or other nonmonetary remedies provided by contract if the sanc-
tioned health care  provider participates in ORS 127.800 to 127.897 while acting in the course and
scope of the  sanctioned health care  provider’s capacity as an employee or independent contractor
of the  sanctioning health care provider. Nothing in this subparagraph shall be construed to prevent:
(i) A health care provider from participating in ORS 127.800 to  127.897 while acting outside the
course and scope of the health care provider’s capacity as an employee or  independent contractor;
or
(ii) A patient from  contracting with his or her [ attending physician] prescribing provider or and
consulting [ physician] provider to act outside the course and scope of the prescribing provider or
consulting provider’s capacity as an employee  or independent contractor of the sanctioning health
[7]
SB 1003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
care provider.
(c) A health care provider that imposes sanctions pursuant to  paragraph (b) of this subsection
must follow all due process and other procedures the sanctioning health care provider may  have
that are related to the imposition of sanctions on another health care provider.
(d) For purposes of this subsection:
(A) “Notify” means a separate statement in writing to the health care provider  specifically in-
forming the health care provider prior to the health care  provider’s  participation in ORS 127.800
to 127.897 of the  sanctioning health care provider’s policy about participation in activities covered
by ORS 127.800 to 127.897.
(B) “Participate in ORS 127.800 to 127.897” means to perform  the duties of an [ attending physi-
cian] prescribing provider pursuant to ORS  127.815, the consulting [ physician] provider function
pursuant to ORS 127.820 or the counseling function  pursuant to ORS 127.825. “Participate in ORS
127.800 to 127.897” does not include:
(i) Making an initial  determination that a patient has a terminal disease and informing the pa-
tient of the medical prognosis;
(ii) Providing  information about the Oregon Death with Dignity Act to a patient upon the re-
quest of the patient;
(iii) Providing a patient, upon the request of the patient, with a referral to another [ physician]
provider; or
(iv) A patient contracting with his or her [ attending physician ] prescribing provider and con-
sulting [ physician] provider to act outside of  the course and scope of the prescribing provider or
consulting provider’s capacity as an employee  or independent contractor of the sanctioning health
care provider.
(6) Suspension or termination of staff membership or privileges under subsection (5) of  this sec-
tion is not reportable under ORS 441.820.  Action taken pursuant to ORS 127.810, 127.815, 127.820
or 127.825 shall not be the sole basis for a report of unprofessional or dishonorable conduct under
ORS 677.415 (3), (4), (5) or (6).
(7) No provision of ORS 127.800 to 127.897 shall be construed to  allow a lower standard of care
for patients in the community where the patient is treated or a similar community.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 127.897 is amended to read:
127.897. [§6.01. Form of the request. ] Form of the request.  A request for a medication  as au-
thorized by ORS 127.800 to 127.897 shall be in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
REQUEST FOR MEDICATION
TO END MY LIFE IN A HUMANE
AND DIGNIFIED MANNER
I, 
, am an adult of sound mind.
I am suffering from , which my [ attending physician ] prescribing provider has
determined is a terminal disease and which has been medically confirmed by a consulting
[physician] provider.
I have been fully informed of  my diagnosis, prognosis, the nature of medication to be prescribed
and potential associated risks, the expected result, and the  feasible alternatives, including comfort
care, hospice care and pain control.
[8]
SB 1003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
I request that my [ attending physician ] prescribing provider prescribe medication that will end
my life in a humane and dignified manner.
INITIAL ONE:
 I have informed my family of my decision and taken their opinions into consider-
ation.
 I have decided not to inform my family of my decision.
 I have no family to inform of my decision.
I understand that I have the right to rescind this request at any time.
I understand the full import  of this request and I expect to die when I take the medication to
be prescribed. I further understand that  although most deaths occur within three hours, my death
may take longer and my [ physician] provider has counseled me about this possibility.
I make this request voluntarily and without reservation, and  I accept full moral responsibility
for my actions.
Signed: 
Dated: 
DECLARATION OF WITNESSES
We declare that the person signing this request:
(a) Is personally known to us or has provided proof of identity;
(b) Signed this request in our presence;
(c) Appears to be of sound mind and not under duress, fraud or undue influence;
(d) Is not a patient for whom either of us is [ attending physician ] prescribing provider.
 Witness 1/Date
 Witness 2/Date
NOTE: One  witness shall not be a relative (by blood, marriage or adoption) of the person signing
this request[ ,] and shall not be entitled to any portion  of the person’s estate upon death [ and shall
not own, operate or be employed  at a health care facility where the person is a patient or resident ]. If
the patient is an inpatient at a  health care facility, one of the witnesses [ shall] may be an individual
designated by the facility.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 19.
 ORS 127.870 is amended to read:
127.870. [ §3.12. Effect on construction of wills, contracts and statutes. ] Effect on construction
of wills, contracts and  statutes.  (1) No provision in a contract, will or other agreement, whether
written or oral, to the extent the provision would affect whether  a person may make or rescind a
request for medication to end his or her life in a humane and dignified manner, shall be valid.
(2) No obligation owing under any currently existing contract  shall be conditioned or affected
by the making or rescinding of a request, by a person, for  medication to end his or her life in a
[9]
SB 1003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
humane and dignified manner.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 127.875 is amended to read:
127.875. [§3.13. Insurance or annuity policies. ] Insurance or annuity policies.  The sale,  pro-
curement, or issuance  of any life, health, or accident insurance or annuity policy or the rate charged
for any policy shall not be conditioned upon or affected by the making  or rescinding of a request,
by a person, for medication to end his or her life in a humane and dignified  manner. Neither shall
a qualified  patient’s act of ingesting medication to end his or her life in a humane and dignified
manner have an effect upon a life, health, or accident insurance or annuity policy.
SECTION 21.  ORS 127.890 is amended to read:
127.890. [§4.02. Liabilities. ] Liabilities. (1) A person  who without authorization of the patient
willfully alters or forges a request for medication or conceals or destroys a rescission of that request
with the intent or effect of causing the patient’s death shall be guilty of a Class A felony.
(2) A person  who coerces or exerts undue influence on a patient to request medication for the
purpose of ending the  patient’s life, or to destroy a rescission of such a request, shall be guilty of
a Class A felony.
(3) Nothing in ORS 127.800  to 127.897 limits further liability for civil damages resulting from
other negligent conduct or intentional misconduct by any person.
(4) The penalties in  ORS 127.800 to 127.897 do not preclude criminal penalties applicable under
other law for conduct which is inconsistent with the provisions of ORS 127.800 to 127.897.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 127.895 is amended to read:
127.895. [§5.01. Severability. ] Severability. Any section of ORS 127.800 to 127.897 being  held in-
valid as to any  person or circumstance shall not affect the application of any other section of ORS
127.800 to 127.897 which can be given full effect without the invalid section or application.
SECTION 23. The section captions used in this 2025 Act are provided  only for the con-
venience of the reader and do not become part of the  statutory law of this state or express
any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 24. The amendments to ORS 127.800,  127.805, 127.810, 127.815, 127.820, 127.825,
127.830, 127.835, 127.840, 127.845, 127.850,  127.855, 127.865, 127.870, 127.875, 127.880, 127.885,
127.890, 127.895 and 127.897 by sections 3 to 22 of this 2025 Act apply to  medication dispensed
on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[10]