Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a homestead,  as defined in
ORS 311.666, owned or co-owned by an  individual who is at least 70 years old who has filed
a valid claim under subsection (4) of this section shall have a specially assessed value de-
termined under subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) The specially assessed value of a homestead to which  a valid claim relates shall
equal the real market value  of the homestead as shown on the tax statement delivered pur-
suant to ORS 311.250 for the property tax year immediately  preceding the first property tax
year to which a valid claim filed under subsection (4) of this section relates.
(b) For the first property tax year for which the  homestead is assessed under this sec-
tion, the homestead’s maximum specially assessed value shall equal the product of the  spe-
cially assessed value multiplied by the ratio, not greater than 1.00, of the maximum assessed
value the homestead would have had for the applicable property  tax year if it were not spe-
cially assessed to  the real market value of the homestead for the applicable property tax
year.
(c) For each year after the  first property tax year for which the homestead is specially
assessed under this section and before disqualification from  the specially assessed value, the
homestead’s maximum specially assessed value shall  equal the greater of 103 percent of the
homestead’s assessed value from  the prior property tax year or 100 percent of the
homestead’s maximum specially assessed value from the prior property tax year.
(3) The assessed value of the homestead for any property tax year during  which the
homestead is granted a specially assessed value under this section shall be the least of:
(a) The homestead’s maximum specially assessed value as determined under subsection
(2) of this section;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1327
SB 568
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The homestead’s real market value; or
(c) The homestead’s specially  assessed value as determined under subsection (2) of this
section.
(4)(a) An individual’s claim for a specially assessed value for a homestead  under this
section must:
(A) Be in writing on a form supplied by the Department of Revenue;
(B) Describe the homestead;
(C) Recite all facts establishing the eligibility of the homestead for, and of the  individual
to claim, the specially assessed value; and
(D) Have attached:
(i) Any documentary proof required by the department; and
(ii) A  written declaration by the individual that the statements contained in the claim
are true.
(b) The claim must be filed with the assessor of the county in  which the homestead is
located after January 1 and on or before  April 15 immediately preceding the property tax
year for which the specially assessed value is claimed.
(c) If the county assessor determines  that the homestead is eligible for, and the individ-
ual is eligible to claim, the specially assessed value, the county assessor shall determine the
total amount of taxes due on the individual’s homestead in accordance with this section.
(5) Any individual aggrieved by the denial of a  claim for the specially assessed value un-
der this section may appeal to the Oregon Tax Court  in the manner provided by ORS 305.404
to 305.560.
(6) The specially assessed value under this section is  in addition to and not in lieu of any
other property tax limit, exemption or partial exemption, special assessment or deferral.
(7)(a) If, as  of January 1 of the assessment year, any of the circumstances listed in par-
agraph (b) of this subsection have occurred since the immediately preceding January 1,  the
homestead shall:
(A) Have,  for the immediately succeeding property tax year, a maximum assessed value
as determined under ORS 308.156 (5); and
(B) Be assessed and taxed as other property similarly situated is assessed and taxed.
(b) The circumstances referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection are:
(A) The individual who claimed the  specially assessed value on the homestead dies or, if
there was more  than one claimant, the survivor of the individual who originally claimed the
specially assessed value dies.
(B) The homestead granted the specially assessed value is sold, a contract to sell  is en-
tered into or a person other than the individual who claimed the specially assessed value,
including a transferee, becomes the owner of the homestead.
(C) The homestead is no longer the owner-occupied primary homestead of  any individual
who claimed the specially assessed value, except  in the case of an individual required to be
absent from the homestead by reason of health.
(D) The homestead granted the specially assessed value  is a manufactured structure or
floating home and has been moved out of the state.
(E) New property  or new improvements as defined in ORS 308.149 have been added to the
tax account of the homestead that has been granted the specially assessed value.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act applies to property tax years beginning on or  after
[2]
SB 568
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
(1) A claim for specially assessed value  under section 1 of this 2025 Act may
not be made for a property tax year that begins on or after July 1, 2032.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, a homestead granted a specially as-
sessed value under section 1 of this 2025  Act for any property tax year that begins before
July 1, 2032, shall continue  to have the specially assessed value as long as the homestead
remains eligible for, and the individual granted the claim for the specially  assessed value
remains eligible to claim, the specially assessed value.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]