Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
On or before June 30, 2026, the Land Conservation and Development  Com-
mission shall  adopt rules allowing on-site and off-site temporary workforce housing to be
sited with solar photovoltaic power generation facilities, as  appropriate for the construction
of such facilities and consistent  with rules allowing housing sited with wind power generation
facilities, to the extent practicable.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3414