Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Forestry Department shall study the  capacity of Oregon’s nursery
industry to provide seedlings for reforestation following forest fires and shall present  the
study in a report  to an appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative As-
sembly, in the manner provided under ORS 192.245, on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2664