Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Impacts of Ballot Measures 5 and 50 is established.
(2) The task force consists of 11 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of  the Senate shall appoint six members from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint five members from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(3) The task force shall study and prepare a report on the impacts of Article XI, section
11b, of the Oregon Constitution (Ballot Measure 5 (1990)), and Article XI,  section 11, of the
Oregon Constitution (Ballot Measure 50 (1997)),  on local governments, including impacts on
budgeting, programming, assessor practices and measurable outcomes.
(4) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force may presession file legislation in the  manner provided in ORS 171.130
for interim committees. All legislation recommended by official action  of the task force must
indicate that it is introduced at the request of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit the report described in subsection (3) of this section in
the manner provided in ORS  192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 187
HB 2333
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to taxation no  later than December
15, 2026.
(12) The Legislative Policy and Research Director may employ persons necessary for the
performance of the functions of the task force. The Legislative Policy and Research Director
shall fix the duties and amounts of compensation of the employees. The task force shall  use
the services of continuing legislative staff, without employing additional  persons, to the
greatest extent practicable.
(13) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]