Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible community” means a city with a population of less than 20,000.
(b) “Sewage treatment works” has the meaning given that term in ORS 448.405.
(c) “Water system” has the meaning given that term in ORS 448.405.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority, in consultation with  the Department of Environmental
Quality, shall establish a program to provide grants to eligible  communities to repair or re-
place water systems or sewage treatment works.
(3) An application for a grant under this section shall be made in the form and  manner
prescribed by the authority. Before awarding a grant under  this section for the repair or
replacement of sewage treatment works, the authority must provide a copy of the grant ap-
plication to the department for comment.
(4) Grants awarded under this section shall be made from moneys credited  to or depos-
ited in the Small Community Water Infrastructure Fund established under  section 2 of this
2025 Act.
(5) The authority, in consultation  with the department, may adopt rules as necessary for
the administration of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Small Community Water Infrastructure Fund is  established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Small
Community Water Infrastructure Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly; and
(b) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any public or private source.
(3) Moneys in the Small Community Water  Infrastructure Fund are continuously appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority for the purpose of awarding grants  under section 1
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4377
HB 3676
1
2
of this 2025 Act.
[2]