Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June
30, 2021, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $2,616,255, for deposit in the Court Ap-
pointed Special Advocate Fund established in ORS 184.498.
(2) The moneys appropriated under this section  may be expended for distribution to
CASA Volunteer Programs, as defined in ORS  184.489, for the purposes set forth in ORS
184.492 and 419B.112, including but not limited to:
(a) Hiring staff to ensure greater support of and quality assurance  within CASA Volun-
teer Programs; and
(b) Increasing the number and  diversity of CASA Volunteer Programs in an effort to
reduce the average time that each child spends in foster care.
SECTION 2.
This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 93