Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Consumer product manufacturer” means a person that is engaged  in the business
of manufacturing devices and that holds, controls or licenses an  intellectual property inter-
est associated with  the device, whether the intellectual property is a patent, copyright,
trademark or trade dress, trade secret or other exclusive proprietary interest.
(B) “Consumer product manufacturer”  does not include a person that is engaged in the
business of distributing devices, selling  devices at retail or servicing, maintaining or repair-
ing devices before or after a retail sale unless the person also manufactured the device.
(b) “Device” means a mobile  telephone, electronic tablet or similar consumer product
that:
(A) Sends and receives data by means of connection to the Internet; and
(B) Has an operating system that:
(i) Recognizes the geographical location within which the consumer product is used; and
(ii) Requires a user to provide, as a condition of completing the setup of the consumer
product, the user’s date of birth or age.
(c) “Obscene material” means material that:
(A) An  average person, applying contemporary community standards would find that,
taken as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest;
(B) Depicts or describes, in a patently offensive way, sexual conduct as defined in ORS
167.051; and
(C) Taken as a whole, lacks  serious literary, artistic, political, scientific or educational
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 241
HB 2308
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
value.
(c) “Parental control filter” means a setting or  option in a device’s operating system that
a consumer product manufacturer  identifies as a parental control, or by another designation
with a similar meaning or effect, and  that enables a user of the device to block access to
applications or Internet websites that provide access to obscene material.
(d) “Setup” means the act of specifying initial  settings or options for using a device and
associating the settings or options with a user account on the device.
(2) A device that is activated for use within this state must:
(a) Have a  parental control filter that is capable of blocking access to applications or
websites that provide access to obscene material;
(b) Determine the age of each user during setup;
(c) Automatically turn  on the parental control filter during setup for each user who is
younger than 18 years old;
(d) Enable a user who  is 18 years old or older, or a parent or guardian of a user who is
younger than 18 years old, to block or allow, after setup, access to the setting or option that
turns the parental control filter off or  on by means of a security measure, such as a pass-
word, biometric feature or other measure; and
(e) Notify a user who is 18 years  old or older, or a parent or guardian of a user who is
younger than 18 years  old, whenever the parental control filter blocks access to an applica-
tion or website that provides access to obscene material and provide  the user with an op-
portunity to  temporarily or permanently allow access to the application or website, or to
turn the parental control filter off  or on, by meeting the security measure’s requirements
for access.
(3) The Attorney General may investigate, and bring  an action in a court of this state
against, a  consumer product manufacturer that sells or directs or permits the sale in this
state at retail of a device that does not meet the requirements specified in  subsection (2) of
this section.
(4)(a) In an investigation  under subsection (3) of this section, the Attorney General may
execute an  investigative demand in writing and have the investigative demand served upon
any person who might have documentary material or information  relevant to an alleged or
suspected violation of this section. The investigative demand must:
(A) Require the person  to produce relevant documentary material for examination and
copying or reproduction, to answer in writing  written interrogatories, to give oral testimony
concerning documentary material or  information, or to provide any combination of material,
answers or testimony under penalty of perjury;
(B) State a reasonable time  and place for the person to provide material, answers or
testimony; and
(C) State the nature of the conduct that constitutes an alleged violation of this section.
(b) At any time before the earlier of the date specified  under paragraph (a)(B) of this
subsection, or within 20 days after the  demand has been served, the person subject to the
investigative demand may file in an appropriate court a petition to:
(A) Extend the date by  which the person must provide material, answers or testimony;
or
(B) Modify or set aside the demand, stating good cause.
(5) In an action under subsection (3) of this section, the Attorney General may:
[2]
HB 2308
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
(a) Seek to enjoin  further sales in this state of devices that do not meet the requirements
of subsection  (2) of this section, pending the consumer product manufacturer’s compliance
with the requirements;
(b) Recover from the consumer product manufacturer a civil penalty of  not more than
$5,000 per violation;
(c) Recover the Attorney  General’s reasonable attorney fees, court costs and
investigatory expenses; and
(d) Seek  such other relief as the court deems lawful and appropriate, including
restitution on behalf of persons who  suffered ascertainable injuries as a result of the con-
sumer product manufacturer’s failure to comply with the requirements set forth in sub-
section (2) of this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act applies to:
(1) Consumer product manufacturers  that conduct business in this state or that provide
products or services to residents of this state; and
(2) Devices that are activated within this state on or after the  operative date specified
in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
[3]