Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 166.015 is amended to read:
166.015. (1) A person commits the crime of riot if while participating with  five or more other
persons the person engages  in tumultuous and violent conduct and thereby intentionally or
recklessly creates a grave risk of causing public alarm.
(2) As used in this section, “tumultuous and  violent conduct” includes using a motor
vehicle or a person’s body to impede traffic, create a traffic hazard or block the normal  and
reasonable movement of traffic.
(3) “Tumultuous and violent conduct” does not include the following:
(a) Proceeding in a manner needed for safe operation of the motor vehicle,  including but
not limited to:
(A) Momentarily stopping to allow oncoming traffic to pass before  making a right-hand
or left-hand turn.
(B) Momentarily stopping  in preparation of, or moving at an extremely slow pace while,
negotiating an exit from the road.
(b) Proceeding as part of a funeral procession under the direction of a funeral  escort
vehicle or a funeral lead vehicle.
(c) Proceeding as authorized under ORS 814.070 (3) and (4).
(d) Proceeding with the approval of and under the conditions imposed  by the road au-
thority, as defined in ORS 801.445.
[(2)] (4) Riot is a Class C felony.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 166.015 by section 1 of this 2025 Act  apply to con-
duct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 801