Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. For the purpose of enforcing state and local  transient lodging taxes, the
Department of Revenue  shall purchase software that scrapes online data relating to tran-
sient lodging rentals. The department shall make the software accessible  to units of local
government that impose local transient lodging taxes.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Department of Revenue,  for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2019, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $  to enable the depart-
ment to carry out the purpose described in section 1  of this 2019 Act for the period beginning
on the effective date of this 2019 Act  and ending on December 31, 2021, and to reimburse the
department for procurement costs related to that purpose.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1943