Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 6,  chapter 660, Oregon Laws 1985, as amended by section 1, chapter 108,
Oregon Laws 1993, section  1, chapter 215, Oregon Laws 2003, and section 1, chapter 191, Oregon
Laws 2011, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  ORS 307.540 to 307.548 apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 1985,  and
before July 1, [ 2027] 2033.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2128