Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Broadband Service Infrastructure Program is established within  the
Oregon Broadband Office for the purpose of:
(a) Offsetting the cost of planning and developing broadband service infrastructure;
(b) Promoting the development and  adoption of high speed broadband in unserved and
underserved areas; and
(c) Supporting universal broadband service in this state.
(2) Under the Broadband Service Infrastructure  Program, the office shall use a reverse
auction model to award grants or loans to eligible applicants to cover the costs for  planning
and developing broadband service infrastructure in  designated geographic areas. The office
shall:
(a) Designate geographic areas that are  unserved or underserved areas and eligible for
a grant or loan under the program;
(b) Issue an opportunity announcement inviting eligible applicants to  submit a bid to plan
and develop broadband service infrastructure in a designated geographic area; and
(c) Award a grant or loan to the  eligible applicant that has submitted a bid that is real-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3639
SB 943
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
istic, feasible and the lowest cost amount.
(3) An entity that seeks to qualify as an eligible applicant shall  demonstrate, prior to
being permitted to submit a bid, that the  entity meets good-faith standards and has the fi-
nancial and technical capabilities to plan and develop broadband service infrastructure.
(4) An eligible applicant that receives a grant or  loan under the program shall enter into
a performance  agreement to plan and develop broadband service infrastructure within the
geographic area that:
(a) Reaches 95 percent or more of the customers in the geographic area; and
(b) Provides broadband service at a speed of at least 100 megabits per second  for down-
loads and uploads with a  capability to provide speeds of one gigabit per second for downloads
and uploads.
(5) A grant or loan awarded under the  program may be used to cover the costs for
planning and development of broadband service infrastructure that an eligible applicant in-
curred on or after March 15, 2021.
(6) The office may issue separate opportunity announcements for bids as funding  is
available.
(7) The Oregon Business Development  Department shall adopt rules and standards to
carry out the Broadband Service Infrastructure Program.
SECTION 2.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall begin the rulemaking
process on the date following the date this 2023 Act  takes effect and, no later than December
31, 2023, adopt the initial rules and standards to  carry out the Broadband Service
Infrastructure Program established by section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.  Section 4, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first  special session), as amended by
section 1, chapter 76, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 4. (1) The  Broadband Fund is established, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
Interest earned by the Broadband Fund shall  be credited to the fund. [ Moneys in the Broadband
Fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon  Business Development Department the program es-
tablished by rule under section  5, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session). ] The fund shall
consist of moneys deposited in the fund  pursuant to ORS 759.425 and moneys appropriated or
transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Moneys  in the Broadband Fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business
Development Department for the purpose of providing grants  or loans under the program
established by rule under section 5, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session).
(3) The department may use reasonable amounts from  the fund necessary to administer
the program established by rule under section 5, chapter 17, Oregon  Laws 2020 (first special
session).
SECTION 4.  Section 5, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020  (first special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  [ (1) As used in this section: ]
[(a) “Underserved  area” means, based on the most recent broadband deployment data published
by the Federal Communications Commission,  other federal agencies or the State of Oregon, a ge-
ographic area within one or  more census blocks, within which there is no service provider offering
residential wireline or wireless broadband service  at a speed of at least 25 megabits per second for
downloads and three megabits per second for uploads. ]
[(b) “Unserved area” means, based on the most recent broadband deployment  data published by the
Federal Communications Commission, other federal  agencies or the State of Oregon, a geographic area
[2]
SB 943
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
within one  or more census blocks, within which there is no service provider offering residential wireline
or wireless broadband service at a speed of  at least 10 megabits per second for downloads and one
megabit per second for uploads. ]
[(2)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department shall establish by rule a program  for pro-
viding grants or loans to assist eligible applicants with projects for: ]
[(A) The planning and development of broadband service infrastructure; ]
[(B) Digital literacy including cybersecurity; ]
[(C) Digital inclusion; and ]
[(D) Digital adoption. ]
[(b) In establishing the program required by this section, the department shall take into consider-
ation all federal funding opportunities for the planning and development of broadband service
infrastructure and shall endeavor to administer the program in a  manner that serves to maximize the
total available state and federal support for broadband development and related planning. ]
[(3) Rules adopted under this section shall include but need not be limited to rules establishing: ]
[(a) Criteria for applications and for establishing the eligibility of applicants and proposed projects
for a grant or loan under the program; ]
[(b) A process for: ]
[(A) Identifying broadband service providers that provide service within or near  the geographic
area that would be benefited by a project proposed by an eligible applicant; and ]
[(B) Notifying the identified broadband service providers of the pending application; ]
[(c) Standards for the department to evaluate applications from eligible applicants; ]
[(d) Criteria and procedures for broadband service providers  to engage in a competitive bidding
process for contracts to complete projects pursuant to a grant or loan awarded under the program; ]
[(e) Reporting requirements by grant or loan award  recipients on the broadband service
infrastructure developed or planned for using grant or loan moneys and the locations served or  that
will be served by the broadband service infrastructure; ]
[(f) A public process for interested persons to submit comments on pending applications; ]
[(g) A process for appealing grant or loan decisions by the department; and ]
[(h) Procedures to  ensure that any records or data submitted to the department pursuant to ad-
ministration of the program  that relate to broadband, voice connections or subscriptions and that are
confidential, privileged or otherwise protected from disclosure  are not disclosed, except as permitted by
state and federal law. ]
[(4) In making  broadband service infrastructure grant or loan award decisions under the program,
the department shall apply the following preferences: ]
[(a) Regarding the geographic area that a proposed project will serve, the department shall: ]
[(A) Give first preference to proposed projects that will serve unserved areas; and ]
[(B) Give second preference to proposed projects that will serve underserved areas. ]
[(b) Regarding the customers that a proposed project will serve, the department shall: ]
[(A) Give first preference to proposed projects that are  eligible to receive funds from the Connecting
Oregon Schools Fund established under ORS 276A.424; ]
[(B) Give second preference to proposed  projects that will provide broadband service access to
public libraries; and ]
[(C) Give third preference to proposed projects that will provide broadband service access to  resi-
dential customers. ]
[(5) The department shall, as part of the program, establish procedures for distributing  grant or
[3]
SB 943
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
loan funds awarded for the purpose of providing  broadband access to schools. Procedures established
under this subsection shall include procedures for transferring  not more than 20 percent of the moneys
deposited in the Broadband Fund established under section 4 of this 2020  special session Act each
biennium from the Broadband Fund to the Connecting Oregon  Schools Fund established under ORS
276A.424.]
[(6) The department may not award a grant  or loan under the program for a proposed project
to:]
[(a) Develop broadband service infrastructure to  serve residential locations that, at the time the
application for the proposed project is received by the department, have access to terrestrial wireline
or wireless broadband  service at a speed of at least 25 megabits per second for downloads and three
megabits per second for uploads; or ]
[(b) Develop broadband service infrastructure that will serve two or fewer residential locations. ]
[(7)(a) If the department awards a grant or  loan for a proposed project to develop broadband ser-
vice infrastructure that will serve nonresidential locations that, at the time the application  for the pro-
posed project was received  by the department, were served by terrestrial wireline or wireless broadband
service at a speed of at least 25 megabits per second for downloads and three megabits per second  for
uploads, the broadband service providers identified pursuant to  rules adopted under subsection (3)(b)
of this section shall be  afforded a right of first refusal to contract for the development of broadband
service infrastructure as part of the project. If a broadband  service provider exercises the right of first
refusal, the provider shall be awarded the  contract to develop broadband service infrastructure as part
of the project, subject to the requirement that the  provider must offer access to the completed broadband
service infrastructure:]
[(A) Beginning no later than one year after the date that the  department awards the grant or loan
to develop the proposed project; ]
[(B) At demonstrated download and upload speeds equal  to or faster than the speeds indicated in
the application for the proposed project; and ]
[(C) At a cost that is equal to or  less than the cost indicated in the application for the proposed
project.]
[(b) This subsection does not  apply to a grant or loan award for a proposed project described in
subsection (4)(b) of this section. ]
(1) As used in this section, “high-cost broadband service area” means an area where  the
cost to  provide broadband services is higher than the average cost to provide broadband
services as a result of the following factors:
(a) The remote location of the area;
(b) The lack of population density of the area;
(c) The unique topography of the area; or
(d) A high rate of poverty in the area.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department, through the  Oregon Broadband Of-
fice, shall establish a program to provide grants or loans to eligible applicants to support:
(a) Residents and businesses that are located within a high-cost  broadband service area
having access to broadband services at rates that are reasonably comparable to the rates  in
areas that are outside of high-cost broadband service areas;
(b) Digital and cybersecurity literacy;
(c) Digital inclusion; and
(d) Digital adoption.
[4]
SB 943
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
(3) The program shall  be funded by moneys in the Broadband Fund established under
section 4, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session).
(4) As part of program, the department shall establish:
(a) Eligibility criteria;
(b) Application procedures;
(c) Criteria for assessing applications and awarding grants or loans; and
(d) Reporting requirements.
SECTION 5.
 Section 6, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020  (first special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  [ (1) Not later than  September 15 of each year, the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment shall report, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to telecommunications on the status of the Broadband Fund  established under section
4 of this 2020 special session Act. The report required by this section shall include a description of: ]
[(a) All loans and grants provided through the  program adopted under section 5 of this 2020 spe-
cial session Act; and ]
[(b) The status of the projects funded by the loans and grants. ]
[(2) In addition to the information required in the  report under subsection (1) of this section, the
report submitted on or before September 15, 2024, by  the department pursuant to this section shall in-
clude an evaluation of the continuing need for the Broadband Fund, including but not limited to rec-
ommendations regarding the repeal, by section 9 of this 2020 special session Act,  of the Broadband
Fund and the program adopted under section 5 of this 2020 special session Act. ]
The Oregon Broadband Advisory Council shall include in  the biennial report required
under ORS 285A.160 an evaluation of the continuing need for the  program established by rule
under section 5, chapter 17, Oregon  Laws 2020 (first special session), including any recom-
mendations regarding the repeal, by section 9, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020  (first special
session), of the program established by rule under section 5, chapter 17,  Oregon Laws 2020
(first special session).
SECTION 6.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[5]