Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Agriculture,  in consultation with the Minor
Crops Advisory Committee created under ORS 634.600, shall establish a grant program  to
fund research on alternatives to chlorpyrifos. The department  and the advisory committee
shall consult with the commodity commissions established under  ORS 576.051 to 576.455 and
Oregon State University to develop priority areas for grant funding. Research funded by the
grant program must be completed no later than December 31, 2024.
(2) No later than September 15, 2025, the department shall report to the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related  to agriculture in the manner provided under ORS
192.245 on the results of the  research funded by the grant program established under sub-
section (1) of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) Oregon State University, in  cooperation with the United States Depart-
ment of Agriculture’s Interregional Project Number  4, shall research alternatives to
chlorpyrifos. In conducting the research,  the university shall consult broadly with agricul-
tural stakeholders to  design trials that address priority crops and pests. Research conducted
under this subsection must be completed no later than December 31, 2024.
(2) No later than September 15, 2025, the university shall report to  the interim commit-
tees of the Legislative Assembly related to  agriculture in the manner provided under ORS
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3430
HB 3249
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
192.245 on the results of the research conducted under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $850,000, for the purpose of carrying  out the provisions
of section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to Oregon State University, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General
Fund, the  amount of $400,000, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 2 of
this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]