Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,625,000, which shall  be distributed to the
State Fair Council to fund:
(1) An assessment of fairground facilities; and
(2) Deferred maintenance, improvement and enhancement of the fairground facilities.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3617