Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 180.160 is amended to read:
180.160. [(1) Subject to rules prescribed by the Attorney General, in rendering assistance to  the
respective officers, departments, boards and  commissions of state government, and other public bodies,
the Department of Justice may charge such officers, agencies and public bodies (including, when  ap-
propriate, the Department of Justice itself) separately for the cost of such assistance,  said cost includ-
ing, but not limited to salaries of assistants and administrative and clerical salaries,  investigative
services, and capital outlay; and shall also charge such officers, departments, boards, commissions  or
public bodies for other costs incurred and disbursements made pursuant  to request or authorization in
connection with  such assistance, and not paid directly out of moneys appropriated or otherwise avail-
able for expenditure by such officers, agencies or public bodies. ]
(1) The Department of Justice may not charge the officers  and agencies of state gov-
ernment, as defined in ORS 174.111, for the cost of assistance rendered, including but  not
limited to salaries of assistants and administrative  and clerical salaries, investigative ser-
vices and capital outlay, or for other costs incurred and disbursements  made in connection
with the assistance. The department shall pay the costs of  assistance rendered to officers
and agencies of state government out of funds appropriated to the department for  that pur-
pose.
(2) The department may charge a public  body other than state government, as defined in
ORS 174.111, and  its officers, for the cost of assistance rendered, including but not limited
to salaries of assistants and administrative and clerical  salaries, investigative services and
capital outlay, and for other costs incurred and disbursements  made in connection with the
assistance and not paid directly out of moneys appropriated or otherwise available for  ex-
penditure by the public body or its officers.
[(2)] (3) The Department of Justice may not impose charges under subsection [ (1)] (2) of  this
section at rates greater than the rates established for the biennium through the legislative budgeting
process in the preceding odd-numbered  year regular session of the Legislative Assembly unless the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3011
HB 2788
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
department first notifies the Joint Committee on Ways  and Means, the Joint Interim Committee on
Ways and Means or the Emergency Board.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 180.140 is amended to read:
180.140. (1) The Attorney General shall appoint the other  assistants the Attorney General deems
necessary to transact  the business of the office, each to serve at the pleasure of the Attorney Gen-
eral and perform such duties as the Attorney General may designate and  for whose acts the Attor-
ney General shall be responsible. Each assistant shall have  full authority under the direction of the
Attorney General to perform any duty required by law to be performed by the Attorney General.
(2) Each assistant so appointed shall be a person  admitted to the practice of law by the Supreme
Court of this state and shall  qualify by taking the usual oath of office, conditioned upon the faithful
performance of duties.
(3) The Attorney General may appoint  temporary assistants for a period not to exceed 15
months. Such  temporary assistants shall be legally trained but are not required to be admitted to
the practice of law by the Supreme Court of this state.
(4) Each  assistant shall receive the salary fixed by the Attorney General, payable as other state
salaries are paid. Each assistant so appointed shall devote the full  time of the assistant to the
business of the state, unless employment on a part-time basis is otherwise  fixed by the Attorney
General.
(5) Special legal assistants or private counsel may be employed by the Attorney General, under
the direction and control of the Attorney General, in  particular cases or proceedings, whenever the
Attorney General deems it appropriate  to protect the interests of the state. [ The cost of such special
assistants or counsel shall be charged to the appropriate officer or agency pursuant to ORS 180.160. ]
(6) None of the provisions of this chapter prohibit the Attorney General or  any of the Attorney
General’s full-time deputies or assistants from voluntarily  representing, without compensation or
expenditure of state resources, indigent clients referred by a nonprofit civil legal  aid office or pro
bono program.
SECTION 3.  ORS 180.170 is amended to read:
180.170. The Department of Justice shall estimate  in advance the expenses that it will incur
during the biennium under ORS 180.160 and 180.340, and shall render to  [ officers, departments,
boards and commissions of state government and other ] public bodies , other than  agencies of state
government, and their officers,  an invoice for their  share of such expenses for periods within the
biennium [ and in sufficient amounts to provide reasonable cash operating  requirements for the Legal
Division of the Department of Justice  within the biennial period ]. Each officer[ , department, board or
commission or other ] or public body shall pay to the  credit of the Department of Justice Operating
Account such invoice as an administrative  expense from funds or appropriations available to it in
the same manner as other claims against the [ state or ] public body are paid.  If the estimated ex-
penses for any  officer[ , department, board, commission ] or public body are more or less than actual
expenses for the period covered by  the invoice, the difference shall be reflected in the next following
estimate of expenses.
SECTION 4.  ORS 180.180 is amended to read:
180.180. (1)  The Department of Justice Operating Account is created in the General Fund.
Moneys credited to the account are continuously appropriated to the Department of Justice for  the
purpose of paying expenses incurred by the department, including those incurred by the  Division of
Child Support, but not including expenses described in ORS 180.095, that are  reimbursable from the
Department of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account.
[2]
HB 2788
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
(2) All moneys received by the Department of Justice pursuant to its activities, except those
received and creditable to the Department  of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account,
shall be deposited in the State  Treasury to the credit of the Department of Justice Operating Ac-
count.
(3)[(a) Subject to paragraph  (b) of this subsection, ] Subaccounts may be used in the Department
of Justice Operating Account whenever the Department  of Justice determines that operating needs
of the department so require.
[(b) The department shall deposit moneys received by the department from officers,  departments,
boards and commissions of state government under ORS 180.160 and 180.170 into a subaccount in  the
Department of Justice Operating Account. ]
(4) In order to facilitate financing the  operating expenses of the Department of Justice described
in subsection (1) of this section, with the approval of  the Director of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services, the Department  of Justice may at any time during the biennium transfer
to the Department of Justice Operating Account any funds the department  considers necessary, not
to exceed $800,000, from funds appropriated to the department for  a biennial period. Funds trans-
ferred under this subsection shall be retransferred from the Department  of Justice Operating Ac-
count to the appropriation from which  the original transfer was made. The retransfers shall be
accomplished prior to the last day of each biennial period.
[(5) With the approval of the Director of  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the
Department of Justice may at any time during the biennium transfer from the subaccount described in
subsection (3)(b) of this section to the General Fund any  amounts the department determines will not
be needed to meet the  responsibilities imposed on the department under the current biennial budget or
under any laws governing the department. ]
SECTION 5.
 ORS 180.225 is amended to read:
180.225. In any proceeding under the antitrust laws of the United States in which the state  or
any public body within the state is interested, the Attorney General may, in the  discretion of the
Attorney  General,  represent any such public body at its request[ , charging it for the cost of such
representation pursuant to ORS 180.160 ].
SECTION 6. ORS 283.425 is repealed.
[3]