Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Upon charging a defendant with an  offense described in ORS 166.255 (1)(b),
the district attorney shall allege in the charging instrument one of the following relation-
ships existing between the defendant and the person alleged to  be the victim of the offense,
at the time of the offense:
(1) The defendant is the current or former spouse of the victim;
(2) The defendant is the parent or guardian of the victim;
(3) The defendant shares a minor child in common with the victim;
(4) The defendant is cohabiting with or has cohabited with the victim;
(5) The defendant and the victim are adults related by blood or marriage; or
(6) The defendant and the victim have been involved in a sexually intimate relationship.
SECTION 2.
(1)(a) When a defendant is charged with  an offense described in ORS 166.255
(1)(b), the district  attorney shall, unless waived by the defendant or for good cause shown,
at arraignment or no later than 45  days prior to trial or entry of a guilty or no contest plea,
serve on the defendant  and file with the court a notice stating that, due to the nature of the
relationship between the  defendant and the alleged victim, the defendant will be prohibited
from possessing firearms and ammunition if convicted of the offense. The notice must spec-
ify a type of relationship listed in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
(b) When a  defendant is charged with stalking under ORS 163.732, the district attorney
shall, unless waived by the defendant or for good cause shown, at arraignment or no later
than 45 days prior to trial or entry of a guilty or no contest plea, serve on the defendant  and
file with the court a notice stating that, due to the nature of the offense, the defendant  will
be prohibited from possessing firearms and ammunition if convicted of the offense.
(2) The Department of Justice, in consultation with the State  Court Administrator, shall
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3358
SB 823
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
develop a form to be used to provide a notice described in subsection (1)  of this section. The
form must:
(a) Allow the district attorney, if applicable,  to specify the relationship between the de-
fendant and the alleged victim, and  whether the relationship between the defendant and the
alleged victim would cause the defendant to be prohibited from possessing firearms  and am-
munition under Oregon law or under both Oregon and federal law; and
(b) Advise  the defendant that the failure to allege any specified relationship between the
defendant and the victim, or the absence of a court determination or order under section 3
of this 2021 Act, does not affect the lawfulness of the defendant’s possession of firearms  or
ammunition under ORS 166.250 or 166.255, other Oregon law or federal law.
SECTION 3.
(1) If  a defendant has been charged with an offense described in ORS 166.255
(1)(b) on a charging  instrument alleging that the relationship existing between the defendant
and the person  alleged to be the victim of the offense, at the time of the offense, is of a type
listed in section 1 of this 2021 Act, the specified relationship may be established as follows:
(a) At any time prior to  entry of a plea of guilty or no contest, the defendant may stip-
ulate, orally on the record or in writing, to the nature of  the relationship. Upon the stipu-
lation, the court shall find that the relationship has been established  and shall proceed under
subsection (2) of this section.
(b) If the defendant enters a plea of guilty or no contest to the  offense described in ORS
166.255 (1)(b), but does not stipulate or admit to the nature of the  relationship between the
defendant and the victim, the district attorney has the burden of proving the nature of the
relationship beyond a reasonable doubt. If the  court finds that the burden of proof has been
met, the court shall proceed under subsection (2) of this section.
(c) If the defendant proceeds to trial on the offense described  in ORS 166.255 (1)(b), the
district attorney has the burden  of proving the nature of the relationship beyond a reason-
able doubt. The fact finder shall return a special verdict of “yes” or “no”  on the issue of
whether the nature of the  relationship between the defendant and victim is as alleged. If the
fact finder returns a verdict of “yes,” the court shall proceed under  subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) If the nature of the  relationship between the defendant and the victim has been es-
tablished under  subsection (1) of this section, upon conviction of the offense described in
ORS 166.255 (1)(b), the court shall:
(a) Make a written determination concerning the nature of the relationship;
(b) Enter an order prohibiting the defendant from possessing firearms and  ammunition;
and
(c) Inform the defendant that the Department  of State Police and the sheriff will be no-
tified concerning the order for purposes of entry into state and federal databases.
(3) Upon conviction of stalking under ORS 163.732, the court shall:
(a) Enter an order prohibiting the defendant from possessing firearms and  ammunition;
and
(b) Inform the defendant that the  Department of State Police and the sheriff will be no-
tified concerning the order for purposes of entry into state and federal databases.
(4)(a) The court shall notify the Department of State Police and the county sheriff when
the court enters an order described in subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(b) Upon receipt of the notification described in paragraph (a) of this subsection:
[2]
SB 823
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
(A) The Department of State Police shall enter the information into any appropriate state
or national databases; and
(B) The sheriff shall enter the information into any appropriate state or national data-
bases.
(5) The State Court Administrator shall develop a form to be used for the determination
and order described in subsection (2) of this section and the order described in subsection  (3)
of this section. The form must allow the court to designate  the crime of conviction, specify
the relationship between the defendant and the victim,  if applicable, and specify whether the
conviction or  relationship causes the defendant to be prohibited from possessing firearms
and ammunition under Oregon law or under both Oregon and federal law.
(6) The absence of a  court determination or order under this section does not affect the
lawfulness of the defendant’s  possession of firearms or ammunition under ORS 166.250 or
166.255, other Oregon law or federal law.
SECTION 4.
The Department of State Police, when entering information received under
section 3 of  this 2021 Act into a state or national database, shall ensure, and shall develop
a process if  necessary to ensure, that the information specifies whether the defendant is
prohibited from possessing firearms and ammunition under Oregon law or under both Oregon
and federal law.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 166.257 is amended to read:
166.257. (1) Upon receiving a request to return a  firearm or ammunition relinquished to a law
enforcement agency pursuant to ORS 166.256, the law enforcement agency shall:
(a) Notify [ the Department of Justice of the return request for the purposes  of notifying ] the
petitioner of the order  of the return request ; and
(b) Hold the firearm or ammunition for 72 hours after receiving the request.
(2) Prior to returning the firearm or ammunition, the law enforcement agency shall:
(a) Confirm that the person to whom the  law enforcement agency will return the firearm or
ammunition is the lawful owner of the firearm or ammunition, or a person with a possessory right
to the firearm or ammunition; and
(b) Perform a criminal background  check as defined in ORS 166.432 to confirm that the person
is not prohibited from possessing a firearm or ammunition under state or federal law.
SECTION 6.
ORS 181A.287 is repealed.
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $115,000, to fund the Law Enforcement Data System for the
purposes of implementing sections 1 to 4 of this 2021 Act.
[3]