Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of the wildlife laws.
SECTION 2. The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall:
(1) Designate wildlife management units consisting of  lands that are identified by the
National Integrated Drought Information System as experiencing moderate,  severe, extreme
or exceptional drought and in which:
(a) Populations of elk or mule deer  are at or below 50 percent of the population objectives
set forth in individual species management plans established by the  department or the State
Fish and Wildlife Commission.
(b) Populations of pronghorn antelope, bighorn sheep or  mountain goats are below 75
percent of the rolling three-year average of the populations.
(2) On or before June 30 of each year:
(a) Review and update the designations of wildlife management units.
(b) Change the designations of wildlife management units as necessary when drought
conditions change.
(3) Undertake predator control in the wildlife management units until:
(a) Populations of elk or mule deer within the  wildlife management units are at or above
80 percent of the population objectives set forth in individual species management  plans es-
tablished by the department or the commission.
(b) Populations of pronghorn antelope, bighorn sheep or mountain goats within  the
wildlife management units  are at least 90 percent of the rolling three-year average of the
populations.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be  expended for purposes re-
lated to predator control, as described in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4387
HB 3602
1
[2]