Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 735.532, as amended by section 4, chapter 87, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
735.532. (1) A person may not transact business or purport to transact business in  this state as
a pharmacy benefit  manager unless the person has a license to transact business as a pharmacy
benefit manager issued by the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(2) To obtain a license under this section, a person must:
(a) Submit an application to the department on a form prescribed by the department by rule.
(b) Pay a fee in an amount adopted by the department by rule.
(c) Demonstrate in the application described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection, with
evidence acceptable to the  Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services,
that the person is not owned or operated by an insurer or an affiliate of an insurer  on behalf
of which the person would perform services that are  subject to ORS 735.530 to 735.532. For
the purposes of this paragraph, “affiliate” means a person that controls,  is controlled by or
is under common control with another person.
(3) A license to transact business as a pharmacy benefit manager must be  renewed every 12
months. To renew a license under this subsection, a pharmacy benefit manager must pay a renewal
fee in an amount adopted by the department by rule.
(4) The department shall deposit all moneys collected under this section into the  Consumer and
Business Services Fund created in ORS 705.145.
(5) Any fee adopted by the department under this section  must be sufficient to pay the
department’s reasonable costs in administering ORS 735.530 to 735.552.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 735.532, as amended by section 4, chapter  87, Oregon Laws 2024, and section
1 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
735.532. (1) A person may not transact business or purport to transact business in  this state as
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1001
HB 2252
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
a pharmacy benefit  manager unless the person has a license to transact business as a pharmacy
benefit manager issued by the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(2) To obtain a license under this section, a person must:
(a) Submit an application to the department on a form prescribed by the department by rule.
(b) Pay a fee in an amount adopted by the department by rule.
(c) Demonstrate in the application described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, with  evidence
acceptable to the Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services, that the person
is not  owned or operated by an insurer or an affiliate of an insurer on behalf of which the person
would perform services that are subject to ORS 735.530 to 735.532. For the purposes of this  para-
graph, “affiliate” means a person that controls, is controlled by or is under  common control with
another person.
(3) A license to  transact business as a pharmacy benefit manager must be renewed every 12
months. To renew a license under this subsection, a pharmacy benefit manager must pay a renewal
fee in an amount adopted  by the department by rule  and make the demonstration described in
subsection (2)(c) of this section .
(4) The department shall deposit all moneys collected under this section into the  Consumer and
Business Services Fund created in ORS 705.145.
(5) Any fee adopted by the department under this section  must be sufficient to pay the
department’s reasonable costs in administering ORS 735.530 to 735.552.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 735.532  by section 2 of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2031.
[2]