Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Energy shall:
(a) Work and consult  with stakeholders to identify areas of inquiry regarding energy and
energy use in this state that, if  researched and analyzed, could provide important and useful
information, data or datasets as a resource for the Legislative Assembly or Governor. The
stakeholders must represent a diverse range of interests, expertise and  education,
socioeconomic communities and geographic areas of the state;
(b) Develop research options using the areas of inquiry identified  under paragraph (a) of
this subsection and in consultation with federal and  state agencies that oversee or have ex-
pertise in the areas of inquiry identified under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Convene an advisory group to develop a set of recommendations and  benchmarks
around energy and energy use in this  state using the research options developed under par-
agraph (b) of this subsection.
(2)(a) The department shall produce a report that consolidates a final set of recommen-
dations around energy and energy use in this state. The report must include:
(A) A final  set of recommendations and background information regarding the work and
decision-making that led to the final set of recommendations;
(B) The areas of inquiry  identified under subsection (1)(a) of this section and background
information regarding the work that led to the areas of inquiry;
(C) The research options developed under subsection (1)(b) of this section and background
information regarding the work that led to the research options; and
(D) The set of recommendations and benchmarks developed by the advisory group  under
subsection (1)(c) of this section and background information regarding the work that led to
the set of recommendations.
(b) The department shall submit the report produced  under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section to the Governor and  the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3044
HB 2534
1
2
3
4
5
in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]