Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 254.085 is amended to read:
254.085. (1) The Secretary of State, not later than the 61st  day before the date of a primary or
general election, shall file with each county clerk a statement of the federal and state offices to be
filled or  for which candidates are to be nominated in the county at the election, information con-
cerning all candidates for the offices, and the state measures to be voted on.
(2)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the information concerning
candidates for the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, Oregon  Tax Court and circuit court shall in-
clude a designation of incumbent for each candidate who is the regularly elected [ or appointed ] judge
of the court to which the candidate seeks election. If a candidate was regularly elected [or
appointed] to a specific position or department on  the court, the candidate shall be designated as the
incumbent only if the person is a candidate for that position or department.
(b) For any candidate for the  Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, Oregon Tax Court or
circuit court who  was appointed and is seeking election in the first election since being ap-
pointed, the designation of incumbent may not be included in the  information concerning
candidates for that candidate.
(3) Included with each state measure shall be the measure number, the latest ballot  title certi-
fied by the Attorney General under ORS 250.067 (2) or, if the Supreme Court has  reviewed the title
under ORS 250.085, the title certified by the  court and the financial estimates under ORS 250.125.
The Secretary of State shall keep a copy of the statement.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 851