Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force to Abolish the Department of Education is established.
(2) The task force consists of 10 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the  Senate shall appoint five members from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint five members from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(3) The task force  shall study and make recommendations related to the abolishment of
the Department of Education, including:
(a) A review of distributions of the State  School Fund, and whether distributions should
be made by another method or by another state agency.
(b) A review of distributions of the Fund for Student Success,  and whether distributions
should be made by another method or by another state agency.
(c) A review of all other funding and grant distributions made by the Department of Ed-
ucation, and whether distributions should be  made by another method or by another state
agency.
(d) A review of the process for obtaining  fingerprints and criminal records checks for
school districts and schools, and whether  the background checks should be provided by an-
other state agency.
(e) A review of methods for determining quality education goals and the  meeting of
quality education goals  for the purpose of complying with the requirements of Article VIII,
section 8, of the Oregon Constitution.
(f) A  review of the food programs offered through the United States Department of Ag-
riculture, and the determination of whether the administration of the programs should  be
provided by another state agency.
(g) A review of alternative state agencies to act as  the state educational agency for
purposes of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.
(h) A review of  alternative state agencies to act as the state educational agency for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2307
SB 653
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
purposes of the Every Student Succeeds Act, 20 U.S.C. 6301 et seq.
(i) A review of alternative state agencies to administer the High School Graduation  and
College and Career Readiness Act.
(j) A review of alternative state agencies to investigate reports of  abuse or sexual con-
duct as provided by ORS 339.370 to 339.400.
(4) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force may presession file legislation in the  manner provided in ORS 171.130
for interim committees. All legislation recommended by official action  of the task force must
indicate that it is introduced at the request of the task force.
(11) The task force shall report to the Legislative  Assembly in the manner provided in
ORS 192.245 at any time  within 30 days after its final meeting or at a time the President and
Speaker designate.
(12) The Legislative Policy and Research Director may employ persons necessary for the
performance of the functions of the task force. The Legislative Policy and Research Director
shall fix  the duties and amounts of compensation of the employees. The task force shall use
the services of continuing  legislative staff, without employing additional persons, to the
greatest extent practicable.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
[2]