Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any authorization to issue general obli-
gation bonds under ORS 286A.035, in the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of
the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, the State Treasurer may issue Article
XI-Q bonds under ORS 286A.816 to 286A.826 in an amount that produces  $17,500,000 of net
proceeds for the purpose specified in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net  proceeds of bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the Depart-
ment of Veterans’ Affairs for construction of a veterans’ home in Roseburg, Oregon.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2801