Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Greenhouse gas” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468A.210.
(b) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.360.
(c) “Motor vehicle fuel” means gasoline, diesel or any  other liquid product used to power
a motor vehicle upon the highways of this state.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any fee, assessment  or other charge im-
posed by state statute or administrative rule pursuant to a  program to reduce the amount
of greenhouse gas emissions produced by the combustion of  motor vehicle fuel shall be ded-
icated for highway purposes and transferred by the  agency that collected the fee, assessment
or other charge to the State Highway Fund established under ORS 366.505.
(3) An agency required to  transfer amounts under subsection (2) of this section shall
make the required transfers each calendar quarter.
(4) The Governor shall  include in the Governor’s budget an estimate of the amount re-
quired to be transferred under this section  in the coming biennium and make recommen-
dations for  whether the amount transferred by each agency should be wholly or partially
replaced with revenue from any other source.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 291.216 is amended to read:
291.216. (1) The Governor’s budget shall include  a budget message prepared by the Governor,
including recommendations of  the Governor with reference to the fiscal policy of the state govern-
ment for the coming biennium,  describing the important features of the budget, embracing a general
budget summary setting forth the aggregate figures of the budget so  as to show a balanced relation
between the total proposed expenditures and the total  anticipated income, with the basis and factors
on which the estimates  are made, the amount to be borrowed, and other means of financing the es-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2514
SB 637
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
timated expenditures for the ensuing biennium, compared with the corresponding figures for at least
the last completed biennium and the current biennium.
(2) The Governor’s budget shall  be supported by explanatory schedules or statements, classifying
the expenditures reported in the budget, both past and proposed, by organization  units, objects and
funds, and the income by organization units, sources and funds, and  the proposed amount of new
borrowing as well as proposed new tax  or revenue sources, including a single comprehensive list
of all proposed increases in fees, licenses and assessments assumed in the budget.
(3) The Governor’s budget shall be submitted for all dedicated funds, as well as the state Gen-
eral Fund, and shall include the estimated amounts of federal and other aids or grants to  state
agencies or activities provided for any purpose whatever, together with estimated  expenditures
therefrom.
(4) The Governor’s budget shall embrace  the detailed estimates of expenditures and revenues.
It shall include:
(a) Statements of  the bonded indebtedness of the state government, showing the actual amount
of the debt service for at least the past biennium, and the estimated amount for  the current
biennium and the  ensuing biennium, the debt authorized and unissued, the condition of the sinking
funds and the borrowing capacity.
(b) The Governor’s recommendations concerning tax expenditures identified under ORS 291.214.
(c) Any statements relative to the financial plan which the Governor may consider desirable or
which may be required by the Legislative Assembly.
(5) The Governor’s budget  shall use the estimated revenues under ORS 291.342 for the fiscal
year in which the budget is submitted as the basis  for total anticipated income under subsection (1)
of this section,  subject to adjustment as may be necessary to reflect accurately projections for the
next biennium.
(6)(a) The Governor’s budget shall present information  regarding the expenses of the state in the
following categories:
(A) Personnel expenses, including compensation  and benefits for state employees, but excluding
costs of services contracted out and temporary service costs.
(B) Supplies, equipment and the costs of services contracted out.
(C) Special payments.
(D) Capital construction.
(E) Capital outlay.
(F) Debt service.
(b) For each category described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection, the budget shall show actual
expenditures for the prior biennium and estimated expenditures for the current biennium.
(c) As supplemental information  to the budget, the Governor shall include an estimate of the
projected costs of  continuing currently authorized programs in the next biennium. The estimate shall
include, but is not limited to the projected costs of:
(A) Removing one-time expenditures;
(B) Program phase-ins and phase-outs;
(C) Personnel expenses compared to  existing compensation plan agreements, including position
vacancy experience calculations;
(D) Inflation for services, supplies and medical costs;
(E) Transfers between state funds or accounts;
(F) Mandated caseload changes; and
[2]
SB 637
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
(G) Debt service for previously issued debt.
(d) The budget shall show  the total increase in the cost of salaries and benefits for all state
positions.
(7) The Governor’s budget shall include:
(a) The total number of positions and full-time equivalent positions included in the budget.
(b) The average vacancy rate in the present biennium.
(c) The number of  permanent, full-time equivalent vacancies as of July 1 of even-numbered years.
(8) The Governor’s budget shall include  computations showing budget figures as a percentage
of the total General Fund, federal fund, fee or other source category, as may be appropriate.
(9) The Governor’s budget shall include,  in a format that provides side-by-side comparison with
the State Debt Policy Advisory Commission report of net debt capacity, a six-year forecast,  by debt
type and repayment source, of:
(a) That portion  of the capital construction program required to be reported by ORS 291.224 that
will be financed by debt issuance.
(b) The acquisition of equipment or technology in excess of  $500,000 that will be financed by
debt issuance.
(c) Other state agency debt issuance for grant or loan purposes.
(10) The Governor’s budget shall include the outcomes-based  budgeting information required by
ORS 291.217 (2) and (3).
(11) The Governor’s budget  shall include recommendations regarding available funds that could
be used to make lump sum payments to  the Public Employees Retirement System under ORS 238.229.
(12) The Governor’s  budget shall include a narrative summarizing the racial impact statements
required under ORS 291.206.
(13) The Governor’s budget shall include the estimate  and recommendations required by
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
[3]