Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 195.505 is amended to read:
195.505. (1) A policy developed pursuant to  ORS 195.500 shall conform, but is not limited, to the
following  provisions.
(2) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Established” means having been continuously occupied for at least 72 hours.
(b) “Personal property” means any  item that can reasonably be identified as belonging to an
individual and that has apparent value or utility.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, at least 72 hours before removing
homeless individuals from an established camping site, law enforcement officials shall post a  written
notice, in English and Spanish,  at all entrances to the camping site to the extent that the entrances
can reasonably be identified.
(4)(a) When a 72-hour notice is posted,  law enforcement officials shall inform the local agency
that delivers social services to homeless individuals as to where the notice has been posted.
(b) The local agency may arrange for outreach workers to visit the  camping site that is subject
to the notice to assess the need for social service assistance in arranging shelter  and other assist-
ance.
(5)(a) All personal property at the camping site that  remains unclaimed after removal shall be
given to a law enforcement official, a local agency that delivers  social services to homeless indi-
viduals, an  outreach worker, a local agency official or a person authorized to issue a citation de-
scribed in subsection (10) of this section, whether  notice is required under subsection (3) of this
section or not.
(b) The unclaimed personal property must be stored:
(A) For property removed from camping sites in counties other than  Multnomah County, in a
facility located in the same community as the camping site from which it was removed.
(B) For property removed from camping sites in Multnomah County, in a facility  located within
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4453
HB 3483
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
six blocks of a public transit station.
(c) Items that have no  apparent value or utility or are in an insanitary condition may be im-
mediately discarded upon removal of the homeless individuals from the camping site.
(d) Weapons, controlled substances other than prescription medication and items  that appear to
be either stolen or evidence of a crime shall be given to or retained by law enforcement officials.
(6) The written notice required under subsection (3) of this section must state, at a minimum:
(a) Where unclaimed personal property will be stored;
(b) A phone number that individuals may call to find out where the property will be stored; or
(c) If a permanent storage location has not yet been determined,  the address and phone number
of an agency that will have the information when available.
(7)(a) The unclaimed personal property shall be stored in an orderly  fashion, keeping items that
belong to an individual together to the extent that ownership can reasonably be determined.
(b) The property shall be stored for a minimum of 30 days during which it shall be reasonably
available to any individual claiming ownership. Any  personal property that remains unclaimed after
30 days may be disposed of or donated to a corporation described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 2020.
(8) Following the  removal of homeless individuals from a camping site on public property, the
law enforcement officials, local agency officials and outreach workers may meet to assess  the notice
and removal policy, to discuss whether  the removals are occurring in a humane and just manner and
to determine if any changes are needed in the policy.
(9)(a) The 72-hour notice requirement under subsection (3) of this section does not apply:
(A) When there are grounds for law enforcement officials to believe that illegal activities  other
than camping are occurring at [ an established ] a camping site.
(B) In the event  of an exceptional emergency at [ an established ] a camping site, including, but
not limited to, possible site  contamination by hazardous materials, a public health emergency or
other immediate danger to human life or safety.
(b) If a funeral service is scheduled with less than 72 hours’ notice  at a cemetery at which there
is a camping site, or a camping site is [ established] set up  at the cemetery less than  72 hours before
the scheduled service, the written notice required under subsection (3) of this section may  be posted
at least 24 hours before removing homeless individuals from the camping site.
(10) A person authorized  to issue a citation for unlawful camping under state law, administrative
rule or city or county ordinance may not issue the citation if the  citation would be issued within
200 feet of  a notice required under subsection (3) of this section and within two hours before or after
the notice was posted.
(11) Any law or policy of a city or county that is more specific or  offers greater protections to
homeless individuals subject to removal from an  established camping site preempts contrary pro-
visions of this section.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]