Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Government Ethics Commission shall study  public meetings.
The commission shall submit a report in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and may in-
clude recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assem-
bly related to rules no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 274