Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Disaster Response Assistance Matching Fund is  established
in the  State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The Oregon Disaster
Response Assistance Matching Fund consists of  moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited
or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly  or otherwise. Moneys in the fund are
continuously appropriated to the Oregon Military Department, for  the Office of Emergency
Management, for the purposes specified in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) When the receipt of federal grants or other federal aid related to disaster  response
is conditioned on the contribution of  matching funds by the recipient, the office may provide
grants from the fund to local governments to be used to contribute such matching funds.
(3) The office may provide grants from the fund to local governments in order to  assist
or support disaster response efforts.
(4) The office may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
(5) As used in this section, “local government” has the meaning given that  term in ORS
174.116.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 277