Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 822.250 is amended to read:
822.250. (1) The State Board of Towing is established [ within the Department of Transportation ].
(2) The State Board of Towing consists of nine members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(a) One tower who holds a towing business certificate  issued under ORS 822.205 and who re-
presents a city in Oregon with a population of 100,000 or more;
(b) One tower who holds a towing business  certificate issued under ORS 822.205 and who re-
presents a city in Oregon with a population of less than 100,000;
(c) One tower who holds a towing business certificate issued under ORS 822.205 and  who has
specialized knowledge in towing equipment and vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of more
than 44,000 pounds;
(d) One tower who  holds a towing business certificate issued under ORS 822.205 and who has
specialized knowledge in towing vehicles with a gross vehicle  weight rating of 26,000 pounds or less;
(e) One member who represents the insurance industry;
(f) One member from a tow program within the Department of State Police;
(g) One member who is a chief of police or a county sheriff;
(h) One member who is a member of the public; and
(i) One member who is a consumer advocate.
(3) All members of the board must be residents of Oregon.
(4) The term of office of each member of the board is four years, but a member  serves at the
pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term of  a member, the Governor shall appoint
a successor whose term begins on July 1 next following. A member is  eligible for reappointment. If
there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment to become immediately
effective for the unexpired term.
(5) A member of the board is entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS  292.495.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 822.270 is amended to read:
822.270. (1) The State Board of Towing  Account is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3389
HB 3186
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
(2) The account consists of the following:
(a) Moneys collected from fees imposed under ORS 822.285.
(b) Moneys appropriated to the account by the Legislative Assembly.
(c) Moneys from any other source.
(3) Moneys  in the account are continuously appropriated to the [ Department of Transportation ]
State Board of Towing  to carry out the provisions of ORS 822.250 to 822.290 and 822.995.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 822.285 is amended to read:
822.285. (1) In carrying out its investigative and enforcement duties,  functions and powers, and
notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Board of  Towing may procure services and
award a contract for the personal services of  a subject matter expert, on a case-by-case basis, in any
manner deemed practical or convenient. The price of such contracts, including any amendments, may
not exceed $25,000.
(2) If the board has reason to believe that any person has been engaged or is engaging in any
violation of ORS 98.853, 98.854, 98.856, 98.858, 181A.350, 822.200, 822.215, 822.225, 822.230,  822.235,
822.250 to  822.290, 822.605 or 822.995 or any rule adopted under those statutes, or any order issued
by the board, the board may, without bond,  bring suit in the name and on behalf of the State of
Oregon in the circuit court of any county of this state to enjoin the acts or  practices and to enforce
compliance with ORS  98.853, 98.854, 98.856, 98.858, 181A.350, 822.200, 822.215, 822.225, 822.230,
822.235, 822.250 to 822.290, 822.605 or 822.995 or any rule adopted  under those statutes, or any order
issued by the board. Upon a proper showing, a permanent  or temporary injunction, restraining order
or writ of mandamus shall be granted.
(3) The board, by  rule, may impose a fee on any person holding or applying for a towing business
certificate. The amount of the fee shall be established to recover expenses  incurred by the board in
carrying  out  ORS 822.250 to 822.290 and 822.995. Any fees collected under this subsection shall be
deposited into the State Board of Towing Account established under ORS 822.270.
(4) The Department of Transportation shall provide office facilities, administrative sup-
port and technical assistance to the board.
[2]