Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall conduct a study  of the
benefits and feasibility of establishing a state office of community livability to foster  volun-
teer cleanup efforts in communities in this state. No later than September 15, 2022, the de-
partment shall submit a report of the  findings of the study to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to  economic development in the manner provided under ORS
192.245.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2056