Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $20,000,000, for the purpose of reducing the backlog of untested
sexual assault forensic evidence kits in the possession of the department.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2974