Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act, “Columbia corridor flood  safety
project”  means  a project to upgrade aging flood safety infrastructure along the Columbia
Slough and lower Columbia River in Multnomah County, including, but not limited to:
(1) Upgrading levees;
(2) Improving flood walls, pumps, pump stations, pipes and drains and conveyance; and
(3) Floodplain restoration and resilience.
SECTION 2.
(1) For  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Business Development Department,  the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount  that produces not more than $20 million
in net proceeds for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional
amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section shall  be transferred to the
Columbia Corridor Flood Safety Fund, established under section 5 of  this 2025 Act, to be used
in accordance with section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Completion of the Columbia corridor flood safety project will improve flood safety  and
environmental resilience and maintain federal accreditation of the flood  safety system,
maintaining the Columbia corridor as the state’s largest business and industrial district.
(b) The issuance of lottery bonds will support federal and local funding for the project.
(c) The investments made possible by sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act will  support the
operations and prosperity of businesses, as well as protecting  critical infrastructure and fa-
cilities of economic importance to the entire  state, such as Portland International Airport
and residential areas.
(4) Lottery bonds authorized under this section may not be issued after June 30, 2037.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 838
HB 2726
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 3.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, at the request  of the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount  that produces not more than $25 million
in net proceeds for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional
amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery  bonds issued under this section shall be transferred to the
Columbia Corridor Flood Safety Fund, established under section 5 of  this 2025 Act, to be used
in accordance with section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public  education or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Completion of the Columbia corridor flood safety project will improve flood safety  and
environmental resilience and  maintain federal accreditation of the flood safety system,
maintaining the Columbia corridor as the state’s largest business and industrial district.
(b) The issuance of lottery bonds will support federal and local funding for the project.
(c) The investments  made possible by sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act will support the
operations and prosperity of businesses,  as well as protecting critical infrastructure and fa-
cilities of economic importance to the entire  state, such as Portland International Airport
and residential areas.
(4) Lottery bonds authorized under this section may not be issued after June 30, 2037.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop and imple-
ment a grant program under which the department shall award grants to the urban  flood
safety and water quality district for payment of the expenses of the Columbia corridor  flood
safety project.
(2)(a) The department shall  prescribe a process for the district to propose, and the de-
partment to approve or reject, incremental stages of the project.  A proposal must include a
budget document of the forecasted expenditures for  the stage of the project to which the
proposal relates.
(b) The department may not  approve any proposal if the project expenses would exceed
the amount of lottery bond proceeds available for disbursement as of  the effective date of
the respective grant agreement for that stage.
(3) Once a stage of the project  is approved, the department and the district shall enter
into a  grant agreement for that stage, including the amount of project expenses for which
bond proceeds shall be disbursed.
(4)(a) The grant agreements between the department and the district shall:
(A) Establish  triggers for the incremental distribution of bond proceeds based on nego-
tiated measures of progress in  completion of the stage of the project that are consistent with
prudent financial practices reflecting fiduciary stewardship of public resources.
(B) Require the district to:
(i) Return grant moneys received and reimburse the  State of Oregon for expenditures
made pursuant to sections 1 to 5 of this  2025 Act if the Director of the Oregon Business
Development Department determines that the stage of the project  is not substantially com-
pleted by July 1, 2037; or
(ii) Provide evidence satisfactory to the director  that the district has obtained a letter
[2]
HB 2726
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of credit, entered into a surety bond agreement,  or provided other similar financial assur-
ance, to guarantee the return of grant moneys and reimbursement for expenditures  required
under this subparagraph.
(b) Paragraph (a)(B)(i) of this subsection does not apply if the stage of the project  is not
substantially completed:
(A) Due to an act of God; or
(B) Because the State  of Oregon failed to distribute one or more of the increments of
bond proceeds under section 2 or 3 of this 2025 Act.
(c) Paragraph (b)(B) of this subsection does not apply if the district failed to:
(A) Take action to trigger the incremental distribution of the bond proceeds; or
(B) Meet permitting standards required to complete the stage of the project to which the
incremental distribution relates.
(5) Prior to the distribution of grant moneys, the district shall provide  an updated budget
document including the forecasted expenditures for the stage of the project to which the
grant agreement relates and verify and certify  to the director that the district will receive
the approvals and permits, or has reasonable assurance of obtaining the approvals and per-
mits, required under ORS 196.600 to 196.921 and all permits  required at the local, state and
federal levels for the stage of the project to which the agreement relates.
(6) Upon execution of the grant  agreement, the department shall request the State
Treasurer to issue bond proceeds in accordance with section 2 or 3 of this 2025 Act.
(7) The department shall disburse the  grant moneys to the district pursuant to the
agreement as soon as the bond proceeds are deposited in the Columbia Corridor Flood Safety
Fund established under section 5 of this 2025 Act.
(8) The State of  Oregon and its agencies and departments are not liable to any lenders,
vendors or contractors with which the district has entered into  an agreement for any stage
of the project for any action or omission under sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
(9) By receipt of any part  of net proceeds of lottery bonds issued in accordance with
sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act, the district agrees to indemnify  the state to the fullest
extent permitted by law for liability the state  incurs in connection with any borrowing by the
district for any stage of the project.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Columbia  Corridor Flood Safety Fund is established separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Columbia Corridor Flood Safety  Fund
shall be credited to the fund. The moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Business Development Department for the purposes described in subsection  (2) of
this section.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys transferred to the fund under sections 3 and 4 of this
2025 Act and interest earnings on moneys in the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are available to the department for disbursement to the urban
flood safety and water quality district  for the Columbia corridor flood safety project to pay
for:
(a) Project costs;
(b) The nonfederal cost share, or the nonprivate cost share,  of expenses of the project
up to the amounts specified in sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act; and
(c) Bond-related costs.
[3]