Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at the request of the State Parks
and Recreation Department, the  State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursu-
ant to ORS 390.060 to 390.067 in an amount that produces $100 million in  net proceeds and
interest earnings for  the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an addi-
tional amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds  of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the Oregon Parks for the Future Fund established under ORS
390.067 to be used for purposes specified in ORS 390.067.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public education and  restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) The COVID-19 pandemic and related  closures devastated funding for outdoor recre-
ation and tourism in Oregon, revealing deficiencies in current funding, management and op-
erational structure.
(b) The economy and well-being  of the people of Oregon are in large part dependent upon
proper utilization of the state’s outdoor recreation resources for the physical,  spiritual, cul-
tural, scientific and other benefits that such resources afford.
(c) The acquisition, development,  improvement, upgrading, preservation and expansion
of the capacity of  facilities of the system of state parks, including parks, park facilities,
ocean shores,  scenic waterways, trails and historic sites in this state, do and will accomplish
the purpose of creating jobs and furthering economic development in this state by:
(A) Increasing the capacity, usefulness and attractive  qualities of public recreational fa-
cilities, thereby promoting travel and tourism in Oregon;
(B) Generating business for and supporting the operations and prosperity of businesses
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 647
HB 2125
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
located in the areas of public recreational facilities; and
(C) Creating employment opportunities within  this state through the funding of develop-
ment and improvement projects on which workers will be employed.
SECTION 2.
(1)(a) The State Parks and Recreation Department, in consultation with  the
Oregon Tourism Commission and other relevant state agencies, shall conduct a study of  the
impact of lost  revenue during the COVID-19 pandemic on outdoor recreation and tourism in
this state.
(b) The study must  include recommendations for funding and operational efficiencies that
can be gained through innovation and increased collaboration among outdoor recreation  and
tourism providers.
(c) The study  must identify and recommend a model for organizing outdoor recreation
and tourism service delivery to maximize operational  efficiencies and improve experiences
for individuals engaging in outdoor recreation in this state.
(2) The department shall  submit a report with the results of the study and any recom-
mendations for legislation to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to
natural resources on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]