Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 414.609, as amended by section 10, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
414.609. (1) A  coordinated care organization that contracts with the Oregon Health Authority
must maintain a network of providers, including but not  limited to addiction treatment providers,
sufficient in numbers and areas of practice and geographically distributed in a  manner to ensure
that the health services provided under the contract are reasonably accessible to members.
(2)(a) In any geographic area served by a coordinated care organization where the  au-
thority identifies a medical assistance care or service for which there is limited  access, the
coordinated care  organization shall contract with a number of providers of the care or ser-
vice that are  located outside of the geographic area sufficient to satisfy the requirements
of subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The authority shall identify the medical assistance care or services to which there is
limited access  in each geographic area served by one or more coordinated care organizations
in this state, including but not limited to geographic areas where there is limited access  to
acute psychiatric care for children and for adolescents.
[(2)] (3) A member may transfer from one organization to another organization  no more than
once during each enrollment period.
SECTION 2. The amendments  to ORS 414.609 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to con-
tracts between a coordinated care organization  and the Oregon Health Authority entered
into, amended or renewed on or after the operative date specified  in section 3 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments to  ORS 414.609 by section 1 of this 2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2731
HB 2223
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by the amendments to ORS 414.609 by section 1 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]