Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 660.300 to
660.420.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “commercial driver license” has the meaning
given that term in ORS 801.207.
(2) There is  established in the Higher Education Coordinating Commission a program to
promote workforce development initiatives in the trucking  industry through partnering with
local workforce development boards  to provide training, education and wraparound supports
and services for individuals seeking to obtain  the necessary skills and specialized licensing
to secure a job in the trucking industry.
(3) The goals of the program are to:
(a) Address growing workforce shortages in the trucking industry  and ensure continued
reliability of supply chains by increasing the number of commercial driver license holders  in
this state.
(b) Support economic  growth by ensuring that local businesses have access to a skilled
trucking workforce.
(c) Provide pathways to sustainable careers  to individuals from communities that are
typically underrepresented in the trucking industry.
(d) Reduce financial and logistical barriers to attaining commercial  driver license train-
ing.
(4) The commission shall award  grants to local workforce development boards to admin-
ister the program. In administering the  program, the local workforce development boards
shall:
(a) Increase  the availability of commercial driver license training programs throughout
the state with an emphasis on increasing access for individuals in rural communities.
(b) Provide financial assistance for individuals who participate in commercial driver li-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4025
HB 3826
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
cense training programs, including assistance to cover costs of tuition, training and  trans-
portation.
(c) Provide wraparound supports and services that are necessary to facilitate engagement
in the trucking industry, including but  not limited to vehicle repair assistance, housing as-
sistance and career counseling.
(d) Consult with relevant stakeholders, including trucking industry  employers, commu-
nity leaders and commercial driver license training providers, to establish program guidelines
and best practices for:
(A) Supporting targeted recruitment and engagement efforts to  attract and recruit indi-
viduals from underrepresented communities experiencing financial  hardships or limited ac-
cess to career training programs; and
(B) Facilitating partnerships between  commercial driver license training providers and
employers to provide job placement services for individuals who complete commercial driver
license training provided under the program.
(5) The commission shall establish criteria and standards by  which local workforce de-
velopment boards may apply to receive a grant under this section.
(6) A local workforce development board that receives funding under  this section shall
report to the commission on the outcomes of the program administered under this section,
including:
(a) The number of individuals who participated in  and completed a commercial driver li-
cense training program;
(b) The job placement and retention  rates of individuals who completed commercial
driver license training through the program;
(c) The impact on reducing the shortage of truck drivers in this state, if any; and
(d) Quantifiable data on the how the provision of wraparound  services contributed to
successful completion of commercial driver license training programs by program  partic-
ipants.
SECTION 3.
No later than September 15, 2026, the Higher Education Coordinating Com-
mission shall submit a report to the interim committees relating to  labor and business, in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the  outcomes of the program established under
section 2 of this 2025  Act, including information reported by a grant recipient, and any rec-
ommendations for legislation.
SECTION 4. Not later than 60 days following the effective date of this 2025 Act, the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall distribute the funds specifically appropri-
ated to the commission  under section 5 of this 2025 Act to local workforce development
boards to administer the program established under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $5,000,000 for distribution to local workforce
development boards to administer the program established under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]