Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 459.005 to
459.437.
SECTION 2. (1) The  Legislative Assembly finds and declares that short-term and long-
term solid waste disposal in the Willamette Valley is a matter of statewide concern.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of ORS chapter 92, 195,  197 or 215, any statewide land
use planning goal, rule of the Land Conservation and Development Commission or  local land
use regulation, zoning  ordinance, regional framework plan, functional plan or comprehensive
plan, or any county ordinance, a county shall approve a land use application for an integrated
materials and energy recovery facility if the facility will be sited on land that is:
(a) Owned by a local government unit;
(b) Located in the Willamette Valley, as defined in ORS 215.010;
(c) Located outside of any urban growth boundary; and
(d) Zoned to allow for industrial, light industrial or public facilities uses.
(3)(a) A  local government may approve or deny an application for a facility under this
section without a hearing. Whether a hearing is held, the approval  or denial is not a land
use decision and is subject to review only under ORS 34.010 to 34.100.
(b) A reviewing court shall  award attorney fees to a county, and any intervening appli-
cant, that prevails on the appeal of a county’s approval under this section.
(4) As used  in this section, “integrated materials and energy recovery facility” means a
facility that includes equipment for mixed waste processing, sorting lines  for processing
commingled recycling and an anaerobic  digester to produce biogas from diverted organic
waste.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4897
HB 3971
1
2
on its passage.
[2]