Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 496.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section,  “native fish” and “naturally produced” have the
meaning given those terms in ORS 496.430.
(2) Notwithstanding  any other provision of the wildlife laws, and except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section,  the State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall manage
indigenous stocks of salmon and steelhead in a  watershed, whether naturally produced or
hatchery produced, as a single, integrated native  fish population in accordance with ORS
496.012.
(3) The  department may manage naturally produced and hatchery produced indigenous
salmon or steelhead in a watershed as  separate populations only as strictly necessary to
satisfy the requirements of the federal Endangered Species Act.
(4) The department shall submit a report, in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245, to the
committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to natural resources
before managing salmon or steelhead stocks pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1402