Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Housing and Community Services Department shall study issues related
to housing and shall present the results of the study in  a report to an appropriate committee
or interim committee of the  Legislative Assembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245
on or before September 15, 2023.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2022 Act is repealed on December 31, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 25