Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 12 of this 2024 Act are added to and made a part  of ORS
chapter 285B.
SECTION 2. Findings. (1) Traded sector industries  are the foundation of state and re-
gional economic development strategies for long-term job creation  and prosperity. Because
traded sector jobs typically pay higher than average wages and generate higher than  average
income tax revenues, such jobs play an important role in supporting critical state services.
(2) Industrial development that provides new traded sector jobs reinforces the economies
of local and regional communities and contributes to the economic recovery of the State  of
Oregon.
(3) There is a shortage of market-ready industrial land  in this state. Public and private
project sponsors have limited financial tools to facilitate development of significant  and
complex industrial land that is appropriate for traded sector industrial use.
(4) Public assistance is necessary to overcome development-related constraints and  to
incentivize industrial land development in this state.
(5) The purpose of sections 2 to 12 of this 2024  Act is to provide financial assistance to
project sponsors for  development and planning projects related to industrial land develop-
ment, in an amount determined on a case-by-case  basis by the Oregon Business Development
Department.
SECTION 3. Definitions. As used in sections 2 to 12 of this 2024 Act:
(1) “Administrative costs” includes, but is not limited to, the direct and indirect costs
incurred by the Oregon Business Development Department for:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 286
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Investigating and processing applications submitted under section 8 of this 2024 Act;
(b) Negotiating agreements for the purposes of sections 2 to 12 of this 2024 Act;
(c) Monitoring the use of moneys provided to project sponsors under sections 2 to 12 of
this 2024 Act;
(d) Closing a project; and
(e) Providing financial assistance to a project sponsor.
(2) “Brownfield” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285A.185.
(3)(a) “Development project” means a project for the acquisition,  improvement, con-
struction, demolition or redevelopment of publicly or privately  owned utilities, buildings,
land, transportation facilities  or other facilities that assist the economic and community
development of a municipality.
(b) “Development project” includes planning project activities that are necessary or use-
ful to a development project as determined by the department.
(4) “Eligible project” means a development project or a planning project.
(5) “Environmental action” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285A.188.
(6) “Industrial land” means land planned and zoned for industrial use that:
(a) Is suitable for new industrial uses, or the expansion of existing industrial uses, that
can provide significant additional employment in Oregon;
(b) Has land characteristics that provide significant competitive advantages that are  dif-
ficult or impossible to replicate; and
(c) Has access to transportation and freight  infrastructure, including, but not limited to,
rail, port, airport, multimodal  freight or transshipment facilities and other major transpor-
tation facilities or routes.
(7)(a) “Industrial use” means a use that generates income  from the production, handling
or distribution of goods or services, including goods or services in the traded sector.
(b) “Industrial use” includes, but is not limited  to, manufacturing, assembly, fabrication,
processing, storage, logistics,  warehousing, importation, distribution, transshipment and re-
search and development.
(8) “Planning project” means:
(a) A project related to a potential development project for  preliminary and final land use
planning and engineering;
(b) A survey, land investigation or environmental action;
(c) A financial, technical or other feasibility report, study or plan; or
(d) Any activity that the department determines to  be necessary or useful in planning for
a potential development project.
(9) “Private owner” means a private business  entity or property owner that has entered
into an agreement with a local jurisdiction for the development  of public infrastructure to
serve a private site.
(10) “Project sponsor” means:
(a) A public entity or private owner of industrial land that is investing in the  preparation
of the land for industrial use by a third party; or
(b) A public entity that has entered into  a development or other agreement with the
private owner of industrial land to prepare the land for industrial use.
(11) “Public entity” means:
(a) A city or county in Oregon;
[2]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A port formed under ORS 777.005 to 777.725;
(c) The Port of Portland created by ORS 778.010;
(d) The tribal council of a federally recognized Indian tribe in this state; or
(e) An airport district established under ORS chapter 838.
SECTION 4.
Financial assistance for development projects.  (1)(a) The Oregon Business
Development Department may provide financial assistance to  a project sponsor, for allowable
costs expended for an industrial land development project, from moneys in the Industrial Site
Loan Fund established under section 12 of this 2024 Act, in accordance with this section.
(b) The financial assistance may be  in the form of a loan to the project sponsor or the
purchase of bonds issued by the project sponsor.
(c) The department shall  determine the amount of the financial assistance on a case-by-
case basis.
(2) Financial assistance may be provided only with respect to a  development project that
is:
(a) Directly owned and operated by the project sponsor; or
(b) The subject of a management contract or an operating agreement to which the
project sponsor is a party.
(3)(a) If a development project consists solely of  the purchase or acquisition of land, fi-
nancial assistance may be provided only if the land is:
(A) Identified in the applicable land use or capital plan as necessary for  a potential in-
dustrial land development project; or
(B) Zoned solely for industrial use.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, financial assistance may not be
denied under this subsection solely because the costs of the development project include  the
costs of acquiring off-site property for purposes that are  directly related to the development
project, including, but not limited to, wetland mitigation.
(4) Financial assistance provided to a project sponsor under this section may not be used
for:
(a) The payment of:
(A) A penalty or fine; or
(B) Environmental remediation activities conducted at an industrial land site that is
listed or proposed to be listed as a national priority pursuant to the  Comprehensive Envi-
ronmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (42 U.S.C. 9605), for which the
project sponsor, or any party to  the loan agreement entered into pursuant to section 9 of
this 2024 Act to which the project sponsor is a party, is liable under 42 U.S.C. 9607;
(b) Retirement of debt;
(c) Projects that  primarily focus on relocating business or economic activity from one
part of the state to another, except  in cases where the business or economic activity would
otherwise be located outside Oregon; or
(d) Ongoing operations or maintenance expenses of any person.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to administer  and implement the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 5.
Forgivable loans for  planning projects.  (1)(a) The Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department may  make a forgivable loan to a project sponsor, for allowable costs re-
lated to a planning project, from moneys in the Industrial Site Loan Fund established  under
[3]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section 12 of this 2024 Act, in accordance with this section.
(b) The department shall determine  the amount of a forgivable loan on a case-by-case
basis.
(2) The department may not expend in any biennium more than one  percent of the value
of the Industrial Site Loan Fund for planning projects.
(3) A planning project eligible for a forgivable loan under this section may:
(a) Be a stand-alone project that is not intended to lead to a development project.
(b) Be a project that is intended to lead to a development project.
(c) Include planning or investigation for an environmental action on a brownfield.
SECTION 6.
Other forms of financial assistance. The Oregon Business Development De-
partment may directly or indirectly expend or loan moneys in the Industrial Site  Loan Fund
established under section 12 of this 2024 Act or extend credit to:
(1) Provide to project sponsors of an industrial land eligible project  any form of financial
assistance that the department  considers appropriate, including the refinancing of temporary
project financing.
(2) Purchase goods or services related  to an eligible project on behalf of the project
sponsor.
(3)(a) Finance guaranty agreements that  are issued to guarantee any portion of the ob-
ligation of a project sponsor to finance an industrial land development  project and that are
not sold to the State of Oregon.
(b) Guaranty agreements under this subsection shall be payable solely  from moneys in
the fund and shall not constitute a debt or obligation of the State of Oregon.
(c) The department may, on  behalf of the state, establish a special account in the fund
and commit to  deposit into the special account specified portions of current and future
moneys credited to the fund.
(d) The  commitments shall be made by rule of the department and shall constitute
covenants of the state for the benefit of the owners of obligations guaranteed  by the state
pursuant to this section.
SECTION 7. Allowable costs. For purposes of sections 2 to 12 of this 2024 Act:
(1) The allowable costs of a development project include:
(a) Property acquisition and assembly costs associated with creating large  development
parcels, including any easement or right of way directly related to and necessary for  a de-
velopment project.
(b) Transportation improvements such as access roads, rail spurs and sidings, marine
facility access, airport facilities necessary to provide industrial land access, intersections,
turning lanes, signals, sidewalks, curbs, transit stops and storm drains.
(c) Infrastructure for providing broadband, electric power,  natural gas, water and sewer
service.
(d) Natural resource mitigation.
(e) Land grading activities.
(f) Environmental remediation and mitigation activities to address brownfield issues,  in
accordance with state and federally approved remediation plans.
(g) Interest-carrying costs incurred by a project sponsor  for amounts borrowed to de-
velop industrial land and financing costs, including capitalized interest.
(h) Direct project management costs.
[4]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Costs of consultant services and expenses.
(j) Construction costs and expenses.
(k) Costs  of acquiring off-site property for purposes directly related to a development
project, including, but not limited to, wetland mitigation.
(L) Other costs  that the Oregon Business Development Department determines to be
necessary or useful for the project.
(2) The allowable costs of a planning project include:
(a) Necessary planning, engineering, legal and other professional services associated with:
(A) The preparation of applications for local, state and federal permits  and related ad-
ministrative costs.
(B) Carrying out the project and related administrative costs.
(b) Other costs that the department determines to be necessary  or useful for the project.
SECTION 8.
Application process for financial assistance. (1)(a) A project sponsor seeking
financial assistance from the Industrial Site Loan Fund must  submit an application in the
manner and form required by the Oregon Business Development Department.
(b) At a minimum, each application must include:
(A) The name and nature of the project sponsor;
(B) A description of the nature of the project;
(C) The provisions of sections 2 to 12 of this 2024 Act  under which the project is eligible
for financial assistance;
(D) The proposed activities to be funded;
(E) A description and estimate of the allowable costs to be incurred for the project; and
(F) All other information and documentation that the department requires.
(2)(a) The department shall review all timely  and complete applications and approve or
reject each application in accordance with rules adopted by the department.
(b) The department shall notify each applicant of its decision. The rejection of  an appli-
cation may not be appealed.
SECTION 9.
Agreement for financial assistance. (1) Upon approval of an application
submitted under section 8  of this 2024 Act, the Oregon Business Development Department,
notwithstanding any other provision of law or any restriction on indebtedness  contained in
a charter, and the project sponsor of the eligible project  to which the application relates may
enter into an agreement for  financial assistance based on the application. The department
shall determine the maximum amount of financial assistance based on a  reasonable and
prudent expectation of the ability of the project sponsor to repay the financial assistance.
(2) An agreement entered into pursuant to this section must include:
(a) A provision that the obligation of  the state under the agreement is contingent on the
availability of moneys in  the Industrial Site Loan Fund for the financial assistance agreed
upon.
(b) A provision that grants the department a lien on, or a security interest  in, collateral
to secure repayment of a loan made to, or bonds issued by, the project sponsor, in a  form
and amount determined by the department and specified in the agreement.
(c) Provisions that the department considers necessary to ensure expenditure of the
funds for the purposes set forth in the approved application.
(d) Any other provision the department considers necessary or appropriate.
(3) For an eligible project owned by a public entity, a  loan agreement entered into pur-
[5]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
suant to this  section must be authorized by an ordinance, resolution or order adopted by the
governing body of the project sponsor.
(4) In  making a determination to enter into a loan agreement with the project sponsor
for an industrial  land development project, the department shall consider the reasonableness
of the project sponsor’s  estimated costs to prepare the land for industrial use, including, but
not limited to, allowable costs for land preparation.
(5) Financial assistance approved by the department for  an eligible project shall be paid,
in accordance with the terms of the agreement entered into pursuant  to this section, from
the Industrial Site Loan Fund established under section 12 of this 2024 Act.
(6) In assisting project sponsors with eligible projects, and  to meet the goals of sections
2 to 12 of this  2024 Act, the department and other state agencies shall cooperate to the
maximum extent possible with each other and federal agencies.
SECTION 10.
Repayment. (1) A project sponsor  may repay financial assistance provided
for an eligible project under sections 2 to 12 of this 2024 Act  from any source, including, but
not limited to:
(a) Revenues generated by the eligible project, including special assessment revenues.
(b) Amounts withheld under section 11 of this 2024 Act.
(c) The general fund of the project sponsor.
(2) A plan for  repayment to the Industrial Site Loan Fund of financial assistance provided
for an industrial land development project:
(a) Shall provide for  repayment by the project sponsor of the financial assistance with
interest to begin no later than seven years after the date of project completion  or at such
other time as the Oregon Business Development Department may provide.
(b) Shall provide for  such evidence of debt assurance of, and security for, repayment by
the project sponsor as is considered necessary by the department.
(c) Shall set  forth a schedule of payments and the period of the loan, not to exceed the
useful life of the contracted project or 30 years from the date of  the project completion,
whichever is less, and the manner of determining when loan payments are delinquent.
(d) May  provide for a reasonable extension of the time for making any repayment as set
forth under paragraph (c) of this subsection in emergency  or hardship circumstances, if ap-
proved by the department.
(e) Shall include repayment  of interest that accrues during any period of delay in repay-
ment authorized under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The repayment of accrued  interest
may be in varying amounts.
(f) Shall allow for other forms of payment than principal and interest payments on  loans,
in accordance with rules adopted by the department.
SECTION 11.
Breach; default. (1) If a project sponsor fails to comply with an agreement
entered into under section 9 of this 2024  Act, the Oregon Business Development Department
may seek appropriate legal remedies to secure any repayment of obligations due from the
project sponsor to the Industrial Site Loan Fund.
(2)(a) If a project sponsor defaults on payments of  obligations to the fund under sections
2 to 12  of this 2024 Act, the State of Oregon may withhold any amounts otherwise due to the
project sponsor to offset against the obligations. The department may  waive this right to
withhold.
(b) Moneys withheld under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be deposited in the fund
[6]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and shall be used to repay any account in the fund from which moneys were expended to  pay
obligations upon which the project sponsor defaulted.
SECTION 12.
Industrial Site Loan  Fund. (1)(a) The Industrial Site Loan Fund is estab-
lished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned
by the Industrial Site Loan Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(b) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department for the purposes set forth in sections 2 to 12 of this 2024 Act.  In addition,
the department may finance  administrative costs incurred by the department under sections
2 to 12 of this 2024 Act.
(c) The department may establish other  accounts within the fund for the payment of
project costs, reserves, debt service payments, credit enhancement, administrative costs  and
operation expenses or any other purpose necessary to carry out sections 2 to 12 of this 2024
Act.
(2) Moneys in the fund may be invested as provided by  ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and the
earnings from the investments shall be credited to the account in the fund designated by  the
department.
(3) The fund shall consist of moneys credited to the fund, including:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys transferred to the fund by the department;
(c) Earnings on moneys in the fund;
(d) Repayment of financial  assistance, including interest, under sections 10 and 11 of this
2024 Act;
(e) Moneys received from the federal, state or local governments; and
(f) Moneys from any other source, including, but not limited to, grants and gifts.
(4)(a) The department may commit moneys in the  fund, or reserve future income of the
fund, for expenditure in future years in accordance with this section.
(b) The department may commit moneys or reserve future income under  this subsection
only after:
(A) Allowing for contingencies; and
(B) Determining that there will be sufficient unobligated net moneys in the fund to make
the future payments, consistent with the requirements of this section.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 285B.627 is amended to read:
285B.627. (1) In consultation with  the Department of Revenue, the Oregon Business Development
Department shall establish and administer the Oregon Industrial Site Readiness Program. The  pur-
pose of the program is to:
(a) Enter into tax  reimbursement arrangements with qualified project sponsors pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section; or
(b) Provide loans, including  forgivable loans, to qualified project sponsors pursuant to subsection
(5) of this section.
(2)(a) Subject  to standards and procedures that the Oregon Business Development Department
shall establish by rule, the department shall  designate regionally significant industrial sites for
inclusion in the program.
(b) A regionally significant industrial site designated under this section must  be an industrial
site that is planned and zoned for industrial use.
(3) A project sponsor may apply to participate in the program by submitting an  application and
[7]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
development plan in writing in a form prescribed by the department by rule.
(4) The department shall establish by rule criteria and standards  for the qualification of project
sponsors to participate in the program.
(5) Upon qualification of a project sponsor under this section, and before [ July 1, 2023 ] De-
cember 31, 2034, the department may:
(a) Enter into  a tax reimbursement arrangement with the project sponsor pursuant to which the
project sponsor shall receive an amount equal  to 50 percent of the estimated incremental income tax
revenues generated by  an eligible employer per tax year, beginning with the first tax year following
the tax year in  which a project sponsor is qualified under this section, until the total investment
of the qualified project sponsor in the eligible site preparation costs,  including interest, established
under subsection (7) of this section has been recovered, at  which time the tax reimbursement ar-
rangement shall end; or
(b) Enter into a loan agreement with the project sponsor under  terms and conditions specified
and required by the department. In making  a determination to enter into a loan agreement with the
project sponsor, the department  shall consider the reasonableness of the project sponsor’s estimated
costs to prepare the site for industrial use, including  but not limited to eligible site preparation
costs established by the department pursuant to subsection (7) of this  section. The agreement may
specify that a portion of the loan may be  forgiven if the project sponsor enters into a contract with
an eligible employer to conduct a  business in the traded sector industry on a regionally significant
industrial site within seven years after the project sponsor was qualified under this section.
(6)(a) The total amount of the  loan that may be forgiven under subsection (5) of this section is
the lesser of:
(A) Fifty percent of the total cost of eligible site preparation costs; or
(B) Fifty  percent of the amount of the estimated incremental income tax revenues for the eligible
employer for the term of the loan.
(b) Loan forgiveness may not be allowed under subsection (5) of this section if any  portion of
the loan that would not  be forgiven would be repaid by the project sponsor with state funds received
from any source.
(7) The department shall establish, by rule, eligible site preparation costs  including, but not
limited to, some or all of the following:
(a) Acquisition and assembly costs associated with creating large development parcels.
(b) Transportation improvements such as  access roads, intersections, turning lanes, signals,
sidewalks, curbs, transit stops and storm drains.
(c) Water and sewer infrastructure.
(d) Natural resource mitigation.
(e) Site grading activities.
(f) Environmental remediation and mitigation activities to address brownfields  issues in accord-
ance with state and federally approved remediation plans.
(g) Planning, engineering  and administrative costs associated with applying for necessary local,
state and federal permits.
(h) Interest-carrying costs incurred by a project sponsor for amounts borrowed to  develop a re-
gionally significant industrial  site, not to exceed 20 percent of the total amount forgiven, if any,
under subsection (5) of this section.
(8) The total amount of tax reimbursement arrangements [ and loan amounts ] authorized under
this section may not exceed $10 million per year.
[8]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9) Funds received pursuant to  a tax reimbursement arrangement or a loan agreement under
subsection (5) of this section may not be used for the payment of:
(a) A penalty or fine; or
(b) Environmental remediation activities conducted at a regionally significant industrial site that
is listed or proposed to  be listed as a national priority pursuant to the Comprehensive Environ-
mental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of  1980 (42 U.S.C. 9605) for which the project
sponsor, eligible employer or any party to the tax reimbursement  arrangement or loan agreement
is liable under 42 U.S.C. 9607 at that regionally significant industrial site.
(10) The department shall adopt rules  to administer and implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 14.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $40,000,000 for
deposit in the Industrial Site Loan Fund established under section 12 of this 2024 Act. The
moneys may be used for any purpose for which moneys in the fund may be used.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 285C.050 is amended to read:
285C.050. As used in ORS 285C.050 to 285C.250, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Assessment date” and “assessment  year” have the meanings given those terms in ORS
308.007.
(2) “Authorized business firm” means an  eligible business firm that has been authorized under
ORS 285C.140.
(3) “Business firm” means a person operating  or conducting one or more trades or businesses,
a people’s utility district organized under ORS chapter 261  or a joint operating agency formed under
ORS chapter 262, but does not include any other governmental agency,  municipal corporation or
nonprofit corporation.
(4) “County average annual wage” means:
(a) The  most recently available average annual covered payroll for the county in which the en-
terprise zone is located, as determined by the Employment Department; or
(b) If the enterprise zone is located in more than one county, the highest county average  annual
wage as determined under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5)(a) “Electronic commerce” means engaging in :
(A) Commercial or retail transactions  predominantly over the Internet or a computer network,
utilizing the Internet as a platform for transacting  business, or facilitating the use of the Internet
by other persons for business transactions ; or [, and]
(B) Semiconductor-related development activities.
(b) “Electronic commerce”  may be further defined by  the Oregon Business Development De-
partment by rule.
(6) “Eligible business firm” means a firm engaged in an activity  described under ORS 285C.135
that may file an application for authorization under ORS 285C.140.
(7) “Employee” means a  person who works more than 32 hours per week, but does not include
a person with a temporary or seasonal job or a person hired solely to construct qualified property.
(8) “Enterprise zone”  means one of the 30 areas designated or terminated and redesignated by
order of the Governor under ORS 284.160 (1987  Replacement Part) before October 3, 1989, one of the
areas designated by the Director of the  Oregon Business Development Department under ORS
285C.080 before October 5, 2015, an area designated  under ORS 285C.065, a federal enterprise zone
area designated under ORS 285C.085, an area designated under ORS 285C.250  or a reservation en-
terprise zone designated, or a reservation partnership zone cosponsored, under ORS 285C.306.
[9]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9) “Federal enterprise zone” means any discrete area wholly or partially within this state that
is designated  as an empowerment zone, an enterprise community, a renewal community or some
similar designation  for purposes of improving the economic and community development of the area.
(10) “First-source hiring agreement” means an agreement between an  authorized business firm
and a publicly funded job training provider  whereby the provider refers qualified candidates to the
firm for new jobs and job openings in the firm.
(11) “In service” means being used or occupied or fully ready for use or occupancy for com-
mercial purposes consistent with the intended operations of  the business firm as described in the
application for authorization.
(12) “Modification”  means modernization, renovation or remodeling of an existing building,
structure or real property machinery or equipment.
(13) “New employees hired by the firm”:
(a) Includes only those employees of  an authorized business firm engaged for a majority of their
time in eligible operations.
(b) Does not include individuals employed in a job or position that:
(A) Is created  and first filled after December 31 of the first tax year in which qualified property
of the firm is exempt under ORS 285C.175;
(B) Existed prior to the submission of the relevant application for authorization; or
(C) Is performed primarily at a location outside of the enterprise zone.
(14) “Publicly funded job training provider” includes but  is not limited to a community college,
a service provider under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, or a similar  pro-
gram.
(15) “Qualified business firm” means a  business firm described in ORS 285C.200, the qualified
property of which is exempt from property tax under ORS 285C.175.
(16) “Qualified property” means property described under ORS 285C.180.
(17) “Qualified rural county” means a county:
(a) That is outside all metropolitan statistical areas, as  defined by the most recent federal
decennial census; and
(b) In which,  on the most recently certified property tax assessment roll, the total property taxes
imposed by all taxing  districts within the county are equal to or greater than 1.3 percent of the total
assessed value of all taxable property located in the county.
(18) “Rural enterprise zone” means:
(a) An enterprise zone located in an area of this state in which an urban enterprise zone  could
not be located; or
(b) A reservation enterprise  zone designated, or a reservation partnership zone cosponsored,
under ORS 285C.306.
(19) “Sparsely populated county” means a county with a density of 100 or fewer persons  per
square mile, based on the most recently available population figure for  the county from the Portland
State University Population Research Center.
(20) “Sponsor” means:
(a) The city, county or port, or any combination of cities, counties or ports, that  received ap-
proval of an enterprise zone  under ORS 284.150 and 284.160 (1987 Replacement Part), under ORS
285C.080 before October 5, 2015, or under ORS 285C.085 or 285C.250 or that designated an enterprise
zone under ORS 285C.065 or 285C.250;
(b) The tribal government, in the case of a reservation enterprise zone;
[10]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
(c) The tribal government and the cosponsoring city, county or port,  in the case of a reservation
partnership zone; or
(d) A city, county or port that joined the enterprise zone through  a boundary change under ORS
285C.115 (6) or a port that joined the enterprise zone under ORS 285C.068.
(21) “Tax year” has the meaning given that term in ORS 308.007.
(22) “Urban enterprise zone” means an enterprise zone in a metropolitan statistical  area, as
defined by the most recent  federal decennial census, that is located inside a regional or metropolitan
urban growth boundary.
(23) “Year” has the meaning given that term in ORS 308.007.
SECTION 16.
The amendments to ORS 285C.050 by section 15  of this 2024 Act apply to
property tax years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 17. The section captions used in this 2024 Act are provided  only for the con-
venience of the reader and do not become part of the  statutory law of this state or express
any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 18. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[11]