Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section,  a recipient of grant
or loan moneys distributed  by a state agency shall submit periodic reports, as described in
this section, that include the following information:
(a) The name and address of the recipient and the  name and contact information of an
individual who may serve as a point of contact for the recipient;
(b) The amount of moneys received from the state agency;
(c) A description of the program or law under which the moneys were distributed;
(d) A detailed accounting of how the moneys were expended; and
(e) Amounts unexpended, if any.
(2) Reports under this section must be submitted to  the standing or interim committee
of the Legislative Assembly relating to ways and means.
(3) An initial report under this section must be submitted no later than one  year after
moneys are initially distributed to the recipient. Thereafter, a recipient shall submit  addi-
tional reports on an annual basis until all moneys are expended.
(4) State agencies that distribute grant or loan moneys shall notify recipients  of the re-
quirements of this section and section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(5) The reporting requirements imposed by this section do not apply to:
(a) Public bodies; or
(b) Individual recipients of grant or loan moneys.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(b) “State agency” means every  state officer, board, commission, department, institution,
branch or agency of the  state government whose costs are paid wholly or in part from funds
held in the State Treasury.
SECTION 2.
(1) A person required to file a report under section 1 of this 2023 Act shall:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4045
HB 3271
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(a) Within 30 days after the initial distribution of  moneys to the person, disclose the
amount and recipient of any political contribution made by the person  in the three years
preceding the initial distribution of moneys; and
(b) Annually disclose, for three years  following the initial distribution of moneys to the
person, the amount and recipient of any political contribution made by the person in  the
preceding year.
(2) Disclosures under  this section must be submitted to the standing or interim com-
mittee of the Legislative Assembly relating to ways and means.
(3) As used in this  section, “political contribution” means a contribution as defined in
ORS 260.005.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]