Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Transportation, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $20,000, for deposit into the Roadside Memorial Fund  to cover
costs of  fees to erect and maintain Fallen Hero roadside memorial signs made at the request
of Gold Star Family members.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Transportation, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $5,000, to cover the surcharge required for issuance of Gold
Star Family member veterans’ recognition registration plates.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3627