Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 659A.421 is amended to read:
659A.421. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Dwelling” means:
(A) A building or structure, or portion of a building or  structure, that is occupied, or designed
or intended for occupancy, as a residence by one or more families; or
(B) Vacant land offered  for sale or lease for the construction or location of a building or
structure, or portion of a building or structure, that is occupied, or designed or intended for  occu-
pancy, as a residence by one or more families.
(b) “Minor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 109.697.
[(b)] (c) “Purchaser” includes an occupant, prospective occupant,  renter, prospective renter,
lessee, prospective lessee, buyer or prospective buyer.
[(c)] (d) “Real property” includes a dwelling.
[(d)(A)] (e)(A) “Source of income” includes federal rent subsidy payments under 42  U.S.C. 1437f
and any other local, state or federal housing assistance.
(B) “Source of income” does not include income derived from a specific occupation or income
derived in an illegal manner.
(2) A person may  not, because of the race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender iden-
tity, national origin, marital status, familial status , minor  status  or source of income of any person:
(a) Refuse to sell, lease or rent any  real property to a purchaser. This paragraph does not pre-
vent a person from refusing to lease or rent  real property to a prospective renter or prospective
lessee:
(A) Based upon the past conduct of a prospective renter or prospective lessee provided  the re-
fusal to lease or rent based on past conduct is consistent with local,  state and federal law, including
but not limited to fair housing laws; or
(B) Based upon the prospective renter’s or prospective  lessee’s inability to pay rent, taking into
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2580
HB 3523
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
account the value of the prospective  renter’s or prospective lessee’s local, state and federal housing
assistance, provided the refusal to lease or rent  based on inability to pay rent is consistent with
local, state and federal law, including but not limited to fair housing laws.
(b) Expel a purchaser from any real property.
(c) Make any distinction, discrimination or  restriction against a purchaser in the price, terms,
conditions or privileges relating to the sale, rental, lease or occupancy of real property or in  the
furnishing of any facilities or services in connection therewith.
(d) Attempt to discourage the sale, rental or lease of any real property to a purchaser.
(e) Publish,  circulate, issue or display, or cause to be published, circulated, issued or displayed,
any communication, notice, advertisement or sign of any kind relating to the sale, rental or  leasing
of real property  that indicates any preference, limitation, specification or unlawful discrimination
based on  race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, marital status,
familial status , minor status  or source of income.
(f) Assist, induce, incite  or coerce another person to commit an act or engage in a practice that
violates this section.
(g) Coerce, intimidate, threaten or interfere with any person in  the exercise or enjoyment of,
or on account of the person having exercised or enjoyed or having aided or encouraged any  other
person in the exercise or enjoyment of, any right granted or protected by this section.
(h) Deny access to, or membership or participation in,  any multiple listing service, real estate
brokers’ organization or other service, organization or facility relating to the business  of selling or
renting dwellings, or discriminate against any person in  the terms or conditions of the access,
membership or participation.
(i) Represent to a person that  a dwelling is not available for inspection, sale or rental when the
dwelling in fact is available for inspection, sale or rental.
(j) Otherwise make unavailable or deny a dwelling to a person.
(3)(a) A person whose business includes engaging in  residential real estate related transactions
may not discriminate against any  person in making a transaction available, or in the terms or con-
ditions of the transaction, because of race, color,  religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
national origin, marital status, familial status , minor status  or source of income.
(b) As used  in this subsection, “residential real estate related transaction” means any of the
following:
(A) The making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial assistance:
(i) For purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing or maintaining a dwelling; or
(ii) Secured by residential real estate; or
(B) The selling, brokering or appraising of residential real property.
(4) A real estate licensee may not accept or retain a listing of real property  for sale, lease or
rental with  an understanding that a purchaser may be discriminated against with respect to the sale,
rental or lease thereof because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,  na-
tional origin, marital status, familial status , minor status  or source of income.
(5) A person may not, for  profit, induce or attempt to induce any other person to sell or rent
any dwelling by  representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the neighborhood of
a person or persons of a particular race, color,  religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
national origin, marital status, familial status , minor status  or source of income.
(6) This section does not apply with respect to sex distinction, discrimination or restriction if
the real property involved is such that the application of  this section would necessarily result in
[2]
HB 3523
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
common use of bath or bedroom facilities by unrelated persons of opposite sex.
(7)(a) This section does not apply to  familial status distinction, discrimination or restriction with
respect to housing for older persons.
(b) As used in this subsection, “housing for older persons” means housing:
(A) Provided under  any state or federal program that is specifically designed and operated to
assist elderly persons, as defined by the state or federal program;
(B) Intended for, and solely occupied by, persons 62 years of age or older; or
(C) Intended and operated for occupancy by at least one  person 55 years of age or older per
unit. Housing qualifies as housing for older persons under this subparagraph if:
(i) At least 80 percent of the dwellings are occupied by at least one person 55 years of  age or
older per unit; and
(ii) Policies  and procedures that demonstrate an intent by the owner or manager to provide
housing for persons 55 years of age or older are published and adhered to.
(c) Housing does not fail to meet the requirements for housing for older persons if:
(A) Persons residing in  the housing as of September 13, 1988, do not meet the requirements of
paragraph (b)(B) or (C) of this subsection. However, new occupants of  the housing shall meet the
age requirements of paragraph (b)(B) or (C) of this subsection; or
(B) The housing includes unoccupied units that are reserved  for occupancy by persons who meet
the age requirements of paragraph (b)(B) or (C) of this subsection.
(d) Nothing in this section limits the applicability of any reasonable local,  state or federal re-
strictions regarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling.
(8) The provisions  of subsection (2)(a) to (d) and (f) of this section that prohibit actions based
upon sex, sexual orientation,  gender identity or familial status do not apply to the renting of space
within a single-family residence if the owner actually  maintains and occupies the residence as the
owner’s primary residence and all occupants share some common space within the residence.
(9) Any violation of this section is an unlawful practice.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]