Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at the request  of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, the State Treasurer  is authorized to issue lottery
bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585  in an amount that produces $8,750,000 in net
proceeds and interest earnings for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section,
plus an additional amount estimated  by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-
related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued  under this section in an amount sufficient to
provide $8,750,000 in net proceeds and interest earnings must be transferred  to the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services for distribution to  Williams & Russell CDC to be used
for the purpose  of developing a business hub in Portland’s Albina neighborhood that will
provide office  and retail space for entrepreneurs and community partner organizations in
order to support small businesses, professional development, workforce training  and eco-
nomic growth.
(3) Lottery bonds authorized  under this section must be issued no later than June 30,
2026.
(4) The Legislative Assembly  finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of  this section will create jobs, further economic development,
finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds and native fish
and wildlife in Oregon, and is  authorized based on the finding that the development of busi-
ness hubs plays an important role in the state’s economic vitality.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4545