Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 352.829 is amended to read:
352.829. (1) The Oceangoing Research  Vessel Program is established at Oregon State University
in order to assist in  the research and study of the waters of the Pacific Coast. Potential areas of
research include, but are not limited to:
(a) Mapping the seabed in Oregon’s territorial sea, as defined in ORS 196.405;
(b) Analyzing marine ecosystems, including but not limited to existing marine reserves,  existing
marine protected areas, proposed marine reserves and proposed marine protected areas;
(c) Analyzing the potential effects of climate change, including but not limited to ocean
acidification;
(d) Compiling comprehensive assessments of overall ocean health;
(e) Understanding ocean  dynamics, including but not limited to natural hazards such as
tsunamis; and
(f) Installing instruments to effectively monitor the impact  of wave energy systems, marine re-
serves and marine protected areas on marine ecosystems and fish populations.
(2) The Oceangoing Research Vessel Program shall solicit  from state agencies and from students
and faculty of public universities listed in ORS 352.002 proposals for the use of a research  vessel
operated under the program.
(3) In order to effectively allocate the use of research vessels operated under the Oceangoing
Research Vessel Program, there is established a Research Vessel Council, consisting of seven mem-
bers appointed  by the President of Oregon State University. The president shall appoint to the
council:
(a) At least one member who  is a trained scientist with at least five years of marine research
experience , including at least one scientist from the University of Oregon ;
(b) Upon request from the agency, at least one member from each of the following agencies:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1551
HB 3486
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
(A) State Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(B) State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries;
(C) Department of Land Conservation and Development; and
(D) Department of Environmental Quality; and
(c) At least one member who has expertise in marine operations or marine education.
(4) The Research Vessel Council shall evaluate proposals submitted under subsection (2) of this
section on the basis of the:
(a) Proposal’s geographical area of study;
(b) Quality of the submitted management, research or educational rationale; and
(c) Feasibility of accommodating the proposed work within the schedule  of federally funded
projects for the research vessel.
(5) The Research Vessel Council shall schedule the use  of a research vessel for selected pro-
posals as part of the University-National Oceanographic Laboratory System  ship scheduling process.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission for distribution to the University of
Oregon, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of
$306,000, to be used for 30 days  of research per year on two research vessels operated by the
Oregon Institute of Marine Biology.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for distribution to the  University of
Oregon, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$110,000, which may be expended for  the purchase of a dive vessel and for the construction
of a dock for a dive vessel and a dive platform.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]