Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
On or before December 1 of each year, the Department  of Veterans’ Affairs
shall submit a report in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245, to the appropriate interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly. The report must  describe, for the previous 12
months:
(1) The amount of federal moneys  the state receives for each dollar the state spends on
outreach and programming for veterans; and
(2) The amount of moneys service  members and veterans in this state receive for com-
pensation or retirement pay or pension from  the Armed Forces of the United States or
United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3875