Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 293.229 is amended to read:
293.229. (1) Not later than October 1 of each fiscal year, each  state agency shall submit a report
to the Legislative Fiscal Office that describes the  status of that agency’s liquidated and delinquent
accounts and efforts made by that agency to collect liquidated and delinquent accounts during the
previous fiscal year. The report required under this subsection shall be in a form prescribed by the
Legislative Fiscal Office and shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Beginning balance and total number of all liquidated and delinquent accounts;
(b) New liquidated and delinquent accounts added during the last preceding fiscal year;
(c) Total collections of liquidated and delinquent accounts;
(d) Total amount and total number of liquidated and delinquent accounts that have been written
off;
(e) Total number and ending balance of all liquidated and delinquent accounts;
(f) Total amount of liquidated and delinquent accounts assigned to the Department  of Revenue
and the total amount collected by the department under ORS 293.250;
(g) Total amount of liquidated and delinquent accounts  assigned to private collection agencies
and the total amount collected by private collection agencies under ORS 293.231;
(h) Total number and total amount of all liquidated and delinquent  accounts exempted under
ORS 293.233;
(i) Total number  and ending balance of all liquidated and delinquent accounts that have been
placed in suspended collection status under ORS 305.155; and
(j) A statement indicating whether the agency has liquidated and delinquent accounts that  are
not exempt under ORS 293.233, or are otherwise prohibited or exempted by  law from assignment, for
which no payment has been received for more than 90 days and that have not been assigned to  the
Department of Revenue under ORS 293.231.
(2) If a state agency reports under subsection (1) of this  section that the total ending balance
of its liquidated and delinquent accounts is $50 million or greater, the  state agency shall, not later
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 295
HB 4163
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
than three months after it submits the report under subsection (1) of  this section, submit an addi-
tional report to the committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to ways
and means that:
(a) Describes major categories of liquidated and delinquent accounts held by the state agency;
(b) Describes circumstances under which the state agency writes off or adjusts  liquidated and
delinquent amounts or removes an account from liquidated and delinquent status;
(c) Describes actions undertaken  by the state agency to reduce the amount of liquidated and
delinquent debt owed to it at the end of each fiscal year; and
(d) Sets forth a plan for future actions that will reduce  the amount of liquidated and delinquent
debt owed to the state agency at the end of each  fiscal year and describes any additional resources
that are necessary to carry out the plan.
(3) The Legislative Fiscal Office shall produce an annual report  not later than [ December 31 ]
February 1 of each fiscal year on the status of liquidated and delinquent accounts of state  agencies
and the judicial branch of state government. The report shall be based on the reports  submitted by
state agencies as required in this  section and on reports submitted by the judicial branch of state
government under ORS 1.195.
(4) The report required under subsection (3) of this section shall:
(a) List those state agencies, including the judicial branch of state government, that have liqui-
dated and delinquent accounts that are not exempt under ORS 1.198, 1.199 or 293.233, or are other-
wise prohibited or exempted by law from assignment,  for which no payment has been received for
more than 90 days and that have not been assigned to a private collection agency  or to the De-
partment of Revenue under ORS 1.197 or assigned to the Department of Revenue under 293.231;
(b) List separately information about the liquidated and delinquent accounts of the Secretary
of State, the State Treasurer, other state agencies in the executive branch of state  government and
the judicial branch of state government; and
(c) Include any other information the Legislative Fiscal Office determines is necessary to  de-
scribe the status of liquidated and delinquent accounts across offices and branches  of state govern-
ment.
(5) Notwithstanding ORS 293.227, as used in this section, “state agency” has the  meaning given
that term in ORS 293.226, except that it:
(a) Does not include the  judicial department as defined in ORS 174.113 or the legislative de-
partment as defined in ORS 174.114; and
(b) Includes public universities listed in ORS 352.002 and  Oregon Health and Science University,
notwithstanding ORS 352.138 and 353.100.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 293.252 is amended to read:
293.252. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall  monitor state agency debt
collection functions described by law and  assist state agencies in efforts to improve the collection
of delinquent debts owed to state agencies.  The department’s duties under this subsection include,
but are not limited to:
(a) Providing training to state agencies regarding processing and managing accounts  receivable
in compliance with applicable law and state policies.
(b) Providing technical assistance to state agencies in resolving challenges in processing and
managing accounts receivable and developing financial administrative systems  to improve the han-
dling of liquidated and delinquent accounts.
(c) Developing performance standards for state  debt collection, including but not limited to
[2]
HB 4163
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
standards defining what constitutes liquidated  and delinquent accounts and when debt may be
written off pursuant to ORS 293.240.
(d) Working with state agencies to improve the quality and value of data that each  state agency
submits to the Legislative Fiscal Office for purposes of ORS 293.229.
(e) Submitting an annual management report  to the Legislative Assembly not later than [ De-
cember 31 ] February 1 of each fiscal  year, in conjunction with the report of the Legislative Fiscal
Office produced under ORS 293.229, that identifies important  issues and significant trends in state
agency debt collection practices and describes and evaluates  efforts by state agencies to improve
the collection of delinquent debt.
(2) The department shall adopt policies:
(a) Providing  guidance for the collection of liquidated and delinquent accounts owing to state
agencies.
(b) Setting procedures for state agencies to account for and manage  information regarding the
agency’s liquidated and delinquent accounts.
(c) After consultation with  the Attorney General, setting criteria for effective and efficient as-
signment of liquidated and delinquent accounts to the  Department of Revenue or private collection
agencies, and setting performance measurements to be used in the application of the criteria.
(d) For the allocation, form and amount of charges or fees added to  liquidated and delinquent
accounts under ORS 293.231, 293.250 and 697.105.
(e) Setting exemptions or adjustments for state agencies that are prohibited  by law from adding
or collecting fees under ORS 293.231, 293.250 or 697.105 and for  agencies for which the addition or
collection of the fees is not feasible given the agency resources available for collection of accounts
receivable.
(f) For the improvement of  communications regarding liquidated and delinquent accounts among
state agencies and between private collection agencies and the Department of Revenue.
(g) Describing  conditions under which a state agency may request and collect Social Security
numbers in accordance with state and federal law when it is reasonably  foreseeable that a person
may owe  the state agency a liquidated and delinquent amount as a result of a transaction or activ-
ity.
(h) After consultation with the Attorney General, setting criteria  under which state agencies,
the Department of Revenue and private  collection agencies may propose and accept offers of com-
promise as provided in ORS 293.240.
(3) As used in this section, “state agency” has the meaning given that  term in ORS 293.226,
except that it does not include the judicial department as defined in  ORS 174.113, the Secretary of
State or the State Treasurer.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 291.227 is amended to read:
291.227. (1)(a) As part of the development of the legislatively  adopted budget, each state agency
that employs more than 100 employees shall report to the Joint Committee  on Ways and Means the
state agency’s maximum supervisory ratio for the biennium.
(b) Before submitting the report to the committee, a state agency shall provide  a copy of the
report to all labor organizations that represent employees of the state agency.
(2) A state agency must determine  its maximum supervisory ratio by starting from a baseline
ratio of one to 11 and adjusting the ratio based on some or all of the following factors:
(a) Safety of the public or of state agency employees;
(b) Geographic location of the agency’s employees;
[3]
HB 4163
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Complexity of the agency’s duties;
(d) Industry best practices and standards;
(e) Size and hours of operation of the agency;
(f) Unique personnel needs of the agency, including the agency’s use of  volunteers or seasonal
or temporary employees, or the exercise of supervisory authority by agency supervisory  employees
over personnel who are not agency employees; and
(g) Financial scope and responsibility of the agency.
(3) The Joint Committee on Ways and Means shall review  the maximum supervisory ratios re-
ported by state agencies. [ The committee  shall include the maximum supervisory ratio in a budget
report or budget note for each state agency that reported a maximum supervisory ratio. ]
(4) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, a state agency whose actual supervisory  ratio is
greater than its maximum supervisory ratio may not fill a supervisory position.
(5)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may  exempt a state agency from the
limitations of subsection (4)  of this section if the department determines that an additional supervi-
sory position is reasonably necessary to the state agency. The department must make  the determi-
nation with reference to some or all of the factors set forth in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) At least five  business days before granting an exemption under this subsection, the depart-
ment shall notify all labor organizations that represent employees of the state agency of its  intent
to grant the exemption.
(6)(a) The department shall, once per quarter, produce reports on the actual  supervisory ratio
of each state agency. The reports must include data on  job families within each state agency to the
extent such data is reasonably available.
(b) The department shall make the  reports publicly available on the Internet and shall notify
all labor organizations that represent state employees when the reports are available.
(7) The department may  adopt rules for the administration of this section, including rules gov-
erning how temporary, seasonal or part-time employees are accounted for in the calculation of a
supervisory ratio.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Job families” means groups of occupations based upon work performed, skills,  education,
training and credentials.
(b) “Legislatively adopted budget” has the meaning given that term in ORS 291.002.
(c)(A) “State agency”  means all state officers, boards, commissions, departments, institutions,
branches, agencies, divisions and other entities, without regard to the designation given to  those
entities, that are within the executive branch of government as  described in Article III, section 1,
of the Oregon Constitution.
(B) “State agency” does not include:
(i) The legislative department as defined in ORS 174.114;
(ii) The judicial department as defined in ORS 174.113;
(iii) The Public Defense Services Commission;
(iv) The Secretary of State and the State Treasurer;
(v) Semi-independent state agencies listed in ORS 182.454;
(vi) The Oregon Tourism Commission;
(vii) The Oregon Film and Video Office;
(viii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002;
(ix) The Oregon Health and Science University;
[4]
HB 4163
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
(x) The Travel Information Council;
(xi) Oregon Corrections Enterprises;
(xii) The Oregon State Lottery Commission;
(xiii) The State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation;
(xiv) The Oregon Utility Notification Center;
(xv) Oregon Community Power;
(xvi) The Citizens’ Utility Board;
(xvii) A special government body as defined in ORS 174.117;
(xviii) Any other public  corporation created under a statute of this state and specifically desig-
nated as a public corporation; and
(xix) Any  other semi-independent state agency denominated by statute as a semi-independent
state agency.
(d) “Supervisory employee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 243.650.
(e) “Supervisory ratio” means the ratio of employees who  are supervisory employees to em-
ployees who are not supervisory employees.
SECTION 4.
This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[5]