Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 742.277 is amended to read:
742.277. (1) As used in this section  and ORS 742.278:
(a) “Homeowner insurance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 746.600.
(b) “Wildfire risk” means danger to people or property that is threatened or caused  by
a fire that is:
(A) An uncontrollable  brush fire, firestorm or other series of fires, regardless of origin,
that is fueled  predominantly by trees, grasslands, timber, scrub or any other naturally oc-
curring or native-grown vegetation; and
(B) Declared by a governmental authority as a wildfire.
[(b)] (c)  “Wildfire risk mitigation action” means an action that reduces wildfire risk  to property,
including:
(A) A property-level action, such as  establishing defensible space, hardening a building or re-
ceiving certification from the Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety for a  Wildfire Pre-
pared Home or a similar entity.
(B) A community-level action, such as receiving recognition as a Firewise USA  Site in Good
Standing or recognition from a similar entity or participating in community risk reduction programs
established by the State Fire Marshal.
(2) An insurer that cancels or decides  not to renew a homeowner insurance policy for a prop-
erty, or that increases a premium  for a homeowner insurance policy for a property, for a reason that
is not nonpayment  of a premium and that is materially related to wildfire risk, shall send a notice
of the cancellation, decision not to renew or premium increase to the insured that describes:
(a) Any property-specific  characteristics related to wildfire risk that resulted in the cancellation,
decision not to renew or premium increase.
(b) Wildfire  risk mitigation actions the insured could undertake to improve the insurability of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3319
HB 3089
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
the property, if there are any.
(c) If the insurer used wildfire risk scores or classifications to assess the property,  the following
information:
(A) In plain language, a description of how wildfire risk scores and  classifications are deter-
mined, including a description of any general variables the insurer considers.
(B) The range of wildfire risk scores or classifications that could potentially be assigned to a
property.
(C) The relative position of the wildfire risk score or classification assigned to the property.
(D) Impacts, if there are any, that wildfire risk mitigation actions could have on a wildfire  risk
score or classification assigned to the property.
(d) General information about factors the insurer considers in order to  classify, measure or
otherwise determine the wildfire risk to a property.
(e) Any other information specified  by rule by the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices.
(3) In  addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, a notice for a premium in-
crease that is materially related to wildfire risk must describe:
(a) What wildfire risk mitigation actions the insured could undertake, if any,  that would result
in a discount, incentive or other premium adjustment.
(b) The amount of the potential discount, incentive or other premium adjustment.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]