Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CHANGES TO BALLOT MEASURE 11 (1994) SENTENCES
(Sentences Are Presumptive, Not Mandatory)
SECTION 1.
 ORS 137.700 is amended to read:
137.700. (1)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 161.605, when a person is convicted of one of the  offenses
listed in subsection (2)(a) (A) or (B)  of this section and the offense was committed on or  after April
1, 1995, [ or of one of the offenses listed in subsection (2)(b) of this section and the offense  was com-
mitted on or after October 4, 1997, or of the offense  described in subsection (2)(c) of this section and
the offense was committed on or after January 1,  2008,] the court shall impose, and the person shall
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1611
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
serve, at least the entire term of imprisonment  listed in subsection (2) (a)(A) or (B)  of this section.
The person  is not, during the service of the term of imprisonment, eligible for release on post-prison
supervision or any  form of temporary leave from custody. The person is not eligible for any re-
duction in[ , or based on, ] the minimum sentence for any reason whatsoever under ORS 421.121 or
any other statute. The court may impose a greater sentence if otherwise permitted  by law, but may
not impose  a lower sentence than the sentence specified in subsection (2) (a)(A) or (B)  of this sec-
tion.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 161.605, when a person  is convicted of one of the offenses listed
in subsection (2)(a)(C) to (S), (b) or (c) of this section,  the presumptive sentence is the cor-
responding term of imprisonment listed with each offense. The court may impose a greater
or lesser sentence  as permitted under the sentencing guidelines of the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission. The person may request that  the court, pursuant to ORS 137.751, de-
termine the person’s eligibility for release  on post-prison supervision under ORS 421.508.
Unless the  court orders otherwise under ORS 137.750, and provided that the person is oth-
erwise eligible, during the service of the term of imprisonment the  person may be considered
for any form of temporary leave from custody,  work release, conditional or supervised re-
lease program or reduction in sentence under ORS 421.121 or any other statute.
(2) The offenses to which subsection (1) of this section applies  and the applicable [ mandatory
minimum] sentences are:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(a)(A) Murder in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.115.......................300 months
(B) Murder in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.107 ..................360 months
(C) Attempt or conspiracy
to commit aggravated
murder, as defined
in ORS 163.095. .................120 months
(D) Attempt or conspiracy
to commit murder
in any degree. .....................90 months
(E) Manslaughter in the
first degree, as defined
in ORS 163.118. .................120 months
(F) Manslaughter in the
second degree, as defined
in ORS 163.125. ...................75 months
(G) Assault in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.185.........................90 months
(H) Assault in the second
degree, as defined in
[2]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 163.175.................[70] 30 months
(I) Except as provided in
paragraph (b)(G) of
this subsection,
kidnapping in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.235. ...................90 months
(J) Kidnapping in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.225.........................70 months
(K) Rape in the first degree,
as defined in ORS 163.375
(1)(a), (c) or (d). .................100 months
(L) Rape in the second degree,
as defined in
ORS 163.365.........................75 months
(M) Sodomy in the first degree,
as defined in ORS 163.405
(1)(a), (c) or (d). .................100 months
(N) Sodomy in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.395.........................75 months
(O) Unlawful sexual penetration
in the first degree, as
defined in ORS 163.411
(1)(a) or (c). ........................100 months
(P) Unlawful sexual penetration
in the second degree, as
defined in ORS 163.408. ....75 months
(Q) Sexual abuse in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.427.................[75] 30 months
(R) Robbery in the first degree,
as defined in
ORS 164.415.........................90 months
(S) Robbery in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 164.405.................[70] 30 months
(b)(A) Arson in the first degree,
as defined in ORS 164.325,
when the offense represented
a threat of serious
physical injury. ...................90 months
(B) Using a child in a display
of sexually explicit
[3]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
conduct, as defined in
ORS 163.670.........................70 months
(C) Compelling prostitution,
as defined in
ORS 167.017.........................70 months
(D) Rape in the first degree,
as defined in
ORS 163.375 (1)(b). ...........300 months
(E) Sodomy in the first degree,
as defined in
ORS 163.405 (1)(b). ...........300 months
(F) Unlawful sexual penetration
in the first degree, as
defined in
ORS 163.411 (1)(b). ...........300 months
(G) Kidnapping in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.235, when the
offense is committed in
furtherance of the commission
or attempted commission of an
offense listed in subparagraph
(D), (E) or (F) of
this paragraph. ..................300 months
(c) Aggravated vehicular
homicide, as defined in
ORS 163.149.......................240 months
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 2.
 ORS 137.707 is amended to read:
137.707. (1)(a) When a  person waived under ORS 419C.349 (1)(a) is convicted of an offense listed
in subsection (4) (a)(A) or (B)  of this section, the court shall impose at least  the presumptive term
of imprisonment provided for the offense in subsection (4) (a)(A) or  (B)  of this section. The court
may impose a  greater presumptive term if otherwise permitted by law, but may not impose a lesser
term. The person is not, during the service of the term of imprisonment,  eligible for release on
post-prison supervision or any form of temporary leave  from custody. The person is not eligible for
any reduction in the minimum sentence for any reason under ORS 421.121 or any other provision
of law. The person is eligible for a hearing and conditional release under  ORS 420A.203 and
420A.206.
(b) When a person waived under ORS 419C.349  (1)(a) is convicted of an offense listed in
subsection (4)(a)(C) to (S), (b) or  (c) of this section, the presumptive sentence is the corre-
sponding term of imprisonment listed with each offense. The court may impose a greater  or
lesser sentence as permitted under the sentencing guidelines of  the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission. The person may request that the court, pursuant  to ORS 137.751, determine the
person’s eligibility for release on post-prison supervision  under ORS 421.508. Unless the court
[4]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
orders otherwise under ORS 137.750, and provided that the  person is otherwise eligible, dur-
ing the service of the term of imprisonment  the person may be considered for any form of
temporary leave from custody, work release, conditional or supervised release program or
reduction in sentence under ORS 421.121 or any other statute. The person is eligible for a
hearing and conditional release under ORS 420A.203 and 420A.206.
(2) ORS 138.052, 163.105 and 163.150 apply to sentencing  a person prosecuted under this section
and convicted of aggravated murder under ORS 163.095 except that a person  who was under 18
years of age at the time the offense was committed is not subject to a sentence of death or  life
imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole.
(3) The court shall commit the person to the legal and physical custody of the  Department of
Corrections.
(4) The offenses to which this section applies and the presumptive sentences are:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(a)(A) Murder in the second degree, as defined in
ORS 163.115. ............................300 months
(B) Murder in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.107. .......................360 months
(C) Attempt or conspiracy
to commit aggravated
murder, as defined
in ORS 163.095. .......................120 months
(D) Attempt or conspiracy
to commit murder
in any degree. ............................90 months
(E) Manslaughter in the
first degree, as defined
in ORS 163.118. .......................120 months
(F) Manslaughter in the
second degree, as defined
in ORS 163.125. .........................75 months
(G) Assault in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.185. .........................90 months
(H) Assault in the second
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.175. .................[70] 30 months
(I) Kidnapping in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.235. ..............................90 months
(J) Kidnapping in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.225. ..............................70 months
(K) Rape in the first degree,
[5]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
as defined in ORS 163.375. ...100 months
(L) Rape in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.365. ..............................75 months
(M) Sodomy in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.405. ............................100 months
(N) Sodomy in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.395. ..............................75 months
(O) Unlawful sexual
penetration in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.411. .......................100 months
(P) Unlawful sexual
penetration in the
second degree, as
defined in ORS 163.408. ..........75 months
(Q) Sexual abuse in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.427.......................[75] 30 months
(R) Robbery in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 164.415. ..............................90 months
(S) Robbery in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 164.405.......................[70] 30 months
(b)(A) Arson in the first degree,
as defined in
ORS 164.325, when
the offense represented
a threat of serious
physical injury. .........................90 months
(B) Using a child in a display
of sexually explicit
conduct, as defined in
ORS 163.670. ..............................70 months
(C) Compelling prostitution,
as defined in ORS 167.017
(1)(a), (b) or (d). .........................70 months
(c) Aggravated vehicular
homicide, as defined in
ORS 163.149. ............................240 months
_______________________________________________________________________________________
[6]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) If  a person charged with an offense under this section is found guilty of a lesser included
offense and the lesser included offense is:
(a) An offense listed in subsection (4) of this section, the  court shall sentence the person as
provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(b) Not an offense listed in subsection (4) of this section:
(A) But constitutes an  offense for which waiver is authorized under ORS 419C.349 (1)(b), the
court, upon motion of the district attorney, shall hold  a hearing to determine whether to retain ju-
risdiction or to transfer the case to juvenile court for disposition. In determining whether to retain
jurisdiction,  the  court shall consider the criteria for waiver in ORS 419C.349. If the court retains
jurisdiction, the court shall sentence  the person as an adult under sentencing guidelines. If the court
does not retain jurisdiction, the court shall:
(i) Order that a presentence report be prepared;
(ii) Set forth in a  memorandum any observations and recommendations that the court deems
appropriate;
(iii) Enter  an order transferring the case to the juvenile court for disposition under ORS
419C.067 and 419C.411; and
(iv) Enter an order  providing that all court records of the case are subject to the same limita-
tions on inspection, copying and disclosure  of records, reports and materials as those set forth under
ORS 419A.255.
(B) And is not an offense for which waiver is  authorized under ORS 419C.349 (1)(b), the court
may not sentence the person. The court shall:
(i) Order that a presentence report be prepared;
(ii) Set forth in a  memorandum any observations and recommendations that the court deems
appropriate;
(iii) Enter  an order transferring the case to the juvenile court for disposition under ORS
419C.067 and 419C.411; and
(iv) Enter an order  providing that all court records of the case are subject to the same limita-
tions on inspection, copying and disclosure  of records, reports and materials as those set forth under
ORS 419A.255.
(6) When a person is charged under this section, other offenses based on  the same act or
transaction shall be charged as separate counts in the same accusatory instrument and  consolidated
for trial, whether or not the other offenses are  aggravated murder or offenses listed in subsection
(4) of this section. If  it appears, upon motion, that the state or the person charged is prejudiced by
the joinder  and consolidation of offenses, the court may order an election or separate trials of
counts or provide whatever other relief justice requires.
(7)(a) If a person charged and tried as provided in subsection (6)  of this section is found guilty
of aggravated murder or an offense listed in subsection (4) of this section and  one or more other
offenses, the court shall impose the sentence  for aggravated murder or the offense listed in sub-
section (4) of this section as provided in subsections (1) and  (2) of this section and shall impose
sentences for the other offenses as otherwise provided by law.
(b) If a person charged and  tried as provided in subsection (6) of this section is not found guilty
of aggravated murder or an offense  listed in subsection (4) of this section, but is found guilty of one
of the other charges that constitutes an offense for which  waiver is authorized under ORS 419C.349
(1)(b), the court, upon motion  of the district attorney, shall hold a hearing to determine whether to
retain jurisdiction or to transfer the case to juvenile court for disposition. In determining whether
[7]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to retain jurisdiction, the  court shall consider the criteria for waiver in ORS 419C.349. If the court
retains jurisdiction, the court shall sentence  the person as an adult under sentencing guidelines. If
the court does not retain jurisdiction, the court shall:
(A) Order that a presentence report be prepared;
(B) Set forth in a memorandum any observations  and recommendations that the court deems
appropriate;
(C) Enter an order transferring the  case to the juvenile court for disposition under ORS
419C.067 and 419C.411; and
(D) Enter an order providing that all court records of the case are subject to the same limita-
tions on inspection, copying and disclosure  of records, reports and materials as those set forth under
ORS 419A.255.
(Conforming Amendments)
SECTION 3.
 ORS 137.124 is amended to read:
137.124. (1) If the court imposes a sentence upon  conviction of a felony that includes a term of
incarceration that exceeds 12 months:
(a) The court shall not designate the correctional facility in which the defendant is  to be con-
fined but shall  commit the defendant to the legal and physical custody of the Department of Cor-
rections; and
(b) If the judgment provides that the term of incarceration be served  consecutively to a term
of incarceration of 12 months or less that was imposed in a  previous proceeding by a court of this
state upon conviction of a felony,  the defendant shall serve any remaining part of the previously
imposed term of incarceration in the legal and physical custody of the Department of Corrections.
(2)(a) If the court imposes a sentence upon conviction of a felony that includes a term of
incarceration that is 12 months or less, the court shall commit the defendant  to the legal and
physical custody of the  supervisory authority of the county in which the crime of conviction oc-
curred.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, when the court imposes a sentence upon
conviction of a felony that includes a term of incarceration that is  12 months or less, the court shall
commit the  defendant to the legal and physical custody of the Department of Corrections if the court
orders that the term of incarceration be served consecutively to a  term of incarceration that ex-
ceeds 12 months that was imposed in a previous proceeding  or in the same proceeding by a court
of this state upon conviction of a felony.
(3) After assuming custody of the convicted person the Department of Corrections may  transfer
adults in custody from one correctional facility to another  such facility for the purposes of diagnosis
and study, rehabilitation and  treatment, as best seems to fit the needs of the adult in custody and
for the protection and welfare of the community and the adult in custody.
(4) If the court  imposes a sentence of imprisonment upon conviction of a misdemeanor, it shall
commit the defendant to the custody of  the supervisory authority of the county in which the crime
of conviction occurred.
(5)(a) When a person under 18 years of age at the time  of committing the offense and under 20
years of  age at the time of sentencing is committed to the Department of Corrections under ORS
137.707 or due to the fact  that criminal proceedings were initiated after the person attained 18 years
of age, the Department of Corrections shall transfer the  physical custody of the person to the
[8]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Oregon Youth Authority as provided in ORS 420.011 if:
(A) The person will complete the sentence imposed before the person attains 25 years of age;
(B) The Department of Corrections and the Oregon Youth Authority determine that, because  of
the person’s age, immaturity,  mental or emotional condition or risk of physical harm to the person,
the person should not be incarcerated initially in a Department of Corrections institution; or
(C) The person is under 18 years of age at the time of sentencing and commitment.
(b) A person placed in the custody of the Oregon Youth Authority  under this subsection who is
at least  18 years of age shall be returned to the physical custody of the Department of Corrections
whenever the Director of the Oregon Youth Authority, after consultation with  the Department of
Corrections, determines that  the conditions or circumstances that warranted the transfer of custody
under this subsection are no longer present.
(c) Notwithstanding ORS 137.320, the sheriff may by agreement  with the Department of Cor-
rections transfer the person described in this subsection directly  to a youth correction facility for
physical custody without first delivering the  person to the Department of Corrections. As part of the
agreement with  the Department of Corrections, the sheriff may designate the county juvenile de-
partment or the Oregon Youth Authority to conduct the direct transfer described  in this paragraph
if the sheriff has entered into a  written agreement with the county juvenile department, the Oregon
Youth Authority, or both, to provide the direct transfer.
(6)(a) When a person under 18 years of age at the time  of committing the offense and under 20
years of age at the time of sentencing is committed to the legal and  physical custody of the De-
partment of Corrections or the supervisory authority of a  county following waiver under ORS
419C.349 (1)(b), 419C.352, 419C.364  or 419C.370 or sentencing under ORS 137.707 (5)(b)(A) or (7)(b)
[or 137.712], the Department of Corrections or the supervisory authority of a county  shall transfer
the person to the physical custody of the Oregon Youth Authority for  placement as provided in ORS
420.011 (3). The terms and  conditions of the person’s incarceration and custody are governed by ORS
420A.200 to  420A.206. Notwithstanding ORS 137.320, the sheriff may by agreement with the Depart-
ment of Corrections or the supervisory authority of a county transfer the  person described in this
subsection directly to a youth correction facility for physical  custody without first delivering the
person to the Department of Corrections or supervisory authority of the county. As part  of the
agreement with the Department of Corrections  or supervisory authority of the county, the sheriff
may designate the county juvenile department  or the Oregon Youth Authority to conduct the direct
transfer described in this paragraph if the sheriff has entered into a written agreement with  the
county juvenile department, the Oregon Youth Authority, or both, to provide the direct transfer.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 137.320, when a person under 16 years of  age is waived under ORS
419C.349 (1)(b), 419C.352,  419C.364 or 419C.370 and subsequently is sentenced to a term of
imprisonment in the county  jail, the sheriff shall transfer the person to a youth correction facility
for physical custody as provided in ORS 420.011 (3).
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (5)(a)(A) of this  section, the department or the
supervisory authority of a county  may not transfer the physical custody of the person under sub-
section (5)(a)(A) of this  section if the Director of the Oregon Youth Authority, after consultation
with the Department of Corrections or the supervisory authority of a  county, determines that, be-
cause of the person’s age, mental or emotional condition or risk of  physical harm to other persons,
the person should not be incarcerated in a youth correction facility.
(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, under no circumstances  may a person
under 18 years of age be incarcerated in a Department of Corrections institution.
[9]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9) If a defendant is transferred under subsection (5) of this section, the defendant shall also be
transferred after a resentencing on the same charges resulting from an appellate decision  or a
post-conviction relief proceeding or for any other reason, even if the defendant is 20  years of age
or older at the time of the resentencing.
(10) For the purposes of determining the person’s age  at the time of committing an offense under
this section:
(a) If the person is convicted of two or more offenses occurring on different days, the  person’s
age shall be calculated using the earliest date.
(b) If  the person is convicted of an offense occurring within a range of dates, the person’s age
shall be calculated using the date at the beginning of the range.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 137.751 is amended to read:
137.751. (1)  When a court sentences a defendant to a term of incarceration that exceeds one
year, the defendant may request a determination of the defendant’s eligibility  for release on post-
prison supervision under ORS  421.508 (4). The court shall order in the judgment that the Department
of Corrections may release  the defendant on post-prison supervision under ORS 421.508 (4) only if,
after a hearing, the court finds that:
(a) The defendant meets the eligibility requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section;
(b) The defendant was not on probation, parole or  post-prison supervision for an offense listed
in ORS [ 137.712 (4) or ] 811.705 (3)(b) at the  time of the commission of the current crime of con-
viction;
(c) The defendant has  not previously been released on post-prison supervision under ORS 421.508
(4);
(d) The harm or loss caused by the crime is not greater than usual for that type of crime;
(e) The crime was not part of an organized criminal operation; and
(f) After considering  the nature of the offense and the harm to the victim, the defendant’s suc-
cessful completion of the program would:
(A) Increase public safety;
(B) Enhance the likelihood that the defendant would be rehabilitated; and
(C) Not unduly reduce the appropriate punishment.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a defendant may  not be released on
post-prison supervision under ORS 421.508 (4) if the defendant is being sentenced for a crime  under
ORS 163.145, 163.165 (1)(a) or (b), 163.525 or 811.705 (3)(b).
(3) A defendant may not be released on post-prison supervision under ORS 421.508 (4) if the de-
fendant is being sentenced for a crime listed in ORS 137.700  (2)(a)(A) or (B) , 137.707 (4)(a)(A)  or
(B) or 163.095 or a sex crime as defined in ORS 163A.005.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the  parties may stipulate to a defendant’s el-
igibility for release on post-prison supervision under ORS 421.508 (4). If the court accepts the stip-
ulation, the court does  not need to make explicit findings regarding the factors described in
subsection  (1)(b)  to (f) of this section. The parties may not stipulate to the defendant’s release on
post-prison supervision under  ORS 421.508 (4) if the defendant is being sentenced for a crime de-
scribed in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) If the court makes the findings described in subsection (1) of  this section or accepts the
stipulation of the parties under subsection (4) of this section, the court shall:
(a) Order on the record in open court as part of the sentence imposed that the defendant  may
be considered by the department for release on post-prison supervision under ORS 421.508 (4); and
[10]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Include the order described in paragraph (a) of this subsection in the judgment.
(6) Subject to the requirements of this section, the court may order that  the defendant serve a
minimum period of incarceration before the defendant  is released on post-prison supervision under
ORS 421.508 (4). Nothing in this section authorizes the  release of the defendant on post-prison
supervision before the defendant has served the period of time described in ORS 421.508 (4)(b).
SECTION 5.
 ORS 138.045 is amended to read:
138.045. (1)  The state may take an appeal from the circuit court, or from a municipal court or
a justice court that has become a court of record under ORS 51.025 or 221.342, to the Court of  Ap-
peals from:
(a) An order made  prior to trial dismissing or setting aside one or more counts in the accusatory
instrument;
(b) An order allowing a demurrer;
(c) An order arresting the judgment;
(d) An order made prior to trial suppressing evidence;
(e) An order made prior to trial for the return or restoration of things seized;
(f) For a felony  committed on or after November 1, 1989, a judgment, amended judgment or
corrected judgment of conviction;
(g) For any felony, a judgment, amended judgment, supplemental  judgment, corrected judgment
or post-judgment order, that  denied restitution or awarded less than the amount of restitution re-
quested by the state;
[(h) An order or  judgment in a probation revocation hearing finding that a defendant who was
sentenced to probation under ORS  137.712 has not violated a condition of probation by committing a
new crime; ]
[(i)] (h)  An order made after a guilty  finding dismissing or setting aside one or more counts in
the accusatory instrument; or
[(j)] (i) An order granting a new trial.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, when the state chooses to appeal  an order
described in subsection (1)(a), (b) or (d) of this section, the state  shall take the appeal to the Su-
preme Court if the defendant is charged with murder or aggravated murder.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 138.105 is amended to read:
138.105. (1) On appeal by a defendant, the appellate court has authority to  review the judgment
or order being appealed, subject to the provisions of this section.
(2) The appellate court has authority to review only questions of law appearing on the record.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the appellate court has authority  to review any
intermediate decision of the trial court.
(4) On appeal from a judgment  of conviction and sentence, the appellate court has authority to
review:
(a) The denial of  a motion for new trial based on juror misconduct or newly discovered evidence;
and
(b) The denial of a motion in arrest of judgment.
(5) The appellate court has no authority to review the validity of the  defendant’s plea of guilty
or no contest, or a conviction based on the defendant’s plea of guilty or no contest, except that:
(a) The appellate court has authority to  review the trial court’s adverse determination of a
pretrial motion reserved in a conditional plea of guilty or no contest under ORS 135.335.
(b) The appellate court has authority to review whether the trial  court erred by not merging
[11]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
determinations of guilt of two or more offenses,  unless the entry of separate convictions results from
an agreement between the state and the defendant.
(6) On appeal from a judgment  ordering payment of restitution but not specifying the amount
of restitution, the appellate court has no authority to review the decision to award restitution.
(7) Except as otherwise  provided in subsections (8) and (9) of this section, the appellate court
has authority to review any sentence to determine whether the trial court failed to comply with
requirements of law in imposing or failing to impose a sentence.
(8) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (9) of this section, for  a sentence imposed on
conviction of a felony committed on or after November 1, 1989:
(a) The appellate court has no authority to review:
(A) A sentence that is within the presumptive sentence prescribed by the  rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission.
(B) A sentence of probation when the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission prescribe
a presumptive sentence of imprisonment but allow a sentence of probation without departure.
(C) A sentence of  imprisonment when the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
prescribe  a  presumptive sentence of imprisonment but allow a sentence of probation without depar-
ture.
(b) If the trial court imposed a sentence that departs from the  presumptive sentence prescribed
by the rules of the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission, the appellate court’s authority to review
is limited to whether  the trial court’s findings of fact and reasons justifying a departure from the
sentence prescribed by the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission:
(A) Are supported by the evidence in the record; and
(B) Constitute substantial and compelling reasons for departure.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the appellate court  has authority to review
whether the sentencing court erred:
(A) In  ranking the crime seriousness classification of the current crime or in determining the
appropriate classification of a prior conviction or juvenile  adjudication for criminal history pur-
poses.
(B) In imposing or failing  to impose a minimum sentence prescribed by ORS 137.700  (1)(a)  or
137.707 (1)(a).
(9) The appellate court has no authority to  review any part of a sentence resulting from a
stipulated sentencing agreement between the state and the defendant.
(10)(a) On  appeal from a corrected or amended judgment that is entered before expiration of the
applicable period under  ORS 138.071 (1) or (2) during which the original judgment can be appealed,
the appellate court has authority to review the judgment, including the corrections  or amendments,
as provided in this section.
(b) On appeal from a corrected or amended judgment that is entered after  expiration of the ap-
plicable period under ORS 138.071 (1) or (2) during which the  original judgment was or could have
been appealed, the appellate court has authority to  review, as provided in this section, only the
corrected or amended part of the judgment, any part of the  judgment affected by the correction or
amendment, or the trial court’s decision under ORS 137.172 not to correct or amend the judgment.
(c) As used in this subsection, “judgment” means any appealable judgment or order.
(11)(a) On a defendant’s cross-appeal under ORS 138.035 (5),  the appellate court may, in its dis-
cretion, limit review to any decision by the trial court  that is inextricably linked, either factually
or legally, to the state’s appeal.
[12]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The failure to file a cross-appeal under ORS 138.035  (5) does not waive a defendant’s right
to assign error to a particular ruling of the trial court on appeal from a judgment.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 138.115 is amended to read:
138.115. (1) On appeal by the state, the appellate court has  authority to review the judgment or
order being appealed, subject to the provisions of this section.
(2) The appellate court has authority to review only questions of law appearing on the record.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the appellate court has authority  to review any
intermediate decision involving the merits of, or necessarily affecting, the judgment  or order from
which the appeal is taken.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph  (b) of this subsection, on appeal from a judgment of
conviction of any felony, the  appellate court has authority to review only the sentence as provided
by subsections (5) and (6) of this section.
(b) The appellate court has authority to review whether the trial  court erred in merging deter-
minations of guilt of two or  more offenses, unless the merger of determinations of guilt resulted from
an agreement between the state and the defendant.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (6) and (7) of this section,  the appellate court
has authority to review the sentence imposed on conviction of any felony to  determine whether the
trial court failed to comply with requirements of law in imposing or failing to impose a sentence.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section, for  a sentence imposed on
conviction of a felony committed on or after November 1, 1989:
(a) The appellate court has no authority to review:
(A) A sentence that is within the presumptive sentence prescribed by the  rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission.
(B) A sentence of probation when the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission prescribe
a presumptive sentence of imprisonment but allow a sentence of probation without departure.
(C) A sentence of  imprisonment when the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
prescribe  a  presumptive sentence of imprisonment but allow a sentence of probation without depar-
ture.
(b) If the trial court imposed a sentence that departs from the  presumptive sentence prescribed
by the rules of the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission, the appellate court’s authority to review
is limited to whether  the trial court’s findings of fact and reasons justifying a departure from the
sentence prescribed by the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission:
(A) Are supported by the evidence in the record; and
(B) Constitute substantial and compelling reasons for departure.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the appellate court  has authority to review
whether the sentencing court erred:
(A) In  ranking the crime seriousness classification of the current crime or in determining the
appropriate classification of a prior conviction or juvenile  adjudication for criminal history pur-
poses.
(B) In imposing or failing  to impose a minimum sentence prescribed by ORS 137.700  (1)(a)  or
137.707 (1)(a).
(7) The appellate court has no authority to  review any part of a sentence resulting from a
stipulated sentencing agreement between the state and the defendant.
(8)(a) On appeal  from a corrected or amended judgment that is entered before expiration of the
applicable period under ORS 138.071 (1) or (2) during which the original judgment can  be appealed,
[13]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the appellate court has authority to review the judgment, including the corrections  or amendments,
as provided in this section.
(b) On appeal from a  corrected or amended judgment that is entered after expiration of the ap-
plicable period under ORS 138.071 (1) or  (2) during which the original judgment was or could have
been appealed, the appellate court has authority to review,  as provided in this section, only the
corrected or amended part of the judgment,  any part of the judgment affected by the correction or
amendment, or the trial court’s decision under ORS 137.172 not to correct or amend the judgment.
(c) As used in this subsection, “judgment” means any appealable judgment or order.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 144.101 is amended to read:
144.101. (1) The State  Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision has jurisdiction over the
imposition of conditions of post-prison supervision and sanctions for violations of those conditions
for a person convicted of a felony if:
(a) The term of imprisonment imposed on the person is more than 12 months;
(b) The felony is classified as crime category 8,  9, 10 or 11 of the sentencing guidelines grid of
the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission;
(c) The person is [ subject to a sentence under ] sentenced for an offense  described in  ORS
137.700 or 137.707;
(d) The person is sentenced as a dangerous offender under ORS 161.725 and 161.737;
(e) The person is subject to a term of post-prison supervision under ORS 144.103;
(f) The person is committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections under ORS  137.124;
(g) The responsibility for correctional services for the person has  reverted to the department
under ORS 423.483; or
(h) No local supervisory  authority is responsible for correctional services for the person under
the laws of this state.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, a local supervisory  authority has juris-
diction over the imposition of conditions of post-prison supervision and sanctions for violations  of
those conditions for a person sentenced to a term of imprisonment of 12 months or less.
(3) If a local supervisory authority imposes conditions of post-prison  supervision or sanctions for
violations of those conditions, the person may  request the board to review the conditions or sanc-
tions. The board shall review the  request and may, at its discretion, review the conditions and
sanctions, under rules adopted by the board.
(4) If a circuit court in a participating county, as defined in section 29, chapter 649, Oregon
Laws 2013, enters an order admitting  a person into a reentry court under section 29 (3), chapter 649,
Oregon Laws 2013, the reentry court has concurrent jurisdiction over  the imposition of sanctions
for violations of the conditions of post-prison supervision.
(5) Nothing in this section  affects the jurisdiction of the board over the imposition of conditions
of parole and sanctions for violations of those conditions.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 144.101, as amended by section 34,  chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is
amended to read:
144.101. (1) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision has  jurisdiction over the
imposition of conditions of post-prison supervision and sanctions for violations of those conditions
for a person convicted of a felony if:
(a) The term of imprisonment imposed on the person is more than 12 months;
(b) The felony is classified as crime category 8, 9, 10  or 11 of the sentencing guidelines grid of
the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission;
[14]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The person is  [ subject to a sentence under ] sentenced for an offense described in  ORS
137.700 or 137.707;
(d) The person is sentenced as a dangerous offender under ORS 161.725 and 161.737;
(e) The person is subject to a term of post-prison supervision under ORS 144.103;
(f) The person is committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections under ORS  137.124;
(g) The responsibility for correctional  services for the person has reverted to the department
under ORS 423.483; or
(h) No local supervisory authority is responsible for correctional services for  the person under
the laws of this state.
(2) Except as provided  in subsection (1) of this section, a local supervisory authority has juris-
diction  over  the imposition of conditions of post-prison supervision and sanctions for violations of
those conditions for a person sentenced to a term of imprisonment of 12 months or less.
(3) If a local supervisory authority imposes conditions of post-prison  supervision or sanctions for
violations of those conditions, the person may  request the board to review the conditions or sanc-
tions. The board shall review the  request and may, at its discretion, review the conditions and
sanctions, under rules adopted by the board.
(4) Nothing in this section  affects the jurisdiction of the board over the imposition of conditions
of parole and sanctions for violations of those conditions.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 144.397 is amended to read:
144.397. (1)(a) A person convicted of  an offense or offenses committed when the person was un-
der 18 years of age, who is serving a sentence of imprisonment for the  offense or offenses, is eligible
for release on parole or post-prison supervision as provided in this section after the person has
served 15 years of imprisonment.
(b) Nothing in  this section is intended to prevent a person from being released prior to serving
15 years of imprisonment under any other provision of law.
(c) As used  in this subsection, “served 15 years of imprisonment” means that 15 years have
passed since the person began serving the sentence, including  pretrial incarceration but not in-
cluding any reduction in sentence under ORS 421.121 or any other statute.
(2) This section applies notwithstanding ORS 144.110 or the fact that the person was:
(a) Sentenced to a minimum sentence under ORS 163.105, 163.107, 163.115 or 163.155.
(b) Sentenced to a mandatory minimum sentence under ORS 137.700  (1)(a) , 137.707 (1)(a)  or
137.717, a determinate sentence under ORS 137.635 or a sentence required by any  other provision
of law.
(c) Sentenced to two or more consecutive sentences under ORS 137.123.
(3) When a person eligible  for release on parole or post-prison supervision as described in sub-
section (1) of this section has served 15 years of imprisonment, the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision shall hold a hearing. The  hearing must provide the person a meaningful
opportunity to be released on parole or post-prison supervision.
(4) The board may require the person, before  holding a hearing described in this section, to be
examined by a psychiatrist or psychologist with expertise in  adolescent development. Within 60 days
of the evaluation, the examining psychiatrist  or psychologist shall file a written report of the
findings and conclusions of the examination  with the board. A certified copy of the report shall be
provided to the person and the person’s attorney.
(5) During a hearing under this section, the board shall consider and give  substantial weight to
the fact that a person under 18 years  of age is incapable of the same reasoning and impulse control
[15]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
as an adult and the diminished culpability of minors as compared to that of adults. The board shall
also consider the following circumstances, if relevant to the specific person and offense:
(a) The age and immaturity of the person at the time of the offense.
(b) Whether and to what extent an adult was involved in the offense.
(c) The person’s family and  community circumstances at the time of the offense, including any
history of abuse, trauma and involvement in the juvenile dependency system.
(d) The person’s subsequent emotional growth and increased maturity during  the person’s
imprisonment.
(e) The person’s participation in  rehabilitative and educational programs while in custody if
such programs have been made available to the person and use of self-study for self-improvement.
(f) A mental health diagnosis.
(g) Any other mitigating factors or circumstances presented by the person.
(6) Under no circumstances may the board consider the age of the person as an aggravating
factor.
(7) If the board finds that, based on the consideration of the age and immaturity of  the person
at the time of  the offense and the person’s behavior thereafter, the person has demonstrated matu-
rity and rehabilitation, the board shall release the person as follows:
(a) For a person sentenced under ORS 163.105, 163.107, 163.115  or 163.155, the board shall set
a release date that is not more  than 60 days from the date of the hearing and, notwithstanding
section 28, chapter 790, Oregon Laws 1989, the person shall be  released on parole in accordance
with ORS 144.125, 144.260 and 144.270.
(b) A person sentenced to a term  of imprisonment under a provision of law other than ORS
163.105, 163.107, 163.115 or 163.155 shall be released on post-prison supervision in accordance  with
ORS 144.096 and 144.098 within 60 days of the date of the hearing.
(8) Unless the context requires otherwise, the  provisions of ORS 144.260 to 144.380 apply to a
person released on parole under subsection (7)(a) of this section.
(9) If  the board determines that the person has not demonstrated maturity and rehabilitation
under subsection (7) of this section, the board may postpone a subsequent hearing to a  date that is
at least two years but no more than 10 years from the date of the hearing.
(10) The person may waive  a hearing under this section. Notwithstanding waiver of the hearing,
the board shall hold a hearing under this section upon the person’s written request.
(11) The board shall provide notice of the hearing to:
(a) The district attorney of the county in which the person was convicted; and
(b) The victim of any offense for which the person is  serving a sentence, if the victim requests
to be notified and furnishes the board with a current address.
(12) A person has the right to counsel, including counsel appointed at board  expense, at a
hearing under this section.
(13) The board may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 161.620 is amended to read:
161.620. Notwithstanding  any other provision of law, a sentence imposed upon any person
waived under ORS 419C.349, 419C.352, 419C.364 or 419C.370  shall not include any sentence of death
or life imprisonment without the possibility of  release or parole nor imposition of any mandatory
minimum sentence except that a mandatory minimum sentence under:
(1) ORS 137.707 (1)(a) shall be imposed[ , except as provided in ORS 137.712 ];
(2) ORS 163.105 (1)(c) shall be imposed; and
[16]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) ORS 161.610 may be imposed.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 165.072 is amended to read:
165.072. As used in this section and ORS 165.074, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Cardholder” means a person to whom  a payment card is issued or a person who is author-
ized to use the payment card.
(2) “Credit card” means a card, plate, booklet, credit card  number, credit card account number
or other identifying symbol, instrument or device that can be used to pay for, or to  obtain on credit,
goods or services.
(3) “Financial institution” means a financial institution as that term is defined in ORS 706.008.
(4) “Merchant” means:
(a) An owner or operator of a retail mercantile establishment;
(b) An agent,  employee, lessee, consignee, franchisee, officer, director or independent contractor
of an owner or operator of a retail mercantile establishment; and
(c) A person who  receives what the person believes to be a payment card or information from
a payment card from a cardholder as the instrument for obtaining something of value from the per-
son.
(5) “Payment card” means a credit card, charge card, debit card, stored value card or  any card
that is issued to a person and allows the user to obtain something of value from a merchant.
(6) “Payment card transaction” means a sale or  other transaction or act in which a payment
card is used to pay for, or to obtain on credit, goods or services.
(7) “Payment card transaction record” means any record or evidence of a payment  card trans-
action, including, without limitation, any paper, sales draft, instrument  or other writing and any
electronic or magnetic transmission or record.
(8) “Person” does not include a financial institution or  its authorized employee, representative
or agent.
(9)(a) “Previous conviction” [ has the meaning given that term in ORS 137.712 ] means a con-
viction that was entered prior  to imposing sentence on the current crime provided that the
prior conviction is based on a crime committed in a separate criminal episode.
(b) “Previous conviction” does not include a conviction for a Class  C felony, including an
attempt or solicitation to commit a Class B felony, or a misdemeanor, unless the conviction
was entered within the 10-year period immediately preceding the date on which  the current
crime was committed .
(10) “Reencoder” means an electronic device  that places encoded information from one payment
card onto another payment card.
(11) “Scanning device” means an electronic device that is used to  access, read, scan, obtain,
memorize or store, temporarily or permanently, information encoded on a payment card.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 420.011 is amended to read:
420.011. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, admissions to the youth
correction facilities are  limited to youth offenders who are at least 12 but less than 19 years of age,
found by the juvenile court to have committed an act that if  committed by an adult would constitute
aggravated  murder,  murder, a felony or a Class A misdemeanor and placed in the legal custody of
the Oregon Youth Authority. A youth  offender admitted to a youth correction facility may not be
transferred by administrative process to any penal or correctional institution.
(2)(a) In addition to the persons  placed in the legal custody of the youth authority under ORS
419C.478 (1) or 419C.481, and  with the concurrence of the Director of the Oregon Youth Authority
[17]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or the director’s designee, persons who are committed to the  Department of Corrections under ORS
137.124 and meet the requirements of ORS 137.124 (5) may be temporarily assigned to  a youth cor-
rection  facility  as provided by ORS 137.124 (5). A person assigned on such a temporary basis remains
within the legal custody of the  Department of Corrections and such reassignment is subject to ter-
mination by the Director of  the Oregon Youth Authority by referring the person back to the De-
partment of Corrections as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) After a person is  transferred to the physical custody of the youth authority under ORS
137.124 (5), the Director of the Oregon Youth  Authority may refer the person back to the Depart-
ment of  Corrections for physical custody and placement if the director, after consulting with the
Department of Corrections, determines that the person is at least 18 years of age and:
(A) Poses a substantial danger to youth  authority staff or persons in the custody of the youth
authority; or
(B) Is not likely, in the foreseeable future, to benefit from the rehabilitation and treatment pro-
grams administered by the  youth authority and is appropriate for placement in a Department of
Corrections institution.
(3) Any person under 18 years of age at  the time of committing the crime and under 20 years
of age at the  time of sentencing and commitment who, after waiver under ORS 419C.349 (1)(b),
419C.352, 419C.364 or 419C.370 or sentencing under ORS 137.707 (5)(b)(A)  or (7)(b) [ or 137.712], is
sentenced to a term of imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections, and any per-
son under 16 years of age who after waiver under ORS  419C.349 (1)(b), 419C.352, 419C.364 or
419C.370 or sentencing under ORS 137.707 (5)(b)(A) or (7)(b) [ or 137.712] is  sentenced to a term of
imprisonment in the county jail, shall be temporarily  assigned to a youth correction facility by the
Department of Corrections, or by  the sheriff to whose custody the person has been committed, pur-
suant to ORS 137.124 (6). The director  shall designate the appropriate youth correction facility or
schools for such assignment. A person assigned to a  youth correction facility under ORS 137.124 (6)
and this  subsection remains within the legal custody of the Department of Corrections or sheriff to
whose custody the person was committed. The assignment of such a person to the youth  correction
facility is subject, when  the person is 18 years of age or older, to termination by the director by
referring  the  person back to the Department of Corrections or the sheriff to serve the balance of
the person’s sentence.  Assignment to a youth correction facility pursuant to ORS 137.124 (6) and this
subsection, if not terminated earlier by the director,  shall terminate upon the person’s attaining the
age specified in ORS 420A.010 (5) setting the age limits for which  the Oregon Youth Authority may
retain legal and physical custody of the person, and the person shall be referred  to the Department
of Corrections or the sheriff having legal custody of the  person to serve the balance of the person’s
sentence.
(4) Whenever a  person committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections is temporarily
assigned to  a youth correction facility pursuant to this section, the youth authority may provide
programs and treatment for the person, and may adopt  rules relating to conditions of confinement
at the youth correction facility, as the youth authority determines are  appropriate. However, the
person remains subject  to laws and rules of the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision
relating to parole.
(5) For the purposes of determining the person’s age  at the time of committing an offense under
this section:
(a) If the person is convicted of two or more offenses occurring on different days, the  person’s
age shall be calculated using the earliest date.
[18]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) If  the person is convicted of an offense occurring within a range of dates, the person’s age
shall be calculated using the date at the beginning of the range.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 420.240 is amended to read:
420.240. (1) The Oregon Youth Authority  may establish and administer a work release program
in which persons who are committed to the custody  of the Department of Corrections and placed in
the physical  custody of the youth authority under ORS 137.124 or other statute may be authorized
to leave assigned quarters for the purpose of:
(a) Participating in private, gainful employment;
(b) Participating in a work  program approved by the youth authority, including work with public
or private agencies or persons, with or without compensation;
(c) Obtaining in  this state additional education, including but not limited to vocational, technical
and general education;
(d) Participating in alcohol or drug treatment programs;
(e) Participating in mental health programs;
(f) Specific treatment to develop independent living skills; or
(g) Other purposes established by the youth authority by rule.
(2) After consulting with the Department of  Corrections, the youth authority shall adopt rules
to carry out the provisions of ORS 420.240 to 420.265.
(3) The provisions of this section do not apply to persons sentenced under ORS  137.635, 137.700
(1)(a) or 137.707  (1)(a)  or any other provision of law that prohibits eligibility for any form of tem-
porary leave from custody.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 420A.203 is amended to read:
420A.203. (1)(a) This section and ORS 420A.206 apply only to a person who:
(A) Was under 18 years of age at the time of the commission of the offense for  which the person
was sentenced to a term of imprisonment, who committed the offense  on or after June 30, 1995, and
who was:
(i) Sentenced to a term of imprisonment of at least 24 months following waiver  under ORS
419C.349 (1)(b), 419C.352, 419C.364 or 419C.370; or
(ii) Sentenced  to a term of imprisonment of at least 24 months under ORS 137.707 [ or 137.712];
or
(B)(i) Was under 18 years of age at the time of the commission of all offenses for which the
person was sentenced to a term of imprisonment;
(ii) Is in the physical custody of the Oregon Youth Authority; and
(iii) Has a projected release date, as  determined by the Department of Corrections, that falls on
or after the person’s 25th birthday and before the person’s 27th birthday.
(b) When a person described in paragraph (a)(A) of this  subsection has served one-half of the
sentence imposed or when  a person described in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection attains 24 years
and six months of  age, the sentencing court shall determine what further commitment or disposition
is appropriate as provided in this section.  As used in this subsection and subsection (2) of this sec-
tion, “sentence imposed” means the  total period of mandatory incarceration imposed for all con-
victions resulting from a single prosecution or criminal proceeding not including  any reduction in
the sentence under ORS 421.121 or any other statute.
(2)(a) No more than 120 days and not  less than 60 days before the date on which a person has
served one-half of the sentence imposed or  attains 24 years and six months of age, the Oregon Youth
Authority or the Department of Corrections, whichever has physical custody of the  person, shall file
[19]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in the sentencing court a notice and request that the court  set a time and place for the hearing
required under this section.  The youth authority or department shall serve the person with a copy
of the notice and request for hearing on or before the date of filing.
(b) Upon receiving the notice and request  for a hearing under paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the sentencing court  shall schedule a hearing for a date not more than 30 days after the date on
which the  person will have served one-half of the sentence imposed or attains 24 years and six
months of age, or such later date as is agreed upon by the parties.
(c) The court shall notify the following of the time and place of the hearing:
(A) The person and, if the person is under 18 years of age, the person’s parents;
(B) The records supervisor  of the correctional institution in which the person is incarcerated;
and
(C) The district attorney who prosecuted the case.
(d) The court shall make reasonable efforts to  notify the following of the time and place of the
hearing:
(A) The victim and, if the victim is under 18 years of age,  the victim’s parents or legal guardian;
and
(B) Any other person who has filed a written request with the court to be notified of any hear-
ing concerning the transfer, discharge or release of the person.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, the court may delay the  hearing for good
cause.
(3) In a hearing under this section:
(a) The person and the state are parties to the proceeding.
(b) The person has the right to  appear with counsel. If the person requests that the court ap-
point counsel and the court determines that the  person is financially eligible for appointed counsel
at state expense, the court shall order that counsel be appointed.
(c) The district attorney represents the state.
(d) The court shall determine admissibility of evidence as if the hearing were a  sentencing pro-
ceeding.
(e) The court may  consider, when relevant, written reports of the Oregon Youth Authority, the
Department of Corrections and qualified experts, in addition to  the testimony of witnesses. Within
a reasonable time  before the hearing, as determined by the court, the person must be given the op-
portunity to examine all reports and other documents concerning the person  that the state, the
Oregon Youth Authority  or the Department of Corrections intends to submit for consideration by
the court at the hearing.
(f) Except as  otherwise provided by law or by order of the court based on good cause, the person
must be given access to the records maintained in the person’s case by the Oregon Youth Authority
and the Department of Corrections.
(g) The person may examine all of the witnesses called  by the state, may subpoena and call
witnesses to testify on the person’s behalf and may  present evidence and argument. The court may
permit witnesses to appear by telephone or other two-way electronic communication device.
(h) The hearing must be recorded.
(i) The hearing and the record of the hearing are open to the public.
(j) The question to be decided  is which of the dispositions provided in subsection (4) of this
section should be ordered in the case.
(k) The person has the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence that the person  has
[20]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
been rehabilitated and reformed, and if conditionally released, the person would not  be a threat to
the safety of the  victim, the victim’s family or the community and that the person would comply with
the release conditions.
(4)(a) At the conclusion of the hearing and after  considering and making findings regarding each
of the factors in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the court shall order  one of the following dispo-
sitions:
(A) Order that the person serve the  entire remainder of the sentence of imprisonment imposed,
taking into account any reduction in  the sentence under ORS 421.121 or any other statute, with the
person’s physical custody determined under ORS 137.124, 420.011 and 420A.200.
(B) Order that the person be conditionally released under ORS 420A.206 at such time as the
court may order, if the court finds that the person:
(i) Has been rehabilitated and reformed;
(ii) Is not a threat to the safety of the victim, the victim’s family or the community; and
(iii) Will comply with the conditions of release.
(b) In making the determination under this section, the court shall consider:
(A) The experiences and character of the person before and after commitment to  the Oregon
Youth Authority or the Department of Corrections;
(B) The person’s juvenile and criminal records;
(C) The person’s mental, emotional and physical health;
(D) The gravity of the loss,  damage or injury caused or attempted, during or as part of the
criminal act for which the person was convicted and sentenced;
(E) The manner in which the person committed  the criminal act for which the person was con-
victed and sentenced;
(F) The  person’s efforts, participation and progress in rehabilitation programs since the person’s
conviction;
(G) The results of any mental health or substance abuse treatment;
(H) Whether the person demonstrates accountability and  responsibility for past and future con-
duct;
(I) Whether the person has made and  will continue to make restitution to the victim and the
community;
(J) Whether the person will comply with and benefit from all conditions that  will be imposed if
the person is conditionally released;
(K) The safety of the victim, the victim’s family and the community;
(L) The recommendations of the district  attorney, the Oregon Youth Authority and the Depart-
ment of Corrections; and
(M) Any other relevant factors or circumstances raised by the state, the Oregon Youth  Au-
thority, the Department of Corrections or the person.
(5) The court shall provide copies of its disposition order under subsection (4)  of this section to
the parties, to the  records supervisor of the correctional institution in which the person is
incarcerated and to the manager of the institution-based records office of  the Department of Cor-
rections.
(6) The person or the state may appeal an order  entered under this section. On appeal, the ap-
pellate court’s review is limited to claims that:
(a) The disposition is not authorized under this section;
(b) The court failed to comply with the requirements of this  section in imposing the disposition;
[21]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or
(c) The findings of the court are not supported by substantial evidence in the record.
(7) A person described in subsection (1)(a)(B) of this section may waive a hearing under  this
section.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 421.121 is amended to read:
421.121. (1) Except  as provided in ORS 137.635, 137.700  (1)(a), 137.707 (1)(a), 163.105, 163.107 and
163.115, each  adult in custody sentenced to the custody of the Department of Corrections for felonies
committed on or after November 1, 1989, is eligible for a  reduction in the term of incarceration for:
(a) Appropriate institutional behavior, as defined by rule of the Department of Corrections;  and
(b) Participation in the adult basic skills development program described in ORS 421.084.
(2) The maximum amount of time  credits earned for appropriate institutional behavior or for
participation in the  adult basic skills development program described in ORS 421.084 may not exceed
20 percent of the total term of incarceration in a Department of Corrections institution.
(3) The time credits may not be used to shorten  the term of actual prison confinement to less
than six months.
(4) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to the rulemaking provisions of ORS chapter  183
to establish a process for granting, retracting and restoring the time credits earned  by the offender
as allowed in subsections (1) to (3) of this section.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 421.168 is amended to read:
421.168. (1) The Department of  Corrections shall establish a short-term transitional leave pro-
gram. The program shall provide adults  in custody with an opportunity to secure appropriate tran-
sitional support when necessary for successful reintegration into  the community prior to the adult’s
discharge to post-prison supervision.
(2) The  Department of Corrections shall identify each adult in custody who is eligible for the
short-term transitional leave program and shall, in conjunction with the  supervisory authority for
the county to which the adult in custody will be released, assist each eligible adult  in custody in
preparing a transition plan and in identifying and applying  for an employment, educational or other
transitional opportunity in the community.
(3) If the transition plan for the adult  in custody is approved by the department and is an es-
sential part  of successful reintegration into the community, the department may grant a transitional
leave no more than 120 days before the discharge date of the adult in custody.
(4) An adult in custody is  not eligible for transitional leave before having served six months of
prison incarceration.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section. The rules must
include a set of release conditions for adults in  custody released on transitional leave status. An
adult in custody on transitional leave status is subject to immediate return to prison for any vio-
lation of the conditions of release.
(6) The provisions of this section do not apply to adults in custody whose sentences were im-
posed under ORS 137.635, 137.690, 137.700  (1)(a) , 137.707 (1)(a) , 164.061, 475.907, 475.925, 475.930 or
813.011 or under a provision of law that prohibits release on any form of temporary leave  from
custody.
SECTION 18.
ORS 137.712 is repealed.
(Measure 11 Change Applicability)
[22]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 19.
The amendments to ORS 137.124,  137.700, 137.707, 137.751, 138.045, 138.105,
138.115, 144.101, 144.397, 161.620,  165.072, 420.011, 420.240, 420A.203, 421.121 and 421.168 by
sections 1 to 17 of this 2021 Act and the repeal of ORS 137.712 by section 18  of this 2021 Act
apply to crimes committed on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
APPROPRIATION FOR REIMAGINE SAFETY FUND
SECTION 20. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,500,000,  for distribution to the
Northwest Health Foundation for deposit into the Reimagine Safety Fund.
LIMITATION ON ARRESTS AND TRAFFIC STOPS
SECTION 21.  ORS 133.310 is amended to read:
133.310. (1) A peace  officer may arrest a person without a warrant if the officer has probable
cause to believe that the person has committed any of the following:
(a) A felony.
(b) A person Class A  misdemeanor , as  that term is defined in the rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission.
(c) An unclassified offense for which the maximum penalty allowed by law is equal to  or greater
than the maximum penalty allowed for a Class C [ misdemeanor] felony.
(d) Any [ other] crime committed in the officer’s presence.
(2) A peace officer may arrest a person without a warrant when the peace  officer is notified by
[telegraph,] telephone, radio or other mode of communication by another peace officer of  any state
that there exists a duly issued warrant for the arrest of a person within the  other peace officer’s
jurisdiction.
(3) A peace officer shall arrest  and take into custody a person without a warrant when the
peace officer has probable cause to believe that:
(a) There exists an order issued pursuant to ORS 30.866, 107.095  (1)(c) or (d), 107.716, 107.718,
124.015, 124.020, 133.035, 163.738, 163.765, 163.767 or 419B.845 restraining the person;
(b) A true copy of the order and proof of service on the person has been filed as  required in
ORS 107.720, 124.030, 133.035, 163.741, 163.773 or 419B.845; and
(c) The person to be arrested has violated the terms of that order.
(4) A peace officer shall arrest and take into custody a person without a warrant if:
(a) The person  protected by a foreign restraining order as defined by ORS 24.190 presents a copy
of the foreign  restraining order to the officer and represents to the officer that the order supplied
is the most recent order in effect between the parties and that the person restrained by  the order
has been personally served with a copy of the order or has actual notice of the order; and
(b) The peace officer has probable cause to believe that the person  to be arrested has violated
the terms of the foreign restraining order.
(5) A peace officer shall arrest and take into custody a person without a warrant if:
(a) The person protected by a foreign restraining order as defined by ORS 24.190 has filed a copy
of the foreign restraining order with a court or has been identified by the officer as a  party pro-
tected by a foreign restraining order entered in the Law Enforcement Data System or in the  data-
[23]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
bases of the National Crime Information Center of the United States Department of Justice; and
(b) The peace officer has probable  cause to believe that the person to be arrested has violated
the terms of the foreign restraining order.
(6) A peace officer  shall arrest and take into custody a person without a warrant if the peace
officer has probable cause to believe:
(a) The person  has been charged with an offense and is presently released as to that charge
under ORS 135.230 to 135.290; and
(b) The person has failed to comply with a no contact condition of the release agreement.
SECTION 22.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 133.055, 133.235 and 133.310, a peace officer shall
issue a criminal citation to a person in lieu of arresting the person if there is no warrant  for
the person’s arrest and the peace officer  has probable cause to believe the person has com-
mitted the following crimes:
(a) Unsworn falsification under ORS 162.085;
(b) Interfering with  a peace officer or parole and probation officer under ORS 162.247
when there is no accompanying charge;
(c) Resisting arrest under ORS 162.315 when there is no accompanying charge;
(d) Theft in the third degree under ORS 164.043;
(e) Theft in the second degree under ORS 164.045;
(f) Criminal trespass in the second degree by a guest under ORS 164.243;
(g) Criminal trespass in the second degree under ORS 164.245;
(h) Criminal trespass at a sports event under ORS 164.278;
(i) Offensive littering under ORS 164.805;
(j) Unlawful sound recording under ORS 164.865;
(k) Forgery in the second degree under ORS 165.007;
(L) Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the second degree under ORS 165.017;
(m) Misrepresentation of age by a minor under ORS 165.805;
(n) Interfering with public transportation under ORS 166.116;
(o) Prostitution under ORS 167.007;
(p) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance under ORS 475.752 (7)(b);
(q) Unlawful possession of methadone under ORS 475.824 (2)(c);
(r) Unlawful possession of oxycodone under ORS 475.834 (2)(c);
(s) Unlawful possession of heroin under ORS 475.854 (2)(c);
(t) Unlawful possession of cocaine under ORS 475.884 (2)(c);
(u) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine under ORS 475.894 (2)(c); or
(v) An attempt to commit a crime listed in paragraphs (a) to (u) of this subsection.
(2) A peace officer issuing a criminal  citation under this section may detain the person
only for such time as  is reasonably necessary to investigate and verify the person’s identity
and issue the citation.
SECTION 23.
Section 24 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Ve-
hicle Code.
SECTION 24. Notwithstanding ORS 810.410, a police officer may not initiate a traffic vi-
olation stop for unlawful use or failure to use lights under ORS 811.520  or operation without
required lighting equipment under ORS 816.330 if the offense is  based on the following cir-
cumstances:
(1) A headlight that is not  in compliance with ORS 816.050 or 816.320, and the vehicle has
[24]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a headlight that is in compliance;
(2) A taillight that is not in compliance with ORS 816.080  or 816.320, and the vehicle has
a taillight that is in compliance;
(3) A brake light that is  not in compliance with ORS 816.100 or 816.320, and the vehicle
has a brake light that is in compliance;
(4) Taillights that do not emit red light as required by ORS 816.080 (2); or
(5) A registration plate light that is not in compliance with ORS 816.090 or 816.320.
SECTION 25.
Sections 22 and 24 of  this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 133.310 by
section 21 of this 2021 Act apply to conduct alleged to  constitute an offense occurring on or
after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
JAIL ADMISSION FOR ILL PERSONS
SECTION 26.  ORS 169.105 is amended to read:
169.105. [No] A  person who is unconscious , who is showing symptoms of a contagious virus
or who is in acute need of medical or psychiatric care  [ shall] may not  be admitted to custody
in a facility described  in ORS 169.005, but shall instead be taken immediately to the nearest appro-
priate medical facility for medical diagnosis, care and treatment.
COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS
(Parole and Probation Officers)
SECTION 27.  ORS 137.620 is amended to read:
137.620. (1) As used in this section, “parole and probation  officer” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 181A.355.
(2) Parole and probation officers of the Department of Corrections or  a county community cor-
rections agency and those appointed by the court have the powers of peace officers  in the execution
of their duties, but are not active members of the  regular police force.  Parole and probation offi-
cers shall ensure that clothing worn while engaged in official duties does not resemble  the
uniform of a peace officer.
(3) Each parole and probation officer  appointed by the court, before entering on the duties of
office, shall take an oath of office.
(4) Each parole and probation officer who collects or has  custody of money shall execute a bond
in a penal sum to be fixed by the  court, with sufficient sureties approved thereby, conditioned for
the honest  accounting of all money received by the parole and probation officer as a parole and
probation  officer. The accounts  of all parole and probation officers are subject to audit at any time
by the proper fiscal authorities.
SECTION 28.  ORS 166.263 is amended to read:
166.263. (1) When authorized by the officer’s employer, a parole  and probation officer, as defined
in ORS 181A.355, may carry a firearm while engaged in official duties if the officer has completed:
[(1)] (a)  A firearms training program recognized by the Board on Public  Safety Standards and
Training; and
[(2)] (b) A psychological screening.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, a parole and probation officer may not
carry a firearm while engaged in official duties:
[25]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) At or in locations in which persons seek social services or public benefits; or
(b) At or in a supervised person’s place of employment.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 181A.530 is amended to read:
181A.530. (1) Except for  a person who has requested and obtained an extension from the De-
partment of Public Safety Standards and  Training pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, a person
may not be employed as a parole and probation officer for more than 18 months unless the  person
is a citizen of the United States  or a nonimmigrant legally admitted to the United States under a
Compact of Free Association, and:
(a) The person has been certified as being qualified as a parole and probation officer under
provisions of ORS  181A.355 to 181A.670 and the certification has not lapsed or been revoked pur-
suant to ORS 181A.630, 181A.640 and 181A.650 (1) and not reissued under ORS 181A.650 (2); or
(b) The person is exempted from the certification requirement under ORS 181A.420 (1) and (2).
(2) The department, upon the  facts contained in an affidavit accompanying the request for an
extension, may find  good cause for failure to obtain certification within the time period described
in subsection (1) of this section. If the department finds that  there is good cause for failure to timely
obtain certification, the department may extend for up to one year  the period that a person may
serve as a parole and probation officer without certification. The grant or denial of an extension  is
within the sole discretion of the department.
(3) The certification of a parole  and probation officer shall lapse upon the passage of more than
three consecutive months during which  period the officer is not employed as a parole and probation
officer, unless the officer is on leave from a law enforcement  unit. Upon reemployment as a parole
and probation  officer, the person whose certification has lapsed may apply for certification in the
manner provided in ORS 181A.355 to 181A.670.
(4) In order to  maintain certification, a parole and probation officer [ who is employed part-time ]
must complete annually at least 20 hours of continuing education approved  by the Department of
Public Safety Standards and Training.  The continuing education must include training in pro-
viding trauma-informed care, culturally specific services and de-escalation techniques.
(5) The requirement of citizenship imposed under subsection (1) of this section does not  apply
to a person employed as a parole and probation officer on September 27, 1987, who continues  to
serve as a parole and probation officer.
(Expansion of Earned Reduction in Supervision)
SECTION 30.
 ORS 137.633 is amended to read:
137.633. (1) A person convicted  of a felony or a designated drug-related misdemeanor and sen-
tenced to probation or to the legal and physical custody of the  supervisory authority under ORS
137.124 (2), or  a person sentenced to probation under the supervision of the court,  is eligible
for a reduction in the period  of probation or local control post-prison supervision [ for complying with
terms of probation or post-prison supervision, including the payment of restitution  and participation in
recidivism reduction programs ] as provided in subsection (2) of this section .
[(2) The  maximum reduction under this section may not exceed 50 percent of the period of probation
or local control post-prison supervision imposed. ]
[(3) A reduction under this section may not be used to shorten the period of probation or  local
control post-prison supervision to less than six months. ]
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 144.085 and 144.103, for every 30 days that the person does not
[26]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
willfully abscond from supervision or is not convicted of  a new felony or person Class A
misdemeanor, the person shall receive a 30-day reduction in the term of supervision.
(3) A person who has successfully completed an  alternative incarceration program under
ORS 421.508 or short-term transitional leave under  ORS 421.168 shall have the person’s term
of post-prison supervision reduced to one year beginning on the date  of the person’s release
from custody.
(4)(a) The Department of Corrections shall adopt rules to carry out  the provisions of this sec-
tion.
(b) The supervisory authority shall comply with the rules adopted under this section.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
(b) “Local control post-prison supervision” means  post-prison supervision that is supervised by
a local supervisory authority pursuant to ORS 144.101.
(c) “Person Class A misdemeanor”  has the meaning given that term in the rules of the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(Changes to Supervision Conditions)
SECTION 31.
 ORS 137.540 is amended to read:
137.540. (1) The court may sentence the defendant  to probation subject to any of  the following
[general] conditions [ unless specifically deleted by the court ] if necessary and appropriate in a
particular case. The probationer shall:
(a) Pay [ supervision fees, ] fines, restitution or other fees ordered by the court.
[(b) Not use or possess controlled substances except pursuant to a medical prescription. ]
[(c)] (b)  Submit to testing for controlled substance, cannabis or alcohol use if  the probationer
has a history of substance abuse  or if there is a reasonable suspicion that the probationer has ille-
gally used controlled substances.
[(d)] (c)  Participate in a substance abuse evaluation as directed by  the supervising officer and
follow the recommendations of the evaluator if there are reasonable grounds to  believe there is a
history of substance abuse.
[(e)] (d) Remain in the State of Oregon until written permission to leave is granted by the De-
partment of Corrections or a county community corrections agency.
[(f)] (e)  If  physically able, find and maintain gainful full-time employment, approved schooling,
or a full-time combination of both. Any waiver of this requirement  must be based on a finding by the
court stating the reasons for the waiver.
[(g)] (f)  Change neither  employment nor residence without prior permission from the Department
of Corrections or a county community corrections agency.
[(h)] (g)  Permit the parole and probation officer to visit the probationer  or the probationer’s
work site or residence and to conduct a walk-through of the common areas and  of the rooms in the
residence occupied by or under the control of the probationer.
[(i)] (h)  Consent to the search of person, vehicle  or premises upon the request of a represen-
tative of the supervising officer if the supervising  officer has reasonable grounds to believe that
evidence of a violation will be found, and  submit to fingerprinting or photographing, or both, when
requested by the Department of Corrections or a county community corrections agency for super-
vision purposes.
[27]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(j)] (i)  Obey  all laws, municipal, county, state and federal , except that with regard to the
possession and use of controlled substances, the probationer shall follow state law .
[(k)] (j)  Promptly and  truthfully answer all reasonable inquiries by the Department of Cor-
rections or a county community corrections agency.
[(L)] (k)  Not possess weapons, firearms or dangerous animals.
[(m)] (L)  Report as required , whether in person  or electronically,  and abide by the direction
of the supervising officer.
[(n)] (m)  If recommended by the supervising officer, successfully complete a sex  offender treat-
ment program approved by the supervising officer and submit to polygraph examinations at the di-
rection of the supervising officer if the probationer:
(A) Is under supervision for a sex offense under ORS 163.305 to 163.467;
(B) Was previously convicted of a sex offense under ORS 163.305 to 163.467; or
(C) Was previously convicted in another jurisdiction of an offense  that would constitute a sex
offense under ORS 163.305 to 163.467 if committed in this state.
[(o)] (n)  Participate in a  mental health evaluation as directed by the supervising officer and
follow the recommendation of the evaluator.
[(p)] (o) If required to report as a sex offender under ORS 163A.015, report with the  Department
of State Police, a city police department, a county sheriff’s office or the supervising agency:
(A) When supervision begins;
(B) Within 10 days of a change in residence;
(C) Once each year within 10 days of the probationer’s date of birth;
(D) Within 10 days of the first  day the person works at, carries on a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(E) Within 10 days of a  change in work, vocation or attendance status at an institution of higher
education.
[(q)] (p) Submit to a risk and needs  assessment as directed by the supervising officer and follow
reasonable recommendations resulting from the assessment.
(2) In addition to the [ general] conditions  described in subsection (1) of this section , the court
may impose any special conditions of probation that  are reasonably related to the crime of con-
viction or the needs of the  probationer for the protection of the public or reformation of the
probationer, or both, including, but not limited to, that the probationer shall:
(a) For crimes committed prior to November 1,  1989, and misdemeanors committed on or after
November 1, 1989, be  confined to the county jail or be restricted to the probationer’s own residence
or to the premises thereof, or  be subject to any combination of such confinement and restriction,
such confinement or restriction or combination thereof to be for a period not to  exceed one year
or one-half of the maximum period of  confinement that could be imposed for the offense for which
the defendant is convicted, whichever is the lesser.
(b) For felonies committed on or after November 1, 1989:
(A) Be confined  in the county jail, or be subject to other custodial sanctions under community
supervision, or both, as provided by rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission; and
(B) Comply with any special conditions of probation that are imposed by  the supervising officer
in accordance with subsection (9) of this section.
(c) For crimes committed on or after December 5, 1996, sell any  assets of the probationer as
specifically ordered by the court in order to pay restitution.
(d) For crimes constituting delivery of a controlled substance,  as those terms are defined in ORS
[28]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
475.005, or for telephonic harassment under ORS 166.090, or for crimes  involving domestic violence,
as defined in ORS 135.230, be  prohibited from using Internet websites that provide anonymous text
message services.
(3)(a) If a person is released on  probation following conviction of stalking under ORS 163.732
(2)(b) or violating a court’s stalking protective order  under ORS 163.750 (2)(b), the court may include
as a special condition of the person’s probation reasonable residency restrictions.
(b) If the court imposes the special condition of probation described in this subsection and  if at
any time during the period of probation the victim moves to a location that  causes the probationer
to be in violation of the special condition  of probation, the court may not require the probationer
to change the probationer’s residence in order to comply with the special condition of probation.
(4) When a person who is a sex  offender is released on probation, the court shall impose as a
special  condition  of probation that the person not reside in any dwelling in which another sex
offender who is on probation, parole  or post-prison supervision resides, without the approval of the
person’s supervising parole and probation officer, or in which more than one other sex offender who
is on probation, parole or post-prison supervision resides, without the approval  of the director of the
probation agency that  is supervising the person or of the county manager of the Department of
Corrections, or a designee of the director  or manager. As soon as practicable, the supervising parole
and probation officer of  a person subject to the requirements of this subsection shall review the
person’s living arrangement with the person’s sex offender treatment provider to ensure that  the
arrangement supports the goals of offender rehabilitation and community safety. As used in  this
subsection:
(a) “Dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 469B.100.
(b) “Dwelling” does not include a residential treatment facility or a halfway house.
(c) “Halfway house” means a publicly or privately operated profit or nonprofit  residential facil-
ity that provides rehabilitative care and treatment for sex offenders.
(d) “Sex offender” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
(5)(a) If the person is released on probation following conviction of a sex crime, as  defined in
ORS 163A.005, or an assault, as defined in ORS 163.175 or 163.185, and the victim was under 18
years of age,  the court, if requested by the victim, shall include as a special condition of the person’s
probation that the person not reside within three miles of the victim unless:
(A) The victim resides in a county having a population of less than 130,000 and  the person is
required to reside in that county;
(B) The person demonstrates to the court by a preponderance of the evidence  that no mental
intimidation or pressure was brought to bear during the commission of the crime;
(C) The  person demonstrates to the court by a preponderance of the evidence that imposition
of the  condition will deprive the person of a residence that would be materially significant in aiding
in the rehabilitation of the person or in the success of the probation; or
(D) The person  resides in a halfway house. As used in this subparagraph, “halfway house” means
a publicly or privately operated profit or nonprofit residential  facility that provides rehabilitative
care and treatment for sex offenders.
(b) A victim may request imposition of the special  condition of probation described in this sub-
section at the time of sentencing in person or through the prosecuting attorney.
(c) If the court imposes the special condition of probation described in this subsection and if  at
any time during the period of probation the victim moves to within three miles of the  probationer’s
residence, the court may not require the probationer  to change the probationer’s residence in order
[29]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to comply with the special condition of probation.
(6) When a person who is a sex offender, as defined in  ORS 163A.005, is released on probation,
the Department of Corrections or the county community corrections agency, whichever is appropri-
ate, shall notify the city police department, if the person is going to  reside within a city, and the
county sheriff’s office of the county in  which the person is going to reside of the person’s release
and the conditions of the person’s release.
(7) Failure to abide by [ all general and special ] the conditions of probation may result in arrest,
modification of conditions, revocation of probation or imposition of structured,  intermediate sanc-
tions in accordance with rules adopted under ORS 137.595.
(8) The court may order that probation be supervised by the court. [ If the court orders  that
probation be supervised by the court, the defendant  shall pay a fee of $100 to the court. Fees imposed
under this subsection in the circuit court shall be deposited by the clerk of the court  in the General
Fund. Fees imposed in a justice  court under this subsection shall be paid to the county treasurer. Fees
imposed in a municipal court under this subsection shall be paid to the city treasurer. ]
(9)(a) The court may at any time modify the conditions of probation.
(b) When the court orders a defendant placed under the supervision of the Department of  Cor-
rections or a community corrections agency, the supervising officer may file  with the court a pro-
posed modification to the special conditions of probation.  The supervising officer shall provide a
copy of the proposed modification to the district attorney and  the probationer. If the district attor-
ney:
(A) Files  an objection to the proposed modification less than five judicial days after the proposed
modification was filed,  the court shall schedule a hearing no later than 10 judicial days after the
proposed modification was filed, unless the  court finds good cause to schedule a hearing at a later
time.
(B) Does not file an objection to the proposed modification less than  five judicial days after the
proposed modification was filed, the proposed modification becomes effective five  judicial days after
the proposed modification was filed.
(10) A court may [ not] order revocation of probation [ as a result  of the probationer’s failure to
pay restitution unless the court determines from the totality of  the circumstances that the purposes of
the probation are not being served ] only for willfully absconding probation or the commission
of a felony or a person Class A misdemeanor, as  that term is defined in the rules of the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, while on probation .
[(11) It is not a cause for revocation of probation that the probationer  failed to apply for or accept
employment at any workplace where there is a labor  dispute in progress. As used in this subsection,
“labor dispute” has the meaning for that term provided in ORS 662.010. ]
[(12)(a) If the court determines that a defendant has violated the terms of probation, the court shall
collect a $25 fee from the defendant and may impose a fee for the costs of extraditing the defendant to
this state for the probation violation proceeding if the defendant  left the state in violation of the con-
ditions of the defendant’s probation. The fees imposed  under this subsection become part of the judg-
ment and may be collected in the same manner as a fine. ]
[(b) Probation violation fees collected under this subsection in the circuit court shall be deposited
by the clerk of the court in the General Fund. Extradition cost fees collected  in the circuit court under
this subsection shall be deposited by the  clerk of the court in the Arrest and Return Account estab-
lished by ORS 133.865. Fees collected in  a justice court under this subsection shall be paid to the
county treasurer. Fees collected in a municipal court under this subsection shall be  paid to the city
[30]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
treasurer.]
[(13)] (11)  As used in this section, “attends,”  “institution of higher education,” “works” and
“carries on a vocation” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 144.102 is amended to read:
144.102. (1) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or local supervisory authority
responsible for correctional services for a person shall specify in writing the conditions  of post-
prison supervision imposed under ORS 144.096. A copy of the conditions  must be given to the person
upon release from prison or jail.
(2) The board or the supervisory authority shall determine, and may at any time modify,  the
conditions of post-prison supervision, which may include, [ among other conditions ] if necessary and
appropriate for a particular case , that the person shall:
(a) Comply with the conditions of post-prison  supervision as specified by the board or supervi-
sory authority.
(b) Be under the supervision of  the Department of Corrections and its representatives or other
supervisory authority and abide by their direction and counsel.
(c) Answer all reasonable inquiries of the board, the department or the supervisory authority.
(d) Report to  the parole officer , either in person or electronically,  as directed by the board,
the department or the supervisory authority.
(e) Not own, possess or be in control of any weapon.
(f) Respect and obey all municipal, county, state and federal laws , except that with  regard to
the possession and use of controlled substances, the person shall follow state law .
(g) Understand that the board  or supervisory authority may, at its discretion, punish violations
of post-prison supervision.
(h) Attend a victim impact treatment session in a  county that has a victim impact program. [ If
the board or supervisory authority requires attendance  under this paragraph, the board or supervisory
authority may require the person,  as an additional condition of post-prison supervision, to pay a rea-
sonable fee to  the victim impact program to offset the cost of the person’s participation. The board or
supervisory authority may not order a person to pay a fee in excess of $5 under this paragraph. ]
(i) For crimes constituting delivery of a controlled substance, as those terms are defined in ORS
475.005, or for telephonic harassment under ORS 166.090, or for crimes  involving domestic violence,
as defined in ORS 135.230, be prohibited from using Internet  websites that provide anonymous text
message services.
(3) If the person is required to report as a sex  offender under ORS 163A.010, the board or su-
pervisory authority shall include  as a condition of post-prison supervision that the person report
with the Department of State Police, a city police department, a county sheriff’s office or the
supervising agency:
(a) When supervision begins;
(b) Within 10 days of a change in residence;
(c) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s date of birth;
(d) Within 10 days of the first day the person works at, carries on  a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(e) Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or attendance  status at an institution of higher
education.
(4)(a) The board or supervisory authority may establish special conditions that the board or su-
pervisory authority considers  necessary because of the individual circumstances of the person on
[31]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
post-prison supervision.
(b) If the  person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of a sex crime, as defined in
ORS 163A.005, the board or supervisory authority shall include all of the following as special  con-
ditions of the person’s post-prison supervision:
(A) Agreement to comply with a curfew set by the board, the supervisory authority or the
supervising officer.
(B) A prohibition against contacting a person under  18 years of age without the prior written
approval of the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(C) A prohibition  against being present more than one time, without the prior written approval
of the board, supervisory authority or supervising  officer, at a place where persons under 18 years
of age regularly congregate.
(D) In addition to the prohibition under subparagraph (C) of this  paragraph, a prohibition
against being present, without the prior written approval of the board,  supervisory authority or
supervising officer, at, or on property adjacent to, a school, child care  center, playground or other
place intended for use primarily by persons under 18 years of age.
(E) A prohibition against working or volunteering at a school, child  care center, park, play-
ground or other place where persons under 18 years of age regularly congregate.
(F) Entry into and completion of or successful discharge  from a sex offender treatment program
approved by the  board, supervisory authority or supervising officer. The program may include
polygraph and plethysmograph testing. The person is  responsible for paying for the treatment pro-
gram.
(G) A prohibition against direct or indirect contact with the victim, unless approved  by the
victim, the person’s treatment provider and the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(H) Unless otherwise indicated for the treatment required under subparagraph (F)  of this para-
graph, a prohibition against viewing, listening to, owning or possessing  sexually stimulating visual
or auditory materials that are relevant to the person’s deviant behavior.
(I) Agreement to consent to a search of the  person or the vehicle or residence of the person
upon the request of a representative of the board or supervisory authority  if the representative has
reasonable grounds to believe that  evidence of a violation of a condition of post-prison supervision
will be found.
(J) Participation in  random polygraph examinations to obtain information for risk management
and treatment. The person is responsible for  paying the expenses of the examinations. The results
of a polygraph examination under this subparagraph may not be used in evidence in a hearing  to
prove a violation of post-prison supervision.
(K) Maintenance of a driving log and  a prohibition against driving a motor vehicle alone unless
approved by the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(L) A  prohibition against using a post-office box unless approved by the board, supervisory au-
thority or supervising officer.
(M) A prohibition against residing in a dwelling in which  another sex offender who is on pro-
bation, parole or post-prison supervision resides unless approved by  the board, supervisory authority
or supervising officer, or in which more than one other sex offender who is on probation, parole or
post-prison supervision  resides unless approved by the board or the director of the supervisory au-
thority, or a designee of the board or director. As soon as practicable, the supervising officer of  a
person subject to the  requirements of this subparagraph shall review the person’s living arrange-
ment with  the person’s sex offender treatment provider to ensure that the arrangement supports the
[32]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
goals of offender rehabilitation and community safety.
(c)(A) If the person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of a sex crime, as defined
in ORS 163A.005, or an assault, as defined in ORS 163.175  or 163.185, and the victim was under 18
years of age, the board or supervisory authority, if requested by the victim, shall include as a special
condition of the person’s post-prison supervision that the person not reside within three miles of the
victim unless:
(i) The victim resides in a county having a population of less  than 130,000 and the person is
required to reside in that county under subsection (7) of this section;
(ii) The  person demonstrates to the board or supervisory authority by a preponderance of the
evidence that no mental intimidation or pressure was brought to bear during the  commission of the
crime;
(iii) The person demonstrates  to the board or supervisory authority by a preponderance of the
evidence that imposition of the condition will deprive the person of  a residence that would be
materially significant in  aiding in the rehabilitation of the person or in the success of the post-prison
supervision; or
(iv) The person resides in a halfway house.
(B) A victim may request imposition of the special condition of  post-prison supervision described
in this paragraph at  the time of sentencing in person or through the prosecuting attorney. A victim’s
request may be included in the judgment document.
(C) If the board or supervisory authority imposes  the special condition of post-prison supervision
described in this paragraph and  if at any time during the period of post-prison supervision the victim
moves to within three miles of  the person’s residence, the board or supervisory authority may not
require the person to change the person’s  residence in order to comply with the special condition
of post-prison supervision.
(d)(A) If  a person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of stalking under ORS
163.732 (2)(b) or violating a court’s stalking protective order under ORS 163.750 (2)(b), the board  or
supervisory authority may include as a special condition of the person’s post-prison supervision
reasonable residency restrictions.
(B) If the board or supervisory authority imposes  the special condition of post-prison supervision
described in this paragraph and  if at any time during the period of post-prison supervision the victim
moves to a location that causes the person to be in violation of the special condition of post-prison
supervision, the board or supervisory authority may not require the person to change the  person’s
residence in order to comply with the special condition of post-prison supervision.
(5)(a) The board  or supervisory authority may require the person to pay, as a condition of
post-prison supervision, compensatory fines, restitution or attorney fees:
(A) As determined, imposed or required by the sentencing court; or
(B) When previously required as a condition of any type of supervision that is later revoked.
(b) The board may require a person to  pay restitution as a condition of post-prison supervision
imposed for an offense other than the offense for which the restitution was ordered if the person:
(A) Was ordered to pay restitution as a result of another conviction; and
(B) Has not fully paid the restitution by the time the person has completed the period of post-
prison supervision imposed for the offense for which the restitution was ordered.
(6) A person’s failure to apply for or accept employment at a workplace  where there is a labor
dispute in progress does not constitute a violation of the conditions of post-prison supervision.
(7)(a) When  a person is released from imprisonment on post-prison supervision, the board shall
[33]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
order as a condition of  post-prison supervision that the person reside for the first six months after
release in the county that last supervised the person, if the person was on active supervision  as an
adult for a felony at the time of the offense that resulted in the imprisonment.
(b) If the person was not on active supervision as an adult  for a felony at the time of the offense
that resulted in the imprisonment, the board shall order  as a condition of post-prison supervision
that the person reside for the first six months after release in the county where the person  resided
at the time of the offense that resulted in the imprisonment.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (b) of this subsection:
(A) The board shall determine the county where the person resided at the  time of the offense
by examining records such as:
(i) An Oregon driver license, regardless of its validity;
(ii) Records maintained by the Department of Revenue;
(iii) Records maintained by the Department of State Police;
(iv) Records maintained by the Department of Human Services;
(v) Records maintained by the Department of Corrections; and
(vi) Records maintained by the Oregon Health Authority.
(B) If the person did not have an identifiable  address at the time of the offense, or the address
cannot be determined, the person is considered to have resided in the county where the  offense oc-
curred.
(C) If  the person is serving multiple sentences, the county of residence is determined according
to the date of the last arrest resulting in a conviction.
(D) In determining the person’s county of residence, the  board may not consider offenses com-
mitted by the person while the person was incarcerated in a Department of Corrections facility.
(d) Upon motion of the board, the supervisory authority, the person, a victim or a district at-
torney, the board may waive the residency condition under paragraph (b) of this subsection  only
after making a finding that one of the following conditions has been met:
(A) The person provides proof of employment with no set ending date  in a county other than the
county of residence determined under paragraph (c) of this section;
(B) The person is found to pose a significant danger to a victim of the person’s crime residing
in the county of residence, or a victim or victim’s family residing in  the county of residence is found
to pose a significant danger to the person;
(C) The person has a spouse or biological or adoptive family residing in a county other than  the
county of residence who will be materially significant in aiding in the  rehabilitation of the person
and in the success of the post-prison supervision;
(D) As another condition  of post-prison supervision, the person is required to participate in a
treatment program that is not available in the county of residence;
(E) The person requests release to another state; or
(F) The board finds other good cause for the waiver.
(e) The board shall consider eligibility  for transitional housing programs and residential treat-
ment programs when determining whether to waive the residency condition under paragraph  (b) of
this subsection, and the acceptance of the person into a  transitional housing program or a residen-
tial treatment program constitutes good cause as described in paragraph (d)(F) of this subsection.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Attends,” “carries  on a vocation,” “institution of higher education” and “works” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
[34]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b)(A) “Dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 469B.100.
(B) “Dwelling” does not mean a residential treatment facility or a halfway house.
(c) “Halfway house” means a residential facility that provides  rehabilitative care and treatment
for sex offenders.
(d) “Labor dispute” has the meaning given that term in ORS 662.010.
(Limit on Violation Sanctions and Conforming Amendments)
SECTION 33.
 ORS 137.010 is amended to read:
137.010. (1) The statutes that define offenses impose a duty  upon the court having jurisdiction
to pass sentence in accordance with this section or, for felonies committed on or  after November
1, 1989, in accordance with rules of the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission unless otherwise spe-
cifically provided by law.
(2) If it cannot be determined whether the felony was committed on  or after November 1, 1989,
the defendant shall be sentenced as if the felony had been committed prior to November 1, 1989.
(3) Except when a person is convicted of a felony committed on or after November  1, 1989, if
the court is of the opinion that it is in the  best interests of the public as well as of the defendant,
the court may suspend the imposition or execution of any part of a sentence for any period  of not
more than five years. The court may extend  the period of suspension beyond five years in accord-
ance with subsection (4) of this section.
(4) If the court suspends the imposition or execution of a part of a sentence for an offense other
than a felony committed on or after November 1,  1989, the court may also impose and execute a
sentence of probation on  the defendant for a definite or indefinite period of not more than five years.
However, upon a later finding that a defendant sentenced to  probation for a felony has violated a
condition of the probation [ and in lieu of revocation ], the court may order  the period of both the
suspended sentence and  the sentence of probation extended until a date not more than six years
from the date of original imposition of sentence. Time  during which the probationer has absconded
from supervision and a bench warrant has been issued for the  probationer’s arrest shall not be
counted in determining the time elapsed since imposition of the sentence of probation.
(5) If the court announces that it intends to suspend imposition or execution of any part of  a
sentence, the defendant may, at that time, object and  request imposition of the full sentence. In no
case, however, does the defendant have a right to refuse the court’s order, and the court  may sus-
pend imposition or execution of a part of the sentence despite the defendant’s  objection or request.
If the court further announces that it intends to sentence  the defendant to a period of probation, the
defendant may, at that time, object and request that a sentence of  probation or its conditions not
be imposed or that different conditions be imposed. In no case, however, does the  defendant have
the right to refuse  a sentence of probation or any of the conditions of the probation, and the court
may sentence the defendant to probation subject to conditions despite the defendant’s  objection or
request.
(6) The power of the judge of any court to suspend execution of any part of a  sentence or to
sentence any person convicted of a crime to probation shall continue until the  person is delivered
to the custody of the Department of Corrections.
(7) When a person is convicted of an offense and the court does not suspend the  imposition or
execution of any part of a sentence  or when a suspended sentence or sentence of probation is re-
voked, the court shall impose the following sentence:
[35]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A term of imprisonment;
(b) A fine;
(c) Both imprisonment and a fine; or
(d) Discharge of the defendant.
(8) This section does not deprive the court of any authority  conferred by law to enter a judg-
ment for the forfeiture of property, suspend or cancel a license, remove a  person from office or im-
pose any other civil penalty. An order exercising that authority may be included as  part of the
judgment of conviction.
(9) When imposing sentence for a felony  committed on or after November 1, 1989, the court shall
submit sentencing information to the commission in accordance with rules of the commission.
(10) A judgment of conviction that includes a term  of imprisonment for a felony committed on
or after November 1, 1989, shall state the length of  incarceration and the length of post-prison
supervision.  The  judgment of conviction shall also provide that if the defendant violates the condi-
tions of post-prison supervision, the defendant shall be subject to sanctions  including the possibility
of additional imprisonment in accordance with rules of the commission.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 137.128 is amended to read:
137.128. (1) A judge may sentence an offender  to community service either as an alternative to
incarceration or fine or probation, or as a condition of  probation. Prior to such order of community
service the offender  must consent to donate labor for the welfare of the public. The court or its
delegate may select community service tasks that  are within the offender’s capabilities and are to
be performed within a reasonable length of time during hours the offender is not  working or at-
tending school.
(2) Failure  to perform a community service sentence may be grounds for [ revocation of probation
or] a finding that the offender has violated the conditions of probation or  contempt of court.
SECTION 35.  ORS 137.525 is amended to read:
137.525. (1) If a person pleads guilty or no contest  to, or is found guilty of, a crime described in
ORS 163.305 to  163.467, and if the court contemplates sentencing the person to probation, the court,
before entering judgment, may order that the person undergo an examination by a  psychiatrist or
other physician found qualified and  appointed by the court to determine whether available medical
treatment would be likely to reduce such  biological, emotional or psychological impulses, including
any paraphilia, which may be the cause of the criminal conduct and,  if so, whether the person is a
suitable candidate medically for such treatment. Such medical treatments may include the taking
of prescribed medication.
(2) If the examining psychiatrist or other physician reports that available medical  treatment
would be likely to reduce the biological, emotional or psychological impulses that were a  probable
cause of the criminal conduct, and that the person is a suitable candidate  medically for such treat-
ment, the court  may include as a condition of probation that the person participate in a prescribed
program of medicine and accept medical  treatment at the person’s own expense under the care of
the psychiatrist or other physician appointed by the court and  that the person faithfully participate
in the prescribed program of medical treatment during the course of the probation.
(3) A sentence of probation under this section  shall not be imposed except upon the written
consent of the convicted person. [Probation under this section may be revoked ] A person serving
a sentence of probation under this section may be found in violation of the conditions  of
probation upon any failure of the [ convicted] person to cooperate in  the treatment program, in-
cluding, but not limited to, any failure to meet with the treating physician as directed by the phy-
[36]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sician or to take medication or otherwise to participate in  the prescribed program of medical
treatment during the course of the probation.
SECTION 36.
 ORS 137.595 is amended to read:
137.595. (1) The Department  of Corrections shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of chap-
ter 680, Oregon Laws 1993, by establishing a system of structured, intermediate probation  violation
sanctions that may be imposed by the Department  of Corrections or a county community corrections
agency, taking into consideration the  severity of the violation behavior, the prior violation history,
the severity of the underlying criminal conviction, the criminal history of the offender, protection
of the community, deterrence, the effective capacity of the state prisons and the availability  of ap-
propriate local sanctions including,  but not limited to, jail, community service work, house arrest,
electronic surveillance, restitution centers,  work release centers, day reporting centers or other lo-
cal sanctions.
(2) Rules adopted by the Department of Corrections under this section shall establish:
(a) A system of structured, intermediate probation violation  sanctions that may be imposed by
the Department of Corrections or a county community corrections agency  on a probationer who
waives in writing a probation violation hearing, admits or affirmatively chooses not to contest  the
violations alleged in a probation violation report and consents to the sanctions;
(b) Procedures to provide a probationer with  written notice of the probationer’s right to a
hearing before the court to determine whether the probationer  violated the conditions of probation
alleged in a probation violation report, and if so, whether to continue the probationer on probation
subject to the  same or modified conditions, or order sanctions for any violations and the right to
be represented by counsel at the hearing if the probationer is financially eligible;
(c) Procedures for a probationer to waive in writing  a probation violation hearing, admit or not
contest the violations alleged in the probation violation report and consent to the imposition of
structured, intermediate sanctions by the Department of Corrections or a  county community cor-
rections agency;
(d) The level and type of sanctions that may be imposed by parole and probation officers and
by supervisory personnel , and a prohibition on the imposition of jail confinement as a sanction
when the probation  violation is based solely on the probationer’s use of a controlled sub-
stance;
(e) [ The level and ] That the  type of violation behavior warranting  a recommendation to the
court that probation be revoked  may consist only of  willfully absconding from probation or
committing a new felony or person Class A  misdemeanor, as that term is defined in the rules
of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission ;
(f) Procedures  for notifying district attorneys and the courts of probation violations admitted
by probationers and the sanctions  imposed by the Department of Corrections or county community
corrections agencies; and
(g) Such other policies or  procedures as are necessary to carry out the purposes of chapter 680,
Oregon Laws 1993.
(3) Jail confinement imposed  as a custodial sanction by the Department of Corrections or a
county community corrections agency pursuant to rules adopted under this  section may not exceed
60 days per violation  report. The total number of days of jail confinement for all violation reports
per conviction may not exceed the maximum number of  available jail custody units under rules
adopted by the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(4) Nonjail confinement imposed as a custodial  sanction by the Department of Corrections or a
[37]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
county community corrections agency pursuant to rules adopted under this  section may not exceed
the maximum number of available nonjail custody units under rules adopted by the Oregon Criminal
Justice  Commission.
SECTION 37.
 ORS 144.108 is amended to read:
144.108. (1) If the violation of post-prison supervision  is new criminal activity or if the supervi-
sory authority finds that  the continuum of sanctions is insufficient punishment for a violation of the
conditions of post-prison supervision, the supervisory authority may:
(a) Impose the most restrictive sanction available, including incarceration in jail;
(b) Request the State Board of Parole  and Post-Prison Supervision to impose a sanction under
subsection (2) of this section; or
(c) Request the board to impose a sanction under ORS 144.107.
(2) If so requested, the board or its designated representative shall hold a hearing to  determine
whether incarceration  in a jail or state correctional facility is appropriate. Except as otherwise
provided by rules of the board and the Department of Corrections concerning parole and  post-prison
supervision violators, the board may impose a sanction up to the maximum  provided by rules of the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission. In conducting a hearing  pursuant to this subsection, the board
or its designated  representative shall follow the procedures and the offender shall have all the rights
described in ORS 144.343 and 144.347 relating to revocation of parole.
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the board or  supervisory au-
thority may not revoke post-prison supervision unless the person  on supervision has willfully
absconded or committed  a new felony or person Class A misdemeanor, as that term is de-
fined in the rules
[(3)] (4) A person who is ordered to serve a term of  incarceration in a jail or state correctional
facility as a sanction for a post-prison supervision violation is not eligible for:
(a) Earned credit time as described in ORS 169.110 or 421.121;
(b) Transitional leave as defined in ORS 421.168; or
(c) Temporary leave as described in ORS 169.115 or 421.165 (1987 Replacement Part).
[(4)] (5) A person who is ordered to serve a term of incarceration in a state correctional  facility
as a sanction for a post-prison supervision violation  shall receive credit for time served on the
post-prison supervision violation prior to the board’s imposition of the term of incarceration.
(Abolition of Supervision Fees and Conforming Amendments)
SECTION 38.
ORS 423.570 is repealed.
SECTION 39.  ORS 133.865 is amended to read:
133.865. (1) The Arrest and Return Account is established separate and distinct from the General
Fund. The account consists of moneys deposited into the account under ORS  [ 137.540,] 144.605 and
161.665, moneys  allocated to the account under ORS 137.300 and other moneys received by the
Governor for the purpose of paying the costs of extraditing defendants.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, moneys in the account  are continuously
appropriated to the Governor for the purpose of  paying costs incurred in carrying out the provisions
of ORS 133.743 to 133.857.
(3) Moneys deposited in the  Arrest and Return Account under ORS 144.605 are continuously
appropriated  to  the Governor for the purpose of paying costs incurred in retaking offenders who
have transferred supervision  under the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision described
[38]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in ORS 144.600.
SECTION 40.
 ORS 137.630 is amended to read:
137.630. (1) The duties of parole and probation  officers appointed pursuant to ORS 137.590 or
423.500 to 423.560 are:
(a) To  make investigations and reports under ORS 137.530 as are required by the judge of any
court  having  jurisdiction within the county, city or judicial district for which the officer is appointed
to serve.
(b) To receive under supervision any person sentenced to probation by any court  in the juris-
diction area for which the officers are appointed to serve.
(c) To provide release assistance, and supervise any person  placed in a diversion, work release
or community  services alternative program, by any court in the jurisdiction area for which the of-
ficers are appointed to serve.
(d) To give each person under their supervision a statement of the conditions of probation  or
program participation and to instruct the person regarding the conditions.
(e) To keep informed concerning the conduct and condition  of persons under their supervision
by visiting, requiring reports and otherwise.
(f) To use all suitable methods, not inconsistent with the condition of  probation or program
participation, to aid and encourage persons under their supervision and to effect improvement  in
their conduct and condition.
(g) To keep detailed records of the work done and to make reports to the courts and to  the
Department of Corrections as the courts require.
(h) To perform other duties not inconsistent with the normal and customary functions of  parole
and probation officers as  may be required by any court in the jurisdiction area for which the officers
are appointed to serve.
(2) Parole and probation officers of  the Department of Corrections have duties as specified by
rule adopted by the Director of the Department of Corrections.
(3) Notwithstanding  subsection (2) of this section, parole and probation officers may not be re-
quired to collect from  persons under their supervision any fees to offset the costs of supervising the
probation[ , including but not limited to those ordered pursuant to ORS 137.540 or 423.570 ].
SECTION 41.  ORS 144.089 is amended to read:
144.089. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based organization” means a not-for-profit organization or entity or a local or
county government.
(b) “Community service” has the meaning given that term under ORS 137.126.
(c) “Delinquent fees or debts” means:
(A) Unpaid costs for conviction;
(B) Attorney fees;
(C) Costs related to criminal conviction that a person accumulated while incarcerated; or
(D) Fees of any judgment that includes  a monetary obligation that the court or judicial branch
is charged with collecting as described in ORS 1.202.
(d) “Person” means an individual who has served a sentence in the legal and  physical custody
of the Department of Corrections and who is  serving an active period of parole or post-prison
supervision.
(e) “Supervisory authority” has the meaning given that term under ORS 144.087.
(2)(a) The county  governing body of each county shall establish a community service exchange
[39]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
program for the county.
(b) The local supervisory authority may determine whether to participate in the  community
service exchange program.
(c) The local supervisory authority may determine whether a community-based organization
qualifies for the community service exchange program.
(d) A person may not participate in the community service exchange program more than once.
(3) The  community service exchange program may not result in a waiver of unpaid balances for:
(a) Restitution or compensatory fines imposed under ORS 137.101 to 137.109;
(b) Unpaid obligations imposed by a support order under ORS chapter 25;
(c) Fines for misdemeanors and felonies under ORS 137.286; or
(d) Fines for traffic offenses.
(4) In order to be eligible to participate in the community service exchange program, a person
must:
(a) Enter into a written agreement  with a community-based organization to perform community
service in exchange for a waiver of delinquent fees or debts [ and supervision fees ]; and
(b) Obtain the approval of the terms of the written agreement  of the local supervisory authority.
(5) A community-based organization shall supervise and  record the community service that a
person performs to fulfill the  requirements established by the written agreement described under
this section. The community-based organization shall  notify the local supervisory authority as soon
as a person has entered into the community service exchange program and when the person  has
successfully fulfilled or failed to meet the requirements of the program.
(6) Within 30 days of the local supervisory authority’s receiving notification that a person is
participating in the community service exchange program[ :],
[(a)] the local supervisory authority shall notify the court of the  county in which the person was
convicted. Notwithstanding ORS 137.143, upon notification from the local  supervisory authority, the
court shall suspend all collection activity of delinquent fees or debts.
[(b) If a person is under the supervision of a community  corrections agency, the local supervisory
authority shall notify the community corrections agency. The community corrections agency or the  local
supervisory  authority  shall cause all collection of supervision fees, including but not limited to those
ordered pursuant to ORS 423.570, to be ceased. ]
[(c) If the person is under the  supervision of the local supervisory authority, the local supervisory
authority shall cause all  collection of supervision fees, including but not limited to those ordered pur-
suant to ORS 423.570, to be ceased. ]
(7)(a) When a person has successfully fulfilled the requirements of the community service ex-
change program, the community-based  organization shall notify the local supervisory authority and
the local supervisory authority shall send a notice of completion to the court  of the county in which
the person was convicted.
[(b) If the person is under the  supervision of the local supervisory authority, upon notification of
completion from the community-based organization, the local  supervisory authority shall waive the
supervision fees, including but not limited to those ordered pursuant to ORS 423.570. ]
[(c) If  the person is under the supervision of a community corrections agency or other local super-
visory authority, upon notification of completion from the community-based organization, the  local su-
pervisory authority shall notify the community corrections  agency and the community corrections
agency or local supervisory authority shall waive the supervision fees, including but not limited to those
ordered pursuant to ORS 423.570, and the local supervisory authority may  waive all other fees to offset
[40]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the costs of supervision. ]
[(d)] (b)  Upon  notification of completion from the local supervisory authority, the court shall
update the record of monetary obligations imposed for the convictions to reflect a waiver of  delin-
quent fees or debts.
(8) If a person fails to meet the requirements of the community service exchange program:
(a) The community-based organization shall notify the local supervisory authority and, if  appli-
cable, the local supervisory authority shall notify the community  corrections agency or other local
supervisory authority. [ Upon notification, the local  supervisory authority or the community corrections
agency shall resume collection of the supervision fees, including but not limited to  those ordered pur-
suant to ORS 423.570. ]
(b) Within 30 days of the local supervisory  authority’s receiving notification from the
community-based organization, the  local supervisory authority shall notify the court of the county
in which the person was convicted.
(c) Upon  notification from the local supervisory authority, the court shall resume collection of
delinquent fees or debts.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 144.103 is amended to read:
144.103. (1) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 137.765 and subsection (2) of this section, any
person sentenced to a term of imprisonment for  violating or attempting to violate ORS 163.365,
163.375, 163.395, 163.405, 163.408, 163.411, 163.425 or 163.427 shall serve a  term of active post-prison
supervision that continues until the term of the post-prison  supervision, when added to the term of
imprisonment served, equals the maximum statutory indeterminate sentence for the violation.
(2)(a) A person sentenced to a term of  imprisonment for violating one of the offenses listed in
paragraph (b) of  this subsection shall serve a term of post-prison supervision that continues for the
rest of the person’s life if the person was at least 18 years of age at  the time the person committed
the crime.
(b) The offenses to which paragraph (a) of this subsection applies are:
(A) ORS 163.375 (1)(b);
(B) ORS 163.405 (1)(b);
(C) ORS 163.411 (1)(b); and
(D) ORS 163.235 when the offense is committed in furtherance of  the commission or attempted
commission of rape in the first degree, sodomy in the first degree or unlawful  sexual penetration in
the first degree if the victim is under 12 years of age.
(c) When a person is sentenced to a term of post-prison supervision described in paragraph  (a)
of this subsection, the person must be actively  supervised for at least the first 10 years of the
post-prison supervision and actively tracked for the remainder  of the term. Active tracking may be
done by means of an electronic device attached to the person.
(3) A person sentenced to a term of imprisonment for violating ORS 163.185  (1)(b) shall serve a
term of post-prison supervision that continues until the term of  the post-prison supervision, when
added to the term of imprisonment served, equals the maximum statutory  indeterminate sentence for
the violation.
[(4) Any costs incurred as a result  of this section shall be paid by increased post-prison supervision
fees under ORS 423.570. ]
(Applicability)
[41]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 43.
The amendments to ORS 133.865,  137.010, 137.128, 137.525, 137.540, 137.595,
137.630, 137.633, 144.089, 144.102, 144.103 and 144.108 by sections  30 to 37 and 39 to 42 of this
2021 Act and the repeal of ORS 423.570 by section 38  of this 2021 Act apply to sentences im-
posed on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
JUSTICE REINVESTMENT PROGRAM CHANGES
SECTION 44.  Section 53, chapter 649,  Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section 54, chapter
649, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 1, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 53.  (1)(a) In consultation with the Justice Reinvestment Grant Review  Committee estab-
lished under  subsection (2) of this section, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall administer
the Justice Reinvestment Program described in this section.  From funds appropriated to the com-
mission for purposes of the program, the commission shall award grants to :
(A) Counties that establish a process to assess offenders and provide a continuum  of
community-based sanctions, services and programs that are  designed to reduce recidivism and de-
crease the county’s utilization of imprisonment in a Department  of Corrections institution while
protecting public safety and holding offenders accountable[ .]; and
(B) Community-based organizations, culturally specific organizations  and culturally re-
sponsive service providers that provide:
(i) Mental health and substance use disorder treatment;
(ii) Maternal health services;
(iii) Trauma-informed restorative justice services;
(iv) Violence reduction programs, including  but not limited to violence interruption
mentors or after-school programs focused on art, music, theater or dance;
(v) Crisis intervention without police involvement;
(vi) Reentry programs  that are connected to education, work force development and
transitional supports;
(vii) Long-term supportive housing;
(viii) Support for setting aside conviction records;
(ix) Pretrial release support;
(x) Services for victims, including incarcerated victims or victims on pretrial release;
(xi) Programs for persons, and families of  persons, who are currently or were formerly
incarcerated;
(xii) Programs designed to reduce recidivism  and reduce contact with the criminal justice
system; or
(xiii) Programs for persons who have been impacted by police violence,  either directly or
through a family member.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection[ ,]:
(A) No less than [ 10] 15 percent  of grant funds awarded under this section must be distributed
to community-based [ nonprofit] organizations that  provide services to victims of crime , with priority
given to culturally specific organizations .
(B) No less than 20 percent of grant funds awarded under this section must be distributed
to culturally specific organizations and culturally responsive service providers. The distrib-
ution of funds required by this subparagraph is in addition to any funds  distributed under
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. Up to 25 percent of funds distributed  under this sub-
[42]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
paragraph may be used for  costs associated with the fiscal agent selected under subsection
(5)(a) of this section.
(2) The Justice Reinvestment Grant Review Committee is established,  consisting of the following
members:
(a) The Governor shall appoint the following seven members:
(A) One member shall be a district attorney.
(B) One member shall be a county sheriff.
(C) One member shall be a chief of police.
(D) One member shall be a county commissioner.
(E) One member shall be a community corrections director who is not a sheriff.
(F) Two members shall be representatives of community-based organizations that  provide ser-
vices for underserved racial, ethnic or minority communities.
(b) The Chief Justice of the Supreme  Court shall appoint one nonvoting member who is a judge.
(c) The President of the Senate shall appoint two nonvoting members from  among members of
the Senate.
(d) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint two  nonvoting members from
among members of the House of Representatives.
(3)(a) A majority of the voting members of the  committee constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(b) The committee shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(c) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appointment to
become effective immediately.
(d) The committee shall meet  at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson or a
majority of the voting members of the committee.
(e) Legislative members  of the committee shall be entitled to payment of compensation and ex-
penses under ORS 171.072, payable from funds appropriated to the Legislative Assembly.
(4)(a) An application for a grant described in this section must  be submitted by a local public
safety coordinating council convened under ORS 423.560.
(b) The grant application must include a statement of commitment, from the  relevant
stakeholders of the  service or program for which the county is requesting funding and including the
district attorney, presiding judge and community corrections director, to reduce recidivism and  de-
crease the county’s utilization of imprisonment in Department of Corrections  facilities while pro-
tecting public safety and holding offenders accountable.
(5)(a) [ During a grant application period established by the commission,  the proportion of grant
funds available to each county shall be determined in accordance with  the formula used to distribute
baseline funding under ORS  423.483.] The commission shall convene the advisory committee
described in ORS 137.658 (3) to issue a request for proposals for a  fiscal agent to distribute
Justice Reinvestment Program funds to community-based organizations  and to provide
technical assistance and operational support to the  organizations. No later than December
31, 2021, the advisory committee shall select, and  the commission shall enter into a contract
with, a fiscal agent.
(b) At the conclusion of the grant application  period, the commission shall award grants to
counties  and to the fiscal agent described in paragraph (a) of this subsection  in accordance
with rules adopted by the commission.
(c) If unallocated funds remain at the  conclusion of the grant acceptance period, the commission
[43]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
may establish a supplemental grant period and distribute the unallocated funds.
(6)(a) The commission shall regularly evaluate  the community-based sanctions, services and
programs funded  under this section. The commission shall specifically assess the extent to which
each county is reducing utilization of imprisonment in Department of Corrections facilities  by
offenders convicted of felonies under ORS 137.717, 475.752 to 475.980, 811.182, 813.010 or 813.011.
(b) The commission shall report the results of an evaluation conducted under this section  to a
committee of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary.
(7)(a) Before applying for grant funds to administer a community-based  program described in
subsection (10)(a)(D) of this section, the county must obtain the  consent of the presiding judge of the
judicial district in which the county is located.
(b) A grant application to administer a  community-based program described in subsection
(10)(a)(D) of this section must include the costs of appointed counsel.
(8) After consulting with the Justice Reinvestment Grant Review  Committee, the commission
shall adopt rules to administer the Justice Reinvestment Program. The rules must include:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications  and distributing grant funds.
Rules described in this paragraph must provide the Justice Reinvestment Grant  Review Committee
with the ability to approve grant applications for submission for final approval by the commission.
The commission  may either approve the grant application or return the application for reconsider-
ation by the committee.
(b) A process  for evaluating the efficacy of community-based sanctions, services and programs
funded under this section.
(c) A requirement that the grant review committee consider, when approving grant applications,
each county’s historical reduction of utilization of imprisonment in  Department of Corrections fa-
cilities by offenders convicted of felonies under ORS 137.717,  475.752 to 475.980, 811.182, 813.010 or
813.011.
(d) Provisions allowing the grant review  committee to submit to the commission, and the com-
mission to approve, provisional funding plans for counties applying for grants under this section.
(9)(a) If a county does not reduce utilization of imprisonment in  Department of Corrections fa-
cilities by offenders convicted of felonies under  ORS 137.717, 475.752 to 475.980, 811.182, 813.010 or
813.011, upon request of the grant review committee, the commission  shall decline to grant the full
grant amount requested by a county, provide technical assistance,  withhold approved grant funds
or terminate further distribution of the grant award.
(b) If the commission takes an action described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, any  remain-
ing moneys may be redistributed by  the commission through a supplemental grant program. Priority
shall be given to counties  funding programs for historically underserved communities including rural
communities, racial, ethnic and minority communities and  tribal communities. Rural counties may
apply for supplemental grants in cooperation with other rural counties.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based programs” includes:
(A) Work release programs;
(B) Structured, transitional leave programs;
(C) Evidence-based programs designed to reduce recidivism that include the balanced adminis-
tration of sanctions, supervision and treatment;
(D) Administering  a reentry court under section 29 [ of this 2013 Act ], chapter 649, Oregon
Laws 2013; and
[44]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(E) Specialty courts aimed at medium-risk and high-risk offenders.
(b) “Culturally responsive service” means a service  that is respectful of, and relevant to,
the beliefs, practices, cultures and linguistic  needs of diverse consumer or client populations
and communities whose members identify as having particular cultural  or linguistic affil-
iations by virtue of their place of birth, ancestry  or ethnic origin, religion, preferred lan-
guage or language  spoken at home. A culturally responsive service has the capacity to
respond to the issues of diverse communities and require  knowledge and capacity at
systemic, organizational, professional and individual levels of intervention.
(c) “Culturally specific organization” means an organization that serves  a particular
cultural community, that is primarily staffed  and led by members of that community, and
that demonstrates intimate knowledge of the lived experience  of the community, including
but not limited to:
(A) The impact  of structural and individual racism or discrimination directed against the
community;
(B) Specific disparities, barriers or challenges documented in the community and  how
those disparities, barriers or challenges influence the structure of the organization;
(C) Commitment to  the community’s strength-based and self-driven thriving and
resilience; and
(D) The ability to  describe and adapt the organization’s services to the community’s
cultural practices, health and safety beliefs and practices, positive cultural  identity and pride
or religious beliefs.
[(b)] (d) “County” includes a regional collection of counties.
CRIMINAL JUSTICE DATA REPORTING
SECTION 45.
(1)(a) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall  collect data concern-
ing the disparate imposition of supervision conditions.
(b) The commission shall review the  data described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
and make the data, disaggregated  by race, gender identity, sexual orientation and county,
available to the public in a clear and accessible  format, either in a report or on the website
of the commission,
(2)(a) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, in coordination with  the Department of
Corrections, shall  collect data concerning the number of persons on supervision, persons
revoked from supervision  and sentenced to incarceration, and persons sanctioned for violat-
ing conditions of supervision and serving a sanction in a local correctional facility.
(b) The commission shall review the  data described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
and make the data, disaggregated  by race, gender identity, sexual orientation and county,
available to the public in a clear and accessible  format, either in a report or on the website
of the commission.
SECTION 46. Section 45 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 1, 2032.
SECTION 47. (1) No later than January 1, 2022, the  Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
shall report to committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to the judiciary, in the man-
ner provided under ORS 192.245, the following information:
(a)(A) The amount and percent of Justice Reinvestment Program funds provided to cul-
turally specific organizations and culturally responsive service providers;
[45]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The specific culturally specific  organizations and culturally responsive service pro-
viders that received program funds; and
(C) The populations served by the culturally specific organizations and culturally  re-
sponsive service providers that received program funds, disaggregated  by race, gender iden-
tity, sexual orientation and county;
(b)(A) The amount  and percentage of Justice Reinvestment Program funds provided to
counties for community-based sanctions, services and programs;
(B) The specific sanctions, services and programs that received program funds; and
(C) The populations  served by the sanctions, services and programs that received pro-
gram funds, disaggregated by race, gender identity, sexual orientation and county; and
(c)(A) The  amount and percentage of Justice Reinvestment Program funds provided to
community-based organizations that provide services to victims of crime; and
(B) The specific organizations that received program funds.
(2) No later than September 15,  2022, the commission shall provide a supplementary re-
port to committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary, in the manner pro-
vided under ORS 192.245, with updated information described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Culturally responsive service” means a service  that is respectful of, and relevant to,
the beliefs, practices, cultures and linguistic  needs of diverse consumer or client populations
and communities whose members  identify as having particular cultural or linguistic affil-
iations by virtue of their place of  birth, ancestry or ethnic origin, religion, preferred lan-
guage or language spoken at home. A culturally responsive service has the  capacity to
respond to the issues of  diverse communities and require knowledge and capacity at
systemic, organizational, professional and individual levels of intervention.
(b) “Culturally specific organization” means an organization that  serves a particular
cultural community, that is primarily staffed  and led by members of that community, and
that demonstrates intimate knowledge of the lived experience  of the community, including
but not limited to:
(A) The impact  of structural and individual racism or discrimination directed against the
community;
(B) Specific disparities, barriers or challenges documented in the community and  how
those disparities, barriers or challenges influence the structure of the organization;
(C) Commitment to  the community’s strength-based and self-driven thriving and
resilience; and
(D) The ability to  describe and adapt the organization’s services to the community’s
cultural practices, health and safety beliefs and practices, positive cultural  identity and pride
or religious beliefs.
SECTION 48.
Section 47 of this 2021 Act is repealed on July 1, 2023.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 49. The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
[46]
HB 2002
1
2
3
4
5
6
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 50.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[47]