Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2017 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
401.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Appropriate public places” includes structures, facilities and open spaces that:
(A) Are  suitable for use, or development, as a staging area for response to and recovery
from a large-scale emergency;
(B) Contain, or may be  developed with, infrastructure for uses that are compatible with
or complementary to use as a staging  area, including state parks, state fairgrounds, county
parks and county fairgrounds; and
(C) Are, or may be, developed for  multiple uses, including use as a staging area from
which to respond to and recover from a large-scale emergency.
(b) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(2) The Office of Emergency Management shall adopt  by rule and implement a strategy
to identify and select appropriate public places  and to construct or modify, in the appropriate
public places, infrastructure to support preparedness for emergency response to  and recov-
ery from a large-scale emergency.
(3) In developing and implementing the strategy  to construct emergency response and
recovery infrastructure in appropriate public places:
(a) The office shall coordinate its activities  with appropriate state agencies and with local
governments that include emergency services agencies.
(b) A public body may make facilities and structures available for use as a staging area
from which to respond to and recover from a large-scale emergency.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon  Public Places Are Safe Places Investment Fund is established
in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) Amounts in the Oregon Public Places Are  Safe Places Investment Fund may be in-
vested as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and interest earned  on moneys in the fund must
be credited to the fund.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1310
HB 2886
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
(3) Amounts credited to the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Office of Emer-
gency Management for the purpose described in section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(4) The office shall deposit in the fund:
(a) Amounts appropriated, or otherwise provided,  by the Legislative Assembly for the
purpose described in section 2 of this 2017 Act; and
(b) Gifts, grants or contributions received by the office for the purpose described in sec-
tion 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2017 Act shall be known and may be cited as the
Oregon Public Places Resiliency Investment Act.
[2]