Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in this section and sections 2 to 14 of this 2020 Act:
(1) “Actual conflict of interest” has the meaning given that term in ORS 244.020.
(2) “Aerial application  of pesticides” means the spraying or any other application of pes-
ticide by aircraft.
(3) “Aerial pesticide applicator” means a person certified under ORS 634.128.
(4) “Clearcut logging”:
(a) Means  a Harvest type 1, Harvest type 2 or Harvest type 3 operation, as those terms
are defined in ORS 527.620.
(b) Does not mean firewood cutting or timber milling for personal use.
(5) “Common ownership” means:
(a) Direct ownership by one or more individuals;
(b) Ownership by a corporation, partnership or association; or
(c) Ownership by an entity in which one or more individuals or an affiliated  corporation,
partnership, association or other entity owns an interest.
(6) “Common School Forest Lands” means forest parcels managed by the State  Land
Board that were granted to the state by the federal government  when Oregon obtained
statehood.
(7) “Emergency” means an actual or imminent threat of  catastrophe, disaster or un-
foreseen condition or circumstance that causes or threatens to cause widespread loss of  life
or injury to person or property.
(8) “Fishbearing stream” means a stream:
(a) Inhabited at any time of the year by:
(A) Anadromous or game fish species;
(B) Fish that are identified on any lists that  are adopted, by rule, by the State Fish and
Wildlife Commission; or
(C) Fish that are listed under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (P.L.  93-205, 16
U.S.C. 1531), as amended; or
(b) That contains fish habitat accessible to fish  species described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(9) “Forest operation” means any commercial activity relating to the growing or har-
vesting of a forest tree species as defined in ORS 527.620.
(10) “Forest waters” means any waters of this state, as defined in ORS 536.007, on
forestland.
(11) “Large stream” means  a stream with an average annual flow of 10 cubic feet per
second or greater.
(12) “Medium stream” means a stream with  an average annual flow greater than 2 and
less than 10 cubic feet per second.
(13) “Perennial stream” means:
(a) Flowing water that does not go dry at any time  during a year having normal rainfall;
[2]
HB 4025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or
(b) Intermittently dry portions of  a perennial channel below the uppermost point of per-
ennial flow.
(14) “Pesticide” has the meaning given that term in ORS 634.006.
(15) “Pesticide operator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 634.006.
(16) “Public official” has the meaning given that term in ORS 244.020.
(17) “Small tract forestland” means forestland that:
(a) Is subject to assessment under ORS 321.700 to 321.754 and  from which the harvesting
of timber is subject to severance taxation under ORS 321.700 to 321.754;
(b) Has an owner that owns or holds common ownership in  at least 10 acres of Oregon
forestland but less than 5,000 acres of Oregon forestland; and
(c) Constitutes all forestland within  a single tax lot and all forestland within contiguous
parcels owned or held in common ownership by the owner.
(18) “Stream”:
(a) Means the following parts of a river, creek or other channel that carries  flowing
surface water during part of the year:
(A) The water and any vegetation, aquatic life or habitats in the water;
(B) Beds  and banks below the high-water level capable of containing water, whether or
not water is actually present;
(C) The area between the high-water level of connected side channels;
(D) Beaver ponds, oxbows and side channels, if connected by surface  flow to the stream
during a portion of the year;
(E) Stream-associated wetlands; and
(F) The area adjacent to an unconfined stream channel where, except as modified  by a
permanent levee or dike, channel  location is reasonably expected to shift position on its
floodplain through lateral avulsion or erosion during the  period of 180 to 500 years, depending
on site conditions, required to grow mature forest trees from the surrounding area.
(b) Does not mean:
(A) Ephemeral overland flow;
(B) Road drainage systems;
(C) Waste  treatment lagoons, reservoirs for industrial use, drainage ditches, irrigation
ditches, farm ponds, stock ponds, settling ponds, gravel ponds,  cooling ponds, log ponds,
pump chances or other water  bodies developed for human purposes that are not part of a
stream; or
(D) Heli-ponds that are maintained for the intended use by human activity.
(19) “Written plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 527.620.
SECTION 2.
(1) The purpose of sections 2 to 14 of this 2020 Act,  and the policy of the
State of Oregon, is to protect forest waters on privately owned,  state owned and local gov-
ernment owned forestlands in Oregon.
(2) Sections  2 to 14 of this 2020 Act are intended to be interpreted and applied consist-
ently with the purpose and policy stated in subsection (1) of this  section. To the extent of
any conflict between the purpose or policy stated  in subsection (1) of this section and any
policy adopted under ORS 527.610 to 527.770, the purpose or policy stated in subsection (1)
of this section prevails. To the extent that sections 2 to 14 of this 2020 Act conflict  with ORS
527.610 to 527.770, sections 2 to 14 of this 2020 Act prevail over ORS 527.610 to 527.770.
[3]
HB 4025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The people of Oregon find and declare that:
(a) Oregon’s forest waters are threatened; and
(b) Significant and immediate threats to forest waters are caused by  aerial application
of pesticides, logging  adjacent to forest waters and logging-associated forest operations on
high landslide hazard locations.
SECTION 3.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 468B.110 or 527.610  to 527.770, except as provided
in subsection (4) of  this section and section 4 of this 2020 Act, clearcut logging and associated
forest operations are prohibited:
(a) Within 100 feet of fishbearing streams, large streams, medium streams,  significant
wetlands, wetlands five acres or larger, and streams with domestic water use;
(b) Within 50 feet of perennial streams, lakes and  wetlands larger than one half-acre; and
(c) Within 50 feet of small nonfishbearing  streams subject to rapidly moving landslides
as defined in ORS 195.250.
(2) The  existence of a man-made barrier to fish passage is not a basis for withholding
classification of a stream as a fishbearing stream.
(3) The distances specified in  subsection (1) of this section refer to horizontal distances
from the forest waters, applied as exact minimum distances and not  as average distances
over a unit of stream length.
(4) The areas within which clearcut logging and associated forest  operations are prohib-
ited in subsection (1) of this  section are subject to site-specific limited exceptions as specified
in a written plan approved by the State Forester for:
(a) Maintenance of existing road crossings and unavoidable yarding corridors to the
minimum size necessary, if an additional  contiguous riparian area equal in size to the road
crossing or yarding corridor remains unharvested and the area impacted  by the maintenance
is rehabilitated to the maximum extent practicable;
(b) Thinning of small, undercanopy vegetation in a stand, if the best available information
demonstrates the thinning to be necessary and effective to mitigate the risk of fire  within
the defensible space of dwellings, public buildings or critical built infrastructure, or to allow
the safe use of prescribed burning as a forest restoration tool on dry forest types;
(c) Thinning of small,  undercanopy vegetation in a stand, if the best available information
demonstrates the thinning will enhance the resilience of the riparian area to drought or  fire;
or
(d) Thinning of small, undercanopy vegetation in a stand  to restore properly functioning
riparian conditions, by means of an operation reviewed and approved by a  state-employed
specialist in aquatic and riparian functions.
(5) The State Forestry  Department may increase the size of areas specified in subsection
(1) of this section, or  specify additional restrictions on forest operations within areas speci-
fied in  subsection (1) of this section, to protect the quality or quantity of forest waters as
necessary, based on the best available information, significant new information or changing
climatic conditions, to:
(a) Comply with  state water quality standards or the protection goals of ORS 527.610 to
527.770; or
(b) Avoid impacts to threatened and endangered fish or to wildlife species  and habitats
inventoried as resource sites under ORS 527.710.
SECTION 4.  (1) The State Board of Forestry shall adopt rules for clearcut logging adja-
[4]
HB 4025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cent to forest waters on small tract forestland for which 20  percent or more of the total
acreage is in an area described in section 3 (1)  of this 2020 Act. Section 3 (1) of this 2020 Act
does not apply to small tract  forestland on which logging and forest operation activities
comply with rules adopted under this section.
(2) In developing rules under this section,  the board shall balance the regulatory impact
of section 3 of this 2020 Act with the purpose and policy outlined in  section 2 of this 2020
Act while minimizing the threat of harm to forest waters.
SECTION 5.
(1) Aerial application of pesticides within 500 feet of all forest waters is
prohibited. The distance specified in  this section refers to the horizontal distance from the
forest waters, applied as exact minimum distances and  not as average distance over a unit
of stream length.
(2) The prohibition established in this section is in addition to, and not in lieu  of, any
other prohibitions on pesticide application established by law.
SECTION 6. (1) The  State Forestry Department shall maintain an electronic reporting
and notification system for pesticide operators, timber owners or landowners proposing to
conduct a forest operation involving an aerial application of pesticides to forestland.
(2) A  pesticide operator, timber owner or landowner must file notice with the State
Forester of a forest operation involving an aerial application of pesticides  to forestland. Such
notice must be filed not  less than 14 and not more than 21 business days prior to the pro-
posed date of the application. The notice must include, at a minimum:
(a) The name and business address of the pesticide operator, timber  owner, landowner
and aerial pesticide applicator;
(b) For the pesticide product expected to be used in the aerial application:
(A) The common name or brand name;
(B) The name of any carrier substance to be used; and
(C) Any registration number issued by  the United States Environmental Protection
Agency, the State  Department of Agriculture or any other federal or state administrative
agency;
(c) The total amount and concentration of the pesticide and any substance  used to en-
hance the effectiveness of the pesticide product expected to be used;
(d) The proposed date for the aerial application of pesticides; and
(e) A legal description and map for the proposed area for the  aerial application of pesti-
cides.
(3) Upon receipt of a notice required by subsection (2)  of this section, the State Forestry
Department shall send notice  to any person who has requested notification of planned pes-
ticide applications, submitted a valid electronic mail address  to the department and provided
a physical address that is not more than one mile from the proposed site of the aerial ap-
plication of pesticides.
SECTION 7.
 (1) State Forester approval of a written  plan for operation is required prior
to logging or other forest operations that are conducted on or  may affect a site that, on
November 3, 2020, was a site that the State Forester identified as designated  in State Board
of Forestry rules as being a high landslide hazard location.
(2) The State  Forester may not approve a written plan for an operation on a site that is
a high landslide hazard location unless:
(a) The best available information supports a determination that the proposed  forest op-
[5]
HB 4025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
eration will not increase the risk, frequency, magnitude or extent of a landslide  that could
deliver sediment or debris to forest waters; and
(b) The State Forester’s determination is consistent with the recommendation  of a
state-employed geotechnical expert.
(3) The board shall update and complete maps for state and private  forestlands every two
years to identify all  high landslide hazard locations identified by the State Forester under
subsection (1) of this  section that the State Forester considers capable of delivering sediment
or debris to forest waters. The board shall make the maps available to the public.
(4) The State Forester may identify areas containing features that  indicate inherent in-
stability where forest operations should be excluded or limited to avoid exacerbating the risk
of landslide initiation that could deliver sediment or  debris to forest waters. The State
Forester shall apply the requirements of subsection (2) of this  section to areas identified
under this subsection. The board shall include areas identified by the  State Forester under
this subsection in the maps described in subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 8.
 (1) The State Board  of Forestry shall adopt rules for carrying out sections
2 to 14 of this 2020 Act in a manner  consistent with the purpose, policy and findings in sec-
tion 2 of this 2020 Act and for carrying  out forest practices affecting the quantity and quality
of forest  waters. The board shall base its rulemaking decisions on the best available infor-
mation, including but not limited  to information related to climate change and the probable
negative effects of climate  change on the quality and quantity of forest waters and drinking
water from forest water sources. ORS 527.714 does not limit board authority to  adopt rules
for carrying out sections 2 to 14 of this 2020 Act.
(2) When adopting rules under sections 3 and 4 of this 2020 Act, the  board shall consult
with the  Department of Environmental Quality and the Oregon Health Authority. Rules de-
scribed in  this subsection may expand the areas in and methods by which logging is re-
stricted under sections 2 to 14 of this 2020 Act  if necessary to protect the quality and
quantity of forest waters flowing through forestlands.
(3) When adopting rules relating to sections 5 and 6 of this 2020 Act and ORS 527.672,  the
board shall consult with the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Department of En-
vironmental Quality and the Oregon  Health Authority. Rules described in this subsection
may expand the areas within which the aerial application of pesticides is prohibited if nec-
essary to protect the quality of forest waters.
(4) When adopting rules under section 7 of this 2020 Act, the State Forester  shall consult
with the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries. Rules described in this  sub-
section may expand  the areas in which logging is restricted if necessary to protect the
quality of forest waters.
SECTION 9. (1) Any action,  decision or recommendation by any person acting in a ca-
pacity as a public official regarding forest waters or any provision of sections 2 to 14 of this
2020 Act, the effect of which would be to the private pecuniary  benefit or detriment of the
person or the person’s relative or any business with which the  person or a relative of the
person is associated, is an actual conflict of interest. Except as provided  in this subsection,
the existence  of an actual conflict of interest under this section is independent of whether
the circumstances creating the  actual conflict of interest also create a potential conflict of
interest under ORS 244.020. Circumstances creating an exemption from a potential  conflict
of interest under ORS 244.020 (13)(b) do not  create an actual conflict of interest under this
[6]
HB 4025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 244.120 (1)(c), a public official having an actual conflict of in-
terest under subsection (1) of this section shall announce publicly  the nature of the conflict.
After announcing the nature of the actual conflict of  interest, the public official may par-
ticipate as a public official in any discussion or debate on the issue  out of which the conflict
arises but may not vote on the issue.
SECTION 10. 
(1) The State Forestry Department shall adopt rules setting forth the  re-
quirements and procedures for a written plan for a forest operation under section 3 or 7 of
this 2020 Act. The rules must, at a minimum, provide that:
(a) A written  plan approved by the State Forester must comply with sections 2 to 14 of
this 2020 Act and be consistent with the  purpose and policy stated in section 2 of this 2020
Act;
(b) The  State Forester may not approve a written plan until members of the public and
interested persons are provided an opportunity to comment on the plan;
(c) Opportunities for comment under paragraph (b) of this subsection must be for a pe-
riod that ends not less than 14 calendar days after the public is provided notice of the written
plan; and
(d) Logging or associated forest operations under a written plan may not begin until the
State Forester makes a final decision approving the written plan and:
(A) The time for filing a request for hearing under subsection  (2) of this section has ex-
pired; or
(B) A stay of the operation under subsection (3) of this section has expired.
(2) Any person who timely provides comments on the written plan may  request a hearing
within 30 days after issuance of the order approving the written plan.
(3) If a request for  hearing is filed under subsection (2) of this section, logging or forest
operations under section 3 or 7 of this 2020 Act for which a written plan is  required shall be
stayed until the hearing has concluded and an order has been  issued and become final by
operation of law or on appeal.
(4) An undertaking may not be  required of a person for requesting a hearing under sub-
section (2) of this section.
(5) Attorney fees may not be awarded against a person who requested a  hearing under
subsection (2) of this  section or appealed a decision resulting from a hearing, unless there
was no objectively reasonable basis for requesting a hearing or appealing the decision.
(6) To the extent of any conflict between this section and ORS  527.670 or 527.700, this
section controls.
(7) ORS 527.674 does not apply to rules adopted under this section.
SECTION 11.
 For purposes of ORS 195.305, sections  2 to 14 of this 2020 Act and rules
adopted under sections 2 to 14 of this 2020 Act are  not land use regulations that restrict the
residential use of private real property or a farming or forest  practice. For purposes of ORS
195.305 (3)(b), sections 2 to 14 of this 2020 Act and  rules adopted under sections 2 to 14 of this
2020 Act are activities for the protection of public health and safety.
SECTION 12. (1) Except as otherwise provided in sections 2 to 14 of this 2020 Act,
sections 2 to 14 of  this 2020 Act apply to all forestlands in Oregon, including but not limited
to privately owned, state owned and local government owned forestlands.
(2) Sections 2 to 14 of this 2020 Act do not apply to:
[7]
HB 4025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Federal or tribal forestlands exempt from regulation under sections 2 to 14 of  this
2020 Act by federal law; or
(b) Common School Forest Lands.
SECTION 13.
Sections 2 to 14 of this 2020 Act do not limit or  restrict the administration
or enforcement of water quality standards established by the  Environmental Quality Com-
mission or under any other provision of  law on federal forestlands, tribal forestlands or
Common School Forest Lands, or  on watersheds that supply drinking water for municipal
and other local water systems, including, but not limited to:
(1) The Bull Run Watershed, supplying the City of Portland;
(2) The McKenzie River Watershed, supplying the Eugene metropolitan area;
(3) The Ashland Creek Watershed, supplying the City of Ashland;
(4) The Twin  Mountain inventoried roadless area and Marble Point roadless area, serving
Baker City;
(5) The Tumalo Creek Watershed, supplying the Bend metropolitan area; and
(6) The North Santiam Watershed, supplying the City of Salem and surrounding  com-
munities.
SECTION 14.
The State  Forester may temporarily suspend State Forestry Department
administration and enforcement of  section 3, 5, 6, 7 or 10 of this 2020 Act, or any rules
adopted under section 4, 8 or 10 of this 2020 Act, to allow response to an emergency  posing
hazards to public health, safety or property, including but not limited to allowing firefighting
response. A suspension under this section may not exceed 60  calendar days unless renewed
with a subsequent finding of necessity by the State  Forester. For each suspension and re-
newal of suspension under to this  section, the State Forester shall provide a post-incident
report to  the State Board of Forestry and post the report on the department website. The
report must detail the reasons for, and effectiveness of,  the suspension and the effect of the
suspension on affected forest waters.
SECTION 15.
(1) As used in this  section, “clearcut logging” and “forest waters” have the
meanings given those terms in section 1 of this 2020 Act.
(2) At least once each biennium, the Secretary of State shall conduct financial  and per-
formance audits regarding the effectiveness of sections 2 to 14 of this  2020 Act in protecting
forest waters. The audits shall include:
(a) An analysis of the condition of forest waters based on  the best available information,
including trends in improvements or deterioration  in the quantity and quality of forest wa-
ters. This analysis shall include consideration of the  expected impacts on forest waters from
climate change.
(b) An analysis of the collection of revenue made available under ORS  321.017 for use by
the State Forestry Department, and the outcomes of the use of that revenue.
(c) A survey of California, Idaho and Washington  statutory and administrative rule pro-
tections of waters on forestlands in those states.
(d) A report on enforcement actions and rates  of compliance with the provisions of
sections 2 to 14 of this 2020 Act.
(e) A presentation of the best available information regarding:
(A) Reductions in water quality and quantity resulting from the cumulative  impact of
clearcut logging on forest waters; and
(B) Increases in fire severity and  fire intensity in forestlands replanted following clearcut
[8]
HB 4025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
logging.
(f) Recommendations for amendments to modify or  improve sections 2 to 14 of this 2020
Act consistent with the purpose  and policy stated in section 2 of this 2020 Act. The recom-
mendations may include, but need not be limited  to, recommendations for the appropriation
of additional funds necessary for  achieving the purpose and policy of sections 2 to 14 of this
2020 Act.
(3) The audits described in subsection (2) of this section shall be conducted  pursuant to
the provisions of ORS chapter 297. However, if any provision of sections 2 to 14 of  this 2020
Act conflict with ORS chapter  297, the provisions of sections 2 to 14 of this 2020 Act control.
(4) The Secretary of State shall, at a minimum:
(a) Deliver the audit results to the State Board of  Forestry and the Environmental
Quality Commission;
(b) Make the audit results publicly available on behalf of the residents of Oregon  through
news media; and
(c) Post the audit results on the Secretary of State’s website.
(5) The Secretary of State shall monitor and  report annually on agency progress in im-
plementing recommendations made in the  audits. The secretary shall follow up on recom-
mendations as part of recurring audit work  or as an activity separate from other audit
activity. When  following up on recommendations, the secretary may request that the ap-
propriate agency provide evidence of implementation.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 321.017 is amended to read:
321.017. (1) In addition to the  taxes levied under ORS 321.015 (1) to (4), there hereby is levied
a privilege tax upon taxpayers on the harvesting of all  merchantable forest products harvested on
forestlands in the amount provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The rate of tax levied in subsection (1) of this  section shall be established annually at the
beginning of each calendar year by the  board of directors of the Oregon Forest Resources Institute,
at a rate not to exceed 75  cents per thousand feet, board measure, adjusted annually for inflation
since 1991 based on the Consumer  Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items),
as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(3) The tax shall be measured by and be  applicable to each per thousand feet, board measure,
and such shall be subject to  and determined by the procedures and provisions of ORS 321.015 (5)
and (6).
(4) The tax levied by subsection (1) of this section  shall be due and payable to the Department
of Revenue  in the manner and procedure, including penalties and interest, as set forth for the col-
lection of the privilege tax in ORS 321.005 to 321.185.
(5) The revenue from the tax levied by  subsection (1) of this section shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer who shall deposit it in a suspense account established  under ORS 321.145 (1). After
payment of refunds, which  shall be paid in the same manner as other forest products harvest tax
refunds are paid in ORS 321.145 (2)[ ,]:
(a) One-third of  the balance of the additional tax [ imposed] levied under  subsection (1) of this
section shall be deposited in the Oregon Forest Resources Institute Fund[ .];
(b) One-third of the balance of the additional tax  levied under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion shall be deposited to the State Forestry Department Account  and used for the purposes
of administering and enforcing sections 2  to 14 of this 2020 Act and for providing technical
assistance;
[9]
HB 4025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) One-third of the balance of the additional tax levied  under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion shall be deposited to the State Forestry Department Account and used for the purpose
of protecting forest waters by supporting measures for reducing or eliminating hazards to:
(A) Critical built infrastructure; or
(B) Homes  and public buildings in wildfire hazard zones identified by the State Forestry
Department that rely on forest waters as their drinking water source.
(6) Measures referred to in subsection (5)(c) of this section may include,  but need not be
limited to, the provision of information,  technical assistance and financial assistance by the
department for property owners and residents in  wildfire hazard zones beyond what is oth-
erwise required under the  state building code or Department of Consumer and Business
Services rules to mitigate wildfire hazard.
(7) The moneys made available for department use  under subsection (5)(b) and (c) of this
section are in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other moneys appropriated  or otherwise
made available to the department.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 526.009 is amended to read:
526.009. (1) There is created a State Board  of Forestry consisting of seven members appointed
by the Governor. The members  appointed to the board shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate
as provided in ORS 171.562 and 171.565. The Governor  shall designate one member of the board as
chairperson to hold that position until that member’s term expires or until relieved by the  Governor
as provided in subsection [ (6)] (8) of this section. The chairperson  shall have such powers and duties
as are provided by the rules of the board.
(2) The term of office of a member of the board is four years. A member  shall be eligible for
reappointment, but no member shall serve more  than two consecutive full terms. In case of a va-
cancy for any cause, the Governor  shall make an appointment as provided in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Appointments made by the Governor under subsection (1) of this section  shall include ap-
pointment of at least one member from each of the forest regions  established under ORS 527.640 and
the rules adopted thereunder by January 1, 1987.
(4) No more than three members of the board may derive any significant portion of  their income
directly from persons or organizations that are subject to regulation  under ORS 527.610 to 527.770,
527.990 (1) and 527.992.
(5) A member of the board who derives any significant portion of their income  directly
from persons or organizations that are subject to regulation under ORS  527.610 to 527.770
has an actual conflict of interest regarding any action, decision  or recommendation as a
member of the board  regarding forest waters or any provision of sections 2 to 14 of this 2020
Act.
(6) A member of the board  having an actual conflict of interest under subsection (5) of
this section shall announce publicly the nature of the  conflict. After announcing the nature
of the actual conflict of interest, the member may participate as a public official  in any dis-
cussion or debate on the issue out of which the conflict  arises but may not vote on the issue.
[(5)] (7) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, no member of the board shall  have
any relationship or pecuniary  interest that would interfere with the member representing the public
interest.
[(6)] (8)  The Governor may at any time remove any member of the  board for inefficiency, in-
competence, neglect of duty, malfeasance in  office, unfitness to render effective service or failure to
[10]
HB 4025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
continue to meet the criteria of appointment pursuant to this section.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 527.672 is amended to read:
527.672. When a forest operation involves applying  [ herbicides] pesticides  by aircraft near an
inhabited dwelling or school, the operator [ is responsible for leaving an unsprayed strip of at  least
60] may not spray the area within 500  feet adjacent to the dwelling or school. The  [responsibility
of the operator under ] prohibition imposed by this section is in addition to any responsibility  of the
aerial pesticide applicator imposed under ORS chapter 634 or section 5 or 6 of this 2020 Act .
SECTION 19. No later than January 1, 2022, the Department of Consumer and Business
Services shall  adopt rules to ensure and protect the health and safety of persons who per-
form or have contact  with pesticides used in any forestland applications. When adopting
rules under this section, the department shall consult with the Department of Environmental
Quality and the Oregon Health Authority. Section 8 (3) of this 2020 Act does not  apply to
rules adopted under this section.
SECTION 20.
The State Board of Forestry shall make the first map required  under sec-
tion 7 of this 2020 Act available to the public no later than January 1, 2022.
SECTION 21. The Secretary of State shall  complete and publish the first audit under
section 15 of this 2020 Act no later than December 31, 2022.
SECTION 22. Sections 19, 20 and 21 of this 2020 Act are repealed January 2, 2024.
SECTION 23. Sections 1 to 15 and 19 to  22 of this 2020 Act apply to forest operations
commenced on or after the effective date of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 24. The amendments to ORS 321.017 by section 16 of this 2020 Act apply  to
privilege taxes levied on timber harvesting that occurs  on or after the effective date of this
2020 Act.
SECTION 25. The amendments to ORS 526.009 by section 17 of this 2020 Act  apply to the
actions, decisions and recommendations of State Board of Forestry members  made on or
after the effective date of this  2020 Act and to board discussions, debate and votes occurring
on or after the effective date of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 26. The amendments to ORS 527.672 by section 18 of this 2020 Act apply to ae-
rial applications of pesticides made on or after the effective date of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 27. This 2020 Act shall be submitted to the people for their approval or re-
jection at the next regular general election held throughout this state.
[11]