Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of  State Police shall create and maintain a list of states
that:
(a) Authorize a person who is  licensed under ORS 166.291 and 166.292 to carry a concealed
handgun in the other state; and
(b) In order to obtain a concealed handgun license or permit, require license or  permit
applicants to demonstrate  competency with a handgun by any one of the methods listed in
ORS 166.291 (1)(f)(A) to (E).
(2) The Department of State Police shall provide the list described in subsection  (1) of
this section to all law enforcement agencies within this state.
(3) The Department of State Police shall make the list described in subsection  (1) of this
section available to the public without charge on an Internet website.
SECTION 2.  ORS 166.173 is amended to read:
166.173. (1) A city or county may adopt ordinances to regulate, restrict or prohibit the pos-
session of loaded firearms in public places as defined in ORS 161.015.
(2) Ordinances adopted under subsection (1) of this section do not apply to or affect:
(a) A law enforcement officer.
(b) A member of the military in the performance of official duty.
(c) A person  who is  licensed  under ORS 166.291 and 166.292  to carry a concealed handgun.
(d) A person  who is not a resident of this state, who is not prohibited from possessing a
firearm and who is authorized  to carry a concealed handgun pursuant to a valid license or
permit that was issued, in a state on the list described in section 1  of this 2025 Act, by a
state or local law enforcement agency, a court or another issuing authority of that state.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 215
HB 2172
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(d)] (e)  A person authorized to possess a loaded firearm while in or on a public building or
court facility under ORS 166.370.
[(e)] (f)  An employee of the United States Department of Agriculture, acting within the scope
of employment, who possesses a loaded firearm in the course of the lawful taking of wildlife.
[(f)] (g)  An honorably retired law enforcement officer, unless the person  who is a retired law
enforcement officer has been convicted of an offense that would  make the person ineligible to obtain
a concealed handgun license under ORS 166.291 and 166.292.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 166.260 is amended to read:
166.260. (1) ORS 166.250 does not apply to or affect:
(a) A parole and probation officer, police officer or  reserve officer, as those terms are defined
in ORS 181A.355.
(b) A federal officer, as  defined in ORS 133.005, or a certified reserve officer or corrections of-
ficer, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355, while the federal officer,  certified reserve officer
or corrections officer is acting within the scope of employment.
(c) An honorably retired law enforcement officer,  unless the person who is a retired law
enforcement officer has been convicted of an offense that would  make the person ineligible to obtain
a concealed handgun license under ORS 166.291 and 166.292.
(d) Any person summoned by  an officer described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection to
assist in making arrests or preserving the peace, while the summoned person is engaged in  assisting
the officer.
(e) The possession or transportation by any merchant of unloaded firearms as merchandise.
(f) Active or reserve members of:
(A) The Army, Navy, Air Force, Coast Guard or  Marine Corps of the United States, or of the
National Guard, when on duty;
(B) The commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration; or
(C) The Public Health Service of the United States Department  of Health and Human Services,
when detailed by proper authority for duty with the Army or Navy of the United States.
(g) Organizations which are by law authorized to purchase or  receive weapons described in ORS
166.250 from the United States, or from this state.
(h) Duly authorized military or  civil organizations while parading, or the members thereof when
going to and from the places of meeting of their organization.
(i) A person who is licensed under ORS 166.291 and 166.292 to carry a concealed handgun.
(j) A person who  is not a resident of this state and who is authorized to carry a concealed
handgun pursuant to a valid license or permit that was issued, in a state on the list described
in section 1 of this 2025 Act, by a state or local law enforcement agency, a court or  another
issuing authority of that state.
(2) It  is an affirmative defense to a charge of violating ORS 166.250 (1)(c)(C) that the person has
been granted relief from the disability under ORS 166.274.
(3) Except for persons who  are otherwise prohibited from possessing a firearm under ORS
166.250 (1)(c) or 166.270, ORS 166.250 does not apply to or affect:
(a) Members of any club or organization, for the purpose of practicing shooting at  targets upon
the established target ranges, whether public or private, while such members are using  any of the
firearms referred  to in ORS 166.250 upon such target ranges, or while going to and from such
ranges.
(b) Licensed hunters or fishermen while engaged in hunting  or fishing, or while going to or re-
[2]
HB 2172
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
turning from a hunting or fishing expedition.
(4) The exceptions listed in subsection (1)(d) to [ (i)] (j)  of this section constitute affirmative de-
fenses to a charge of violating ORS 166.250.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 166.262 is amended to read:
166.262. A peace officer may not arrest or charge a  person for violating ORS 166.250 (1)(a) or
(b) or 166.370 (1)(a) if the person has in the person’s immediate possession:
(1) A valid license to carry a firearm as provided in ORS 166.291 and 166.292, or, for a person
who is not a resident of this  state, a valid license or permit that was issued, in a state on
the list described in section 1 of this  2025 Act, by a state or local law enforcement agency,
a court or another issuing authority of that state,  and that authorizes the person to carry
a concealed handgun, unless the person possesses a firearm within the Capitol, within the passen-
ger terminal of a commercial service airport with over one million passenger boardings  per year or
on school grounds subject to a policy described in ORS 166.377;
(2) Proof that the person is a law enforcement officer; or
(3) Proof that the person is an honorably retired law enforcement officer,  unless the person has
been convicted  of an offense that would make the person ineligible to obtain a concealed handgun
license under ORS 166.291 and 166.292.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 166.370 is amended to read:
166.370. (1)(a) Any person who intentionally possesses a loaded  or unloaded firearm or any other
instrument used as a dangerous  weapon, while in or on a public building, shall upon conviction be
guilty of a Class C felony.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, in  a prosecution under this section for the
possession of a  firearm within the Capitol, within the passenger terminal of a commercial service
airport with over one million  passenger boardings per year or on school grounds subject to a policy
described in ORS 166.377, if the person proves by a preponderance  of the evidence that, at the time
of the possession, the person was licensed under ORS 166.291 and  166.292 to carry a concealed
handgun, or is a person described in subsection (3)(h) of this  section , upon conviction the per-
son is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a person who inten-
tionally possesses:
(A) A firearm in a court facility is  guilty, upon conviction, of a Class C felony. A person who
intentionally possesses a firearm in a court facility shall surrender the  firearm to a law enforcement
officer.
(B) A weapon, other than a firearm, in a court facility may be required to  surrender the weapon
to a law enforcement officer or to immediately  remove it from the court facility. A person who fails
to comply with this subparagraph is guilty, upon conviction, of a Class C felony.
(C) A firearm in a local court facility is guilty, upon conviction, of a Class C felony if,  prior to
the offense, the presiding judge of the  local court facility entered an order prohibiting firearms in
the area in which the court conducts business and during the hours in which the court operates.
(b) The presiding judge  of a judicial district or a municipal court may enter an order permitting
the possession of specified weapons in a court facility.
(c) Within a shared court facility,  the presiding judge of a municipal court or justice of the
peace district may not  enter an order concerning the possession of weapons in the court facility that
is in conflict with an order entered by the presiding judge of the circuit court.
(3) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to:
[3]
HB 2172
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A police officer or reserve officer, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355.
(b) A parole and probation officer, as defined in ORS 181A.355, while the  parole and probation
officer is acting within the scope of employment.
(c) A federal officer,  as defined in ORS 133.005, or a certified reserve officer or corrections of-
ficer, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355, while the federal officer,  certified reserve officer
or corrections officer is acting within the scope of employment.
(d) A person summoned by an officer  described in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this subsection to
assist in making an arrest or preserving the peace, while the summoned  person is engaged in as-
sisting the officer.
(e) An honorably retired law enforcement officer.
(f) An active or reserve member of the military forces of this state or  the United States, when
engaged in the performance of duty.
(g) A person who is licensed under ORS  166.291 and 166.292 to carry a concealed handgun, ex-
cept as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(h) A person who is not a  resident of this state and who is authorized to carry a con-
cealed handgun pursuant to a valid license or permit that was issued, in a state on the  list
described in section 1 of this  2025 Act, by a state or local law enforcement agency, a court
or another issuing authority of that state, except as  provided in subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
[(h)] (i)  A person who is authorized by the officer or agency that controls the public  building
to possess a firearm or dangerous weapon in that public building.
[(i)] (j)  An employee of the United States  Department of Agriculture, acting within the scope
of employment, who possesses a firearm in the course of the lawful taking of wildlife.
[(j)] (k)  Possession of a firearm on school property if the firearm:
(A) Is possessed by a person who is not otherwise prohibited from possessing the firearm; and
(B) Is unloaded and locked in a motor vehicle.
[(k)] (L)  A  person who possesses a firearm in the passenger terminal of a commercial service
airport, if the firearm is unloaded and in a locked hard-sided container for  the purposes of trans-
porting the firearm as checked baggage in accordance with federal law.
(4)(a) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b)  of this section, the exceptions listed in subsection
(3)(d) to [ (k)] (L)  of this section constitute affirmative defenses  to a charge of violating subsection
(1)(a) of this section.
(b) A person may not use the affirmative defense described in subsection (3)(e) of this section
if the person has been convicted of  an offense that would make the person ineligible to obtain a
concealed handgun license under ORS 166.291 and 166.292.
(5)(a) Any person who knowingly, or with reckless disregard for the safety of another, discharges
or attempts to discharge a firearm at a place that the person knows is a school shall upon con-
viction be guilty of a Class C felony.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to the discharge of a firearm:
(A) As part of a program approved  by a school in the school by an individual who is partic-
ipating in the program;
(B) By a law enforcement officer acting in the officer’s official capacity; or
(C) By an employee of the  United States Department of Agriculture, acting within the scope of
employment, in the course of the lawful taking of wildlife.
(6) Any weapon  carried in violation of this section is subject to the forfeiture provisions of ORS
[4]
HB 2172
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
166.279.
(7) Notwithstanding the fact that a person’s conduct in a  single criminal episode constitutes a
violation of both subsections (1) and (5) of this section, the district attorney may charge  the person
with only one of the offenses.
(8) As used in this section,  “dangerous weapon” means a dangerous weapon as that term is de-
fined in ORS 161.015.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 166.375 is amended to read:
166.375. (1) Notwithstanding ORS  162.135 and 162.185 or any Department of Corrections regu-
lation, rule, policy or provision of an employment contract to the contrary, if the department  has
not provided a  secure and locked location for the storage of personal handguns and ammunition by
authorized staff, authorized staff may possess a personal  handgun and ammunition in the authorized
staff member’s personal vehicle when the vehicle is parked in a department parking lot if the au-
thorized staff member:
(a) Is present at a public building owned or occupied by the department;
(b)(A) Has a valid concealed handgun license issued pursuant to ORS 166.291 and 166.292; or
(B) Is a  person who is not a resident of this state and who is authorized to carry a con-
cealed handgun pursuant to a valid license or permit that was issued, in a state on the  list
described in section 1 of this  2025 Act, by a state or local law enforcement agency, a court
or another issuing authority of that state;  and
(c) Has secured the personal handgun  and ammunition in a closed and locked container designed
for the storage of firearms inside the vehicle.
(2)(a) Authorized staff may possess and store  only the amount and types of ammunition author-
ized by the department by written policy or rule.
(b) The  department shall adopt written policies or rules to carry out the purposes of this section.
The policies or rules shall include, at a minimum, procedures for and responsibilities  of authorized
staff when possessing  and storing personal handguns and ammunition on property owned or occupied
by the department under this section.
(3) As used in this section and ORS 423.045:
(a) “Authorized staff” means employees of  the department and employees of the State Board of
Parole and Post-Prison Supervision and Oregon Corrections Enterprises  who are assigned to work
in or at a public building owned or occupied by the department.
(b) “Handgun” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
(c) “Vehicle” means a vehicle that is self-propelled and that is commonly  known as a passenger
car, van, truck or motorcycle.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 166.377 is amended to read:
166.377. (1) The governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002, the Oregon Health
and Science University Board of Directors, the governing board of a community college  or a district
school board as defined in ORS 332.002 may adopt a policy providing that the affirmative [ defense]
defenses described in ORS 166.370 (3)(g)  and (h) , concerning persons licensed to  carry a concealed
handgun under ORS 166.291 and 166.292  or pursuant to a license or permit  issued by another
state, does not apply to the possession of firearms on  the grounds of the schools controlled by the
board.
(2) A board that adopts a policy under this section shall:
(a) Post a clearly visible sign, at all  normal points of entry to the school grounds subject to the
policy described in subsection  (1) of this section, indicating that the affirmative [ defense] defenses
[5]
HB 2172
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
described in ORS 166.370 (3)(g) [ does] and (h) do  not apply.
(b) Post a notice on the board’s website identifying all  school grounds subject to the policy de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 166.380 is amended to read:
166.380. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a peace officer  may examine a
firearm possessed by anyone on  the person while in or on a public building to determine whether
the firearm is a loaded firearm.
(2)(a) A person who is licensed under ORS 166.291 and 166.292 to carry a concealed handgun
may present a valid concealed handgun license to the peace officer  instead of providing the firearm
to the peace officer for examination.
(b) A person who is not a resident of this state  and who is authorized to carry a con-
cealed handgun pursuant to a valid license or permit that was issued, in a state on the list
described in section 1 of this 2025 Act, by a state or local  law enforcement agency, a court
or another issuing  authority of that state, may present the valid license or permit to the
peace officer instead of providing the firearm to the peace officer for examination.
SECTION 9.  ORS 166.663 is amended to read:
166.663. (1) A person may not cast from a motor vehicle an artificial light while there is  in the
possession or in the immediate physical presence of the person a bow and arrow or a firearm.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a person casting an artificial light:
(a) From the headlights of a motor vehicle that is being operated  on a road in the usual manner.
(b) When the bow and arrow or firearm that the person has in  the possession or immediate
physical presence of the person is disassembled or stored, or in the trunk  or storage compartment
of the motor vehicle.
(c) When the ammunition or arrows are stored separate from the weapon.
(d) On land owned or lawfully occupied by that person.
(e) On  publicly owned land when that person has an agreement with the public body to use that
property.
(f) When the  person is a peace officer, or is a government employee engaged in the performance
of official duties.
(g) When the person has been issued a license under  ORS 166.291 and 166.292 to carry a con-
cealed  handgun.
(h) When the person is not a resident of this state and is authorized  to carry a concealed
handgun pursuant to a valid license or permit that was issued, in a state on the list described
in section 1 of this 2025 Act, by a state or local law enforcement agency, a court or  another
issuing authority of that state.
[(h)] (i) When the person is an honorably retired law enforcement  officer, unless the person has
been convicted of an offense that would make the person ineligible to obtain a concealed  handgun
license under ORS 166.291 and 166.292.
(3) A peace officer may issue a citation to a person for a violation of subsection (1) of this sec-
tion when  the violation is committed in the presence of the peace officer or when the peace officer
has probable cause to believe that a violation has occurred based on a description  of the vehicle
or other information received from a peace officer who observed the violation.
(4) Violation of subsection (1) of this section is punishable as a Class B violation.
(5) As used in this section, “peace officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 161.015.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 821.240 is amended to read:
[6]
HB 2172
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
821.240. (1) A person commits the offense of operating a snowmobile or  an all-terrain vehicle
while carrying a firearm or bow if the  person operates any snowmobile or all-terrain vehicle with
a firearm in the possession of the person, unless the firearm is unloaded,  or with a bow, unless all
arrows are in a quiver.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A person who is licensed under ORS 166.291 and 166.292 to carry a concealed handgun;
(b) A person who is not a resident of this state  and who is authorized to carry a con-
cealed handgun pursuant to a valid license or permit that was issued, in a state on the list
described in section 1 of this 2025 Act, by a state or local  law enforcement agency, a court
or another issuing authority of that state;
[(b)] (c)  A law enforcement officer; or
[(c)] (d)  An honorably retired law enforcement officer, unless the person who is a retired law
enforcement officer has been convicted of an offense that would  make the person ineligible to obtain
a concealed handgun license under ORS 166.291 and 166.292.
(3) As used in this section, “unloaded” means:
(a) If the firearm is a revolver, that there is no live cartridge in the  chamber that is aligned
with the hammer of the revolver;
(b) If the firearm is a muzzle-loading firearm, that the firearm is not capped or primed; or
(c) If the firearm is other than a revolver or a muzzle-loading firearm, that there  is no live
cartridge in the chamber.
(4) The offense described in this section, operating a snowmobile or an all-terrain vehicle while
carrying a firearm or bow, is a Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 11.
The amendments to ORS 166.173,  166.260, 166.262, 166.370, 166.375, 166.377,
166.380, 166.663 and 821.240 by sections 2 to 10 of this  2025 Act apply to conduct occurring on
or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 12. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[7]