Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Each school district and any private school having a sports  team that
competes against a public school sports team  shall require that every athletic competition
or extracurricular sport is expressly designated by the biological sex of the  students who
participate in the competition or sport as follows:
(a) “Males,” “Men” or “Boys”;
(b) “Females,” “Women” or “Girls”; or
(c) “Coed.”
(2) Students of the  biologically male sex may not participate in any athletic competition
or extracurricular sport that is designated as “Females,” “Women”  or “Girls” under sub-
section (1) of this section.
(3) Nothing in subsection (2)  of this section restricts or prohibits any student from par-
ticipating in any  athletic competition or extracurricular sport that is designated as
“Males,” “Men,” “Boys” or “Coed.”
(4) A public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, any licensing  or accrediting organization or
any voluntary  organization that administers interscholastic activities or that facilitates the
scheduling and programming of interscholastic activities may not entertain  a complaint,
open an investigation or take  any other adverse action against a school district or private
school for maintaining separate athletic competitions or extracurricular sports in accordance
with subsection (2) of this section.
(5) A student who is  deprived of an opportunity or suffers a direct or indirect harm as
a result of a school district  or private school knowingly violating this section may bring a
claim against the school  district or private school for injunctive relief, damages and any
other relief available under law.
(6) A student who is subject to retaliation or any other adverse action by  a school dis-
trict, private school or athletic association or organization as a result of reporting a violation
of this section to an employee of the school district, the private school  or the athletic asso-
ciation or organization, or to any public body with oversight of school  districts in this state,
may bring a claim against the school  district, the private school or athletic association or
organization for injunctive relief, damages and any other relief available under law.
(7) A school district or private school that suffers a direct or indirect harm  as a result
of a violation of this section may bring a  claim against the public body, licensing or accred-
iting organization or athletic association or organization for injunctive  relief, damages and
any other relief available under law.
(8) A civil action  brought under this section must be initiated not more than two years
after the alleged direct or  indirect harm or the retaliation or other adverse action
occurred. A student, school  district or private school that prevails on a claim brought under
[2]
HB 3740
1
2
3
4
this section is entitled  to monetary damages, including damages for any psychological, emo-
tional or physical harm suffered, attorney fees and costs and any other appropriate relief.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act first applies to the 2026-2027 school year.
[3]