Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In managing state forestlands as described in  ORS 530.050, the State
Forester shall use active management designed to achieve and maintain  low forest fuel load
levels on the forestlands in order to promote forest health values and  the control of wildfire
risk.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3936