Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
442.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Credentialing information” means information necessary to credential or recreden-
tial a health care practitioner.
(2) “Credentialing organization”  means a hospital or other health care facility, physician
organization or  other health care provider organization, coordinated care organization as
defined in ORS 414.025, business organization, insurer or other organization that credentials
health care practitioners.
(3) “Health care practitioner” means an individual authorized to  practice a profession
related to the provision of  health care services in this state for which the individual must
be credentialed.
(4) “Health care regulatory board” means a board or other  agency that authorizes indi-
viduals to practice  a profession related to the provision of health care services for which the
individual must be credentialed.
SECTION 3. (1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority, in  consultation with the advisory group
convened under section 7 of this 2025 Act, shall establish  a program for the purpose of pro-
viding to a credentialing organization access to information that is necessary to credential
or recredential a health care practitioner.
(b) To fulfill the requirements of this subsection, the  authority shall establish and oper-
ate an electronic system  through which credentialing information may be submitted to an
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4484
HB 3748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
electronic database and accessed. The system must operate and be  accessible by credential-
ing organizations, health care practitioners and health care regulatory boards 24 hours a day,
seven days a  week. The authority may contract with a private entity to ensure the effective
establishment and operation of the system.
(c) To the  greatest extent practicable, the electronic system shall use the most accessible
and current technology available.
(2) In consultation with the advisory group convened under section  7 of this 2025 Act, the
authority shall adopt rules for the operation of the electronic system, including:
(a) Identification of the type of information that is necessary to credential or recreden-
tial each type of health care practitioner;
(b) Processes  by which a health care practitioner or health care regulatory board submits
credentialing information to the  authority or an entity that has entered into a contract with
the authority under subsection (1)(b) of this section;
(c) Processes,  as required by recognized state and national credentialing standards, by
which credentialing information submitted under section 4 of this 2025 Act is verified;
(d) Processes by which a credentialing organization, health care practitioner  or health
care regulatory board may electronically access the database;
(e) Processes by which a health  care practitioner may attest that the credentialing in-
formation in the electronic database is current;
(f) The purposes for which credentialing  information accessed by a credentialing organ-
ization or health care regulatory board may be used; and
(g) The imposition of fees, not to exceed the cost of administering sections 2 to 7 of  this
2025 Act, on health  care practitioners who submit credentialing information to the database
and credentialing organizations that access the database.
(3) All information, except for general  information used for directories, as defined by the
authority by rule, that is received, kept and maintained in the database under this section
is exempt from public disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
SECTION 4.
(1)(a) As a condition of being authorized to practice  a profession in this
state, a health care practitioner or designee must submit to the Oregon  Health Authority,
an entity that has entered into a contract with the authority under section 3  (1)(b) of this
2025 Act or a health care regulatory board the  credentialing information identified by the
authority under section 3 (2)(a) of this 2025 Act.
(b) A  health care practitioner that, in good faith, submits credentialing information un-
der this subsection is immune from civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or  im-
posed with respect to the submission of that credentialing information.
(2) The authority may  require a health care regulatory board, after consulting with the
health care regulatory board, to provide or supplement the  credentialing information identi-
fied by the authority under section 3 (2)(a) of this 2025 Act.
(3)(a) A  credentialing organization shall obtain from the authority, or an entity that has
entered into a contract with the authority under section 3 (1)(b) of  this 2025 Act, the cre-
dentialing information of the health care practitioner that is kept  and maintained in the
electronic database described in section 3 of this 2025 Act. A credentialing organization  may
not request credentialing information from a  health care practitioner if the credentialing
information is available through the database.
(b) A credentialing organization that, in good faith, uses credentialing information  pro-
[2]
HB 3748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vided under this subsection for the purposes established by the authority  under section 3
(2)(e) of this 2025 Act is immune from civil liability that might otherwise be  incurred or im-
posed with respect to the use of that credentialing information.
SECTION 5.
A prepaid group practice health plan that serves at least 200,000 members
in this state and that has been issued a certificate of  authority by the Department of Con-
sumer and Business Services  may petition the Director of the Oregon Health Authority to
be exempt from the requirements of sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act. The director may award
the petition if  the director determines that subjecting the health plan to sections 2 to 7 of
this 2025 Act is not cost-effective. If a petition is awarded under this section, the  exemption
also applies to any health care facilities and health care provider groups associated  with the
health plan.
SECTION 6. The Director of the Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules necessary for
the administration of sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. At least once per  year, the Oregon Health Authority shall convene an advi-
sory group consisting of  individuals who represent credentialing organizations, health care
practitioners and health care regulatory boards to review and advise the authority on the
implementation of sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act and on the  standard credentialing appli-
cation used in this state.
SECTION 8.
(1) To establish the electronic system described in section 3 of this 2025 Act,
the Oregon Health Authority  shall issue a request for information to seek input from po-
tential contractors on capabilities and cost structures associated with the scope of work  re-
quired to establish and maintain the electronic system. The authority shall  use the results
of the request for information  to create a formal request for proposals. No later than 150
business days after the close of the request for  information, the authority shall issue a
formal request for proposals to establish and maintain the electronic system.
(2) The authority may enter into a contract under section 3 (1)(b)  of this 2025 Act with
a private entity only if the private entity:
(a) Can demonstrate appropriate technical, analytical and clinical knowledge  and experi-
ence to carry out the duties prescribed by section 3 of this 2025 Act; or
(b) Has a contract, or will enter into a contract, with another entity that meets the  cri-
teria described in this subsection.
SECTION 9. The Oregon Health Authority  shall report on the implementation of the
electronic system described in section 3 (1) of this 2025 Act and on the development of  rules
to be adopted under section 3 (2) of this 2025 Act to:
(1) The  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health no later than
October 1, 2026; and
(2) The Legislative Assembly in the manner required by ORS 192.245:
(a) On or before February 1, 2026; and
(b) On or before February 1, 2027.
SECTION 10.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, for the  purpose of carrying out sections 2 to 7 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 11. Sections 8 and 9 of this 2025 Act are repealed on the date of  the convening
of the 2028 regular session of the Legislative Assembly as specified in ORS 171.010.
[3]
HB 3748
1
2
3
4
5
6
SECTION 12.
(1) Sections 2 to 5 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2028.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any action necessary before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section to enable  the authority to exercise, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the authority by sections 2 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
[4]