Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Justice  shall study ways to address organized retail
theft.
(2) The department shall provide the results of the  study, including any recommended
legislative changes, in  a report to the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than December 31, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3078