Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Conserving water and incentivizing reuse of treated wastewater are in the public in-
terest;  and
(2) The South Suburban Sanitary District faces  unique challenges applicable to the full
utilization of  the waters of the Klamath River, into which treated wastewater discharged by
the South Suburban Sanitary District flows.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section and section 1 of this 2023 Act, “South  Suburban
Sanitary District” means the sanitary district  formed under ORS 450.005 to 450.245 to provide
sanitation facilities and services to the Klamath Falls south suburban area.
(2) Subject to  subsections (3) and (5) of this section, the South Suburban Sanitary Dis-
trict is granted the exclusive right to use treated wastewater discharged by  the district into
the Klamath  River or any of its tributaries, including but not limited to Lake Ewauna, for
the benefit  of the district or for the general use and benefit of people or fish and wildlife
within or without the boundaries of the district.
(3) The discharge  of treated wastewater described in this section must comply with re-
quirements of a permit issued by the Department of  Environmental Quality under ORS
468B.050.
(4) Treated wastewater discharged by  the district in compliance with the requirements
of this section:
(a) Is additive to the natural flow of the surface waters of this state; and
(b) May not be appropriated by any person:
(A) Pursuant to a permit issued under ORS chapter 537; or
(B) To fulfill any state or federal requirements pertaining to fish and wildlife.
(5)(a) The district may sell or  otherwise utilize all treated wastewater discharged by the
district in compliance with this section in any manner that benefits the district or people
or fish and wildlife within or without the boundaries of the district.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 807
HB 2765
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(b) The provisions of ORS chapter 537 requiring application for a permit to  appropriate
water do not apply to the  use of treated wastewater discharged by the district in compliance
with this section.
(c) Before using treated wastewater  described in this section for the benefit of the dis-
trict, the district shall file with  the Water Resources Department a notice setting forth the
following:
(A) The mailing address of the district;
(B) The date the use of the treated wastewater will be initiated;
(C) The nature of the use of the treated wastewater;
(D) The amount of treated wastewater anticipated to be used; and
(E) The location and description of any ditch, canal, pipeline or other conduction  facility
to be used to divert the treated wastewater.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]