Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue Officer shall study the estate tax and shall review
options for modifying the exemption  threshold and tax rates. The Legislative Revenue Officer
shall submit a report in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommen-
dations for legislation, to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to re-
venue no later than December 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 153