Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. With respect to the sale or exchange of an investment in opportunity zone
property, in lieu of  the basis adjustment described in section 1400Z-2(c) of the Internal Re-
venue Code, the basis of the investment shall be increased  by the greater of zero or 50 per-
cent of the  difference between the fair market value of the investment on the date of sale
or exchange minus  the taxpayer’s basis, as determined without the basis adjustment de-
scribed in section 1400Z-2(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 4. With respect to the sale or exchange of an investment in opportunity  zone
property, in lieu of the basis adjustment described in section 1400Z-2(c) of  the Internal Re-
venue Code, the basis of the investment shall be  increased by the greater of zero or 50 per-
cent of the difference between the fair market value of the investment on the date  of sale
or exchange minus the taxpayer’s basis, as determined without the basis  adjustment de-
scribed in section 1400Z-2(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.
SECTION 5. Sections 2 and 4 of this 2021  Act apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2020.
SECTION 6. (1) The Legislative Revenue  Officer shall study the operation, benefits, im-
pact and effectiveness of the federal opportunity zone program in Oregon.
(2) In conducting the study required by subsection (1) of this section, the officer shall
consult with members of the Legislative Assembly and with individuals representing the fol-
lowing:
(a) Construction trade organizations;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3093
HB 2428
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
(b) Labor organizations;
(c) Private equity concerns, including those working with qualified opportunity funds;
(d) Tax policy advocates;
(e) Tax practitioners, including those working with qualified opportunity funds;
(f) Economic and community  development organizations, including those located in areas
where opportunity zones are located; and
(g) Local governments, including those of rural and  urban jurisdictions where opportu-
nity zones are located.
(3) The officer shall report findings to interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly
related to revenue and to economic development in the manner provided by ORS 192.245  no
later than  November 1, 2021. The report may include any options, if appropriate, recom-
mended by the officer for legislation related to the opportunity zone program in Oregon.
SECTION 7.
(1) Each qualified opportunity fund, as defined  in section 1400Z-2(d) of the
Internal Revenue Code, that is organized or  doing business in this state shall submit a report
to the Department of Consumer and Business  Services within six months of the date that
the qualified opportunity fund:
(a) Receives moneys from an investor that is domiciled in this state; or
(b) Makes an investment in a qualified opportunity zone located in this state.
(2) Following an initial report described in subsection (1) of this  section, a qualified op-
portunity fund described in subsection (1) of this section shall submit  subsequent reports at
least annually on the anniversary of  the initial report and shall update the information in the
report.
(3) The report required under this section shall include:
(a) The name of the qualified opportunity fund;
(b) A description of all qualified opportunity zone property in which the qualified oppor-
tunity fund holds its assets, including physical addresses of each property;
(c) A description of each qualified  opportunity zone business in which the qualified op-
portunity fund is invested, including the type of business, the ownership structure of  the
business, the physical address of the business and whether the business is  a minority-owned
business or a woman-owned business as defined in ORS 200.005; and
(d) Any further information required by the department.
(4) The department shall:
(a) Establish by rule the form and manner for providing reports under this section; and
(b) Post reports received under this section on the  Oregon transparency website as pro-
vided in ORS 276A.253.
SECTION 8.
The reports required under section 7 of  this 2021 Act shall be submitted no
later than October 1, 2021, and annually thereafter.
SECTION 9. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]