Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000 for distribution to Pueblo Unido
PDX, a domestic nonprofit corporation, for:
(1) Facilitating the creation of additional language proficiency  evaluations for interpret-
ers of indigenous languages spoken  in present-day Mexico, Central America or South Amer-
ica; and
(2) Recruitment,  training, retention and coordination of interpretation assignments for
individuals who need interpretation for an indigenous  language of present-day Mexico, Cen-
tral America or South America.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000 for  distribution to Oregon Worker
Relief, a domestic nonprofit  corporation, for payments to individuals who provide interpre-
tation services for languages that are  the national languages of small countries from which
local populations have emigrated, languages spoken by small ethnic minority groups or lan-
guages spoken by indigenous groups.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3326