Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SMALL SCALE LOCAL ENERGY PROJECTS
AND CLEAN ENERGY DEPLOYMENT PROGRAM
(Transfer of Duties, Functions and Powers)
SECTION 1.
 Except for the duty to establish by rule standards and criteria for  small
scale local energy projects under ORS 470.080 (1),  the duties, functions and powers of the
State Department of Energy related to the issuance of loans for small scale local  energy
projects under ORS chapter  470 are imposed upon, transferred to and vested in the Oregon
Business Development Department.
(Records and Property)
SECTION 2. (1) The Director of the State Department of Energy shall deliver to the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2581
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Oregon Business Development Department all records and property within  the jurisdiction
of the director that relate  to the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 1 of this
2019 Act, and the Director of the  Oregon Business Development Department shall take pos-
session of the records and property.
(2) The Governor shall resolve any dispute between the State Department of Energy  and
the Oregon  Business Development Department relating to transfers of records and property
under this section, and the Governor’s decision is final.
(Unexpended Revenues)
SECTION 3. (1) The unexpended balances of amounts authorized to be expended by the
State Department of Energy for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, from revenues dedi-
cated, continuously appropriated, appropriated or otherwise made available for the purpose
of administering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers transferred  by section 1 of
this 2019 Act are transferred to and are available for expenditure by the  Oregon Business
Development Department for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for the purpose of  admin-
istering and enforcing the duties, functions and  powers transferred by section 1 of this 2019
Act.
(2) The expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing or limiting
expenditures by the State Department of Energy remain applicable to expenditures by the
Oregon Business Development Department under this section.
(Action, Proceeding, Prosecution)
SECTION 4.
The transfer of duties, functions and powers to the Oregon  Business Devel-
opment Department by section 1 of this 2019 Act does not affect any action,  proceeding or
prosecution involving or with respect to the duties,  functions and powers begun before and
pending at the time of the transfer, except that  the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment is substituted for the State Department of Energy in the action, proceeding or prose-
cution.
(Liability, Duty, Obligation)
SECTION 5.
(1) Nothing in sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act, the amendments to  statutes
by sections 8 to 33 of this 2019 Act or the repeal of ORS 470.100  by section 39 of this 2019
Act relieves a person of a liability, duty or obligation accruing  under or with respect to the
duties, functions and powers transferred by section 1 of this 2019  Act. The Oregon Business
Development Department may undertake the collection or enforcement of  any such liability,
duty or obligation.
(2) The rights and obligations of the State Department of Energy  legally incurred under
contracts, leases and business transactions executed,  entered into or begun before the op-
erative date specified in section 40 of this 2019 Act accruing under or with respect to the
duties, functions and powers transferred by section 1 of this 2019 Act are transferred to  the
Oregon Business Development Department. For the purpose of succession to these rights
and obligations, the Oregon Business Development Department is a  continuation of the State
[2]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Department of Energy and not a new authority.
(Rules)
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding the transfer of duties, functions and powers by  section 1
of this 2019 Act, the rules of the State Department of Energy with respect to such duties,
functions or powers that are in effect on the operative date specified in section 40 of this 2019
Act continue in effect until superseded or repealed by rules of the Oregon Business  Devel-
opment Department. References in the  rules of the State Department of Energy to the State
Department of Energy or an  officer or employee of the State Department of Energy are
considered to be references to the Oregon Business Development Department or  an officer
or employee of the Oregon Business Development Department.
SECTION 7.
Whenever, in any uncodified law or resolution of the Legislative Assembly
or in any rule, document, record or proceeding authorized by  the Legislative Assembly, in
the context of the duties, functions and powers  transferred by section 1 of this 2019 Act,
reference is made to the State  Department of Energy, or an officer or employee of the State
Department of Energy whose  duties, functions or powers are transferred by section 1 of this
2019 Act,  the reference is considered to be a reference to the Oregon Business Development
Department or an officer or  employee of the Oregon Business Development Department who
by this 2019 Act is charged with carrying out the duties, functions and powers.
(Amendments to Statutes)
SECTION 8.  ORS 470.050 is amended to read:
470.050. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Alternative fuel project” means:
(a) Equipment, including  vehicles that are not used primarily for personal, family or household
purposes, that is modified or acquired directly from a factory and that:
(A) Uses an alternative fuel including electricity, biofuel, gasohol with at least 20  percent de-
natured alcohol content, hydrogen, hythane, methane, methanol, natural gas, propane  or any other
fuel approved by the Director of the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development
Department; and
(B) Produces lower exhaust emissions or is more energy efficient than equivalent  equipment fu-
eled by gasoline or diesel; and
(b) A facility, including a fueling station, or equipment necessary to produce alternative fuel  or
operate equipment that uses an alternative fuel.
(2) “Applicant” means an applicant for a loan to construct a small scale local energy project.
[(3) “Base efficiency package”  means the package of energy efficiency upgrades or renewable energy
projects for a property  that, when energy savings, project repayment costs, tax or other incentives, loan
offset grants and other relevant economic factors  are considered, is estimated to not increase the utility
bill of the customer over the loan repayment term. ]
[(4)] (3)  “Committee” means the Small  Scale Local Energy Project Advisory Committee created
under ORS 470.070.
[(5)] (4) “Cooperative” means a cooperative corporation organized under ORS chapter 62.
[(6) “Director” means the Director of the State Department of Energy  appointed under ORS
[3]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
469.040.]
[(7)] (5)  “Eligible federal agency” means a federal agency or public corporation created by  the
federal government that proposes to use a loan for a small scale local energy project. “Eligible
federal agency”  does not include a federal agency or public corporation created by the federal
government that proposes to use a loan for a small scale local energy  project to generate electricity
for sale.
[(8)] (6) “Eligible  state agency” means a state officer, board, commission, department, institution,
branch or agency of the state whose costs are paid wholly or in part from funds held in the State
Treasury.
[(9) “Energy efficiency and sustainable technology loan”  means a loan for a small scale local en-
ergy project that is repayable by means of: ]
[(a) A charge included with the participant’s utility customer account billing; or ]
[(b) An alternative repayment method identified by the department and the  borrower and specified
in the loan agreement. ]
[(10) “Energy Project Bond Loan Fund” means the fund established under ORS 470.580. ]
[(11) “Energy Project Supplemental Fund” means the fund established under ORS 470.570. ]
[(12) “Energy Revenue Bond Repayment Fund” means the fund established under ORS 470.585. ]
[(13) “Energy savings projection” means an examination of the energy performance and site  char-
acteristics of a property that, at a minimum, identifies: ]
[(a) A base efficiency package; and ]
[(b) Any additional optional measures that a  customer is able to repay and that the sustainable
energy project manager believes to be feasible for the site. ]
[(14) “Jobs, Energy and Schools Fund” means the fund established under ORS 470.575. ]
[(15)] (7)  “Loan” includes  the purchase or other acquisition of evidence of indebtedness and
money used for the purchase or other acquisition of evidence of indebtedness.
[(16)] (8)  “Loan  contract” means the evidence of indebtedness and all instruments used in the
purchase or acquisition of  the evidence of indebtedness. For eligible federal or state agencies or
municipal corporations that are tax exempt entities, a loan contract may  include a lease purchase
agreement with respect to personal property.
[(17) “Loan offset grant” means moneys from the Jobs, Energy and Schools Fund that are used to
help offset the initial  project costs or loan payments for energy efficiency, renewable energy and energy
conservation projects. ]
[(18) “Loan  repayment charge” means an amount charged to a utility customer account through
on-bill financing as a mechanism for the repayment of an energy efficiency and  sustainable technology
loan.]
[(19)] (9)  “Municipal corporation” has the meaning given in  ORS 297.405 and also includes any
Indian tribe or authorized Indian  tribal organization or any combination of two or more of these
tribes or organizations acting jointly in connection with a small scale local energy project.
[(20) “On-bill financing” means a mechanism for collecting the repayment of an energy efficiency
and sustainable technology loan through a utility customer account billing system. ]
[(21) “Optional package” means measures for promoting energy efficiency or the use of  renewable
energy: ]
[(a) That are in addition to the measures described in the customer’s base efficiency package; ]
[(b) For which a customer has the ability to repay; and ]
[(c) That the sustainable energy project manager believes to be feasible for the site. ]
[4]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(22)] (10)  “Oregon business” means a sole proprietorship,  partnership, company, cooperative,
corporation or other form of business entity that is organized or  authorized to do business under
Oregon law for profit.
[(23) “Primary contractor” means a contractor that: ]
[(a) Has entered into a  contract with an owner of property for which a proposed small scale local
energy project will be located; ]
[(b) Is responsible for the completion of the small scale local energy project; ]
[(c) Undertakes to complete the small scale local energy project; and ]
[(d) Is  responsible for any subcontractors performing work on the small scale local energy
project.]
[(24) “Public Purpose  Fund Administrator” means the entity designated by the Public Utility
Commission to administer moneys collected by a  company through the public purpose charge described
under ORS 757.612. ]
[(25)] (11) “Recycling project” means a facility or equipment that converts waste into  a new and
usable product.
[(26)] (12) “Small business” means:
(a) An Oregon business that is:
(A) A retail or service business employing 50 or fewer persons at the time the loan is made; or
(B) An industrial or manufacturing business employing 200  or fewer persons at the time the loan
is made; or
(b) An Oregon subsidiary  of a sole proprietorship, partnership, company, cooperative, corpo-
ration or other form of business entity for which the total number of employees for both  the sub-
sidiary and  the parent sole proprietorship, partnership, company, cooperative, corporation or other
form of business entity at the time the loan is made is:
(A) Fifty or fewer persons if the subsidiary is a retail or service business; and
(B) Two hundred or fewer if the subsidiary is an industrial or manufacturing business.
[(27) “Small scale local energy program  loan” means a loan for a small scale local energy project
other than an energy efficiency and sustainable technology loan. ]
[(28)] (13) “Small scale local energy project” means any of the following:
(a) A system, mechanism or series of  mechanisms located primarily in Oregon that directly or
indirectly  uses  or enables the use of, by the applicant or another person, renewable resources in-
cluding, but not limited to, solar, wind, geothermal, biomass,  waste heat or water resources to
produce energy, including heat, electricity and substitute fuels, to meet a local community  or re-
gional energy need in this state.
(b) A system, mechanism or series of mechanisms located primarily  in Oregon or providing
substantial benefits to Oregon that directly or indirectly conserves energy or enables the conserva-
tion of energy by the applicant or another person, including energy used in transportation.
(c) A recycling project.
(d) An alternative fuel project.
(e) An improvement that increases the production or  efficiency, or extends the operating life,
of a system, mechanism, series of mechanisms  or project otherwise described in this subsection, in-
cluding but not limited to restarting a dormant project.
(f) A system, mechanism or series of mechanisms installed in a facility  or portions of a facility
that directly or indirectly reduces the amount  of energy needed for the construction and operation
of the facility and that meets the sustainable building practices  standard established by the [ State
[5]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development Department  by rule. For purposes of this
paragraph, “system, mechanism or series of mechanisms”  includes related and integrated upgrades
to attain  compliance with standards set in the State of Oregon Structural Specialty Code and Fire
and Life Safety Code, and seismic safety upgrades.
(g) A project described in paragraphs (a) to (f) of this subsection, whether or  not the existing
project was originally financed under this chapter, together with any refinancing necessary to re-
move prior liens or encumbrances against the existing project.
(h) A project described in paragraphs (a) to (g)  of this subsection that conserves energy or
produces energy by generation or by processing or collection of a renewable resource.
[(29)] (14) “Small Scale Local Energy Project Administration and  Bond Sinking Fund” means the
fund created under ORS 470.300.
[(30)] (15) “Small Scale Local Energy Project Loan Fund” means the loan fund created by  Arti-
cle XI-J of the Oregon Constitution and appropriated to the [ State] department [ of Energy ] under
ORS 470.130.
[(31) “Sustainable energy project manager” means the organization  responsible for promoting the
energy efficiency and sustainable  technology loan program or the clean energy deployment program and
related incentives for energy efficiency and renewable energy at the neighborhood and community
level.]
[(32) “Utility service territory” means the allocated territory in which  a utility subject to this
chapter provides a utility service. For the purposes of this  subsection, “allocated territory” and “utility
service” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 758.400. ]
SECTION 9.
 ORS 470.060 is amended to read:
470.060. (1) The following may file with the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business
Development Department  an application to obtain  moneys for a small scale local energy project
as provided in this chapter:
(a) An individual who is an Oregon resident;
(b) An Oregon business;
(c) A nonprofit or public cooperative;
(d) A nonprofit corporation;
(e) An eligible federal agency;
(f) An eligible state agency;
(g) A public corporation created by this state;
(h) An intergovernmental  entity created pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement under ORS
190.003 to 190.130;
(i) A special district;
(j) A local improvement district;
(k) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; or
(L) A municipal corporation.
(2) Applications to obtain financing  for a small scale local energy project shall be made in
writing on a form prescribed by the [ State] department  [ of Energy ]. Applications submitted to the
[State] department [ of Energy ] shall:
(a) Describe the nature and purpose of the proposed small scale local energy project.
(b) State whether any purposes other than energy production, but consistent with energy pro-
duction, will be served by the proposed small scale local energy project, and the nature of the other
purposes, if any.
[6]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Include an evaluation of  the potential of the small scale local energy project to meet local
community energy needs.
(d) Include an evaluation of the potential environmental impacts of the  small scale local energy
project.
(e) State whether any moneys other than those in  the loan fund are proposed to be used for the
development of the proposed small scale local energy  project, and whether any other moneys are
available or have been sought for the project.
(f) Describe the source of moneys for repayment of the loan applied for.
(3) [If the application  is for a loan other than an energy efficiency and sustainable technology loan
to an individual, ] A fee of one-tenth of  one percent of the amount of the loan applied for or $2,500,
whichever is less, shall be  submitted with each application. In addition, the applicant may be re-
quired to pay for costs incurred in connection with the application that exceed the  application fee
and which  the Director of the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development De-
partment determines  are incurred solely in connection with processing the application. The appli-
cant shall be advised of any additional costs the applicant must pay before the costs are incurred.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 470.070 is amended to read:
470.070. (1) The  Director of the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development
Department shall appoint a Small Scale Local Energy Project Advisory Committee to  review ap-
plications made under ORS 470.060 and rules adopted under  ORS 470.080[, other than applications for
energy efficiency and sustainable technology loans, ] and make recommendations regarding those  ap-
plications to the director.
(2) Nine members shall  be appointed to the Small Scale Local Energy Project Advisory Com-
mittee. Each member shall be appointed to serve a four-year  term, commencing on the date of ap-
pointment, and until a successor is appointed and qualified. The members shall represent the interest
of the  citizens of this state and shall be knowledgeable in the areas of small scale energy technol-
ogy, natural resource development, environmental protection,  finance, agriculture, local government
operations and utility operations. At least three members shall reside outside  the Willamette Valley.
(3) The committee shall elect its own presiding  officer, adopt rules for its procedure and meet
on call of the presiding officer or a majority of the members.  A majority of the members shall con-
stitute a quorum to do business. The director shall  provide administrative facilities and services for
the committee.
(4) Members of the Small Scale Local Energy Project Advisory  Committee shall be entitled to
expenses as provided by ORS 292.495.
SECTION 11.  ORS 470.080 is amended to read:
470.080. (1) After consultation with the  Small Scale Local Energy Project Advisory Committee
and the Director of the Oregon Business  Development Department , the Director of the State
Department of Energy shall establish by rule standards and  criteria for small scale local energy
projects to be funded under this chapter [ other than projects funded through energy  efficiency and
sustainable technology loans ]. The standards  and criteria shall operate to encourage diversity in
projects funded, give preference to the maximum  extent practical to projects proposed by individuals
and small businesses, ensure acceptability of environmental impacts and shall require  consideration
of the potential contribution of a project if developed at other suitable locations to meeting the en-
ergy needs of this state. The standards and criteria shall give the least preference  to projects pro-
posed by an eligible federal agency.
(2) All applications submitted under ORS 470.060  shall be reviewed by the [ State Department of
[7]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Energy] Oregon Business Development  Department . The department may request that the appli-
cant submit additional information or revise the application. The department shall:
(a) Determine whether the application  meets the standards and criteria adopted under sub-
section (1) of this section; and
(b) Recommend approval or denial of  the loan application, and if approval is recommended in
what amount the loan should be made.
(3) After concluding its review, unless the application meets the criteria established by the
committee under subsection (4) of this section, the department shall refer the application and its
findings and recommendation to the committee for its review. The department shall notify the ap-
plicant of the date, time and place of any oral presentation to the  committee on the application. The
committee shall review the application and the  department’s findings and recommendations and ad-
vise the director whether  the proposed small scale local energy project meets the criteria estab-
lished [ by the director ] under subsection (1) of this section, whether the project should  be financed
with moneys from the Small Scale Local Energy Project Loan Fund and in what amount  the loan
should be made if approved.
(4) The committee may provide for direct  referral of an application by the department to the
director if the application meets criteria established by the committee.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 470.090 is amended to read:
470.090. (1) After consideration of the recommendation of the Small Scale Local Energy Project
Advisory Committee or the [ State Department  of Energy ] Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment as provided by ORS 470.080, the Director of the [ State Department of  Energy ] Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department  may approve or reject  the financing of a small scale local energy
project described in an  application filed as provided in ORS 470.060, using moneys in the Small Scale
Local Energy Project Loan Fund. Approval of a loan  by the director shall include a certification
of the amount of the loan.
(2) The director’s approval of a loan for a small scale local energy project  shall be based on a
finding that:
(a) The proposed small scale local energy project meets established  standards and criteria under
ORS 470.080;
(b) The proposed project is consistent with the preservation and enhancement of  environmental
quality;
(c) The proposed project is feasible  and a reasonable risk from practical and economic stand-
points;
(d) The plan for development of the project is satisfactory;
(e) The applicant is qualified, creditworthy and responsible  and is willing and able to enter into
a contract with the director for development and repayment as provided  in ORS 470.150  [ or
470.645];
(f) There is a need for the  proposed small scale local energy project and the applicant’s financial
resources are adequate to provide the working capital to maintain the project after completion;
(g) Moneys in the loan fund are or will be  available for the development of the proposed small
scale local energy project;
(h) A dwelling constructed before January 1, 1979, that  will be served by a proposed space
heating project is weatherized according to the standards established under ORS 469.155;
(i) Except for  a proposed space heating project for a dwelling under paragraph (h) of this sub-
section, the loan does not finance any project  for which the projected economic value of the energy
[8]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
savings of the project during the first year the  project is implemented is equal to or greater than
the cost of the project; and
(j) The loan will not preclude individuals and small businesses from access to loan moneys.
(3) The director shall notify the applicant  and the presiding officer of the committee of the
director’s action and of the reasons for that action. [ The director shall inform the  applicant of the
review procedure established  in ORS 470.100. ] Notwithstanding ORS chapter 183, a decision of
the director on an  application for financing under this section is not subject to judicial re-
view.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 470.110 is amended to read:
470.110. The Director of the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development De-
partment may accept gifts of money or other property from any source, given for the purposes  of
ORS 470.050 to 470.120, 470.140 (1) and 470.150 to 470.210. Money so received shall  be paid into the
Small Scale Local Energy Project Loan Fund. Money or other property so received  shall be used for
the purposes for which received.
SECTION 14.  ORS 470.120 is amended to read:
470.120. If the applicant receives from any  source other than the Small Scale Local Energy
Project Loan Fund[ , the Energy Project Supplemental Fund or the Energy Project Bond Loan Fund ]
any moneys to  assist in the development of the  small scale local energy  project, the amount of the
loan to the applicant from the Small Scale Local Energy Project Loan Fund[ , Energy Project Sup-
plemental Fund or Energy Project Bond Loan Fund ] shall be limited to that amount necessary for
the development of those portions of the project not funded by other sources.
SECTION 15.  ORS 470.130 is amended to read:
470.130. All moneys in the Small Scale Local  Energy Project Loan Fund created by Article XI-J
of the Oregon Constitution are appropriated continuously to  the [ State Department of Energy ]
Oregon Business Development Department  and shall be used for the purposes authorized under
this chapter.
SECTION 16.  ORS 470.135 is amended to read:
470.135. The duties of the Director of the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services to es-
tablish, maintain and keep accounts of, and make disbursements or transfers  out of, the funds and
accounts established or identified in the two  bond indentures, as supplemented, dated June 1, 1981,
and September 1, 1985, that relate to  the Small Scale Local Energy Project Loan Program estab-
lished by Article XI-J of the  Oregon Constitution and this chapter are transferred to the [ State De-
partment of Energy ] Oregon Business Development  Department . Notwithstanding the transfer of
these fiscal functions to the  [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, in accordance  with ORS 291.015 (2), the [ State Department of Energy’s ] Oregon Business
Development Department’s  performance of these fiscal functions  shall remain subject to the con-
trol of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
SECTION 17.  ORS 470.140 is amended to read:
470.140. (1) In accordance with the  applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183 and except as
provided by  ORS 470.080 (1) , the Director of the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business
Development Department may adopt rules considered necessary to carry out the purposes  of this
chapter.
(2) The director shall submit to the Legislative Assembly  and the Governor a biennial report
of the transactions of the Small Scale Local Energy Project Loan Fund and the Small  Scale Local
Energy Project  Administration and Bond Sinking Fund in such detail as will accurately indicate the
[9]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
condition of the funds.
SECTION 18.  ORS 470.145 is amended to read:
470.145. The [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon  Business Development Department  shall
develop,  implement  and periodically update a marketing plan to inform potential applicants of the
availability of small scale local energy project loans. The first priority of the marketing plan  shall
be to inform individuals  and small businesses that small scale local energy project loans are avail-
able.
SECTION 19.  ORS 470.150 is amended to read:
470.150. Except as provided in ORS  470.155 and 470.170, if the Director of the [ State Department
of Energy ] Oregon Business  Development Department  approves the financing of a small scale
local  energy  project, the director, on behalf of the state, and the applicant may enter into a loan
contract, secured by a first lien or by other  good and sufficient collateral in the manner provided
in ORS 470.155 to 470.210. For purposes of this section, the interest of the [ State Department of En-
ergy] Oregon Business Development Department  under a lease  purchase contract entered into
with an eligible federal or state  agency or a municipal corporation may constitute good and suffi-
cient collateral. The contract:
(1) May provide that the director, on behalf of the state,  must approve the arrangements made
by the applicant for the development, operation and maintenance of the small  scale local energy
project, using moneys  in the Small Scale Local Energy Project Loan Fund for the project develop-
ment.
(2) Shall provide a plan for repayment by the applicant of moneys borrowed from the  loan fund
used for the development of the small scale local energy project and interest on those moneys  used
at a rate of interest the director determines is necessary to provide adequate funds  to recover the
administrative expenses  incurred in connection with the loan. The director shall set the interest rate
at an incremental rate above the interest rate on  the underlying bonds in an amount sufficient to
recover all program-related costs including, but not limited to, implementation, financing,  adminis-
tration and promotional costs for the program. The incremental rate for projects proposed by an
eligible federal agency shall be greater  than the incremental rate charged to any other govern-
mental borrower. The repayment plan, among other matters:
(a) Shall provide for commencement  of repayment by the applicant of moneys used for project
development and interest thereon not later than two years after the date of the loan  contract or at
any other time as the director may provide. In addition  to any other prepayment option provided in
a borrower’s loan agreement, the department shall provide a  borrower the opportunity to prepay the
borrower’s loan, without any additional premium, by defeasing such loan  to the call date of the bond
or bonds funding the applicable loan, or any refunding bonds linked to  the loan, but such defeasance
shall occur only if the director finds that after the defeasance, the sinking fund will have sufficient
funds to make payments required under ORS 470.300 (1).
(b) May provide for reasonable extension of the time for making any  repayment in emergency
or hardship circumstances, if approved by the director.
(c) Shall provide for evidence of debt assurance of and security  for repayment by the applicant
considered necessary or proper by the director.
(d) Shall set forth the period of loan, which may not exceed the usable life of  the completed
project, or 30 years from the date of the loan contract, whichever is less.
(e) [ May] Shall set forth a procedure for formal declaration of default  of payment by the direc-
tor, including  formal notification of all relevant federal, state and local agencies; and further, a
[10]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
procedure for notification of all relevant federal, state and local agencies that declaration of default
has been rescinded when appropriate.
(f) Shall require the loan to be paid in full in the event that:
(A) The director makes a formal declaration  of default of payment pursuant to paragraph
(e) of this subsection; or
(B) The small scale local energy project fails to meet the standards and  criteria estab-
lished under ORS 470.080.
(3) May include provisions satisfactory to the director for field inspection, the  director to be the
final judge of completion of the project.
(4) May provide  that the liability of the state under the contract is contingent upon the avail-
ability of moneys in the loan fund for use in the planning and development of the project.
(5) May include further provisions the director considers necessary to ensure expenditure of the
funds for the purposes set forth in the approved application.
(6) May provide that the director may  institute an appropriate action or suit to prevent use of
the project financed by the loan fund by any person who is  delinquent in the repayment of any
moneys due the sinking fund.
[(7) If the project is  being financed by an energy efficiency and sustainable technology loan or
small scale local energy program loan, in addition to the  requirements of subsections (1) to (6) of this
section, shall include: ]
[(a) For an energy efficiency  and sustainable technology loan that relies on an on-bill financing
system for the  collection of a loan repayment charge, an agreement by the applicant to notify a person
acquiring ownership of, or an interest in, the property from  the applicant that the loan repayment
charge will be transferred  to the utility customer account of the person acquiring the ownership or in-
terest unless the loan is discharged before or at the time the ownership or interest transfers; ]
[(b) A plainly worded acknowledgment by the applicant that failure to make payments as  required
under the loan agreement may result in the foreclosure of a property lien  or other debt collection
actions;]
[(c) A waiver stating that the applicant waives any jurisdictional or  other irregularities or defects
in:]
[(A) The energy efficiency and sustainable technology loan program; ]
[(B) A small scale local energy project; ]
[(C) The small scale local energy program loan provisions; ]
[(D) This chapter; or ]
[(E) Department rules that relate in any way to the loan repayment charge, real property lien pro-
visions or any form or  combination of loan security or to the requirement to satisfy the loan
obligation;]
[(d) If the applicant is not the owner  of the property to be burdened by the loan repayment charge,
fixture filing or real property lien, provision for participation by  the property owner as a party to the
contract or a notarized authorization by the owner for the fixture filing and lien; and ]
[(e) A description of any other conditions required by the department. ]
SECTION 20.
 ORS 470.160 is amended to read:
470.160. If  the Director of the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development
Department approves a loan for a small scale local energy project, the State  Treasurer shall pay
moneys for such project from the Small Scale Local  Energy Project Loan Fund [ or Energy Project
Bond Loan Fund ] in accordance with the terms of the loan contract, as prescribed by the director.
[11]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 21.  ORS 470.170 is amended to read:
470.170. [(1)(a)] (1) [ Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, ] When a loan is  made under
this chapter to an applicant other than a municipal corporation, the loan shall  be secured pursuant
to a mortgage, trust deed, security agreement, pledge, assignment  or similar instrument, by a secu-
rity interest  or lien on real or personal property in the full amount of the loan or as the Director
of the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development  Department  shall require for
adequate security, including but not limited to long-term leasehold interests or equitable interests
in real property or personal property. In lieu of, or  in addition to, any of the collateral otherwise
described in this [ paragraph] subsection , the applicant may secure the loan by providing  credit
enhancement, including but not limited to a letter of credit or payment  bond, or a guaranty ac-
ceptable to the director.
[(b) To the extent consistent  with any declaration, pledge or agreement for bonds issued under ORS
470.220 to 470.290, an energy efficiency and sustainable technology loan shall be secured  as provided
in ORS 470.680 or 470.685. ]
(2) When a loan is made to a municipal corporation for the development of a small scale  local
energy project under  this chapter, the loan shall be secured as the director shall require for ade-
quate security. The security may be in the  form of a lien, mortgage, interest under a lease-purchase
contract or other form of security acceptable to the director and the municipal corporation.
(3) When a loan made under this chapter is secured by a lien on the real property of the appli-
cant, the director shall perfect the lien by recording as provided by law.
(4) Upon payment of all amounts loaned  to an applicant pursuant to this chapter, the director
shall file a satisfaction or release notice that indicates repayment of the loan.
(5) The director may cause to be instituted appropriate proceedings to foreclose  liens for delin-
quent loan payments,  and shall pay the proceeds of any such foreclosure, less the director’s expenses
incurred in foreclosing, into  the Small Scale Local Energy Project Administration and Bond Sinking
Fund if the loan was  issued from the Small Scale Local Energy Project Loan Fund[ , or into the En-
ergy Project Bond Loan Fund if the loan was from the Energy Project Bond  Loan Fund ]. In a fore-
closure proceeding the director may bid on property offered for sale in the proceedings  and may
acquire title to the property on behalf of the state.
(6) The director may take any action, make  any disbursement, hold any funds or institute any
action or proceeding necessary to protect the state’s interest.
(7) The director  may settle, compromise or release, for reasons other than uncollectibility as
provided in ORS 293.240, all or part of any loan obligation so long as the  director’s action is con-
sistent with the  purposes of this chapter and does not impair the ability to pay the administrative
expenses of the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development Department  or the
obligations of any bonds then outstanding.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 470.180 is amended to read:
470.180. In addition to any other remedy available to the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon
Business Development Department , if a municipal corporation  entitled by law to share in the
apportionment of any state revenues  or funds defaults on any payments due to the State of Oregon
under a loan contract entered into under ORS 470.150, the  [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon
Business Development Department  may certify that fact to  the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services and  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall withhold payment of
any revenues or funds in the State Treasury to which the  municipal corporation is entitled, in an
amount not to exceed  the balance owing on the loan, until the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon
[12]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Business Development Department  certifies that the default has been remedied.
SECTION 23.  ORS 470.190 is amended to read:
470.190. If an applicant fails to comply  with a contract entered into with the Director of the
[State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development Department  for  development and
repayment as provided in ORS 470.150 [ or 470.645], the  director, in addition to remedies provided in
ORS 470.170 and 470.180, may seek other appropriate legal remedies to secure the loan and may
contract as provided in ORS  470.150 with any other person for continuance of development and for
repayment of moneys from the Small Scale Local Energy Project Loan Fund [ or from the  Energy
Project Bond Loan Fund ] used therefor and interest thereon.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 470.200 is amended to read:
470.200. If any small scale local energy project is refinanced or an additional grant  or loan in-
tended to finance the project development is obtained from other sources after the execution  of the
loan from the state, all such funds shall be used to repay the  state unless the Director of the [ State
Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development Department  finds  that repayment of the
state from the additional grant or loan would be contrary to public interest.
SECTION 25.  ORS 470.210 is amended to read:
470.210. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,  a municipal corporation may enter into
a loan contract with the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development Department
to finance a small scale local energy project.
(2) In order to  finance a small scale local energy project, the Director of the [ State Department
of Energy ] Oregon Business Development Department , on  behalf of the state and in lieu of en-
tering into a loan contract under subsection (1) of  this section, may purchase or otherwise acquire
a municipal corporation’s general obligations or revenue obligations, including but not  limited to
bonds, notes, certificates of participation, warrants or lease purchase agreements.
SECTION 26.  ORS 470.230 is amended to read:
470.230. Except as provided in  ORS 470.270, all moneys obtained from the sale of general obli-
gation bonds under ORS 470.220 to 470.290 and  Article XI-J of the Oregon Constitution shall be
credited by the State Treasurer to the Small Scale Local Energy Project Loan Fund. Those  moneys
shall be used only for  the purposes stated in Article XI-J of the Oregon Constitution, including
payment of the costs of issuing  the bonds and of obtaining credit enhancement for the bonds, and
making payments of interest on  bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of ORS 470.220 to 470.290
if there are insufficient funds in  the Small Scale Local Energy Project Administration and Bond
Sinking Fund to make the payments referred to in  ORS 470.300 (1). Moneys loaned to municipal
corporations but withheld by  the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development
Department for security or to pay for future project costs may remain in  the loan fund. Pending
the use of the moneys in the loan fund for the proper purposes, the moneys may  be invested in the
manner provided by law.
SECTION 27.  ORS 470.270 is amended to read:
470.270. (1) After consultation with the State Treasurer, the Director of the  [ State Department
of Energy ] Oregon Business Development Department  may issue general obligation refunding
bonds for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds issued under ORS 470.220 to 470.290  and Ar-
ticle XI-J of the Oregon Constitution. The refunding bonds may be sold in the same manner  as other
bonds are sold under ORS 470.220 to 470.290. All moneys obtained from the sale of refunding bonds
shall be credited by the  State Treasurer to the Small Scale Local Energy Project Administration and
Bond Sinking Fund. The refunding  bonds may be issued to refund bonds previously issued for re-
[13]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
funding purposes. Pending the use of moneys obtained  from the sale of refunding bonds for proper
purposes, such moneys may be invested in the manner provided by law.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision  of ORS 470.150, if the [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon
Business Development Department  issues taxable refunding bonds at a lower interest rate to re-
fund outstanding general obligation bonds, and is unable to allow loan recipients to receive  a por-
tion of the interest savings, the director shall allow the  loan recipient to prepay the outstanding
loan balance upon the request of the recipient. The director shall respond to such a  request within
30 days after receiving the request  by specifying the outstanding principal balance after applying
reserves held by the state for the borrower and the prepayment premium as listed in  the bond doc-
ument, loan document or bond purchase agreement.
(3) The department shall pursue opportunities for refunding bonds  to reduce interest sums pay-
able by the department. When the department refunds  a bond with tax-exempt bonds, the department
shall share, on an equitable basis, the savings from any refunding with the borrowers whose loans
were made with the proceeds of the refunded bonds in an amount consistent with a finding by the
director that the sinking fund has, and will continue to have, sufficient funds to make payments re-
quired under ORS 470.300 (1). The department may not refund  tax-exempt bonds with taxable bonds,
unless the department is able to share  the savings associated with such a refunding with the bor-
rowers whose loans are linked to such bonds. At least 120 days before the date on which the de-
partment intends to issue  refunding bonds, the director shall notify each borrower whose loan was
made from the proceeds of the bonds being refunded and shall offer the borrower the  opportunity
to prepay the borrower’s loan. A borrower shall respond within 60 days of the date of  the notice
described in this subsection if the borrower intends to prepay the borrower’s loan.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 470.300 is amended to read:
470.300. (1) There hereby is created the Small Scale Local Energy Project Administration  and
Bond Sinking Fund, separate and distinct from the General Fund, to provide for payment of:
(a) Administrative expenses of the [ State Department of Energy and the Director of the State  De-
partment of Energy ] Oregon Business Development  Department and the Director of the Oregon
Business Development Department  in processing applications, investigating potential small scale
local energy projects and proposed loans and servicing and  collecting outstanding loans made from
the Small Scale Local Energy Project Loan Fund, if the expense is not paid directly by the applicant.
(b) Administrative expenses  of the State Treasurer in carrying out the duties, functions and
powers imposed upon the State Treasurer by this chapter.
(c) Principal, interest and redemption premium, if any, of all bonds issued pursuant to the pro-
visions of ORS 470.220 to 470.290 and Article XI-J of the Oregon Constitution.
(d) Net investment earnings on any funds loaned to municipal corporations but withheld  as
provided in ORS 470.230.
(e) Costs of issuing the bonds and of obtaining credit enhancement for the bonds.
(2) The fund created by subsection (1) of this section shall consist of:
(a) Application fees required by ORS 470.060, unless the department  requires the applicant to
pay the fee directly for a cost incurred in connection with the application.
(b) Repayment of moneys  loaned to applicants from the Small Scale Local Energy Project Loan
Fund, including interest on such moneys.
(c) Such moneys as may be appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(d) Moneys obtained from the sale of refunding bonds under ORS 470.220 to 470.290  and any
accrued interest on such bonds.
[14]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Moneys received from ad valorem taxes levied pursuant to Article XI-J of the Oregon Con-
stitution, and all moneys that the Legislative Assembly may provide in lieu of such taxes.
(f) Interest earned on cash balances invested by the State Treasurer.
(g) Moneys transferred from the loan fund.
(h) Gifts, grants, donations or other moneys for  promoting small scale local energy [ program
loan purposes and goals ] projects .
(3) The director, with the approval of  the State Treasurer, may transfer moneys from the sinking
fund to the loan fund if:
(a) A cash flow projection shows that, for the term of the bonds outstanding  at the time the
director transfers the moneys, remaining moneys in the sinking fund, together with  expected loan
contract payments and fund earnings, will improve the  financial basis of the program and will con-
tinue to be  adequate to pay bond principal, interest, redemption premiums, if any, and administration
costs; and
(b) The transfer will not create the need for issuance of any bonds.
(4) The director,  with the approval of the State Treasurer, may establish separate and distinct
accounts within the sinking fund to accomplish the purpose of this section.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 470.310 is amended to read:
470.310. (1) If there are insufficient funds in the Small Scale Local  Energy Project Adminis-
tration and Bond Sinking Fund to make  the payments referred to in ORS 470.300 (1), the Director
of the  [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development Department  may request the
funds necessary for such payments from the Legislative Assembly or the Emergency Board.
(2) When the director determines that moneys in sufficient  amount are available in the sinking
fund, the State Treasurer shall reimburse the General Fund without  interest, in an amount equal to
the amount allocated by the Legislative Assembly or the Emergency Board pursuant  to subsection
(1) of this section. The moneys  used to reimburse the General Fund under this subsection shall not
be considered a budget item on which a limitation is otherwise fixed by law, but shall  be in addition
to any specific appropriations or  amounts authorized to be expended from continually appropriated
moneys.
SECTION 30.  ORS 470.810 is amended to read:
470.810. (1) The State Department of Energy  shall establish the clean energy deployment pro-
gram to provide grants and loans to support energy efficiency or clean energy projects in this state.
The department shall establish criteria for qualifications of the projects by rule.
(2)(a) The department may use funds from  the [ Jobs, Energy and Schools Fund and ] the Clean
Energy Deployment Fund to provide loans and grants to school districts  that have projects to
weatherize, upgrade and retrofit kindergarten through grade 12 public schools in this state, in  order
to improve energy efficiency.
(b) A school district that finances a project through the clean energy  deployment program may
not self-perform work constituting more than five percent of the total cost  of the project being fi-
nanced.
(c) All school projects financed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection through  the clean
energy deployment  program are deemed to be public works projects and are subject to the prevailing
wage requirements of ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870.
(3) The department may contract for the implementation of the clean  energy deployment pro-
gram [ in all or parts of this state with a sustainable energy project manager as defined in ORS
470.050].
[15]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 31.  ORS 470.815 is amended to read:
470.815. (1) School districts that participate in the clean energy deployment program established
in ORS 470.810 may finance projects to:
(a) Weatherize, upgrade and retrofit kindergarten through grade 12 public schools;
(b) Retrofit school bus fleets to operate on compressed natural gas or other alternative  fuels
such as propane or to operate with high-efficiency types of engines such as hybrid electric engines;
or
(c) Replace school bus fleets with  school buses that operate on compressed natural gas or other
alternative fuels such as propane or that operate with high-efficiency types of engines such as hybrid
electric engines.
(2) The projects described in  subsection (1) of this section shall be designed to improve energy
efficiency, decrease fuel costs, increase use of alternative fuels and decrease  emissions of air con-
taminants.
(3) School districts may finance the projects described in subsection (1) of this section by:
(a) Paying directly for the projects;
(b) Receiving lower  interest loans from the Clean Energy Deployment Fund or the Small Scale
Local Energy Project Loan Fund, supported by:
[(A) Grant moneys from the Jobs, Energy and Schools Fund; ]
[(B)] (A)  Public purpose charges directed to a school district in  areas served by investor-owned
utilities under ORS 757.612;
[(C)] (B)  Qualified Energy Conservation  Bonds issued under the Energy Improvement and Ex-
tension Act of 2008 or other federal loan programs; or
[(D)] (C) Revenues generated by the savings in energy costs resulting from  the energy efficiency
improvements;
(c) Issuing general  obligation bonds, subject to the bond election requirements under ORS
328.210; or
(d) Using any other source of moneys.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 223.680 is amended to read:
223.680. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Local government” means cities and counties.
(b) “Qualifying real property” means multifamily residential dwellings or  commercial or indus-
trial buildings that the local  government has determined can be benefited by utilities improvements.
(c) “Utilities improvements” means improvements to qualifying  real property for any of the fol-
lowing  purposes:
(A) Energy efficiency.
(B) Renewable energy.
(C) Energy storage.
(D) Smart electric vehicle charging stations.
(E) Water efficiency.
(2)(a) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a local government  may establish a program to
assist owners of record of qualifying real property in financing cost-effective  utilities improvements
to the qualifying real property.
(b) The utilities improvements must be authorized by:
(A) A local government implementing a program established under this section; or
(B) The [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business  Development Department  for a loan
[16]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
issued under subsection (10) of this section to a local government that establishes a program  in co-
operation with a local government described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(c) A program established pursuant to this subsection may provide for the local government to:
(A) Make loans to owners  financed with the net proceeds and interest earnings of revenue bonds
authorized by subsection (9) of this section;
(B) Facilitate private financing by the owners; or
(C) Make loans under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and facilitate  private financing under
subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.
(3) Before establishing a program under this section, the local  government shall provide notice
to utilities that distribute electric energy, natural gas or water within the areas in which  the local
government will operate the program.
(4) A local government that establishes a program under this section may:
(a) Require performance of an energy  or water audit on the qualifying real property before the
local government approves a loan for utilities improvements to the property;
(b) Impose requirements intended to ensure that the costs of  the improvements financed under
this section do not exceed the cumulative  cost savings of the improvements over the useful life of
the improvements; and
(c) Impose requirements and conditions  on loans or financing agreements that are designed to
ensure timely repayment.
(5)(a) If the  owner of record of qualifying real property requests financing pursuant to a program
established under this section, subject to  subsection (6) of this section, the local government imple-
menting the program may:
(A) Enter into a loan agreement with the owner, and any other person benefited by the  loan;
or
(B) Facilitate a financing agreement for the owner, and any other  person benefited by the fi-
nancing.
(b) A loan agreement or financing agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph  (a) of this
subsection must be in a principal amount sufficient to pay:
(A) The costs of  utilities improvements the local government determines will benefit the quali-
fying real property and the borrowers;
(B) The costs of the energy or water audit; and
(C) The costs and reserves of the program.
(c) A local government acting pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection may:
(A) If the local government makes a  loan, charge the borrower an interest rate on the principal
amount that is sufficient to pay the financing costs of the  loan program, including loan delinquen-
cies; and
(B) Charge periodic fees to pay for program costs.
(6) A local government may not enter into  a loan agreement, or facilitate a financing agreement,
under subsection (5) of this section unless the owner has:
(a) Provided written notice to all mortgagees  of the qualifying real property that the owner in-
tends to enter into a loan agreement or financing agreement under this section; and
(b) Received written consent from the mortgagees  stating that the loan agreement or financing
agreement entered into under this section does not constitute an event of default or  give rise to any
remedies under the terms of the mortgage loan agreements.
(7) The local government implementing a program established under this section may:
[17]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Secure a  loan or financing with a lien on the benefited qualifying real property with the
same priority, as determined under ORS 223.230 (3), as  a lien for assessments for local improvements
arising under ORS 223.393.
(b) Assess the benefited qualifying real property for the amounts due under a  loan agreement
or financing agreement.
(c) Enforce a lien and collect an assessment authorized by  this section as provided in ORS
223.505 to 223.650.
(d) Secure a loan or financing in  any other manner that the local government determines is
reasonable.
(8)(a) In lieu of enforcing liens and collecting assessments as provided  in subsection (7)(c) of this
section, a local government may certify the assessment, in the  manner provided in ORS 310.060, to
the county assessor of each county in which benefited qualifying real property is located.
(b) If the assessments are certified as provided in this subsection, the county assessor shall:
(A) Enter the assessment upon the county assessment roll against  the property described in the
certificate, in the manner that other local government assessments are entered;
(B) Collect, account for and enforce  the assessments in the manner that local government
property taxes are collected, accounted for and enforced; and
(C) Transfer, as provided  by law, the assessments collected to the local government that imposed
the assessment.
(9) A local government may issue revenue bonds pursuant to  ORS 287A.150 to finance the costs
of a program established under this section,  including the costs of making loans for utilities im-
provements.
(10) The [ State Department of Energy ] Oregon Business Development Department  may lend
money under the provisions of ORS 470.060 to 470.080 and 470.090 to a local  government that es-
tablishes a program under this section  in cooperation with a local government implementing a pro-
gram under this section.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 757.247 is amended to read:
757.247. (1) The Public  Utility Commission may authorize a public utility, upon application of the
utility, to file and place into effect  a tariff schedule establishing rates or charges for the cost of
energy resource  measures provided to an individual property owner or customer pursuant to an
agreement entered into between the individual property owner or customer and the public utility.
Energy resource measures provided under this section may include:
(a) The installation of renewable energy generation facilities on  the property of property owners
or the premises of customers;
(b) The implementation of energy conservation measures, including measures  that are not cost-
effective;
(c) The installation of equipment or devices or the implementation of measures that enable de-
mand reduction,  peak load reduction, improved integration of renewable energy generation or more
effective utilization of energy resources;
(d) Loans for the purposes described in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection; and
(e) Direct payments to third parties for the purposes  described in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this
subsection.
(2) Subject to the agreement entered  into between the individual property owner or customer
and the public utility, a tariff schedule placed into effect under  this section may include provisions
for:
[18]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The payment of the rates or charges over a period of time;
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) of  this section, a reasonable rate of return on any in-
vestment made by the public utility;
(c) The  application of any payment obligation to successive owners of the property to which the
energy resource measure is attached or to successive customers located at the premises to which
the energy resource measure is attached; and
(d) The application of the payment obligation to the current property owner or customer alone,
secured by methods agreed to by the property owner or customer and the public utility.
(3) Application of a tariff schedule under this section is subject to approval by the commission.
(4) If  a payment obligation applies to successive property owners or customers as described in
subsection (2)(c) of this section, a public utility  shall record a notice of the payment obligation in
the records maintained by the county clerk under ORS 205.130. The commission  may prescribe by
rule other methods by which the public utility  shall notify property owners or customers of such
payment obligations.
(5) A public utility may use  moneys obtained through a rate established under ORS 757.603 (2)(a)
to provide a renewable energy generation facility to a property owner or customer under this sec-
tion. A public utility may not charge interest to a property  owner or customer for a renewable en-
ergy generation  facility acquired with moneys obtained through a rate established under ORS
757.603 (2)(a).
(6) Agreements entered into and tariff schedules placed into  effect under this section are not
subject to ORS [ 470.500 to 470.710,] 757.612 or 757.689.
(Transfer of Moneys and Appropriation)
SECTION 34.
(1) The following funds are abolished on the operative  date specified in
section 40 of this 2019 Act:
(a) The Energy Project Supplemental Fund;
(b) The Jobs, Energy and Schools Fund;
(c) The Energy Project Bond Loan Fund; and
(d) The Energy Revenue Bond Repayment Fund.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the funds specified in subsection (1) of this section on the
operative date specified in section 40 of this 2019 Act  that are unexpended, unobligated and
not subject to any  conditions shall be transferred to the Small Scale Local Energy Project
Loan Fund created by Article XI-J of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 35.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $  for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act, the amendments
to statutes by sections 8 to 33 of this 2019 Act and  the repeal of ORS 470.100 by section 39
of this 2019 Act.
(Report)
SECTION 36.
The Oregon Business  Development Department, in consultation with the
State Department of Energy, shall report to the appropriate interim  committees of the
Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2020, on  the estimated cost of continuing
[19]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to manage the  loan portfolio, including an estimate of ongoing transaction costs, for loans
for small scale local energy projects under ORS chapter 470 for the next eight years.
SECTION 37. Section 36 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2021.
AUDIT
SECTION 38. The State Department of Energy shall contract with an independent third
party to conduct an audit, including a forensic audit, of all  activities of the department re-
lated to the issuance of loans for small scale  local energy projects under ORS chapter 470
to determine compliance with the provisions of ORS 223.680, 291.445, 470.050, 470.060,  470.070,
470.080, 470.090, 470.100, 470.110, 470.120, 470.130, 470.135,  470.140, 470.145, 470.150, 470.160,
470.170, 470.180, 470.190, 470.200, 470.210,  470.230, 470.270, 470.300, 470.310, 470.810 and 470.815,
all as in effect immediately before the operative date specified in section 40 of this  2019 Act.
The audit required under this section  shall be at the expense of the department. The auditor
shall prepare a  report of the results of the audit and make the report available to the De-
partment of Justice.
REPEALS
SECTION 39. ORS 470.100, 470.500, 470.505, 470.510, 470.515, 470.520, 470.525,  470.530,
470.535, 470.540, 470.545, 470.550, 470.555, 470.560, 470.565,  470.570, 470.575, 470.580, 470.585,
470.590, 470.595, 470.600, 470.605, 470.610,  470.615, 470.620, 470.630, 470.635, 470.640, 470.645,
470.650, 470.655, 470.660, 470.665, 470.670, 470.675, 470.680,  470.685, 470.690, 470.695, 470.700,
470.710, 470.715, 470.720, 701.108 and 701.119 are repealed.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 40. (1) Sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act, the amendments to statutes by sections
8 to 35 of this 2019 Act and the repeal of statutes by section  41 of this 2019 Act become op-
erative on January 1, 2020.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department, the Director  of the Oregon Business
Development Department, the State  Department of Energy and the Director of the State
Department of Energy may take any action before the operative date specified  in subsection
(1) of this section that is necessary to enable the  Oregon Business Development Department,
the Director of the  Oregon Business Development Department, the State Department of
Energy and the Director of the State Department of Energy to exercise, on and after  the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the departments and directors by sections 1 to 7  of this 2019 Act, the amend-
ments to statutes by sections 8 to  33 of this 2019 Act and the repeal of statutes by section
39 of this 2019 Act.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 41. The unit  captions used in this 2019 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
[20]
SB 267
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2019 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 42. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[21]