Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall conduct a study to determine:
(a) The cost of hiring retired  police officers to work part-time in the public schools of
this state to provide security for those schools; and
(b) The impact of hiring retired police officers to provide  security for public schools on
the schools, school districts, education service districts, department and local, county and
state public safety agencies.
(2) The department shall report  the results of the study in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 905