Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Investment Council and the State Treasurer, in  the State
Treasurer’s role as investment officer for  the council, shall act reasonably and in a manner
consistent with ORS 293.721 and 293.726 to:
(a) Reduce the carbon intensity of the state’s investment portfolio;
(b) Address investment risk resulting  from climate change to the moneys in the Public
Employees Retirement Fund; and
(c) Make efforts to achieve net zero carbon emissions within the fund by the year 2050.
(2) The State Treasurer shall track and periodically report on the carbon intensity of
investments within the fund.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Treasurer, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $____, to carry out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 257