Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “residential facility” means:
(a) A child-caring agency, as defined in ORS 418.205,  that is a qualified residential treat-
ment program described in ORS 418.323 and that provides residential  care and treatment to
a child, as defined in ORS 418.205;
(b) A residential training home or a residential  training facility, as those terms are de-
fined in ORS 443.400; or
(c) A developmental disability child foster home, as defined in ORS 443.830.
(2) The Department of Human Services and the  Department of Education shall jointly
study the mental, emotional, behavioral health  and educational needs of youth who are in a
residential facility and who attend a  public school in this state for any grade from
kindergarten through grade 12.
(3) The study conducted under this section must:
(a) Identify gaps in funding that is intended to cover the costs of mandated programs  or
services for human services and for education and that is provided to  human services agen-
cies, school districts and education service districts for youth in  residential facilities who
attend public school;
(b) Identify gaps in available services and supports for youth in residential facilities  who
attend public school;
(c) Identify gaps in information that is related to youth in residential facilities who  at-
tend public school and that is shared between:
(A) Students;
(B) Parents and guardians;
(C) Residential facility providers and their staff; and
(D) School districts and education service districts and their staff;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1092
HB 3059
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
(d) Identify best practices for  providing educational and wraparound services and sup-
ports for youth in residential facilities who attend public school; and
(e) Respond to other requests for information or  questions identified by the departments
or by the advisory committee established under subsection (4) of this section.
(4) For the purpose of conducting the study  under this section, the departments jointly
must convene an advisory committee consisting of  13 members. The advisory committee
must include:
(a) At least one member who is a representative of school districts;
(b) At least one member who is a representative of education service districts;
(c) At least one member who is licensed as an administrator  by the Teacher Standards
and Practices Commission;
(d) At least  one member who is licensed as a teacher by the Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission;
(e) At least one member who is a classified school employee;
(f) At least one member who represents residential facility providers;
(g) At least two  members who are representatives of organizations that represent the
interests of students with disabilities and their families;
(h) At least one member who is a representative of staff who are  licensed, certified or
endorsed to provide services to youth in a residential facility setting; and
(i) Other members  who have experience or expertise in working with youth who reside
in a residential facility and who attend a public school in this state.
(5) When conducting the study under this section:
(a) The departments may  enter into a contract with a public or private entity to conduct
the study.
(b) The departments, or the  entity with which a contract is entered into to conduct the
study, must consult with the advisory  committee established under subsection (4) of this
section.
(6) The departments shall jointly submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,
and may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to education and to human services no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]