Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 455.185 is amended to read:
455.185. (1)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 455.148, 455.150 and 455.153, upon request by one  or more
municipalities and with the consent of all affected parties, the Director of the  Department of Con-
sumer and Business Services may enter into an agreement for the Department  of Consumer and
Business Services to uniformly  administer and enforce  within a geographic area  all or a portion
of a building inspection program [ within a geographic area ].
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 455.156, 479.820, 479.854 and 479.855, at the request of  one or
more municipalities the Electrical and Elevator Board may enter into an agreement to  es-
tablish an electrical licensing enforcement program within  a geographic area under ORS
479.510 to 479.945.
(c) [ The] A  geographic  area  described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection  may be a
municipality, a  region comprising parts of more than one municipality or a region comprising mul-
tiple municipalities. The geographic area need  not correspond to the jurisdictional boundaries of
municipalities. [ The] An agreement under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection  may provide for
the department  or the board, as appropriate,  to perform administration and enforcement for a
specified period or for carrying out one or more particular projects.
(2) The terms of an agreement under subsection (1)  of this section may specify whether the de-
partment is to utilize department  or board resources , as appropriate,  or combine  resources with
one or more  of the municipalities to carry out an agreement. An agreement may combine department
or board and local government resources in any  manner that the parties believe will provide for the
efficient and uniform administration of the building inspection program within  the geographic area,
including but not limited to full, divided,  mutual or joint performance of any of the administrative
or enforcement functions by  any of the parties to the agreement. A decision by the director re-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1363
SB 87
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
garding whether to enter into  or consent to  an agreement  under subsection (1) of this section, and
the content of any agreement that the director enters into under subsection (1) of this section, is
not subject to review by the Attorney General  or the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
and is subject to challenge or appeal under ORS chapter 183 only for failure to comply with an  ex-
press requirement created  under ORS 455.185 to 455.198  or, for agreements between the board
and a municipality, for failure to comply with an express licensing requirement of the board
under ORS 479.510 to 479.945.
(3) An  agreement under subsection (1) of this section is not an abandonment of a building in-
spection program for purposes of ORS 455.148 or 455.150.
(4) If the Department of Consumer and Business Services  enters into an agreement under sub-
section (1) of this section, the department and a public body that  offers construction-related services
in the geographic area may enter into an agreement for providing access to the  construction-related
services on the electronic information system described in ORS 455.095 and 455.097. The  agreement
may include, but need not be limited to, provision for access that allows the electronic submission
of an application to the public body for a construction-related permit. As used in this subsection,
“public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(5) An agreement under subsection (1)(b) of this section may:
(a) Identify, recommend or implement an expansion, reduction, specification  or appor-
tionment of authority to enforce ORS 479.510 to 479.945  between or among the parties to the
agreement;
(b) Provide for the  board and other parties to the agreement to share the proceeds of
civil penalties the board imposes  under ORS 455.895 (1)(b) and 479.995, notwithstanding pro-
visions in those sections and ORS 479.850 that specify the disposition of the proceeds; or
(c) Provide for other responsibilities for programs or  activities under ORS 479.510 to
479.945.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 455.895 is amended to read:
455.895. (1)(a) The State Plumbing Board may impose a  civil penalty against a person as pro-
vided under ORS 447.992 and 693.992. Amounts recovered  under this paragraph are subject to ORS
693.165.
(b) The Electrical and Elevator Board may impose  a civil penalty against a person as provided
under ORS 479.995. Amounts recovered under this paragraph are subject to ORS 479.850.
(c) The Board of Boiler Rules may impose a civil penalty against a  person as provided under
ORS 480.670. Amounts recovered under this paragraph are subject to ORS 480.670.
(2) The Department of Consumer and  Business Services, or an appropriate advisory board, if
any, may at [ its] the department’s or the  board’s  discretion impose a civil penalty against any
person who violates the state building code or ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to  446.285, 446.395
to 446.420, 446.566 to 446.646, 446.666 to 446.746, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 or 480.510 to 480.670,
or this chapter or ORS chapter 447, 460 or  693, or any rule adopted or order issued for the admin-
istration and enforcement of those statutes. Except as provided  in subsections (3), (4) and (9) of this
section or ORS 446.995, a civil penalty imposed under this section must be in an  amount [ determined
by] the  department or an  appropriate  advisory board [ or the department of ] determines, but  not
more than [ $5,000] $7,500 for each offense or, in the case of a continuing offense,  not more than
$1,000 for each day of the offense.
(3) Each violation of ORS 446.003 to 446.200 or 446.225 to 446.285, or any rule or  order issued
under ORS 446.003 to 446.200 or 446.225 to 446.285, constitutes a separate violation with respect to
[2]
SB 87
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
each manufactured  dwelling or with respect to each failure or refusal to allow or perform an act
required under ORS 446.003 to 446.200 or 446.225 to 446.285, except that the  maximum civil penalty
may not exceed $1  million for any related series of violations occurring within one year from the
date of the first violation.
(4) The department may  impose a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 against a public body
responsible for administering and enforcing a building inspection program. As used  in this sub-
section, “public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(5) The maximum penalty established by this section for a violation may be  imposed only upon
a finding that the person has engaged in a  pattern of violations. The department, by rule, shall de-
fine what  constitutes a pattern of violations. Except as provided in subsections (1) and (10) of this
section, moneys received from any civil penalty under this section are appropriated  continuously for
and [ shall] must  be used by the department for enforcement and administration of provisions and
rules described in subsection (2) of this section.
(6) Civil penalties under this section [ shall] must  be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
(7) The department or an appropriate advisory board may remit  or reduce  a civil penalty
imposed under this section [ may be remitted or reduced ] upon such terms and conditions as the de-
partment or the [ appropriate advisory ] board considers proper and consistent with the  public health
and safety. In any judicial review of a civil penalty imposed under this section,  the court may, in
[its] in the court’s  discretion, reduce the penalty.
(8) Any officer, director, shareholder or agent of a corporation, or  member or agent of a part-
nership or association, who  personally participates in or is an accessory to any violation by the
partnership, association or corporation of a provision or rule described in  subsection (2) of this
section is subject to the penalties prescribed in this section.
(9) In addition to  the civil penalty set forth in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, any person
who violates  a provision or rule described in subsection (2) of this section may be required by the
department or the appropriate advisory board to forfeit and pay to  the General Fund of the State
Treasury a civil penalty in an amount determined by the department or advisory  board that does
not exceed five times the amount by which such person profited in any transaction that violates  a
provision or rule described in subsection (2) of this section.
(10) If  a civil penalty is imposed for a violation of a provision of ORS 446.566 to 446.646 and the
violation relates to a filing or failure to file with  a county assessor functioning as agent of the de-
partment, the  department, after deducting an amount equal to the department’s procedural, col-
lection and other related costs and  expenses, shall forward one-half of the remaining civil penalty
amount to the county in which the manufactured structure is located at the time of the violation.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 701.255 is amended to read:
701.255. The Construction Contractors Board may retain [ 20] 50 percent  annually from the funds
[collected] the board collects  under ORS 701.992. The amount [ retained] the board  retains  under
this section [ shall be ] is  continuously appropriated  to  the board  for the board’s costs of [ collection
of] collecting civil penalties [ imposed] the board imposes  by order [ of the board ].
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $500,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer
and Business Services  to carry out the provisions of the amendments to ORS 455.185 by
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
[3]
SB 87
1
[4]