Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Affordable  homeownership program” means a program established, implemented and
operated by a nonprofit organization whereby affordable housing is made available to persons
in low income households.
(2) “Affordable housing” means housing that is affordable for persons in  low income
households.
(3) “Low income household” means a household having an  income equal to or less than
100 percent of the median household income for the  area as determined by the Housing and
Community Services Department. In making the  determination, the department shall give
consideration to any data on area household income published by the  United States Depart-
ment of Housing and Urban Development.
(4) “Manufactured home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 446.003.
(5) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization or group of organizations  that is de-
scribed in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue  Code and is exempt from income tax
under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(6) “Nonprofit organization grant  program recipient” means a nonprofit organization that
has been awarded a grant from the Housing and Community Services Department  under
section 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Affordable Homeownership  Grant Program is established within the
Housing and Community Services Department. The purpose of the program is to provide
grants to eligible nonprofit organizations with homeownership programs that  will provide
opportunities for homeownership to persons in low income households.
(2) The department shall make grants to eligible nonprofit  organizations for the following
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1843
HB 2570
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
purposes:
(a) To purchase or  leverage loans made to persons in low income households to purchase
or build new homes, replace manufactured homes or acquire and rehabilitate homes; or
(b) To purchase, construct  or rehabilitate homes and manufactured homes for sale to
persons in low income households who are first-time homeowners.
(3) The department  shall specify by rule the qualifications that a nonprofit organization
must demonstrate to be eligible  to receive a grant under this section. At a minimum, the
nonprofit organization must have  established and be operating, or demonstrate that the
nonprofit organization will establish and operate, an affordable  homeownership program. The
department shall ensure that successful nonprofit organization grant recipients are ge-
ographically diverse throughout the state.
(4) The department shall specify, by  rule, an application process for nonprofit organiza-
tions to apply to participate in the  Affordable Homeownership Grant Program. Upon being
awarded a  grant under this section, the department and the nonprofit organization grant
program recipient  shall enter into an agreement that, at a minimum, contains provisions
that:
(a) Indicate the purposes for which the grant funds may be used;
(b) Contain the repayment provisions set forth in subsection (5) of this section;
(c) Contain the provisions set forth in subsection (7) of this section;
(d) Require the nonprofit organization to create and administer a revolving fund  as de-
scribed in section 3 of this 2017 Act;
(e) Permit the department to conduct audits and investigations of the nonprofit  organ-
ization regarding the purposes for which grant moneys have been used; and
(f) Require annual reports by  the nonprofit organization to the department as set forth
in subsection (6) of this section.
(5) A nonprofit organization grant program recipient will be required to repay to the  de-
partment, in whole or in part, grant moneys received under this section if  and to the extent
that:
(a) The nonprofit organization does not use  the grant funds to create a revolving fund
in accordance with section 3 of this 2017 Act;
(b) The nonprofit organization does not use  the grant funds in accordance with the pro-
visions of the grant agreement  executed between the department and the nonprofit organ-
ization under subsection (4) of this section; or
(c) The Director of the Housing and Community  Services Department determines that
the nonprofit organization must repay all or part of the grant funds on grounds  of
defalcation, fraud or similar reasons after auditing or investigating the nonprofit
organization’s operations and conducting an administrative proceeding under ORS 183.413 to
183.470.
(6)(a) A nonprofit organization grant program recipient must report annually to the  de-
partment concerning the status and use of grant funds received  under this section. The de-
partment, by rule, shall specify the information that the report must contain. At a minimum,
the report must include:
(A) A  detailed description of the nonprofit organization grant program recipient’s activ-
ities as they relate to use of awarded grant funds;
(B) A list of each loan that  the nonprofit organization grant program recipient has made
[2]
HB 2570
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and a full accounting of the repayment status of these loans;
(C) A list of the number of  homes or manufactured homes that the nonprofit organiza-
tion grant program recipient purchased, constructed, rehabilitated and sold;
(D) The nature and  amounts of the administrative expenses the nonprofit organization
grant program recipient incurs with respect to the revolving fund  described in section 3 of
this 2017 Act; and
(E) Aggregated data concerning the income, racial or ethnic  background, family size and
related demographic information of persons in low  income households who received assist-
ance with homeownership opportunities under the Affordable  Homeownership Grant Pro-
gram from the nonprofit organization grant program recipient,  excluding any personal
information about an individual.
(b) The nonprofit organization grant program  recipient must provide the report described
in this subsection to the department not later than December 31 of each year.
(7)(a) Amounts of loans  purchased or leveraged, or made, by a nonprofit organization
grant program recipient under this section shall not constitute a debt  of the state or a
lending of the credit of the state within  the meaning of any constitutional or statutory lim-
itation, although nothing in this subsection or in the  terms of an agreement between the
department and a nonprofit organization grant program recipient is intended to  impair the
rights of the nonprofit organization to exercise any  rights granted to the nonprofit organ-
ization against the security for the mortgage loan.
(b) The department may not pay amounts for grants under this section from any source
other than  available funds in the Affordable Homeownership Grant Program Fund estab-
lished in section 4 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) A nonprofit organization grant program recipient must  use grant funds
awarded under section 2 of this 2017 Act  to create and administer a revolving fund that the
nonprofit organization grant program recipient uses to:
(a) Purchase or leverage mortgage loans originated or  made by third parties for the
benefit of  persons in low income households to purchase or build new homes, replace manu-
factured homes or acquire and rehabilitate homes; or
(b) Purchase, construct or rehabilitate homes and  manufactured homes for sale to per-
sons in low income households that are first-time homeowners.
(2) A nonprofit organization grant program  recipient shall establish, in consultation with
the Housing and Community Services Department, eligibility requirements and standards for
persons in low income households to participate in  the nonprofit organization’s affordable
homeownership program.
(3) The nonprofit organization grant program recipient shall deposit payments that bor-
rowers make on mortgage loans into the revolving fund created under this section.
(4) A nonprofit organization grant program recipient may charge a third  party interest
or a discount on loans purchased or leveraged by the nonprofit organization.
(5) A nonprofit organization grant program recipient may receive  and deposit into the
revolving fund created under this section contributions, donations, grants and  other trans-
fers of money from any source, public or private. The nonprofit organization  grant program
recipient shall keep accounts and records that identify the source and nature of the transfers
and withdrawals made to and from the revolving fund.
SECTION 4.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
[3]
HB 2570
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
General Fund, the Affordable Homeownership  Grant Program Fund. Interest earned on the
Affordable Homeownership Grant Program Fund must be credited  to the fund. Moneys in the
Affordable Homeownership Grant Program Fund are continuously appropriated to the Hous-
ing and Community Services Department to make grants to eligible nonprofit  organizations
with affordable homeownership programs.
(2) Moneys  in the Affordable Homeownership Grant Program Fund may be used by the
department to pay for the administrative expenses of the  department in establishing, imple-
menting and administering the Affordable Homeownership Grant Program.
(3) The Affordable Homeownership Grant Program Fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Repayment of grant funds under section 2 (5) of this 2017 Act;
(c) Moneys transferred  to the fund from the federal or state government or from private
contributions;
(d) Application fees, if any;
(e) Interest and other earnings on moneys in the fund; and
(f) Gifts, grants or donations received from any source.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $25 million, which may be expended to  es-
tablish and implement the Affordable Homeownership Grant Program  under sections 1 to 4
of this 2017 Act.
[4]