Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon  Quality Education Model Modernization Task Force is es-
tablished for the purposes  of evaluating current standards for staffing, technology and
transportation and evaluating workforce  requirements and opportunities for private sector
investment. When performing the duties of the task force under this section, the task  force
shall consider the study conducted under section 12, chapter 95, Oregon Laws 2024.
(2) The task force shall consist of nine members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one  member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) One member who is a school district superintendent;
(B) One member who is a member of a school district board;
(C) One member who is a public school teacher of any grade from kindergarten to  grade
12;
(D) Two members who are parents of students in public schools in this state;
(E) One member who represents the business community; and
(F) One member who does not have any children in the public schools of this state.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Evaluate the manner by which the Quality  Education Commission establishes goals
and determines  the costs for educational resources, including staffing, technology and
transportation;
(b) Evaluate workforce  requirements and opportunities for private sector investment
based on the region served by a school district or an education service district;
(c) Develop a baseline budget for the public schools of this  state and for each school
district to implement the recommendations of the Quality Education Commission;
(d) Add an additional three percent to the baseline budget  developed under paragraph (c)
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1707
HB 2904
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
of this subsection to be  used by school districts directly in classrooms in the manner deter-
mined best by each school district; and
(e) Identify the funding needed at  80, 90, 100 and 103 percent of the adjusted budget cal-
culated as provided under paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(4) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include  recommendations for legislation, to the interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2026. The report must  include an
analysis of the evaluations and budget  model described in subsection (3) of this section pro-
vided by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  and the Legislative Fiscal Office.
(11) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(12) The Department of Education shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation, but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel and  other
expenses incurred by them in the  performance of their official duties in the manner and
amounts provided for in ORS 292.495. Claims for  expenses incurred in performing functions
of the task force shall be paid out of funds appropriated to the  Department of Education for
purposes of the task force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of its duties and, to the extent permitted  by laws relating
to confidentiality, to furnish such information and advice as the members of the task force
consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]