Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 243.144, as amended by section 9, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
243.144. Benefit plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the  cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply with  the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810;
(10) ORS 743A.325; [ and]
(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c)[ .]; and
(12) Section 2, chapter 35, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 2.
 ORS  243.144, as amended by sections 9 and 10, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
243.144. Benefit  plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health  services and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3436
HB 3086
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810; [ and]
(10) ORS 743A.325[ .]; and
(11) Section 2, chapter 35, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to  ORS 243.144 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to benefit
plans issued, renewed or extended on or after October 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]