Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 215.448 is amended to read:
215.448. [(1) The governing body of a county or its designate may allow, subject to  the approval
of the governing body or its  designate, the establishment of a home occupation and the parking of ve-
hicles in any zone. However, in an exclusive farm use zone, forest zone or a mixed farm and forest zone
that allows residential uses, the following standards apply to the home occupation: ]
[(a) It shall be operated  by a resident or employee of a resident of the property on which the
business is located; ]
[(b) It shall employ on the site no more than five full-time or part-time persons; ]
[(c) It shall be operated substantially in: ]
(1) As used in this section, “home occupation” means an occupation or  profession that
is customarily  conducted in a dwelling and is accessory, incidental and subordinate to the
primary use of the dwelling for residential use.
(2) A county may allow a home occupation to be established in any zone. A  home occu-
pation may be established in an existing dwelling on lands zoned for exclusive farm  use,
forest use or mixed farm and forest use, only if the home occupation:
(a) Is operated by an owner of the property who is also a resident of the dwelling;
(b) Employs on the site no more  than five individuals, other than an owner of the prop-
erty, each of whom may work full-time or part-time;
(c) Does not provide clients with on-site dining, drinking, event  hosting or lodging of
more than five unrelated persons, except as allowed under ORS 215.449,  215.451, 215.452,
215.453 or 215.461;
(d) Does not use external signs identifying the  home occupation that are lighted or larger
than 12 square feet;
(e) Does not allow for the parking of more than three client vehicles;
(f) Is operated substantially within an area no greater than 2,000 square feet located in:
(A) The dwelling; or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2006
SB 77
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
(B) Other buildings normally associated with , and accessory to, the dwelling  [ uses permitted
in the zone in which the property is located ]; and
[(d)] (g)  [ It shall ] Does  not unreasonably interfere with :
(A) The use of the dwelling as a dwelling; or
(B) Other uses permitted in the zone in which the property is located.
[(2)] (3) [ The governing body of the county or its  designate ] The county  may establish additional
reasonable conditions of approval  for the establishment or use  of a home occupation under [ sub-
section (1) of ] this section.
[(3) Nothing in this section authorizes the governing body  or its designate to permit construction
of any structure that would not otherwise be allowed in the zone in which  the home occupation is to
be established.]
(4) This section does not authorize or limit the development of any structure.
[(4)] (5) [ The existence of home occupations shall ] A home occupation may  not be  used as jus-
tification for a zone change.
[2]