Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this section, “school of higher education” means:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(b) A community college, as defined in ORS 341.005.
(2)(a) The Secretary of State shall ensure that [ within four  miles of the main campus of each
school of higher education ] there  is at least one location designated as an official ballot drop site
under ORS 254.470  at  each public high school and on each campus of a school of higher edu-
cation.
(b) The  requirement set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection applies only to elections held
within the  electoral district in which the [ main campus of a ] public high school or  school of higher
education is located.
(3) Each school of higher education shall:
(a) Display a direct link to the Secretary of State’s online voter registration tool on  the school’s
Internet website or  on any appropriate student-focused digital communication network managed by
the school.
(b) Upon the request of the school’s official student government or  its equivalent, give the stu-
dent government or its equivalent an opportunity to provide nonpartisan voter registration services:
(A) As part of student orientation programs held by the school’s administration;
(B) As part of campus welcome events that occur before classes begin each  academic term; and
(C) As part of residence life program activities.
(c) Upon the request of the school’s official student government or its equivalent, provide the
student government  or its equivalent with an official class schedule and a list of professional contact
information for school faculty, which may be used for the purpose of seeking faculty approval for
the student government or its equivalent to provide nonpartisan voter registration  classroom pres-
entations.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3834
SB 1012
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
(d) Provide individual students and student groups the  opportunity to provide nonpartisan voter
registration services throughout the academic term in any nonreserved  public space on the school’s
property, provided that the nonpartisan voter registration services conform  to the rules of conduct
and rules for reserving space at the school. This paragraph applies only to students enrolled at  the
school and does not alter in any way the rights of a person who is not enrolled as  a student at the
school.
(e) If the school owns and  operates any student housing, at least three months prior to each
primary or general election:
(A) Obtain from the  local county elections office what address information students living in
on-campus housing must provide in order to receive election ballots in  the event a student chooses
to vote using the student’s campus address; and
(B) Make the information obtained under  subparagraph (A) of this paragraph available to the
school’s official student government or its equivalent.
SECTION 2.  Section 2, chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 2. Section 1 , chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2016,  [ of this 2016 Act ] first applies to the
[2017-2018] 2018-2019 academic year.
SECTION 3.  Section 3, chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 3. (1) Section 1 , chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2016  [ of this 2016 Act ] becomes operative on
July 1, [ 2017] 2018.
(2) The Secretary of State,  a public high school or a  school of higher education, as defined
in section 1 , chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2016  [ of this 2016 Act ], may  take any action before the
operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section that is necessary for the school to exercise,
on and after the operative  date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred  on the school by section 1 , chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2016  [ of this 2016
Act].
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of  $_____, to be allocated to county clerks for the purpose of hiring indi-
viduals to carry out the provisions of section  1, chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2016, as amended
by section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]