Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $27,414,113.59 for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 2 and 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 2. After withholding $150,000 from the moneys appropriated under  section 1 of
this 2024 Act for its  costs in administering this section and section 3 of this 2024 Act, the
Oregon Business Development Department shall distribute $13,799,040 as follows:
(1) $5,918,747 to:
MAJOR VENUES.
Name of venue Grant Amount
High Desert Museum ................ $ 379,750
Oregon Ballet Theatre .............. $ 341,775
Oregon Shakespeare Festival .... $ 2,555,175
Oregon Symphony ..................... $ 949,375
Portland Art Museum ............... $ 743,298
Portland Center Stage .............. $ 474,687
Portland Opera.......................... $ 474,687
(2) $7,880,293 to:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 175
HB 4124
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
CULTURAL RESOURCES ECONOMIC FUND VENUES.
Name of venue Grant Amount
Black United Fund .................... $ 900,000
Clatsop County Historical
Society ...................................... $ 1,000,000
Columbia County Museum
Association................................ $ 400,000
High Desert Museum ................ $ 2,000,000
Friends of Oregon Caves
and Chateau .............................. $ 455,690
Josephine County Library
Foundation................................ $ 424,603
Painted Sky Center for
the Arts .................................... $ 500,000
PAM CUT//Center for an
Untold Tomorrow...................... $ 250,000
Portland Institute for
Contemporary Art ..................... $ 150,000
Portland Playhouse................... $ 300,000
Rainier Oregon Historical
Museum..................................... $ 500,000
Salem Parks Foundation ........... $ 150,000
Southern Oregon Historical
Society ...................................... $ 500,000
Very Little Theatre ................... $ 350,000
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Earned revenue” means revenue from the  sale of goods or services, including, but
not limited to, membership, admission tickets, rentals, exhibitions, merchandise,  food and
beverages, advertising and contracted services and performances.
(B) “Earned revenue”  does not include donations, federal, state or local governmental
grants, or returns on investments.
(b) “Oregon cultural organization” means a public  or private entity, whether operated for
profit or as a nonprofit organization, that:
(A) Has its business headquarters, and operates primarily, in this state;
(B) Operates primarily for  the purpose of producing, promoting or presenting the arts,
culture, humanities, heritage or live cultural entertainment,  other than adult entertainment,
to the public; and
(C)(i) Operates as a public facility, performing arts organization, museum, historical  site,
visual arts organization, county fairgrounds, cultural entity within a federally  recognized
Indian tribe based in Oregon or community event organization; or
(ii) Produces cultural projects or programs for the public.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department shall use $13,465,073.59 of the  moneys
[2]
HB 4124
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
appropriated under section 1 of  this 2024 Act to develop and implement a program for
awarding grants directly to Oregon cultural organizations.
(3) To be eligible for a grant, an Oregon cultural  organization must demonstrate to the
department’s satisfaction that,  at any time during fiscal year 2020 through fiscal year 2023,
the organization experienced a significant loss in  earned revenue because of statewide man-
dates, or guidance of the Oregon Health Authority, in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.
(4)(a) The department shall prescribe the form  and process by which Oregon cultural
organizations may apply for and be awarded grants under the program.
(b) The department may require applicants to demonstrate  need, as described in sub-
section (6) of this section, in the form of:
(A) The organization’s federal tax  returns for the periods to which the application re-
lates; or
(B) Financial documentation, including, but not limited to, audited financial statements
or financial statements that have been approved by a certified public accountant.
(5) The department may consult with the  Trust for Cultural Development Board in re-
viewing applications and awarding grants.
(6) The department shall develop an equitable funding allocation so that grant  moneys
shall be awarded, subject to subsections (7) and (8) of this section, with priority  given to
applicants who have experienced the greatest proportional  loss, as measured by the ratio of
an applicant’s total lost  earned revenue to the applicant’s total earned revenue for each fis-
cal year, beginning with fiscal year 2019, to which the application relates.
(7) Subject to subsection (8) of this section, the department shall develop award allocation
options that take into account  an equitable percentage of an applicant’s fiscal size and lost
earned revenue and available funding.
(8) Under consultation with the Trust for Cultural Development Board, the department
shall award grant moneys proportionately among the  geographic regions of this state, as
defined by the department,  based on the relative population of, and the number of eligible
applications received from Oregon cultural organizations located in, each region. Regions
may be defined according to the service areas of  cultural coalitions operating under the
auspices of the board and grant moneys may be distributed through the cultural coalitions.
(9) Before awarding grants, the department  may withhold an amount, not to exceed five
percent of the total amount appropriated  under section 1 of this 2024 Act, to reimburse the
department for the actual costs of developing and implementing the program.
(10) Notwithstanding any other  provision of law, this section shall apply to any grant
moneys that the department awards to  an Oregon cultural organization on or after the ef-
fective date of this 2024 Act in response to the negative impact of the COVID-19  pandemic
on the organization’s earned revenue.
(11) Any venue that received a grant under section 254,  chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023,
is not eligible to receive a grant under this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) Section 3 of this 2024 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2025.
(2) The  Oregon Business Development Department may take any action before the oper-
ative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section that is necessary for the department to
exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,  all of the
powers, duties and functions conferred on the department under section 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
[3]
HB 4124
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]