Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of  Fish and Wildlife, in consultation with the
Oregon Conservation and Recreation Advisory  Committee, shall establish a program to
award grants for building or  improving public facilities for recreational fishing located inside
an urban growth boundary.
(2) Projects for  which grants are awarded must serve to protect, maintain or enhance
fish and wildlife resources in Oregon, as described in ORS 496.252 (2).
(3) Grants awarded under this section shall be paid out of the Oregon Conservation  and
Recreation Fund established under ORS 496.252.
(4) In carrying out this section, the department shall consider opportunities to coordinate
with the Restoration  and Enhancement Board established under ORS 496.286 to enhance
fishing access.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount  of $200,000, for deposit in the Oregon Conservation and
Recreation Fund established under ORS 496.252 for the purpose of awarding grants  under
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2413