Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Forestry Department shall study forest products. The department
shall submit a report on the study in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include
recommendations for  legislation, to the committees or interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to natural resources no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3224