Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 414.231 is amended to read:
414.231. (1) As used in this section[ :],
[(a) “Adult” means a person 19 years of age or older. ]
[(b)] “child” means a person under 19 years of age.
(2) The Cover All [ People ] Children program is established to  make affordable, accessible health
care  available  to all [ residents] children in this state. The program provides medical assistance,
funded in whole or in part by Title XIX of the Social Security Act, by the State Children’s  Health
Insurance Program under Title XXI  of the Social Security Act or by moneys appropriated or allo-
cated by the  Legislative Assembly to supplement funds received under Title XIX or XXI of the Social
Security Act.
(3) A child is eligible for medical assistance under  subsection (2) of this section if the child re-
sides in  this state and the income of the child’s family is at or below 300 percent of the federal
poverty guidelines.
[(4) An adult is eligible for medical assistance under subsection (2) of this section  if the adult re-
sides in this state and would be eligible  for medical assistance but for the adult’s immigration
status.]
[(5)] (4) There is no asset limit to qualify for the program.
[(6)(a)] (5)(a) A child receiving medical  assistance through the Cover All [ People ] Children
program is continuously eligible for a minimum period of 12 months or until the child  reaches 19
years of age, whichever comes first.
(b) The  Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority shall reenroll a child
for successive 12-month periods of enrollment as long as the child is  eligible for medical assistance
on the date of reenrollment and the child has not yet reached 19 years of age.
(c) A  child may not be required to submit a new application as a condition of reenrollment under
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4187
HB 3722
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
[(7)] (6) The department or the authority must  determine eligibility for or reenrollment in med-
ical assistance under this section using information and sources available to  the department or the
authority. If information and sources available to the department or the authority are  not adequate
to verify eligibility, the department or the authority may require the [ adult] child or [ a] the child’s
caretaker to provide additional documentation in accordance with ORS  411.400 and 411.402. Infor-
mation requested or obtained by the department or the authority under  this subsection is subject
to the requirements of ORS 410.150 and 413.175.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 413.201 is amended to read:
413.201. (1) The Oregon Health Authority is responsible for  statewide outreach, education and
engagement for the Cover All [ People ] Children program established in ORS 414.231 and  adminis-
tered by the authority with the goal of  enrolling in the program all eligible [ individuals] children
residing in this state. The authority, in collaboration with  the work group described in subsection
(3) of  this section, shall evaluate and implement the outreach, education and engagement strategies
designed to most effectively encourage enrollment in the program.
(2) To maximize the enrollment and retention of eligible [ individuals] children in the Cover  All
[People ] Children program, the authority shall develop and administer  a grant program to provide
funding to organizations and  community based groups to deliver culturally specific and targeted
outreach, application assistance and navigation to:
(a) Members of racial, ethnic and language minority communities;
(b) Children and families living in geographic isolation; and
(c) Children and families with additional  barriers to accessing health care, such as cognitive,
mental health or sensory disorders, physical disabilities or chemical dependency or homelessness.
(3) The authority shall convene a work  group, consisting of individuals with experience in con-
ducting outreach to the individuals described in subsection (2)(a) to (c) of this section, to advise and
assist the authority in carrying out its duties under this section and in  developing an implementa-
tion plan to ensure that community feedback is included from a health equity perspective.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 192.556, as amended by section 47, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
192.556. As used in ORS 192.553 to 192.581:
(1) “Authorization” means a  document written in plain language that contains at least the fol-
lowing:
(a) A description of the information to be  used or disclosed that identifies the information in a
specific and meaningful way;
(b) The name or  other specific identification of the person or persons authorized to make the
requested use or disclosure;
(c) The name or other specific identification of the person or persons to whom the covered entity
may make the requested use or disclosure;
(d) A description of each purpose of the requested  use or disclosure, including but not limited
to a statement that the use or disclosure is at the request of the individual;
(e) An expiration date or an expiration event that relates to the individual  or the purpose of the
use or disclosure;
(f) The signature of the individual or personal representative of the individual and the date;
(g) A description of the authority of the personal representative, if applicable; and
(h) Statements adequate to place the individual on notice of the following:
[2]
HB 3722
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The individual’s right to revoke the authorization in writing;
(B) The exceptions to the right to revoke the authorization;
(C) The ability or inability to condition treatment, payment, enrollment or eligibility  for benefits
on whether the individual signs the authorization; and
(D) The  potential for information disclosed pursuant to the authorization to be subject to
redisclosure by the recipient and no longer protected.
(2) “Covered entity” means:
(a) A state health plan;
(b) A health insurer;
(c) A health care provider that  transmits any health information in electronic form to carry out
financial or administrative activities in  connection with a transaction covered by ORS 192.553 to
192.581; or
(d) A health care clearinghouse.
(3) “Health care” means care, services or supplies related to the health of an individual.
(4) “Health care operations” includes but is not limited to:
(a) Quality assessment, accreditation, auditing and improvement activities;
(b) Case management and care coordination;
(c) Reviewing the competence, qualifications or performance of health care  providers or health
insurers;
(d) Underwriting activities;
(e) Arranging for legal services;
(f) Business planning;
(g) Customer services;
(h) Resolving internal grievances;
(i) Creating deidentified information; and
(j) Fundraising.
(5) “Health care provider” includes but is not limited to:
(a) A psychologist,  occupational therapist, regulated social worker, professional counselor or
marriage and family therapist licensed or otherwise authorized to practice under  ORS chapter 675
or an employee of the  psychologist, occupational therapist, regulated social worker, professional
counselor or marriage and family therapist;
(b) A physician or physician associate licensed  under ORS chapter 677, an acupuncturist li-
censed under ORS 677.759 or an employee of the physician, physician associate or acupuncturist;
(c) A nurse or nursing home administrator licensed under  ORS chapter 678 or an employee of
the nurse or nursing home administrator;
(d) A dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679 or an employee of the dentist;
(e) A dental hygienist or denturist licensed under ORS chapter 680 or an employee of the  dental
hygienist or denturist;
(f) A speech-language  pathologist or audiologist licensed under ORS chapter 681 or an employee
of the speech-language pathologist or audiologist;
(g) An emergency medical services provider licensed under ORS chapter 682;
(h) An optometrist licensed under ORS chapter 683 or an employee of the optometrist;
(i) A chiropractic physician licensed under ORS chapter 684 or an employee of  the chiropractic
physician;
(j) A naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685  or an employee of the naturopathic
[3]
HB 3722
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
physician;
(k) A massage therapist licensed under ORS 687.011 to 687.250 or an  employee of the massage
therapist;
(L) A direct entry midwife licensed under ORS 687.405 to 687.495 or an employee of  the direct
entry midwife;
(m) A  physical therapist licensed under ORS 688.010 to 688.201 or an employee of the physical
therapist;
(n) A medical imaging licensee under ORS 688.405 to 688.605  or an employee of the medical
imaging licensee;
(o) A respiratory care practitioner  licensed under ORS 688.815 or an employee of the respiratory
care practitioner;
(p) A polysomnographic technologist licensed under ORS 688.819 or an employee  of the poly-
somnographic technologist;
(q) A pharmacist licensed under ORS chapter 689 or an employee of the pharmacist;
(r) A dietitian licensed under ORS 691.405 to 691.485 or an employee of the dietitian;
(s) A funeral service practitioner licensed  under ORS chapter 692 or an employee of the funeral
service  practitioner;
(t) A health care facility as defined in ORS 442.015;
(u) A home health agency as defined in ORS 443.014;
(v) A hospice program as defined in ORS 443.850;
(w) A clinical laboratory as defined in ORS 438.010;
(x) A pharmacy as defined in ORS 689.005; and
(y) Any other person or entity that furnishes, bills for or is paid for health  care in the normal
course of business.
(6) “Health information” means any oral or written information in any form or medium that:
(a) Is created or received by a covered entity, a public  health authority, an employer, a life
insurer, a school, a university or a health care provider that is not a covered entity; and
(b) Relates to:
(A) The past, present or future physical or mental health or condition of an individual;
(B) The provision of health care to an individual; or
(C) The past, present or future payment for the provision of health care to an individual.
(7) “Health insurer” means an insurer as defined in ORS 731.106 who offers:
(a) A health benefit plan as defined in ORS 743B.005;
(b) A short term health insurance policy, the duration of  which does not exceed three months
including renewals;
(c) A student health insurance policy;
(d) A Medicare supplemental policy; or
(e) A dental only policy.
(8) “Individually identifiable health information”  means any oral or written health information
in any form or medium that is:
(a) Created or received by a covered entity, an employer or a health care provider that is not
a covered entity; and
(b) Identifiable to an individual, including  demographic information that identifies the individual,
or for which there is a reasonable  basis to believe the information can be used to identify an indi-
vidual, and that relates to:
[4]
HB 3722
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The past, present or future physical or mental health or condition of an individual;
(B) The provision of health care to an individual; or
(C) The past, present or future payment for the provision of health care to an individual.
(9) “Payment” includes but is not limited to:
(a) Efforts to obtain premiums or reimbursement;
(b) Determining eligibility or coverage;
(c) Billing activities;
(d) Claims management;
(e) Reviewing health care to determine medical necessity;
(f) Utilization review; and
(g) Disclosures to consumer reporting agencies.
(10) “Personal representative” includes but is not limited to:
(a) A person appointed as a guardian under ORS 125.305, 419B.372,  419C.481 or 419C.555 with
authority to make medical and health care decisions;
(b) A person appointed as a health care representative under ORS 127.505 to 127.660 or a rep-
resentative under ORS 127.700 to 127.737 to make health care decisions or mental health  treatment
decisions;
(c) A person appointed as a personal representative under ORS chapter 113; and
(d) A person described in ORS 192.573.
(11)(a) “Protected health information” means  individually identifiable health information that is
maintained or transmitted in any form of electronic or other medium by a covered entity.
(b) “Protected health information” does  not mean individually identifiable health information in:
(A) Education records covered  by the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20
U.S.C. 1232g);
(B) Records described at 20 U.S.C. 1232g(a)(4)(B)(iv); or
(C) Employment records held by a covered entity in its role as employer.
(12) “State health plan” means:
(a) Medical assistance as defined in ORS 414.025;
(b) The Cover All [ People ] Children program; or
(c) Any medical assistance or premium assistance program operated by the Oregon Health  Au-
thority.
(13) “Treatment” includes but is not limited to:
(a) The provision, coordination or management of health care; and
(b) Consultations and referrals between health care providers.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 413.225 is amended to read:
413.225. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community health center or safety net clinic” means a nonprofit medical  clinic or school-
based health center that provides primary physical health, vision, dental or mental health services
to low-income patients without charge or using a sliding scale based on the income of the patient.
(b) “School-based health center” means a health clinic that:
(A) Is located on the grounds of a school in a school district or on  the grounds of a school op-
erated by a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribal organization;
(B) Is organized through collaboration among schools, communities  and health providers, in-
cluding public health authorities;
(C) Is administered by a county, state, federal or private organization that ensures that  certi-
[5]
HB 3722
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
fication requirements are met and provides project funding through grants, contracts, billing  or
other sources of funds;
(D) Is operated exclusively for the purpose of providing health services such as:
(i) Primary care;
(ii) Preventive health care;
(iii) Management and monitoring of chronic health conditions;
(iv) Behavioral health care;
(v) Oral health care;
(vi) Health education services; and
(vii) The administration of  vaccines recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Pre-
vention;
(E) Provides health services to children and adolescents  by licensed or certified health profes-
sionals; and
(F) May provide one or more health services to children and adolescents by:
(i) A student enrolled in a professional medical, nursing or dental program at an  accredited
university if the health service is within the student’s field of study and training; or
(ii) An expanded practice dental  hygienist holding a permit issued under ORS 680.200 for oral
health care.
(2)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall award grants to community health centers or safety
net clinics, including school-based health centers, to ensure the capacity of  each grantee to provide
health care services to underserved or vulnerable populations.
(b) The authority shall work with  the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and
stakeholders to identify additional sources of funding  for school-based health center expenditures for
which federal financial participation is available under Title XIX or Title XXI of the Social Security
Act.
(3) The authority shall provide outreach for the  Cover All [ People ] Children program, including
development and administration of an application  assistance program, and including grants to pro-
vide funding to organizations and local groups for outreach and  enrollment activities for the pro-
gram, within the limits of funds provided by the Legislative Assembly for this purpose.
(4) The authority shall, using funds allocated by the Legislative Assembly:
(a) Provide funds for the expansion and continuation of school-based health  centers that are
operating on July 29, 2013, and that become certified under ORS 413.223;
(b) Direct  funds to communities with certified school-based health centers and to communities
planning for certified school-based health centers; and
(c) Create a pool of funds available to provide financial incentives to:
(A) Increase the number of school-based health  centers identified as patient centered primary
care homes without requiring school-based health centers to be identified  as patient centered pri-
mary care homes;
(B) Improve the coordination of the care of patients served by coordinated care organizations
and school-based health centers; and
(C) Improve the effectiveness of the delivery of health services through  school-based health
centers to children who qualify for medical assistance.
(5) The authority  shall by rule adopt criteria for awarding grants and providing funds in ac-
cordance with this section.
(6) The authority shall analyze and evaluate the implementation of the Cover All [ People ] Chil-
[6]
HB 3722
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dren program.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 414.578 is amended to read:
414.578. (1) A community health improvement plan adopted by a  coordinated care organization
and its community advisory council in accordance with ORS 414.577 shall include a  component for
addressing the health of  children and youth in the areas served by the coordinated care organization
including, to the extent practicable, a strategy and a plan for:
(a) Working with programs developed by the Early Learning Council, Early Learning Hubs,  the
Youth Development Council and the school health providers in the region; and
(b) Coordinating the effective and efficient  delivery of health care to children and adolescents
in the community.
(2) A community health improvement plan must be based on research, including research into
adverse childhood experiences, and must identify funding sources and additional  funding necessary
to address the health needs of children and adolescents  in the community and to meet the goals of
the plan. The plan must also:
(a) Evaluate the adequacy of the  existing school-based health resources including school-based
health centers and school nurses to meet the specific pediatric and adolescent health care needs in
the community;
(b) Make recommendations to improve the school-based health center and  school nurse system,
including the addition or improvement of electronic medical records and billing systems;
(c) Take into consideration whether integration of school-based health centers  with the larger
health system or system of community clinics would further advance the goals of the plan;
(d) Improve the integration of  all services provided to meet the needs of children, adolescents
and families;
(e) Focus on primary care, behavioral health and oral health; and
(f) Address promotion of health and prevention and early intervention in the  treatment of chil-
dren and adolescents.
(3) A coordinated care organization  shall involve in the development of its community health
improvement plan, school-based health centers, school nurses, school mental health  providers and
individuals representing:
(a) Programs developed by the Early Learning Council and Early Learning Hubs;
(b) Programs developed by the Youth Development Council in the region;
(c) The Healthy Start Family Support Services program in the region;
(d) The Cover All [ People ] Children program and other medical assistance programs;
(e) Relief nurseries in the region;
(f) Community health centers;
(g) Oral health care providers;
(h) Community mental health providers;
(i) Administrators of county health department programs  that offer preventive health services
to children;
(j) Hospitals in the region; and
(k) Other appropriate child and adolescent health program administrators.
(4) The  Oregon Health Authority may provide incentive grants to coordinated care organizations
for the purpose of contracting with  individuals or organizations to help coordinate integration
strategies identified in the community health improvement plan adopted by the community advisory
council. The authority may also  provide funds to coordinated care organizations to improve systems
[7]
HB 3722
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of services that will promote the implementation of the plan.
(5) Each coordinated care organization shall  report to the authority, in the form and manner
prescribed by the authority, on the progress of the integration strategies  and implementation of the
plan for working with the programs developed by the Early Learning Council, Early Learning Hubs,
the Youth Development Council and school health care providers in  the region, as part of the de-
velopment and  implementation of the community health improvement plan. The authority shall
compile the information biennially and report the information  to the Legislative Assembly by De-
cember 31 of each even-numbered year.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 431A.430, as amended by section 1, chapter 108, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
431A.430. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Air conditioner” means a portable, stand-up air conditioner that has an energy  efficiency
ratio rating of eight or higher.
(b)(A) “Air filter” means an  air filtering device that uses a high-efficiency particulate air
(HEPA) filter to remove contaminating particles from the air.
(B) “Air filter” does not include a device that is labeled an “air purifier” and that uses  an
electrostatic or ionizing process.
(c) “Eligible distribution entity” means a:
(A) Local government as defined in ORS 174.116;
(B) Local housing authority;
(C) Nonprofit organization;
(D) Federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon;
(E) Indian health center;
(F) Coordinated care organization as defined in ORS 414.025;
(G) Community action agency as described in ORS 458.505;
(H) Manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperative as defined in ORS 62.803;
(I) Landlord that  has a residential tenant who has received medical assistance through the
Oregon Health Authority, the Department of Human Services or Medicare within the past  12
months;
(J) Electric utility as defined in ORS 757.600; or
(K) Natural gas utility as defined in ORS 757.392.
(d) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(2)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall create a program to:
(A) Acquire a supply of air conditioners and air filters; and
(B) Distribute the air conditioners and air filters to eligible  distribution entities that will pro-
vide the air conditioners and air filters for an emergency or anticipated emergency  to eligible indi-
viduals as described in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) The Oregon Health Authority  may provide or contract with one or more third parties to
administer the program.
(3) The administrator of the program shall:
(a) Determine the percentage of program funds needed to support  the costs of installation and
materials for installation.
(b) Determine the percentage of program funds,  but no more than 10 percent of program funds,
needed to cover the costs of the authority or a third party or  parties and eligible distribution enti-
ties in administering the program.
[8]
HB 3722
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
(c) Make technical assistance resources  available to individuals who receive an air conditioner
or air filter under the program  that answer questions about the installation, use and maintenance
of the air conditioners and air filters.
(d) Provide to eligible distribution entities:
(A) Technical assistance, including assistance  that supports the distribution, installation and
maintenance of the air conditioners and air filters; and
(B) Reimbursement for costs of identifying eligible  Oregonians, delivering devices, providing
utility supports when otherwise not available and ensuring that  devices are installed and working
properly.
(4) An eligible distribution  entity may distribute air conditioners and air filters under this sec-
tion only to individuals who:
(a) Are  eligible to receive medical assistance through the Oregon Health Authority, the De-
partment of Human Services or Medicare, including under  the Cover All [ People ] Children program
established in ORS 414.231, or have received any of these services in the past 12 months;
(b) Reside in any type of housing or recreational vehicle, as defined in ORS 174.101, that  has
electricity for operating the air conditioner or air filter; and
(c) Upon receiving an air conditioner or air filter, provide an attestation that the individual can
safely and legally install the air conditioner or air filter in the  individual’s home or recreational
vehicle.
(5) The Oregon Health Authority shall make available a list of eligible distribution entities
participating in the program to:
(a) Individuals who are eligible to receive medical assistance through  the Oregon Health Au-
thority or Department of Human Services.
(b) The 2-1-1 system provided for in ORS 403.400 to 403.430.
(c) The Housing and Community Services Department.
(6) The Oregon Health Authority and any  eligible distribution entity participating in the pro-
gram are immune from civil liability for:
(a) The functioning, safety or impact of any air conditioner or air filter  distributed by the pro-
gram.
(b) Any heat-related health impacts to an individual using an air  conditioner or air filter dis-
tributed by the program.
(7) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules to implement the program.
SECTION 7.
(1) The amendments to ORS 192.556, 413.201, 413.225, 414.231, 414.578 and
431A.430 by sections 1 to 6 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority  by the amendments to ORS 192.556, 413.201, 413.225,
414.231, 414.578 and 431A.430 by sections 1 to 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[9]