Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall conduct a study  of the
economic development of ports in Oregon. The department  shall submit a report of its
findings to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to economic devel-
opment in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 722