Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section,  “suicidal behavior” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 339.341.
(2) As part  of the comprehensive district plan on student suicide prevention adopted un-
der ORS 339.343, each school district shall ensure  that an individualized suicide prevention
protection plan is developed, reviewed and revised for  each student who demonstrates sui-
cidal behavior.
(3) For the purpose of assisting school districts in complying with  the requirements de-
scribed in subsection (2)  of this section, the State Board of Education, in consultation with
the Oregon Health Authority, shall establish by rule:
(a) The required contents of an individualized suicide prevention protection  plan and the
procedures for the development, review and revision of the plan; and
(b) A standardized form for use in an individualized suicide prevention protection plan.
(4) An individualized suicide prevention protection plan must, at a minimum, identify:
(a) Indicators of the  student’s suicidal behavior, which must be provided to the student’s
teachers to the extent allowed by federal and state law.
(b) Student organizations or activities that may help the student manage stress.
(c) Coping skills and techniques that the student may  use to manage stress and calm
down.
(d) Places the student may go if the student needs to leave a stressful situation.
(e) Online classes that the student may  take if the student needs to leave a stressful
classroom environment, and a school employee that may act as an aide during this time.
(f) Any people, places or objects that trigger stress for  the student and a plan to mini-
mize or avoid those triggers.
(g) A plan to remove the student from a triggering environment in  a manner that does
not cause physical or mental harm or disrupt the student’s education.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 992
HB 2392
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) Reasons that encourage the student to want to live.
(i) Trusted persons that a school may contact if the student indicates suicidal behavior.
(j) Accommodations the school may make to help the student.
(k) Any plan developed by the student’s behavioral or mental health service provider.
(5) A school district shall ensure that the following individuals are involved in the devel-
opment, review or revision of an individualized suicide prevention protection plan:
(a) A suicide prevention specialist.
(b) The student’s school counselor.
(c) A public counselor.
(d) A behavioral or mental health service provider.
(e) The student’s parent or guardian.
(6) For a student who has demonstrated suicidal behavior at any time, the  school district
shall provide for, at a minimum, an annual meeting between the student’s parent or guardian
and the student’s teacher or an  appropriate school employee. The purpose of the meeting
shall be to:
(a) Provide the parent or guardian an update on the student’s education progress; and
(b)(A) Determine if the student would benefit from  an individualized suicide prevention
protection plan as provided by  this section, an individualized education program as defined
in ORS 343.035 or a 504 Plan as defined in ORS 343.068; or
(B) Update a plan or program described in subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph if a plan
or program is already in place.
(7) Each  school district shall use the standardized form established by the State Board
of Education for the  development, review and revision of individualized suicide prevention
protection plans.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 339.343 is amended to read:
339.343. (1) This section shall be known and may be cited as Adi’s Act.
(2) In accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Education in consultation  with the
Oregon Health Authority, each school district shall adopt a policy requiring a comprehensive dis-
trict plan on student suicide prevention for students in kindergarten through grade 12.
(3) A plan required under this section must include:
(a) Procedures relating to suicide prevention, intervention  and activities that reduce risk and
promote healing after a suicide , including the development, review and revision of individual-
ized suicide prevention protection plans under section 1 of this 2025 Act ;
(b) Identification of the school officials responsible for responding to reports of suicidal risk;
(c) A procedure by which a person may request a school  district to review the actions of a
school in responding to suicidal risk;
(d) Methods to address the needs of high-risk groups, including:
(A) Youth bereaved by suicide;
(B) Youth with disabilities, mental illness or substance use disorders;
(C) Youth experiencing homelessness or out-of-home settings, such as foster care; and
(D) Lesbian, gay,  bisexual, transgender, queer and other minority gender identities and sexual
orientations;
(e) A description of, and materials  for, any training to be provided to school employees as part
of the plan, which must include:
(A) The prevention of suicide, including recognizing  early signs of suicidal behavior, as
[2]
HB 2392
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
defined in ORS 339.341;
[(A)] (B) When and how to refer youth and  their families to appropriate mental health services;
and
[(B)] (C) Programs that can be completed through self-review of suitable suicide prevention
materials; and
(f) Any other requirement prescribed  by the State Board of Education by rule, based on con-
sultations with  state and national suicide prevention organizations, suicide experts and school-based
mental health providers, and based on reviews of national models.
(4) A  school district may consult with state or national suicide prevention organizations, the
Department of Education, school-based mental health professionals,  parents, guardians, school em-
ployees, students, administrators and school board associations when developing  the plan required
under this section.
(5) The plan required under this section:
(a) Must be  written to ensure that a school employee acts only within the authorization and
scope of the employee’s credentials or licenses. Nothing in this section shall be construed  as au-
thorizing or encouraging a school employee to diagnose or treat mental illness unless the  employee
is specifically licensed and employed to do so.
(b) Must be:
(A) Made available annually to the  community of the school district, including students of the
school district, parents and  guardians of students of the school district, and employees and volun-
teers of the school district.
(B) Readily available at the school district office and on the school district website, if applicable.
(6) A school district that does not comply  with the requirements of this section is considered to
be nonstandard under ORS 327.103.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon  Health and Science University shall convene a work group
to examine ways to improve individualized suicide prevention protection  plans developed un-
der section 1 of this 2025  Act and manage disruptive classroom environments during a be-
havioral or mental health crisis.
(2) The university shall submit a report on the work group’s findings and  recommen-
dations in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  leg-
islation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to education and
human services no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
[3]