Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 197.712 is amended to read:
197.712. (1) In addition to the findings and policies set forth in ORS  197.005, 197.010 and 215.243,
the Legislative Assembly finds and declares that, in carrying out statewide comprehensive land use
planning, the provision of adequate opportunities for a variety of economic activities  throughout the
state is vital to the health, welfare and prosperity of all the people of the state.
(2) By the adoption of new goals or rules,  or the application, interpretation or amendment of
existing goals or rules,  the Land Conservation and Development Commission shall [ implement all of
the following ] ensure that :
(a) Comprehensive plans [ shall] include an analysis  of the community’s economic patterns,
potentialities, strengths and deficiencies as they relate to state and national trends.
(b) Comprehensive plans [ shall] contain policies concerning the economic  development opportu-
nities in the community.
(c) Comprehensive  plans and land use regulations [ shall] provide for at least an adequate supply
of sites of suitable sizes, types, locations and service levels for industrial and commercial  uses con-
sistent with plan policies.
(d) Comprehensive plans and land use regulations  [shall] provide for compatible uses on or near
sites zoned for specific industrial and commercial uses.
(e) Comprehensive plans and land use regulations allow within lands zoned for commer-
cial uses, where appropriate, the development of housing supportive of commercial uses.
[(e)] (f)  [ A city or county shall ] Cities and  counties  develop and adopt [ a] public facility [ plan]
plans for areas within an urban  growth boundary containing a population greater than 2,500
persons[. The public facility plan shall ] that must  include rough cost estimates  for public projects
needed to provide sewer, water and transportation  for the land uses contemplated in the compre-
hensive plan and land use regulations. Project  timing and financing provisions of public facility
plans [ shall not be considered ] are not  land use decisions.
[(f)] (g)  In accordance with ORS 197.180, state agencies that provide  funding for transportation,
water supply, sewage and solid waste facilities [ shall] identify  in their coordination programs how
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4484
HB 3449
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
they will coordinate that funding  with other state agencies and with the public facility plans of
cities and counties. In addition, state agencies that issue  permits affecting land use shall identify in
their coordination  programs how they will coordinate permit issuance with other state agencies and
cities and counties.
[(g)] (h)  Local governments [ shall] provide:
(A) Reasonable opportunities to satisfy local and rural needs for residential and  industrial de-
velopment and other economic activities on appropriate lands outside urban  growth boundaries, in
a manner consistent with conservation of the state’s agricultural and forest land base; and
(B) Reasonable opportunities for urban  residential, commercial and industrial needs over time
through changes to urban growth boundaries.
[(3) A comprehensive plan  and land use regulations shall be in compliance with this section by the
first periodic review of that plan and regulations. ]
SECTION 2. A local government’s comprehensive  plan and land use regulations must be
in compliance with the amendments to ORS 197.712 by section 1 of this 2019 Act by  the first
periodic review of the plan and regulations.
[2]