Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary that relates
to the financial administration of legislative branch offices and agencies,  no amount may be
appropriated, allocated or otherwise expended to support partisan caucus offices, except that:
(a) Legislators may continue to meet based on party affiliation;
(b) Moneys otherwise allocable to  caucus offices may be allocated to member service and
supply accounts established pursuant to Senate and House Rules; and
(c) Members  may pool service and supply account moneys together to fund additional
support, policy or communications staff to support issue-based caucuses.
(2) Moneys not expended under subsection (1) of this section may be allocated by  the
President of the Senate and the Speaker  of the House of Representatives among the statu-
tory committees of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 2.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2927