Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 247.017 is amended to read:
247.017. (1) The Secretary of State shall by rule establish a schedule by  which the Department
of Transportation shall provide to the secretary electronic records containing the legal name,  age,
residence and citizenship information for, and  the electronic signature of, each person who meets
qualifications identified by the secretary by rule.
(2) Upon receiving the  electronic record for, and electronic signature of, a person described in
subsection (1) of this section  and subject to subsection (3) of this section , the Secretary of State
shall provide the information to the county  clerk of the county in which the person may be regis-
tered as an elector. The secretary or county clerk shall notify each person of the process to:
(a) Decline being registered as an elector.
(b) Adopt a political party affiliation.
(3) Prior to providing any information to a county clerk under subsection (2) of this  sec-
tion, the  Secretary of State shall verify the information the Department of Transportation
provides to the secretary under subsection (1) of this section. The secretary may not  provide
any information to a county clerk unless  the secretary has verified that the person is a
United States citizen.  Verification under this subsection includes a review of any document
showing that the person is a United States citizen.
(4) If a person notified under subsection (2) of this section does  not decline to be registered as
an elector within 21 calendar days after the Secretary of State or county  clerk issues the notifica-
tion, the person’s electronic record and electronic signature submitted under  subsection (1) of this
section will constitute a completed registration card for the person for  purposes of this chapter. The
person shall be registered to  vote if the county clerk determines that the person is qualified to vote
under Article II, section 2, of the Oregon Constitution, and the person is not  already registered to
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1544
HB 3470
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vote.
[(4)] (5) A county clerk may not send  a ballot to, or add to an elector registration list, a person
who meets eligibility requirements until at least 21  calendar days after the Secretary of State or
county clerk provided notification to the person as described in subsection (2) of this section.
[(5)] (6) In addition to providing electronic records to the  Secretary of State under subsection
(1) of  this section, the Department of Transportation may by rule develop, and require the avail-
ability or use of, any form or  application the department determines is necessary to ensure compli-
ance with  the voter registration provisions of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L.
103-31).
[(6)] (7) The Secretary of State shall adopt rules required  to implement subsections (1) to [ (4)]
(5) of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 247.018 is amended to read:
247.018. (1)(a) Subject  to compliance with all applicable federal laws and regulations, the Sec-
retary of State shall by  rule establish a schedule by which the Oregon Health Authority shall pro-
vide to the secretary electronic records, derived from information  provided to the Oregon Health
Plan, containing the legal  name, age, residence and citizenship information for, and, if any, the
electronic signature of, each person who is eligible to be a qualified  elector under Article II, section
2, of the Oregon Constitution.
(b) The secretary shall establish by rule, after consultation with  the authority, what electronic
records establish whether a person is eligible to be a qualified elector for purposes of this sub-
section.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the authority may not provide  to the sec-
retary any electronic records for a person who is not a citizen of the United States.
(2) When establishing a schedule under subsection (1)  of this section, the secretary may adopt
rules governing the format and frequency of data  transfer. Any rules adopted under this subsection:
(a) Are subject to input and public comment, including comment from the authority; and
(b) May come  into effect only after the secretary and authority test and verify the data transfer
processes.
(3) The secretary:
(a) Shall by rule develop a process to obtain an electronic signature from  the Department of
Transportation for each person described in subsection (1) of this  section for whom the authority
does not provide an electronic signature under this section; and
(b) May use an electronic signature that  is obtained under paragraph (a) of this subsection or
that is otherwise in the secretary’s possession, for the purpose of registering  electors to vote under
this section.
(4) Upon receiving the electronic record for a person described in subsection (1) of  this section
and subject to subsection (5) of this  section , the secretary shall provide the information to the
county clerk of the county in which the person may  be registered as an elector. The secretary or
county clerk shall notify each person of the process to:
(a) Decline being registered as an elector;
(b) Adopt a political party affiliation; and
(c) Provide a signature if  no signature was provided under subsection (1) of this section and the
secretary does not have a copy of the signature  and is unable to obtain an electronic copy of the
signature from the Department of Transportation under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Prior to providing any information to a county clerk under subsection (4) of this  sec-
[2]
HB 3470
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
tion, the Secretary of State shall verify  the information the Oregon Health Authority pro-
vides to the secretary under subsection  (1) of this section. The secretary may not provide
any information to a county clerk unless the secretary has  verified that the person is a
United States citizen. Verification under this subsection includes a review of any  document
showing that the person is a United States citizen.
(6) Notwithstanding the absence of any  signature, if a person notified under subsection (4) of
this section does not decline to be registered as an elector within 21 calendar days after the secre-
tary or county clerk  issues the notification, the person’s electronic record submitted to the county
clerk under subsection (4) of this section  will constitute a completed registration card for the person
for purposes of this  chapter. The person shall be registered to vote if the county clerk determines
that the person is qualified to vote under Article  II, section 2, of the Oregon Constitution, and the
person is not already registered to vote.
[(6)] (7) A county clerk may not send  a ballot to, or add to an elector registration list, a person
who is  determined under subsection [ (5)] (6) of this section to be qualified to vote, and who is not
already registered to vote, until at least 21 calendar days after the  secretary or county clerk pro-
vided notification to the person as described in subsection (4) of this section.
[(7)] (8) The transfer of personal information and data by the authority  or department to the
secretary under this section is limited to the information and data that is necessary to register
electors. Information and data transferred  to the secretary under this section may be used only for
the purpose of registering electors.
[(8)] (9) The secretary shall adopt rules required to implement this section, including  rules to
ensure that no  ballot is counted for a person registered to vote under this section whose registration
record does not contain an electronic signature.
[(9)] (10) As used in this section, “electronic signature” means an electronic form of a hand-
written signature that can be verified, in the manner described in  ORS 254.470 (11), for the purpose
of tallying ballots.
SECTION 3.
(1) The amendments to ORS 247.017 and  247.018 by sections 1 and 2 of this
2025 Act become operative on June 1, 2026.
(2) The Secretary of State, the Oregon Health Authority and  the Department of Trans-
portation may  take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,
all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the Secretary  of State, the Oregon
Health Authority and the Department of  Transportation by the amendments to ORS 247.017
and 247.018 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act.
[3]