Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 341.522 is amended to read:
341.522. (1) The Office of Student  Access and Completion shall administer the Oregon Promise
program as provided by this section.
(2) Subject to subsections (7) to (10) of this section, the office  shall provide a grant for courses
offerred by a  community college [ courses] or a career school licensed under  ORS 345.010 to
345.340 to  a person who meets the criteria described in subsections (3) to (6) of this section. The
grant shall be limited as provided by subsections (7) to (10) of this section.
(3) A grant shall be awarded under this section to a person who meets the following criteria:
(a) Is enrolled in courses that are:
(A) Offered at a community college in this state  or a career school  licensed under ORS
345.010 to 345.340; and
(B) Determined  by the office, in accordance with rules adopted by the Higher Education Coor-
dinating Commission, to be required for completion of:
(i) A one-year curriculum for students who plan to  transfer to another post-secondary institution
of education;
(ii) An associate degree; [ or]
(iii) A program in career and technical education;  or
(iv) For a career school, a training and certificate program through the career school;
(b) Except as provided in subsection  (5) of this section, has been a resident of this state for at
least 12 months prior to enrolling in the courses described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) Attained the  person’s highest level of education, except as provided in subsection (5) of this
section, in this state prior to:
(A) Receiving a diploma under ORS 329.451;
(B) Receiving a certificate for passing an approved  high school equivalency test such as the
General Educational Development (GED) test as provided by ORS 350.175;
(C) Completing grade 12 in compliance with the requirements of ORS 339.035; or
(D) Completing grade 12 at a private or parochial school, as described in ORS 339.030 (1)(a);
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4134
SB 1045
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Except as provided in  subsections (4) and (5) of this section, attained the person’s highest
level of education as described in  paragraph (c) of this subsection within six months from the date
that the person first enrolls in courses described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection for the purpose
of receiving a grant under this section;
(e) Earned a cumulative grade point  average of 2.0 or better in high school or otherwise dem-
onstrated an equivalent academic ability, as determined by the office according to rules adopted  by
the commission;
(f) Completed and  submitted the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for each academic
year and accepted all state and federal aid grants available to  the person, if eligible to file the ap-
plication;  and
(g) Has not completed either of the following:
(A) More than  a total of 90 credit hours, or the equivalent, at a post-secondary institution of
education; or
(B) A curriculum, degree or program, as described in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(4)(a) If a person otherwise meets the required criteria and has been awarded  a grant under
subsection (3) of this  section, but the person enters into service with a career and technical student
organization relating to agriculture or  farming that is approved by the Department of Education
under ORS 344.077 within six months  after the person attained the person’s highest level of educa-
tion as described in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the person will continue to be eligible to receive
the grant if the person first enrolls in courses  described in subsection (3)(a) of this section within
six months of finishing the person’s service with the career and technical student organization.
(b) In addition to the situation  described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the commission may
waive the requirement set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section for a person who shows  that the
person was unable to timely enroll in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section due to a
significant hardship. The commission may adopt rules to implement this paragraph.
(5)(a) A member of the  Oregon National Guard who has completed initial active duty training
is not required to comply with the criteria set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section in order to
receive a grant, provided that the member first enrolls in  courses described in subsection (3)(a) of
this section within six  months after completing initial active duty training, as evidenced by an offi-
cial form issued by the United States Department of Defense.
(b)(A) A  person who completes the highest level of education as described in subsection (3)(c)
of this section while confined in a correctional facility, either serving a  sentence of incarceration
or as a young person, youth or adjudicated youth, is not required to comply with the criteria set
forth in subsection (3)(d) of this  section in order to receive a grant, provided that the person first
enrolls in courses described  in subsection (3)(a) of this section within six months after the date on
which the person is first released from a  correctional facility following completion of the highest
level of education described in subsection (3)(c) of this section.
(B) The eligibility requirements described in subsection (6)(a)(C) of this section  may be waived
by the office according to rules  adopted by the commission for a person who receives a grant under
this section in the manner described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) As used in this paragraph:
(i) “Adjudicated youth,” “detention facility,” “young person” and “youth” have the  meanings
given those terms in ORS 419A.004.
(ii) “Correctional facility” means any place used  for the confinement of young persons, youths
or adjudicated youths or persons charged with or convicted of a crime or otherwise confined  under
[2]
SB 1045
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a court order, including a:
(I) Youth correction facility;
(II) Detention facility;
(III) Department of Corrections institution;
(IV) Local correctional facility; or
(V) State hospital or a secure intensive community inpatient facility, with respect to  persons
detained therein who are youths or  adjudicated youths, who are charged with or convicted of a
crime or who are detained therein after  having been found guilty except for insanity of a crime
under ORS 161.290 to 161.373 or having  been found responsible except for insanity under ORS
419C.411.
(iii) “Department of Corrections institution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 421.005.
(iv) “Local correctional facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 169.005.
(v) “Youth correction facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 420.005.
(c)(A) If a person was a foster child:
(i) The person shall be treated as meeting the residency criteria for eligibility  under subsection
(3)(b) of this  section if, but for the person’s placement in out-of-state foster care, the person other-
wise meets the requirements of subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(ii) The person shall be treated as attaining the person’s highest  level of education in this state
under subsection (3)(c) of this section if the person  attained the person’s highest level of education
while placed in out-of-state foster care and the person’s highest  level of education substantially
meets the requirements under subsection (3)(c) of this section.
(iii) The person is not required to comply with the  criteria set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this
section in order to receive a grant provided that the  person completes the highest level of education
as described in subparagraph (A)(ii) of this paragraph while in a treatment program and the  person
first enrolls in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section within 12 months  after the date
on which the person is released from the treatment program.
(B) Upon request from the commission, the Department of Human Services  shall provide doc-
umentation of the placement status of a person described in paragraph (c)(A) of this subsection.
(C) As used in this paragraph:
(i) “Foster care” means substitute care for children placed  by the Department of Human Ser-
vices  or  a tribal child welfare agency away from the child’s parents and for whom the department
or agency  has placement and care responsibility, including placements in foster family homes, foster
homes of  relatives, group homes, emergency shelters, residential facilities, child care institutions and
preadoptive homes.
(ii) “Foster child” means a child over whom the Department of Human Services retained juris-
diction under ORS 417.200 for the duration of the child’s placement in foster care outside the  State
of Oregon.
(6)(a) A person continues to remain eligible  to receive a grant under this section if the person,
in addition to satisfying the criteria specified in subsection (3) of  this section, meets the following
criteria:
(A) Maintains at least the minimum cumulative grade point average prescribed by the  commis-
sion based on federal aid grant requirements;
(B) Makes satisfactory academic  progress toward a curriculum, degree or program, as described
in subsection (3)(a)(B) of this section, as prescribed by the commission based on federal  aid grant
requirements; and
[3]
SB 1045
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Enrolls in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section  for a sufficient number of
credit hours to be considered at least a half-time  student each term for at least three terms in each
consecutive academic year.
(b) A person who fails to meet an eligibility requirement  described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection becomes ineligible to receive a grant  under this section for the term after which the
person fails to meet the  eligibility requirement, unless the eligibility requirement is waived by the
office according to rules adopted by the commission.
(7)(a) The total amount of a grant awarded under this section shall be based on each term  that
a person is enrolled in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section. Except as  provided in
subsections (9) and (10) of this section, after the amount of tuition for the  person for the term is
reduced  by  any amounts received by the person in state and federal aid grants, the person shall be
eligible for a grant under this section in an amount that equals:
(A) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, not less than the greater of:
(i) $2,000, adjusted for inflation based on the increase of the  average cost of tuition at a com-
munity college operated under this chapter in a manner determined by the commission by  rule; and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
(B) Not more than the lesser of:
(i) The average cost of tuition at a community  college in this state, as determined by the office;
and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
(b)(A) If the office determines both that the person’s actual cost for tuition exceeds the amount
set forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i)  of this subsection and that the person’s actual cost for tuition ex-
ceeds the average cost of tuition at a community college  or career  school in this state, the person
shall be eligible  for a grant in an amount that equals the average cost of tuition at a community
college or career school  in this state.
(B) If the office determines  that the person’s actual cost for tuition is less than the amount set
forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i) of this subsection, the person shall be eligible for a  grant in an amount
that equals the amount set forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i) of this subsection.
(c) The minimum amount of a grant, as calculated under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this sub-
section, may be prorated  for a person who is enrolled in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this
section for a sufficient number of credit hours to be considered at least a  half-time student but not
a full-time student.
(d) The commission may prescribe  by rule whether to include fees, and any limitations related
to the inclusion of fees, when determining the actual cost of tuition or the average  cost of tuition
under this subsection.
(8) The  commission may adopt by rule the priority by which grants are awarded, which may
allow for preference to be given to persons enrolled in school districts or  high schools that meet
specified criteria.
(9) Prior to the start of the fall term of each academic year, the  commission shall determine
whether there are sufficient moneys to award a grant under this section to each  person who meets
the criteria described  in subsections (3) to (6) of this section. When making a determination under
this subsection, the commission may consider both projected resources  and statutory modifications
that will take effect during the  current biennium. On the basis of this determination the commission
may:
(a) Limit eligibility to receive a grant under this section to a person whose  financial resources,
[4]
SB 1045
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
as determined by  the commission by rule, are at or below the level the commission determines is
necessary to allow the commission to operate the Oregon Promise program with available moneys;
or
(b) Reduce or eliminate any limitation on eligibility previously  imposed by the commission under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(10)(a) If at any time the commission determines that there are insufficient  moneys to provide
a grant to each person who has been awarded a grant under this section, the  commission may de-
crease the total amount of the grant awarded.
(b) If at any time the commission determines that the amount  of moneys available to operate the
Oregon Promise program exceeds the amount determined under  subsection (9) of this section, the
commission may reduce or eliminate  any limitation on eligibility to receive a grant under this sec-
tion that was previously imposed by the commission under subsection (9)(a) of this section.
(c) The commission shall promptly notify  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
responsible for higher education each time the commission takes any action under paragraph (a) or
(b) of this subsection.
(11) The commission shall adopt  any rules necessary for the administration of this section, in-
cluding any requirements related to:
(a) Specifying the form and timelines for submitting an application for a grant under this section;
(b) Determining whether a person is eligible for a grant under  this section, including whether
the person shall be given priority as allowed under subsection (8) of this section;
(c) Implementing programs or  policies that improve the academic success or completion rates for
persons who receive a grant under this section;
(d) Prescribing eligibility requirements and grant calculations for persons dually enrolled in a
community college and a public university; and
(e) Evaluating the impact of the program established under this section, including any  require-
ments for reporting data needed for evaluations.
(12) No later than December 31 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall submit  to an
interim legislative committee related to  education a report that summarizes the commission’s
findings on the impact of the program established under this section. The report shall include:
(a) Student completion rates of curricula, degrees and programs described in subsection (3)(a)(B)
of this section;
(b) The  amount of federal aid grants received by persons who received a grant under this sec-
tion;
(c) The financial impact of the program  on school districts that had students receive a grant
under this section;
(d) The financial impact  and the enrollment impact of the program on community colleges and
public universities in this state; and
(e) The overall success rate of the program and financial impact of the program.
[5]