Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) ORS 830.640, 830.643, 830.646, 830.649, 830.652 and 830.655 are repealed.
(2) Section 4, chapter 119, Oregon Laws 2022, is repealed.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 830.084 is amended to read:
830.084. In establishing the  mandatory boating safety education program pursuant to ORS
830.082, the State Marine Board shall:
(1) Set a minimum standard of boating safety education. The minimum standard  shall be con-
sistent with the applicable standard established or approved by  the National Association of State
Boating Law Administrators and include instruction relating to towed watersports safety edu-
cation. The board by rule may update the minimum standard as necessary.
(2) Create a boating  safety course and examination designed to educate and test for the mini-
mum standard established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Create an equivalency exam that may substitute for taking the boating safety course.
(4) Incorporate volunteer boating safety education programs to the maximum extent possible.
(5) Allow use of commercially provided  boating safety courses, provided the courses meet the
standard adopted by the board.
(6) Accept proof of  prior completion of any approved boating safety course as meeting the re-
quirement for a boating safety course.
(7) Establish a fee for the boating safety education  card issued under ORS 830.086 that may not
exceed  $20.
(8) Promote the fact that insurance discounts  of 10 percent to 15 percent are widely available
for taking a boating  safety course that meets the minimum standard established pursuant to sub-
section (1) of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 113
SB 1590
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 3.
 ORS 830.110 is amended to read:
830.110. In addition to the powers and duties  otherwise provided in this chapter, the State Ma-
rine Board shall have the power and duty to:
(1) Make all rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The rules  shall be made
in accordance with ORS chapter 183.
(2) Devise a  system of identifying numbers for boats, floating homes and boathouses. If an
agency of the  federal government has an overall system of identification numbering for boats within
the United States, the system devised by the board shall conform with the federal system.
(3) Cooperate with state and federal agencies to promote  uniformity of the laws relating to
boating and their enforcement.
(4) Make contracts  necessary to carry out the provisions of ORS 830.060 to 830.140, 830.565 to
830.575, 830.630, [ 830.640 to 830.649, ] 830.700 to 830.715, 830.725, 830.730,  830.770, 830.780, 830.785,
830.795 to 830.820 and 830.830 to 830.870.
(5) Advise and assist county sheriffs and other peace  officers in the enforcement of laws relating
to boating.
(6) Study, plan and recommend the development of boating facilities  throughout the state which
will promote the safety and pleasure of the public through boating.
(7) Publicize the advantage of safe boating.
(8) Accept gifts and grants of property and money to be used to further  the purposes of this
chapter.
(9) Exempt from any provisions of this chapter any class of boats if it  determines that the safety
of persons  and property will not be materially promoted by the applicability of those provisions to
the class of boats. The board may not exempt from numbering any class of boats unless:
(a) The board determines that the numbering will not materially aid in their identification; and
(b) The secretary of the department of the federal government under which the United States
Coast Guard is operating has exempted from numbering the same boats or classes of boats.
(10) Appoint and require the bonding of agents to issue a temporary permit  to operate a boat.
In addition to the prescribed fees, the agents  may charge a fee prescribed by the board for their
services in issuing the temporary permit. Every three years the board shall  issue an order revising
the fee imposed under this subsection on January 1, based on changes in  the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers, West  Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics
of the United States Department of Labor. The board shall round the  amount of the fee to the
nearest half-dollar.  The revised fee takes effect on January 1 and applies for the following three
years.
(11) Publish and distribute to  the interested public the boating laws of this state and resumes
or explanations of those laws.
(12) Publish and distribute forms for any application required under  this chapter and require the
use of such forms.
(13) Make rules for the uniform navigational marking of the waters of this state. Such rules shall
not conflict with markings prescribed by the United States Coast Guard. No  political subdivision
or person shall mark the waters of this state in  any manner in conflict with the markings prescribed
by the board.
(14) Make rules regarding marine toilets  and their use consistent with the prevention and con-
trol of pollution of the waters of this  state and not in conflict with the rules of the Oregon Health
Authority or the Environmental Quality Commission.
[2]
SB 1590
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(15) Institute proceedings to enjoin  unlawful obstructions injuring free navigation on the waters
of this state.
(16) Make rules regulating water ski course markers, ski jumps and other special use  devices
placed in the waters of this state. Such  rules may regulate the installation and use of the devices
and may require a permit.
(17) Adopt rules necessary to carry out and enforce the  provisions of ORS 830.950 and 830.955.
The rules shall include but need not be limited to:
(a) The kinds of protective covering or physical barriers that are acceptable to be used between
a submersible polystyrene device and the water.
(b) Guidelines for the use of submersible polystyrene devices for the repair  or maintenance of
existing docks or floats.
(18) Adopt rules providing for establishment  of a Safe Boating Education Course to be made
available  to  courts and law enforcement agencies within this state for use as a sentencing option
for those individuals  convicted of boating offenses. The board shall specify the content of the Safe
Boating Education Course and shall prescribe procedures for  making the course available to local
courts and law enforcement agencies, including procedures for  promptly notifying such courts
whether individuals required to enroll in the course have taken and successfully passed the  course.
Such rules may provide for  administration of the course through nonprofit organizations, such as the
United States Coast Guard Auxiliary, United States Power Squadrons or similar groups.
(19) For purposes of ORS 830.175, 830.180, 830.185, 830.187 and 830.195,  in cooperation with the
State Aviation Board, regulate boats that are seaplanes as provided in ORS 830.605 and 835.200.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 830.990 is amended to read:
830.990. (1) Violation  of ORS 830.302 by a person operating a motorboat or violation of ORS
830.565 by a person operating a sailboat that is at least 12 feet in length or a motorboat is a Class
D violation. Notwithstanding ORS 153.019, the presumptive fine for a  violation of ORS 830.302 or
830.565 by a person operating a motorboat is $50.
(2) A person who violates  ORS 830.050, 830.088, 830.090, 830.092, 830.094, 830.215, 830.230,
830.415, 830.624, 830.710, 830.720, 830.770, 830.780, 830.810, 830.850 or 830.855, or rules adopted to
carry out the purposes of those statutes, commits a Class D violation.
(3) A person who violates ORS 830.220, 830.240, 830.245, 830.250, 830.375, 830.475 (4), 830.480,
830.785, 830.805 or 830.825, or rules adopted to carry out  the purposes of those statutes, commits a
Class C violation.
(4) A person who violates  ORS 830.110, 830.175, 830.180, 830.185, 830.187, 830.195, 830.210,
830.225, 830.235, 830.260, 830.300, 830.315  (2) and (3), 830.335, 830.340, 830.345, 830.350, 830.355,
830.360, 830.362, 830.365, 830.370, 830.410, 830.420, 830.425, 830.495, 830.560, [830.649,] 830.775, 830.795
or 830.830, or rules adopted to carry out the purposes  of those statutes, commits a Class B violation.
(5) A person who violates ORS 830.305, 830.390 or 830.944, or rules adopted to  carry out the
purposes of those statutes, commits a Class A violation.
[(6)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section,  a person who violates ORS 830.649 and has
one or more prior convictions for violation of  ORS 830.649 within a three-year period preceding the
date of the person’s current conviction, commits a Class A violation. ]
[(b) In addition to the penalty imposed under this subsection, the court shall: ]
[(A) Order the person not to operate a boat for a period of one year; and ]
[(B) Order the person to complete a boating safety course approved by the State Marine Board. ]
[(7)] (6) A person who violates ORS 830.591 commits a Class C misdemeanor.
[3]
SB 1590
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
[(8)] (7) A person who violates ORS 830.383 commits a Class B misdemeanor.
[(9)] (8) A person who violates ORS 830.035 (2), 830.053, 830.315 (1), 830.325, 830.475 (1),  830.730
or 830.955 (1) commits a Class A misdemeanor.
[(10)] (9) A person who violates ORS 830.475 (2) commits a Class C felony.
SECTION 5.
The amendments to ORS 830.990 by  section 4 of this 2024 Act and the repeal
of statutes by section 1 of this 2024 Act:
(1) Apply to conduct constituting, or alleged to constitute,  an offense occurring on or
after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
(2) Do not affect proceedings  based on conduct constituting, or alleged to constitute, an
offense occurring before the effective date of this 2024 Act.
(3) Do not release or extinguish any penalty incurred under the statutes repealed by
section 1 of  this 2024 Act. The statutes repealed by section 1 of this 2024 Act remain in force
for the purpose of maintaining  an action or prosecution for the enforcement of such a pen-
alty.
(4) Do not relieve a person of any obligation with respect to a fine,  penalty, liability or
other duty or obligation accruing under the statutes repealed by section  1 of this 2024 Act.
After the effective date of this  2024 Act, a court may undertake the collection or enforce-
ment of such fine, penalty or other liability, duty or obligation.
SECTION 6. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]