Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 163.208 is amended to read:
163.208. (1) A person commits the crime of assaulting a public  safety officer if the person in-
tentionally or knowingly causes physical injury to the other  person, knowing the other person to
be a peace officer, corrections officer, youth correction officer, parole and probation officer, animal
control officer, firefighter or staff member, and while the other person is acting in the  course of
official duty.
(2) Assaulting a public safety officer is a Class C felony.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in [ paragraph (b) ] paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection,
a person convicted under  this section shall be sentenced to not less than seven days of imprisonment
and shall not be granted bench parole or suspension of sentence nor released on a sentence of  pro-
bation before serving at least seven days of the sentence of confinement.
(b) A person convicted under this section shall be sentenced to not less than 14 days of
imprisonment and shall not be granted  bench parole or suspension of sentence nor released on a
sentence of probation before serving at least 14 days of the sentence  of confinement if the victim is
a peace officer.
(c) If, at the time of the  offense, the person was an adult in custody at a correctional
facility and the victim was a corrections officer as defined in ORS 181A.355, the court  shall
sentence a person convicted  under this section to a mandatory minimum sentence of 48
months of imprisonment. The court may not sentence the person  to probation or to a lesser
term of imprisonment. The person shall serve the entire sentence imposed by the  court and
is not, during the term of the sentence, eligible for release on  post-prison supervision, any
form of temporary leave from custody or any reduction in  the term of incarceration in ac-
cordance with ORS 421.121 or any other statute.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Animal control officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 609.500; and
(b) “Staff member” means:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1241
SB 773
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
(A) A corrections officer as defined in ORS 181A.355, a youth correction officer,  a Department
of Corrections or Oregon Youth Authority staff member or a person employed pursuant to  a con-
tract with the department or youth authority to work with, or in the vicinity of, adults  in custody
or adjudicated youths; and
(B) A volunteer authorized by the department, youth authority or  other entity in charge of a
corrections facility to work with, or in the vicinity of, adults in custody or adjudicated youths.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 421.121 is amended to read:
421.121. (1) Except as  provided in ORS 137.635, 137.700, 137.707, 163.105, 163.107 , [ and] 163.115
and 163.208, each adult in custody sentenced  to the custody of the Department of Corrections for
felonies committed on or after November 1, 1989, is eligible for a  reduction in the term of
incarceration for:
(a) Appropriate institutional behavior, as defined by rule of the Department of Corrections;  and
(b) Participation in the adult basic skills development program described in ORS 421.084.
(2) The maximum amount of time credits earned for  appropriate institutional behavior or for
participation in the  adult basic skills development program described in ORS 421.084 may not exceed
20 percent of the total term of incarceration in a Department of Corrections institution.
(3) The time credits may not be used to  shorten the term of actual prison confinement to less
than six months.
(4) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to the rulemaking provisions of ORS chapter  183
to establish a process for granting, retracting and restoring the time credits earned  by the offender
as allowed in subsections (1) to (3) of this section.
[2]