Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 173.025 to
173.055.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “small business” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 183.310.
(2) The Legislative Fiscal Officer, with the aid of the Oregon Department of  Administra-
tive Services, the Legislative Revenue Officer and state agencies, shall prepare  a fiscal im-
pact statement for each measure reported out of a committee  of the Legislative Assembly
that would have a financial effect on small businesses in this state. The statement must de-
scribe the financial effect that the  measure would, if enacted, have on small businesses in
this state.
SECTION 3.
(1) In addition to the quarterly  estimates prepared by the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services under ORS 291.342, the State Treasurer, with  the assistance
of the Legislative Revenue Officer, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the  Department of Revenue
and the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, shall for  each calendar quarter of
the year ascertain  by computation and estimate the total amount of revenue available for
state purposes for the  current fiscal year, as well as the amount of revenue received quar-
terly, cumulated throughout the biennium.
(2) During a regular session of  the Legislative Assembly held in an odd-numbered year,
as specified in ORS 171.010, the State  Treasurer shall also estimate the total anticipated re-
venues available for purposes of enacting the legislatively adopted budget, as defined in  ORS
291.002, for the next biennium.
(3) The State Treasurer shall report the estimates of revenues to the Emergency Board,
or if the Legislative Assembly is in session, to the Joint Committee on Ways and Means.
(4) For purposes of enacting the legislatively adopted budget,  as defined in ORS 291.002,
the Legislative Assembly shall use  the estimates of revenues prepared by the State Treas-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1770
HB 2227
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
urer under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(5) In carrying out the duties imposed under subsections (1) to (3) of this section, the
State Treasurer shall issue quarterly  a statement setting forth the methodology and as-
sumptions used in making the estimates of revenues. Nothing in this subsection requires  the
statement  to  set forth procedures used or methods used to determine either the methodology
or the assumptions.
(6)(a) Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, an estimate of revenues or
revenue forecast  required under any provision of the Oregon Constitution or any provision
of law other than this section shall be  considered to be an estimate or forecast prepared by
the State Treasurer.
(b) An estimate of revenues  or revenue forecast required under Article IX, section 14,
of the Oregon Constitution,  or ORS 291.216 or 291.349 shall be considered to be an estimate
or forecast prepared by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  under ORS
291.342 or 291.348 or other authority.
(7) The State Treasurer  may contract with a qualified nonpartisan public or private en-
tity to perform the duties of the State Treasurer as required under this section.
SECTION 4.  ORS 291.349 is amended to read:
291.349. (1) As soon as practicable after adjournment sine die of the odd-numbered  year regular
session of the Legislative Assembly, the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall report
to the Legislative Revenue Officer and the Legislative Fiscal Officer the estimate as of  July 1 of the
first year of the biennium of General Fund and State Lottery  Fund revenues that will be received
by the state during  that biennium. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall base its
estimate on the last forecast [ given to  the Legislative Assembly ] made by the department  before
adjournment sine die of the odd-numbered year regular session [ on which the printed, adopted budget
prepared in the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services is based ], adjusted only insofar as
necessary to reflect changes in laws adopted at  that session. The report shall contain the estimated
revenues from corporate income and excise taxes separately from the estimated  revenues from other
General Fund sources. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may  revise the estimate
if necessary following adjournment sine die of a  special session or an even-numbered year regular
session of the Legislative Assembly, but any revision does not affect the basis  of the computation
described in subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(2) As soon as practicable after the end of  the biennium, the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services shall report to the Legislative Revenue Officer and  the Legislative Fiscal Officer,
or the Legislative Assembly if it is in session, the amount of General Fund  revenues collected as
of the last June 30 of the preceding biennium. The report shall contain  the collections from corpo-
rate income and excise taxes separately from collections from other sources.
(3) If the  revenues received from the corporate income and excise taxes during the biennium
exceed the amounts estimated to be received from such  taxes for the biennium, as estimated after
adjournment sine die of  the odd-numbered year regular session, by two percent or more, the total
amount of that excess shall be retained in the General Fund and used, in the manner described in
ORS 291.345, to provide additional funding for public education, kindergarten through grade 12.
(4) If the revenues received from General Fund revenue  sources, exclusive of those described in
subsection (3) of this section, during the biennium exceed the  amounts estimated to be received from
such sources for the biennium, as  estimated after adjournment sine die of the odd-numbered year
regular session, by two percent or  more, there shall be credited to personal income taxpayers an
[2]
HB 2227
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
amount equal to the total amount of that  excess, reduced by the cost certified by the Department
of Revenue under ORS 291.351 as being allocable to credits described under this subsection.  The
excess amount to be credited shall be credited to personal  income taxpayers in a percentage amount
of prior year personal income tax liability as determined under subsection (5) of this section.
(5)(a) If there  is an excess to be credited under subsection (4) of this section, on or before Oc-
tober 1, following the end of each  biennium, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall
determine and certify to the Department  of Revenue the percentage amounts of credit for purposes
of subsection (4) of this section. The percentage amounts determined shall be percentage amounts
to the nearest one-tenth of a percent that will distribute the excess to  be credited to personal in-
come taxpayers.
(b) The percentage amount applicable  to subsection (4) of this section shall equal the amount
distributed under subsection (4) of  this section divided by the estimated total personal income tax
liability for all personal income taxpayers for tax years beginning in the  calendar year immediately
preceding the calendar year in which the excess is determined.
(c) The amount of the surplus credit under subsection (4) of this section is determined by
multiplying the  percentage amount determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection by the total
amount of a personal  income taxpayer’s tax liability for the tax year beginning in the calendar year
immediately preceding the calendar year in which the excess is determined in order to  calculate the
amount to be credited to the taxpayer.
(d) The credit shall  be determined based on the tax liability as shown on the return of the tax-
payer or as corrected by the Department of Revenue.
(e) The credit shall be computed after the allowance of  a credit provided under ORS 316.082,
316.131 or 316.292, but  before the allowance of any other credit or offset against tax liability allowed
or allowable under any  provision of law of this state, and before the application of estimated tax
payments, withholding or other advance tax payments.
(f) For personal income taxpayers,  if a credit applied against tax liability as described in para-
graph (e) of this subsection reduces tax  liability to zero and an amount of the credit remains unused,
the remaining unused amount shall be refunded to the taxpayer. For purposes of ORS chapters  305,
314, 315 and 316, refunds  issued under this paragraph are refunds of an overpayment of tax imposed
under ORS chapter 316.
(g) The Department of Revenue may prescribe by rule the  manner of calculating and claiming
a credit if the filing status of a taxpayer changes between the tax year for which a credit may  be
claimed and the succeeding tax year.
(6) A refund may not be made under this section to a  taxpayer if the amount of the refund is
less than $1.
(7) Not later  than October 15 following the end of the biennium, the Department of Revenue
shall provide information and  guidance to taxpayers relating to the calculation of the credit. The
department may make the information and guidance available electronically or otherwise.
(8) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules specifying the manner for issuing  refunds under
this section to taxpayers who filed returns for the tax year  on which the credit is computed but who
are not required to file returns for the year in which the credit could be claimed.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 291.357 is amended to read:
291.357. (1) As used in this section, “general governmental purposes” means:
(a) Those  activities defined as governmental activities under the accounting standards
promulgated by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board of the Financial  Accounting Foun-
[3]
HB 2227
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dation that are in effect on August 10, 2001; and
(b) Post-secondary educational activities that are partially funded by student tuition and fees.
(2) Each biennium, state governmental appropriations for general governmental purposes shall
be no greater than eight percent of projected personal income in Oregon for the same  biennium.
Projected personal income shall be based on the United States Department of Commerce projections
used by the [ Oregon Department of Administrative Services ] State Treasurer  in  the last [ forecast]
quarterly revenue estimate  given to the Legislative Assembly  before adjournment sine die of the
odd-numbered year regular session on which the [ printed,] legislatively adopted  budget , as defined
in ORS 291.002, is based.
(3) For purposes of this section, the following are considered to be appropriations:
(a) An authorization, given by law, to expend moneys in a biennium;
(b) A limitation, imposed by law, on the expenditure in  a biennium of moneys that are contin-
uously appropriated; and
(c) An  estimate of amounts of moneys that are continuously appropriated that will be spent in
a biennium without limitation.
(4) The following appropriations are not subject to  the limitation on appropriations contained
in this section:
(a) Appropriations for the construction or acquisition of assets that are financed by state bonds,
certificates of participation or other forms of borrowing.
(b) Appropriations of moneys received directly or indirectly from the federal government.
(c) Appropriations for fee remission programs of public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(d) Appropriations of moneys voluntarily donated to a state agency.
(e) Appropriations of moneys from revenue increases or  new revenue sources if the increases
or sources result from  approval of a measure by the people at an election held on or after August
10, 2001.
(f) Appropriations to fund new programs or to increase funding for  existing programs if the need
for new or increased funding results from approval of a measure by the people at an election  held
on or after August 10, 2001.
(5) The limitation on appropriations established by this section may  be exceeded for a biennium
if the Governor declares an emergency and three-fifths of  the members serving in each house of the
Legislative Assembly affirmatively vote to exceed the limitation for the biennium.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 314.840 is amended to read:
314.840. (1) The Department of Revenue may:
(a) Furnish any taxpayer, representative authorized to represent the taxpayer under ORS 305.230
or person designated by the taxpayer under ORS 305.193, upon  request of the taxpayer, represen-
tative or designee, with a copy  of the taxpayer’s income tax return filed with the department for
any year, or with a copy of any report filed by the taxpayer in connection with the return, or with
any other information the department considers necessary.
(b) Publish lists of taxpayers who are entitled to unclaimed tax refunds.
(c) Publish statistics so classified as to prevent the identification  of income or any particulars
contained in any report or return.
(d) Disclose a taxpayer’s name, address, telephone number, refund amount,  amount due, Social
Security number, employer identification number or other taxpayer identification number to  the ex-
tent necessary  in connection with collection activities or the processing and mailing of correspond-
ence or of forms for any  report or return required in the administration of any local tax under ORS
[4]
HB 2227
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
305.620 or any law imposing a tax upon or measured by net income.
(2) The department also may disclose and give access to information described  in ORS 314.835
to:
(a) The Governor  of the State of Oregon or the authorized representative of the Governor with
respect to an individual who is  designated as being under consideration for appointment or reap-
pointment to an office or for employment in the office of the Governor.  The information disclosed
shall be confined to whether the individual:
(A) Has filed returns with respect  to the taxes imposed by ORS chapter 316 for those of not
more than the three immediately preceding years for which the individual was required to  file an
Oregon individual income tax return.
(B) Has failed to pay any tax within 30 days  from the date of mailing of a deficiency notice or
otherwise respond to a deficiency notice within 30 days of its mailing.
(C) Has been assessed any penalty under the Oregon personal income tax laws and the nature
of the penalty.
(D) Has been or is under investigation for possible criminal offenses  under the Oregon personal
income tax laws. Information disclosed pursuant  to this paragraph shall be used only for the purpose
of making the appointment, reappointment or decision to employ or not to  employ the individual in
the office of the Governor.
(b) An officer or employee of the  State Treasurer or the  Oregon Department of Administrative
Services duly authorized or employed  to prepare revenue estimates, or a person contracting with the
State Treasurer or the  Oregon Department of  Administrative Services to prepare revenue esti-
mates, in the preparation of revenue estimates required under section 3 of this 2017 Act, required
for the Governor’s budget under ORS 291.201  to 291.226, or required for submission to the Emer-
gency Board or  the Joint Interim Committee on Ways and Means, or if the Legislative Assembly is
in session, to the Joint Committee on Ways and Means, and to the  Legislative Revenue Officer or
Legislative Fiscal Officer under ORS 291.342,  291.348 and 291.445. The Department of Revenue shall
disclose and give access to the information described in ORS  314.835 for the purposes of this para-
graph only if:
(A) The request for information is made in writing, specifies  the purposes for which the request
is made and is signed by an authorized representative of the  State  Treasurer or the  Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services. The form for request for information shall be prescribed  by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services and approved by the Director of the Department  of
Revenue.
(B) The officer, employee or person  receiving the information does not remove from the premises
of the Department of Revenue any  materials that would reveal the identity of a personal or corpo-
rate taxpayer.
(c) The Commissioner of Internal Revenue or authorized  representative, for tax administration
and compliance purposes only.
(d) For tax administration and compliance  purposes, the proper officer or authorized represen-
tative of any of the following entities that has or is  governed by a provision of law that meets the
requirements of any applicable provision of the Internal Revenue Code as to confidentiality:
(A) A state;
(B) A city, county or other political subdivision of a state;
(C) The District of Columbia; or
(D) An association established exclusively to provide services to federal, state or local  taxing
[5]
HB 2227
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
authorities.
(e) The Multistate Tax Commission or its  authorized representatives, for tax administration and
compliance purposes only. The Multistate Tax Commission may make the information available  to
the Commissioner of Internal Revenue or the  proper officer or authorized representative of any
governmental entity described in and meeting the qualifications of paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(f) The Attorney General, assistants and employees in the Department of Justice,  or other legal
representative of the State of Oregon, to the extent the department  deems disclosure or access
necessary for the performance of the duties of advising or representing the department  pursuant to
ORS 180.010 to 180.240 and the tax laws of this state.
(g) Employees of the State of Oregon, other  than of the Department of Revenue or Department
of Justice, to the extent the department deems disclosure or access necessary for such  employees
to perform their duties under contracts  or agreements between the department and any other de-
partment, agency or subdivision of the State of Oregon, in the  department’s administration of the
tax laws.
(h) Other persons, partnerships, corporations and other  legal entities, and their employees, to
the extent the department deems disclosure or  access necessary for the performance of such others’
duties under contracts  or agreements between the department and such legal entities, in the
department’s administration of the tax laws.
(i) The Legislative Revenue Officer or authorized representatives upon compliance  with ORS
173.850. Such officer or representative shall not remove  from the premises of the department any
materials that would reveal the identity of any taxpayer or any other person.
(j) The Department of Consumer and Business Services, to the  extent the department requires
such information to determine  whether it is appropriate to adjust those workers’ compensation
benefits the amount of which is based pursuant to ORS chapter 656  on the amount of wages or
earned income received by an individual.
(k) Any agency of the State of Oregon, or any person, or any officer  or employee of such agency
or person to whom disclosure or access is given  by state law and not otherwise referred to in this
section, including but not limited to  the Secretary of State as Auditor of Public Accounts under
Article VI, section 2, of the Oregon Constitution; the Department  of Human Services pursuant to
ORS 412.094; the Division of  Child Support of the Department of Justice and district attorney re-
garding cases for which they are providing support enforcement  services under ORS 25.080; the
State Board of Tax Practitioners, pursuant to ORS 673.710;  and the Oregon Board of Accountancy,
pursuant to ORS 673.415.
(L) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services to determine that a
person complies with  ORS chapter 656 and the Director of the Employment Department to determine
that a person complies with ORS chapter 657, the following employer information:
(A) Identification numbers.
(B) Names and addresses.
(C) Inception date as employer.
(D) Nature of business.
(E) Entity changes.
(F) Date of last payroll.
(m) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority to  determine that a person has the ability to
pay for care that includes services provided by  the Oregon State Hospital, or the Oregon Health
Authority to collect any unpaid cost of care as provided by ORS chapter 179.
[6]
HB 2227
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(n) Employees of  the Employment Department to the extent the Department of Revenue deems
disclosure  or  access to information on a combined tax report filed under ORS 316.168 is necessary
to performance of their duties in administering the tax imposed by ORS chapter 657.
(o) The State Fire Marshal to assist the State  Fire Marshal in carrying out duties, functions and
powers under ORS 453.307 to 453.414, the employer or agent name, address, telephone number and
standard industrial classification, if available.
(p) Employees  of the Department of State Lands for the purposes of identifying, locating and
publishing lists of taxpayers entitled to unclaimed refunds as required  by the provisions of chapter
694, Oregon Laws 1993. The information shall be limited to the  taxpayer’s name, address and the
refund amount.
(q) In addition to the disclosure  allowed under ORS 305.225, state or local law enforcement
agencies to assist in the investigation or prosecution of the following criminal activities:
(A) Mail theft of a check, in which case  the information that may be disclosed shall be limited
to the stolen document, the  name, address and taxpayer identification number of the payee, the
amount of the check and the date printed on the check.
(B) The counterfeiting, forging or altering  of a check submitted by a taxpayer to the Department
of Revenue or issued  by the Department of Revenue to a taxpayer, in which case the information
that may be disclosed  shall be limited to the counterfeit, forged or altered document, the name, ad-
dress and taxpayer identification number of the payee, the amount  of the check, the date printed
on the check and the altered name and address.
(r) The United States Postal Inspection Service or a  federal law enforcement agency, including
but not limited to the United States Department of Justice, to assist in the  investigation of the fol-
lowing criminal activities:
(A) Mail theft of a check, in which case the  information that may be disclosed shall be limited
to the stolen document, the name, address and taxpayer identification number  of the payee, the
amount of the check and the date printed on the check.
(B) The counterfeiting, forging or altering  of a check submitted by a taxpayer to the Department
of Revenue or issued by the Department of Revenue to a taxpayer, in which  case the information
that may be disclosed shall be limited to the counterfeit, forged or altered document,  the name, ad-
dress and taxpayer identification number of the  payee, the amount of the check, the date printed
on the check and the altered name and address.
(s) The United States Financial Management Service, for purposes of  facilitating the offsets de-
scribed in ORS 305.612.
(t) A  municipal corporation of this state for purposes of assisting the municipal corporation in
the administration of a tax of the municipal corporation that is imposed on  or measured by income,
wages or net earnings from self-employment. Any disclosure under this paragraph may be made  only
pursuant to a written agreement between the Department of Revenue and the municipal  corporation
that ensures the confidentiality of the information disclosed.
(u) A consumer reporting agency, to  the extent necessary to carry out the purposes of ORS
314.843.
(v) The Public Employees Retirement Board, to the extent necessary to  carry out the purposes
of ORS 238.372 to 238.384, and to any public employer, to the extent necessary to  carry out the
purposes of ORS 237.635 (3) and 237.637 (2).
(3)(a) Each officer or employee of the department and each person described or  referred to in
subsection  (2)(a), (b), (f) to (L) or (n) to (q) of this section to whom disclosure or access to the tax
[7]
HB 2227
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
information is given under subsection (2) of this section  or any other provision of state law, prior
to beginning employment or the performance of duties involving such disclosure  or access, shall be
advised in writing of the provisions of ORS  314.835 and 314.991, relating to penalties for the vio-
lation of ORS 314.835, and  shall as a condition of employment or performance of duties execute a
certificate for the department,  in a form prescribed by the department, stating in substance that the
person has read these provisions of law, that the person has  had them explained and that the person
is aware of the penalties for the violation of ORS 314.835.
(b) The disclosure authorized in subsection (2)(r) of this section shall be made only after a
written agreement has been entered  into between the Department of Revenue and the person de-
scribed in subsection (2)(r) of this section  to whom disclosure or access to the tax information is
given, providing that:
(A) Any information described in  ORS 314.835 that is received by the person pursuant to sub-
section (2)(r) of this section is  confidential information that may not be disclosed, except to the ex-
tent necessary  to investigate or prosecute the criminal activities described in subsection (2)(r) of
this section;
(B) The information shall be protected as  confidential under applicable federal and state laws;
and
(C) The United States Postal Inspection Service or the  federal law enforcement agency shall
give notice to the Department of Revenue of any request received under the federal Freedom of In-
formation Act, 5 U.S.C. 552, or other federal law relating to the disclosure of information.
(4) The Department of Revenue may recover the costs of furnishing the information described
in subsection (2)(L), (m) and (o) to (q) of this section from the respective agencies.
SECTION 7.
(1) Sections 1 to 3 of this 2017 Act and the amendments to ORS 291.349,
291.357 and 314.840 by sections 4 to 6  of this 2017 Act become operative on January 1, 2018,
and apply to measures  reported out of committees of the Legislative Assembly, and to esti-
mates of revenues and economic forecasts required, on or after January 1, 2018.
(2) The State Treasurer, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  the Legis-
lative Revenue Officer, the Legislative Fiscal Officer and the Department of Revenue  may
take any action prior to January 1, 2018, that is necessary to allow the State Treasurer,  the
Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, the Legislative Revenue Officer, the Legis-
lative Fiscal  Officer and the Department of Revenue to exercise, on and after January 1,
2018, all the duties, functions and powers conferred  on the State Treasurer, the Oregon De-
partment of  Administrative Services, the Legislative Revenue Officer, the Legislative Fiscal
Officer and the Department of Revenue by sections 1 to 3 of this 2017 Act  and the amend-
ments to ORS 291.349, 291.357 and 314.840 by sections 4 to 6 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[8]