Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission, for the  biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,054,491, which may be  expended to fund
nine additional full-time staff positions at the  commission to support student safety and
adult accountability in the education system of this state.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4490