Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
DATA, ANALYSIS AND INFORMATION SYSTEMS
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission may create reports and  analysis
of commission data regarding commercial  sales and commercial industries. The commission
may market, sell, license the  use of or offer other forms of value-added access to data and
analysis described in this subsection to private entities.
(2) The commission may enter into contracts with private entities for the entities to:
(a) Capture and compile commission data to create reports and analysis regarding com-
mercial sales and commercial industries; and
(b) Receive a  share of revenue derived by the commission from selling or licensing the
use of the data and analysis.
(3) Commission data that a private entity captures or compiles under  an agreement de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section is proprietary information of the commission.
(4) The commission may enter into contracts with private entities for the entities to ac-
cept payments, and distribute  shares of revenue, from sales or licenses for use of data and
analysis described in subsection (1) of this section or any systems,  processes or business
models developed from that data or analysis.
(5) The commission shall ensure that data and  analysis that the commission sells or li-
censes for use are in a format that preserves anonymity of the source and do  not contain
personally identifiable information.
(6) The commission may adopt rules to:
(a) Ensure that personally identifiable information is not included in data or analysis;
(b) Control the use of data and analysis; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 120
SB 1556
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
(c) Establish prices or fees for the purchasing of, or other access to, data and analysis.
(7) Net revenue from selling  or licensing the use of data and analysis described in this
section remaining after payments of revenue shares to private entities described  under sub-
section (2) or (4) of this section shall be  deposited to the Oregon Liquor Control Commission
Information Technology Infrastructure Fund established under section 2 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 2.
The Oregon Liquor Control Commission Information Technology
Infrastructure Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from  the
General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission Information
Technology Infrastructure Fund shall be credited  to the fund. Moneys in the fund are con-
tinuously appropriated to the Oregon Liquor Control Commission for the purposes of:
(1) Paying costs directly or indirectly related to the duties, functions and powers of the
commission under section 1 of this 2020 Act; and
(2) Procuring, operating, maintaining, staffing or servicing  information system hardware,
software and supplies directly or indirectly related  to supporting the operational or revenue
generating functions of the commission. Commission actions under this subsection  to im-
prove information technology must be carried out in  accordance with Oregon Department
of Administrative Services procurement  policies and the Enterprise Information Resources
Management Strategy.
PRICE NEGOTIATIONS
SECTION 3.
Sections 4 and 5 of  this 2020 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 471.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding ORS 471.175, an Indian tribe that  holds a full on-premises
sales license may purchase distilled liquor for sale by the drink on tribal reservation  land
directly from the Oregon Liquor Control Commission at  a price negotiated by the Indian
tribe and the commission.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding ORS 471.175, an airline described in ORS 471.182  that holds
a full on-premises sales license may purchase  distilled liquor for sale to ticketed passengers
aboard a commercial aircraft directly from the Oregon Liquor  Control Commission at a price
negotiated by the airline and the commission.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 6. The unit captions used in this 2020 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express  any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2020 Act.
[2]