Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 3  and 9 to 12 of this 2017 Act, the amendments to ORS 137.717 and
421.168 and section 1, chapter 830, Oregon Laws  2015, by sections 2, 5 and 7 of this 2017 Act
and the repeal of  ORS 475.934 and sections 8 and 16, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, by
sections 4, 6 and 8 of this 2017 Act shall be known and may be cited as  the “Safety and
Savings Act.”
FAMILY SENTENCING ALTERNATIVE PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 2.  Section 1, chapter 830, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) The Department of Corrections, in partnership with the circuit  court and county
community corrections agencies of participating counties  and the Department of Human Services,
shall establish the Family Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program.
(2) A defendant is eligible for the Family Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program if:
(a) The defendant’s presumptive sentence under the sentencing guidelines of  the Oregon Crimi-
nal Justice Commission  is a term of imprisonment in the legal and physical custody of the Depart-
ment of Corrections of at least one year;
(b) The defendant [ has not previously been convicted of,  and] is not currently being sentenced for:
(A) A person felony as defined in the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission;
(B) A sex crime as defined in ORS [ 181.805] 163A.005; or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1571
SB 894
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) An offense requiring a specified sentence under ORS 137.635,  137.700, 137.707, 164.061,
475.907, 475.925, 475.930 or [ 813.010] 813.011; and
(c) The defendant is  pregnant at the time of sentencing,  or is  the parent or legal guardian
of a  minor child and at the time of the offense or sentencing  had physical custody of the child
[at the time of the offense ].
(3)(a) If the defendant meets the  eligibility requirements described in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion and [ receives ] is eligible for  a downward dispositional departure under  the rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission, the court may order that  the defendant sign a release authorizing the
Department of Human Services  to provide the community corrections agency with written confir-
mation of, and consultation concerning, any open or current  juvenile dependency proceeding or any
prior substantiated allegation of abuse or neglect involving the defendant and a minor child.
(b) When determining whether to sentence the defendant to probation  as a downward
dispositional departure under the rules of the commission, the court may  consider eligibility
in the Family Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program as a mitigating factor.
(4) After receipt of the information described in  subsection (3) of this section, the community
corrections agency, in consultation with the Department of Human Services, shall determine if  the
Family Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program is an appropriate  program for the defendant and, if the
program is appropriate  and the defendant is sentenced to a term of probation , require partic-
ipation in the program for  the first 12 months of the probationary sentence. In addition to the con-
ditions of probation ordered under ORS 137.540, the defendant may be required to  comply with any
additional conditions related to the program, including but not limited to:
(a) Geographical restrictions, including house arrest and electronic surveillance;
(b) Participation in vocational training; and
(c) Completion of:
(A) Parenting skills classes;
(B) Drug or alcohol treatment;
(C) Mental health treatment; or
(D) Life skills classes.
(5) The Department  of Human Services and community corrections agencies shall cooperate with
the Department of Corrections in implementing  the Family Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program
described in this section.
(6) The Department of Human Services and the Department of Corrections shall jointly submit
a report concerning the Family Sentencing  Alternative Pilot Program, which must include program
outcomes and data related to the efficacy of the program, and which  may include recommendations
for legislation in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to the judiciary no later than January 1[ , 2017] of each year .
(7) The Department of Corrections  shall establish a process for selecting counties to
participate in the Family Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program.
(8) The Department of Corrections and the Department of  Human Services may adopt
rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Department of Corrections may further  reduce the term of
incarceration of an inmate as described in ORS 421.121 by a period  of an additional six
months if the inmate meets the following eligibility requirements:
(a) The inmate is not serving a sentence for:
(A) A person felony as defined in the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission;
[2]
SB 894
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) A sex crime as defined in ORS 163A.005; or
(C) An  offense requiring a specified sentence under ORS 137.635, 137.700, 137.707, 164.061,
475.907, 475.925, 475.930 or 813.011;
(b) The inmate is the parent or legal guardian of a minor child;
(c) The inmate  has participated in a program related to creating and maintaining a re-
lationship with the inmate’s child; and
(d) The inmate has demonstrated appropriate institutional behavior as defined  by rule
of the department.
(2) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or  the local supervisory au-
thority may, in addition to  the conditions of post-prison supervision described in ORS 144.102,
order additional conditions of post-prison supervision for a person released under this section
as the board or authority considers appropriate including, but not limited to:
(a) Geographical restrictions, including house arrest and electronic surveillance;
(b) Participation in vocational training; and
(c) Completion of:
(A) Parenting skills classes;
(B) Drug or alcohol treatment;
(C) Mental health treatment; or
(D) Life skills classes.
(3) The Department of Corrections and the State Board of Parole and  Post-Prison
Supervision shall adopt rules to implement this section.
SHORT-TERM TRANSITIONAL LEAVE
SECTION 4.
Section 16, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is repealed.
SECTION 5.  ORS 421.168, as amended by  section 15, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is
amended to read:
421.168. (1) The Department of  Corrections shall establish a short-term transitional leave pro-
gram. The program shall provide inmates with an opportunity to secure  appropriate transitional
support when necessary for  successful reintegration into the community prior to the inmate’s dis-
charge to post-prison supervision.
(2) The Department of Corrections shall  identify each inmate who is eligible for the short-term
transitional leave program and shall, in conjunction with  the supervisory authority for the county
to which the inmate will be released, assist each eligible inmate in  preparing a transition plan and
in identifying and applying for an employment, educational or  other transitional opportunity in the
community.
(3) If the inmate’s transition plan is approved by the department and is an essential part of the
inmate’s successful  reintegration into the community, the department may grant a transitional leave
no more than [ 30] 180 days prior to the inmate’s discharge date.
(4) An inmate  is not eligible for transitional leave before having served six months of prison
incarceration.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section. The rules must
include a set of release  conditions for inmates released on transitional leave status. An inmate on
transitional leave status is subject to immediate return to prison for  any violation of the conditions
of release.
[3]
SB 894
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) The provisions of this section do not apply to inmates whose  sentences were imposed under
ORS 137.635,  137.690,  137.700 , [ or] 137.707 , 164.061, 475.907, 475.925, 475.930 or 813.011  or [ any
other] under a  provision of  law that prohibits release on any form of temporary leave from custody.
DRUG AND PROPERTY OFFENSES
SECTION 6. Section 8, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is repealed.
SECTION 7.  ORS 137.717, as amended by section 7, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013,  is amended
to read:
137.717. (1) When a court sentences a person convicted of:
(a) Aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057, burglary in  the first degree under
ORS 164.225[, robbery in the third degree under ORS 164.395, identity  theft under ORS 165.800 ] or
aggravated identity theft under ORS 165.803, the presumptive  sentence is [ 24] 19  months of
incarceration, unless the rules of the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission prescribe a longer
presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057,  burglary
in the first degree under ORS 164.225, [ robbery in the third  degree under ORS 164.395, ] robbery in
the second  degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the first degree under ORS 164.415 or aggravated
identity theft under ORS 165.803;  or
(B) [ Two] Four  or more previous convictions for any combination of the crimes listed  in sub-
section (2) of this section[ ; or ].
[(C) A previous  conviction for a crime listed in subsection (2) of this section, if the current crime
of conviction was committed while the  defendant was on supervision for the previous conviction or less
than three years after the date the defendant completed the period  of supervision for the previous con-
viction.]
(b) Theft  in the first degree under ORS 164.055, unauthorized use of a vehicle under ORS
164.135, [mail theft or receipt of stolen mail under ORS 164.162, ] burglary in the second degree under
ORS 164.215, criminal mischief in the first degree under ORS 164.365, computer  crime under ORS
164.377, forgery in the first degree under ORS 165.013,  [criminal possession of a forged instrument in
the first degree under ORS 165.022, fraudulent  use of a credit card under ORS 165.055 (4)(b), ] identity
theft under ORS 165.800,  possession of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300 or trafficking  in stolen
vehicles under ORS 819.310, the presumptive sentence is [ 18] 13 months  of incarceration, unless the
rules of  the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission prescribe a longer presumptive sentence, if the
person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS  164.057, unau-
thorized use  of a vehicle under ORS 164.135, burglary in the first degree under ORS 164.225, [ robbery
in the third degree under ORS 164.395, ] robbery in the second degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in
the first degree under ORS 164.415, possession of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300, trafficking in
stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310 or aggravated identity theft under ORS 165.803;  or
(B) [ Two] Four  or more previous convictions for any combination of the crimes listed in sub-
section (2) of this section[ ; or ].
[(C) A previous conviction for a crime listed in subsection (2) of this section, if the  current crime
of conviction was committed while the  defendant was on supervision for the previous conviction or less
than three years after the date the  defendant completed the period of supervision for the previous con-
viction.]
[4]
SB 894
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The crimes to which subsection (1) of this section applies are:
(a) Theft in the second degree under ORS 164.045;
(b) Theft in the first degree under ORS 164.055;
(c) Aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057;
(d) Unauthorized use of a vehicle under ORS 164.135;
[(e) Mail theft or receipt of stolen mail under ORS 164.162; ]
[(f)] (e)  Burglary in the second degree under ORS 164.215;
[(g)] (f)  Burglary in the first degree under ORS 164.225;
[(h)] (g)  Criminal mischief in the second degree under ORS 164.354;
[(i)] (h)  Criminal mischief in the first degree under ORS 164.365;
[(j)] (i)  Computer crime under ORS 164.377;
[(k)] (j)  Forgery in the second degree under ORS 165.007;
[(L)] (k)  Forgery in the first degree under ORS 165.013;
[(m)] (L)  Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the second degree under ORS 165.017;
[(n)] (m)  Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the first degree under ORS 165.022;
[(o)] (n)  Fraudulent use of a credit card under ORS 165.055;
[(p)] (o)  Identity theft under ORS 165.800;
[(q)] (p) Possession of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300;  and
[(r)] (q) Trafficking in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310[ ; and ].
[(s) Any attempt to commit a crime listed in this subsection. ]
[(3)(a) A presumptive sentence described in subsection (1) of this section shall be increased by two
months for each previous conviction the person has that: ]
[(A) Was for any of the crimes listed in subsection (1) or (2) of this section; and ]
[(B) Was not used as a predicate for the presumptive sentence  described in subsection (1) of this
section.]
[(b) Previous convictions may not increase a presumptive sentence described in subsection (1) of this
section by more than 12 months under this subsection. ]
[(4)] (3) The court may impose a sentence other than the  sentence provided by subsection (1)
[or (3) ] of this section if the court imposes:
(a) A longer term of incarceration that is otherwise required or authorized by law; or
(b) A departure sentence authorized by the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission
based upon findings of substantial and  compelling reasons. Unless the law or the rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice  Commission allow for imposition of a longer sentence, the maximum departure al-
lowed for a person sentenced under this subsection is  double the presumptive sentence provided in
subsection (1) [ or (3) ] of this section.
[(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4)(b) of this section, the court may  not sentence a person under
subsection (4) of this section  to a term of incarceration that exceeds the period of time described in ORS
161.605.]
[(6) The court shall sentence a person under this section to at least the presumptive  sentence de-
scribed in subsection (1) or (3) of this section, unless the  parties stipulate otherwise or the court finds
that:]
[(a) The person was not on probation, parole or post-prison supervision for a crime listed  in sub-
section (1) of this section at the time of the commission of the current crime of conviction; ]
[(b) The person has not previously received a downward departure from a  presumptive sentence for
a crime listed in subsection (1) of this section; ]
[5]
SB 894
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(c) The harm or loss caused by the crime is not greater than usual for that type of crime; and ]
[(d) In consideration of the nature of the offense and  the harm to the victim, a downward departure
will:]
[(A) Increase public safety; ]
[(B) Enhance the likelihood that the person will be rehabilitated; and ]
[(C) Not unduly reduce the appropriate punishment. ]
[(7)(a)] (4)(a)  For a crime  committed on or after November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered
to have  occurred upon the pronouncement of sentence in open court. However, when sentences are
imposed for two or more convictions arising  out of the same conduct or criminal episode, none of
the convictions is considered to have occurred prior to any of the other convictions arising out  of
the same conduct or criminal episode.
(b) For a crime committed prior to November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered to have  oc-
curred  upon  the pronouncement in open court of a sentence or upon the pronouncement in open
court of the suspended imposition of a sentence.
[(8)] (5)  For purposes of this section,  previous convictions must be proven pursuant to ORS
137.079.
[(9)] (6) As used in this section[ :],
[(a) “Downward departure” means a downward  dispositional departure or a downward durational
departure under the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission. ]
[(b)] “previous conviction” includes:
[(A)] (a)  Convictions occurring before, on or after July 1, 2003; and
[(B)] (b) Convictions entered in any other state or federal court for comparable offenses.
SECTION 8.  ORS 475.934 is repealed.
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 9. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Corrections, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $
 for the purposes  of funding the Family Sentencing
Alternative Pilot Program described in section 1, chapter 830, Oregon  Laws 2015, increasing
the number of counties participating in the program and carrying out  the provisions of sec-
tion 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 10.  (1) In addition to and not in  lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Department of Human Services,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,
out of the General Fund,  the amount of $  for the purposes of funding the Family
Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program described in section 1, chapter 830, Oregon  Laws 2015,
increasing the number of counties participating in the program and  carrying out the pro-
visions of section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of $  is
established for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from federal funds collected  or received by the Department of Human Services for
the purposes of funding the Family Sentencing Alternative Pilot Program described in sec-
tion 1, chapter 830, Oregon Laws 2015, increasing the number of counties participating in  the
program and carrying out the provisions of section 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 11.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
[6]
SB 894
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2017,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $ , to be deposited in  the Justice Rein-
vestment Account described in section 52, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, and  expended for
the purposes of the Justice Reinvestment Program described  in section 53, chapter 649,
Oregon Laws 2013.
SECTION 12. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $ , to be deposited in the Oregon Domestic  and Sexual
Violence Services Fund described  in ORS 147.453 and expended as described in ORS 147.450
to 147.471.
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
SECTION 13. (1) Section 3 of this 2017 Act and the amendments to section  1, chapter 830,
Oregon Laws 2015, by section 2 of this 2017 Act apply to sentences imposed  on or after the
effective date of this 2017 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 421.168 by section 5 of this 2017 Act  apply to sentences im-
posed on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 137.717 by section 7 of this 2017 Act and the repeal of ORS
475.934 by section 8 of this 2017 Act apply to sentences imposed on or after the effective date
of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 14.
The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
[7]