Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “primary care physician” means a physician li-
censed under ORS chapter 677 whose clinical practice is:
(a) Family medicine;
(b) General internal medicine; or
(c) Pediatrics.
(2) Every two years, the Oregon Health Authority shall conduct a study to count  the
number of primary care physicians in this state who are licensed and in  active practice. In
conducting the study, the authority shall:
(a) Include a primary care physician in  the count only if the physician is actively seeing
patients in a primary care capacity;
(b) Sort the data by city and region; and
(c) Identify gaps  in the availability of primary care physicians in rural and medically
underserved areas.
(3) The authority shall submit a report on the authority’s findings to the Legislative
Assembly, including any recommendations for addressing primary care physician shortages
and improving health care access in rural and medically underserved areas, and shall  make
the report publicly available on the authority’s website.
SECTION 2.
No later than September 15, 2026, the Oregon Health Authority shall com-
plete the first report described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1637