Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that there is a compelling need to in-
crease the staff resources  of the Oregon Health Authority that are dedicated to enforcing
the nurse staffing requirements of ORS 441.152 to 441.177.
(2) The Oregon  Health Authority shall increase the number of full-time employees who
are responsible for investigating  complaints under ORS 441.171 as necessary to ensure the
safety of patients in hospitals licensed in this state.
SECTION 2.  ORS 441.154 is amended to read:
441.154. (1)(a) For each hospital  there shall be established a hospital nurse staffing committee.
Each committee shall:
(A) Consist of an equal number of hospital nurse managers and direct care staff;
(B) For that portion of the committee composed of direct care  staff, consist entirely of direct
care registered nurses, except for [ one position ] three positions  to be filled  by [ a direct care staff
member who is not a registered nurse and whose services are  covered by a written hospital-wide
staffing plan that meets the requirements of ORS 441.155 ] certified nursing assistants ; and
(C) Include at least one direct care registered nurse from each hospital nurse specialty or  unit.
(b) If the direct care registered nurses who work at a hospital are represented under a collective
bargaining agreement, the  bargaining unit shall conduct a selection process by which the direct care
registered nurses who work at the hospital select the members  of the committee who are direct care
registered nurses.
(c) If the direct  care staff member who is not a registered nurse who works at a hospital is re-
presented under a collective  bargaining agreement, the bargaining unit shall use the selection pro-
cess conducted pursuant to  paragraph (b) of this subsection to select that member of the committee.
(d) If the direct care registered nurses who work at a hospital are not represented  under a
collective bargaining agreement, the direct care  registered nurses belonging to a hospital nurse
specialty or unit shall select each member of the committee  who is a direct care registered nurse
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3751
HB 2945
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
from that specialty or unit.
(2) A hospital nurse  staffing committee shall develop a written hospital-wide staffing plan in
accordance with ORS 441.155. The committee’s primary goals in developing the staffing  plan shall
be to ensure that the hospital is staffed  to meet the health care needs of patients. The committee
shall review and modify the staffing plan in accordance with ORS 441.156.
(3) A majority of the members of  a hospital nurse staffing committee constitutes a quorum for
the transaction of business.
(4) A hospital nurse staffing committee shall have two  cochairs. One cochair shall be a hospital
nurse manager elected by the members of the committee  who are hospital nurse managers and one
cochair  shall  be a direct care registered nurse elected by the members of the committee who are
direct care staff.
(5)(a) A decision made by a hospital nurse staffing committee  must be made by a vote of a ma-
jority  of  the members of the committee. If a quorum of members comprises an unequal number of
hospital nurse  managers and direct care staff, only an equal number of hospital nurse managers and
direct care staff may vote.
(b) If the committee is unable to reach an agreement on the staffing plan, either  cochair of the
committee may invoke a 30-day period during which the committee shall continue to develop  the
staffing plan. During the 30-day period, the hospital shall respond in a timely manner to  reasonable
requests from members of the committee for data that  will enable the committee to reach a resol-
ution. If at the end of the 30-day period, the committee remains unable  to reach an agreement on
the staffing plan, one of the cochairs shall notify the Oregon Health Authority of the impasse.
(c) Upon receiving notification under paragraph (b) of this subsection,  the authority shall pro-
vide the committee with a mediator to  assist the committee in reaching an agreement on the staffing
plan. Mediation conducted under this paragraph must be consistent with the  requirements for im-
plementing and reviewing staffing plans under ORS 441.155 and 441.156.
(d) If the committee is unable  to reach an agreement on the staffing plan after 90 days of me-
diation, the authority may impose a penalty against the hospital as described in ORS 441.175.
(6) A hospital nurse staffing committee shall meet:
(a) At least once every three months; and
(b) At any time and place specified by either cochair.
(7)(a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this  subsection, a hospital nurse staffing committee meeting
must be open to:
(A) The hospital nursing staff as observers; and
(B) Upon invitation by either cochair, other observers or presenters.
(b) At any time,  either cochair may exclude persons described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
from a committee meeting for purposes related to deliberation and voting.
(8) Minutes of hospital nurse staffing committee meetings must:
(a) Include motions made and outcomes of votes taken;
(b) Summarize discussions; and
(c) Be made available in a timely manner to hospital nursing staff and  other hospital staff upon
request.
(9) A hospital shall release a member of a hospital nurse staffing committee described in sub-
section (1)(a) of this section from the member’s assignment, and  provide the member with paid time,
to attend committee meetings.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 441.175 is amended to read:
[2]
HB 2945
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
441.175. (1) The Oregon Health Authority may impose civil penalties in the  manner provided in
ORS 183.745 or  suspend or revoke a license of a hospital for a violation of any provision of ORS
441.152 to 441.177. The authority shall adopt by rule a  schedule establishing the amount of civil
penalty that may be imposed for  a violation of ORS 441.152 to 441.177 when there is a reasonable
belief that safe patient  care has been or may be negatively impacted, except that a civil penalty
may not exceed [ $5,000] $10,000. Each violation of a written hospital-wide staffing plan shall be
considered a separate  violation. Any license that is suspended or revoked under this subsection shall
be suspended or revoked as provided in ORS 441.030.
(2) The authority shall maintain for public inspection records of any civil penalties or license
suspensions or revocations imposed on hospitals penalized under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be  expended for carrying out section 1 of
this 2019 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[3]