Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1)(a) The  Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, in collaboration with the
Department of Corrections, shall establish the Family Preservation Project pilot program at
the Coffee Creek Correctional Facility.
(b) The program shall be administered by  the YWCA of Greater Portland and be located
within the facility.
(2) The goals of the program include:
(a) Providing services that increase protective  factors within families, create self-efficacy
in parents and lead to successful parenting upon reentry;
(b) Reducing the trauma experienced by children of incarcerated parents;
(c) Improving social-emotional  and educational outcomes for the children of incarcerated
parents;
(d) Increasing successful reentry of incarcerated parents  and reunification with families;
(e) Reducing the likelihood that children of incarcerated parents enter the justice system;
and
(f) Reducing recidivism.
(3)(a)(A) The program may provide services to  parents serving sentences of incarceration
at Coffee Creek Correctional Facility, children of the parents and caregivers of  the children,
that the program  determines to be eligible, as provided in subparagraph (B) of this para-
graph.
(B) The program shall collaborate with  the Department of Corrections and, if a child is
in the care and custody of the  Department of Human Services, with the Department of Hu-
man Services, to determine  the eligibility of the individuals described in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph.
(b) The services  provided under this section must be individualized, targeted, culturally
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2554
HB 2731
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
appropriate, gender-responsive, trauma-informed and, when delivered to children in  the care
and custody  of the Department of Human Services, determined in collaboration with the
Department of Human Services.
(c) Services provided under this section may include, but are not limited to:
(A) Therapeutic visitations;
(B) Biopsychosocial assessments and interventions;
(C) Psycho-educational and support groups;
(D) Intensive transition planning;
(E) Parenting support and education;
(F) Caregiver support;
(G) Juvenile and family law support;
(H) Communication support;
(I) Reentry and peer support; and
(J) Lectures and speaker series.
(4) The YWCA of Greater Portland shall contribute to the program:
(a) Practitioners who have at least a master’s degree  with specific training in family
systems, adult and children’s mental health and trauma;
(b) Tracking of outcome measurements of the program;
(c) Community partnerships;
(d) Family housing opportunities; and
(e) Domestic violence and sexual assault victim support and services.
(5) The Department of Corrections shall contribute to the program:
(a) Training required to obtain  contractor identification, keys and access to information
technology systems and support;
(b) Adequate office space to house all program staff;
(c) Adequate designated classroom space;
(d) Adequate space to hold monthly speaker series meetings;
(e) A child-friendly space for therapeutic visitation twice a month;
(f) A designated person to act as a liaison between Coffee  Creek Correctional Facility and
the YWCA of Greater Portland; and
(g) The opportunity for quarterly team  program meetings to establish and review proto-
cols and procedures of the program.
(6) The commission shall contribute to the program:
(a) Research and analysis support, including the  evaluation described in subsection (8)
of this section; and
(b) The collection of  data, in collaboration with the program, concerning maternal
incarceration.
(7) The commission, the Department of Corrections and representatives  of the program
shall meet quarterly with other state agencies, as determined by the commission, Depart-
ment of Corrections or program and including  but not limited to the Department of Human
Services, the Oregon Health  Authority and the Department of Education, to discuss and
provide updates concerning the implementation and outcomes of the program.
(8) No later than September 15, 2026, and every  two years thereafter, the commission, in
consultation with the YWCA  of Greater Portland and the Department of Corrections, shall
evaluate the effectiveness of the program described in this section  and shall report the re-
[2]
HB 2731
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
sults of the analysis to the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in ORS 192.245.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to  the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of  $ , for distribution to the YWCA of
Greater Portland to carry out the provisions of section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 1, 2031.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]