Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ADDITIONS TO ORS CHAPTER 455
SECTION 1. Sections 2 to 5 of  this 2017 Act and ORS 705.250 are added to and made a
part of ORS 455.010 to 455.740.
ESTABLISHING DEPARTMENT OF BUILDING CODES
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Building Codes is established.
(2) The department is under the supervision  and control of a director, who is responsible
for the performance of the duties, functions and powers of the department.
(3) The Governor shall  appoint the Director of the Department of Building Codes, who
holds office at the pleasure of the Governor.
(4) The director shall be paid a salary as  provided by law or, if not so provided, as pre-
scribed by the Governor.
(5) For purposes of administration, subject to the approval of the Governor, the  director
may organize and reorganize the department  as the director considers necessary to properly
conduct the work of the department.
(6) The director may divide the functions of the  department into administrative divisions.
Subject to the approval of  the Governor, the director may appoint an individual to administer
each division. The administrator of each division serves at the  pleasure of the director and
is not subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 240. Each individual appointed under  this
subsection must be well qualified by technical training and experience in the functions to  be
performed by the individual.
(7) The appointment of the director is subject to confirmation by  the Senate in the
manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
EMPLOYEES
SECTION 3. (1) The Director of the Department of Building Codes shall, by written order
filed with the Secretary of State, appoint a deputy director. The  deputy director serves at
the pleasure of the director, has authority  to act for the director in the absence of the di-
rector and is subject to the control of the director at all times.
(2) Subject to any applicable provisions of ORS chapter 240, the director shall  appoint all
subordinate officers  and employees of the Department of Building Codes, prescribe their du-
ties and fix their compensation.
GENERAL AUTHORITY TO ADOPT RULES
SECTION 4. In accordance  with the provisions of ORS chapter 183, the Department of
Building Codes may adopt rules necessary for the administration of the laws that the  De-
partment of Building Codes is charged with administering.
[2]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
DEPARTMENT OF BUILDING CODES FUND
SECTION 5. The Department of Building Codes Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the Department of Building
Codes Fund shall be credited to the fund.  Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated
to the Department of Building Codes for carrying out the duties, functions  and powers of the
department.
TRANSFER
SECTION 6.  The  duties, functions and powers of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services relating to programs administered and enforced by its building codes divi-
sion during all or part of the period beginning July 1, 2015, and ending February  1, 2017, in-
cluding but not limited to the administration and enforcement of the state building code, are
imposed upon, transferred to and vested in the Department of Building Codes.
RECORDS, PROPERTY, EMPLOYEES
SECTION 7.
(1) The  Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services
shall:
(a) Deliver to the Department of Building Codes  all records and property within the ju-
risdiction of the director that relate to the duties, functions  and powers transferred by sec-
tion 6 of this 2017 Act; and
(b) Transfer to  the Department of Building Codes those employees engaged primarily in
the exercise of the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 6 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The Director of the Department of  Building Codes shall take possession of the records
and property, and shall take charge of the employees and employ them in the exercise of the
duties, functions and powers transferred by section 6 of this 2017 Act, without reduction  of
compensation but subject to change or termination of employment or compensation as  pro-
vided by law.
(3) The Governor shall resolve any dispute between the Department of Consumer  and
Business Services  and the Department of Building Codes relating to transfers of records,
property and employees under this section, and the Governor’s decision is final.
UNEXPENDED REVENUES
SECTION 8.  (1) The unexpended balances of amounts authorized to be expended by  the
Department of  Consumer and Business Services for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,
from revenues dedicated, continuously  appropriated, appropriated or otherwise made avail-
able for the purpose of administering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers  trans-
ferred by section 6 of  this 2017 Act are transferred to and are available for expenditure by
the Department of Building Codes for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for the purpose
of administering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers transferred  by section 6 of
this 2017 Act.
(2) The expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing or limiting
[3]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
expenditures by the Department of Consumer and Business  Services remain applicable to
expenditures by the Department of Building Codes under this section.
ACTION, PROCEEDING, PROSECUTION
SECTION 9. The transfer of duties,  functions and powers to the Department of Building
Codes by section 6 of this 2017 Act does not affect any action,  proceeding or prosecution in-
volving or with respect  to the duties, functions and powers begun before and pending at the
time of the transfer, except that the Department  of Building Codes is substituted for the
Department of Consumer and Business Services in the action, proceeding or prosecution.
LIABILITY, DUTY, OBLIGATION
SECTION 10. (1) Nothing in  sections 1 to 14 or 335 to 337 of this 2017 Act or the amend-
ments to statutes and session law by sections 15 to 334 of this  2017 Act relieves a person of
a liability, duty  or obligation accruing under or with respect to the duties, functions and
powers transferred by section 6 of this 2017 Act. The Department of  Building Codes may
undertake the collection or enforcement of any such liability, duty or obligation.
(2) The rights and obligations of the Department of  Consumer and Business Services le-
gally incurred under contracts, leases and business transactions executed, entered  into or
begun before the operative date of  section 6 of this 2017 Act and accruing under or with re-
spect to the duties, functions and powers transferred by  section 6 of this 2017 Act are
transferred to the Department  of Building Codes. For the purpose of succession to these
rights and obligations, the  Department of Building Codes is a continuation of the Department
of Consumer and Business Services and not a new authority.
RULES
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding the transfer of duties,  functions and powers by section 6
of this 2017 Act, the rules of  the Department of Consumer and Business Services with re-
spect to such duties, functions or powers that  are in effect on the operative date of section
6 of this 2017 Act continue in effect until superseded or  repealed by rules of the Department
of Building Codes. References in the rules of the Department of Consumer  and Business
Services to the Department of Consumer and Business Services or an officer or  employee
of the Department of  Consumer and Business Services in the context of any duty, function
or power transferred under section 6 of this 2017 Act are considered to be references  to the
Department of Building Codes or an officer or employee of the Department of Building Codes.
Section 6 of this 2017 Act does not alter or terminate the service  of any advisory board
member holding office on the operative date of section 6 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 12. Whenever, in any  uncodified law or resolution of the Legislative Assembly
or in any rule, document, record or proceeding authorized by  the Legislative Assembly, in
the context of the duties, functions and powers  transferred by section 6 of this 2017 Act,
reference is made to the Department of Consumer  and Business Services, or an officer or
employee of the Department of Consumer and Business Services, whose duties,  functions or
powers are transferred by section 6  of this 2017 Act, the reference is considered to be a
[4]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
reference to the Department of Building Codes or an officer or employee  of the Department
of Building Codes who by this 2017 Act is charged with carrying  out the duties, functions and
powers.
MANUFACTURED STRUCTURE DEALERS
SECTION 13. Section 14 of this 2017 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 446.661 to
446.756.
SECTION 14.  (1) A person may not engage in, or procure or assist any person to  engage
in, any conduct or activity for which a license  is required under ORS 446.661 to 446.756 or
any Department of Consumer and Business Services rule adopted or order issued  for the
administration and enforcement of ORS 446.661  to 446.756 unless the necessary license has
been obtained.
(2) The department may enter into agreements with any city or county  for the city or
county to conduct inspections of manufactured structure dealerships for the purpose of de-
termining compliance with ORS 446.661 to 446.756.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 15.
 ORS 30.788 is amended to read:
30.788. (1) An action for damages arising out of the practice of  architecture, as defined in ORS
671.010, may not be  maintained by any person against an architect for services rendered by the ar-
chitect under the provisions of this section.
(2) An action for damages arising out of the practice of engineering, as described in ORS
672.007, may not be maintained  by any person against an engineer for structural engineering ser-
vices rendered by the engineer under the provisions of this section.
(3) An  action for damages arising out of the provision of building code inspections, plan reviews
or post-disaster building evaluations may not be maintained by any person against a certified in-
spector or certified building evaluator if the inspector or  building evaluator is providing building
code inspections, plan reviews or post-disaster building evaluations under the provisions of  this
section and the inspector or building evaluator is operating within the scope of the certification.
(4) The immunity provided by this section  applies only to services that meet all of the following
requirements:
(a) The services are rendered without compensation.
(b) The services are rendered within 60 days after the Governor  declares a state of emergency
under the provisions of ORS 401.165.
(c) The services are rendered to assist in relief efforts arising out of  the emergency giving rise
to the declaration of emergency.
(5) This section does not affect the liability of any architect,  engineer, inspector or building
evaluator for gross negligence or intentional torts.
(6) The immunity provided by this section applies only to:
(a) Inspectors certified under ORS 455.715 to 455.740;
(b) Building evaluators  certified for post-disaster building evaluation by the Department of
[Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes;
(c) Architects who are registered under ORS 671.010 to 671.220;
[5]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Engineers who are registered under ORS 672.002 to 672.325; and
(e) Architects and engineers who are licensed or registered under the laws of another state.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 62.803 is amended to read:
62.803. As used in ORS 62.800 to 62.815, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Lienholder” means the holder of a manufactured dwelling lien:
(a) That  is recorded in the deed records of the county in which the manufactured dwelling is
located;
(b) That is perfected with the Department of [ Consumer and Business  Services ] Building Codes
pursuant to ORS 446.611; or
(c) Of which a manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperative has actual knowledge.
(2) “Manufactured dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 446.003.
(3) “Manufactured dwelling park” has the meaning given that term in ORS 446.003.
(4) “Manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperative” means a cooperative corporation that:
(a) Is organized to acquire or develop, and to own, an interest in one or more manufactured
dwelling parks that are primarily used  for the siting of manufactured dwellings owned and occupied
by members of the cooperative;
(b) Limits the use of all income and earnings  to use by the cooperative and not for the benefit
or profit of any individual; and
(c) Elects to be governed by ORS 62.800 to 62.815.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 90.425 is amended to read:
90.425. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Current market value” means the  amount in cash, as determined by the county assessor,
that could reasonably  be expected to be paid for a manufactured dwelling or floating home by an
informed buyer  to an informed seller, each acting without compulsion in an arm’s-length transaction
occurring on the assessment  date for the tax year or on the date of a subsequent reappraisal by the
county  assessor.
(b) “Dispose of  the personal property” means that, if reasonably appropriate, the landlord may
throw away the property or may give  it without consideration to a nonprofit organization or to a
person unrelated to the landlord. The landlord may  not retain the property for personal use or
benefit.
(c) “Goods” includes those goods left inside a recreational  vehicle, manufactured dwelling or
floating home or left upon the rental space  outside a recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling
or floating home, whether the recreational vehicle, dwelling or home is located inside or  outside of
a facility.
(d) “Lienholder” means any lienholder  of an abandoned recreational vehicle, manufactured
dwelling or floating home, if the lien is  of record or the lienholder is actually known to the landlord.
(e) “Of record” means:
(A) For a recreational vehicle that is not a manufactured structure as defined in ORS 446.561,
that a security interest has been properly recorded with the Department of Transportation pursuant
to ORS 802.200 (1)(a)(A) and 803.097.
(B) For a manufactured dwelling or recreational vehicle that  is a manufactured structure as
defined in ORS 446.561, that a security interest  has been properly recorded for the manufactured
dwelling or recreational vehicle in the records of the Department of [ Consumer and  Business Ser-
vices] Building Codes pursuant to ORS  446.611 or on a certificate of title issued by the Department
of Transportation prior to May 1, 2005.
[6]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) For a floating home, that a security interest has been  properly recorded with the State
Marine Board pursuant to ORS 830.740  to 830.755 for a home registered and titled with the board
pursuant to ORS 830.715.
(f) “Owner” means any owner  of an abandoned recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or
floating home, if different from the tenant and either of record or actually known to the landlord.
(g) “Personal property” means goods,  vehicles and recreational vehicles and includes manufac-
tured dwellings  and floating homes not located in a facility. “Personal property” does not include
manufactured dwellings and floating homes located in a facility and therefore subject to  being
stored, sold or disposed of as provided under ORS 90.675.
(2) A  landlord is responsible for abandoned personal property and shall store, sell or dispose of
abandoned personal property as provided by this section. This section governs  the rights and obli-
gations of landlords, tenants and any lienholders or  owners in any personal property abandoned or
left upon the premises by the tenant or any lienholder or owner in the following circumstances:
(a) The tenancy has ended by termination or expiration of a rental agreement  or by
relinquishment or abandonment of  the premises and the landlord reasonably believes under all the
circumstances that the tenant has left the personal property upon the  premises with no intention
of asserting any further claim to the premises or to the personal property;
(b) The tenant has been absent from the premises continuously  for seven days after termination
of a tenancy by a court order that has not been executed; or
(c) The landlord receives possession of the premises from the sheriff following  restitution pur-
suant to ORS 105.161.
(3) Prior  to storing, selling or disposing of the tenant’s personal property under this section, the
landlord must give a written notice to the tenant that must be:
(a) Personally delivered to the tenant; or
(b) Sent by first class mail addressed and mailed to the tenant at:
(A) The premises;
(B) Any post-office box held by the tenant and actually known to the landlord; and
(C) The most recent forwarding address if provided by the tenant  or actually known to the
landlord.
(4)(a) In addition to the notice required by subsection (3) of this  section, in the case of an
abandoned recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home, a landlord shall also give
a copy of the notice described in subsection (3) of this section to:
(A) Any lienholder of the recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home;
(B) Any owner of the recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home;
(C) The tax collector of  the county where the manufactured dwelling or floating home is located;
and
(D) The assessor of the county where the manufactured dwelling or floating home is located.
(b) The landlord shall give the notice copy required by this subsection by personal delivery or
first class mail, except that for any lienholder, mail service must be both by first class mail and  by
certified mail with return receipt requested.
(c) A notice to lienholders under paragraph (a)(A) of this  subsection must be sent to each
lienholder at each address:
(A) Actually known to the landlord;
(B) Of record; and
(C) Provided to the landlord by the lienholder in a written notice that  identifies the personal
[7]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
property subject to the lien and that was sent  to the landlord by certified mail with return receipt
requested within the preceding five years. The notice  must identify the personal property by de-
scribing the physical address of the property.
(5) The notice required under subsection (3) of this section must state that:
(a) The personal property left upon the premises is considered abandoned;
(b) The tenant or any lienholder or owner must contact  the landlord by a specified date, as
provided in subsection (6)  of this section, to arrange for the removal of the abandoned personal
property;
(c) The personal property is  stored at a place of safekeeping, except that if the property includes
a manufactured dwelling or floating home, the dwelling or home must be stored  on the rented space;
(d) The tenant or any lienholder or  owner, except as provided by subsection (18) of this section,
may arrange for removal of the personal property by  contacting the landlord at a described tele-
phone number or address on or before the specified date;
(e) The landlord shall make the personal property available for removal by the tenant  or any
lienholder or owner, except as  provided by subsection (18) of this section, by appointment at rea-
sonable times;
(f) If the personal property is  considered to be abandoned pursuant to subsection (2)(a) or (b)
of this  section, the landlord may require payment of removal and storage charges, as provided by
subsection  (7)(d)  of this section, prior to releasing the personal property to the tenant or any
lienholder or owner;
(g) If the personal property is considered to be abandoned pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of  this
section, the landlord may not require payment of storage charges prior to releasing  the personal
property;
(h) If the tenant or any lienholder  or owner fails to contact the landlord by the specified date,
or after that contact, fails to  remove the personal property within 30 days for recreational vehicles,
manufactured dwellings and floating homes or 15 days  for all other personal property, the landlord
may sell or dispose of the personal property.  If the landlord reasonably believes that the personal
property will be eligible for disposal pursuant to subsection (10)(b) of this  section and the landlord
intends to dispose of the  property if the property is not claimed, the notice shall state that belief
and intent; and
(i) If the personal property includes a recreational vehicle, manufactured  dwelling or floating
home and if applicable, there  is a lienholder or owner that has a right to claim the recreational
vehicle, dwelling or home, except as provided by subsection (18) of this section.
(6) For purposes of subsection (5)  of this section, the specified date by which a tenant, lienholder
or owner must contact a landlord to arrange for the disposition of abandoned personal property is:
(a) For abandoned recreational vehicles,  manufactured dwellings or floating homes, not less than
45 days after personal delivery or mailing of the notice; or
(b) For all other abandoned personal property,  not less than five days after personal delivery
or eight days after mailing of the notice.
(7) After notifying the tenant as required by subsection (3) of this section, the landlord:
(a) Shall store any abandoned manufactured dwelling or floating home  on the rented space and
shall exercise reasonable care for the dwelling or home;
(b) Shall store all  other abandoned personal property of the tenant, including goods left inside
a recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home or left upon the  rented space outside
a recreational vehicle, dwelling or home, in a place of safekeeping and shall exercise  reasonable
[8]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
care for the personal property, except that the landlord may:
(A) Promptly dispose of rotting food; and
(B) Allow an animal control agency to remove any abandoned  pets or livestock. If an animal
control agency will not remove the abandoned pets or livestock, the landlord shall exercise  reason-
able care for the animals given  all the circumstances, including the type and condition of the ani-
mals, and may give the animals to an agency that is willing  and able to care for the animals, such
as a humane society or similar organization;
(c) Except  for manufactured dwellings and floating homes, may store the abandoned personal
property at the dwelling unit, move and store it elsewhere on the premises or move  and store it at
a commercial storage company or other place of safekeeping; and
(d) Is entitled to reasonable or actual storage charges and costs incidental  to storage or dis-
posal, including any cost of removal  to a place of storage. In the case of an abandoned manufactured
dwelling or floating home, the storage charge may be no greater than the monthly  space rent last
payable by the tenant.
(8) If a tenant, lienholder  or owner, upon the receipt of the notice provided by subsection (3)
or (4) of this section or otherwise, responds by actual notice to  the landlord on or before the spec-
ified date in the landlord’s notice that the tenant, lienholder or owner intends to remove  the per-
sonal property from the premises or from  the place of safekeeping, the landlord must make that
personal property available for removal by  the tenant, lienholder or owner by appointment at rea-
sonable times during the 15 days or, in the case of a  recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling
or floating home, 30 days following the date of the response, subject to subsection (18) of this sec-
tion. If the personal property is considered to be abandoned pursuant to subsection  (2)(a) or (b) of
this section,  but not pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section, the landlord may require payment
of removal and storage charges, as provided in subsection (7)(d) of this  section, prior to allowing the
tenant, lienholder or owner to remove the  personal property. Acceptance by a landlord of such
payment does not operate to create or reinstate a tenancy or create a waiver  pursuant to ORS
90.412 or 90.417.
(9) Except as provided in subsections (18) to  (20) of this section, if the tenant, lienholder or
owner of a recreational vehicle, manufactured  dwelling or floating home does not respond within the
time provided by the landlord’s  notice, or the tenant, lienholder or owner does not remove the per-
sonal property within the time required by subsection (8) of  this section or by any date agreed to
with the  landlord, whichever is later, the tenant’s, lienholder’s or owner’s personal property is con-
clusively presumed to be abandoned. The tenant and any lienholder  or owner that have been given
notice pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of this section shall, except with regard  to the distribution
of sale proceeds pursuant to subsection (13) of this section, have no  further right, title or interest
to the personal property and may not claim or sell the property.
(10) If the personal  property is presumed to be abandoned under subsection (9) of this section,
the landlord then may:
(a) Sell the personal property at a public or private sale, provided that prior to the sale of  a
recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home:
(A) The landlord may seek to transfer  ownership of record of the personal property by comply-
ing with the requirements of the appropriate state agency; and
(B) The landlord shall:
(i) Place a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in  which the recreational
vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home is located. The notice shall state:
[9]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(I) That the recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home is abandoned;
(II) The tenant’s and owner’s name, if of record or actually known to the landlord;
(III) The address  and any space number where the recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling
or floating home is located, and any plate, registration or  other identification number for a recre-
ational vehicle or floating home noted on the certificate of title, if actually known to the landlord;
(IV) Whether the sale is by private bidding or public auction;
(V) Whether the landlord is accepting sealed bids and, if so, the last date  on which bids will be
accepted;  and
(VI) The name and telephone number of the  person to contact to inspect the recreational vehi-
cle, manufactured dwelling or floating home;
(ii) At a reasonable  time prior to the sale, give a copy of the notice required by sub-
subparagraph (i) of this  subparagraph to the tenant and to any lienholder and owner, by personal
delivery or first class mail, except that for any lienholder, mail service must be by first class  mail
with certificate of mailing;
(iii) Obtain an affidavit of publication from the newspaper to  show that the notice required un-
der sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph ran in the newspaper at least one day in each of  two
consecutive weeks prior to the date scheduled for the sale or the last date bids will be accepted;
and
(iv) Obtain written proof from the county that all property taxes and assessments on the manu-
factured dwelling or floating home have been paid or, if not paid,  that the county has authorized the
sale, with the sale proceeds to be distributed pursuant to subsection (13) of this section;
(b) Destroy or otherwise dispose of the personal property if the landlord determines that:
(A) For a manufactured dwelling or floating home, the current market value of  the property is
$8,000 or less as determined by the county assessor; or
(B) For all other personal property,  the reasonable current fair market value is $1,000 or less
or so low that the cost of storage and  conducting a public sale probably exceeds the amount that
would be realized from the sale; or
(c) Consistent with paragraphs (a) and (b) of  this subsection, sell certain items and destroy or
otherwise dispose of the remaining personal property.
(11)(a) A public or private sale authorized by this section must:
(A) For a recreational  vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home, be conducted consistent
with the terms listed in subsection (10)(a)(B)(i) of this section. Every aspect of the  sale including the
method, manner, time, place and terms must be commercially reasonable; or
(B) For all other personal property, be conducted under the provisions of ORS 79.0610.
(b) If there is no buyer at a sale of a  manufactured dwelling or floating home, the personal
property is considered to be worth $8,000 or less, regardless of current market value, and the  land-
lord shall destroy or otherwise dispose of the personal property.
(12) Notwithstanding  ORS 446.155 (1) and (2), unless a landlord intentionally misrepresents the
condition of a manufactured dwelling or floating home, the landlord  is not liable for the condition
of the dwelling or home to:
(a) A buyer  of the dwelling or home at a sale pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section, with
or without consideration; or
(b) A person or nonprofit organization to  whom the landlord gives the dwelling or home pursu-
ant to subsection (1)(b), (10)(b) or (11)(b) of this section.
(13)(a) The landlord may deduct from the proceeds of the sale:
[10]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The reasonable or actual cost of notice, storage and sale; and
(B) Unpaid rent.
(b) If the sale was  of a manufactured dwelling or floating home, after deducting the amounts
listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the landlord  shall remit the remaining proceeds, if any, to
the county tax collector to the extent of any unpaid property taxes and assessments owed on  the
dwelling or home.
(c) If the sale was of a  recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home, after de-
ducting the amounts listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, if  applicable, the landlord
shall remit the remaining proceeds, if any, to any  lienholder to the extent of any unpaid balance
owed on the lien on the recreational vehicle, dwelling or home.
(d) After deducting the amounts  listed in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection, if appli-
cable, the landlord shall remit to the tenant or owner the remaining proceeds,  if any, together with
an itemized accounting.
(e) If the tenant or owner cannot after due diligence be  found, the landlord shall deposit the
remaining proceeds with the county treasurer of the county in which the sale occurred.  If not
claimed within three years, the deposited proceeds revert to the  general fund of the county and are
available for general purposes.
(14) The county tax collector shall cancel all unpaid property taxes and assessments owed on
a manufactured dwelling or floating home, as provided  under ORS 311.790, only under one of the
following circumstances:
(a) The landlord disposes of the manufactured dwelling or  floating home after a determination
described in subsection (10)(b) of this section.
(b) There  is no buyer of the manufactured dwelling or floating home at a sale described under
subsection (11) of this section.
(c)(A) There is a buyer of the  manufactured dwelling or floating home at a sale described under
subsection (11) of this section;
(B) The current market value of the manufactured dwelling or  floating home is $8,000 or less;
and
(C) The proceeds of the sale are insufficient to satisfy the unpaid property taxes and assessments
owed on the dwelling or home after distribution of  the proceeds pursuant to subsection (13) of this
section.
(d)(A) The landlord buys the manufactured dwelling or floating home  at a sale described under
subsection (11) of this section;
(B) The current  market value of the manufactured dwelling or floating home is more than $8,000;
(C) The proceeds of the sale are insufficient to satisfy the unpaid property taxes and assessments
owed on the manufactured dwelling  or floating home after distribution of the proceeds pursuant to
subsection (13) of this section; and
(D) The landlord disposes of the manufactured dwelling or floating home.
(15) The landlord is not responsible for any loss to the tenant, lienholder or owner resulting
from storage of personal property in compliance  with this section unless the loss was caused by the
landlord’s deliberate or negligent act. In the  event of a deliberate and malicious violation, the
landlord is liable for twice the actual damages sustained by the tenant, lienholder or owner.
(16) Complete compliance in good faith with this section shall constitute  a complete defense in
any action brought by a  tenant, lienholder or owner against a landlord for loss or damage to such
personal property disposed of pursuant to this section.
[11]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(17) If a landlord does not comply with this section:
(a) The tenant is relieved of any liability  for damage to the premises caused by conduct that
was not deliberate, intentional or grossly negligent and for unpaid  rent and may recover from the
landlord up to twice the actual damages sustained by the tenant;
(b) A lienholder or owner aggrieved by the noncompliance may recover from the landlord the
actual damages sustained by the lienholder or owner. ORS 90.255 does not authorize an  award of
attorney fees to the prevailing party in any action arising under this paragraph; and
(c) A county tax collector aggrieved by the noncompliance may  recover from the landlord the
actual damages sustained by the tax  collector, if the noncompliance is part of an effort by the
landlord to defraud the tax collector. ORS 90.255 does not authorize an award  of attorney fees to
the prevailing party in any action arising under this paragraph.
(18) In the case  of an abandoned recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home,
the provisions of this section regarding the rights and responsibilities of a tenant to the  abandoned
vehicle, dwelling or home also apply  to any lienholder except that the lienholder may not sell or
remove the vehicle, dwelling or home unless:
(a) The lienholder has foreclosed its lien on  the recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or
floating home;
(b) The tenant or  a personal representative or designated person described in subsection (20)
of this section has waived all rights under  this section pursuant to subsection (26) of this section;
or
(c) The notice and response periods provided by subsections (6)  and (8) of this section have ex-
pired.
(19)(a) In the case of an abandoned manufactured dwelling or floating home but not including
a dwelling or home abandoned following a  termination pursuant to ORS 90.429 and except as pro-
vided by subsection (20)(d) and (e) of this section, if  a lienholder makes a timely response to a notice
of abandoned personal property pursuant to subsections (6) and (8) of this section and so  requests,
a landlord shall enter into  a written storage agreement with the lienholder providing that the
dwelling or home may not be sold or disposed of  by the landlord for up to 12 months. A storage
agreement entitles the lienholder to  store the personal property on the previously rented space
during the term of the agreement, but does not entitle anyone to occupy the personal property.
(b) The  lienholder’s right to a storage agreement arises upon the failure of the tenant, owner
or, in the case of a deceased tenant, the personal representative, designated  person, heir or devisee
to remove or sell the dwelling or home within the allotted time.
(c) To  exercise the right to a storage agreement under this subsection, in addition to contacting
the landlord with a timely response as described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the lienholder
must enter into the proposed storage agreement within 60 days after the landlord  gives a copy of
the agreement to the lienholder.  The landlord shall give a copy of the proposed storage agreement
to the lienholder in the same manner as provided by subsection (4)(b) of this section. The  landlord
may include a copy of the proposed storage agreement with the  notice of abandoned property re-
quired by subsection (4)  of this section. A lienholder enters into a storage agreement by signing a
copy of the agreement provided by the landlord and personally  delivering or mailing the signed copy
to the landlord within the 60-day period.
(d) The storage agreement may require, in addition  to other provisions agreed to by the landlord
and the lienholder, that:
(A) The lienholder make timely periodic payment of all storage charges, as described  in sub-
[12]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section (7)(d) of this section, accruing from the commencement of the  45-day period described in
subsection  (6) of this section. A storage charge may include a utility or service charge, as described
in ORS 90.532, if limited to charges for electricity, water, sewer service and natural gas  and if in-
cidental to the storage of personal property. A storage charge  may not be due more frequently than
monthly;
(B) The lienholder pay a late charge or fee for failure to pay a storage charge by the date  re-
quired in the agreement, if the amount of the late charge is  no greater than for late charges de-
scribed in the rental agreement between the landlord and the tenant; and
(C) The lienholder maintain the personal property and the space on which  the personal property
is stored  in a manner consistent with the rights and obligations described in the rental agreement
between the landlord and the tenant.
(e) During the term of an agreement described under this subsection, the lienholder has the right
to remove or sell the property, subject to the provisions of the lien. Selling the property includes a
sale to a  purchaser who wishes to leave the dwelling or home on the rented space and become a
tenant, subject  to any conditions previously agreed to by the landlord and tenant regarding the
landlord’s approval of a purchaser or, if there  was no such agreement, any reasonable conditions
by the landlord regarding approval of any purchaser who wishes to leave the dwelling  or home on
the rented space and become a tenant. The landlord also may condition approval for occupancy  of
any purchaser of the property upon payment of all unpaid storage charges and maintenance costs.
(f)(A) If the  lienholder violates the storage agreement, the landlord may terminate the agreement
by giving at least 90  days’ written notice to the lienholder stating facts sufficient to notify the
lienholder of the reason for the termination. Unless the lienholder corrects the violation within  the
notice period, the agreement terminates as provided  and the landlord may sell or dispose of the
dwelling or home without further notice to the lienholder.
(B) After a landlord gives a termination notice  pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph
for failure of the lienholder to pay a storage  charge and the lienholder corrects the violation, if the
lienholder again violates the storage agreement by failing to pay a subsequent storage charge, the
landlord may terminate the agreement by giving at least 30 days’ written notice  to the lienholder
stating facts sufficient to notify the lienholder of the reason for termination. Unless the lienholder
corrects the violation within the  notice period, the agreement terminates as provided and the land-
lord may sell or dispose of the property without further notice to the lienholder.
(C) A lienholder may terminate a storage agreement at any time upon at least  14 days’ written
notice to the landlord and may remove the property from the rented space if the lienholder has  paid
all storage charges and other charges as provided in the agreement.
(g) Upon the failure of a lienholder to enter into a storage agreement as provided by this  sub-
section or upon termination of  an agreement, unless the parties otherwise agree or the lienholder
has sold or removed the manufactured dwelling or  floating home, the landlord may sell or dispose
of the property pursuant to this section without further notice to the lienholder.
(20) If the personal property is a manufactured dwelling or  floating home and is considered
abandoned as a result of the death of a tenant  who was the only tenant and who owned the dwelling
or home, this section applies, except as follows:
(a) The following persons have the same rights and responsibilities regarding the  abandoned
dwelling or home as a tenant:
(A) Any personal representative named in a will or appointed by a court to act for the  deceased
tenant.
[13]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Any person designated  in writing by the tenant to be contacted by the landlord in the event
of the tenant’s death.
(b) The notice required by subsection (3) of this section must be:
(A) Sent by first class mail to the deceased tenant at the premises; and
(B) Personally delivered or sent by first class mail  to any personal representative or designated
person, if actually known to the landlord.
(c) The notice described in subsection (5) of this section must refer to any  personal represen-
tative or designated person, instead of the deceased tenant,  and must incorporate the provisions of
this subsection.
(d) If a personal representative, designated person or other person entitled  to possession of the
property, such as an heir or devisee, responds by actual notice to a landlord within the 45-day period
provided by subsection (6) of this section  and so requests, the landlord shall enter into a written
storage agreement with the representative or person providing that the dwelling or  home may not
be sold or disposed of by  the landlord for up to 90 days or until conclusion of any probate pro-
ceedings, whichever is later. A storage agreement entitles the representative or  person to store the
personal property on the previously rented space during the  term of the agreement, but does not
entitle anyone to  occupy the personal property. If such an agreement is entered, the landlord may
not enter a similar agreement with a lienholder pursuant to subsection (19)  of this section until the
agreement with the personal representative or designated person ends.
(e) If a personal representative or other person requests that a  landlord enter into a storage
agreement, subsection (19)(c), (d) and (f)(C)  of this section applies, with the representative or person
having the rights and responsibilities of a lienholder with regard to the storage agreement.
(f) During the term of an agreement described under paragraph  (d) of this subsection, the rep-
resentative or person has  the right to remove or sell the dwelling or home, including a sale to a
purchaser or a transfer to an heir  or devisee where the purchaser, heir or devisee wishes to leave
the dwelling or home on the rented space and become a tenant, subject to any conditions  previously
agreed to  by the landlord and tenant regarding the landlord’s approval for occupancy of a purchaser,
heir or devisee or, if there was no such agreement, any reasonable conditions by the landlord re-
garding approval for occupancy of any purchaser, heir or devisee who wishes to leave  the dwelling
or home on the rented space and become a  tenant. The landlord also may condition approval for
occupancy of any purchaser, heir or devisee of the dwelling  or home upon payment of all unpaid
storage charges and maintenance costs.
(g) If the representative or person violates the  storage agreement, the landlord may terminate
the agreement by giving at least 30  days’ written notice to the representative or person stating facts
sufficient to notify the representative or  person of the reason for the termination. Unless the rep-
resentative or person corrects the violation within the notice  period, the agreement terminates as
provided and the landlord may sell or dispose of the  dwelling or home without further notice to the
representative or person.
(h) Upon the failure of a representative or person to enter into a storage agreement as  provided
by this subsection or upon termination of an agreement, unless the  parties otherwise agree or the
representative or person has sold or removed the manufactured dwelling or floating home,  the
landlord may sell or dispose of the property pursuant to this section without further  notice to the
representative or person.
(21) If  the personal property is other than a manufactured dwelling or floating home and is
considered abandoned as a result of the death of a tenant who was the only tenant  and who owned
[14]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the personal property, this section applies except as follows:
(a) The  following persons have the same rights and responsibilities regarding the abandoned
personal property as a tenant:
(A) An heir or devisee.
(B) Any  personal representative named in a will or appointed by a court to act for the deceased
tenant.
(C) Any person designated  in writing by the tenant to be contacted by the landlord in the event
of the tenant’s death.
(b) The notice required by subsection (3) of this section must be:
(A) Sent by first class mail to the deceased tenant at the premises;
(B) Personally delivered or sent by first class mail to any heir, devisee, personal  representative
or designated person, if actually known to the landlord; and
(C) Sent by first class mail to the attention of an estate administrator of the Department of State
Lands.
(c) The notice described in subsection (5) of this section must  refer to the heir, devisee, personal
representative, designated person or  estate administrator of the department, instead of the deceased
tenant, and must incorporate the provisions of this subsection.
(d) The landlord shall allow a person that is an heir, devisee or personal representative  of the
tenant, or an estate administrator of the department, to remove the personal property if the person
contacts the landlord within the period provided by subsection (6)  of this section, complies with the
requirements of  this section and provides the landlord with reasonable evidence that the person is
an heir, devisee or personal representative, or an estate administrator of the department.
(e) If neither an heir, devisee nor personal representative of the tenant,  nor an estate adminis-
trator of the department, contacts the landlord within the time period provided by subsection (6) of
this section,  the landlord shall allow removal of the personal property by the designated person of
the tenant, if the designated person  contacts the landlord within that period and complies with the
requirements of  this section and provides the landlord with reasonable evidence that the person is
the designated person.
(f) A landlord who allows removal of personal property under this subsection  is not liable to
another person that has a claim or interest in the personal property.
(22) If a governmental agency determines that the  condition of a manufactured dwelling, floating
home or  recreational vehicle abandoned under this section constitutes an extreme health or safety
hazard under state or local law and the agency determines that the hazard endangers others  in the
immediate vicinity and requires  quick removal of the property, the landlord may sell or dispose of
the property  pursuant to this subsection. The landlord shall comply with all provisions of this sec-
tion, except as follows:
(a) The date provided in subsection (6) of this section by which a  tenant, lienholder, owner,
personal representative or designated person must contact a landlord to arrange for the  disposition
of the property must be not less than 15 days after personal delivery or mailing of the notice  re-
quired by subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The date provided in subsections (8) and  (9) of this section by which a tenant, lienholder,
owner, personal representative or designated  person must remove the property must be not less than
seven days after the tenant, lienholder, owner, personal representative or designated person contacts
the landlord.
(c) The notice  required by subsection (3) of this section must be as provided in subsection (5)
[15]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of this section, except that:
(A) The dates and deadlines in the notice for contacting the landlord and removing the  property
must be consistent with this subsection;
(B) The notice must state  that a governmental agency has determined that the property consti-
tutes an extreme health or safety hazard and must be removed quickly; and
(C) The landlord shall attach a copy of the agency’s determination to the notice.
(d) If the tenant, a lienholder, owner, personal representative or designated person does  not re-
move the property within the time allowed, the landlord or a buyer at a sale by the landlord  under
subsection (11) of this section shall promptly remove the property from the facility.
(e) A landlord is not required to enter into a storage agreement with a lienholder, owner,  per-
sonal representative or designated person pursuant to subsection (19) of this section.
(23)(a) If an  official or agency referred to in ORS 453.876 notifies the landlord that the official
or agency has determined that all or part of the premises is unfit for use as a result of the  presence
of an illegal drug manufacturing site involving methamphetamine, and the  landlord complies with
this subsection, the landlord is not required to comply with subsections (1)  to (22) and (24) to (27)
of this section  with regard to personal property left on the portion of the premises that the official
or agency has determined to be unfit for use.
(b) Upon receiving  notice from an official or agency determining the premises to be unfit for use,
the landlord shall promptly give written notice to the tenant as provided in subsection (3) of this
section. The landlord shall also attach a copy of the notice in a  secure manner to the main entrance
of the dwelling unit. The notice to the tenant shall include a copy of  the official’s or agency’s notice
and state:
(A) That the premises,  or a portion of the premises, has been determined by an official or agency
to be unfit for use due to contamination  from the manufacture of methamphetamine and that as a
result subsections (1) to (22) and (24) to (27) of  this section do not apply to personal property left
on any portion of the premises determined to be unfit for use;
(B) That the landlord has hired, or will hire, a contractor to assess the level of contamination
of the site and to decontaminate the site;
(C) That  upon hiring the contractor, the landlord will provide to the tenant the name, address
and telephone number of the contractor; and
(D) That the tenant may contact the contractor to  determine whether any of the tenant’s per-
sonal property may be removed from the premises or  may be decontaminated at the tenant’s expense
and then removed.
(c) To the extent consistent with rules of the Department of Human Services, the contractor
may release personal property to the tenant.
(d) If the contractor and the department determine that the premises or the tenant’s personal
property is not unfit for use, upon notification by the department  of the determination, the landlord
shall comply with subsections (1) to (22) and  (24) to (27) of this section for any personal property left
on the premises.
(e) Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this  subsection, the landlord is not responsible for
storing or returning any personal property left on the portion of the premises that is unfit for use.
(24) In the case of an abandoned recreational vehicle,  manufactured dwelling or floating home
that is owned  by someone other than the tenant, the provisions of this section regarding the rights
and responsibilities of a tenant to the  abandoned vehicle, dwelling or home also apply to that owner,
with regard only to the vehicle, dwelling or home, and not  to any goods left inside or outside the
[16]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vehicle, dwelling or home.
(25) In the case of an abandoned motor vehicle, the procedure  authorized by ORS 98.830 and
98.835 for removal of abandoned motor vehicles from private property  may be used by a landlord
as an alternative to the procedures required in this section.
(26)(a) A landlord may sell or dispose of a tenant’s  abandoned personal property without com-
plying with subsections (1) to (25) and (27) of this section if, after termination of the  tenancy or no
more than seven days prior to the termination of the tenancy, the following parties  so agree in a
writing entered into in good faith:
(A) The landlord;
(B) The tenant, or  for an abandonment as the result of the death of a tenant who was the only
tenant, the personal representative, designated person or other  person entitled to possession of the
personal property, such as an heir or devisee, as described in subsection  (20) or (21) of this section;
and
(C) In the case  of a manufactured dwelling, floating home or recreational vehicle, any owner and
any lienholder.
(b) A landlord may not, as part of a  rental agreement, require a tenant, a personal represen-
tative, a designated person or any lienholder or owner to waive any right provided by this section.
(27) Until personal property  is conclusively presumed to be abandoned under subsection (9) of
this section, a landlord does not have a lien pursuant to ORS 87.152 for  storing the personal prop-
erty.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 90.675 is amended to read:
90.675. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Current market value” means the amount in cash, as  determined by the county assessor,
that could reasonably be expected to be paid for personal property by an informed buyer to an  in-
formed seller, each acting without compulsion in an arm’s-length transaction occurring  on the as-
sessment date for the tax year or on the date of a subsequent reappraisal by the county assessor.
(b) “Dispose of  the personal property” means that, if reasonably appropriate, the landlord may
throw away the property or may give  it without consideration to a nonprofit organization or to a
person unrelated to the landlord. The landlord may  not retain the property for personal use or
benefit.
(c) “Lienholder” means any lienholder  of abandoned personal property, if the lien is of record
or the lienholder is actually known to the landlord.
(d) “Of record” means:
(A) For a manufactured  dwelling, that a security interest has been properly recorded in the re-
cords  of  the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes pursuant to ORS
446.611 or on a certificate of title issued  by the Department of Transportation prior to May 1, 2005.
(B) For a floating home, that  a security interest has been properly recorded with the State
Marine Board pursuant to ORS 830.740 to 830.755 for a home registered  and titled with the board
pursuant to ORS 830.715.
(e) “Personal property” means only a manufactured dwelling or floating home located in a fa-
cility and subject to ORS 90.505 to 90.850. “Personal property” does  not include goods left inside a
manufactured dwelling or floating home or left upon a rented space and subject to disposition under
ORS 90.425.
(2) A  landlord is responsible for abandoned personal property and shall store, sell or dispose of
abandoned personal property as provided by this section. This section governs  the rights and obli-
[17]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
gations of landlords, tenants and any lienholders in any personal  property abandoned or left upon
the premises by the tenant or any lienholder in the following circumstances:
(a) The tenancy has ended by termination or expiration of a rental agreement  or by
relinquishment or abandonment of  the premises and the landlord reasonably believes under all the
circumstances that the tenant has left the personal property upon the  premises with no intention
of asserting any further claim to the premises or to the personal property;
(b) The tenant has been absent from the premises continuously  for seven days after termination
of a tenancy by a court order that has not been executed; or
(c) The landlord receives possession of the premises from the sheriff following  restitution pur-
suant to ORS 105.161.
(3) Prior  to storing, selling or disposing of the tenant’s personal property under this section, the
landlord must give a written notice to the tenant that must be:
(a) Personally delivered to the tenant; or
(b) Sent by first class mail addressed and mailed to the tenant at:
(A) The premises;
(B) Any post-office box held by the tenant and actually known to the landlord; and
(C) The most recent forwarding address  if provided by the tenant or actually known to the
landlord.
(4)(a) A landlord shall also give  a copy of the notice described in subsection (3) of this section
to:
(A) Any lienholder of the personal property;
(B) The tax collector of the county where the personal property is located; and
(C) The assessor of the county where the personal property is located.
(b) The landlord shall give the notice copy required by this subsection by personal delivery or
first class mail, except that for any lienholder, mail service must be both by first class mail and  by
certified mail with return receipt requested.
(c) A notice to lienholders under paragraph (a)(A) of this  subsection must be sent to each
lienholder at each address:
(A) Actually known to the landlord;
(B) Of record; and
(C) Provided to the landlord by the lienholder in a written notice that  identifies the personal
property subject to the lien and that was sent  to the landlord by certified mail with return receipt
requested within the preceding five years. The notice  must identify the personal property by de-
scribing the physical address of the property.
(5) The notice required under subsection (3) of this section must state that:
(a) The personal property left upon the premises is considered abandoned;
(b) The tenant or any lienholder must contact the  landlord by a specified date, as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, to arrange for the removal of the abandoned personal property;
(c) The personal property is stored on the rented space;
(d) The tenant or any  lienholder, except as provided by subsection (19) of this section, may ar-
range for removal of the personal property by  contacting the landlord at a described telephone
number or address on or before the specified date;
(e) The landlord shall make the personal property available for removal by the tenant  or any
lienholder, except as provided by subsection (19) of this section,  by appointment at reasonable times;
(f) If the personal property is  considered to be abandoned pursuant to subsection (2)(a) or (b)
[18]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of this section,  the landlord may require payment of storage charges, as provided by subsection (7)(b)
of this section, prior to releasing the personal property to the tenant or any lienholder;
(g) If the personal property is considered to be abandoned pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of  this
section, the landlord may not require payment of storage charges prior to releasing  the personal
property;
(h) If the tenant or any  lienholder fails to contact the landlord by the specified date or fails to
remove the personal property within 30 days after that contact, the landlord may sell  or dispose of
the personal property.  If the landlord reasonably believes the county assessor will determine that
the current market value  of the personal property is $8,000 or less, and the landlord intends to
dispose of  the property if the property is not claimed, the notice shall state that belief and intent;
and
(i) If applicable, there is a lienholder that has a right to claim the personal property, except as
provided by subsection (19) of this section.
(6) For purposes of subsection (5) of this section, the specified date by which a tenant or
lienholder must contact a landlord to arrange for the disposition of abandoned personal  property
must be not less than 45 days after personal delivery or mailing of the notice.
(7) After notifying the tenant as required by subsection (3) of this section, the landlord:
(a) Shall store the abandoned personal property of the tenant on the rented space and shall ex-
ercise reasonable care for the personal property; and
(b) Is entitled to reasonable  or actual storage charges and costs incidental to storage or dis-
posal. The storage charge may  be no greater than the monthly space rent last payable by the tenant.
(8) If a tenant or lienholder, upon the receipt of the notice provided by  subsection (3) or (4) of
this section or otherwise, responds by actual  notice to the landlord on or before the specified date
in the landlord’s notice that the tenant or  lienholder intends to remove the personal property from
the premises, the landlord must make that personal property available for removal  by the tenant or
lienholder by appointment at reasonable times during the 30 days  following the date of the response,
subject to subsection (19) of this section. If the personal property is considered to  be abandoned
pursuant to subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this  section, but not pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this sec-
tion, the landlord may require payment of  storage charges, as provided in subsection (7)(b) of this
section, prior to allowing the tenant or lienholder to remove the  personal property. Acceptance by
a landlord of such payment does not operate to create or reinstate a  tenancy or create a waiver
pursuant to ORS 90.412 or 90.417.
(9) Except as provided in subsections  (19) to (21) of this section, if the tenant or lienholder does
not respond within the time provided by the landlord’s notice,  or the tenant or lienholder does not
remove the personal property  within 30 days after responding to the landlord or by any date agreed
to with the landlord, whichever is later, the personal property is conclusively presumed  to be
abandoned. The tenant and any  lienholder that have been given notice pursuant to subsection (3)
or (4) of this section shall, except with regard  to the distribution of sale proceeds pursuant to sub-
section (13) of this section, have no further right, title  or interest to the personal property and may
not claim or sell the property.
(10) If the personal  property is presumed to be abandoned under subsection (9) of this section,
the landlord then may:
(a) Sell the personal property at a public or private sale, provided that prior to the sale:
(A) The landlord may seek to transfer ownership of record  of the personal property by comply-
ing with the requirements of the appropriate state agency; and
[19]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The landlord shall:
(i) Place a notice  in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the personal
property is located. The notice shall state:
(I) That the personal property is abandoned;
(II) The tenant’s name;
(III) The address and any  space number where the personal property is located, and any plate,
registration or other identification number for a floating home noted on the title, if actually  known
to the landlord;
(IV) Whether the sale is by private bidding or public auction;
(V) Whether the landlord is accepting sealed bids and, if so, the last date  on which bids will be
accepted;  and
(VI) The name and telephone number of the person to contact to inspect the personal  property;
(ii) At a reasonable  time prior to the sale, give a copy of the notice required by sub-
subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph to the tenant and to any  lienholder, by personal delivery or
first class mail, except that for any lienholder, mail service must be by first class  mail with certif-
icate of mailing;
(iii) Obtain an affidavit of publication from  the newspaper to show that the notice required un-
der sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph ran in the newspaper at least one day in each of  two
consecutive weeks prior to the date scheduled for the sale or the last date bids will be accepted;
and
(iv) Obtain  written proof from the county that all property taxes and assessments on the per-
sonal property have been paid or, if not paid, that the  county has authorized the sale, with the sale
proceeds to be distributed pursuant to subsection (13) of this section; or
(b) Destroy or otherwise dispose of the personal property  if the landlord determines from the
county assessor that the current market value of the property is $8,000 or less.
(11)(a) A public or private sale authorized by this section must be conducted consistent  with the
terms listed in subsection (10)(a)(B)(i) of this  section. Every aspect of the sale including the method,
manner, time, place and terms must be commercially reasonable.
(b) If there is no buyer  at a sale described under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the personal
property is considered to be worth $8,000 or less, regardless of current market value, and the  land-
lord shall destroy or otherwise dispose of the personal property.
(12) Notwithstanding  ORS 446.155 (1) and (2), unless a landlord intentionally misrepresents the
condition of personal property, the landlord is  not liable for the condition of the personal property
to:
(a) A buyer of the personal property at a sale pursuant to subsection (10)(a)  of this section, with
or without consideration; or
(b) A  person or nonprofit organization to whom the landlord gives the personal property pursu-
ant to subsection (1)(b), (10)(b) or (11)(b) of this section.
(13)(a) The landlord may deduct from the proceeds of the sale:
(A) The reasonable or actual cost of notice, storage and sale; and
(B) Unpaid rent.
(b) After deducting the amounts listed in paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the landlord shall
remit the remaining proceeds, if any, to the county tax collector to the extent of  any unpaid prop-
erty taxes and assessments owed on the dwelling or home.
(c) After deducting the amounts listed in paragraphs (a) and  (b) of this subsection, if applicable,
[20]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the landlord shall remit the remaining proceeds,  if any, to any lienholder to the extent of any unpaid
balance owed on the lien on the personal property.
(d) After deducting the amounts  listed in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection, if appli-
cable, the landlord shall remit to the tenant the remaining proceeds,  if any, together with an item-
ized accounting.
(e) If the tenant cannot after due diligence be found, the landlord shall deposit the remaining
proceeds with the county treasurer of the  county in which the sale occurred. If not claimed within
three years, the deposited proceeds revert to the general  fund of the county and are available for
general purposes.
(14) The county tax collector and the  Department of Revenue shall cancel all unpaid property
taxes and special assessments as provided under ORS 305.155 and  311.790 only under one of the
following circumstances:
(a) The landlord disposes of the personal property after  a determination described in subsection
(10)(b) of this section.
(b) There is no buyer of the personal property  at a sale described under subsection (11) of this
section and the landlord disposes of the property.
(c)(A) There is a buyer of the personal property at a sale described under subsection (11) of this
section;
(B) The current market value of the personal property is $8,000 or less; and
(C) The proceeds of the sale are insufficient to satisfy the unpaid property taxes and assessments
owed on the personal property after distribution of the proceeds pursuant to subsection  (13) of this
section.
(d) The  landlord buys the personal property at a sale described under subsection (11) of this
section and sells the property, in compliance with subsection (15) of  this section, to a buyer who
intends to occupy the property in the facility in which the property is located.
(e) The landlord  acquires the personal property as a result of an agreement described in sub-
section (23) of this section and  sells the property, in compliance with subsection (15) of this section,
to a buyer who intends to occupy the property in the facility in which the property is located.
(15)(a) Subsection (14)(d) and (e) of this section apply only if:
(A) There exists a  lien on the personal property for unpaid property taxes and special assess-
ments owed to a county or to the Department of Revenue and the landlord files  an affidavit or
declaration  with  the county tax collector or the Department of Revenue, as appropriate, that states:
(i) The landlord’s intent to  sell the property in an arm’s-length transaction to an unrelated buyer
who intends to occupy the property in the facility in which the property is located; and
(ii) That the landlord shall comply with the requirements of this subsection; and
(B) Following the sale described in paragraph (a)(A) of this  subsection, the landlord files an af-
fidavit or  declaration with the county tax collector or the Department of Revenue, as appropriate,
that states:
(i) That the landlord has sold the property in an arm’s-length  transaction to an unrelated buyer
who intends to occupy the property in the facility in which the property is located;
(ii) The sale price and a description of the landlord’s claims against  the property or costs from
the sale, as described under subsection (13)(a) of this section, and any costs of  improvements to the
property for sale; and
(iii) The period of time, which may not be more than is reasonably necessary, that  is taken by
the landlord to complete the sale of the property.
[21]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) After a landlord files the affidavit or declaration under paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection,
the county tax collector shall provide to the landlord a  title to the property that the landlord may
then provide to a buyer at the time of the sale of the property.
(c) The affidavit or declaration described in paragraph (a)(B)  of this subsection must be accom-
panied by:
(A) Payment to the county tax collector or the  Department of Revenue, as appropriate, of the
amount remaining from the sale proceeds after the deduction of the landlord’s claims  and costs as
described in the affidavit or declaration, up to the amount of the unpaid taxes or tax lien. The
landlord may retain the amount of the sale proceeds that exceed the amount of  the unpaid taxes or
tax lien;
(B) Payment to the county tax collector of any county warrant fees; and
(C) An affidavit or declaration from the buyer that states the buyer’s intent to occupy  the
property in the facility in which the property is located.
(d) Upon a showing of compliance with paragraph (c) of this  subsection, the county tax collector
or the Department of Revenue shall cancel all unpaid taxes or tax liens on the property.
(16) The  landlord is not responsible for any loss to the tenant or lienholder resulting from
storage of personal property in compliance with  this section unless the loss was caused by the
landlord’s deliberate or negligent act. In the event of  a deliberate and malicious violation, the
landlord is liable for twice the actual damages sustained by the tenant or lienholder.
(17) Complete compliance in good  faith with this section shall constitute a complete defense in
any action brought by a  tenant or lienholder against a landlord for loss or damage to such personal
property disposed of pursuant to this section.
(18) If a landlord does not comply with this section:
(a) The tenant is relieved of any liability  for damage to the premises caused by conduct that
was not deliberate, intentional or grossly negligent and for unpaid  rent and may recover from the
landlord up to twice the actual damages sustained by the tenant;
(b) A lienholder aggrieved by the noncompliance  may recover from the landlord the actual
damages sustained by the lienholder. ORS 90.255 does not authorize an  award of attorney fees to
the prevailing party in any action arising under this paragraph; and
(c) A county tax collector aggrieved by the noncompliance may  recover from the landlord the
actual damages sustained by the tax  collector, if the noncompliance is part of an effort by the
landlord to defraud the tax collector. ORS 90.255 does not authorize an award  of attorney fees to
the prevailing party in any action arising under this paragraph.
(19) The provisions of this section regarding the rights and responsibilities of a tenant  to the
abandoned personal property also apply to any lienholder, except that the lienholder  may not sell
or remove the dwelling or home unless:
(a) The lienholder has foreclosed the lien on the manufactured dwelling or floating home;
(b) The tenant or  a personal representative or designated person described in subsection (21)
of this section has waived all rights under  this section pursuant to subsection (23) of this section;
or
(c) The notice and response periods provided by subsections (6)  and (8) of this section have ex-
pired.
(20)(a) Except as provided by subsection (21)(d)  and (e) of this section, if a lienholder makes a
timely response to a notice of abandoned personal property pursuant to subsections (6) and  (8) of
this section and so requests, a landlord shall enter into a written  storage agreement with the
[22]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
lienholder providing that the personal property may not be sold or disposed of by  the landlord for
up to 12 months. A storage agreement  entitles the lienholder to store the personal property on the
previously rented space during the term of the agreement, but does not  entitle anyone to occupy the
personal property.
(b) The lienholder’s right to a storage  agreement arises upon the failure of the tenant or, in the
case of a  deceased tenant, the personal representative, designated person, heir or devisee to remove
or sell the dwelling or home within the allotted time.
(c) To  exercise the right to a storage agreement under this subsection, in addition to contacting
the landlord with a timely response as described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the lienholder
must enter into the proposed  storage agreement within 60 days after the landlord gives a copy of
the agreement to the lienholder. The landlord shall give a copy of  the proposed storage agreement
to the  lienholder in the same manner as provided by subsection (4)(b) of this section. The landlord
may include a copy of the  proposed storage agreement with the notice of abandoned property re-
quired by subsection (4) of this section. A lienholder enters into a storage agreement  by signing a
copy of the agreement provided by the landlord and personally  delivering or mailing the signed copy
to the landlord within the 60-day period.
(d) The storage agreement may require, in addition  to other provisions agreed to by the landlord
and the lienholder, that:
(A) The lienholder  make timely periodic payment of all storage charges, as described in sub-
section (7)(b) of this section,  accruing from the commencement of the 45-day period described in
subsection  (6) of this section. A storage charge may include a utility or service charge, as described
in ORS 90.532, if  limited to charges for electricity, water, sewer service and natural gas and if in-
cidental to the storage of personal property. A storage charge  may not be due more frequently than
monthly;
(B) The  lienholder pay a late charge or fee for failure to pay a storage charge by the date re-
quired in the agreement, if  the amount of the late charge is no greater than for late charges imposed
on facility tenants;
(C) The lienholder maintain the personal property and the space on which  the personal property
is stored  in a manner consistent with the rights and obligations described in the rental agreement
that the landlord currently provides to tenants as required by ORS 90.510 (4); and
(D) The lienholder repair any defects in the physical condition of the  personal property that
existed prior  to the lienholder entering into the storage agreement, if the defects and necessary re-
pairs are reasonably described in the storage agreement and, for homes that were first  placed on
the space within the previous 24  months, the repairs are reasonably consistent with facility stan-
dards in effect at the time of placement. The lienholder shall  have 90 days after entering into the
storage  agreement  to make the repairs. Failure to make the repairs within the allotted time consti-
tutes a violation of the storage agreement and the landlord may terminate the agreement by giving
at least 14 days’ written notice to the lienholder stating facts sufficient to notify the  lienholder of
the reason for termination. Unless the lienholder corrects the violation within the notice  period, the
agreement terminates as provided  and the landlord may sell or dispose of the property without fur-
ther notice to the lienholder.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection  (7)(b) of this section, a landlord may increase the storage charge
if the increase is  part of a facility-wide rent increase for all facility tenants, the increase is no
greater than the increase for other tenants and the landlord gives the lienholder written notice
consistent with the requirements of ORS 90.600 (1).
[23]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) During the term of an agreement  described under this subsection, the lienholder has the right
to remove or sell the property, subject to the provisions of the lien. Selling the property includes a
sale to a purchaser who wishes to leave the property on the rented space and become a tenant,
subject to the provisions of ORS  90.680. The landlord may condition approval for occupancy of any
purchaser of the property upon payment of all unpaid storage charges and maintenance costs.
(g)(A) Except as provided in paragraph (d)(D) of this subsection, if  the lienholder violates the
storage agreement, the landlord may terminate the agreement by giving at  least 90 days’ written
notice to the lienholder  stating facts sufficient to notify the lienholder of the reason for the termi-
nation. Unless the lienholder corrects the violation within the  notice period, the agreement termi-
nates as provided and the landlord may  sell or dispose of the property without further notice to the
lienholder.
(B) After a landlord gives a termination notice  pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph
for failure of the lienholder to pay a storage  charge and the lienholder corrects the violation, if the
lienholder again violates the storage agreement by failing to pay a subsequent storage charge, the
landlord may terminate the  agreement by giving at least 30 days’ written notice to the lienholder
stating facts sufficient to notify the lienholder of the reason for termination. Unless the lienholder
corrects the violation within the notice period, the agreement terminates as  provided and the land-
lord may sell or dispose of the property without further notice to the lienholder.
(C) A lienholder may  terminate a storage agreement at any time upon at least 14 days’ written
notice  to  the landlord and may remove the property from the facility if the lienholder has paid all
storage charges and other charges as provided in the agreement.
(h) Upon the failure of a lienholder to enter into a storage agreement as provided by  this sub-
section or upon termination of  an agreement, unless the parties otherwise agree or the lienholder
has sold or  removed the property, the landlord may sell or dispose of the property pursuant to this
section without further notice to the lienholder.
(21) If the personal property is considered abandoned as a result of the death of a tenant  who
was the only tenant, this section applies, except as follows:
(a) The provisions  of this section regarding the rights and responsibilities of a tenant to the
abandoned personal  property shall apply to any personal representative named in a will or appointed
by a court to act for the deceased tenant or any person designated in writing by the tenant  to be
contacted by the landlord in the event of the tenant’s death.
(b) The notice required by subsection (3) of this section must be:
(A) Sent by first class mail to the deceased tenant at the premises; and
(B) Personally delivered or sent by first class mail  to any personal representative or designated
person if actually known to the landlord.
(c) The notice  described in subsection (5) of this section must refer to any personal represen-
tative or designated person, instead of the  deceased tenant, and must incorporate the provisions of
this subsection.
(d) If a personal representative,  designated person or other person entitled to possession of the
property, such as an heir or devisee, responds by actual notice to a landlord within the 45-day period
provided by subsection (6) of this section and so requests, the  landlord shall enter into a written
storage agreement with the representative or person providing that the personal property may  not
be sold or disposed of by the landlord for up to 90 days or until  conclusion of any probate pro-
ceedings, whichever is later. A storage agreement entitles the representative or  person to store the
personal property on the previously rented space during  the term of the agreement, but does not
[24]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
entitle anyone to occupy the personal property. If such an agreement is entered, the  landlord may
not enter a similar agreement with a lienholder pursuant to subsection (20)  of this section until the
agreement with the personal representative or designated person ends.
(e) If a personal representative or other person requests that a  landlord enter into a storage
agreement, subsection (20)(c) to (e) and (g)(C) of this section applies,  with the representative or
person having the rights and responsibilities of a lienholder with regard to the storage agreement.
(f) During the term of an agreement  described under paragraph (d) of this subsection, the rep-
resentative or person has the  right to remove or sell the property, including a sale to a purchaser
or a transfer to an heir or devisee where  the purchaser, heir or devisee wishes to leave the property
on the rented space and become a tenant, subject to the provisions of ORS 90.680. The landlord  also
may condition approval for occupancy of  any purchaser, heir or devisee of the property upon pay-
ment of all unpaid storage charges and maintenance costs.
(g) If the representative or person violates  the storage agreement, the landlord may terminate
the agreement by giving at least 30  days’ written notice to the representative or person stating facts
sufficient to notify the representative or person of the reason for  the termination. Unless the rep-
resentative or person corrects the violation  within the notice period, the agreement terminates as
provided and the landlord may sell or dispose of the  property without further notice to the repre-
sentative or person.
(h) Upon the failure of a representative or person to enter into a storage agreement as  provided
by this subsection or upon termination of an agreement, unless the  parties otherwise agree or the
representative or person has sold or removed the property, the landlord may sell or dispose  of the
property pursuant to this section without further notice to the representative or person.
(22) If a governmental agency determines that the condition of personal property  abandoned
under this section constitutes an extreme health or safety hazard under state or local  law and the
agency determines that the hazard endangers others in the facility and requires quick  removal of
the property, the landlord may sell or dispose of the property pursuant to this  subsection. The
landlord shall comply with all provisions of this section, except as follows:
(a) The date provided in subsection (6) of this section by which a tenant, lienholder,  personal
representative or designated person must contact a landlord to  arrange for the disposition of the
property must be not less than 15 days after personal delivery or mailing  of the notice required by
subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The date provided in subsections (8) and  (9) of this section by which a tenant, lienholder,
personal representative or designated person must remove  the property must be not less than seven
days after the tenant, lienholder,  personal representative or designated person contacts the landlord.
(c) The notice  required by subsection (3) of this section must be as provided in subsection (5)
of this section, except that:
(A) The dates and deadlines in the notice for contacting the landlord and removing the  property
must be consistent with this subsection;
(B) The notice must state  that a governmental agency has determined that the property consti-
tutes an extreme health or safety hazard and must be removed quickly; and
(C) The landlord shall attach a copy of the agency’s determination to the notice.
(d) If the tenant, a lienholder or a personal representative  or designated person does not remove
the property  within the time allowed, the landlord or a buyer at a sale by the landlord under sub-
section (11) of this section shall promptly remove the property from the facility.
(e) A landlord is not required to enter into a storage agreement with  a lienholder, personal
[25]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
representative or designated person pursuant to subsection (20) of this section.
(23)(a) A landlord may sell or  dispose of a tenant’s abandoned personal property without com-
plying with the provisions of this section if, after  termination of the tenancy or no more than seven
days prior to the termination of the tenancy, the following parties so  agree in a writing entered into
in good faith:
(A) The landlord;
(B) The tenant, or  for an abandonment as the result of the death of a tenant who was the only
tenant, the personal representative, designated person or other  person entitled to possession of the
personal property, such as an heir or devisee, as described in subsection (21) of this section; and
(C) Any lienholder.
(b) A landlord may not, as part of a rental agreement, as a condition to approving a sale  of
property on rented space under ORS 90.680 or in any other  manner, require a tenant, a personal
representative, a designated person or any lienholder to waive any right provided by this section.
(24) Until personal property is conclusively presumed to be abandoned under  subsection (9) of
this section, a landlord does  not have a lien pursuant to ORS 87.152 for storing the personal prop-
erty.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 114.545 is amended to read:
114.545. (1) The affiant:
(a) Shall take control of the property of the estate coming into the possession of the affiant.
(b) Within 30 days after filing the affidavit shall mail, deliver or cause to be  recorded each in-
strument which the affidavit states will be mailed, delivered or recorded.
(c) May open one or more deposit accounts in a financial  institution as defined in ORS 706.008
with funds of the decedent, upon which the affiant may withdraw funds by means  of checks, drafts
or negotiable orders of withdrawal or otherwise for the payment of  claims and expenses described
in paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(d) From and to the extent of  the property of the estate, shall pay or reimburse any person who
has paid:
(A) Expenses described in ORS 115.125 (1)(b) and (c) and listed in the affidavit;
(B) Claims listed in the affidavit as undisputed;
(C) Allowed claims presented to the affiant within the time permitted by ORS 114.540; and
(D) Claims which the probate court directs the affiant to pay.
(e) Shall pay claims and expenses  under paragraph (d) of this subsection in the order of priority
prescribed by ORS 115.125.
(f) May transfer or sell any vehicle that is part of the estate before the completion of  the period
established under ORS 114.555 if the affiant complies with the requirements established by  the De-
partment of Transportation for such purposes under ORS 803.094.
(g) May convey any real or personal  property that is part of the estate before the completion
of the period established under ORS 114.555, provided  that each heir or devisee succeeding to the
interest conveyed joins in the conveyance and that any proceeds of sale, net of the reasonable  ex-
penses of sale and any debt secured as  of the date of the decedent’s death by a duly perfected lien
on the property, shall become a  part of the estate subject to ORS 114.505 to 114.560. If the property
is a manufactured  structure as defined in ORS 446.561, the affiant must assign interest in the
structure as provided in ORS 446.616.  Any conveyance to a purchaser in good faith and for a valu-
able consideration made by the affiant and the heir or devisee succeeding to the interest conveyed,
or made by the heir or devisee succeeding to the interest conveyed  after completion of the period
[26]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
established under ORS 114.555, conveys the interest stated in the conveyance free of any interest
of the claiming successors, and the purchaser has no duty with respect to application of  the con-
sideration paid for the conveyance.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of this section, when an heir or devisee entitled to
succeed to a conveyance  fails or refuses to join in the conveyance as required by subsection (1)(g)
of this section, an affiant  approved under ORS 114.517 may convey any real or personal property
that is part of the estate at any time to a third party for a valuable consideration.
(3) Property  conveyed by an affiant under this section is subject to liens and encumbrances
against the decedent or the estate of the decedent but is not subject to rights of creditors of  the
decedent or liens or encumbrances against the heirs or devisees  of the decedent. The filing and al-
lowance of a claim in a proceeding under ORS 114.505 to 114.560 does  not make the claimant a se-
cured creditor.
(4) Any claiming successor to whom payment, delivery or transfer is made  under ORS 114.505
to 114.560 as a person entitled thereto as disclosed in the affidavit is personally  answerable and
accountable:
(a) To the extent of the value of the property received, to  creditors of the estate to the extent
such creditors are entitled to payment under subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) To any personal representative of the estate of the decedent thereafter appointed.
(5) After the expiration of the period  established in subsection (1)(b) of this section, the affiant
shall cause to be recorded in the deed records of any county in which real  property belonging to
the decedent is situated an affiant or claiming successor’s deed  conveying the property to persons
entitled to the property, executed in the manner required by ORS chapter 93.
(6) For a manufactured structure as defined in ORS 446.561 belonging to a decedent and assessed
as personal property,  the affiant shall file with the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes  the necessary information for recording the successor’s interest in the
manufactured structure on an ownership document.
(7) A financial institution as defined in ORS 706.008 that  opens one or more deposit accounts for
an affiant pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of  this section is not liable to any other person for opening
the account or accounts or for permitting the affiant to withdraw funds from the account  or ac-
counts by means of checks, drafts, negotiable orders of withdrawal or otherwise.  The financial in-
stitution is not  required to ensure that the funds of the decedent that are paid out by the affiant
are properly applied.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 183.457 is amended to read:
183.457. (1)  Notwithstanding ORS 8.690, 9.160 and 9.320, and unless otherwise authorized by an-
other law, a person participating  in a contested case hearing conducted by an agency described in
this subsection may be represented by an attorney or by an authorized representative subject to the
provisions of subsection (2) of this section. The Attorney General  shall prepare model rules for
proceedings with lay representation that do not have the effect  of precluding lay representation.
No rule adopted by a state agency shall have the effect of precluding lay  representation. The
agencies before which an authorized representative may appear are:
(a) The State Landscape Contractors Board in the administration of the Landscape Contractors
Law.
(b) The State Department of Energy and the Energy Facility Siting Council.
(c) The Environmental Quality Commission and the Department of Environmental Quality.
(d) The Department of  Consumer and Business Services for proceedings in which an insured
[27]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
appears pursuant to ORS 737.505.
(e) The Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes and any other agency
for the purpose of proceedings to enforce the state building code, as defined by ORS 455.010.
(f) The State Fire Marshal in the Department of State Police.
(g) The Department of State  Lands for proceedings regarding the issuance or denial of fill or
removal permits under ORS 196.800 to 196.825.
(h) The Public Utility Commission.
(i) The Water Resources Commission and the Water Resources Department.
(j) The Land Conservation and Development Commission and the Department of Land Conser-
vation and Development.
(k) The State Department of Agriculture, for purposes of hearings under ORS 215.705.
(L) The Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(2) A person participating in a contested  case hearing as provided in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion may appear by an authorized representative if:
(a) The agency conducting the contested case hearing has determined that appearance  of such
a person by an authorized representative will not hinder the orderly and timely development of the
record in the type of contested case hearing being conducted;
(b) The agency conducting  the contested case hearing allows, by rule, authorized representatives
to appear on behalf of such participants in the type of contested case  hearing being conducted; and
(c) The officer presiding at the contested case hearing may exercise discretion  to limit an au-
thorized representative’s presentation of evidence, examination and cross-examination of  witnesses,
or presentation of factual arguments to ensure the orderly and timely development of  the hearing
record,  and  shall not allow an authorized representative to present legal arguments except to the
extent authorized under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The officer presiding at a contested case hearing in which an  authorized representative ap-
pears under  the provisions of this section may allow the authorized representative to present evi-
dence, examine and cross-examine witnesses, and make arguments relating to the:
(a) Application of statutes and rules to the facts in the contested case;
(b) Actions taken by the agency in the past in similar situations;
(c) Literal meaning of the statutes or rules at issue in the contested case;
(d) Admissibility of evidence; and
(e) Proper procedures to be used in the contested case hearing.
(4) Upon judicial review, no limitation imposed by  an agency presiding officer on the partic-
ipation of an authorized representative shall  be the basis for reversal or remand of agency action
unless the limitation resulted in substantial prejudice to a person entitled  to judicial review of the
agency action.
(5) For the purposes of this section, “authorized representative”  means a member of a partic-
ipating partnership, an authorized officer or regular  employee of a participating corporation, asso-
ciation or organized group, or an authorized officer or  employee of a participating governmental
authority other than a state agency.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 183.530 is amended to read:
183.530. A housing cost impact statement shall be prepared upon the proposal for  adoption or
repeal of any rule or any amendment to an existing rule by:
(1) The Oregon Housing Stability Council;
(2) [A building codes division of ] The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
[28]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Codes or any board associated with the department with regard to rules  adopted under ORS 455.610
to 455.630;
(3) The Land Conservation and Development Commission;
(4) The Environmental Quality Commission;
(5) The Construction Contractors Board;
(6) The Occupational Safety and Health Division of the Department of Consumer  and Business
Services; or
(7) The State Department of Energy.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 215.236 is amended to read:
215.236. (1) As  used in this section, “dwelling” means a single-family residential dwelling not
provided in conjunction with farm use.
(2) The governing body or its designee may not grant final approval of an application made  un-
der ORS 215.213 (3) or 215.284 (1), (2), (3), (4) or (7) for  the establishment of a dwelling on a lot or
parcel in an exclusive farm use zone that is, or has been, receiving  special assessment without evi-
dence that the lot or parcel upon which the  dwelling is proposed has been disqualified for special
assessment at value for farm use under ORS 308A.050 to 308A.128  or other special assessment under
ORS 308A.315, 321.257 to 321.390, 321.700  to 321.754 or 321.805 to 321.855 and any additional tax
imposed as the result of disqualification has been paid.
(3) The governing body or its designee may grant tentative approval of  an application made
under ORS 215.213 (3) or 215.284 (1), (2), (3), (4) or (7) for the establishment of a dwelling on a lot
or parcel in an exclusive farm use zone that  is specially assessed at value for farm use under ORS
308A.050 to 308A.128 upon making the findings required  by ORS 215.213 (3) or 215.284 (1), (2), (3),
(4) or (7). An application for  the establishment of a dwelling that has been tentatively approved shall
be given final approval by the governing  body or its designee upon receipt of evidence that the lot
or parcel upon which establishment of  the dwelling is proposed has been disqualified for special
assessment at value for farm use under ORS 308A.050 to 308A.128  or other special assessment under
ORS 308A.315, 321.257 to 321.390, 321.700 to 321.754 or 321.805 to  321.855 and any additional tax
imposed as the result of disqualification has been paid.
(4) The owner of a lot or parcel upon which  the establishment of a dwelling has been tentatively
approved as provided by subsection (3) of this section shall, before final approval, simultaneously:
(a) Notify the county assessor that the lot or parcel is no longer being used  as farmland or for
other specially assessed uses described in subsection (2) or (3) of this section;
(b) Request that the county assessor disqualify the lot  or parcel from special assessment under
ORS 308A.050 to 308A.128, 308A.315, 321.257 to 321.390, 321.700 to 321.754 or 321.805  to 321.855; and
(c) Pay any additional tax imposed upon disqualification from special assessment.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a lot or parcel that has  been disqualified
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section may not requalify for special  assessment unless, when
combined with another contiguous lot or parcel, it constitutes a qualifying parcel.
(6)(a) A lot or parcel that has been disqualified pursuant to  subsection (4) of this section may
requalify for  wildlife habitat special assessment under ORS 308A.403 to 308A.430 or conservation
easement special assessment under  ORS 308A.450 to 308A.465 without satisfying the requirements
of subsection (5) of this section.
(b) Upon disqualification from wildlife habitat special assessment under ORS 308A.430 or dis-
qualification from conservation easement special assessment under ORS  308A.465, the lot or parcel
shall be subject to the requirements of subsection (5) of this section.
[29]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) When the owner of a lot or parcel upon  which the establishment of a dwelling has been
tentatively approved notifies the county assessor that  the lot or parcel is no longer being used as
farmland and requests  disqualification of the lot or parcel for special assessment at value for farm
use, the county assessor shall:
(a) Disqualify the lot or parcel for special assessment at value for farm use under ORS 308A.050
to 308A.128 or other special assessment by removing the special assessment;
(b) Provide the owner of the lot or parcel with written notice of the disqualification; and
(c) Impose the additional tax, if any, provided by statute upon disqualification.
(8) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, a building official, as
defined in ORS 455.715 (1), or any other agency or  official responsible for the administration and
enforcement of the state building code, as defined in ORS 455.010, may not issue a  building permit
for the construction of a  dwelling on a lot or parcel in an exclusive farm use zone without evidence
that the owner of the lot or parcel upon which the dwelling is proposed to be constructed has paid
the additional tax, if any, imposed by the county assessor under subsection (7)(c) of this section.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 244.050 is amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or  before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission a verified statement of economic interest as required  under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner  of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal judges,  except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives.
(g) The president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public  uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
[30]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Office of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(EE) Administrator of the Office for Oregon Health Policy and Research.
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) Public defense services executive director.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(UU) Director of the Department of Building Codes.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs  the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan service  district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial  officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards and commissions:
[31]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Board of Geologic and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to 777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of the  board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the board of directors of an authority created under ORS  465.600 to
465.621.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a board or commission listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file  with the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics  Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070
and 244.090.
[32]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) By April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate  described
in subsection  (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Within 30 days after the filing deadline for  the general election, each candidate described in
subsection (1) of this section who was not a  candidate in the preceding primary election, or who
was nominated for public office described  in subsection (1) of this section at the preceding primary
election by write-in votes, shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest  as re-
quired under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (4) of this section apply only to persons who  are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April  15. Subsections
(1) to (4) of this section also apply to persons who do  not become candidates until 30 days after the
filing deadline for the statewide general election.
(6) If a  statement required to be filed under this section has not been received by the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement  is due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply with  the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set by  the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 24.  ORS 244.050, as amended by section 10,  chapter 88, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file  with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission  a verified statement of economic interest as required under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor,  Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal judges,  except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
Legislative Policy and Research Director, the Secretary of the Senate  and the Chief Clerk of the
House of Representatives.
(g) The president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public  uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
[33]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Office of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(EE) Administrator of the Office for Oregon Health Policy and Research.
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) Public defense services executive director.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(UU) Director of the Department of Building Codes.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs  the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan service  district and the auditor and
[34]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial  officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards and commissions:
(A) Board of Geologic and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to 777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of the  board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the board of directors of an authority created under ORS  465.600 to
[35]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
465.621.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a board or commission listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file  with the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics  Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate  described
in subsection  (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Within 30 days after the filing deadline for  the general election, each candidate described in
subsection (1) of this section who was not a  candidate in the preceding primary election, or who
was nominated for public office described  in subsection (1) of this section at the preceding primary
election by write-in votes, shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest  as re-
quired under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (4) of this section apply only to persons who  are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April  15. Subsections
(1) to (4) of this section also apply to persons who do  not become candidates until 30 days after the
filing deadline for the statewide general election.
(6) If a  statement required to be filed under this section has not been received by the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement  is due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply with  the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set by  the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 25.  ORS 279C.527 is amended to read:
279C.527. (1) As used in this section and in ORS 279C.528:
(a)(A) “Green energy technology” means a system that employs:
(i) Solar or geothermal energy directly for space or water heating or to generate electricity;  or
(ii) Building design that uses solar energy passively to reduce  energy use from other sources
by at least 20 percent from a  level required under ORS 276.900 to 276.915 or achieved in buildings
constructed according to state building code standards that the Department of  [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes approves under ORS 455.496.
(B) “Green energy technology” does not include a system that:
(i) Uses water, groundwater or the ground  as a heat source at temperatures less than 140 de-
grees Fahrenheit, or less than 128 degrees  Fahrenheit if the system is used for a public school
building; or
(ii) Incorporates solar energy indirectly into other methods for generating energy, such as  from
the action of waves on water, from hydroelectric facilities or from wind-powered turbines.
(b) “Public building” means a  building that a public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, owns or
controls, and that is:
(A) Used or occupied by employees of the public body; or
(B) Used for conducting public business.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section,  a contracting agency that intends to enter
into a public  improvement contract for constructing a public building or for reconstructing or per-
forming a major renovation of a public building, if the cost of the reconstruction or major renovation
exceeds 50 percent  of the value of the public building, shall first make a determination under sub-
section (3) of this section as to whether green energy technology  is appropriate for the public
[36]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
building and, if the  contracting agency determines that green energy technology is appropriate, shall
ensure that the public improvement contract provides an amount equal to at least 1.5 percent of  the
total contract price for the purpose of including  appropriate green energy technology as part of the
construction, reconstruction or major renovation of the public building.
(b) A public improvement contract to construct, reconstruct or renovate a public building may
provide for constructing green energy technology at a site that is  located away from the site of the
public building if:
(A) Constructing green energy technology away  from the site of the public building and using
the energy from the green energy technology at the site of the public  building is more cost-effective,
taking into account additional costs associated with transmitting generated energy to the  site of the
public building, than  is constructing and using green energy technology at the site of the public
building;
(B) The  green energy technology that is located away from the site of the public building is lo-
cated within this state and in the same county as, or in a county adjacent to, the site  of the public
building; and
(C) The public improvement contract provides that all of the moneys for constructing green en-
ergy technology away from the site of the public building must fund  new energy generating capacity
that does not  replace or constitute a purchase and use of energy generated from green energy
technology that:
(i) Employs solar  energy and that existed on the date that the original building permit for the
public building was issued; or
(ii) Employs geothermal energy and for which construction was completed before January 1,
2013.
(c) In evaluating whether a contracting agency can construct  green energy technology at a site
away from the site of the public building in accordance with paragraph (b)(A) of this subsection,  the
contracting agency shall:
(A) Compare the costs of constructing green energy technology that  employs solar energy at the
site of the public  building only with the corresponding costs of green energy technology that em-
ploys solar energy at a location away from the site of the public building; and
(B) Compare the costs of green  energy technology that employs geothermal energy at the site
of the public building  only with the corresponding costs of green energy technology that employs
geothermal energy at a location away from the site of the public building.
(3) In making  a determination as to whether green energy technology is appropriate in con-
structing, reconstructing or performing  a major renovation of a public building, a contracting
agency shall list in the determination the total contract price and specify the amount  the agency
intends to expend on including  green energy technology as part of the construction, reconstruction
or major  renovation. The State Department of Energy shall develop a form that a contracting
agency may use to prepare the written determination described in this subsection.
(4)(a) If the contracting agency determines that green energy  technology is not appropriate for
the public building, subsection (2) of this section does not apply to the public improvement contract.
A contracting agency’s  determination under this paragraph must consider whether constructing
green energy technology at the site of the public building is appropriate and  whether constructing
green energy  technology away from the site of the public building and in accordance with subsection
(2)(b) and (c) of this section is appropriate.
(b) If subsection (2) of this section does not apply to the public improvement contract:
[37]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The contracting agency shall spend an amount  equal to at least 1.5 percent of the total
contract price to include appropriate green energy technology as  part of a future public building
project; and
(B) The  amount the contracting agency spends on the future public building project in accord-
ance with subparagraph (A) of this paragraph is in addition to any  amount required under sub-
section (2) of this section for including appropriate green energy technology as part of the future
public building project.
(5)(a) A contracting agency need not set  aside the amount described in subsection (4)(b) in an
account or otherwise reserve moneys for a future public building at the time  the contracting agency
makes the determination described in subsection (3) of this section, but the contracting agency  shall
report  the  amount described in subsection (4)(b) to the State Department of Energy as provided in
ORS 279C.528 (2)(a).
(b) Subsection (4)(b) of this section does not apply to a public improvement contract for  which
state funds are not directly or indirectly used.
(6)(a) This section does not exempt an authorized state agency, as defined in ORS 276.905,  from
complying with ORS 276.900 to 276.915, except that an authorized state agency, without  complying
with ORS 276.900 to 276.915, may determine that green energy technology is appropriate to include
as part of constructing, reconstructing or performing a major renovation of a public building.
(b) A contracting agency may  not use an amount described in subsection (4)(b) of this section
to comply with requirements set forth in ORS 276.900 to 276.915 or with a state building  code
standard that the Department of [ Consumer and  Business Services ] Building Codes approves under
ORS 455.496.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 174.108 (3), this section applies to intergovernmental
entities described in ORS 174.108 (3).
SECTION 26.
 ORS 293.701 is amended to read:
293.701. As used in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Council” means the Oregon Investment Council.
(2) “Investment funds” means:
(a) Public Employees Retirement Fund referred to in ORS 238.660;
(b) Industrial Accident Fund referred to in ORS 656.632;
(c) Consumer and Business Services Fund referred to in ORS 705.145;
(d) Employment Department Special Administrative Fund referred to in ORS 657.822;
(e) Insurance Fund referred to in ORS 278.425;
(f) Funds under the control and administration of the Department of State Lands;
(g) Oregon Student Assistance Fund referred to in ORS 348.570;
(h) Moneys made available to the  Commission for the Blind under ORS 346.270 and 346.540 or
rules adopted thereunder;
(i) Forest  Development Revenue Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.147 and State Forestry
General Obligation Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.280;
(j) Oregon War Veterans’ Fund referred to in ORS 407.495;
(k) Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sinking Account referred to in ORS 407.515;
(L) World War II Veterans’ Compensation Fund;
(m) World War II Veterans’ Bond Sinking Fund;
(n) Funds in the hands of the State Treasurer that are not required to meet current demands
and that are invested in the Oregon Short Term Fund established under ORS 293.728  or in another
[38]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
commingled investment vehicle;
(o) State funds that are not subject to the control and administration of officers or  bodies spe-
cifically designated by law;
(p) Funds derived from the sale of state bonds;
(q) Social Security Revolving Account referred to in ORS 237.490;
(r) Public University Fund established by ORS 352.450;
(s) Local Government Employer Benefit Trust Fund referred to in ORS 657.513;
(t) Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund established by ORS 391.800;
(u) Education Stability Fund established by ORS 348.696;
(v) Deferred Compensation Fund established under ORS 243.411;
(w) Trust for Cultural Development Account established under ORS 359.405; [ and]
(x) The State Library Donation Fund and the Talking Book and  Braille Library Endowment
Fund subaccount established under ORS 357.195[ .]; and
(y) Department of Building Codes Fund established in section 5 of this 2017 Act.
(3) “Investment officer” means the State Treasurer in the capacity as investment  officer for the
council.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 308.310 is amended to read:
308.310. The Electrical and Elevator Board in  the Department of [ Consumer and Business Ser-
vices] Building Codes shall furnish any county assessor upon request a complete list of  those per-
sons who have been issued electrical permits in such county within  one year of the date of the
request, together with the location of the electrical  installations requested thereby. The board shall
have 30 days to prepare the list after the board has received the request.
SECTION 28.  ORS 311.280 is amended to read:
311.280. (1)  Any person desiring to pay taxes on any part of any real estate assessed as one
parcel or tract may  do so by applying to the county assessor or deputy county assessor. The county
assessor shall determine the relative or proportionate value such part bears to the  value of the
whole tract assessed, and shall file a  statement thereof with the tax collector, on which basis the
assessment shall be divided and taxes shall be collected accordingly.
(2) The assessor or tax collector  shall not divide an assessment under this section unless the
person calling for the division of assessment owns, or holds a mortgage or  other lien on that part
only of such area on which the person desires to pay  the taxes, and has filed with the assessor a
true copy of the deed, contract of sale, mortgage or other instrument evidencing the  interest in the
part; provided that whenever such instrument is otherwise recorded in the county records, such fil-
ing shall not be required.
(3) The assessor or tax collector shall not divide an assessment under this section  unless all ad
valorem taxes, fees and other charges required to be placed upon the tax roll that have  been certi-
fied for collection under ORS 311.105 and 311.110 and become a lien upon the entire parcel of
property have been paid. However, if the applicant for the division  is a public body, only the portion
of such taxes, fees and other charges  apportionable to the part of the real estate owned by the
public body, or on which the public body holds a mortgage or other lien, need be paid. As  used in
this subsection, “public body” means the United States, its agencies and instrumentalities, the state,
a county, city, school district, irrigation or drainage district, a port, a water district and all other
public or municipal corporations in the state exempt from tax under ORS 307.040 or 307.090.
(4) In the case of a parcel or tract of real estate which is being assessed under one of the special
assessment laws listed in ORS 308A.733 (2) or under ORS 358.480 to 358.545, the assessor  or tax
[39]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
collector shall not  divide the assessment unless the portion of any additional taxes or penalty
apportionable to the part of the property disqualified from special assessment is paid.
(5) In the case of property within the jurisdiction of  a city or county which has adopted minor
land partition regulations pursuant  to ORS 92.046, the assessor shall not divide an assessment unless
the person calling for the division of  assessment has filed with the assessor evidence that the divi-
sion has been approved as required by such regulations.
(6) Whenever a manufactured structure is assessed as  real property under ORS 308.875, and the
security interest holder of the manufactured structure is a person different  from the owner of the
parcel of land upon  which it is situated, the security interest holder may apply to the assessor for
a division of the value of the entire parcel between the value of the manufactured structure and the
value of the remainder of the parcel. Using this value division, the tax collector shall allocate the
taxes between the manufactured structure and the remainder of the parcel,  and the security interest
holder of the manufactured structure may pay the taxes on  the value attributable to the manufac-
tured structure and thereby free the manufactured structure from the lien  of those taxes. If a divi-
sion is made and taxes and special  assessments are paid on the value attributable to the
manufactured structure, the county  may reclassify the manufactured structure as personal property,
forward the ownership document application information to the Department  of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes and allow the structure to be moved as  provided in ORS 446.631
without payment of the taxes and special assessments attributable to the remainder of the parcel.
(7) If protest is filed to the division, the matter shall be  heard by the county commissioners or
the county court (as defined in ORS 306.005) at its next regular session for transaction of county
business, who shall make a final division of the assessment, and the tax collector  shall collect and
receipt for the taxes as so determined and ordered.
(8) No person shall  apply in any year under this section for a division of the assessment of a
subdivision made on  the assessment roll prepared as of January 1 of the year in which the subdivi-
sion is finally approved.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 311.512 is amended to read:
311.512. (1) Taxes on manufactured structures assessed as real property shall become due,  be-
come delinquent, and be collected at  the same time and in the same manner as taxes on other real
property.  Taxes  on manufactured structures assessed as personal property are subject to all the
provisions of law relating to the assessment, taxation and collection of personal property taxes.
(2) The seizure and sale for tax delinquency of a manufactured  structure assessed as personal
property must be conducted and carried out in the same manner as provided by law for the  seizure
and sale of other personal property for the collection of taxes due thereon, except as follows:
(a) If the records of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes indi-
cate that the person to whom the seized manufactured structure is assessed is not the security in-
terest holder, the tax collector,  before selling the manufactured structure, shall give notice of the
sale to any security interest holder by registered or  certified mail, addressed to the security interest
holder at the last-known address of the holder  as shown by the records of the Department of [ Con-
sumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, mailed not later than the 10th day before the sale.
(b) At any time before the sale, the person assessed or security  interest holder of the manufac-
tured structure to be sold may pay the tax collector the full amount  of the delinquent taxes, plus
any penalties and interest thereon, and costs incurred by the tax collector in seizing the  manufac-
tured structure and arranging  its sale. If this is done, the tax collector may not hold the sale and
shall return the manufactured structure to the person entitled to possession of the structure.
[40]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) If the amount  realized on the sale is in excess of the amount of taxes, interest, penalties and
costs due on the manufactured structure, the tax collector first  shall pay to the security interest
holder, according to the  records of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes, the amount of their interest to the extent there are sufficient moneys to do so, and shall  pay
any amount thereafter remaining to the owner of the manufactured structure.
SECTION 30.  ORS 311.675 is amended to read:
311.675. (1) In each county in which there is  tax-deferred property, the Department of Revenue
shall cause to be recorded in the mortgage records of the county a list of  tax-deferred properties
that lie in the  county. The list shall contain a description of the property as listed on the assessment
roll together with the name of the owner as listed on the assessment roll.
(2)(a) The recording of tax-deferred properties under subsection (1) of this  section is notice that
the Department of Revenue claims a lien against  those properties in the amount of the deferred
taxes plus interest on the deferred taxes, the  cost of insurance purchased pursuant to ORS 311.670
(4)(b) and any fees paid by the department  in connection with the filing, recording, release or sat-
isfaction of the lien.
(b) If the recording of tax-deferred  properties under subsection (1) of this section occurred prior
to January 1,  1990, the recording is notice that the department claims a lien against those properties
in the amount of the deferred taxes plus interest on the deferred  taxes, the cost of insurance pur-
chased pursuant to ORS 311.670 (4)(b) and any fees paid by the department in connection with  the
filing, recording, release or satisfaction of the  lien, whether or not the amount of taxes and interest
on the deferred taxes, the cost of  insurance purchased pursuant to ORS 311.670 (4)(b) or fees is
listed.
(3)(a) When  an ownership document is issued under ORS 446.566 to 446.646, or issuance of the
document is pending, for a tax-deferred  manufactured structure assessed as personal property under
ORS 308.875, the Department of Revenue shall file with the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes an application for notation of the deferred property tax lien as  a security
interest on behalf of the State of Oregon. The Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes shall note  the lien as a security interest in the same manner as other security in-
terests in manufactured structures. A lien noted as a security  interest in records maintained by the
Department of [ Consumer and Business  Services ] Building Codes pursuant to ORS 446.566 to 446.646
shall have the same legal effect as other security interests in manufactured structures.
(b) For any other tax-deferred homestead assessed as personal property, the  Department of Re-
venue may file notice of the deferred property tax lien as a security interest on behalf of  the State
of Oregon  with the office of the Secretary of State or with any other designated filing office pursu-
ant to ORS chapter 79.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 182.040 to 182.060  and 205.320 relating to the time
and manner of payment of  fees to the county clerk, the department shall not be required to pay any
filing, indexing or recording fees to the county in connection with  the filing, recording, release or
satisfaction of liens against tax-deferred properties of  that county in advance or at the time entry
is made.  The manner of payment of the fees shall be as provided in ORS 205.395 for the payment
of fees for filing, recording and making entry of warrants or orders in the County Clerk Lien Record.
(b) The Department  of Revenue shall pay filing fees for any application for notation of the de-
ferred property tax lien as a security interest in tax-deferred properties to the Department of  [ Con-
sumer and Business Services ] Building Codes as provided in ORS 446.646  or in rules adopted under
ORS 446.646.
[41]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) If the Department of Revenue files notice  of the deferred property tax lien as a security in-
terest on behalf  of the State of Oregon with the office of the Secretary of State or with any other
designated filing office under subsection (3) of this section, the  department shall pay filing fees to
the Secretary of State or to the other filing office pursuant to ORS chapter 79.
SECTION 31.  ORS 421.645 is amended to read:
421.645. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 195.025, 197.175, 197.180, 215.130 (4), 227.286, 455.148 or 455.150
or any other  provision of law, including but not limited to statutes, ordinances, regulations and
charter provisions, the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services, through  the
Building Codes Division ] Building Codes, shall exercise authority for the issuance of all permits
required under the state building  code for the construction and operation of the women’s
correctional facility and intake center complex approved under ORS 421.643.
(2) All other state agencies, including but not limited to the Department  of Environmental
Quality, shall issue such permits within the  authority of the agency as may be necessary for the
construction and operation of the complex.
(3) Within the authority of the city, county or political subdivision, each city, county and  poli-
tical subdivision shall issue the appropriate  permits, licenses and certificates not issued under sub-
sections (1) and (2) of this section, including all necessary construction permits  over public rights
of way, and enter into any intergovernmental agreements as may be necessary for  the construction
and operation of the complex.
(4) A state agency or local government that issues  a permit, license or certificate under sub-
sections (1) to (7) of this section shall continue to exercise enforcement authority over the  permit,
license or certificate.
(5) Except as  provided in ORS 421.649, nothing in ORS 421.635 to 421.657 expands or otherwise
alters the obligations of a city, county or political subdivision to pay  for infrastructure improve-
ments for the complex.
(6)(a) State agencies  and local governments shall issue any permit, license or certificate required
under subsections (1) to (3) of this section  within 60 days of receiving a completed application for
the permit, license or certificate from the Department of Corrections or  a person acting on behalf
of the department. A state agency or local government  may impose reasonable conditions on any
permit, license or certificate but may not deny the permit, license or certificate unless denial is  re-
quired under federal law.
(b) If a permit, license or certificate required under subsections (1) to (7) of this  section is not
issued within 60 days of receiving a  completed application, the Department of Corrections may file
a petition for a writ of  mandamus in the circuit court for the jurisdiction of the affected local gov-
ernment to compel issuance of the permit, license  or certificate. The writ shall issue unless the local
government can demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that  issuing the permit, license or
certificate would violate a substantive provision of the state  building code, exceed the local
government’s statutory authority or violate federal law.
(c) Proceedings on a petition for a writ of mandamus under this subsection shall comply with
the applicable provisions of ORS chapter 34.
(7) The issuance of  any permit, license or certificate under subsections (1) to (7) of this section
and any  construction or development undertaken pursuant to such permit, license or certificate shall
not be considered in support of or in opposition to an application for a land use decision under  ORS
chapter 197, 215 or 227.
(8) In accordance with the applicable provisions of ORS chapter  183 and notwithstanding ORS
[42]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
455.035, the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall
adopt such rules as the director determines necessary to implement the provisions of subsections (1)
to (7) of this section.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 443.760 is amended to read:
443.760. (1) Adult foster homes that  are certified as residential homes as defined in ORS 197.660
shall meet  all state and local building, sanitation, utility and fire code requirements applicable to
single family dwellings. However, by rule, the licensing agency may adopt more  stringent standards
upon a finding that there is a significant health or safety threat to residents that necessitates  a
standard not imposed on other single family dwellings.
(2) In adopting more stringent  standards, the licensing agency shall consult with the Department
of [ Consumer and  Business Services ] Building Codes and the office of the State Fire Marshal to
insure adequate evacuation of residents.
(3) As used in this section, “adequate evacuation” means the ability  of a provider to evacuate
all residents from the dwelling within three minutes.
(4) If a licensed provider rents or leases the premises where the adult foster home  is located,
the lessor shall charge a flat rate for the lease or rental.
SECTION 33.  ORS 446.003 is amended to read:
446.003. As used in ORS 446.003 to 446.200 and 446.225 to 446.285, and for the purposes of  ORS
chapters 195, 196,  197, 215 and 227, the following definitions apply, unless the context requires oth-
erwise, or unless administration and enforcement by the State of  Oregon under the existing or re-
vised National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act would be  adversely
affected, and except as provided in ORS 446.265:
(1) “Accessory building or  structure” means any portable, demountable or permanent structure
established for use of the occupant of the manufactured structure and as further defined by  rule by
the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(2)(a) “Alteration”  means any change, addition, repair, conversion, replacement, modification or
removal of any equipment or installation that may affect the operation, construction  or occupancy
of a manufactured structure.
(b) “Alteration” does not include:
(A) Minor repairs with approved component parts;
(B) Conversion of listed fuel-burning appliances in accordance with the terms of their listing;
(C) Adjustment and maintenance of equipment; or
(D) Replacement of equipment or accessories in kind.
(3) “Approved” means approved, licensed  or certified by the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes or its designee.
(4) “Board” means the Residential and Manufactured Structures Board.
(5) “Cabana” means a stationary, lightweight structure that may be prefabricated, or  demount-
able, with two or more walls, used adjacent to  and in conjunction with a manufactured structure to
provide additional living space.
(6) “Certification” means an evaluation process by which the department verifies  a
manufacturer’s ability to produce manufactured structures to the  department rules and to the de-
partment approved quality control manual.
(7) “Conversion” or “to convert” means the process of changing a manufactured structure in
whole or in part from one type of vehicle or structure to another.
(8) “Dealer” means any person engaged in the business of selling,  leasing or distributing manu-
[43]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
factured structures or equipment, or both, primarily to persons who in good faith  purchase or lease
manufactured structures or equipment, or both, for purposes other than resale.
(9) “Department” means the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(10) “Director” means the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business  Services ]
Building Codes.
(11) “Distributor” means any person engaged in selling  and distributing manufactured structures
or equipment for resale.
(12) “Equipment” means materials, appliances, subassembly, devices,  fixtures, fittings and
apparatuses used in the construction, plumbing, mechanical and electrical systems of a manufactured
structure.
(13) “Federal manufactured  housing construction and safety standard” means a standard for
construction, design and performance of a manufactured dwelling  promulgated by the Secretary of
Housing and Urban Development pursuant to the  federal National Manufactured Housing Con-
struction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-383).
(14) “Fire Marshal” means the State Fire Marshal.
(15) “Imminent safety hazard” means an imminent  and unreasonable risk of death or severe
personal injury.
(16) “Insignia of compliance” means:
(a) For a manufactured dwelling built to HUD standards for such dwellings, the HUD label; or
(b) For all other manufactured structures, the  insignia issued by this state indicating compliance
with state law.
(17) “Inspecting authority” or “inspector” means the Director  of the Department of [ Consumer
and Business Services ] Building Codes or representatives  as appointed or authorized to administer
and enforce provisions of ORS  446.111, 446.160, 446.176, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.310 to 446.350,
446.990 and this section.
(18) “Installation” in relation to:
(a) Construction means the  arrangements and methods of construction, fire and life safety,
electrical, plumbing and mechanical equipment and systems within a manufactured structure.
(b) Siting means the manufactured structure and cabana foundation support and tiedown,  the
structural, fire and life safety, electrical, plumbing and mechanical  equipment and material con-
nections and the installation of skirting and temporary steps.
(19) “Installer” means any individual licensed by the director to install, set up, connect, hook
up, block, tie down, secure, support,  install temporary steps for, install skirting for or make elec-
trical, plumbing or mechanical connections to manufactured dwellings  or cabanas or who provides
consultation or supervision for any of these activities,  except architects registered under ORS
671.010 to 671.220 or engineers registered under ORS 672.002 to 672.325.
(20) “Listed”  means equipment or materials included in a list, published by an organization
concerned with product evaluation acceptable  to the department that maintains periodic inspection
of production of listed equipment or materials, and whose listing states either that the  equipment
or materials meets appropriate standards or has been tested and  found suitable in a specified man-
ner.
(21) “Lot” means any space, area  or tract of land, or portion of a manufactured dwelling park,
mobile home park or recreation park that is  designated or used for occupancy by one manufactured
structure.
(22)(a) “Manufactured dwelling” means a residential trailer, mobile  home or manufactured home.
[44]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) “Manufactured dwelling” does not  include any building or structure constructed to conform
to the State of Oregon  Structural Specialty Code or the Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code adopted
pursuant to ORS [ 455.100 to 455.450 and 455.610 to 455.630 ] chapter 455 or any  unit identified as a
recreational vehicle by the manufacturer.
(23) “Manufactured dwelling park” means any place where four or more manufactured  dwellings
are located within 500 feet of one another on a lot, tract or parcel of land under the same owner-
ship, the primary purpose of which is to rent or lease space or keep space  for rent or lease to any
person for a charge or fee paid or to be paid for the rental or lease or use of  facilities or to offer
space free in connection  with securing the trade or patronage of such person. “Manufactured
dwelling park” does not include a lot or  lots located within a subdivision being rented or leased for
occupancy by no more than one manufactured  dwelling per lot if the subdivision was approved by
the local government unit having jurisdiction  under an ordinance adopted pursuant to ORS 92.010
to 92.192.
(24)(a) “Manufactured home,” except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, means a
structure constructed for movement on the public highways that has sleeping, cooking  and plumbing
facilities, that is intended for  human occupancy, that is being used for residential purposes and that
was constructed in accordance with federal manufactured housing construction  and safety standards
and regulations in effect at the time of construction.
(b) For purposes of implementing any contract pertaining to manufactured homes between  the
department and the federal government, “manufactured home” has the meaning  given the term in
the contract.
(25)(a) “Manufactured structure”  means a recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or recre-
ational structure.
(b) “Manufactured structure” does not include any  building or structure regulated under the
State of Oregon Structural Specialty Code or the Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code.
(26) “Manufacturer” means  any person engaged in manufacturing, building, rebuilding, altering,
converting or assembling manufactured structures or equipment.
(27) “Manufacturing” means the building, rebuilding, altering or converting of manufactured
structures that bear or are required to bear an Oregon insignia of compliance.
(28) “Minimum safety standards” means the plumbing,  mechanical, electrical, thermal, fire and
life safety, structural and transportation standards prescribed by rules adopted by the director.
(29) “Mobile home” means a structure constructed for movement on  the public highways that
has sleeping, cooking and plumbing facilities, that is intended for human occupancy, that is being
used for residential purposes and that was constructed between January 1, 1962,  and June 15, 1976,
and met the  construction requirements of Oregon mobile home law in effect at the time of con-
struction.
(30) “Mobile home  park” means any place where four or more manufactured structures are lo-
cated within 500 feet of one another on  a lot, tract or parcel of land under the same ownership, the
primary purpose of which is to rent space or keep space for rent to any person for a charge  or fee
paid or to be paid  for the rental or use of facilities or to offer space free in connection with securing
the trade or patronage of such person. “Mobile home park” does not include  a lot or lots located
within a subdivision being rented or leased for occupancy by no more  than one manufactured
dwelling per lot if the subdivision was approved by the municipality unit  having jurisdiction under
an ordinance adopted pursuant to ORS 92.010 to 92.192.
(31) “Municipality” means a city, county or other unit of local government otherwise authorized
[45]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by law to enact codes.
(32) “Recreational structure” means a campground structure with or  without plumbing, heating
or cooking facilities intended to be used by any particular occupant on a limited-time basis for rec-
reational,  seasonal,  emergency or transitional housing purposes and may include yurts, cabins, fabric
structures or similar structures as further defined, by rule, by the director.
(33) “Recreational vehicle” means a vehicle with or without  motive power, that is designed for
human occupancy and to be used temporarily for recreational, seasonal or emergency purposes  and
as further defined, by rule, by the director.
(34) “Residential trailer” means a structure constructed for movement on the public  highways
that has sleeping, cooking and plumbing facilities, that is intended  for human occupancy, that is
being used for residential purposes and that was constructed before January 1, 1962.
(35) “Sale” means rent, lease, sale or exchange.
(36) “Skirting” means a weather resistant material used to  enclose the space below the manu-
factured  structure.
(37) “Tiedown” means  any device designed to anchor a manufactured structure securely to the
ground.
(38) “Transitional housing accommodations” means  accommodations described under ORS
446.265.
(39) “Utilities” means the water, sewer, gas or electric  services provided on a lot for a manu-
factured structure.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 446.005 is amended to read:
446.005. As used in ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285 and 446.425, unless  the context
requires otherwise, or unless administration and enforcement by Oregon under the  existing or re-
vised National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act would be  adversely
affected, “issuing authority”  means with respect to mobile home or manufactured dwelling park
plans review and construction, the  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes.
SECTION 35.  ORS 446.062 is amended to read:
446.062. (1)(a) The Director of  the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes shall issue rules under  ORS chapter 183 to regulate mobile home or manufactured dwelling
parks. These rules shall conform to ORS 446.090 to 446.140.
(b) Any water system serving a mobile home or manufactured dwelling park is subject  to ORS
448.115 to 448.285 and the rules adopted pursuant thereto.
(2) Mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks are subject to  ORS 446.003, 446.055, 446.072 to
446.100, 446.140 and 446.271 and the state building code, as defined in ORS 455.010, and the  rules
adopted thereunder by the director under ORS chapter 183.
(3) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall review plans and
inspect construction  of mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks to ensure compliance with
subsection (2) of this section. The director shall adopt rules  under ORS chapter 183 to provide a
schedule for plan review fees and construction inspection fees.
(4) A person shall not construct a new mobile home or manufactured  dwelling park or add lots
to an existing mobile home or manufactured dwelling park without approval by the department.
(5) Installation of a submeter as  provided in ORS 90.537 to measure water consumption at a
space in an existing manufactured dwelling park is a minor plumbing  installation under ORS 447.076
and may be performed under a statewide permit and inspection system for minor  construction work
[46]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
established under ORS 455.155.
SECTION 36.  ORS 446.066 is amended to read:
446.066. The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may inspect every
mobile home or manufactured dwelling park in  order to determine whether it conforms with the
provisions of ORS 446.003 to 446.200 and 446.225 to 446.285 and the  rules adopted pursuant thereto.
Any person operating  such facilities shall at all reasonable times, upon request of the department,
permit access to all parts of the facilities.
SECTION 37.  ORS 446.072 is amended to read:
446.072. The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  shall make  sur-
veys necessary to assure uniform enforcement throughout the state with respect to mobile  home or
manufactured dwelling parks.
SECTION 38.  ORS 446.076 is amended to read:
446.076. All moneys received  by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes under ORS 446.003 to 446.200 and 446.225 to 446.285 shall  be paid into the [ Consumer and
Business Services Fund created by ORS 705.145 ] Department of Building Codes Fund . The moneys
received under this section are continuously appropriated to  the department for use as provided in
ORS 446.423.
SECTION 39.  ORS 446.095 is amended to read:
446.095. The owner or operator of a mobile home or manufactured dwelling park shall:
(1) Construct well-drained and hard-surfaced park streets  at least 20 feet in width, unobstructed
and open to traffic within  the mobile home or manufactured dwelling park. If the owner or operator
permits parking of motor  vehicles on the park streets, the owner or operator shall construct the
park streets at least 30 feet in width.
(2) Provide to each tenant an adequate supply of healthful water and  adequate electric power
and sewerage facilities. All plumbing shall be  installed in compliance with ORS 447.010 to 447.156
[and 447.992] and the  rules of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
adopted thereunder.
(3) Provide, except as specified in subsection (4)  of this section, a separate general play area
restricted to that use, if the  mobile home or manufactured dwelling park accommodates children
who are under 14  years of age. No separate play area shall be less than 2,500 square feet in area.
At least  100 square feet of play area shall be provided for each manufactured dwelling occupied by
children.
(4) Not be required to provide a separate play area  if the mobile home or manufactured dwelling
park was in existence before March 13, 1989, and rented spaces as an all adult park.
SECTION 40.
 ORS 446.100 is amended to read:
446.100. (1) A person may not:
(a) Construct a mobile home or manufactured dwelling park  at a place that is unsuitable due to
swampy terrain, lack of adequate drainage or proximity to the breeding places of insects or  rodents.
(b) Install a manufactured dwelling closer than five feet from a property boundary line.
(c) Construct in a mobile  home or manufactured dwelling park a manufactured dwelling space
less than 30 feet in width or less than 40 feet in length.
(2) The Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall
adopt rules pursuant to the rulemaking provisions of ORS chapter 183 specifying minimum  distances
between adjacent manufactured dwellings and  between manufactured dwellings and other structures.
In adopting  these rules, the director shall take into consideration the standards established by the
[47]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
National Fire Protection Association and standards recommended by the State Fire Marshal.
(3) Except as provided in this subsection, the rules  adopted by the director under subsection (2)
of this section must provide for at least 10 feet of space between  manufactured dwellings. The di-
rector may adopt a rule allowing less than 10 feet of  space between manufactured dwellings that
are separated by a one-hour fire-resistive wall. A standard established by  the director for a one-hour
fire-resistive wall separating manufactured dwellings must be  at least as stringent as the equivalent
standard, if any, for a fire-resistive wall in a two  family dwelling under the Low-Rise Residential
Dwelling Code.
SECTION 41.  ORS 446.105 is amended to read:
446.105. (1) The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
may issue a permit for the establishment  of a temporary mobile home or manufactured dwelling park
to a construction company, timber company, government entity or farm if:
(a) There is no available space in a  mobile home or manufactured dwelling park within a rea-
sonable distance; and
(b) A mobile home or manufactured  dwelling park is necessary for the proper housing of em-
ployees until the project is finished.
(2) Upon approval by the Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes and
the county or city planning commission, a permit  may be issued to a person to establish a temporary
mobile home or manufactured  dwelling park on the person’s own premises in areas having a critical
housing shortage due to large construction projects.  The permit shall expire upon completion of the
project.
SECTION 42.  ORS 446.155 is amended to read:
446.155. (1) A person may not sell or offer for sale  within this state a manufactured dwelling
manufactured after January 1, 1962, that contains:
(a) Plumbing equipment, unless such  equipment meets the requirements of the Department of
[Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes;
(b) Heating equipment, unless such equipment meets the requirements  of the State Fire Marshal;
or
(c) Electrical equipment, unless such equipment meets the requirements of the department.
(2) A person may not rent, lease, sell or offer for rent, lease or sale  within this state a manu-
factured  structure  manufactured after September 1, 1969, unless the manufactured structure bears
an insignia of compliance and contains:
(a) Plumbing, mechanical and electrical equipment or  installations that meet the minimum safety
standards of the department;
(b) Thermal, fire  and life safety equipment, material and installations that meet the minimum
safety standards of the department; or
(c) Structural and transportation  equipment, materials, installations and construction that meet
the minimum safety standards of the department.
(3) A person may not rent, lease, sell or offer for rent, lease  or sale within this state a recre-
ational vehicle unless the recreational vehicle:
(a) Bears an insignia of compliance;
(b) Has previously been lawfully registered and titled within the United States;
(c) Has previously been issued an ownership document under ORS 446.571 or recorded under
ORS 446.626; or
(d) Is exempt  from registration, title or ownership document requirements because of United
[48]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
States government ownership.
(4) Persons manufacturing, remanufacturing, converting, altering or  repairing manufactured
structures or equipment within  the state or for use within the state shall comply with all applicable
construction and safety rules of the department and the following:
(a) Alterations performed on a manufactured dwelling by the manufacturer or dealer  before or
at the  time of sale to the first consumer shall be performed in conformance with the National
Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act.
(b) After the initial sale to a  consumer by a manufacturer or dealer, all alterations to a manu-
factured dwelling, except as identified by the Director of the Department of  [Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes by rule, shall be in conformance with  the specialty codes as described in
ORS 455.010 [ to 455.740 and 479.855 ].
(c) Solid  fuel burning appliances shall be in conformance with the National Manufactured
Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act and standards adopted by the department.
(d) Notwithstanding  subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a previously owned manufactured
dwelling may be sold “as is” provided that the seller discloses  in the bill of sale that the manufac-
tured dwelling is being sold on an “as is” or “with all faults” basis, and that the entire risk as to
the quality and performance of the manufactured dwelling is  with the buyer. If the manufactured
dwelling is found to be defective after purchase, the  buyer shall assume the entire cost of all ser-
vicing and repair. The seller, manufacturer, distributor  or retailer is not responsible for any cost
for servicing and repair.
(5) Installations of manufactured structures shall be in conformance with  the standards adopted
by the department for site preparation, foundation support,  anchoring, structural and utility con-
nections, electrical and plumbing tests, underfloor enclosures, ventilation, vapor barriers and steps
used for access and egress.
SECTION 43.
 ORS 446.160 is amended to read:
446.160. (1) The  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  may cause
such inspections to be made, approve  plans and specifications, provide technical services, issue
insignia of compliance, collect fees provided by ORS 446.176 and,  in compliance with ORS chapter
183, promulgate and  enforce such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary to carry out its
duties and [ insure] ensure compliance  with those parts of ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285,
446.310 to 446.350 and 446.395 to 446.440 within the jurisdiction of the department.
(2) The Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall
adopt rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183 to [ insure] ensure  that manufacturers, distributors  and
dealers comply with the reporting requirements of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Ser-
vices] Building Codes of this state and the Secretary of Housing  and Urban Development as re-
quired by the National  Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974
(Public Law 93-383).
(3) The director is authorized to conduct such inspections and investigations  as may be neces-
sary to  administer and enforce any federal manufactured dwelling construction and safety standards
adopted under ORS 446.155 or the National Manufactured Housing  Construction and Safety Stan-
dards Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-383).  The director shall furnish to the Secretary of Housing and
Urban Development or a designee any information obtained indicating  noncompliance with such
standards for appropriate action.
(4) The director  or a designee is authorized to enter, at reasonable times and without advance
notice, any factory, warehouse or establishment in which a manufactured structure or equipment is
[49]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
manufactured, stored  or held for sale; and to inspect at reasonable times within reasonable limits
in a reasonable manner, any such  factory, warehouse or establishment, and to inspect such products,
books, papers, records and  documents [ which] that  are relevant to the manufacture of a manufac-
tured structure or equipment and the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or dealer’s compliance with ORS
446.155 and the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards  Act of 1974
(Public Law 93-383).
SECTION 44.
 ORS 446.170 is amended to read:
446.170. (1) Manufactured structures subject to the provisions of ORS 446.155 to 446.200,  and
manufactured structures upon which additions, conversions  or alterations of installations of equip-
ment or  material are made shall have affixed to the manufactured structures insignia of compliance.
(2) A person may not place an insignia of compliance on  a manufactured structure except as
provided by ORS 446.155 to 446.200 and the rules adopted under ORS 446.155 to 446.200.
(3) Insignia of compliance may be  issued in bulk only to manufacturers, remanufacturers or
converters  certified  and registered with the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes.
(4) Insignia of compliance are  not transferable, and the department may not make a refund
representing any unused insignia.
(5) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to  a recreational vehicle described in ORS
446.155 (3)(b) to (d).
SECTION 45.  ORS 446.176 is amended to read:
446.176. (1) The Director of the Department of [Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes, with the approval of  the Residential and Manufactured Structures Board, shall adopt regu-
lations under the provisions of ORS chapter 183  to provide a schedule for plan review fees, insignia
fees, inspection fees  and other necessary fees based on the estimated cost of administering ORS
446.003 to 446.200 and 446.225 to 446.285.
(2) Fees collected by the  Department  of Building Codes  pursuant to this section shall be de-
posited in the [ Consumer and  Business Services Fund established by ORS 705.145 ] Department of
Building Codes Fund . Moneys  deposited into the fund pursuant to this section are continuously
appropriated to the department for use as provided in ORS 446.423.
SECTION 46.  ORS 446.180 is amended to read:
446.180. (1) If the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and  Business Services ] Building
Codes determines that standards for construction, equipment and material  installed in manufactured
structures provided by the  statutes or rules and regulations of other states are at least equal to the
minimum safety standards  prescribed under ORS 446.155 to 446.200, and that such statutes, rules and
regulations are being enforced, the director may provide by rule that  manufactured structures ap-
proved by such other state shall be considered approved by the director.
(2) Mobile homes built between September 1, 1969,  and June 15, 1976, to the American National
Standards Institute Mobile Home Standards A119.1 and [ which] that  also bear an insignia of com-
pliance from the State of California, Idaho, Nevada or Washington shall be  considered to comply
with ORS 446.155 (2) provided no alterations have been made to the original structure.
SECTION 47.  ORS 446.185 is amended to read:
446.185. (1) In compliance with ORS chapter 183, rules  establishing minimum safety standards
and requirements shall be adopted  and enforced by the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes for manufactured structures and  manufactured structure instal-
lations as prescribed in ORS 446.155.
[50]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Minimum safety standards prescribed in ORS 446.155 to  446.200 shall be reasonably consist-
ent with nationally recognized  standards for construction of manufactured structures, and the man-
ufactured structures shall be designed to protect the health and safety of the people of this  state
from dangers inherent in the use of substandard and unsafe equipment, material and installations.
SECTION 48.  ORS 446.210 is amended to read:
446.210. (1) The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall issue a limited maintenance electrician’s license to a person who:
(a) Pays the applicable application fee required under ORS 479.840;
(b) Complies with  ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and the rules adopted under ORS 455.117 and 479.510
to 479.945;
(c) Passes  a written examination administered as provided by Department of Building Codes
rule on basic electrical principles on repair and maintenance of electrical  wiring and equipment
used in a manufactured structure; and
(d) Submits proof as provided by department rule that the person  has sufficient experience in
the repair and  maintenance of electrical problems of the type and nature found in a manufactured
structure.
(2) A person licensed under this section may repair and maintain electrical  wiring and equip-
ment used in a manufactured structure.
SECTION 49.
 ORS 446.225 is amended to read:
446.225. (1) The Legislative  Assembly intends to provide a procedure to [ assure] ensure  that
Oregon assumes fullest responsibility for administration and enforcement  of federal manufactured
housing safety and construction standards in Oregon in accordance with the National  Manufactured
Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-383).
(2) The Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business  Services ] Building Codes is au-
thorized to apply for and receive grants from the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development for
implementation and development of a plan for enforcement and administration of federal manufac-
tured housing safety and construction standards for manufactured housing offered  for sale or lease
in this state.
(3) The director is authorized to adopt rules  pursuant to ORS chapter 183 to [ insure] ensure
acceptance by the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development of Oregon’s  plan for administration
and enforcement of federal manufactured housing safety and  construction standards in accordance
with the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (Public
Law 93-383).
SECTION 50.
 ORS 446.230 is amended to read:
446.230. (1) The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall, by  administrative rule, adopt and enforce safety and construction standards for installation,
support and tiedown of manufactured dwellings on a  lot. These safety standards shall be reasonably
consistent with nationally recognized standards for placement, support and tiedown of manufactured
dwellings, and shall be designed to protect the health and safety of occupants of manufactured
dwellings against uplift, sliding, rotation and overturning of manufactured dwellings.
(2) The director shall designate wind pressure zones in which the rules  for tiedown of manu-
factured dwellings shall apply.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 446.395, an installer is not required to be  licensed by the director
to connect utilities from utility terminations provided on a lot to manufactured dwellings.
SECTION 51.
 ORS 446.240 is amended to read:
[51]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
446.240. The Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall adopt and enforce rules establishing safety standards for construction and installation  of ac-
cessory buildings and structures. Prefabricated  and site-built accessory buildings and structures
shall be consistent with the provisions of the state building code adopted pursuant to  ORS 455.020
and 455.110 except where application of such standards would conflict with  standards adopted under
the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety  Standards Act of 1974 and would pre-
vent the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes from enforcing the federal
Act in Oregon.
SECTION 52.  ORS 446.245 is amended to read:
446.245. (1) Manufactured dwellings shall be used as single-family dwellings.
(2) Manufactured dwellings shall not be used for commercial purposes.
(3) Exceptions to subsections (1) and (2) of this section are:
(a) Manufactured dwellings may be  used for purposes other than as a single-family dwelling
when specifically approved for a change in  occupancy in accordance with the provisions of the
Oregon specialty codes by the authority having jurisdiction. When a manufactured dwelling changes
in occupancy it shall lose its identity  as a manufactured dwelling and have the insignia removed and
returned to the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(b) Manufactured dwellings may be used by dealers or  distributors of manufactured structures
as temporary sales offices when no alterations to the design, construction, transportation,  fire and
life safety, plumbing, mechanical or  electrical systems are made to accommodate the office use and
when the dealer  or distributor continues to offer the manufactured dwelling for sale during the of-
fice  use.
(c) A portion  of a manufactured dwelling may be used for an in-house business when the re-
mainder of the structure is used as a single-family dwelling by the same person. The type and lo-
cation of an in-home business shall  be approved by the authority having jurisdiction and the local
planning commission prior to the use.
SECTION 53.
 ORS 446.250 is amended to read:
446.250. The Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall cause inspections to be made, approve plans and specifications,  provide technical services and
issue permits  for alteration of manufactured dwellings and installation of manufactured dwellings
and manufactured structure accessory buildings and  structures on a lot. The director shall appoint
or contract with municipalities that request such appointment or contract  for inspection and issu-
ance of permits for alteration of manufactured dwellings and installation of manufactured  dwellings
and manufactured structure accessory buildings and  structures and alterations of installations of
plumbing, heating, illuminating, cooking or electrical equipment,  provided the municipality employs
as local inspectors qualified persons who have been certified by the director for inspection  and is-
suance of permits for alteration of manufactured  dwellings and installation of manufactured
dwellings and manufactured structure accessory buildings and structures,  pursuant to ORS 446.003,
446.111, 446.155, 446.160, 446.176, 446.225 to 446.285 and 446.990. However,  the certification stan-
dards under this section shall relate to the inspections to be performed and shall not be  more
stringent for municipal inspectors than those applying to state inspectors.
SECTION 54.  ORS 446.252 is amended to read:
446.252. A person may not install a  manufactured dwelling or manufactured structure accessory
building or structure without first obtaining from the Department of [ Consumer and Business Ser-
vices] Building Codes  or a municipality as  provided under ORS 446.250 all permits necessary for
[52]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
installing the manufactured dwelling  or manufactured structure accessory building or structure on
a lot.
SECTION 55.  ORS 446.253 is amended to read:
446.253. (1) The authority  of the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes under ORS 446.250 shall be in addition to the provisions of ORS chapter
455. Where the provisions of ORS 446.252  and this section conflict with the provisions under ORS
chapter 455, the provisions of ORS 446.252 and this section shall control.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, any municipality  that establishes a program
under ORS 446.252 and 455.150 and this  section to administer and enforce installations of manufac-
tured dwellings and manufactured structure accessory buildings and structures  shall assume full
responsibility for permit issuance  and inspections under that program including related electrical,
plumbing, structural and mechanical installations for a manufactured  dwelling and manufactured
structure accessory buildings and structures as defined in ORS 446.003.
(3) The director may by order relieve a municipality from  compliance with the requirements of
subsection (2) of this section under the following conditions:
(a) Budget limitations of the municipality;
(b) Inadequate staffing of the municipality;
(c) Inability to contract services with another municipality; or
(d) Where the public is inconvenienced by increased cost, travel distance or time loss.
(4) The Department of [ Consumer and  Business Services ] Building Codes, subject to ORS chap-
ter 183, may revoke any authority of a local government to conduct  inspections, administration or
enforcement of manufactured dwelling installations and manufactured structure accessory  building
installations and manufactured dwelling alterations under ORS  455.150 if the director determines
that the municipality is not effectively carrying out duties assumed by the municipality.
SECTION 56.
 ORS 446.255 is amended to read:
446.255. (1) After written notice  and hearing as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
Director of the  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may revoke the
certification of a local inspector certified under ORS 446.250, or the authority of a  local government
to enforce provisions of ORS 446.003, 446.111, 446.160, 446.176, 446.225 to 446.285 and  446.990, when
it appears by competent evidence that the inspector or local government has consistently failed  to
act in the public interest in the enforcement of the  provisions of ORS 446.003, 446.111, 446.160,
446.176, 446.225 to 446.285 and 446.990.
(2) Any proceedings under subsection (1) of this section  shall be conducted pursuant to the
provisions of ORS 183.415 to 183.430, 183.440 to 183.460,  183.470 to 183.485 and 183.490 to 183.540,
dealing with contested cases.
SECTION 57.  ORS 446.260 is amended to read:
446.260. (1) Every manufacturer of manufactured homes offered for sale or lease  in this state
shall furnish notification  of any defect in any manufactured home produced by the manufacturer that
the manufacturer determines, in  good faith, relates to a federal manufactured housing construction
or safety standard or constitutes an imminent safety hazard to  the purchaser of the manufactured
home, within a reasonable time after such manufacturer has discovered the defect.
(2) The Director of the Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes is au-
thorized to  adopt rules for notification required by subsection (1) of this section. The rules shall
conform to notification and correction of defects  and record keeping requirements of the Secretary
of Housing and Urban Development under the National Manufactured Housing Construction  and
[53]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Safety Standards Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-383).
(3)(a) In addition to the notification required under subsection (1) of this section, the director
may adopt rules to identify the disclosures required of a dealer or distributor prior  to the sale of
new manufactured structures more than eight feet six inches wide in travel mode. Disclosure re-
quired under  this subsection shall be limited to information regarding permissible uses, roof snow
loads and anchoring of manufactured structures.
(b) The Department of  [Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall develop and make
available to all dealers and distributors of manufactured structures a standard disclosure.  The dis-
closure shall be completed in writing by the dealer or  distributor of any affected manufactured
structure prior to sale. A completed disclosure shall be presented to the purchaser for  signature
at the time of sale and a copy of the signed disclosure  provided to the purchaser. The signed dis-
closure shall be retained by the dealer or distributor for not less than five years  following the date
of sale.
SECTION 58.
 ORS 446.265 is amended to read:
446.265. (1) A municipality may  approve the establishment of a campground inside an urban
growth boundary to be used for  providing transitional housing accommodations. The accommo-
dations may consist of separate facilities, in the form of yurts, for  use as living units by one or more
individuals or by families. The person establishing  the accommodations may provide access to water,
toilet, shower, laundry, cooking, telephone or other services either through separate or shared  fa-
cilities. The accommodations shall provide parking facilities and walkways.
(2) Transitional housing accommodations described under subsection  (1) of this section shall be
limited to persons who lack  permanent shelter and cannot be placed in other low income housing.
A municipality may limit the maximum amount of time that an individual or a  family may use the
accommodations.
(3) Campgrounds providing  transitional housing accommodations described under this section
may be operated by private persons or nonprofit organizations. The shared facilities of the
campgrounds are subject to regulation under the recreation park specialty code  described under
ORS 446.310 to 446.350. The transitional housing accommodations are not subject to  ORS chapter
90.
(4) To  the extent deemed relevant by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes, the construction and  installation of yurts on campgrounds used for providing
transitional housing accommodations established under this section  is subject to the manufactured
structures specialty code described in ORS 446.155. Transitional housing accommodations  not
appurtenant to a yurt are subject to regulation as provided under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Campgrounds established for  providing transitional housing accommodations shall not be al-
lowed on more than two parcels in  a municipality. In approving the use of parcels for a campground,
the municipality shall give preference to locations that have access to grocery stores and  public
transit services.
(6) As used  in this section, “yurt” means a round, domed tent of canvas or other weather re-
sistant material, having a rigid framework, wooden floor, one or  more windows or skylights and that
may have plumbing, electrical service or heat.
SECTION 59.
 ORS 446.271 is amended to read:
446.271. The  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may impose a
civil penalty for a violation of ORS 446.003 to  446.200 or 446.225 to 446.285 or rules adopted or or-
ders issued for the administration or enforcement  of those sections. The department shall impose a
[54]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
civil penalty authorized by this section as provided in ORS 455.895.
SECTION 60.  ORS 446.280 is amended to read:
446.280. The Residential and Manufactured Structures Board shall serve in an advisory  capacity
to the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes in
promulgating, administering and enforcing the plan for the  administration and enforcement of the
National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (Public  Law 93-383)
and safety standards pursuant to ORS 446.003 to  446.200, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.310 to 446.350 and
446.395 to 446.420.
SECTION 61.  ORS 446.285 is amended to read:
446.285. To assist the Director of the Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes in administration and enforcement of  the National Manufactured Housing Construction and
Safety Standards Act of 1974, and safety standards  pursuant to ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to
446.285, 446.310 to 446.350  and 446.395 to 446.420, the Residential and Manufactured Structures
Board may approve or conduct programs of training and education  that maintain and advance the
professional skills and abilities of persons engaged in  manufacturing, delivery, installation, sale or
service of manufactured structures.
SECTION 62.  ORS 446.322 is amended to read:
446.322. Upon receipt of a completed application on an Oregon Health Authority  form, required
fee, and after representation by the  applicant that the facility is in compliance with the provisions
of ORS 446.310 to  446.350, and the rules adopted pursuant thereto, and the requirements of the De-
partment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes , the authority shall issue a license,
unless there is reason to believe noncompliance exists.
SECTION 63.  ORS 446.395 is amended to read:
446.395. (1) Except as provided by rule  by the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes, an individual must obtain an installer license  under ORS 446.400
before installing a manufactured dwelling or cabana.
(2) An individual required by subsection (1)  of this section to obtain a license shall comply with
ORS 446.003 to 446.240 and 446.395 to 446.420 and Department of [ Consumer and  Business Services ]
Building Codes rules adopted under ORS 446.003 to 446.240, 446.395 to 446.420 and 455.117.
(3) Installer licenses may be issued only to individuals.
(4) A person may not employ any individual to install a manufactured dwelling or cabana unless
the individual is licensed by the department to perform the work and complies with ORS  446.003 to
446.240 and 446.395 to 446.420 and rules adopted under ORS 446.003 to  446.240, 446.395 to 446.420
and 455.117.
(5) Licenses issued pursuant to ORS 446.395 to 446.420 and department  rules adopted under ORS
455.117 are not transferable.
SECTION 64.
 ORS 446.400 is amended to read:
446.400. (1) The  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes , subject to
approval of the Residential  and Manufactured Structures Board, shall issue licenses as provided by
department rules adopted under ORS 455.117  to individuals to install manufactured dwellings and
cabanas. The board may adopt classifications of installers including, but  not limited to, temporary
installer, limited installer and installer.
(2) In determining the appropriate  initial license and renewal fees for installers, the Director
of the Department of [ Consumer and  Business Services ] Building Codes , with the approval of the
board, shall ensure  that the annual income to the department from license and renewal fees estab-
[55]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
lished under this section does not  exceed one-third of the estimated total cost of administering and
enforcing ORS 446.003 and 446.395 to 446.420.
(3) Fees collected  by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the [ Consumer
and Business Services Fund established by ORS 705.145 ] Department of Building  Codes Fund and
are continuously appropriated to the department for use as provided in ORS 446.423.
SECTION 65.  ORS 446.405 is amended to read:
446.405. (1)  If a manufactured dwelling or cabana is not installed in accordance with the rules
adopted under ORS 446.003 and 446.395 to  446.420, the owner of the manufactured dwelling or
cabana, at the time of installation, may, within  one year of the completion date of such installation,
file a written complaint with the Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
The department shall provide a copy of the complaint  to the installer and shall also notify the
dealer, if any, that  arranged for such installation and may then investigate the complaint. If the
department determines that the installation fails to comply with licensure requirements  as provided
by ORS 446.003 and 446.395 to 446.420 or the installation rules adopted by the Director of the De-
partment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, the department shall provide notice
of such failure to the installer and shall order the installer to  bring the installation into compliance.
(2) The director shall establish, by rule, fees and a procedure for inspection of manufactured
dwellings and cabanas to carry out the provisions of this section.
(3) If the installer fails to bring the installation into compliance as ordered, the department may
suspend or revoke the installer’s license as provided under ORS 455.129.
(4) If the installer fails to bring the installation  into compliance, the department shall order the
dealer, if  any, that arranged for such installation to bring the installation into compliance with the
provisions of ORS 446.003 and 446.395 to 446.420 and  the rules adopted under ORS 446.003 and
446.395 to 446.420. The dealer  is responsible to bring only those installation activities into compli-
ance that the dealer arranged. The dealer shall have 30 days from the date  of the order to bring
the installation into compliance. If the dealer fails to bring the installation into compliance within
30 days of the date of the order, the dealer shall be subject to  civil penalties as provided by ORS
446.416.
(5) Hearings, penalties and appeals resulting from violation of this section shall be carried  out
in conformance with ORS 183.325 to 183.497 and this section.
SECTION 66.
 ORS 446.410 is amended to read:
446.410. Fees collected by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
pursuant to ORS 446.003 and 446.395 to 446.420 shall be deposited in the [ Consumer and  Business
Services Fund established by ORS 705.145 ] Department of Building Codes  Fund and are contin-
uously appropriated to the department for use as provided in ORS 446.423.
SECTION 67.  ORS 446.416 is amended to read:
446.416. The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  may impose  a
civil penalty for a violation of ORS 446.395 to 446.420 or  rules adopted for the administration and
enforcement  of  those sections. The department shall impose a civil penalty authorized by this section
as provided in ORS 455.895.
SECTION 68.  ORS 446.423 is amended to read:
446.423. Except as otherwise provided in ORS 455.220 (1), all moneys deposited  to the [ Consumer
and Business  Services Fund ] Department of Building Codes Fund  that are derived pursuant to
ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.210, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 446.566 to 446.646[ , 446.661
to 446.756 ] and 455.220 (1) are continuously appropriated  to the Department of [ Consumer and
[56]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Business Services ] Building Codes for carrying out any of the  duties, functions and powers of the
department under ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.210, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420[ ,] and
446.566 to 446.646 [ and 446.661 to 446.756 ], and rules adopted thereunder.
SECTION 69.  ORS 446.430 is amended to read:
446.430. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall delegate
to any  county board of commissioners or city governing body [ which] that  requests any of the au-
thority, responsibilities and functions of the department under ORS 446.062 if the department  de-
termines that the county or city is willing and able to  carry out the rules of the department relating
to fee collection, plan review, inspections,  enforcement and issuance and revocation of permits in
compliance with standards  for enforcement by the counties or cities and monitoring by the depart-
ment. Such standards shall be  established by the department in consultation with the appropriate
county or city officials and in  accordance with ORS 446.062. The department shall review and
monitor each county’s or city’s performance under this  subsection. In accordance with ORS chapter
183, the department  may suspend or rescind a delegation under this subsection. If it is determined
that a county or city is not carrying out such rules or the delegation is suspended,  the unexpended
portion of the fees collected under subsection (2) of this section shall be available  to the department
for carrying out the authority, responsibility and functions under this section.
(2) The county or  city may determine the amount of, and retain, any fee for any function
undertaken pursuant to subsection (1)  of this section. The amount of the fees shall not exceed the
costs of administering the inspection program. The county or city, quarterly, shall remit 15 percent
of the collected fees to the department  for monitoring county or city programs and for providing
informational material necessary to maintain a uniform state program.
(3) The department shall be made a party to any action, suit or proceeding  arising out of county
or city administration of functions pursuant to subsection (1) of this  section and involving the va-
lidity of a rule adopted by the department.
SECTION 70.
 ORS 446.566 is amended to read:
446.566. The following information must be recorded on the ownership document issued for a
manufactured structure by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes:
(1) All ownership interests, for a manufactured structure sold in this state.
(2) A change in location, for a manufactured structure that has been sited in this state.
(3) The manufactured structure identification number as described by department rule.
(4) The manufacturer’s name and, if available, the model of the manufactured structure.
(5) The identifying physical characteristics of the manufactured structure, including but not
limited to the total square footage  of the living area, type of siding, type of roof, number of
bedrooms, number of bathrooms and types of heating and cooling.
(6) If the ownership document is issued  due to sale of the manufactured structure, the most re-
cent sales price and date of sale for the manufactured structure.
(7) Any other information required by department rule.
SECTION 71.
 ORS 446.568 is amended to read:
446.568. (1) Except as provided in this subsection, if a manufactured structure is purchased from
or otherwise acquired through a manufactured structure dealer, the dealer  shall provide the infor-
mation described in ORS 446.566 (3) to (7) to  the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes. A manufactured structure dealer is not required to provide  the information to the
department if the  dealer complies with an instruction from the purchaser to provide the information
to a lender, escrow agent, title company or other designee of the purchaser. A lender,  escrow agent,
[57]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
title company or other designee of the purchaser that receives the information described in  ORS
446.566 (3) to (7) from a manufactured structure  dealer shall provide the information to the depart-
ment. However, the provision of information described in ORS 446.566 (3) to  (7) to the purchaser
does not excuse a manufactured structure dealer from the duty  to provide the information to the
department.
(2) If the manufactured structure is sold by  or otherwise acquired through a person other than
a manufactured structure dealer, the information described in ORS 446.566 (3) to (7) shall  be pro-
vided to the department:
(a) By the seller if title is being transferred by a sale;
(b) By the person to whom the ownership interest is being transferred if title is  being trans-
ferred by operation of law; or
(c) By the  owner if the owner will have a recorded ownership interest in the manufactured
structure after issuance of the ownership document.
SECTION 72.
 ORS 446.571 is amended to read:
446.571. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, the owner of a manufac-
tured structure shall apply  to the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
for an ownership document. Upon receipt of  an application in appropriate form as described in ORS
446.736 (2), the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall issue  an
ownership document for a manufactured structure. Except as  provided in ORS 308.875, a manufac-
tured structure for which an ownership  document is issued is subject to assessment and taxation
as personal property under the ad valorem tax laws of this state.
(b)(A) For a new manufactured structure, except  as provided in subparagraph (C) of this para-
graph, the application must be filed on behalf of the owner  by the manufactured structure dealer
as provided in ORS 446.736, by a lender or by an escrow agent as provided in ORS 446.591.
(B) For a used manufactured structure, except as provided in subparagraph  (C) of this para-
graph, the owner must file the application with the county assessor for the county  in which the
manufactured structure is sited.
(C) If a dealer, lender or  escrow agent refuses to file an application as required by subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph, or if a  county assessor refuses to accept an application in appropriate form
as required by subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the owner may file an application for an owner-
ship document directly with the department.
(2) The department shall maintain ownership records on manufactured structures  for which the
department has issued ownership documents. The department shall maintain a record of ownership
documents or other documents evidencing ownership that have been canceled.
(3) The department shall note all security interests in the manufactured structure  on the own-
ership document and in the records maintained by the  department pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section. The recording of the security interests in the records maintained by  the department is
constructive notice of the interests.
(4) The department shall send the ownership document to the  holder of the earliest perfected
unreleased security interest in the manufactured structure or, if none,  to the owner of the structure.
The department shall also send a  copy of the ownership document to the county assessor for the
county in which the manufactured structure is being sited.
(5) If an interest in a manufactured structure other than an ownership interest is satisfied  or
assigned, the holder of the interest shall notify the department. If the holder of the  satisfied interest
is in possession of the ownership document for the structure, the holder shall return the ownership
[58]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
document to  the department. The department shall adjust the ownership document and send the
adjusted ownership document and copy as described in subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 73.  ORS 446.581 is amended to read:
446.581. The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall adopt  rules
to provide for the transference of an ownership document  for an abandoned manufactured structure
to a landlord pursuant to ORS 90.425 or 90.675 and ORS 446.616 (2).
SECTION 74.  ORS 446.586 is amended to read:
446.586. As used in ORS 446.586 to 446.606:
(1) “Holder or other person” means the manufactured structure owner  or other person having
an interest in  the structure as indicated in the records of the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes.
(2) “Last-known address” means:
(a) The address of a holder or other person that is the  intended recipient of a notice described
in ORS 446.591 (4)  as set forth in an ownership document, financing statement or other documenta-
tion;
(b) If the address for the intended recipient of the notice is  not shown on a document or state-
ment, the address of the intended recipient’s principal place of business; or
(c) If the address for the intended recipient of  the notice is not shown on a document or state-
ment and  the intended recipient does not have a principal place of business, the address of the in-
tended recipient’s residence.
SECTION 75.
 ORS 446.591 is amended to read:
446.591. An ownership  application, information described in ORS 446.736 or an ownership docu-
ment or other document evidencing  ownership and any release thereon under ORS 446.571, 446.616
or 446.641 does not need to be submitted to the Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes as a condition for the department  recording an ownership interest in a manufac-
tured structure if all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The  transaction involves the sale of a manufactured structure or the creation or transfer of
a security interest in a manufactured structure and is processed by an escrow agent licensed in  this
state.
(2) Debt  secured by a security interest in the manufactured structure has been or will be paid
in full by the escrow agent as part of the agent’s processing of the transaction.
(3) The  escrow agent sends the written notice, in the form described in ORS 446.596, at least
30 days prior to the application for issuance of a replacement or  original ownership document or for
changes to an ownership document.
(4) The escrow agent mails a notice described in ORS 446.596 to the holder or other person  that
is responsible for furnishing the application  information, ownership document, other document evi-
dencing ownership, or release of interest, and mails a copy of the notice to any person who has
perfected a security interest under ORS  chapter 79 in the inventory of a dealer selling the structure.
(5) The escrow agent  provides the department [ of Consumer and Business Services ] with an ap-
plication as provided by department rule for  an ownership document. The application must be signed
by the transferee, if  any, and contain any information required by the department, including but not
limited to the following information:
(a) A description of the  manufactured structure, including the identification number as described
by department rule.
(b) The name of the transferee, if any.
[59]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) A recital that the  escrow agent did not receive the requested documents and did not receive
a written objection from the holder or other person.
SECTION 76.  ORS 446.596 is amended to read:
446.596. The escrow agent shall send the notice under ORS 446.591  (4) by certified mail with
return receipt  requested and by first class mail, both with postage prepaid, to the last-known address
of the holder or other  person responsible for furnishing the documents and of any person having a
perfected security interest. The notice must:
(1) Contain a description of  the manufactured structure, including the year of manufacture, the
make and the identification number as described by rule of the Department of [ Consumer and  Busi-
ness Services ] Building Codes;
(2)(a) State that the debt or other obligation owed to  the holder or other person has been paid
and satisfied and specify the date and amount of the final payment; or
(b) State that at or prior to the time that the  security interest or other interest of the holder
or other person in the manufactured structure is  terminated, the escrow agent will fully pay and
satisfy the debt or other obligation owed to the holder or other person;
(3) State that, unless the escrow agent receives the appropriate documents within 30 days  after
the notice is received by the owner  or other person responsible for providing or releasing the doc-
uments, an  application for issuance of a replacement or original ownership document or for changes
to an ownership document will be  made to the department [ of Consumer and Business Services ] as
described in ORS 446.591 (5); and
(4) State that, if the  escrow agent receives from the holder or other person a written objection
to provision  or release of the requested documents, the escrow agent will not apply for the issuance
or replacement of or changes to the ownership document unless the objection is withdrawn  or the
escrow agent receives the documents from the holder or other person.
SECTION 77.  ORS 446.601 is amended to read:
446.601. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall  treat an
application described in ORS 446.591 (5):
(a) As an application for issuance of a replacement or original ownership document  that reflects
the sale  of the manufactured structure or the creation or transfer of the security interest, or as an
application to make other changes to an ownership document consistent with the transaction;
(b) As satisfactory  proof that any previously issued ownership document for the manufactured
structure is not available; and
(c) As a release of any perfected security interest in the manufactured  structure by the holder
or other person responsible for providing the application information, ownership document or  other
document evidencing ownership, or a release thereon.
(2) Upon receipt of an  application described in ORS 446.591 (5) and the payment of appropriate
fees, the department may issue a replacement or original ownership  document for the manufactured
structure, add or delete a security interest or make any  other changes consistent with the trans-
action. The department shall  send the ownership document to the holder of the earliest perfected
unreleased security interest in the manufactured structure or, if  none, to the owner. The department
shall also send a  copy of the ownership document to the county assessor for the county in which
the manufactured structure is sited or being sited.
SECTION 78.  ORS 446.606 is amended to read:
446.606. (1) An escrow agent may  not provide an application to the Department of [ Consumer
and Business Services ] Building Codes  under ORS 446.591 (5) if the agent has received  a written
[60]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
objection in response to the notice provided under ORS 446.596.
(2) An escrow agent  may charge the person owning the manufactured structure under the re-
placement ownership document a reasonable fee for services provided in compliance  with ORS
446.591 and 446.596.
(3) In addition to any  other remedy provided by law, a person may bring an action against an
escrow agent for damages sustained by the person due  to the negligence or willful misconduct of the
escrow agent in complying with ORS 446.591 and 446.596.
SECTION 79.  ORS 446.611 is amended to read:
446.611. (1)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the exclusive means for
perfecting  a  security interest in a manufactured structure that has an ownership document is by
application for and notation of  the security interest in the manufactured structure ownership docu-
ment records of the Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes. The applica-
tion to  have a security interest noted may be included as part of the application for issuance of an
original ownership document. The department shall record the date  of receipt of an application to
have a security interest noted on the ownership document. The security interest is perfected  as
provided in ORS 79.0311 upon the department’s entering the security  interest in the records main-
tained by the department under ORS 446.571. The department shall note the interest on  a new or
updated ownership document and send the document as provided in ORS  446.571. A security interest
perfected under this section continues in effect until released by the holder of the interest.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply if the debtor  who granted the security in-
terest is in the business of selling manufactured structures and the  structure constitutes inventory
held for sale or lease. The filing provisions of ORS 79.0501 to 79.0528 apply  to security interests in
manufactured structures described in this paragraph.
(2) The department shall issue or update an ownership document  to reflect a security interest
described in subsection (1)(a) of this section and note the interest in  the manufactured structure
ownership document records maintained  by the department. The department shall deliver the own-
ership document to the holder of the earliest perfected unreleased security interest in the manu-
factured structure or, if none, to the owner of the structure. The department shall also send a copy
of the ownership document to the county assessor  for the county in which the manufactured struc-
ture is being sited.
(3) If the department cancels an ownership document because the manufactured structure is re-
corded in the deed records of a county, the department  shall notify the county assessor of any
unreleased security interest recorded in the department’s record for the manufactured structure. The
county assessor shall record the security interest information for the structure in  the deed records.
(4) If a  manufactured structure is recorded in the deed records of a county prior to the record-
ing of a security interest, the recording of  a security interest in the county deed records satisfies
the requirement in ORS 72A.3095 that the  security interest be recorded as a mortgage on real estate
and is effective as a financing statement perfecting  the security interest in the structure as provided
in ORS 79.0502 (3).
(5) If a manufactured  structure ceases to be exempt from the ownership document requirement,
upon recording the termination of the exemption in  the deed records, the county assessor shall no-
tify the department of any unreleased  interest shown on the deed record for the manufactured
structure. The department shall note  the security interest information on the ownership document
issued by the department.
SECTION 80.
 ORS 446.616 is amended to read:
[61]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
446.616. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section, upon  the
transfer of any interest in a manufactured structure shown on an  ownership document, each person
whose interest is released, terminated, assigned or transferred shall  acknowledge the release, ter-
mination, assignment or transfer of that interest in a manner specified by the Department of  [ Con-
sumer and Business Services ] Building Codes by rule. The department shall design the rules adopted
for purposes of this subsection to protect the interests of all parties to the transfer of interest.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:
(a) In the case of a transfer of an interest  by operation of law, the personal representative, re-
ceiver, trustee, sheriff, landlord or other representative or successor in interest of the person whose
interest is transferred shall file the acknowledgment described in subsection (1) of this  section. The
representative or successor shall also  provide the transferee with information satisfactory to the
department concerning all facts entitling the representative or successor to transfer the interest.  If
there is no person to transfer the interest, the person to whom interest is awarded  or otherwise
transferred is responsible for providing the  information concerning the person’s entitlement to the
interest.
(b) In the case  of a transfer at death of the interest of the owner or security interest holder of
the manufactured structure, if the estate is not  being probated and ownership is not being trans-
ferred under the provisions of  ORS 114.545, an interest in the manufactured structure may be as-
signed through the use of an affidavit. The affidavit must be on a form  prescribed by the department
and signed by all of the known heirs of the person  whose interest is being transferred, and shall
state the name of the person to whom the ownership interest has been passed. If any heir has not
arrived at the age of majority or is otherwise incapacitated, the parent or guardian of the heir  shall
sign the affidavit.
(c) In the case of a transfer at death  of the interest of the owner or security interest holder
where transfer occurs under ORS 114.545, the affiant, as  defined in ORS 114.505, is the person re-
quired to assign interest.
(d) A security interest  holder, without the consent of the owner, may assign interest of the
holder in a manufactured structure to a person other than the owner without affecting  the interest
of the owner or the validity  or priority of the interest. A person who is not given notice of the
assignment is protected in dealing with the security interest holder as the holder of the interest
until the assignee files notice of  the interest with the department as provided in ORS 446.571. This
paragraph does not exempt an assignment of interest from the  acknowledgment requirement under
subsection (1) of this section.
(e) If an interest in a manufactured  structure is transferred pursuant to an application under
ORS 446.591 (5), the recital  by the escrow company that no written objections were received con-
stitutes both a release, termination, assignment or transfer of interest and an acknowledgment by
the person whose interest is released, terminated, assigned or transferred.
(3) Subsection (1) of this  section does not apply to a transfer of a security interest where the
security interest holder is a financial institution, a  financial holding company or a bank holding
company, as those terms are defined in ORS 706.008, a licensee under ORS chapter 725, or any
subsidiary or affiliate of any of the foregoing and the transfer of the interest of  the security interest
holder:
(a) Results from the merger, conversion, reorganization, consolidation or acquisition  of the se-
curity interest holder; or
(b) Is to an entity that is a member of the same affiliated group as the security holder.
[62]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 81.  ORS 446.621 is amended to read:
446.621. (1) A certificate of title for a manufactured structure issued by  the Department of
Transportation prior to May 1, 2005, is effective as a document  evidencing ownership of the manu-
factured structure. If the manufactured  structure does not have a title pursuant to ORS 308.855 or
308.860 (1969 Replacement Part), a tax record showing that a person has paid the  ad valorem tax
assessment on the structure since 1972  is a document evidencing the person’s ownership of the
structure.
(2) The owner of a manufactured structure described in subsection (1)  of this section is not re-
quired to obtain an ownership document for the structure unless the structure is moved  or sold.
Except as provided in subsections (3) and  (5) of this section, upon the moving or sale of a manu-
factured structure described in subsection (1) of this section, the owner shall submit the document
evidencing  ownership  of the structure to the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes as provided in ORS 446.631 and 446.641. Upon receipt of the  document, the depart-
ment shall enter the information regarding the manufactured structure  in the department’s records
and issue an ownership document for the structure.
(3) If the  owner of a manufactured structure has misplaced a certificate of title, the Department
of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may require  the person to provide proof suffi-
cient to satisfy the department concerning any questions about the ownership of the  manufactured
structure or security interests in the structure. The proof  required by the department may include,
but is not limited to, completion of an affidavit that:
(a) Is in a form required by the department by rule;
(b) Contains any information the department  requires by rule as necessary to establish owner-
ship of the manufactured structure or to determine any security interests in the structure; and
(c) Is verified by the person making the affidavit.
(4) The Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  is not liable to any
person for issuing an  ownership document based on proof provided under subsection (3) of this sec-
tion.
(5) The movement  or sale of a manufactured structure described in subsection (1) of this section
does not require the owner to obtain an ownership document if:
(a) The move or sale  will qualify the manufactured structure for recording in the deed records
of a county under ORS 446.626; and
(b) The person who will own  the structure after the move or sale files an affidavit with the
Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes prior to the move or sale stating
that the person will apply within 25 business days after completion of the move or sale  to have the
manufactured structure recorded in the county deed records.
(6) ORS 803.220 does not apply to a certificate  of title for a manufactured structure issued by
the Department of Transportation.
(7) If the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes issues an ownership
document for a manufactured structure that was previously  issued a certificate of title by the De-
partment of  Transportation, the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall record in the department’s records and note on the ownership  document any unreleased se-
cured interest that was noted on the certificate of title. A secured  interest described in this sub-
section retains the original perfection date of the interest, but provides the  same creditor rights and
remedies available for a secured interest in personal property perfected under ORS 446.611 (1).
SECTION 82.
 ORS 446.626 is amended to read:
[63]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
446.626. (1) The  owner of a manufactured structure that qualifies under this subsection may
apply to the county assessor to have the  structure recorded in the deed records of the county. The
application must be on a form  approved by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes. The application must include a description of the  location of the real property on
which the manufactured structure is or will be sited. If the structure is being sold by a manufac-
tured structure dealer, the dealer may file the application on behalf of the owner  within the time
described in ORS 446.736 (7). A manufactured structure qualifies for recording in the deed  records
if the owner of the structure:
(a) Also owns the land on which the manufactured structure is located;
(b) Is the holder of a recorded leasehold estate of 20 years or  more if the lease specifically
permits the manufactured structure owner to record the structure under this section; or
(c) Is a member of a manufactured dwelling park  nonprofit cooperative formed under ORS 62.800
to 62.815 that owns the land on which the manufactured structure is located.
(2) If the assessor, as agent for the department, determines that the  manufactured structure
qualifies for recording  in the deed records of the county, the assessor shall cause the structure to
be recorded in the deed records. The deed records must contain any unreleased security  interest in
the manufactured structure. If the department has issued an ownership  document for the manufac-
tured structure, the owner must submit the ownership document  to the assessor with the application
described in subsection (1) of this  section. Upon recording the manufactured structure in the deed
records, the assessor shall send the ownership document to the department  for cancellation. The
department shall cancel the ownership document and send confirmation of the cancellation to the
assessor and the owner.
(3) The recording  of a security interest in the deed records of the county under this section
satisfies the requirements for filing  a financing statement for a fixture to real property under ORS
79.0502. The recording of a manufactured structure in the deed records of the county is independent
of the assessment and taxation of the structure as  real property under ORS 308.875. The recording
of a manufactured structure  in the deed records of the county makes the structure subject to the
same provisions of law applicable to any other  building, housing or structure on the land. However,
the manufactured structure may not be sold separately from the land or leasehold  estate unless the
owner complies with subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The owner of a manufactured structure that is recorded in the  deed records of the county
may apply to have the structure removed from the deed records and an ownership document issued
for the structure. Unless the manufactured structure is subject to ORS 446.631, the  owner must ap-
ply to the county assessor, as agent for the department, for  an ownership document as provided in
ORS 446.571. Upon approval of the application, the assessor shall terminate the recording  of the
manufactured structure in the deed records.
(5) If a manufactured structure described in subsection (1)(b) or (c) of  this section is recorded
in the deed records, the owner  of the structure has a real property interest in the manufactured
structure for purposes of:
(a) Recordation of documents pursuant to ORS 93.600 to 93.802, 93.804, 93.806 and 93.808;
(b) Deed forms pursuant to ORS 93.850 to 93.870;
(c) Mortgages, trust deeds and other liens pursuant to ORS chapters 86, 87 and 88; and
(d) Real property tax collection pursuant to ORS chapters  311 and 312. The structure owner is
considered the owner of  the real property for purposes of assessing the structure under ORS 308.875.
SECTION 83.
 ORS 446.631 is amended to read:
[64]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
446.631. (1) A person may not move  a manufactured structure to a different situs unless the
Department of [ Consumer and  Business Services ] Building Codes approves the move and the county
assessor issues a trip permit on behalf of the department. An  application to move a manufactured
structure  must  be filed in the manner and form required by department rule and include the fol-
lowing:
(a) The ownership document or, if an ownership document does not exist, another document
acceptable to the department evidencing ownership of the structure or,  if the structure is recorded
in the deed records of the county, the property description for the current and proposed situses  for
the structure.
(b) The  identity of the owner of the proposed situs or, if the proposed situs is a facility as de-
fined in ORS 90.100, the name of the facility.
(c) Any other information required by the department by rule.
(2)(a) Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, the department may not approve
an application to move a manufactured structure to a situs in another county unless all taxes and
special assessments for the current year that will become a lien against the structure prior to the
move as described in ORS 311.405 and all delinquent taxes  and special assessments for past years
are paid.
(b) A purchaser or landlord may obtain a  trip permit from the county assessor without payment
if the county cancels the taxes and assessments as provided in ORS 90.425 or 90.675.
(3) If the assessor cannot compute the exact amount of taxes due, the owner shall pay an amount
based on the current assessed value of the manufactured structure or the value that would be  used
on the next assessment roll,  or an amount based on the assessor’s best estimate of the total taxes
and assessments. ORS 311.370 applies to taxes and assessments collected under this section.
(4) If the county assessor determines that all due or pending taxes and assessments  have been
paid, the assessor may issue a trip permit on behalf of  the department and shall forward the appli-
cation information to the department. The  department shall update the department’s record for the
manufactured structure and issue an updated ownership document for  the structure indicating the
change in information. If no ownership document exists for the  manufactured structure, the depart-
ment shall record the information for the structure and issue an ownership document.
(5) The department shall deliver an ownership document updated or issued under subsection (4)
of this section to the holder of the earliest perfected unreleased security interest in the manufac-
tured structure or, if none, to the owner of the structure. The department shall also send a  copy of
the ownership document to any other holders of unreleased security interests in the structure  and
to the county assessor for the county in which the structure is to be sited.
(6) The  department [ of Consumer and Business Services ] or a county may charge fees for services
provided  under  this section. The fees charged pursuant to this subsection may not exceed the cost
of the services provided.
(7) Subsections (1) to (6) of this section do not apply to the movement  of a manufactured struc-
ture described under ORS 446.576 (1)(a) or (b) or 446.736.
SECTION 84.
 ORS 446.636 is amended to read:
446.636. (1) For a new manufactured structure, the manufactured structure dealer  must obtain
the trip permit on behalf of the owner. If  the dealer fails to obtain the trip permit prior to the
scheduled moving date, the vehicle transporter must obtain the trip permit on behalf of the owner.
(2) For a  used manufactured structure, the owner must obtain a trip permit from the county
assessor for the county in which the manufactured structure is sited.
[65]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this subsection, if a  dealer or vehicle transporter
refuses to obtain a trip permit as required  by subsection (1) of this section, or if a county assessor
refuses to issue a trip permit to an owner who has complied with ORS 446.631,  the owner may apply
directly to the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes for a trip permit.
(4) The department may issue trip permits in bulk to a manufactured structure dealer or vehicle
transporter.
SECTION 85.  ORS 446.641 is amended to read:
446.641. (1) If a  person sells an ownership interest in a manufactured structure for which there
is an ownership document issued under ORS 446.611 or a structure  described in ORS 446.621 (1) to
(6), the seller shall give notice of the sale to the county assessor for the county in which the
structure is sited.
(2) The seller’s  notice must be on a form approved by the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes. Information required by the form must include, but need not be  limited
to:
(a) The identities of the seller and the purchaser;
(b) Any change in the security interest in the structure resulting from the transaction; and
(c) For each holder of an unreleased security interest:
(A) A signed statement recorded on the ownership document for the manufactured structure
acknowledging that the interest holder is aware of the sale; or
(B) Documentation satisfactory to the department showing  that acknowledgment by the holder
was requested but the holder has not responded.
(3) The seller shall submit the following with the notice:
(a) The ownership document or other document evidencing ownership of the manufactured
structure.
(b) A copy of the bill of sale.
(c) Documentation satisfactory to the county assessor that all taxes,  special assessments and
other charges placed on the tax roll that have been certified for  collection under ORS 311.105 and
311.110, all taxes in  homestead deferral as described under ORS 311.666 to 311.701 and all delinquent
taxes and special assessments for past years are paid or have been canceled.
(4) The county assessor shall forward the information contained in the notice  and the ownership
document or other document evidencing ownership to the department. The  department shall update
the ownership document for the manufactured structure or, if no ownership document  exists, enter
the information in the department’s records and issue an ownership document for the structure.
(5) The department shall deliver an ownership document updated or issued under subsection (4)
of this section to the holder of the earliest perfected unreleased security interest in the manufac-
tured structure or, if none, to the owner of the structure. The department shall also send a  copy of
the ownership document to the county assessor.
(6) A  transfer of ownership of a manufactured structure by operation of law is a sale of the
manufactured structure for purposes of this section.
(7) Notice given to a county assessor under subsection (1) of this section  is not an instrument
of conveyance.
(8) If a seller does  not give a notice of sale to the county assessor within 30 days after closing
of the sale of a manufactured  structure, a buyer may submit a notice of sale to the assessor if the
notice is accompanied by proof of sale acceptable to the department as provided by rule. Upon re-
ceipt of a notice of sale and acceptable proof of sale,  the assessor shall forward the information to
[66]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the department as provided in subsection  (4) of this section. Submission of a notice of sale by a
buyer does  not excuse a seller from civil penalty under ORS 455.895 for a violation of subsection (1)
of this section.
SECTION 86.  ORS 446.646 is amended to read:
446.646. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  may  adopt
rules necessary for carrying out the duties, functions and powers  of the department under ORS
446.566 to 446.646.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the department  shall adopt appropriate
fees to cover the cost of services rendered under ORS 446.566 to 446.646 by the  department and by
a county as agent  for the department. The department may not vary the fee for issuance or renewal
of an ownership document, or for removal  of a manufactured structure from the ownership document
system, based upon the applicant’s status as an owner, dealer or escrow agent.
(3) A county carrying out functions under ORS 446.566 to 446.646 related to  manufactured
structure ownership documents and trip permits is an agent of the department  with regard to those
functions.
(4) Unless the department adopts a different fee  pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the
fee amount:
(a) For issuance of an ownership document is $55.
(b) For issuance of a trip permit is $5.
SECTION 87.
 ORS 446.686 is amended to read:
446.686. (1) If the  Department of Consumer and Business Services proceeds under ORS 446.681
or [ 455.895] 446.995, the department may post a notice  on any manufactured structure held in in-
ventory by a person alleged to be acting as a manufactured structure dealer without a  license. The
notice must state that the person  offering the manufactured structure for sale is currently the sub-
ject of a proceeding to determine whether the  person has a manufactured structure dealer license
and that it may be unlawful for the person to sell the manufactured structure to a retail customer.
(2) A person may  remove a notice posted in accordance with subsection (1) of this section only
upon authorization by the department. The department shall authorize removal within  10 days after
any one of the following occurs:
(a) The dismissal or termination of the proceeding instituted under ORS 446.681 or [ 455.895]
446.995;
(b) Full payment of any lawfully owing civil penalty and compliance with ORS 446.661 to 446.756;
or
(c) A finding by  the department or a court that the manufactured structure is being offered for
sale by a licensed manufactured structure dealer or a person who is exempt from the licensing re-
quirement under ORS 446.676.
SECTION 88.
 ORS 446.721 is amended to read:
446.721. (1) The fee for issuance or  renewal of a manufactured structure dealer license under
ORS 446.691 is $542.
(2) The fee for issuance or renewal of a  supplemental license under ORS 446.716 is $90 for each
additional place of business.
(3) The fee for issuance or renewal of a corrected  dealer license under ORS 446.716 or corrected
limited manufactured structure dealer license under ORS 446.706 is $30.
(4) The fee for  issuance of a temporary manufactured structure dealer license under ORS 446.701
is $100.
[67]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) The fee for issuance or renewal of a limited manufactured  structure dealer license under
ORS 446.706 is $150.
(6) Fees adopted pursuant to this section are not subject to proration or refund.
(7) Fees collected by the  Department of Consumer and Business Services under this section must
be deposited in the  Consumer and Business Services Fund. Moneys deposited into the fund pursuant
to this section [ are continuously appropriated to the department for use  as provided in ORS 446.423 ]
shall be used for the administration and enforcement of ORS 446.661 to 446.756 .
SECTION 89.
 ORS 446.736 is amended to read:
446.736. (1) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, a manufactured structure dealer
who transfers an interest in a manufactured structure shall:
(a) Submit to the Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes an applica-
tion for an ownership document on behalf of the purchaser; or
(b) If the purchase is being  financed, submit sufficient information to a lender to allow the
lender to make an application to the Department of Building Codes for an ownership document.
(2) An application under subsection (1) of this section  must be on a form approved by the De-
partment of Building Codes and include:
(a) The year,  manufacturer’s name, model if available and identification number for the manu-
factured structure.
(b) Any existing ownership document for the structure or, if none, the  manufacturer’s certificate
of origin or other document evidencing ownership of the manufactured structure.
(c) The legal description or street address for the proposed  situs for the manufactured structure.
(d) The identity of the owner of record for the location where the manufactured structure  is
being sited or, if the structure is being sited in a facility as defined in ORS 90.100, the name  of the
facility.
(e) The name and mailing address of each  person acquiring an ownership interest in the manu-
factured  structure.
(f) The name and mailing address  of each person acquiring a security interest in the manufac-
tured structure.
(g) Any other information required by the department by rule for processing an application.
(3) If a manufactured structure dealer is unable to comply with subsection (1)  of this section,
within 25 business days of the transfer the dealer shall provide a notice  of delay to the security
interest holder next named, if any, and the purchaser. The notice must contain:
(a) The reason for the delay;
(b) The anticipated extent of the delay; and
(c) A statement  of the rights and remedies available to the purchaser if the delay becomes un-
reasonably  extended.
(4) A manufactured structure dealer that fails to comply with this  section is subject to revoca-
tion or suspension of the dealer’s license or being  placed on probation by the Department of Con-
sumer and Business Services pursuant to ORS 446.741. A dealer that fails to comply with subsection
(1) of this section within 90 days is subject to criminal penalties under ORS 446.746 (1)(h).
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (4) of this section, if  a purchaser is not in compliance
with the  payment terms of a purchase agreement on the 20th calendar day after the transfer, the
dealer is not required to perform under subsection (1)  of this section until 25 calendar days after the
purchaser is in compliance with the payment terms of the purchase agreement. This subsection does
not excuse the duty of the dealer under subsection (3) of this section.
[68]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) This section does not apply to a transfer of interest in a manufactured  structure that is
subject to an escrow transaction.
(7) This section does not apply to a manufactured structure for which an application is  filed
under ORS 446.626 within 25 business days of the transfer.
SECTION 90.  ORS 446.995 is amended to read:
446.995. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services  may impose a civil penalty [ as
provided in ORS 455.895 for each violation, ] against a licensed manufactured structure dealer or
against a person required by a rule adopted pursuant to ORS 446.666 to  be licensed, if the dealer
or person violates a provision of ORS 446.661 to 446.756 or a rule adopted by the department relat-
ing to the sale of manufactured structures. If the dealer authorizes a person licensed  pursuant to
ORS 446.666 to commit a violation,  the dealer and person are both subject to civil penalty.
Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if a dealer expressly or by  implication authorizes an
act by a real estate agent described in ORS 446.676 (14) that is a violation, the dealer is subject to
the civil penalty for the violation.
(2) The department may impose a civil penalty, in an amount not to exceed $5,000 for each
manufactured structure improperly  sold, brokered or exchanged, or offered or displayed for sale,
against a person that:
(a) Violates a provision of ORS 446.661 to 446.756 or a rule adopted by the department  relating
to the sale of  manufactured structures if the person does not possess a license required by ORS
446.671 or by rule pursuant to ORS 446.666; or
(b) Violates a rule adopted by the department relating to the sale of  manufactured structures
if the person is exempt from licensing under ORS 446.676.
(3) The maximum penalty established by this  section for a violation may be imposed only
upon a finding that the person has engaged  in a pattern of violations. The department, by
rule, shall define what constitutes a pattern of violations.
(4) Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.  Except
as provided in subsection (7) of this section, moneys from  civil penalties imposed under this
section shall be deposited to the Consumer and Business Services Fund.
(5) A civil penalty imposed  under this section may be remitted or reduced upon such
terms and conditions as the department considers proper  and consistent with the public
health and safety. In any judicial review of a civil penalty  imposed under this section, the
court may, in its discretion, reduce the penalty.
(6) Any officer,  director, shareholder or agent of a corporation, or member or agent of
a partnership or association, who personally participates in or is an accessory to any  vio-
lation by the corporation, partnership  or association of a provision or rule described in this
section is subject to the penalties prescribed in this section.
(7) In addition to the civil penalty set forth in this  section, the department may require
any person who violates a provision or rule described in this section to forfeit and pay to  the
General Fund of the  State Treasury a civil penalty in an amount determined by the depart-
ment that does not exceed five times the amount  by which such person profited in any
transaction that violated the provision or rule.
SECTION 91.
 ORS 447.010 is amended to read:
447.010. As used in ORS 447.010 to 447.156 and 447.992, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Board” means the State Plumbing Board established under ORS 693.115.
(2) “Department” means the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
[69]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) “Director” means the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes.
(4) “Journeyman plumber” has the meaning given that term in ORS 693.010.
(5) “Ordinary minor repairs” means the repair, replacement  or maintenance of existing plumbing
fixtures, appliances, appurtenances and related water supply and drain attachments for the purpose
of restoring a plumbing installation to a safe and sanitary operating condition.
(6) “Plumbing” is the art of installing, altering  or repairing in or adjacent to or serving
buildings:
(a) Pipes, fixtures and  other apparatus for bringing in the water supply and removing liquid and
water-carried waste, including the water supply distributing pipes.
(b) Fixtures and fixture traps.
(c) Soil, waste and vent pipes.
(d) House drain and house sewer to  the sewer service lateral at the curb, or in the street, or
alley, or other disposal terminal holding human or domestic sewage.
(e) Storm water drainage, with their devices, appurtenances and connections.
(f) Pipes, fixtures and other apparatus for medical gas,  anesthetic waste gas and vacuum sys-
tems.
(g) Solar heating and cooling systems.
SECTION 92.
 ORS 447.020 is amended to read:
447.020. (1) All installations of plumbing and drainage in buildings and  structures in this state
and all potable water supply, drainage, and waste  installations, within or serving buildings or
structures,  except  in temporary construction camps, and except as otherwise provided in ORS
447.010 to 447.156 [ and 447.992], shall be made in accordance with the requirements of ORS  447.010
to 447.156 [ and 447.992] and ORS chapter 455.
(2) The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, with
the approval of the State Plumbing Board , shall make rules pursuant to  ORS chapter 183 for the
purpose of setting  standards for plumbing and defining compliance with the provisions of ORS
447.010 to 447.156 [ and 447.992 particularly pertaining to ] including but not limited to rules re-
garding:
(a) The  installation of piping, protection and adequacy of the water supply[ ,];
(b) Workmanship and materials[ ,];
(c) Traps and cleanouts[ ,];
(d) Domestic hot water storage tanks and devices[ ,];
(e) Drinking fountains[ ,];
(f) Solar heating and cooling systems[ ,];
(g) Approval of devices, equipment and fixtures[ ,];
(h) Hangers and supports[ ,];
(i) Drainage and venting[ ,];
(j) House drains and house sewers[ ,];
(k) Storm water drains[ ,];
(L) Special wastes[ ,];
(m) Light and ventilation of water closets and bathrooms[ ,]; and
(n) Excavation and grading.
(3) The director shall appoint an adequate staff experienced and trained to serve as plumbing
inspectors to enforce rules adopted under this section.
[70]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 93.  ORS 447.026 is amended to read:
447.026. (1) All water pipe used to carry potable water sold in this state shall be clearly marked
the entire length of pipe, at intervals of length set by the Director of the Department of  [Consumer
and Business Services ] Building Codes with the approval of the State Plumbing Board, with:
(a) Identification of the manufacturer and the plant of origin; and
(b) The manufacturing standard under which the pipe was made.
(2) A label,  shield or coding system may be used to identify the manufacturer, origin and man-
ufacturing standard under which the pipe was made if the manufacturer  has on file with the De-
partment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes a notice describing the identification
system used.
SECTION 94.
 ORS 447.072 is amended to read:
447.072. Notwithstanding  ORS 455.610, the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes, with the approval  of the State Plumbing Board, shall adopt rules to create an ex-
emption from  permit and inspection requirements for ordinary minor repairs in low-rise residential
dwellings and commercial structures when the board finds that the plumbing  does not involve any
changes or alterations of the existing plumbing system. The exemption from the permit:
(1) May not include new construction  or replacement of water heaters or underground plumbing;
and
(2) Shall be available only to licensed plumbing  contractors or persons described under ORS
693.020.
SECTION 95.  ORS 447.076 is amended to read:
447.076. Notwithstanding ORS 455.610, the Department of [ Consumer and Business  Services ]
Building Codes, with the  approval of the State Plumbing Board, shall adopt rules to create a man-
datory inspection program for minor plumbing installations made by licensed  plumbing contractors
in low-rise residential dwellings. The rules adopted by the department shall:
(1) Define the term “minor plumbing installations” in a manner that  does not include new con-
struction;
(2) Designate which minor plumbing installations are under the inspection program; and
(3) Provide for random inspection of minor plumbing installations.
SECTION 96.
 ORS 447.080 is amended to read:
447.080. No city  or county shall enact or enforce any ordinances or building codes providing
different requirements than those imposed  by the state building code for the regulation of the busi-
ness of master plumbing or the  installation of drainage work unless authorized by the Director of
the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes under ORS 455.040.
SECTION 97.  ORS 447.091 is amended to read:
447.091. The Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes or local govern-
ment administering  the plumbing specialty code adopted under ORS 447.020 (2) may, upon request
of any sanitary  district formed pursuant to ORS 450.005 to 450.245, sanitary authority established
under ORS 450.600 to 450.989, or county service district established under ORS 451.410  to 451.610,
contract  for  the inspection of building sewers constructed to connect a district sewage system if
inspectors employed by such  district are certified for sewer inspections under ORS 455.715 to
455.740.
SECTION 98.  ORS 447.095 is amended to read:
447.095. (1) Rules adopted under ORS 447.020 shall provide a plumbing  inspection fee schedule.
The schedule shall establish  inspection fees for inspections made by the Department of [ Consumer
[71]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and Business Services ] Building Codes under ORS  447.010 to 447.156[ , 447.992 ] and 455.610 to
455.630 based on the cost of making inspections as measured by the time required of the inspector.
(2) Plumbing inspections may be made for other governmental units, upon request, pursuant  to
agreements entered into under ORS 190.003 to 190.620.
SECTION 99.  ORS 447.097 is amended to read:
447.097. All moneys received  by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes under ORS 447.010 to 447.156 and 447.992  shall be disposed of in accordance with ORS
693.165.
SECTION 100. ORS 447.100 is amended to read:
447.100. [(1) No new hotel,  motel, apartment house, dwelling, office building or other structure shall
be constructed which employs a tank-type water closet that is not approved by  the Director of the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services, with the approval of the State Plumbing Board,  as
meeting adequate standards of safety and sanitation. ]
(1) A tank-type water closet installed in a  newly constructed hotel, motel, apartment
house, dwelling, office building or other structure must be of  a type that the Director of the
Department of Building Codes, with the approval of the State  Plumbing Board, has approved
as meeting adequate standards of safety and sanitation.
(2) The director, with the approval of  the board, shall cause to have adopted and published,
pursuant to ORS chapter 183, a list of approved types  of tank-type water closets meeting [ the re-
quirements of this section ] adequate standards of safety and sanitation .
SECTION 101. ORS 447.118 is amended to read:
447.118. (1) Nothing in ORS 447.010 to 447.156 [ and 447.992] shall prohibit the installation of a
compost toilet for a dwelling by the occupant of the dwelling if the compost toilet complies with  the
minimum requirements established under this section.
(2) Rules  adopted under ORS 447.020 shall provide minimum requirements for the design, con-
struction, installation and maintenance of compost toilets.
(3) The Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, with
the approval of the State Plumbing Board , may require  by rule that, in addition to any other re-
quirements provided by law, any manufacturer or distributor of  a compost toilet and any person
other than the owner of the dwelling in which the compost toilet is to  be installed who proposes to
install a compost toilet  file with the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes a satisfactory bond, irrevocable letter of credit issued by an  insured institution as defined in
ORS 706.008 or other security in an amount to be fixed by  the department with approval of the
board but not to exceed $5,000, conditioned that such bond, letter of credit or  security shall be
forfeited in whole or in part to the  department for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS
447.124 by failure of such manufacturer, distributor or person to comply with  the rules adopted un-
der this section.
SECTION 102. ORS 447.124 is amended to read:
447.124. For the purpose of enforcing ORS 447.118 and the rules adopted thereunder, the  De-
partment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes , with  the assistance of the Oregon
Health Authority:
(1) May conduct periodic inspections of any compost toilet;
(2) Upon making a finding that a compost toilet is in violation of the rules adopted  pursuant to
ORS 447.118 (2), may issue  an order requiring the owner of the dwelling served by the compost toilet
to take action necessary to correct the violation; and
[72]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) Upon  making a finding that a compost toilet presents or threatens to present a public health
hazard creating an emergency requiring immediate action to protect the public  health, safety or
welfare, may issue an order requiring the owner of the  dwelling served by the compost toilet to take
any action  necessary to remove such hazard or threat thereof. If such owner fails to take the actions
required by  such order, the department shall take such action, itself or by contract with outside
parties, as necessary to remove the hazard or threat thereof. The department shall keep a record
of all necessary expenses incurred by the department in carrying out such action, including a  rea-
sonable charge for costs incurred and equipment and materials utilized by  the state. Any owner who
fails to take action required by an order issued under this  subsection shall be responsible for such
necessary expenses incurred by the state. Based on the record compiled by the department, an
owner responsible for expenses due to the failure of a manufacturer, distributor or person  to comply
with the rules adopted under ORS 447.118 (2) shall have a setoff against the bond or other  security
forfeited under ORS  447.118 (3) to the extent that such expenses are due to such failure of the
manufacturer, distributor or person. The department shall  make a finding and enter an order against
the owner for the necessary expenses. Orders issued under this section may be appealed pursuant
to ORS chapter  183 but not as a contested case. Any amount due the department under this sub-
section and not paid in full within 30 days after  the order is entered, or, if the order is appealed,
within 30 days after there is no further right to appeal, shall become a lien upon the  dwelling of the
owner. The department shall  file a notice of the lien with the recording officer of the county in
which the dwelling is located and the recording officer shall record the notice in a manner  designed
to appear in the mortgage records of the county.
(4) The department may contract with any  state or local agency for the purpose of carrying out
the provisions of this section.
SECTION 103.
 ORS 447.140 is amended to read:
447.140. (1) All waste water and sewage from plumbing fixtures shall be discharged into a sewer
system or alternate sewage disposal system approved by the  Environmental Quality Commission or
Department of Environmental Quality under ORS chapters 468, 468A and 468B.
(2) No plumbing fixture, device or equipment shall be installed, maintained or offered for sale
[which] that  will provide  a cross-connection between the distributing system of water for drinking
and domestic purposes and any other water supply, or a drainage system, soil or  waste pipe so as
to permit or make  possible the backflow of contaminated water, sewage or waste into the water
supply system.
(3) No flush  valve, vacuum breaker or syphon preventer shall be offered for sale or installed that
has not been approved by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes with
the approval of the State Plumbing Board.
(4) The use or installation of water-operated sump pumps or sewage ejectors, if  connected to the
potable water supply, is prohibited.
(5) No pan, plunger, offset washout, washout, long hopper, frost proof  or other water closets
having invisible seals or  unventilated spaces, or walls not thoroughly washed at each flushing, shall
be installed or sold for use in any building.
(6) No plumbing fixture, appurtenance or device, the installation of which would  be in violation
of the state plumbing specialty code and the rules of the department approved by the board  shall
be sold, offered for sale or installed.
SECTION 104. ORS 447.145 is amended to read:
447.145. (1) All new fixtures approved  for installation during construction, reconstruction, al-
[73]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
teration and repair of buildings and other structures  under ORS 447.020 shall comply with rules
adopted by the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
The rules shall be consistent with performance requirements and  test procedures established by the
American National Standards Institute, or other equivalent recognized North  American standards
and procedures. [ Except for used fixtures allowed under subsection (4) of this  section, ] The average
amount of water  used by new or replacement fixtures under the applicable test procedures shall not
exceed:
(a) 1.6 gallons or 6.06 liters per flush for toilets;
(b) 1.0 gallons or 3.785 liters per flush for urinals;
(c) 2.5 gallons or 9.46 liters per minute for shower heads; and
(d) 2.5 gallons or 9.46 liters per minute for interior faucets.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the director by rule shall provide  for ex-
emptions to the requirements under subsection (1) of this section if:
(a) The reconstruction, alteration or repair of a building  does not include the installation of new
or replacement toilets or urinals, shower heads or faucets within the building;
(b) Due to  the capacity, design or installation of the plumbing or sewage system within an ex-
isting building, toilets or urinals required by subsection (1) of this section would, if  installed in the
building, be unable to meet the performance requirements of the  American National Standards In-
stitute or other equivalent recognized North American standards as adopted by rule;
(c) The fixtures and fittings necessary to perform a specialized function, including but not  lim-
ited to emergency showers and aspirator faucets, cannot meet the requirements;
(d) The installation of fixtures that  do not comply with subsection (1) of this section is necessary
to maintain the historic character of a structure listed under ORS 358.480 to 358.545; or
(e) The fixtures and fittings to be installed are  specifically designed to withstand unusual abuse
or installation in a penal institution or are located in an area with  special needs, such as a labo-
ratory, hospital, nursing home or other health care facility.
(3) No person shall sell or offer for sale any new  toilet, urinal, shower head or faucet that has
not been approved under ORS 447.020.
(4) [On or after December 31, 1995, no person  shall] A person may not  sell or offer for sale any
used toilet, urinal, shower head or interior faucet that does not meet the  conservation standards
established in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) The director shall adopt rules and regulations for marking, labeling or  otherwise identifying
fixtures that meet the standards of this section.
SECTION 105.
 ORS 447.152 is amended to read:
447.152. In compliance with ORS chapter 183, the Director of the  Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes, with the approval of the State Plumbing Board, shall adopt rules,
including but not limited to:
(1) Governing minimum safety standards for design and  construction of plumbing products to be
sold or disposed of in this state.
(2) Establishing procedures for certification of plumbing products.
(3) Establishing criteria  for approval of plumbing product testing laboratories and listing agen-
cies, including but not limited to:
(a) Independence from manufacturers, vendors and when applicable, testing laboratories;
(b) Ethical testing and business standards;
(c) Test quality control;
[74]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Continuity of monitoring continuing product safety;
(e) Certification and listing procedures; and
(f) Record keeping.
(4) Providing for certified or listed product identification.
(5) Establishing criteria for approval of a plumbing product  by a special deputy similar to those
rules established for testing laboratories.
(6) Governing the internal organization and  procedure for administering and enforcing ORS
447.152, 447.154 and 447.156 (1) and (2).
SECTION 106.
 ORS 447.210 is amended to read:
447.210. As used in ORS 447.210 to 447.280, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Affected buildings” includes any place of public accommodations  and commercial facilities
designed, constructed and altered in compliance with the  accessibility standards established by the
Americans with Disabilities Act. “Affected buildings” also includes any government building that  is
subject to Title II of the Americans with Disabilities  Act. “Affected buildings” also includes private
entities, private membership clubs and churches that have more than one floor  level and more than
4,000 square feet in ground area  or that are more than 20 feet in height, measured from the top
surface of the lowest flooring to the highest interior overhead finish of the building.
(2) “Americans with Disabilities Act” means the Americans with  Disabilities Act of 1990 found
at 42 U.S.C. section 12101 et seq.
(3) “Architectural barriers” are physical design features that  restrict the full use of affected
buildings and their related facilities by persons with disabilities.
(4) “Commercial facilities” includes nonresidential facilities,  such as office buildings, factories
and warehouses, whose operations affect commerce.
(5) “Covered multifamily dwellings” means buildings consisting of four or  more dwelling units
if such buildings have one or more elevators, and ground  floor dwelling units in other buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units. Dwelling units within a single structure  separated by
firewalls do not constitute separate buildings.
(6) “Department” means the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(7) “Director” means the  Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes.
(8) “Fair Housing Act” means the Fair Housing Act of 1968, as amended in 1988, found at 42
U.S.C. section [ 3604] 3601 et seq.
(9) “Municipality” means a  city, county or other unit of local government otherwise authorized
by law to enact building codes.
(10) “Private entities” means privately owned entities offering examinations  or courses related
to applications,  licensing, certification or credentials for secondary or post-secondary education,
professional or trade purposes.
(11) “Public accommodations” means a facility whose operations affect  commerce and fall within
at least one of the following categories:
(a) Places of lodging not including owner-occupied establishments renting fewer  than six rooms;
(b) Establishments serving food or drink;
(c) Places of exhibition or entertainment;
(d) Places of public gathering;
(e) Sales or rental establishments;
(f) Service establishments;
[75]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) Public transportation terminals, depots or stations;
(h) Places of public display or collection;
(i) Places of recreation;
(j) Places of education;
(k) Social service center establishments; and
(L) Places of exercise or recreation.
(12) “Related facilities” means building site improvements including, but not limited to,  parking
lots, passageways, roads, clustered mailboxes located either on the site or in  an adjacent public
right of way or any other real or personal property located on the site.
(13) “Structural code” means the specialty code defined in ORS 455.010.
SECTION 107.
 ORS 447.220 is amended to read:
447.220. It is the purpose of ORS 447.210 to 447.280 to make  affected buildings, including but not
limited to commercial facilities, public accommodations, private entities, private membership  clubs
and churches,  in the state accessible to and usable by persons with disabilities, as provided in the
Americans with Disabilities Act, and to make covered multifamily  dwellings in the state accessible
to and usable by all persons with disabilities, as provided in the Fair Housing Act. In requiring that
buildings and facilities be usable by persons  with disabilities, it is not the intention of the Legisla-
tive Assembly to require that items of personal convenience such as rest rooms,  telephones and
drinking fountains be provided  for members of the public who have disabilities if they are not oth-
erwise provided for members of the public who do not  have disabilities. However, pursuant to the
Americans with Disabilities Act,  the Director of the Department of [Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes may provide greater protection to individuals with disabilities by adopting
more stringent standards than prescribed by the Americans with Disabilities Act.
SECTION 108.
 ORS 447.230 is amended to read:
447.230. (1) The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall, pursuant to ORS 455.030 and ORS chapter 183, establish  standards and specifications in the
structural code necessary to eliminate  architectural barriers to entry to and use of affected
buildings and their related facilities by persons who have disabilities.
(2) The director shall, to assist in  the identification of architectural barriers and in the devel-
opment of the standards and specifications referred to in subsection (1) of this section,  be assisted
by the Oregon Disabilities Commission or its designee.
SECTION 109. ORS 447.231 is amended to read:
447.231. Notwithstanding any other provision of law and the authority of any board  within the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes , the  Director of the Department
of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall adopt rules to conform the state building
code to the Americans with Disabilities Act  and the Fair Housing Act and the regulations adopted
thereunder. In addition,  the director shall adopt rules to conform the state building code to the
provisions  of  ORS 447.210 to 447.280, to the extent to which any statute is stricter than the Ameri-
cans with Disabilities Act or the Fair Housing Act.
SECTION 110. ORS 447.233 is amended to read:
447.233. (1) The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall include in the state building code, as defined in ORS 455.010, a requirement that the  number
of accessible parking spaces specified in subsection (2) of this section be  provided for affected
buildings subject to the state building code and that the spaces  be signed as required by subsection
(2) of this section. Spaces may also be marked in a manner specified in the state building code.
[76]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2)(a) The number of accessible parking spaces shall be:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Required Required
Required Minimum Number Minimum Number of
Total Parking Minimum Number of of Van “Wheelchair User
In Lot Accessible Spaces Accessible Spaces Only” Spaces
1 to 25 1 1 -
26 to 50 2 1 -
51 to 75 3 1 -
76 to 100 4 1 -
101 to 150 5 - 1
151 to 200 6 - 1
201 to 300 7 - 1
301 to 400 8 - 1
401 to 500 9 - 2
501 to 1,000 2% of total - 1 in every 8
accessible spaces or
portion thereof
1,001 and over 20 plus 1 for each - 1 in every 8
100 over 1,000 accessible spaces or
portion thereof
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(b) In addition, one in every eight accessible spaces, but not less than one,  shall be van acces-
sible. Where five or more parking spaces are designated accessible, any space that is designated as
van accessible shall be reserved for wheelchair users. A van accessible parking space  shall be at
least nine feet wide and shall have an adjacent access aisle that is at least eight feet wide.
(c) Accessible parking spaces shall be at least nine feet wide and  shall have an adjacent access
aisle that is at least six feet wide.
(d) The access aisle shall be located  on the passenger side of the parking space except that two
adjacent accessible parking spaces may share a common access aisle.
(e) A sign shall be posted  for each accessible parking space. The sign shall be clearly visible
to a person parking in the space, shall be marked with the International Symbol of Access and  shall
indicate that the spaces are  reserved for persons with disabled person parking permits. A van ac-
cessible  parking  space shall have an additional sign marked “Van Accessible” mounted below the
sign. A  van accessible parking space reserved for wheelchair users shall have a sign that includes
the words “Wheelchair User Only.”
(f) Accessible parking  spaces and signs shall be designed in compliance with the standards set
forth by the Oregon Transportation Commission in  consultation with the Oregon Disabilities Com-
mission.
(3) No ramp or obstacle  may extend into the parking space or the aisle, and curb cuts and ramps
may not be situated in such a way that they could be blocked by a legally parked vehicle.
(4) Parking spaces required by this section shall be maintained so  as to meet the requirements
of this section at all times and to meet the standards established by the state building code.
[77]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) The director is  authorized to inspect parking spaces and facilities and buildings subject to
the provisions of this section, and to do whatever is necessary to enforce the requirements, including
the maintenance requirements, of this section. Municipalities  and counties may administer and en-
force the requirements of this section in the manner provided under ORS 455.148 or  455.150 for ad-
ministration and enforcement of specialty codes. All plans for parking spaces subject to  the
provisions of this section must be approved by the director prior to the creation of the spaces.
(6) Requirements adopted under this section do not apply to long-term parking facilities at  the
Portland International Airport.
(7) Any reported violation of this section shall be investigated by the  administrative authority.
The administrative authority shall make a final decision and order  correction, if necessary, within
30 days of notification. Any aggrieved person may appeal within  30 days of the decision by the ad-
ministrative authority to the appropriate municipal appeals board or, at the option of the  local ju-
risdiction, directly to the Building Codes Structures Board established under  ORS 455.132. The
appeal shall be acted upon within 60 days of filing. The decision of the municipal  appeals board may
be appealed to the board. The board shall act on the appeal within 60 days of filing. All  appeals to
the board shall be filed in accordance with ORS 455.690.
SECTION 111.
 ORS 447.247 is amended to read:
447.247. (1) Elevators are required:
(a) In all shopping centers, shopping  malls, professional offices of health care providers and
government buildings that are covered by Title II of the Americans with Disabilities Act;
(b) In all other commercial facilities,  private entities and places of public accommodation cov-
ered by Title III of the Americans with Disabilities Act that have more  than one floor level and
more than 3,000 square feet in ground area or that are more than 20 feet  in height, measured from
the top surface of the lowest flooring to the highest interior overhead finish of the building; and
(c) In  all private membership clubs and churches that have more than one floor level and more
than 4,000 square feet in ground area  or that are more than 20 feet in height, measured from the
top surface of the lowest flooring to the highest interior overhead finish of the building.
(2) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  may by rule create
exceptions to the  requirements of this section if this section would require an elevator in a building
that would not be required to have an elevator under the provisions of the Americans with  Disa-
bilities Act or the Fair Housing Act.
SECTION 112.
 ORS 447.250 is amended to read:
447.250. (1) When  a person or governmental entity undertaking the construction, renovation,
alteration or modification of an affected building or  its related facilities determines that a particular
standard or specification exceeds the  standards or specifications imposed by the Americans with
Disabilities Act and the Fair Housing Act, and that full  compliance with the standard or specifica-
tion is impractical in that it would defeat the purpose of the project proposed or in process, it  may
apply to the appeals board having jurisdiction over the project for a  waiver or modification of such
standard or specification, setting forth the reasons for its determination and  a proposal for the work
complying with the particular  standard or specification to the maximum extent that it considers
practical.
(2)(a) For projects involving a state correctional facility as defined in  ORS 421.005 (2), or a local
correctional facility, as defined in  ORS 169.005, the appeals board referred to in subsection (1) of
this section is the Building Codes Structures Board established under ORS 455.132.
(b) For all other projects, the appeals board referred to in subsection (1) of  this section is the
[78]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
appeals board  established under ORS 455.020 (4) by the municipality having jurisdiction over the
project.
(3) The appeals board shall thereupon  investigate the application. The board in its investigation
shall be required to seek the advice of the Oregon  Disabilities Commission or its designee in dealing
with architectural barrier waivers. If the appeals board finds that the proposal submitted  with the
application would constitute a substantial compliance with, or an acceptable alternative to, the
particular standard or specification in view of the objectives  of ORS 447.210 to 447.280, the waiver
shall be granted. If the board finds otherwise, the application shall be  promptly denied with notice
to the requesting person or governmental entity of the denial.
(4) The findings of the appeals board shall include the estimated building  costs and the addi-
tional cost of construction to  conform to the requirements of ORS 447.210 to 447.280 over the cost
of a nonconforming feature or any other special reason or circumstance that, in the judgment of the
board, justifies the decision.
(5) Any person aggrieved by the final decision of an appeals board may within 30  days of the
decision appeal to the Director of the Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes. [In the case where no ] If an  appeals board has not been created the director shall have
original jurisdiction of an application for a waiver. The applicant for a waiver or an appeal shall
submit a  fee of $20 payable to the director with the request for waiver or appeal. In determining
an appeal or an original application, the procedures and standards  of subsections (1) to (4) of this
section shall apply to the director.
SECTION 113.
 ORS 447.260 is amended to read:
447.260. (1) The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
may promulgate rules reasonably necessary  to implement and enforce ORS 447.210 to 447.280 as part
of the structural code including, but not limited to,  rules authorizing the director to waive or modify
any standards  and specifications with respect to work on affected buildings and their related facili-
ties where the director determines, with respect to emergency or temporary  construction, that
compliance with such standards or specifications  would not be necessary to fulfill the objectives of
ORS 447.210 to 447.280 or would be impractical.
(2) The director [ of the Department of Consumer and Business Services ] shall by rule establish
criteria  for  determining the lowest flooring of a building for the purposes of the definition of “af-
fected buildings” provided by ORS 447.210 and for the purposes of ORS 447.247.
SECTION 114. ORS 447.270 is amended to read:
447.270. The Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
or the designated  representative of the director shall cooperate with and receive the assistance of
all persons, all appropriate elective or appointive public officials and all state or  governmental
agencies in carrying out the responsibilities of the director under ORS 447.210 to 447.280.
SECTION 115. ORS 447.275 is amended to read:
447.275. Architects, engineers or other persons designing buildings; contractors and other  per-
sons erecting buildings; building officials, plans examiners, inspectors, the Director  of the Depart-
ment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes , the State Fire Marshal, State Fire
Marshal deputies, municipal fire marshals or municipal deputies inspecting buildings; or a municipal
appeals board shall be relieved of any personal or financial liability from persons suffering injury
or death or those  persons’ heirs as the result of exiting deficiencies during emergencies resulting
from access for  persons with disabilities required by ORS 447.210 to 447.280 or standards adopted
under them.
[79]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 116. ORS 448.330 is amended to read:
448.330. (1) The Director  of the Oregon Health Authority may prohibit the sale of water pipe
used to carry potable water and solders, fillers or  brazing material used in making up joints and
fittings in this state and the installation or use of water  pipe used to carry potable water and
solders, fillers or brazing material used in making up joints and fittings in any private or public
potable water supply system or individual water user’s  lines until such time as the director deter-
mines that adequate standards exist and are practiced in the  manufacture of water pipe used to
carry potable water  and solders, fillers or brazing material used in making up joints and fittings to
[insure] ensure  that the pipe and solder do not present a present or potential threat to the public
health in this state.
(2) The director shall adopt, by rule, product acceptability criteria for water pipe used  to carry
potable  water  and solders, fillers or brazing material used in making up joints and fittings for water
supply purposes  [ which insure ] that ensure  that the pipe and solder do not present a threat to the
public health in this state. The Oregon Health Authority  shall be responsible for the monitoring of
the sale and use  of water pipe used to carry potable water and solders, fillers or brazing material
used in making up joints and fittings for compliance with the  product acceptability criteria. The
Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall cooperate with, and assist,
the authority in its monitoring efforts.
(3) No water pipe used to  carry potable water or solders, fillers or brazing material used in
making up joints and fittings [ which] that  does not conform to the product acceptability criteria
adopted under subsection (2) of this section shall be sold in this state or installed in any  part of any
public or private potable water supply system or individual water user’s lines.
(4) Notwithstanding  subsection (1) or (3) of this section, the director may grant exemptions from
any prohibition of the sale or use of water pipe used to carry potable water for the emergency repair
or replacement of any existing  part of a water supply system, or for the necessary use by a well
driller in the installation of a well. The director may require any person using water  pipe used to
carry potable water under this subsection to notify the authority of the date and location of that
use.
SECTION 117.
 ORS 450.837 is amended to read:
450.837. (1) Water authorities and sanitary authorities are municipalities for the purposes  of
administering and enforcing the plumbing code as provided under ORS 455.150.
(2) However,  notwithstanding ORS 455.150 (3), a building official appointed by a water authority
or sanitary authority or an inspector acting under  the authority and direction of such a building
official shall administer and enforce only that portion of the plumbing code governing the installa-
tion and maintenance of connections between structures  and the mains and sewers of the authority.
(3) Nothing in this section authorizes a building official or inspector of a water authority or
sanitary authority to administer or enforce all or part  of any specialty code except the plumbing
code.
(4) A water authority or sanitary authority shall notify the Director of the  Department of
[Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes not later than May 1 of each year as  to whether
the authority will or will not exercise the code enforcement power granted by this section.
SECTION 118.
 ORS 453.370 is amended to read:
453.370. (1) In order to maintain  and ensure the effectiveness of state programs established un-
der ORS 453.307 to 453.414,  as well as to ensure the effectiveness of local efforts, a local government
may establish, enforce or enact a local community  right to know regulatory program provided that
[80]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the local program complies with the requirements of this section.
(2) To the extent that a local program is supported in whole or  in part by fees, those fees may
be set, imposed or assessed only by the local government that is implementing the local  program.
Such fees are allowed only to the extent not otherwise prohibited or limited by law. Such fees:
(a) Shall be adopted by ordinance as a fee schedule, after notice and public hearing; and
(b) May not exceed $2,000 for any single facility in any calendar year.
(3)(a) All local community right to  know regulatory program enforcement, including but not
limited to penalties, may be imposed only by a local fire official or a board established  by the local
government to implement the local community right to know regulatory program.
(b) Penalties  for violations of a community right to know regulatory program may not exceed
$1,000 per day and shall be assessed according to a schedule adopted  by the local government after
notice and public hearing. Except when a local government  has reasonable grounds to find that an
employer willfully and knowingly avoided compliance with the local program, and as long as the
employer submits the required information within 30  days following a written notification of non-
compliance, penalties shall be suspended if the employer has no history  of violating the local pro-
gram.
(4) After notice and public hearing, the local government must determine that:
(a) Existing reporting to local, state or federal agencies is inadequate to  meet the needs and
concerns of the local government;
(b) The state or federal government does  not collect data that will provide substantially the
same information desired by the local government;
(c) The local government has asked the appropriate state agency  to operate the program desired
by the local government and the state agency has not committed to do so within 180 days;
(d) The Department  of Environmental Quality, the State Fire Marshal and the Oregon Health
Authority have had an opportunity to comment on the proposed  program and the local government
has responded to those comments; and
(e) The local government has provided an  opportunity for written and oral public comment on
the proposed program.
(5) Any local government that operates a local community right to know regulatory program
shall:
(a) Provide for an opportunity to report data electronically;
(b) Place data reported under the program on the Internet with instructions for the  general
public that explain the organization of the data; and
(c) Keep records of data usage and otherwise document interest in the collected data.
(6) Data  and other information presented under a local community right to know regulatory
program:
(a) Shall clearly  distinguish, where appropriate, public health interpretations from the raw data;
(b) May, where feasible, indicate  specifically which hazardous substances and toxic substances
are being released into the local air, water and land; and
(c) Shall include locations  where a person may obtain epidemiological statistics related to health
effects of the hazardous substances and toxic substances, if available.
(7) For any hazardous substance  or toxic substance that a local government proposes to require
an employer to report under a local community right to know regulatory program  established pur-
suant to this section, the local government shall seek written and oral public comment and provide
written notice to interested parties  prior to adoption as a reporting requirement. The local govern-
[81]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment must provide the public with an opportunity to comment on the  appropriateness of reporting
on the proposed hazardous  substance or toxic substance, including but not limited to commenting
on health and environmental considerations, economic concerns and feasibility of compliance. The
local government shall consider the comments before adopting a list or making additions  to a list
of hazardous substances and toxic substances to be reported.
(8) In  administering a local community right to know regulatory program, a local government
shall establish procedures to exempt, when reasonable, an entity from  all or part of the local pro-
gram for the purpose of protecting  trade secrets or where the local government determines that the
operations of the entity pose little or no risk to the public health or the environment.
(9) Except as prohibited by  federal or state law, a local program may not differentiate between
public and private employers.
(10) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of a local government to:
(a) Distribute information  collected under the state Community Right to Know and Protection
Act; or
(b) Adopt or enforce a local ordinance, rule or regulation strictly necessary to comply with:
(A) The Uniform  Building Code as adopted and amended by the Director of the Department of
[Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes;
(B) A uniform fire code; or
(C) Any requirement of a state or federal statute, rule or regulation,  including but not limited
to those controlling hazardous substances, toxic substances or other environmental contaminants.
SECTION 119.
 ORS 453.864 is amended to read:
453.864. The Director of the Oregon Health  Authority shall adopt rules to carry out ORS
105.555, 431.175 and 453.855 to 453.912. The rules shall be developed in consultation with:
(1) The State Fire Marshal or designee;
(2) The director of the Poison Control  and Drug Information Program of the Oregon Health and
Science University, or a designee thereof;
(3) The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, or a designee thereof;
(4) The Director of the Department of [ Consumer and  Business Services ] Building Codes , or a
designee thereof;
(5) The Director of Transportation, or a designee thereof; and
(6) Any other governmental agency determined appropriate by the  Oregon Health Authority
whose advice and information is necessary for the formulation  of the rules authorized by this sec-
tion.
SECTION 120.
 ORS 453.879 is amended to read:
453.879. When the Director of the Oregon Health Authority or  a designee thereof, the State Fire
Marshal or designee  thereof or any law enforcement agency makes a determination that property
subject to ORS 105.555, 431.175 and 453.855 to 453.912 is not fit for use, the Director  of the Oregon
Health Authority or designee thereof shall notify the Director of the Department  of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes of the determination.  The Director of the Department of [ Con-
sumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall list the property  as not fit for use until the Di-
rector of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes is notified that the
property has been certified by the Oregon Health Authority pursuant to ORS 453.885, or the  initial
determination is reversed  on appeal, or the property is destroyed. Upon receipt of the certificate,
the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall cause  the
property to be removed from the list described in this section.
[82]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 121. ORS 453.885 is amended to read:
453.885. (1) The owner of property determined to be not fit for use under ORS 105.555, 431.175
and 453.855 to 453.912 who desires  to have the property certified as fit for use may use the services
of a contractor licensed by the Oregon Health Authority to decontaminate the  property or, upon
approval by the authority, the owner, or an agent of the owner,  may perform the decontamination
work. The contractor, in coordination with  the owner or agent of the owner, shall prepare and
submit a written work plan for decontamination to the  authority. If the work plan is approved and
the decontamination work is completed according to the plan and  is properly documented, the au-
thority shall certify the property as having been decontaminated in compliance with rules of the
authority. Upon the completion of the work plan, the authority shall  require the licensed
contractor’s affidavit of compliance with the approved work plan.
(2) The property owner  shall notify the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes of the certification. No person who is not licensed  by the authority under
ORS 105.555, 431.175 and  453.855 to 453.912 shall advertise to undertake or perform the work nec-
essary to decontaminate property determined to be not  fit for use under ORS 105.555, 431.175 and
453.855 to 453.912.
(3) Upon receipt of  the certificate and a request by the property owner to remove the property
from the list, the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall cause the property to be removed from the list.
SECTION 122.
 ORS 453.897 is amended to read:
453.897. The  Oregon Health Authority shall provide lists of the names of contractors licensed
under ORS 105.555,  431.175 and 453.855 to 453.912 to the Director of the Department of [ Consumer
and Business  Services ] Building Codes who shall distribute the lists to local building code enforce-
ment agencies. The local agencies  shall make the list available on request and shall supply a copy
to any property owner whose property is determined to  be not fit for use under ORS 105.555, 431.175
and 453.855 to 453.912.
SECTION 123. ORS 453.906 is amended to read:
453.906. The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall adopt rules fixing  uniform standards whereby local building code enforcement agencies may
require that property determined under ORS  105.555, 431.175 and 453.855 to 453.912 to be not fit for
use may be subject to action to condemn or demolish the property  or to require the property be
vacated or contents be removed from the property.
SECTION 124. ORS 455.010 is amended to read:
455.010. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Advisory  board” means the board with responsibility for assisting in the adoption,
amendment or administration of a specialty code, specifically:
(A) The Building Codes Structures Board established under ORS 455.132;
(B) The Electrical and Elevator Board established under ORS 455.138;
(C) The State Plumbing Board established under ORS 693.115;
(D) The Board of Boiler Rules established under ORS 480.535;
(E) The Residential and Manufactured Structures Board established under ORS 455.135;
(F) The Mechanical Board established under ORS 455.140; or
(G) The Construction Industry Energy Board established under ORS 455.492.
(b) “Appropriate advisory board” means the advisory board that has jurisdiction over a  partic-
ular code, standard, license, certification or matter.
[83]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) “Department” means the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(3) “Director” means the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes.
(4) “Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code” means  the adopted specialty code prescribing stan-
dards for the construction of residential dwellings  that are three stories or less above grade and
have an exterior door for each dwelling unit, but are not facilities or  homes described in ORS
443.400 or transient lodging.
(5) “Municipality” means a city, county or other unit of local  government otherwise authorized
by law to administer a building code.
(6) “Prefabricated structure”  means a building or subassembly that has been in whole or sub-
stantial part  manufactured or assembled using closed construction at an off-site location to be
wholly or partially assembled on-site. “Prefabricated structure”  does not include a manufactured
dwelling, recreational structure or recreational vehicle, as those terms are defined in ORS 446.003.
(7) “Specialty code” means a  code of regulations adopted under ORS 446.062, 446.185, 447.020 (2),
455.020 (2), 455.496, 455.610, 455.680, 460.085, 460.360, 479.730 (1) or 480.545, but does  not include
regulations adopted by the State Fire Marshal pursuant  to ORS chapter 476 or ORS 479.015 to
479.200 and 479.210 to 479.220.
(8) “State building code” means the combined specialty codes.
(9) “Structural code” means the specialty code prescribing structural standards  for building
construction.
(10) “Unsafe condition” means a condition caused  by earthquake [ which] that  is determined by
the department or any representative of  the department to be dangerous to life and property. “Un-
safe condition” includes but is not limited to:
(a) Any portion, member or  appurtenance of a building that has become detached or dislodged
or appears likely to fail or collapse and thereby injure persons or damage property; or
(b) Any portion, of a building  or structure that has been damaged by earthquake, or by fire or
explosion resulting from an  earthquake, to the extent that the structural strength or stability of the
building is substantially less than it was prior to the earthquake.
SECTION 125.
 ORS 455.015 is amended to read:
455.015. The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(1)(a) It  is in the best interests of this state that construction-related development activities
proceed in a manner that is as quick and efficient as practicable;
(b) Ensuring that construction-related development activities proceed quickly and  efficiently re-
quires a flexible and responsive system for state building code administration and enforcement; and
(c) Having a flexible and responsive system for state building code administration and  enforce-
ment requires that sufficient staff and resources  be available to assist the Director of the Depart-
ment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes as needed.
(2) It is in  the best interests of this state that state building code regulations encourage eco-
nomic development, experimentation,  innovation and cost effectiveness in construction, especially
construction in rural or remote parts of this state.
SECTION 126.
 ORS 455.020 is amended to read:
455.020. (1)  This chapter is enacted to enable the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes to promulgate a state building code to govern the construction,
reconstruction, alteration and repair of buildings and other structures  and the installation of me-
chanical devices and equipment therein, and  to require the correction of unsafe conditions caused
[84]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by earthquakes in existing buildings. The state building code shall establish  uniform performance
standards providing  reasonable safeguards for health, safety, welfare, comfort and security of the
residents of this state who  are occupants and users of buildings, and will provide for the use of
modern methods, devices, materials, techniques and practicable maximum energy conservation.
(2) The rules adopted pursuant to this chapter  shall include structural standards; standards for
the installation and use of  mechanical, heating and ventilating devices and equipment; and standards
for prefabricated structures; and shall, subject to  ORS 455.210, prescribe reasonable fees for the is-
suance of building permits and similar documents, inspections and plan review services by  the De-
partment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes. The department  may also establish,
by rule, the amount  of any fee pertaining to the state building code or any specialty code that is
authorized by statute, but for which an amount is not specified by statute.
(3) This  chapter does not affect the statutory jurisdiction and authority of the Workers’ Com-
pensation Board, under ORS chapter 654,  to promulgate occupational safety and health standards
relating to places of employment,  and to administer and enforce all state laws, regulations, rules,
standards and lawful orders requiring places of employment to be safe and healthful.
(4) Except where the power of municipalities to enact a regulation  described in this sub-
section is expressly withheld or  otherwise provided for by statute,  this chapter and any spe-
cialty code does not limit the authority of a municipality to enact regulations providing for :
(a) Local administration of the state building code;
(b) Local appeal boards;
(c) Fees and other charges;
(d) Abatement of nuisances and dangerous buildings;
(e) Enforcement through penalties, stop-work orders or other means; or
(f) Minimum health, sanitation  and safety standards for governing the use of structures for
housing[, except where the power of municipalities to enact any such regulations is expressly withheld
or otherwise provided for by statute ].
(5) Pursuant to  the regulation of dangerous buildings, a municipality may adopt seismic reha-
bilitation plans that provide for phased completion of repairs  that are designed to provide improved
life safety but that may be less than the standards for new buildings.
SECTION 127. ORS 455.022 is amended to read:
455.022. All moneys deposited to the [ Consumer and Business Services  Fund ] Department of
Building Codes Fund that  are derived pursuant to ORS 455.240 or 460.370, or from state building
code or specialty code program fees for which  the amounts are established by Department of [ Con-
sumer and  Business Services ] Building Codes rule pursuant to ORS 455.020 (2), [ are continuously
appropriated to ] shall be  used by  the department for carrying out any of the duties, functions and
powers of the department under ORS  455.240 or 460.310 to 460.370 or under a program for which a
fee amount is established by department rule pursuant to ORS 455.020 (2)[ , without  regard to the
source of the moneys ].
SECTION 128. ORS 455.028 is amended to read:
455.028. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business  Services ] Building Codes may enter into
interagency agreements with the Construction Contractors Board for the  board to perform duties
on behalf of the department under ORS 446.566 to 446.646, [ 446.666 to 446.746,] 479.510 to 479.945
or 480.510 to 480.670, this chapter or ORS chapter 447, 460 or 693 regarding:
(a) Licenses, registrations and other authorizations; or
(b) The construction, reconstruction, renovation, alteration or repair of structures.
[85]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Subject to the approval of the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and  Business Ser-
vices] Building Codes or the affected advisory board, the department or advisory board may enter
into an agreement with the Construction Contractors Board under this section  regarding perform-
ance of advisory board duties by the Construction Contractors  Board. An agreement described in
this subsection  is considered for purposes of this section to be an agreement between the department
and the Construction Contractors Board.
(3) An interagency agreement under this section may provide for  the board to perform all or
part of the duties described in the  agreement within one or more municipalities, geographic areas
described in agreements under ORS 455.185 or  state building code administrative regions established
as provided under ORS 455.042, or on a statewide basis.  The director may use an agreement under
this section for the purpose of ensuring adequate  staff and resources as provided under ORS 455.192.
Any board employees utilized to carry out an agreement under  this section shall remain employees
of the board without loss of seniority  or reduction in pay or benefits, but the agreement may provide
for the department to  retain control over the final work product of the employees. An agreement
under this section may not be used to avoid any provision of a collective bargaining agreement.
(4) An interagency agreement under this section may provide for:
(a) Good faith  cooperation between the board and the department to enable the board and the
department to carry out their respective duties under law or under the agreement;
(b) The sharing of resources, including but not limited to the system described in  ORS 455.095
and 455.097, equipment, systems, processes and records, documents and other information;
(c) Using  board and department information, including but not limited to complaints, reports,
findings and orders, to carry out the laws that the board administers and  enforces on behalf of the
department;
(d) Ensuring the security of information shared under the agreement;
(e) Purchases by the board of supplies and equipment to carry out duties on behalf of  the de-
partment, subject to the department’s reimbursement of the board;
(f) The use of financing agreements to provide resources necessary or  convenient to carry out
the agreement; and
(g) Acceptance by the board  of moneys in payment of department fees, the temporary retention
and transfer of fee moneys and the reimbursement of  the board’s expenses under the agreement from
those fee moneys.
(5)(a) A  financing agreement provided for as described in subsection (4)(f) of this section is ex-
empt from ORS 283.085 to 283.092 and ORS chapter 286A.
(b) Any department moneys accepted by the  board as provided in subsection (4)(g) of this section
must be identified and accounted for separately from any other moneys in the  possession of or
available to the board. Department moneys temporarily retained by the board, regardless of  where
kept or  deposited, are moneys of the department. The retained moneys are not subject to any ap-
propriation to the board, any authorization for or limitation on the expenditure of moneys  by the
board, any  restriction on the source, use or transfer of board moneys or any judgment, lien or other
claim against moneys of the  board. Notwithstanding any requirement or limitation on the retention
of moneys by a state agency, the retention of department moneys by  the board under an interagency
agreement described in this section shall be governed solely by the terms of the agreement.
(6) An interagency agreement under this section may not:
(a) Delegate the authority  of the director to establish policies or to make a final determination
on any matter;
[86]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Allow the board to hold department fee moneys in  a board account under ORS 182.470 that
does not allow for the separate tracking and accounting of those moneys;
(c) Allow the board to hold department fee moneys past the end of the fiscal quarter in which
the fee moneys were collected; or
(d) Transfer department expenses to the board.
SECTION 129.
 ORS 455.030 is amended to read:
455.030. (1) Subject to any requirement for approval by the appropriate advisory boards,  the
Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may adopt, amend
or repeal rules for carrying out the responsibilities of the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes to develop, implement, administer and enforce a program  that relates to
the state building code or  a specialty code. Except as otherwise provided by this section, the di-
rector shall be  subject to ORS chapter 183 in the adoption, amendment or repeal of regulations au-
thorized by, and in the issuance of orders in contested cases arising under, this chapter.
(2)(a) In addition to the notice requirements of ORS 183.335,  notice of a public hearing on
adoption, amendment or repeal of a specialty code shall be given to the governing  bodies of all
municipalities and the notice shall state that copies of the proposed action may be  obtained from
the department.
(b) The notice  of proposed rule change shall include a finding by the advisory board that the
added cost, if any, is necessary to the  health and safety of the occupants or the public or necessary
to conserve scarce resources.
(c) The director shall maintain  a roster of individuals who wish to be notified of any changes
to or interpretations of the Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code.  Subscribers to the list may be
charged  a  reasonable amount necessary to defray the cost of maintaining the list and advising the
subscribers of changes in the code.
(3) The director is not required  to publish or distribute those parts of a specialty code of regu-
lations adopted by reference. However, the director shall publish with a specialty code  and annually
thereafter a list of places where copies of those  parts of the specialty code adopted by reference
may be obtained together with the approximate cost thereof. The director shall file one copy  of the
rule with the Secretary of State. All standards referred to in any specialty code or any of the mod-
ifications thereto need not be so filed.  All standards and specialty codes referred to in the specialty
code shall be kept on file and available for inspection in the offices of the department.
(4) Any interested person may  propose amendments to the state building code .[, which ] The
proposed amendments may be either applicable to all municipalities or, where it is  alleged and es-
tablished that conditions exist within a municipality or  some municipalities that are not generally
found within other municipalities, amendments may be restricted in  application to such munici-
palities. Amendments proposed to the state building code  under this subsection shall be in con-
formity with the policy and purpose prescribed by ORS 455.020. The justification and  the particular
circumstances requiring the proposed amendments shall be fully stated in the proposal. The director
shall submit all proposed amendments to the  appropriate advisory board. The board shall review and
report its recommendations to the director on the amendments within 180 days after  the date of
submission by the director.
(5) The director, with the approval of the advisory board,  may adopt or modify and adopt any
amendments proposed to the director under subsection (4) of this section. The  director shall, within
30 days after the date of receipt of the recommendations of the advisory board, notify the  person
proposing the amendments of the adoption, modification and adoption or denial of  the proposed
[87]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
amendments. Upon adoption, a copy of  each amendment shall be distributed to the governing bodies
of all municipalities affected thereby.
(6) The director shall from time to time make or cause to be made investigations, or may accept
authenticated  reports  from authoritative sources, concerning new materials or modes of construction
intended for use in the construction of buildings or structures, or intended for use in  other activity
regulated by the state building code, and shall,  where necessary, propose amendments to the code
setting forth the conditions under which the materials or modes may be used, in accordance  with
the standards and procedures of this chapter.
SECTION 130. ORS 455.040 is amended to read:
455.040. [(1)] The state building code shall be applicable and uniform  throughout this state and
in all municipalities, and no municipality shall enact or enforce any ordinance, rule or regulation
relating to the same matters encompassed by the state building  code but [ which] that  provides dif-
ferent requirements  unless authorized by the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes. The director’s  authorization shall not be considered an amendment to the
state building code under ORS 455.030. The  director shall encourage experimentation, innovation
and cost effectiveness by municipalities  in the adoption of ordinances, rules or regulations [ which]
that conflict with the state building code.
[(2) Subsection (1) of this section is operative: ]
[(a) With regard to the state structural code, July 1, 1974. ]
[(b) With regard to the state mechanical, heating  and ventilating code, on the effective date of such
code as determined under ORS 183.355. ]
[(c) With regard to each specialty code not named by paragraphs (a) and (b) of  this subsection, on
the effective date, as determined under  ORS 183.355, of the first amendments to such code adopted
pursuant to this chapter. ]
SECTION 131.
 ORS 455.042 is amended to read:
455.042. The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall establish regions for all areas of  the state to carry out the uniform administration of the state
building code. The director shall assign  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes employees for the regions as necessary to:
(1) Promote consistent interpretation of the state building code;
(2) Resolve disputes between local building officials and contractors or developers regarding the
application of one or more provisions of the state building code; and
(3) Provide oversight and enforcement of ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285,  446.395 to
446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950, 479.995 and 480.510  to 480.670 and ORS chapters 447, 455, 460
and 693 and the rules adopted under those statutes.
SECTION 132.
 ORS 455.044 is amended to read:
455.044. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may  establish
and staff a Tri-County Building Industry Service Center to make available to  licensed contractors
and their employees, local governments and the public the resources and services  described in ORS
455.042 and 455.046.
(2) The Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business  Services ] Building Codes may
adopt by rule  a reasonable fee schedule for the purpose of recovering the costs incurred by the de-
partment in providing services under ORS 455.046. Fees adopted and imposed under this section
shall be in addition to the total building permit fees otherwise imposed in  Clackamas, Multnomah
and Washington Counties. A municipality shall collect fees  adopted and imposed under this section
[88]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and remit the fees to the department.
SECTION 133. ORS 455.046 is amended to read:
455.046. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall:
(a) Develop and administer an installation label program for minor installations  under the state
building code, including but not limited to  electrical installations under ORS 455.627, 479.540 and
479.570 and plumbing installations under ORS 447.076;
(b) Develop standard application forms and procedures for use by municipalities  in Clackamas,
Multnomah and Washington Counties when issuing  structural, mechanical, electrical, plumbing and
other permits when those permits do not require a review of building plans;
(c) Develop standard application forms and procedures for issuing building permits and record-
ing inspections;
(d) Develop standard forms and procedures for reviewing building plans;
(e) Establish standardized criteria and methodology for  determining fee amounts for permits that
are required under the state building code established under ORS 455.030;
(f) Maintain and make available  to the public the names of persons certified to review building
plans;
(g) Maintain and make available to the public the names of persons certified to perform techni-
cal inspections; and
(h) Administer prepaid building permit cost accounts.
(2) The department may use the resources of the Tri-County Building Industry Service  Center
to:
(a) Assist local building  officials in the administration and enforcement of the state building
code; and
(b) Establish a process to facilitate the consistent application of the state  building code
throughout the state.
SECTION 134.
 ORS 455.048 is amended to read:
455.048. In accordance with the applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183, the Director of the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may adopt  rules necessary for the
implementation of ORS 455.044 and 455.046.
SECTION 135. ORS 455.055 is amended to read:
455.055. The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
may adopt  rules establishing uniform permit, inspection and certificate of occupancy requirements
under the state building code. The rules  may include, but need not be limited to, rules establishing
standards for building inspections and  inspection procedures and rules establishing uniform forms
for certificates of occupancy. In adopting rules under this section, the  director may establish a
process for a municipality to address conditions  that are unique to the municipality’s enforcement
of the state building code or that are not addressed by the rules  establishing uniform permit, in-
spection and certificate of occupancy requirements.
SECTION 136. ORS 455.058 is amended to read:
455.058. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the  Department of [ Consumer
and Business Services ] Building Codes , or a  municipality administering and enforcing a building
inspection program, may assess an investigation fee against a person that  is required to obtain a
permit for work on the electrical, gas, mechanical, elevator, boiler,  plumbing or other systems of a
building or structure if the work is commenced before the  permit required for the work is obtained.
The amount of the investigation fee shall be  the average or actual additional cost of ensuring that
[89]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a building, structure or system is in  conformance with state building code requirements that results
from the person not obtaining a required  permit before work for which the permit is required com-
mences.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) An emergency repair required for health,  safety, the prevention of property damage or the
prevention of financial harm if the required building permit for the repair is obtained no later  than
five business days after commencement of the repair; or
(b) Any project for which construction, alteration,  repair, maintenance or installation in a
building or structure prior to obtaining a permit is expressly authorized by law.
(3) The department may adopt rules and establish policies and procedures for use  by the de-
partment or municipalities in assessing an investigation fee under this section.
SECTION 137.
 ORS 455.060 is amended to read:
455.060. (1) Any person who desires to use or furnish any material, design  or method of con-
struction or installation in the  state, or any building official, may request the Director of the De-
partment of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes to issue a ruling with respect to the
acceptability of any material, design or method of construction about which there is  a question un-
der any  provision of the state building code. Requests shall be in writing and, if made by anyone
other than a building official, shall be made and the ruling issued  prior to the use or attempted use
of such questioned material, design or method.
(2) In making rulings, the director shall obtain the approval of  the appropriate advisory board
as to technical and scientific  facts and shall consider the standards and interpretations published
by the body that promulgated  any nationally recognized model code adopted as a specialty code of
this state.
(3) A copy of the ruling issued by the director shall be certified to  the person making the re-
quest. Additional copies shall be transmitted to all building officials in the state. The director  shall
keep a permanent record of all such rulings, and shall furnish copies  thereof to any interested per-
son upon payment of such fees as the director may prescribe.
(4) A building official or inspector shall approve the use of any material, design  or method of
construction approved by the director pursuant to this section if  the requirements of all other local
ordinances are satisfied.
SECTION 138. ORS 455.062 is amended to read:
455.062. (1) A Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes employee acting
within the scope of that employment may provide typical plans and specifications:
(a) For structures of a type  for which the provision of plans or specifications is exempted under
ORS 671.030 from the application  of ORS 671.010 to 671.220 and exempted under ORS 672.060 from
the application of ORS 672.002 to 672.325; and
(b) Notwithstanding  ORS 671.010 to 671.220 and 672.002 to 672.325, for structures that are metal
or wood frame Use and Occupancy Classification Group  U structures under the structural specialty
code.
(2) A building official or inspector,  as those terms are defined in ORS 455.715, when acting
within the scope of direct employment by a municipality, may provide typical plans and specifica-
tions for structures of a type for which the provision  of plans or specifications is exempted under
ORS 671.030 from the application  of ORS 671.010 to 671.220 and exempted under ORS 672.060 from
the application of ORS 672.002 to 672.325.
(3) This section does not alter any applicable requirement under ORS  671.010 to 671.220 or
[90]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
672.002 to 672.325 regarding stamps and seals for a set of plans for a structure.
SECTION 139. ORS 455.065 is amended to read:
455.065. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or  ORS chapter 460, 479, 480 or 693,
the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and  Business Services ] Building Codes may establish
by rule alternative regulatory options for emerging technologies without  the approval of advisory
boards. Before adopting rules under this section, the director shall consult  with the chairperson of
an advisory board that will be affected by the  alternative regulatory option. Rules adopted by the
director may include definitions of the types of products that qualify  as emerging technologies and
may approve the use of specific emerging technologies.
(2) The director shall consider national and international  standards applicable to emerging
technologies in adopting rules under this section.
(3) Rules adopted by the director under this section must be limited to a specific site unless
statewide application is approved by an advisory board that will be affected by the  alternative reg-
ulatory  option.
(4) Rules adopted by the director under this  section may not adversely affect the scope of
practice under any license issued by the Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes.
(5) As used in this section, “emerging technology” means a  product that is of a unique type or
that has a unique scope of application and that would provide a benefit to  Oregon’s economy if de-
veloped, used or produced by Oregon businesses.
SECTION 140. ORS 455.068 is amended to read:
455.068. (1) For the purposes of  this section, “winery” means a facility used primarily for the
commercial production of wine or cider, including  but not limited to areas used for production,
shipping and  distribution, wholesale and retail sales, tasting, crushing, fermenting, blending, aging,
storage, bottling, administrative functions and warehousing.
(2) In adopting any construction standards impacting a winery, the Department  of [ Consumer
and Business Services ] Building Codes shall ensure the standards are applicable to all wineries
producing wine, as defined in ORS 471.001, and cider, as defined in ORS 471.023.
SECTION 141. ORS 455.070 is amended to read:
455.070. (1) Any person may report a  suspected violation of the state building code that poses
an imminent threat to public health or safety to the local building official or, where the code is
state-administered, to the Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes . The
complaint shall be in writing and submitted under rules adopted by the department. The rules  of the
department shall provide for the disposition of frivolous or harassing complaints by requiring  de-
tailed descriptions of the alleged violation and reference to the code sections allegedly violated.
(2) The municipality or the department shall give notice of the complaint to the  contractor,
building owner and subcontractor, if any, involved in the project alleged  to be in violation. The
municipality or the department may  charge the complainant for the necessary costs of supplying,
copying and distributing the complaint form.
(3) If, after  five working days, no remedial action has taken place, the complainant has standing
to appeal the matter to the appeals  board of the municipality, where one is established, or directly
to the  appropriate advisory board where there is no local appeals board. The municipal appeals
board or state  advisory board shall reach a final decision within 14 days of the complainant’s appeal.
A municipal appeals  board decision shall then be subject to appeal to a state advisory board under
ORS 455.690, provided that the state advisory board shall reach a  final determination within 14 days
[91]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of notice of an appeal. A  record of the written complaint and the findings of the appeals and advi-
sory boards may be introduced into evidence in any judicial proceeding  for damages brought against
the complainant by any person suffering damages as a result of the complaint.
SECTION 142. ORS 455.083 is amended to read:
455.083. If the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes has reason to
believe that any person has been engaged, or is engaging, or is about to engage in any violation  of
the state building code or of ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to  446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510
to 479.945, 479.950 or 480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or ORS chapter 447, 460 or  693 or any rule
adopted under those statutes, the department may, without bond, bring suit in the name  and on be-
half of the State of Oregon in the circuit court of any county of this  state to enjoin the acts or
practices and to enforce compliance  with the state building code and ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225
to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950  and 480.510 to 480.670 and this chapter,
and ORS chapter 447, 460 or 693 and any rule adopted under  those statutes. Upon a proper showing,
a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order or writ of mandamus shall be granted.
SECTION 143. ORS 455.085 is amended to read:
455.085. (1) The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall, upon receipt of adequate funds under subsection (2) of this section,  publish all state building
code provisions relating to the design, construction, prefabrication, equipment or  appliance instal-
lation, quality of materials,  use and occupancy location and repair of detached low-rise residential
dwellings in two  separate publications. One publication shall contain the applicable provisions of the
specialty code adopted under ORS 479.730 (1) and the other publication shall contain  the remaining
applicable provisions of the state building code. The text of  the publications made under this section
shall be readable at the ninth grade level of reading, as determined by the director under one  or
more standard recognized readability formulas, including, but not limited to, the Flesch, Fry or  Dale
Chall tests.
(2) The publications under subsection (1) of this section shall be paid  for by funds donated by
interested citizens, who shall be  made aware of the project by the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes through public service announcements and  other nominal-cost
advertising. Funds shall be collected until sufficient funds  are available to conduct the publication.
Refunds shall be made to the donors if sufficient funds are not collected.
SECTION 144. ORS 455.090 is amended to read:
455.090. The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may identify the
resources necessary to develop a  system or network that provides electronic access to building
codes information and services for all building code jurisdictions in  the state. The department may
explore the availability of alternative means  for establishing a statewide system or network for
building codes  information and services, including but not limited to developing resource sharing
arrangements with private industry, obtaining foundation grants and obtaining federal funding.
SECTION 145. ORS 455.095 is amended to read:
455.095. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall develop
and implement a system that provides  electronic access to building codes information. The depart-
ment shall make the system  accessible for use by municipalities in carrying out the building in-
spection programs administered and enforced by the municipalities.
(2) The department may also  make the system available for use by other public bodies that
provide construction-related services including, but not limited to, public bodies described  in ORS
455.185 (4). The information and services available through the  system may include, but need not
[92]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be limited to:
(a) Licensing, permit, inspection and other relevant information;
(b) Access to forms;
(c) Electronic submission of permit applications;
(d) Electronic submission of plans for review;
(e) Electronic issuance of minor label or other appropriate permits;
(f) Access to permit and inspection processes;
(g) Scheduling of inspections, tracking of corrections and granting of approvals; and
(h) The coordination and tracking of construction-related services.
(3) The use of the system described in this section by a municipality or other  public body is
voluntary. Nonparticipation in the system by a municipality or other public body  is not grounds for
the department to suspend, revoke authorization for or assume the administration of a building  in-
spection program described in ORS 455.148 or  455.150 or to impose other disciplinary actions or
sanctions against a municipality or other public body.
SECTION 146.
 ORS 455.097 is amended to read:
455.097. (1) As used in this section, “form and format”:
(a) Means the arrangement, organization, configuration, structure or style of,  or method of de-
livery for, providing required information or providing the substantive  equivalent of required infor-
mation.
(b) Does not mean altering the substance of information or the addition or omission of informa-
tion.
(2) The purpose of this section and ORS  455.095 is to enable the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes to develop and implement a system that:
(a) Provides electronic access to building codes information;
(b) Is designed to offer a full range of electronic building permits services;
(c) Allows the streamlining of building inspection services;
(d) Provides a uniform form and format  for submitting building codes information electronically;
(e) Is available for use by any municipality administering and  enforcing a building inspection
program; and
(f) At the discretion of the department:
(A) Is available for use by other public bodies that provide construction-related services; and
(B) Supports access for other purposes that may  include, but need not be limited to, access for
the coordination and tracking of construction-related services.
(3) The department shall adopt rules to govern the form and format of  building permit applica-
tions, building plans,  specifications, other building program information and any other information
exchanged through the electronic building codes information system described in ORS 455.095.
(4) The department may waive a contrary form and format requirement imposed by statute  or
ordinance or by the rules of another agency  for the submission of information in physical form to
the extent the waiver is necessary to facilitate the submission of the information electronically. The
department may accept  an electronic reproduction of a signature, stamp, seal, certification or
notarization as the equivalent of the original or may accept  the substitution of identifying informa-
tion for the signature, stamp, seal,  certification or notarization. The department may not waive a
requirement imposed  by statute or ordinance or by the rules of another agency, other than a form
and format requirement.
(5) A person exchanging information through the electronic building codes information  system
[93]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in a form and format  acceptable to the department is not subject to any licensing sanction, civil
penalty, fine, permit disapproval  or revocation or other sanction for failure to comply with a form
or format requirement imposed by  statute, ordinance or rule for submission of the information in
physical form, including but not limited to any requirement that the information  be in a particular
form or of a particular size, be submitted  with multiple copies, be physically attached to another
document, be an original document or be signed, stamped, sealed, certified or notarized.
SECTION 147. ORS 455.100 is amended to read:
455.100. The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall have general supervision over the administration  of the state building code regulations, in-
cluding providing statewide interpretations for the  plumbing, elevator, electrical, manufactured
structures, boiler, amusement ride, structural, mechanical, low-rise residential dwelling  and prefab-
ricated structures codes.
SECTION 148. ORS 455.110 is amended to read:
455.110. Except as otherwise provided by ORS 479.015 to  479.200, 479.210 to 479.220, 479.510 to
479.945, 479.990 and 479.995 and ORS chapters 446, 447, 460, 476 and 480:
(1) The Director of the Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall
coordinate, interpret and generally supervise the adoption, administration and  enforcement of the
state building code.
(2) The director, with the  approval of the appropriate advisory boards, shall adopt codes and
standards, including regulations as authorized  by ORS 455.020 governing the construction, recon-
struction, alteration and repair of buildings and other structures and the installation of  mechanical
devices and equipment therein. The regulations  may include rules for the administration and
enforcement of a certification system for persons performing work under  the codes and standards
adopted under this subsection. However, this subsection does not authorize  the establishment of a
separate certification for performing work on low-rise residential dwellings.
(3) The director, with the approval of the  appropriate advisory boards, may amend such codes
from time to time. The codes of regulations and any amendment thereof shall conform  insofar as
practicable to model building  codes generally accepted and in use throughout the United States. If
there is no nationally recognized model code, consideration shall be  given to the existing specialty
codes presently in use in this state. Such model  codes with modifications considered necessary and
specialty codes may be  adopted by reference. The codes so promulgated and any amendments thereof
shall be based on the application  of scientific principles, approved tests and professional judgment
and, to the extent that it is practical to do so, the codes shall be promulgated  in terms of desired
results instead of the means of  achieving such results, avoiding wherever possible the incorporation
of specifications of particular methods or materials. To that end the  codes shall encourage the use
of new methods, new materials and maximum energy conservation.
(4) The director  shall adopt rules requiring a journeyman plumber licensed under ORS chapter
693 or an  apprentice plumber, as defined in ORS 693.010, who tests backflow assemblies to complete
a state-approved training program for the testing of those assemblies.
(5) Notwithstanding ORS 279.835 to 279.855 and ORS chapters 279A  and 279B, the De-
partment of Building Codes  may, after consultation with the appropriate specialty code ad-
visory boards established under ORS 455.132, 455.135, 455.138, 480.535 and 693.115, contract for
public or private  parties to develop or provide training and education programs relating to
the state building code and associated licensing or certification programs.
SECTION 149. ORS 455.112 is amended to read:
[94]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
455.112. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Director of the Department
of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may initiate the adoption of rules  the director
considers necessary to interpret, harmonize, streamline, adjust, promote consistency within, reduce
confusion regarding, administer or enforce the state building code or any  requirement for a license,
registration, certification, endorsement or other authorization to perform work  related to the ad-
ministration and enforcement of the state building code when any provision of the state  building
code or a requirement  for authorization to perform work is unclear, duplicative or in conflict with
another or when the code or a requirement for authorization to perform work  does not adequately
address a project of a unique type or scope. The director must obtain the approval of  the appropri-
ate advisory boards prior to adopting a rule under this section.
SECTION 150.
 ORS 455.117 is amended to read:
455.117. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this  section, a regulatory body listed in
subsection (2) of this section may adopt rules to administer  the licensing, certification or registra-
tion of persons regulated  by the body. The rules adopted under this section may include, but need
not be limited to:
(a) The form and content  of an application for issuance or renewal of a license, certificate or
registration;
(b) Training  and continuing education requirements to maintain a license, certificate or regis-
tration;
(c) The  form and content of and the process for preparing and administering examinations and
examination reviews;
(d) The term of a license, certificate or registration; and
(e) The creation of a system for combining two or more licenses,  certificates or registrations
issued to an individual by an advisory board or  the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes into a single license, certificate, registration or other authorization.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies to the following:
(a) Subject to ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285 and 446.395 to  446.420, with the ap-
proval  of  the Residential and Manufactured Structures Board, the Department of [ Consumer and
Business  Services ] Building Codes for purposes of licenses, certificates and registrations issued un-
der ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285 and 446.395 to 446.420.
(b) Subject  to ORS 447.010 to 447.156 and ORS chapter 693, the State Plumbing Board for pur-
poses of licenses issued under ORS 447.010 to 447.156 and ORS chapter 693.
(c) Subject to ORS 460.005 to 460.175, after consultation with the Electrical and  Elevator Board,
the department for purposes of licenses issued under ORS 460.005 to 460.175.
(d) Subject to ORS 479.510 to 479.945, the Electrical and Elevator Board  for purposes of licenses
issued under ORS 446.210 or 479.510 to 479.945.
(e) Subject to ORS 480.510  to 480.670, the Board of Boiler Rules for purposes of licenses issued
under ORS 480.510 to 480.670.
(3) This section does not authorize the adoption of rules regulating:
(a) Building officials, inspectors, plan reviewers or municipalities;
(b) Persons engaged in the manufacture, conversion or repair of prefabricated  structures, pre-
fabricated components or recreational vehicles; or
(c) Master builders certified under ORS 455.800 to 455.820.
SECTION 151.
 ORS 455.122 is amended to read:
455.122. (1) The Director of the Department of [Consumer and Business Services] Building
[95]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Codes, with the approval of the appropriate advisory boards, shall establish a system that  allows a
contractor or business possessing two or more licenses described  in subsection (2) of this section to
have an approved combination of those licenses issued or renewed simultaneously.
(2) Notwithstanding any issuance or renewal dates established by  rule under ORS 455.117, sub-
section (1) of  this section applies to contractor or business licenses by the Electrical and Elevator
Board, the Board of Boiler Rules or the State Plumbing Board.
(3) The director shall establish rules to implement the system described in this section. The rules
must establish the combinations  of licenses for which a simultaneous issuance or renewal is offered,
the term and expiration date  for the combination, the appropriate fees for administering the system,
the criteria for issuance and renewal and the other standards and criteria deemed by  the Depart-
ment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes to be necessary to administer and enforce
the system.
SECTION 152. ORS 455.125 is amended to read:
455.125. (1)  As used in this section, “person” includes individuals, corporations, associations,
firms, partnerships, limited liability companies, joint  stock companies, public agencies and an owner
or holder of a direct or indirect interest in a corporation, association, firm, partnership, limited li-
ability company or joint stock company.
(2) In addition to any other  sanction, remedy or penalty provided by law, the Director of the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes or an appropriate advisory board
may deny, suspend, condition or revoke a registration, certification,  license or other authority of a
person to perform work or conduct business issued under  laws administered by the Department of
[Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes or advisory board if the person:
(a) Fails to comply with a provision of ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225  to 446.285, 446.395 to
446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 or 480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or  ORS chapter 447, 460 or
693, or with any rule adopted under those statutes or under ORS 455.117; or
(b) Engages in an act for which the Construction Contractors Board  imposes a sanction on the
holder under ORS 701.098.
(3) For purposes of ORS 701.106, a compliance failure described  in subsection (2)(a) of this sec-
tion for which the director or an advisory board denies, suspends, conditions or revokes  a registra-
tion, certification, license or other authority of a person to perform work  or conduct business may
be treated as a failure to be in conformance with this chapter.
SECTION 153.
 ORS 455.127 is amended to read:
455.127. (1) As used in this section, “person” includes individuals, corporations,  associations,
firms, partnerships, limited liability companies, joint  stock companies, public agencies and an owner
or holder of a direct or indirect interest in a corporation, association, firm, partnership, limited li-
ability company or joint stock company.
(2) The Director of the  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes , the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes or an appropriate  advisory board
may disqualify a person from obtaining or  renewing a license, registration, certificate or certifica-
tion if the person:
(a) Is or has been  subject to civil penalties, revocation, cancellation or suspension of a license,
registration, certificate or certification or other sanction by the director, department or an advisory
board; or
(b) Is or has been directly involved in an act for which the director, department  or an advisory
board has levied civil penalties, revoked, canceled or suspended a license,  registration, certificate
[96]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or certification or imposed other sanction  while the person served as a principal, director, officer,
owner, majority shareholder, member or manager of  a limited liability company or in another ca-
pacity with direct or indirect control over another business.
(3) A disqualification under subsection (2) of this section shall be for a period determined  by the
director, department or appropriate advisory board by rule, not to exceed five years. If a person
applies for reinstatement of a  revoked license, registration, certificate or certification after the pe-
riod of disqualification, the person must meet the qualifications for initial issuance of the license,
registration, certificate or certification.
SECTION 154.
 ORS 455.129 is amended to read:
455.129. (1) As used in this section, “relative” means an individual related within the third  de-
gree as determined by the common law, a spouse, an individual related  to a spouse within the third
degree as determined by the common law or an individual in an  adoptive relationship within the
third degree as determined by the common law.
(2) Subject to ORS chapter 183, a regulatory body listed in subsection (3) of  this section may
deny a license, certificate, registration or application or may suspend, revoke, condition or refuse
to renew a license, certificate or registration if the  regulatory body finds that the licensee, certif-
icate holder, registrant or applicant:
(a) Has failed  to comply with the laws administered by the regulatory body or with the rules
adopted by the regulatory body.
(b) Has failed to comply with an order of the regulatory body or the Director of  the Department
of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, including but not limited  to the failure to pay
a civil penalty.
(c) Has filed an application for a license, certificate or registration  that, as of the date the li-
cense, certificate or registration was issued or the date of an  order denying the application, was
incomplete in any material respect or contained a statement that,  in light of the circumstances un-
der which it was made, was incorrect or misleading in any respect.
(d) Has performed work  without appropriate licensing, certification or registration or has em-
ployed individuals to perform work without appropriate licensing, certification or registration.
(e) Has advertised or otherwise  held out as being a licensed, certified or registered specialty
code contractor without holding the appropriate specialty  code contractor license, certificate or
registration.
(f) As a partner, officer, member or employee of a business, has advertised or held  out that the
business is a licensed, certified or registered specialty code contractor if the  business does not
possess the appropriate specialty code contractor license, certificate or registration.
(g) Has engaged in business as a specialty code contractor  without holding a valid specialty
code contractor license, certificate or registration required for the business.
(h) Has failed to meet any condition or  requirement to obtain or maintain a license, certificate
or registration.
(i) Has acted in a manner creating a serious danger to the public health or safety.
(j) Has performed work or operated equipment within the  scope of a specialty code license,
certificate or registration in a manner that violates  an applicable minimum safety standard or a
statute or rule regarding safety.
(k) Has been subject to a revocation, cancellation or suspension order or  to other disciplinary
action by the Construction Contractors Board or has failed to pay a civil penalty imposed by  the
board.
[97]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(L) Has been subject to a revocation, cancellation or suspension order or to other disciplinary
action by another state in regard to  construction standards, permit requirements or construction-
related licensing violations or has failed to pay a civil  penalty imposed by the other state in regard
to construction standards, permit requirements or construction-related licensing violations.
(m) Has, while performing work that requires or that is related to work that requires a valid
license or certificate under ORS  446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510
to 479.945, 479.950 or 480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or  ORS chapter 447, 460 or 693, violated any
statute or rule related to the state building code.
(n) Has performed a code inspection  or plan review on a project to construct, alter, repair or
make an installation in a structure if the  inspector or reviewer, or an employer or relative of the
inspector or reviewer, has a financial  interest in or business affiliation with the project or structure.
(o) Is a business, the owner or an  officer of which has an outstanding obligation to pay a civil
penalty assessed under ORS 455.895 or has been the subject of action against the license,  certificate
or registration by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, the director
or an appropriate advisory board.
(p) Is a business, owner or officer of a reorganized business entity as defined in ORS  657.682, if
an owner, officer, shareholder or partner of the  reorganized business entity, or a member if the re-
organized business entity  is a member-managed limited liability company, has been subject to a re-
vocation or suspension order or to a  condition or civil penalty under ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225
to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 or 480.510 to  480.670 or this chapter or
ORS chapter 447, 460, 693 or  701, or by another state in regard to construction standards, permit
requirements or construction-related licensing violations.
(q) Is  ordered to pay damages under a judgment or arbitration award that relates to con-
struction and that has become final by operation of law or on appeal.
(r) Is a business, the owner or an officer of  which was an owner or officer in another business
at the time:
(A) The other business was assessed a civil penalty under ORS 455.895 that remains unpaid; or
(B) An act or failure to act by any owner or officer of the other business resulted  in action
being taken against the license, certificate or registration of  the other business by the department,
the director or any advisory board.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section applies to:
(a) The State Plumbing Board for purposes of licenses  issued under ORS 447.010 to 447.156 or
ORS chapter 693.
(b) The Electrical and Elevator Board for purposes of licenses issued under  ORS 446.210 or
479.510 to 479.945.
(c) The Board of Boiler Rules for purposes of licenses issued under ORS 480.510 to 480.670.
(d) The department for purposes of licenses issued under this chapter.
(e) The department, subject to Electrical and  Elevator Board approval, for purposes of licenses
issued under ORS 460.005 to 460.175.
(f) The department, subject to Residential and Manufactured Structures Board  approval, for
purposes of licenses, certificates and registrations issued under ORS  446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to
446.285 and 446.395 to 446.420.
(4) The department may  administer and enforce subsection (2) of this section in the same manner
and to the same extent as any advisory board.
SECTION 155.
 ORS 455.132 is amended to read:
[98]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
455.132. (1) There is established in the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes a Building Codes Structures Board consisting of nine members.
(2) The Building Codes Structures Board shall  assist the Director of the Department of [ Con-
sumer and Business Services ] Building Codes in administering the structural, prefabricated struc-
tures and energy programs  described in this chapter and the accessibility to persons with physical
disabilities program described in ORS 447.210 to 447.280.
(3) The board shall consist of members broadly  representative of the industries and professions
involved in the development and construction of buildings and energy conservation, including:
(a) An architect or engineer;
(b) A general contractor, as defined in ORS 701.005, specializing in the construction of buildings
more than three stories above grade;
(c) A contractor specializing in construction for heavy industry;
(d) A representative of the building trade;
(e) A representative of a utility or energy supplier;
(f) A representative of a fire protection agency;
(g) A building official;
(h) An owner or manager of a commercial office building; and
(i) A representative selected from individuals  recommended by the Oregon Disabilities Commis-
sion.
SECTION 156.
 ORS 455.135 is amended to read:
455.135. (1) There is established a Residential and Manufactured Structures Board consisting of
11 members appointed by the Governor.
(2) The members  of the board shall assist the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes in administering the low-rise residential  dwelling program de-
scribed in this chapter.
(3) The board must consist of:
(a) One contractor specializing in the construction of residential structures;
(b) One contractor specializing in the remodeling of residential structures;
(c) One contractor specializing in building multifamily housing three stories  or less above grade;
(d) One home designer or architect;
(e) One building official;
(f) One representative of residential building trade subcontractors;
(g) One structural engineer;
(h) One representative of a utility or energy supplier;
(i) One manufacturer of manufactured dwellings;
(j) One seller or distributor of new manufactured dwellings; and
(k) One public member who does not receive compensation from any interest represented  under
paragraphs (a) to (j) of this subsection.
SECTION 157.
 ORS 455.138 is amended to read:
455.138. (1) There is established in the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes an Electrical and Elevator Board consisting of 15 members.
(2) The Electrical and Elevator Board shall assist the Director of the Department of  [Consumer
and Business Services ] Building Codes  in administering the electrical program  described in ORS
479.510 to 479.945 and 479.995 and the elevator program described in ORS 460.005 to 460.175.
(3) The board shall be composed of:
[99]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A fire and casualty underwriter;
(b) A representative of industrial plants regularly employing licensed electricians;
(c) A person representing the power and light industry;
(d) An electrical equipment supplier who otherwise qualifies by experience in the industry;
(e) An elevator manufacturing representative;
(f) One member from the  electrical equipment manufacturing industry who otherwise qualifies
by experience and training in electricity;
(g) Two journeyman electricians;
(h) An electrical inspector;
(i) Two electrical contractors;
(j) A municipal building official;
(k) A journeyman elevator installer;
(L) An owner or manager of a commercial office building; and
(m) A public member who does not receive compensation from any interest described in para-
graphs (a) to (L) of this subsection.
SECTION 158.
 ORS 455.140 is amended to read:
455.140. (1) There is established a Mechanical Board consisting of  10 members appointed by the
Governor.
(2) The members  of the board shall assist the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes in administering the code adopted  pursuant to ORS 455.020 for
mechanical devices and equipment.
(3) The board must consist of:
(a) One representative of the plumbing industry;
(b) One sheet metal and air conditioner contractor;
(c) One municipal mechanical inspector possessing  the highest level of mechanical inspector
certification issued by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes;
(d) One heating, venting and air conditioning contractor;
(e) One heating, venting and air conditioning installer;
(f) One sheet metal and air conditioner installer;
(g) One representative of a natural gas company or other utility;
(h) One building official;
(i) One insulation craftsperson who has experience with heat and frost insulation; and
(j) One public member who does not receive  compensation from any interest represented under
paragraphs (a) to (i) of this subsection.
(4) At least one  of the board members described in subsection (3)(b) or (d) of this section must
be an owner or operator of a contracting business employing  10 or fewer persons at the time of the
member’s appointment to the term.
SECTION 159.
 ORS 455.144 is amended to read:
455.144. (1) The Building  Codes Structures Board, the Electrical and Elevator Board, the Resi-
dential and Manufactured Structures Board and the Mechanical Board shall each  be organized and
governed as described in this section.
(2)(a) The  term of office of each member is four years and a member is not eligible for appoint-
ment to more than two full terms of office. The  Governor shall appoint the members of each board
and the board members shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.
(b) Before the expiration of the term of a  member, the Governor shall appoint a successor whose
[100]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
term begins on July  1 next following. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make
an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(3) A member of  each board is entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS
292.495.
(4) A board shall select one of its members as chairperson and another as vice chairperson, for
such terms and  with duties and powers necessary for the performance of the functions of such po-
sition as the board determines.
(5) A majority of the members of a board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
(6) In accordance with applicable provisions of  ORS chapter 183, the Director  of the Depart-
ment of Building Codes  may adopt rules necessary for the administration of the laws that  the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes is charged with administering.
(7) The Governor may remove a board member  for good cause. “Good cause” for removal of a
member includes, but is not limited to, three unexcused absences during any 12-month  period from
a regularly scheduled board meeting.
(8) The appointment of a member of a board is subject to confirmation by the  Senate pursuant
to section 4, Article III of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 160.
 ORS 455.148 is amended to read:
455.148. (1)(a) A municipality that assumes the administration and enforcement of a building  in-
spection program shall administer and enforce the program for all of the following:
(A) The state building code,  as defined in ORS 455.010, except as set forth in paragraph (b) of
this subsection.
(B) Manufactured structure  installation requirements under ORS 446.155, 446.185 (1) and 446.230.
(C) Manufactured dwelling parks and mobile home parks under ORS chapter 446.
(D) Park and camp programs regulated under ORS 455.680.
(E) Tourist facilities regulated under ORS 446.310 to 446.350.
(F) Manufactured dwelling alterations regulated under ORS 446.155.
(G) Manufactured structure accessory buildings and structures under ORS 446.253.
(H) Boilers and pressure vessels described in rules adopted under ORS 480.525 (5).
(b) A building inspection program of a municipality may not include:
(A) Boiler and pressure vessel programs under ORS 480.510 to 480.670  except those described
in rules adopted under ORS 480.525 (5);
(B) Elevator programs under ORS 460.005 to 460.175;
(C) Amusement ride regulation under ORS 460.310 to 460.370;
(D) Prefabricated structure regulation under ORS chapter 455;
(E) Manufacture of manufactured structures  programs under ORS 446.155 to 446.285, including
the administration and enforcement of federal manufactured dwelling construction  and safety stan-
dards adopted under  ORS 446.155 or the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety
Standards Act of 1974;
(F) Licensing and certification, or the adoption of statewide codes and standards, under ORS
chapter 446, 447, 455, 479 or 693; or
(G) Review of plans and specifications as provided in ORS 455.685.
(2) A municipality that administers a building inspection program as allowed under this section
shall do so for periods of four years. The Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes shall adopt rules to adjust  time periods for administration of a building inspection program
to allow for variations in the needs of the department and participants.
[101]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) When a municipality administers a building inspection program, the governing body of  the
municipality shall, unless  other means are already provided, appoint a person to administer and
enforce the building inspection program, who shall be known as the building  official. A building of-
ficial shall, in the municipality for which appointed, attend to all aspects  of code enforcement, in-
cluding the issuance of all building permits.  Two or more municipalities may combine in the
appointment of a single building official for the purpose of administering  a building inspection pro-
gram within their communities.
(4)(a) By January  1 of the year preceding the expiration of the four-year period described in
subsection (2) of  this section, the governing body of the municipality shall notify the Director of the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes and, if the municipality is not  a
county, notify the  county whether the municipality will continue to administer and enforce the
building inspection program after expiration of the four-year period.
(b) Notwithstanding the January 1 date set  forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director
and the municipality and, if the municipality  is not a county, the county may by agreement extend
that date to no later than March 1.
(5) If a city does not notify the director, or notifies  the director that it will not administer the
building inspection program, the county or counties in  which the city is located shall administer and
enforce the county program within the city in the same  manner as the program is administered and
enforced outside the city, except as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(6) If a county does not notify the director,  or notifies the director that it will not administer
and enforce a building inspection program, the  director shall contract with a municipality or other
person or use such state employees or state agencies  as are necessary to administer and enforce a
building inspection program,  and permit or other fees arising therefrom shall be paid into the
[Consumer and Business  Services Fund created by ORS 705.145 ] Department of Building Codes
Fund and credited to  the account responsible for paying the expenses thereof. A state employee
may not be displaced as a result of using contract personnel.
(7) The  governing body of a municipality may commence responsibility for the administration
and enforcement of a building inspection program  beginning July 1 of any year by notifying the di-
rector no later than January 1 of the same year  and obtaining the director’s approval of an as-
sumption plan as described in subsection (11)(c) of this section.
(8) The department shall adopt rules to require the governing body of each municipality assum-
ing or continuing a building inspection program under this section to submit  a written plan with the
notice required under subsection (4) or (7) of this section.  If the department is the governing body,
the department shall have a plan on file. The plan must specify how cooperation with the State Fire
Marshal or a designee of the State Fire Marshal will be achieved and how a uniform fire  code will
be considered in the review process of the design  and construction phases of buildings or structures.
(9) A municipality that administers and enforces a building inspection program pursuant  to this
section shall recognize  and accept the performances of state building code activities by businesses
and persons authorized under ORS  455.457 to perform the activities as if the activities were per-
formed by the municipality. A municipality is not required to  accept an inspection, a plan or a plan
review that does not meet the requirements of the state building code.
(10) The department or a municipality that accepts an inspection or plan review as required  by
this section by a person licensed under ORS 455.457 has  no responsibility or liability for the activ-
ities of the licensee.
(11) In addition to the requirements of ORS  455.100 and 455.110, the director shall regulate
[102]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
building inspection programs that municipalities  assume on or after January 1, 2002. Regulation
under this subsection shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Creating building inspection program application and  amendment requirements and proce-
dures;
(b) Granting or  denying applications for building inspection program authority and amendments;
(c) Requiring a municipality  assuming a building inspection program to submit with the notice
given under subsection (7) of this section an assumption plan that includes, at a minimum:
(A) A  description of the intended availability of program services, including proposed service
agreements for carrying out the program during at least the first two years;
(B) Demonstration of the ability and intent to provide building inspection  program services for
at least two years;
(C) An estimate of proposed permit revenue and program operating expenses;
(D) Proposed staffing levels; and
(E) Proposed service levels;
(d) Reviewing procedures and program operations of municipalities;
(e) Creating standards for efficient, effective,  timely and acceptable building inspection pro-
grams;
(f) Creating standards for justifying  increases in building inspection program fees adopted by a
municipality;
(g) Creating  standards for determining whether a county or department building inspection
program is economically impaired in  its ability to reasonably continue providing the program
throughout  a  county, if another municipality is allowed to provide a building inspection program
within the same county; and
(h) Enforcing the requirements of this section.
(12) The department may assume administration and enforcement of a building inspection pro-
gram:
(a) During the pendency of activities under ORS 455.770;
(b) If a municipality abandons or is no longer able to administer the building inspection program;
[and] or
(c) If a municipality fails to substantially comply  with any provision of this section or of ORS
455.465, 455.467 and 455.469.
(13) If the department assumes the administration  and enforcement of a building inspection
program under this section, in  addition to any other power granted to the director, the director may:
(a) Enter  into agreements with local governments under ORS 455.185 regarding the adminis-
tration and enforcement of the assumed building inspection program;
(b) Take action  as described in ORS 455.192 to ensure that sufficient staff and other resources
are available for the administration and enforcement  of the assumed building inspection program;
and
(c) Charge fees described in ORS 455.195 for department services provided  in administering and
enforcing the assumed building inspection program.
(14) A municipality  that abandons or otherwise ceases to administer and enforce a building in-
spection program that the municipality assumed under this section may not resume  the adminis-
tration or enforcement of the program for at least two years. The municipality may resume  the
administration and enforcement of the abandoned program only on July 1 of an odd-numbered year.
Prior to resuming the  administration and enforcement of the program, the municipality must follow
[103]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the notification procedure set forth in subsection (7) of this section.
SECTION 161. ORS 455.150 is amended to read:
455.150. (1) Except as provided in subsection (15)  of this section, a municipality that assumes the
administration and enforcement of  a building inspection program prior to January 1, 2002, may ad-
minister and enforce all or part of a building inspection program. A building inspection program:
(a) Is a program that includes the following:
(A) The state building code,  as defined in ORS 455.010, except as set forth in paragraph (b) of
this subsection.
(B) Manufactured structure  installation requirements under ORS 446.155, 446.185 (1) and 446.230.
(C) Manufactured dwelling parks and mobile home parks under ORS chapter 446.
(D) Park and camp programs regulated under ORS 455.680.
(E) Tourist facilities regulated under ORS 446.310 to 446.350.
(F) Manufactured dwelling alterations regulated under ORS 446.155.
(G) Manufactured structure accessory buildings and structures under ORS 446.253.
(H) Boilers and pressure vessels described in rules adopted under ORS 480.525 (5).
(b) Is not a program that includes:
(A) Boiler and pressure vessel programs under ORS 480.510 to 480.670  except those described
in rules adopted under ORS 480.525 (5);
(B) Elevator programs under ORS 460.005 to 460.175;
(C) Amusement ride regulation under ORS 460.310 to 460.370;
(D) Prefabricated structure regulation under ORS chapter 455;
(E) Manufacture of manufactured structures  programs under ORS 446.155 to 446.285, including
the administration and enforcement of federal manufactured dwelling construction  and safety stan-
dards adopted under  ORS 446.155 or the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety
Standards Act of 1974;
(F) Licensing and certification, or the adoption of statewide codes and standards, under ORS
chapter 446, 447, 455, 479 or 693; and
(G) Review of plans and specifications as provided in ORS 455.685.
(2) A municipality that administers a building inspection program as allowed under this section
shall do so for periods of four years. The Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes shall adopt rules to adjust  time periods for administration of a building inspection program
to allow for variations in the needs of the department and participants.
(3) When a municipality administers a building inspection program, the governing body of  the
municipality shall, unless  other means are already provided, appoint a person to administer and
enforce the building  inspection program or parts thereof, who shall be known as the building official.
A building official shall, in the municipality for which appointed, attend  to all aspects of code
enforcement, including the issuance of all  building permits. Two or more municipalities may combine
in the appointment of a single building official for the  purpose of administering a building inspection
program within their communities.
(4)(a) By January  1 of the year preceding the expiration of the four-year period described in
subsection (2) of  this section, the governing body of the municipality shall notify the Director of the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes and, if not a county, notify  the
county whether the  municipality will continue to administer the building inspection program, or
parts thereof, after expiration of the four-year period. If  parts of a building inspection program are
to be administered and enforced by a municipality,  the parts shall correspond to a classification
[104]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
designated by the director as reasonable divisions of work.
(b) Notwithstanding the January 1 date set  forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director
and the municipality and, if the municipality  is not a county, the county may by agreement extend
that date to no later than March 1.
(5) If a  city does not notify the director, or notifies the director that it will not administer cer-
tain specialty codes or parts thereof under the building inspection  program, the county or counties
in which the city is located shall administer and enforce those  codes or parts thereof within the city
in the same manner as it administers and enforces them  outside the city, except as provided by
subsection (6) of this section.
(6) If a county does not notify the director,  or notifies the director that it will not administer
and enforce  certain specialty codes or parts thereof under the building inspection program, the di-
rector  shall  contract with a municipality or other person or use such state employees or state
agencies as are necessary to administer  and enforce those codes or parts thereof, and permit or
other fees arising therefrom shall be paid into the  [ Consumer and Business Services Fund created
by ORS 705.145 ] Department of Building Codes Fund  and credited to the account responsible for
paying such expenses. A state employee may not be displaced as  a result of using contract person-
nel.
(7) If a municipality administering a building inspection program under  this section seeks to
administer additional parts of a program, the municipality must  comply with ORS 455.148, including
the requirement that  the municipality administer and enforce all aspects of the building inspection
program. Thereafter, the municipality is subject  to ORS 455.148 and ceases to be subject to this
section.
(8) The department shall  adopt rules to require the governing body of each municipality to
submit a written plan with the notice required  under subsection (4) of this section. If the department
is the governing body,  the department shall have a plan on file. The plan shall specify how coop-
eration with the State Fire Marshal or a designee of the  State Fire Marshal will be achieved and
how a uniform fire code will be considered in the review process of the design and construction
phases of buildings or structures.
(9) A  municipality that administers a code for which persons or businesses are authorized under
ORS 455.457 to perform activities shall recognize and accept those activities as if performed by the
municipality. A municipality is not  required to accept an inspection, a plan or a plan review that
does not meet the requirements of the state building code.
(10) The department or a municipality that accepts an inspection or plan review as required  by
this section by a person licensed under ORS 455.457 has  no responsibility or liability for the activ-
ities of the licensee.
(11) In addition to the requirements of ORS  455.100 and 455.110, the director shall regulate
building inspection programs of municipalities assumed prior  to January 1, 2002. Regulation under
this subsection shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Creating building inspection program application and  amendment requirements and proce-
dures;
(b) Granting or  denying applications for building inspection program authority and amendments;
(c) Reviewing procedures and program operations of municipalities;
(d) Creating standards for efficient,  effective, timely and acceptable building inspection pro-
grams;
(e) Creating standards for justifying increases in building inspection program fees  adopted by a
[105]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
municipality;
(f) Creating standards for determining whether  a county or department building inspection pro-
gram is economically impaired in its  ability to reasonably continue providing the program or part
of the program throughout a county, if another municipality  is allowed to provide a building in-
spection program or part of a program within the same county; and
(g) Enforcing the requirements of this section.
(12) The department may assume administration and enforcement of a building inspection pro-
gram:
(a) During the pendency of activities under ORS 455.770;
(b) If a municipality abandons any part of the  building inspection program or is no longer able
to administer the building inspection program; [ and] or
(c) If a municipality fails to substantially comply with any  provision of this section or of ORS
455.465, 455.467 and 455.469.
(13) If the department assumes the administration  and enforcement of a building inspection
program under this section, in  addition to any other power granted to the director, the director may:
(a) Enter into agreements with local governments under ORS 455.185 regarding the  adminis-
tration and enforcement of the assumed building inspection program;
(b) Take action as described in ORS 455.192 to ensure that sufficient staff and  other resources
are available for the administration and enforcement  of the assumed building inspection program;
and
(c) Charge fees described in ORS 455.195 for department services provided  in administering and
enforcing the assumed building inspection program.
(14) If a  municipality abandons or otherwise ceases to administer all or part of a building in-
spection program described in this section, the municipality may not  resume the administration and
enforcement of the abandoned program or part of a program  for at least two years. The municipality
may resume the administration and enforcement of the abandoned program or part of a program only
on July 1 of an odd-numbered year. To resume the administration and enforcement of  the abandoned
program or part of a program, the municipality must comply with ORS 455.148, including the re-
quirement that the municipality administer and  enforce all aspects of the building inspection pro-
gram. Thereafter, the municipality is subject to ORS 455.148 and  ceases to be subject to this
section.
(15) A municipality  that administers and enforces a building inspection program under this sec-
tion shall include in  the program the inspection of boilers and pressure vessels described in sub-
section (1)(a)(H) of this section.
SECTION 162.
 ORS 455.152 is amended to read:
455.152. (1) A municipality, 10 or more persons or an association  with 10 or more members may
file objections to a municipality’s assumption of a building inspection program. The objections  must
be filed within 30 days after  the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes gives notice of the application.
(2) The  director, by rule, shall establish a process for reviewing objections filed under subsection
(1) of this section. The review process shall include but need not be limited to:
(a) Identification of economic impairment, if any, affecting the municipality;
(b) Demonstration by the municipality that all  building inspection program permits and services
will be available, including any service agreements for carrying out building program services;
(c) Review of all elements of the assumption plan submitted by the municipality;
[106]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Demonstration by the municipality of the ability to  provide building inspection program
services for at least two years; and
(e) Review  of proposed levels of service, including the municipality’s ability to maintain or im-
prove upon existing service levels.
(3) Upon  completion of a review under subsection (2) of this section, the director shall issue a
final agency order approving or disapproving the application.
SECTION 163. ORS 455.153 is amended to read:
455.153. (1) A municipality may administer any specialty code or building requirements as
though the code or requirements were ordinances of the municipality if the  municipality is author-
ized to administer:
(a) The specialty code under ORS chapter 447 or 455 or ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and 479.995.
(b) Mobile or manufactured dwelling parks requirements adopted under ORS 446.062.
(c) Temporary parks requirements adopted under ORS 446.105.
(d) Manufactured dwelling installation, support and tiedown requirements adopted under ORS
446.230.
(e) Park or camp requirements adopted under ORS 455.680.
(2) Administration of any specialty code or  building requirement includes establishing a program
intended to verify compliance with state licensing requirements and  all other administrative and
judicial aspects of enforcement of the  code or requirement. Nothing in this section affects the con-
current jurisdiction of the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes, the Building Codes Structures Board, the State  Plumbing Board, the Electrical and Elevator
Board, the Residential and Manufactured  Structures Board or the Mechanical Board to impose civil
penalties for violations committed within municipalities.
SECTION 164.
 ORS 455.154 is amended to read:
455.154. (1)  Notwithstanding ORS 447.076, 455.627, 479.560 and 479.565, the Department of [ Con-
sumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, in consultation with the appropriate advisory boards,
may establish special alternative permit and inspection programs for any  installations or equipment
regulated  under  the state building code. The alternative programs may include, but need not be
limited to:
(a) Programs for  work, other than life-safety work, performed in commercial, manufacturing, in-
dustrial and institutional facilities; and
(b) Inspection programs for in-plant construction.
(2) Every municipality that administers and enforces a building program under ORS 455.148 or
455.150 shall administer  and enforce within the municipality any special alternative permit and in-
spection program that the department makes applicable to that municipality.
(3) A  municipality may apply to the department for approval of municipal application forms,
procedures and criteria  for plan review, permits and inspections and methodologies for determining
fee amounts, for use by the municipality in carrying out an  applicable special alternative permit and
inspection program.
(4) If the department determines that an optional special alternative  permit and inspection pro-
gram affects only some of the jurisdictions that are  subject to ORS 455.046, the requirements of ORS
455.046 are applicable only to standard permit  and inspection programs and not to the optional
program.
SECTION 165.
 ORS 455.155 is amended to read:
455.155. Notwithstanding ORS 447.076, 455.627, 479.560  and 479.565, the Department of [ Con-
[107]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, in consultation with the appropriate advisory boards,
may establish a statewide permitting and inspection system for minor construction work.  Every
municipality that administers and enforces  a building program under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 must
recognize and accept permits issued by the department under this section.
SECTION 166. ORS 455.156 is amended to read:
455.156. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision  of this chapter, ORS chapter 693 or ORS
447.010 to 447.156, 447.992, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.990 or 479.995, the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes shall carry out the provisions of this section.
(2)(a) A municipality that  establishes a building inspection program under ORS 455.148 or a
plumbing inspection program  under ORS 455.150 covering installations under the plumbing specialty
code or Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code may act on behalf of the State Plumbing Board  to in-
vestigate violations of and enforce ORS 447.040, 693.030 and  693.040 and to issue notices of proposed
assessment of civil penalties for those violations.
(b) A municipality that establishes a building inspection program  under ORS 455.148 or an
electrical inspection program under  ORS 455.150 covering installations under the electrical specialty
code  or  Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code may act on behalf of the Electrical and Elevator Board
to investigate violations of and enforce ORS 479.550 (1) and 479.620 and to issue notices of proposed
assessment of civil penalties for those violations.
(c) A municipality that establishes a building inspection program  under ORS 455.148 or 455.150
may investigate  violations and enforce any provisions of the program administered by the munici-
pality.
(3) The department shall establish:
(a) Procedures, forms and standards  to carry out the provisions of this section, including but
not limited to creating preprinted notices of proposed assessment of penalties that can be completed
and served by municipal inspectors;
(b) A program to provide that all of the moneys  recovered by the department, less collection
expenses, be paid to the municipality  that initiated the charges when a person charged with a vio-
lation as provided in subsection (2) of this section, other than a violation  of a licensing requirement,
agrees to the entry of an assessment of civil penalty or does not request a  hearing, and an order
assessing a penalty is entered against the person;
(c) A uniform citation process to be used in all jurisdictions of the state for violation of a  li-
censing requirement. The process may include but need not be limited to  all program areas admin-
istered by a municipality under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 and may provide a uniform method for
checking license status and issuing citations for violation  of a licensing requirement, and a con-
sistent basis for enforcement of  licensing requirements and treatment of violations, including fine
amounts;
(d) A program to provide a division of the moneys  recovered by the department with the
municipality that initiated the charges, when a person charged with a violation  as provided in sub-
section (2) of this section, other than a violation of a licensing requirement, requests  a hearing and
is assessed a penalty. One-half of the amounts recovered shall be paid to the municipality.  The de-
partment shall keep an amount  equal to its costs of processing the proceeding and collection ex-
penses out of the remaining one-half and remit the balance, if any, to the municipality; and
(e) A program to require municipalities to investigate violations of the department’s permit  re-
quirements for plumbing  installations and services under the plumbing specialty code and for
plumbing and electrical installations  and services under the Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code,
[108]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and to:
(A) Initiate notices of proposed assessment of civil penalties as agents of the boards designated
in subsection (2) of this section; and
(B) Pay the agents of the boards out of net civil penalty recoveries as if  the recoveries were
under paragraphs (b) and (d) of this subsection.
(4) The assessment of a civil penalty under this section by  a municipality is subject to the
amount limitations set forth in ORS 455.895.
(5)(a) It shall be a defense for any person charged with a penalty for  violation of a building in-
spection program permit requirement  covering plumbing installations under the plumbing specialty
code, electrical permit requirements under ORS 479.550 or plumbing or electrical requirements  un-
der the Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code that the person was previously  penalized for the same
occurrence.
(b) A building inspection program permit requirement is a requirement contained in  a specialty
code or municipal ordinance or rule requiring a permit before the  particular installations covered
by the codes are commenced.
(c) A penalty for the same occurrence includes  a combination of two or more of the following
that are based on the same plumbing or electrical installation:
(A)(i) An investigative or other fee  added to an electrical permit fee when a permit was obtained
after the electrical installation was started;
(ii) A civil penalty pursuant to ORS 479.995 for violation of ORS 479.550 for failure to  obtain
an electrical permit;
(iii) A civil penalty pursuant to ORS 455.895 for  failure to obtain an electrical permit under the
Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code; or
(iv) A municipal  penalty, other than an investigative fee, for making an electrical installation
under the electrical specialty code or the Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code without a permit; or
(B)(i) An investigative or other fee added to a plumbing permit fee when a permit  was obtained
after the plumbing installation was started;
(ii) A civil penalty pursuant to ORS 447.992 for failure to obtain a plumbing permit as  required
under the plumbing specialty code;
(iii) A civil penalty pursuant to ORS 455.895 for failure to obtain a plumbing permit under  the
Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code; or
(iv) A  municipal penalty, other than an investigative fee, for making a plumbing installation
under the plumbing specialty code or the Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code without a permit.
SECTION 167. ORS 455.158 is amended to read:
455.158. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(b) “Work on a structure” means the construction, reconstruction, alteration or repair of a
structure.
(2) A public body that administers and enforces a building inspection  program shall ensure that
a person required to be licensed  under a provision of ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285,
446.395 to 446.420, 446.566 to 446.646, [ 446.666 to 446.746,] 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 and 480.510  to
480.670, this chapter or ORS chapter 447, 460 or 693  in order to obtain a permit for work on a
structure has a current, valid license of the type required for the permit.
SECTION 168.
 ORS 455.160 is amended to read:
455.160. (1) The municipality that is responsible for  state building code administration and
[109]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
enforcement  in  a municipality pursuant to ORS 455.148 or 455.150, or the Department of [ Consumer
and Business Services ] Building Codes if the department is responsible for  state building code ad-
ministration and enforcement pursuant to ORS 455.148 or 455.150, may not  engage in a pattern of
conduct of failing to provide timely inspections or plan reviews without reasonable cause.
(2) Any person adversely affected by a  pattern of conduct prohibited in subsection (1) of this
section may serve the municipality  or the department with a written demand to provide timely in-
spections or plan reviews.
(3) If a  municipality, within five days of receipt of the demand, fails to provide timely inspections
or plan reviews without reasonable cause, the person who served  the demand may seek to compel
the inspections or plan reviews through a writ of mandamus pursuant  to ORS 34.105 to 34.240. If the
court finds that the municipality  has engaged in a pattern of conduct of failing to provide timely
inspections or plan reviews without reasonable  cause, it may direct the municipality to provide
timely inspections or plan reviews or to transfer the administration and enforcement of the code in
question under procedures outlined in ORS 455.148 (5) and (6) or 455.150 (5) and (6).
(4) If the department,  within five days of receipt of the demand, fails to provide timely in-
spections or plan reviews without reasonable cause, the person who served the demand  may seek
to compel the inspections or plan reviews through  a writ of mandamus pursuant to ORS 34.105 to
34.240. If the court finds that the department has engaged in a pattern of conduct  of failing to pro-
vide timely inspections or plan reviews without reasonable  cause, it may direct the department to
provide timely inspections or plan reviews or to transfer the administration and enforcement of  the
code in question to an appropriate  municipality, if the municipality accepts the responsibility. A
municipality may  accept the transfer of the administration and enforcement of a code under this
subsection without becoming subject to ORS 455.148 as a result of accepting the transfer.
SECTION 169.
 ORS 455.165 is amended to read:
455.165. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Form and format” has the meaning given that term in ORS 455.097.
(b) “Standards” means the content,  processing, form and format of building codes information
collected and maintained by municipalities.
(2) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  may  adopt rules es-
tablishing building codes information standards for  municipalities administering and enforcing
building inspection programs. The department  shall design the standards to ensure consistency be-
tween municipalities regarding building inspections, permits, plans specifications and other  building
codes information. The department may not adopt standards that:
(a) Waive any requirement imposed by statute  or by rule of another state agency for submitting
building permit applications, building plans, specifications or other building  program information in
physical  form.
(b) Require a municipality to assume or expand a building inspection program or  to provide
additional building inspection program services.
SECTION 170.
 ORS 455.170 is amended to read:
455.170. (1) The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall delegate to any municipality [ which] that  requests any of  the authority, responsibilities and
functions of the director relating to [ recreational] recreation parks,  organizational camps and picnic
parks as  defined in ORS 446.310, including but not limited to plan review and inspections, if the di-
rector determines that the municipality  is willing and able to carry out the rules of the director
relating to such authority, responsibilities  and functions. The director shall review and monitor each
[110]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
municipality’s performance under this subsection. In accordance with  ORS chapter 183, the director
may suspend or rescind a delegation under this subsection. If it is determined  that a municipality
is not carrying out such rules or the delegation is suspended, the  unexpended portion of the fees
collected under subsection (2) of this section  shall be available to the director for carrying out the
authority, responsibility and functions under this section.
(2) The director shall determine, by administrative rule,  the amount of fee [ which] that  the
municipality may charge and retain for any  function undertaken pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section. The amount of the fees  [ shall] may  not exceed the costs of administering the delegated
functions. The municipality, quarterly, shall remit 15 percent of the collected  fees to the director for
monitoring municipal programs and for providing informational material necessary to  maintain a
uniform state program.
(3) In any action, suit  or proceeding arising out of municipal administration of functions pursu-
ant to subsection (1) of this section and involving the  validity of a rule adopted by the director, the
director shall be made a party to the action, suit or proceeding.
SECTION 171. ORS 455.185 is amended to read:
455.185. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 455.148, 455.150 and 455.153, upon request by one or  more
municipalities and with the consent of all affected parties, the  Director of the Department of [ Con-
sumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may enter into an agreement for the Department of
[Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes to uniformly administer and enforce all or a por-
tion of a building inspection program within a geographic area. The geographic area may be a
municipality, a region comprising parts of more than one municipality or a region comprising  mul-
tiple municipalities. The geographic area need not correspond  to the jurisdictional boundaries of
municipalities. The agreement  may provide for the department to perform administration and
enforcement for a specified period or for carrying out one or more particular projects.
(2) The terms of an agreement under subsection (1)  of this section may specify whether the de-
partment is to utilize department resources or combine  resources with one or more of the munici-
palities to carry out an  agreement. An agreement may combine department and local government
resources in any manner that the parties believe will provide for the efficient and uniform  adminis-
tration of the building inspection program within the geographic area, including but not limited  to
full, divided, mutual or joint performance of any of the administrative or enforcement functions  by
any of the parties to the agreement. A  decision by the director regarding whether to enter into an
agreement under subsection  (1) of this section, and the content of any agreement that the director
enters into under subsection (1) of  this section, is not subject to review by the Attorney General
or the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services and is subject to challenge or appeal under
ORS chapter 183 only for failure to comply  with an express requirement created under ORS 455.185
to 455.198.
(3) An  agreement under subsection (1) of this section is not an abandonment of a building in-
spection program for purposes of ORS 455.148 or 455.150.
(4) If  the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  enters into an
agreement under subsection (1) of this section, the department and a public  body that offers
construction-related services in the geographic area  may enter into an agreement for providing ac-
cess to the construction-related services on the electronic information system described in  ORS
455.095 and 455.097. The agreement may include, but need not be limited to, provision for access that
allows the electronic submission of an application to the public body for  a construction-related
permit. As used in this subsection, “public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
[111]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 172. ORS 455.188 is amended to read:
455.188. (1) An agreement under ORS 455.185 may provide for  the parties to the agreement to
share any  fee revenue generated by the administration and enforcement of the agreement and to
expend the fee revenue anywhere within the geographic area covered by the agreement.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 455.210, if an agreement under ORS 455.185 provides for  the Depart-
ment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes to administer and enforce a building in-
spection program for which one or more municipalities have adopted a  fee or hourly rate, subject
to subsection  (3)(a) of this section the department may charge the municipally adopted fee or hourly
rate when providing the building inspection program services within a municipality.
(3) Fees described in subsection (2) of this section that are charged by the department:
(a) Are subject to any surcharges described under ORS 455.210, 455.220 or 455.447; and
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 455.210, are  not subject to Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices  approval.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 293.265, moneys from fees described in this section that  are collected
or received by, or in the possession of, a party to an agreement  under ORS 455.185 and are to be
expended by or on behalf of the state shall be turned over  to the State Treasurer no later than one
business day after  the parties to the agreement have determined that the moneys are moneys to be
expended by or on behalf of the state.
SECTION 173.
 ORS 455.192 is amended to read:
455.192. (1) Subject to ORS 293.235 to 293.245, 293.250, 293.260 to 293.280, 293.285 and 293.293
and any rules adopted under ORS 293.235 to 293.245, 293.250,  293.260 to 293.280, 293.285 and 293.293,
and notwithstanding ORS chapter 240, 276, 282, 283, 291 or 292 or other  provisions of ORS chapter
293 or the rules adopted under  ORS chapter 240, 276, 282, 283, 291 or 292, except as provided under
this section the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
may take any action the director considers reasonable to ensure that sufficient  staff and other re-
sources are available for the administration and enforcement of the state building code.  Subject to
subsections (2) to (5)  of this section, actions that the director may take under this section include,
but are not limited to:
(a) Utilizing  municipal personnel, or hiring former municipal personnel, to carry out the admin-
istrative and enforcement duties of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes under an agreement described in ORS 455.185;
(b) Employing additional department [ of Consumer and Business Services ] staff  for carrying out
the administrative and enforcement duties of the department under an  agreement described in ORS
455.185; and
(c) Expending available resources to carry out department responsibilities to provide sufficient
staff and other resources under an agreement described in ORS 455.185.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not authorize action within a  municipality administering
and enforcing a building inspection program under ORS 455.148 or 455.150  except as provided in an
agreement described in ORS 455.185 to which the municipality is a party or has consented.
(3) The utilization of  municipal personnel or hiring of former municipal personnel under sub-
section (1)(a) of  this section is subject to any applicable collective bargaining agreements and may
not be used to  displace any state employee. Municipal personnel whom the department utilizes under
subsection (1)(a) of this  section retain their status as municipal personnel for purposes of ORS 30.260
to 30.300 while carrying out the administrative  and enforcement duties of the department under an
agreement.
[112]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) The employment of additional  staff under subsection (1)(b) of this section is subject to any
limitations established by the Legislative Assembly on the number  of total personnel approved for
the department. To the extent practicable, the director shall give preference to the  use of available
state employees to fulfill additional staffing requirements.
(5) The employment of additional staff under  subsection (1)(b) of this section and the expenditure
of available resources under subsection  (1)(c) of this section must be predicated upon the availability
of adequate revenue, [ which] that  may include but need not be limited to revenue derived from
municipal sources through an agreement described under  ORS 455.185. The use of existing revenue
and available resources to carry out  an agreement under ORS 455.185 is not an addition to or
amendment of the legislatively adopted budget for the department.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 455.230, the director may use moneys  deposited in the [ Consumer and
Business Services Fund ] Department of Building Codes  Fund from fees collected under this sec-
tion for the purpose of paying the department’s costs of carrying out  the administrative and
enforcement duties of the department  within any administrative region established by the director
or a geographic region established by an agreement under ORS 455.185 or for  the purpose of as-
sisting a local government to carry out an agreement under ORS 455.185.
SECTION 174. ORS 455.195 is amended to read:
455.195. (1) If the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes assumes the
administration and enforcement of a building inspection program that has been surrendered  or
abandoned by a municipality,  and immediately prior to the surrender or abandonment the munici-
pality was charging a fee adopted under ORS 455.210 (3) that was different  from the fee authorized
under ORS 455.210 (1) for the  same services, the department may charge the fee adopted by the
municipality for the services that the department provides under the program.
(2) Fees described in subsection (1) of this section that are charged by the department:
(a) Are subject to any surcharges described under ORS 455.210, 455.220 or 455.447; and
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 455.210, are  not subject to Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices  approval.
SECTION 175.
 ORS 455.198 is amended to read:
455.198. Notwithstanding any surcharge use described in ORS 455.210 (4),  the Director of the
Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may use moneys from surcharges
imposed under ORS 455.210 (4) for the purpose of paying the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services’ ] Building Codes’ costs of carrying  out the administration and enforcement of the state
building code within an administrative region established by the  director or a geographic region
established by an agreement that the director enters into under ORS 455.185.
SECTION 176. ORS 455.200 is amended to read:
455.200. The Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes:
(1) May adopt rules, establish policies and procedures and take other actions the  director con-
siders reasonable  or expedient for carrying out agreements under ORS 455.148 (13), 455.150 (13) or
455.185 and any duties, functions and powers of the director or the Department  of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes under ORS 455.148 (13), 455.150 (13) or 455.185 to 455.198;
(2) Shall consult at least annually  with appropriate advisory boards regarding any agreements
under ORS 455.185 or actions taken by the  director under ORS 455.148 (13), 455.150 (13) or 455.185
to 455.198; and
(3) Shall report annually to the Legislative Assembly as provided under ORS 192.230  to 192.250
regarding any department activities under ORS 455.148 (13), 455.150 (13) or  455.185 to 455.198. The
[113]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
report shall include, but not be  limited to, information regarding any projected need for an increase
in department resources required for carrying out the  administration and enforcement of building
inspection programs under ORS 455.148 (13), 455.150 (13) or 455.185 to 455.198.
SECTION 177. ORS 455.210 is amended to read:
455.210. (1) Fees shall be prescribed as required by ORS 455.020 for plan review  and permits
issued by the Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes for the construction,
reconstruction, alteration and repair of  prefabricated structures and of buildings and other struc-
tures and the  installation of mechanical heating and ventilating devices and equipment. The fees
may not exceed 130 percent of the fee schedule printed in the “Uniform Building  Code,” 1979 Edi-
tion, and in the “Uniform Mechanical Code,”  1979 Edition, both published by the International
Conference of Building Officials. Fees are not effective until approved  by the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  the maximum fee the Director of the Depart-
ment of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may prescribe for a limited plan review
for fire and  life safety as required under ORS 479.155 shall be 40 percent of the prescribed permit
fee.
(3)(a) A municipality  may adopt by ordinance or regulation such fees as may be necessary and
reasonable to provide for the administration and enforcement of any  specialty code or codes for
which the municipality has assumed responsibility under ORS 455.148 or 455.150. A municipality
shall give the director notice of the proposed adoption of a new  or increased fee under this sub-
section. The municipality shall give the notice to the director at the time the  municipality provides
the opportunity for public comment under ORS 294.160 regarding the fee or, if  the proposed fee is
contained in an  estimate of municipal budget resources, at the time notice of the last budget meeting
is published under ORS 294.426.
(b) Ten or more persons or an association with 10 or more members may  appeal the adoption
of a fee described in this subsection to the director [ of the Department  of Consumer and Business
Services]. The persons or association must file the appeal no later than 60  days after the director
receives notice of the proposed adoption of the fee from the municipality under paragraph  (a) of this
subsection. However, if the municipality  failed to give notice to the director, an appeal may be filed
with the director within one year after adoption of the new or increased fee.  Upon receiving a
timely appeal, the director shall, after notice to affected parties and  hearing, review the
municipality’s fee adoption process and  the costs of administering and enforcing the specialty code
or codes referred to in paragraph  (a) of this subsection. The director shall approve the fee if the
director feels the fee is necessary and reasonable. If the director does not  approve the fee upon
appeal, the fee is not effective. The appeal process provided in this paragraph does not apply  to fees
that have  been submitted for a vote and approved by a majority of the electors voting on the ques-
tion.
(c) Fees collected by a municipality under this  subsection shall be used for the administration
and enforcement of a building inspection program for which the municipality has assumed responsi-
bility under ORS 455.148 or 455.150.
(d) For purposes of paragraph (b) of this subsection, in determining whether a fee is  reasonable
the director shall consider whether:
(A) The fee is  the same amount as or closely approximates the amount of the fee charged by
other municipalities of a similar size and geographic location for the same level of service;
(B) The fee is calculated with the same or a similar calculation  method as the fee charged by
[114]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
other municipalities for the same service;
(C) The fee is the  same type as the fee charged by other municipalities for the same level of
service; and
(D) The municipality, in adopting the fee,  complied with ORS 294.160, 294.361 and 294.426 and
this section and standards adopted by the director under ORS 455.148 (11) or 455.150 (11).
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter:
(a) For the purpose of partially defraying state administrative costs, there is imposed a sur-
charge in the amount of four percent of the total permit fees or, if the applicant chooses to  pay an
hourly rate instead of purchasing a permit, four percent of the total hourly charges collected.
(b) For the purpose of partially defraying state inspection costs, there is imposed a  surcharge
in the amount of two percent of the  total permit fees or, if the applicant chooses to pay an hourly
rate instead of purchasing a permit, two percent of the total hourly charges collected.
(c) For the purpose of defraying  the cost of administering and enforcing the state building code,
there is imposed a surcharge on permit fees and on hourly charges collected instead of  permit fees.
The surcharge may not exceed one percent of the  total permit fees or, if the applicant chooses to
pay an hourly rate instead of purchasing a permit, one percent of  the total hourly charges collected.
(d) For the purpose of defraying the cost of developing and administering  the electronic building
codes information system described in ORS 455.095  and 455.097, there is imposed a surcharge in the
amount of four percent on permit fees, or if the  applicant chooses to pay an hourly rate instead of
purchasing a permit, four percent of the total hourly charges collected.
(5) Municipalities shall collect and remit surcharges imposed under subsection  (4) of this section
to the director as provided in ORS 455.220.
(6) The director shall adopt  administrative rules to allow reduced fees for review of plans that
have been previously reviewed.
SECTION 178.
 ORS 455.220 is amended to read:
455.220. (1) There is hereby imposed a surcharge  in the amount of one percent of the total
building permit fees or, if the applicant  chooses to pay an hourly rate instead of purchasing a per-
mit, one percent of the  total hourly charges collected in connection with the construction of, or
addition or alteration to, buildings and equipment or appurtenances. Up to one-half of the surcharge
collected under this subsection may be used to fund  the activities described in ORS 455.042 and
455.046. The remainder of the surcharge collected under this subsection  shall be used for the pur-
pose of defraying the costs of training and other educational programs administered  by the Depart-
ment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes under this chapter.
(2) Permit surcharges shall be collected by  each municipality and remitted to the Director of the
Department of [ Consumer and  Business Services ] Building Codes. Each municipality having a pop-
ulation greater than 40,000 shall,  on a monthly basis, prepare and submit to the director a report
of permits and certificates issued in each class or category and fees and surcharges  thereon col-
lected during the month,  together with other statistical information as required by the director
concerning construction activity regulated by the parts of  the state building code administered by
the municipality. All other municipalities shall submit a report described in this  subsection on a
quarterly  basis. The report shall be in a form prescribed by the director and shall be submitted,
together with a remittance covering the surcharges collected, by no later than the 15th day  follow-
ing the month or quarter in which the surcharges are collected.
(3)(a) All surcharges and other fees  prescribed by ORS 455.010 to 455.240 and 455.410 to 455.740
and payable to the department, except fees  received under ORS 455.148 (6) or 455.150 (6), shall be
[115]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
deposited by the  director in the [ Consumer and Business Services Fund created by ORS 705.145 ]
Department of Building Codes Fund .
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, the surcharge imposed under subsection (1)
of this  section for permits established under ORS 446.062 (3), 446.176, 446.405 (2), 446.430 (2) and
455.170 (2) shall be deposited  in the [ Consumer and Business Services Fund established under ORS
705.145 and is continuously appropriated to the department ] Department of Building Codes Fund
for use as provided in ORS 446.423.
(4) Except as provided  in subsection (5) of this section, the director shall administer training and
other education  programs under this chapter through contracts with local educational institutions,
professional associations or other training providers.
(5) The director may:
(a) Arrange for the department to offer training and other education programs for building offi-
cials and building inspectors; or
(b) Arrange for local educational institutions, professional  associations or other training pro-
viders to offer training and other education programs for building  officials and building inspectors.
A contract between the director and a training provider under this paragraph is subject to  ORS
279B.235, but is otherwise exempt from ORS  chapters 279A and 279B and ORS 279C.100 to 279C.125
and 279C.300 to 279C.470.
SECTION 179.
 ORS 455.230 is amended to read:
455.230. (1) Except as otherwise provided  by law, all moneys appropriated or credited to the
[Consumer and Business Services Fund ] Department of Building Codes Fund and received under
this chapter, ORS 447.010 to 447.156, 447.992, 460.005 to 460.175, 460.310 to 460.370,  479.510 to
479.945, 479.995, 480.510 to 480.670 and ORS chapter 693 [ hereby are  appropriated continuously for
and] shall be used [ by the director ] for the purpose of carrying out [ the duties and responsibilities
imposed upon the department under ] this  chapter, ORS 446.566 to 446.646, [ 446.661 to 446.756,] 447.010
to 447.156, 447.992, 460.005 to 460.175, 460.310 to  460.370, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.995 and 480.510 to
480.670 and ORS chapter 693.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, all moneys  appropriated or credited to the [ Consumer
and Business Services Fund ] Department of Building Codes Fund  and received under  ORS 446.003
to 446.200, 446.210, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395  to 446.420, 446.566 to 446.646[ , 446.661 to 446.756] and
455.220 (1) [ hereby are appropriated continuously for and ] shall be used  [ by the director ] for the pur-
pose of carrying out [ the duties and responsibilities imposed  upon the department under ] ORS 446.003
to 446.200, 446.210, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395  to 446.420[ ,] and 446.566 to 446.646 [ and 446.661 to
446.756], and education and training programs pertaining thereto.
SECTION 180. ORS 455.240 is amended to read:
455.240. (1) All revenues derived from the sale of publications of the Department  of [ Consumer
and Business Services ] Building Codes  relating to building codes shall be deposited in the [ Con-
sumer and Business Services Fund ] Department of Building Codes Fund .
(2) Moneys  [ credited to the Consumer and Business Services Fund ] deposited under subsection
(1) of this section [ are continuously appropriated to the department for use ] shall be  used as provided
in ORS 455.022.
SECTION 181. ORS 455.310 is amended to read:
455.310. (1) It is not the purpose of this chapter to require that permits be obtained  or fees be
paid for repairs and  maintenance that do not violate the intent of the structural and fire and life
safety specialty provisions of the State of Oregon Structural Specialty Code and the Low-Rise Resi-
[116]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dential Dwelling Code, adopted  pursuant to ORS 455.020 and 455.610, ORS chapter 476, ORS 479.015
to 479.200 and 479.210 to 479.220, when such repair or maintenance  is done on a single-family resi-
dence, or a private garage, carport or storage shed that is accessory to a single-family residence.
(2) Items designated by the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes , with the advice of the Residential and Manufactured Structures Board, shall be
exempt from permits and  fees required under this chapter. The director shall, pursuant to ORS
chapter  183,  develop and maintain an applicable list of such exempt items, [ which] that  shall in-
clude, but not be limited to[ ,]:
(a) Concrete slabs, driveways, sidewalks[ ,] and masonry repair[ ,];
(b) Porches[ ,] and patio covers[ ,];
(c) Painting[ ,];
(d) Interior wall, floor or ceiling covering[ ,];
(e) Nonbearing partitions[ ,];
(f) Shelving[ ,] and cabinet work[ ,];
(g) Gutters[ ,] and downspouts[ ,];
(h) Small accessory buildings[ ,];
(i) Door and window replacements[ ,];
(j) Replacement or repair of siding ; and
(k) Replacement or repair of roofing.
(3) In making the list of exempt items  under subsection (2) of this section , the director shall
further define the items on the list [ contained in this  subsection ] so that no item which adversely
affects the structural integrity of the dwelling shall be on the list.
SECTION 182. ORS 455.312 is amended to read:
455.312. (1) For a residential prefabricated structure manufactured in this state and intended  for
delivery in another state, the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business  Services ]
Building Codes may not require that:
(a) The prefabricated structure conform to the state building code.
(b) An inspector provide plan approvals and inspections pursuant to ORS 455.715 to 455.740.
(c) A person licensed under  ORS 479.630, 693.060 or 693.103 perform electrical or plumbing in-
stallations in the prefabricated structure.
(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section exempts a person that is  renting, leasing, selling,
exchanging, installing or offering for  rent, lease, sale, exchange or installation a residential prefab-
ricated structure from meeting the  insignia of compliance or certification stamp requirements pre-
scribed under ORS 455.705 if the prefabricated structure is delivered in or relocated to this state.
SECTION 183.
 ORS 455.355 is amended to read:
455.355. (1) The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall, by rule:
(a) Prohibit  the installation of thermostats that contain mercury in commercial and residential
buildings. The director  may not, under rules developed pursuant to this paragraph, prohibit the in-
stallation of thermostats that contain mercury on industrial equipment used for safety controls.
(b) Establish a uniform notification and process  for disposal and delivery of mercury thermostats
by persons installing heating,  ventilation or air conditioning systems. Persons installing heating,
ventilation  or  air conditioning systems shall dispose of mercury thermostats according to the pro-
cess established pursuant to this paragraph.
(2) As used in this section, “thermostat” means a device commonly used to sense and,  through
[117]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
electrical communication with heating, cooling or ventilation equipment, control room temperature.
SECTION 184. ORS 455.365 is amended to read:
455.365. (1) The Building Codes Structures Board and the Residential and Manufactured  Struc-
tures Board shall adopt design and  construction standards for mitigating radon levels in new resi-
dential buildings that are identified under the structural specialty code as Group R-2 or R-3
buildings and  new public buildings. In adopting the standards, the boards shall give consideration
to any standards recommended by the United States  Environmental Protection Agency for radon
mitigation systems in buildings.
(2) The boards shall make the design and construction standards for mitigating radon levels
applicable in:
(a) Baker, Clackamas, Hood River, Multnomah, Polk, Washington and Yamhill Counties; and
(b) Any county for which the boards, after consultation with the  Oregon Health Authority,
consider the standards appropriate due to local radon levels.
(3) The Director of the  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may
authorize a municipality that administers and enforces one or more building  inspection programs
under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 to also administer and enforce any applicable standards for  mitigating
radon that are adopted by the boards.
(4) The director, in  consultation with the boards, may adopt rules for the implementation, ad-
ministration and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 185.
 ORS 455.380 is amended to read:
455.380. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS  455.148 and 455.150, the Department of
[Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes is the final authority in  interpretation, execution
and enforcement of state and municipal administration of building  codes and rules with respect to
construction of agriculture workforce housing as defined in ORS 315.163.
(2) The department shall provide for  a statewide uniform application and method of calculating
permit fees for agriculture workforce housing as defined in ORS 315.163.
(3) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of  subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.
SECTION 186. ORS 455.412 is amended to read:]
455.412. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  shall amend
the state  building code as necessary for the purpose of reducing the frequency of false alarms from
smoke alarms and smoke detectors. Rules adopted under this section shall be designed to  address
smoke alarms and  smoke detectors in single family and multifamily dwellings, hotels and lodging
houses and shall not apply to recreational vehicles, commercial vehicles, railroad equipment,  air-
craft, marine vessels and manufactured dwellings.
(2) As used in this section,  “smoke alarm” and “smoke detector” shall have the meanings pro-
vided in ORS 479.250.
SECTION 187. ORS 455.415 is amended to read:
455.415. (1) A person who is licensed by the State Plumbing Board or the Department  of [ Con-
sumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  pursuant to ORS  460.057, 460.059, 479.630, 479.910,
479.915, 480.630, 693.060, 693.103 or 693.111 must wear and  visibly display an identification badge
indicating the person’s current license status while performing work  for which the license is re-
quired. The authority that licenses the person shall specify the size and content of the  identification
badge and may establish such other specifications as the authority deems appropriate.
(2) Subsection (1)  of this section does not apply if wearing or displaying the identification badge
[118]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
may create a danger to the public health or to the safety of the person or the public.
(3) This section does not require the display of a contractor or business license.
SECTION 188.
 ORS 455.420 is amended to read:
455.420. (1) Each individual dwelling unit in a multifamily residential building constructed after
October 4, 1977, shall have installed a separate, individual electrical meter for  each such dwelling
unit except where a building inspector certified under ORS 455.715 to 455.740  determines that pur-
suant to standards adopted by the Director of  the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes the installation of a single, central electrical meter for all the dwelling units in such
building would facilitate an overall reduction in electrical consumption by such units.
(2) For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of subsection (1) of this section,  the director,
based on recommendations of the Residential and Manufactured Structures Board, shall adopt by
rule standards for determining whether the installation  of a single electrical meter for all dwelling
units in a multifamily residential building facilitates an  overall reduction in electrical consumption
by such units.
SECTION 189.
 ORS 455.425 is amended to read:
455.425. (1) Any  low-income housing for the elderly on which construction begins after January
1, 1978, and [ which] that  is financed in whole  or in part by federal or state funds shall contain a
multiservice room adequate in size to seat all of the tenants.
(2) The Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall
adopt rules, in accordance with the applicable provisions of ORS chapter  183, establishing standards
and specifications for low-income elderly housing multiservice  rooms required under subsection (1)
of this section.  In development of standards and specifications, the director may take into account
any standards or specifications established pursuant to any federal program under which the con-
struction of such housing is funded.
(3) No housing described in subsection (1) of this section that contains 20 or fewer  units is re-
quired to provide a multiservice room.
SECTION 190.
 ORS 455.430 is amended to read:
455.430. If the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
determines that the standards for prefabricated  structures prescribed by statute, rule or regulation
of another state  are at least equal to the regulations prescribed under this chapter, and that such
standards are actually enforced by such other state, the director may provide by regulation  that
prefabricated structures approved by such other state shall be deemed  to have been approved by the
director.
SECTION 191. ORS 455.445 is amended to read:
455.445. (1) [ After considering the recommendations  of the Indoor Air Pollution Task Force, and
as expeditiously as possible, ] The Director of the Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes shall adopt ventilation standards for public areas and office workplaces  that are
at least equivalent  to the most recent, nationally recognized ventilation standards generally ac-
cepted and in use throughout the United States.
(2) The director shall adopt building codes and  building product standards to protect the indoor
air quality of  private residences but only as necessary to address serious or unique indoor air
quality problems in Oregon when  federal statutes, regulations and national codes fail to address
building product and building code related indoor air quality problems.
[(3) As expeditiously as possible, the director shall consider for adoption the ventilation  standards
recommended by the Indoor Air Pollution Task Force. ]
[119]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 192. ORS 455.447 is amended to read:
455.447. (1) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) “Essential facility” means:
(A) Hospitals and other medical facilities having surgery and emergency treatment areas;
(B) Fire and police stations;
(C) Tanks  or other structures containing, housing or supporting water or fire-suppression mate-
rials or equipment required for the protection of essential or  hazardous facilities or special occu-
pancy structures;
(D) Emergency vehicle shelters and garages;
(E) Structures and equipment in emergency-preparedness centers;
(F) Standby power generating equipment for essential facilities; and
(G) Structures and equipment  in government communication centers and other facilities required
for emergency response.
(b) “Hazardous facility”  means structures housing, supporting or containing sufficient quantities
of toxic or explosive substances to be of danger to the safety of the public if released.
(c) “Major  structure” means a building over six stories in height with an aggregate floor area
of 60,000 square feet  or more, every building over 10 stories in height and parking structures as
determined by Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes rule.
(d) “Seismic hazard” means a geologic condition that is a  potential danger to life and property
that includes but is not  limited to earthquake, landslide, liquefaction, tsunami inundation, fault
displacement[,] and subsidence.
(e) “Special occupancy structure” means:
(A) Covered structures whose primary occupancy is public assembly with a capacity  greater
than 300 persons;
(B) Buildings with a capacity greater than 250  individuals for every public, private or parochial
school through secondary level or child care centers;
(C) Buildings for colleges or adult education schools with a capacity greater than 500 persons;
(D) Medical  facilities with 50 or more resident, incapacitated patients not included in subpara-
graphs (A) to (C) of this paragraph;
(E) Jails and detention facilities; and
(F) All structures and occupancies with a capacity greater than 5,000 persons.
(2) The  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall consult with the
Seismic Safety Policy Advisory Commission and the State Department of Geology and Mineral In-
dustries prior to adopting rules. Thereafter,  the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes may adopt rules as set forth in ORS 183.325 to 183.410 to amend the  state building
code  to:
(a) Require new  building sites for essential facilities, hazardous facilities, major structures and
special occupancy structures to be evaluated on a site  specific basis for vulnerability to seismic
geologic hazards.
(b) Require a program for the installation of strong  motions accelerographs in or near selected
major buildings.
(c) Provide for the review of geologic and engineering reports for seismic design of  new
buildings of large size, high occupancy or critical use.
(d) Provide for filing of noninterpretive seismic data from site evaluation in a manner  accessible
to the public.
[120]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) For the purpose of defraying the  cost of applying the regulations in subsection (2) of this
section, there is hereby imposed a surcharge in the amount of one percent  of the total fees collected
under the structural and mechanical  specialty codes for essential facilities, hazardous facilities,
major structures and special  occupancy structures . [ , which ] The  fees shall be retained by the ju-
risdiction enforcing the particular specialty code as provided in ORS 455.150 or enforcing a  building
inspection program under ORS 455.148.
(4) Developers of new  essential facilities, hazardous facilities and major structures described in
subsection (1)(a)(E), (b) and  (c) of this section and new special occupancy structures described in
subsection (1)(e)(A), (D) and (F) of this section that are located  in an identified tsunami inundation
zone shall consult with the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries for assistance  in
determining the impact of possible tsunamis on the proposed development and for assistance in
preparing methods to mitigate risk at the site of  a potential tsunami. Consultation shall take place
prior to submittal of design plans to the building official for final approval.
SECTION 193.
 ORS 455.448 is amended to read:]
455.448. (1) For the purposes of enforcement of this chapter the building  inspector or any person
appointed by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, after showing
official identification and, if necessary, a  warrant issued to the building owner or agent of the owner
under subsection (2) of this section, may:
(a) Enter,  at reasonable times, any property that is known to be damaged, or for which there
are reasonable  grounds to believe that the structure has been damaged, as a result of an earthquake.
(b) Inspect, at reasonable times,  within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner property
that is known  to be damaged, or for which there are reasonable grounds to believe that the struc-
ture has been damaged, as a result of an earthquake.
(2) If entry  is refused, the building inspector or any duly appointed representative of the de-
partment [of Consumer and Business Services ] may appear before  any magistrate empowered to issue
warrants and request such magistrate to issue an inspection warrant, directing it to  any peace of-
ficer, as defined in ORS 161.015 to enter  the described property to remove any person or obstacle
and assist the building inspector or representative of  the department inspecting the property in any
way necessary to complete the inspection.
SECTION 194. ORS 455.449 is amended to read:
455.449. (1) All buildings or portions [ thereof which ] of buildings that  are determined  after in-
spection by a building inspector  or a representative of the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes to be in  unsafe condition as a result of earthquake damage may be de-
clared  to  be a public nuisance and shall be abated by repair, rehabilitation, demolition or removal
in accordance with the procedure specified by rules adopted by the [ agency] department.
(2) Any building declared to be in unsafe condition under subsection (1) of this section  shall be
made to comply with one of the following:
(a) The building shall be repaired in accordance with the current building code or other  current
code applicable to the type of substandard conditions requiring repair;
(b) The building shall be demolished if the owner of the building consents; or
(c) The building may be vacated, secured  and maintained against entry if the building does not
constitute an immediate danger to the life, limb, property or safety of the public.
(3) If the building or structure is in such condition as to make it  immediately dangerous to the
life, limb, property or safety of the public or its occupants, the department  [ of Consumer and Busi-
ness Services ] or a representative of the department shall  order [ it to ] that the building or struc-
[121]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ture be vacated.
(4) If the structure, in whole or in part, is listed on  or is eligible for listing on the National
Register of Historic Places, established and  maintained under the National Historic Preservation
Act  of  1966 (P.L. 89-665), or if the National Register of Historic Places ceases accepting nominations,
is approved for listing on an Oregon register of historic places, or is a locally designated landmark
protected by ordinance  against demolition without due process, alternative compliance with the
provisions of subsection (2)(a) and (c) of this section shall be allowed if the repaired or  rehabilitated
building is  no more hazardous than it would be if repaired or rehabilitated in accordance with (2)(a)
of this section.
SECTION 195.
 ORS 455.450 is amended to read:
455.450. A person may not:
(1) Violate, or procure or assist in the violation of, any final order of the  Director of the De-
partment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, an advisory board, a state adminis-
trative officer or any local appeals board, building official or inspector, concerning the  application
of the state building code in a particular case or concerning a license, certificate, registration or
other authorization.
(2) Engage in, or procure or assist any other  person to engage in, any conduct or activity for
which a permit, label, license, certificate, registration or other formal  authorization is required by
any specialty code, any  provision of ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420,
446.566 to 446.646, [ 446.666 to 446.746,] 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 and 480.510 to 480.670,  this chap-
ter or ORS chapter 447, 460 or  693, or any rule adopted or order issued for the administration and
enforcement of those provisions, without first having obtained  such permit, label, license, certificate,
registration or other formal authorization.
(3) Violate, or procure or  assist in the violation of, any standard, specification, requirement,
prohibition or other technical provision set forth in the state building code  or an applicable local
building code or in any rule or order of  the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes, an advisory board, a local governing body or local building official.
SECTION 196.
 ORS 455.457 is amended to read:
455.457. In accordance with the applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183, the Director of the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes by rule shall establish a  licensing
system for persons that perform specialty code inspections or plan reviews and for businesses  that
employ persons that perform specialty code inspections or plan reviews. Such a system shall include
but not be limited to the following provisions:
(1) Prescribing  the form and content of and the times and procedures for submitting an appli-
cation for the issuance or renewal of a license.
(2) Prescribing the terms of the licenses and the fees for the  original issue and renewal in
amounts that do not exceed the cost to  the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes of administering the licensing system.
(3) Prescribing the requirements for and the manner of testing  the competency of applicants for
the protection of the public health and safety.
(4) Prescribing the amounts and conditions of bonds and liability insurance.
(5) Setting  forth those actions or circumstances that constitute failure to achieve or maintain
licensing competency or that otherwise constitute a danger to the public health or safety and for
which the director may refuse to issue or renew or may suspend or revoke a license or  impose a
civil  penalty.
[122]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 197. ORS 455.461 is amended to read:
455.461. (1) The Director of the Department of [Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes, by rule, shall develop quality control procedures for the activities of specialty code inspec-
tors, plan reviewers and businesses that employ specialty code inspectors and plan reviewers  li-
censed under ORS 455.457. These procedures shall include but are not limited to random sampling
of the work of such persons and businesses.
(2) The director [ of the Department of Consumer and Business Services ] shall appoint  by rule a
chief inspector for each specialty code under this chapter.
SECTION 198. ORS 455.463 is amended to read:
455.463. (1) In addition to any  other authority and power granted to the Director of the De-
partment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes under this chapter and ORS chapters
447 and 479,  with respect to specialty code inspectors, plan reviewers and businesses that employ
specialty code inspectors and plan reviewers licensed under ORS 455.457, if the  director has reason
to believe that there is a failure to enforce or there is a violation of any  provision of this chapter
or ORS chapters 447 and 479 or any rule adopted thereunder, the director may:
(a) Examine building code activities of specialty code inspectors, plan reviewers and  businesses
that employ specialty code inspectors and plan reviewers;
(b) Take sworn testimony; and
(c) With the authorization of the office of the Attorney General,  subpoena persons and records
to obtain testimony on official actions  that were taken or omitted or to obtain documents otherwise
subject to public inspection under ORS 192.410 to 192.505.
(2) The investigative authority authorized by subsection (1) of this section covers violations or
omissions by specialty  code inspectors, plan reviewers and businesses that employ specialty code
inspectors and plan reviewers licensed  under ORS 455.457 related to enforcement of codes or ad-
ministrative rules, licensing of inspectors or financial transactions.
SECTION 199.
 ORS 455.465 is amended to read:
455.465. (1) In administering a building  inspection program, the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes or a municipality shall:
(a) Designate at least three persons licensed under ORS 455.457 from whom the department or
municipality will accept plan reviews; or
(b) Contract with a person licensed under ORS 455.457 and  may include as a term of the con-
tract a process for collection of plan review fees.
(2) For plan  reviews conducted under subsection (1) of this section, the department or a
municipality may:
(a) Establish the process for collecting fees from a person licensed under ORS 455.457; and
(b) Collect an administrative fee as provided in ORS 455.210.
(3) The provisions of ORS 279C.100 to 279C.125 and 279C.300 to 279C.470 and  ORS chapters
279A and 279B, except ORS 279B.235, do not apply to a personal  services contract between the de-
partment or a municipality and a person licensed under ORS 455.457.
SECTION 200.
 ORS 455.466 is amended to read:
455.466. (1) As used in this section, “essential project” means a:
(a) State owned or operated development;
(b) Development  of industries in the traded sector as defined in ORS 285A.010 for structures
more than 100,000 square feet in size;
(c) Project in an industrial site listed by the  Oregon Business Development Department as ready
[123]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for development and for which the project  construction totals more than 100,000 square feet in size;
or
(d) Development designated  by the Director of the Oregon Business Development Department
as essential to the economic well-being of the state.
(2) Notwithstanding any municipal building inspection  program under ORS 455.148 or 455.150,
an applicant for a building permit for an  essential project or the municipality having jurisdiction
over an essential project may request in writing that the Department  of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes administer and enforce the state building code for the project.
(3) Upon receipt by  the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes of a
written request under this section, the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Ser-
vices] Building Codes  shall assemble a rapid approval assessment team consisting of such depart-
ment employees and other persons as  the director considers appropriate. The purpose of the rapid
approval assessment team shall be to provide assistance and advice to the director.
(4) The  Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes , in
consultation with the  rapid approval assessment team, shall determine whether adequate resources
are available to ensure that an essential project may proceed  in a timely, consistent and flexible
manner. In determining the availability of resources  under this subsection, the director and the
rapid approval assessment team shall give first consideration to the availability of  municipal re-
sources. If the director  determines that municipal resources may be inadequate for the essential
project,  the  director may consider whether state resources or a combination of municipal and state
resources is available to ensure that the essential project may proceed in a  timely, consistent and
flexible manner. A determination by the director under this subsection is not appealable.
(5) The Director of the  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may
take all  actions that the director considers reasonable and necessary to ensure that an essential
project may proceed in a timely, consistent and flexible manner, including but not limited to:
(a) Establishing policies, procedures and rules as necessary;
(b) Working directly with local municipalities and other state agencies  to resolve conflicts and
disputes related to the state building code;
(c) Encouraging cooperation between state and municipal building officials and inspectors;
(d) Developing agreements;
(e) Developing site-specific dispute resolution and appeals related to  state building code re-
quirements;
(f) Expediting,  coordinating or providing building inspection program plan review, permitting
and inspection services;
(g) Assisting a municipality or seeking assistance from a municipality; and
(h) Establishing fees to cover the cost of provided services.
SECTION 201.
 ORS 455.467 is amended to read:
455.467. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, for  specialty code plan reviews
of simple low-rise residential dwellings, the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Build-
ing Codes or a municipality that administers  a building inspection program under ORS 455.148 or
455.150 shall approve or disapprove the specialty code building plan:
(a) For a jurisdiction with a population that is less than 300,000, within  10 business days of re-
ceiving a complete application, or shall implement the process described in ORS 455.465.
(b) For a jurisdiction with  a population that is 300,000 or more, within 15 business days of re-
ceiving a complete application, or shall implement the process described in ORS 455.465.
[124]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The 10-day and 15-day requirements in subsection (1) of this section do not apply if:
(a) The plan requires approval by federal, state or local agencies outside the jurisdiction of  the
issuing agency;
(b) The plan is for a complex structure that requires additional review as determined by the
department or municipality; or
(c) Based  on conditions that exist in the affected municipality, the Director of the Department
of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes authorizes a different plan review  schedule as
described in a building inspection program submitted under ORS 455.148 or 455.150.
(3) For specialty code plan reviews of commercial structures, a municipality shall include in  its
building inspection program submitted under ORS 455.148 or 455.150  a process for plan review ser-
vices. The municipality shall include in its  program detailed reasons supporting the proposed plan
review process. The plan review services provided by the municipality shall:
(a) Allow an applicant to defer  the submittal of plans for one or more construction phases for
a commercial construction project in accordance with the state building code; and
(b) Allow an applicant to receive permits for  each of the phases of a commercial construction
project as described in the state building code when the plan review for that phase is approved.
(4) For a phased commercial construction project as described in  subsection (3) of this section,
the municipality shall inform the applicant of the detailed plans necessary for each phase  of the
project  and  the estimated time for initial and phased review of the building plans for conformance
with the state building code.
(5) An applicant submitting  plans under subsection (3) of this section is responsible for ensuring
that the project meets  all specialty code requirements and that the project does not proceed beyond
the level of approval authorized by the building official.
(6) A municipality that repeatedly fails to meet the plan review period described  in this section
or otherwise authorized in its  building inspection program submitted under ORS 455.148 or 455.150
shall be considered to be engaging in a pattern of conduct of failing to provide timely plan  reviews
under ORS 455.160.
SECTION 202.
 ORS 455.471 is amended to read:
455.471. (1)  Fee amounts shall not be established by the Director of the Department of [ Con-
sumer and Business  Services ] Building Codes or any municipality for fees charged by persons li-
censed under ORS 455.457.
(2) Fees charged by a person licensed under ORS  455.457 shall include a surcharge equal to the
percentage amounts established for municipalities under ORS 455.210 (4)(a) and (b) and 455.220 (1).
The surcharges shall be remitted  quarterly to the Department  of Consumer and Business Services
to partially defray the department’s administration, inspection and training costs  incurred pursuant
to ORS 455.455, 455.457, 455.461 and 455.463. Funds received by the department under this section
shall be deposited in the [ Consumer and Business Services Fund created by ORS 705.145 ] Depart-
ment of Building Codes Fund .
SECTION 203.
 ORS 455.473 is amended to read:
455.473. All moneys received  by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes pursuant to ORS 455.457 and 455.471 shall  be paid into the [ State Treasury ] Department of
Building Codes Fund and credited  to the appropriate specialty code account . [ under this chapter
or ORS 479.510 to 479.945. All moneys deposited in  the accounts under this section are continuously
appropriated to the  department to carry out the provisions of ORS 455.455 to 455.463, 455.471, 455.473,
455.477 and 455.897 and section 10, chapter 1045, Oregon Laws 1999. ]
[125]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 204. ORS 455.475 is amended to read:
455.475. (1) An applicant for  a building permit may appeal a decision made by a building official
under authority established pursuant to ORS 455.148, 455.150 or 455.467.  The following apply to an
appeal under this subsection:
(a) An appeal regarding the interpretation  or application of a particular specialty code provision
shall be made first to the appropriate specialty code chief inspector of the Department of  [Consumer
and Business Services ] Building Codes. The decision of the department chief inspector may  be ap-
pealed to the appropriate advisory  board. The decision of the advisory board may only be appealed
to the Director of the  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes if codes in
addition to the applicable specialty code are at issue.
(b) If the  appropriate advisory board determines that a decision by the department chief in-
spector is a major code interpretation, then the inspector shall distribute the decision in writing  to
all applicable specialty code  public and private inspection authorities in the state. The decision shall
be distributed within  60 days after the board’s determination, and there shall be no charge for the
distribution of the  decision. As used in this paragraph, a “major code interpretation” means a code
interpretation decision that affects or may affect more  than one job site or more than one inspection
jurisdiction.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, an applicant for a building permit  may
appeal the decision of a building official on any matter relating to the administration and  enforce-
ment of this chapter to the department.  The appeal must be in writing. A decision by the department
on an appeal filed under this subsection is subject to judicial review as provided in ORS 183.484.
(3) If an appeal is made under  this section, an inspection authority shall extend the plan review
deadline by the number of days it takes for a final decision to be issued for the appeal.
SECTION 205. ORS 455.479 is amended to read:
455.479. Nothing in ORS 455.455 to 455.477 and 455.897 and section 10, chapter 1045,  Oregon
Laws 1999, applies to special inspections as described in  each specialty code as adopted by the Di-
rector of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
SECTION 206. ORS 455.483 is amended to read:
455.483. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, with the ap-
proval of the Electrical and Elevator Board, shall adopt rules to make electrical code  plan review
mandatory only for complex structures located in jurisdictions that offer electrical code plan review
services.
(2) The  department shall adopt rules to make plumbing code plan review mandatory only for
complex structures located in jurisdictions that offer plumbing code plan review services.
(3) Notwithstanding any rules adopted pursuant to  subsections (1) and (2) of this section, an
owner of  a complex structure or the owner’s agent may request and receive plan review and in-
spections for any electrical and plumbing materials and installations that are subject to the  state
building code.
SECTION 207.
 ORS 455.485 is amended to read:
455.485. (1) When adopting the state building code, the Director of the Department  of [ Consumer
and Business Services ] Building Codes shall give special consideration  to the unique needs of con-
struction in rural or remote parts of this state.
(2) Notwithstanding any description of State Fire Marshal  duties in ORS 476.030, 476.033,
476.035, 476.150 or  476.155, the director [ of the Department of Consumer and Business Services ] or a
local building official administering a  building inspection program under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 may
[126]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
determine whether the structure as set forth in the plans and specifications or as constructed meets
the standards of the state  building code, including but not limited to fire and life safety standards.
The State Fire Marshal, or a  local fire official for a governmental subdivision exempted from State
Fire Marshal regulations as described under ORS 476.030, may provide advice to building officials,
inspectors  or  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes employees concern-
ing state building code standards. A  local building official or department employee shall give con-
sideration to advice of the State Fire Marshal  or local fire official that does not conflict with the
state building code, but shall retain the authority to make final decisions regarding the code.
SECTION 208.
 ORS 455.490 is amended to read:
455.490. The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The use of a consensus-based  expedited review system for the uniform statewide adoption,
implementation, application and enforcement of certain  state building code requirements to promote
energy efficiency and energy conservation  will facilitate and expedite compliance with those state
building code requirements by providing a comprehensive  source for interpretation of requirements
that integrate elements affecting a variety of specialty codes.
(2) The establishment of a Construction Industry Energy Board as an advisory board to  the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes is an appropriate means for fur-
thering the goal of facilitating and expediting state building code  compliance related to energy ef-
ficiency and energy conservation.
(3) The creation of a Construction Industry  Energy Board will improve state building code
compliance with regard to energy efficiency and energy use standards by creating an additional
body empowered to enforce those standards.
(4) The reorganization of certain existing advisory boards  and the realignment of code enforce-
ment responsibilities will enable the department [ of Consumer and Business  Services ] to more effec-
tively ensure compliance with state building code specialty codes  by increasing the focus of
appropriate technical expertise, making the advisory boards  more responsive to inquiries regarding
code requirements and streamlining code enforcement responsibilities.
SECTION 209.
 ORS 455.492 is amended to read:
455.492. (1) There  is established a Construction Industry Energy Board, consisting of 11 mem-
bers. The membership shall consist of the following:
(a) Two members selected by  the Electrical and Elevator Board from the members of the Elec-
trical and Elevator Board who have practical experience in the electric industry.
(b) Two  members selected by the Residential and Manufactured Structures Board from the
members of the Residential and Manufactured Structures Board who  have practical experience in
the residential structure industry or manufactured structure industry.
(c) Two  members selected by the Building Codes Structures Board from the members of the
Building Codes Structures Board who have practical experience in construction.
(d) Two members selected by the State Plumbing Board from the members of the  State Plumbing
Board who have practical experience in construction.
(e) Two members selected by the Mechanical Board from  the members of the Mechanical Board
who have practical experience in construction.
(f) One member who is an employee  or officer of the State Department of Energy appointed by
the Director of the State Department of Energy.
(2) The Construction Industry Energy Board shall select one of its members as  chairperson and
another as vice chairperson, for such terms and with duties  and powers necessary for the perform-
[127]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ance of the functions of those positions as the board determines.
(3) Except as provided in ORS  455.496 (2), a majority of the members of the board constitutes
a quorum for the transaction of business.
(4) A member of the board is not entitled to compensation,  but at the discretion of the Director
of the Department of Building  Codes may be reimbursed from funds available to the Department
of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes for actual and necessary travel and other ex-
penses incurred by the member in the performance of the member’s  official duties in the manner and
amount provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 210. ORS 455.496 is amended to read:
455.496. (1) The Construction Industry Energy Board may evaluate and approve or disapprove
proposed state building code standards relating to the energy use and  energy efficiency aspects of
the electrical, structural, prefabricated structure and low-rise residential specialty  codes. The pro-
posed standards evaluated by the board may include, but need  not be limited to, standards regarding
energy-conserving technology, construction methods,  products and materials. The board shall for-
ward any proposed standards recommended by the board  to the Director of the Department of
[Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes for adoption or rejection by the director.
(2) Approval by seven or more board members is required in order to recommend  adoption of
an energy construction standard to the director. If the standard relates to a specialty code that  is
administered by an advisory board described in ORS 455.492 (1)(a) to (e),  the Construction Industry
Energy Board may not recommend the  standard to the director unless all of the Construction In-
dustry Energy Board members who are  members of the advisory board that administers that spe-
cialty code approve of recommending the standard.
(3) Notwithstanding  any provision of this chapter or ORS chapter 446 or ORS 479.510 to 479.945
or 479.950, or any provision of ORS  chapter 447 regulating fixture installations or regulating
plumbing products, the director may adopt or reject a proposed standard recommended  by the Con-
struction Industry Energy Board without further consultation of an advisory board. No  later than
30 days after the  director receives the proposed standard, the director shall initiate a process for
considering  the  approval or rejection of the recommended proposed standard. If the director ap-
proves the standard, the director shall file the standard with the Secretary of State  under ORS
183.335 as a rule amending the state building code.
(4) The Construction Industry Energy  Board shall identify and give notice to the director of the
specialty codes that are affected by a  recommended proposed standard. If the director adopts the
standard as a rule, the rule shall be enforceable as a specialty code provision administered by the
board and enforceable by  any appropriate advisory board as a provision of the code administered
by that advisory board.
SECTION 211.
 ORS 455.500 is amended to read:
455.500. (1) The Director of the Department of [Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes, in consultation  with the appropriate advisory boards, shall adopt, amend and administer a
code separate from the state building  code, to be known as the Reach Code. The director shall de-
sign the code to increase  energy efficiency in buildings that are newly constructed, reconstructed,
altered or repaired.
(2) The Reach Code shall be a set  of statewide optional construction standards and methods that
are economically  and technically feasible, including any published generally accepted codes and
standards newly developed for construction or for the installation of  products, equipment and de-
vices. When adopting or amending  the code, the director, in consultation with the appropriate ad-
[128]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
visory boards, shall:
(a) Review generally accepted codes and standards that achieve greater energy efficiency  than
the energy efficiency required by the state building code; and
(b) Review technical components of generally accepted construction  documents as the director
considers necessary to address federal, state and local financial incentives and advances  in con-
struction methods, standards and technologies.
(3) When amending the state building code under ORS  455.030, the director shall consider
whether any of the standards and methods contained in the Reach Code should be  removed from the
Reach Code and adopted in the state building code.
(4) The  inclusion of a standard or method for construction or for the installation of products,
equipment or devices in the Reach Code:
(a) Does not alter any licensing or certification requirements under ORS  446.003 to 446.200,
446.225 to  446.285, 447.010 to 447.156, 460.005 to 460.175, 479.510 to 479.945 or 480.510 to 480.670 or
this chapter or ORS  chapter 693 or Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
rules;
(b) Exempts products, equipment and devices from product  certification requirements under ORS
447.010 to 447.156 and 479.510 to 479.945 and the state building code; and
(c) Requires that a municipality administering and enforcing a building inspection program un-
der ORS 455.148 or 455.150 must recognize and accept the standard,  method, installation, product,
equipment or device if a person applies to construct,  reconstruct, alter or repair a building in con-
formance with the Reach Code.
SECTION 212. ORS 455.505 is amended to read:
455.505. The Director of the Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes,
subject to the approval of the appropriate  advisory boards, shall adopt rules establishing uniform
energy conservation standards for inclusion under  the state building code. The director shall design
the energy conservation standards to increase energy  efficiency in buildings that are newly con-
structed, reconstructed, altered or repaired. The director shall periodically review  the energy con-
servation standards of the state building code and propose updates to the standards as the director
considers necessary to reflect  changing technology in energy efficiency and to encourage continual
improvements in building energy efficiency in accordance  with ORS 455.511. In reviewing the energy
conservation standards, the director shall consider the  target standards described in the Architec-
ture 2030 organization’s 2030 Challenge and  may consider other available nationally recognized en-
ergy conservation standards.
SECTION 213.
 ORS 455.511 is amended to read:
455.511. (1) As used in this  section, “energy efficiency” means the use of construction and design
standards, construction methods, products, equipment and devices to increase efficient use of, and
reduce  consumption  of, electricity, natural gas and fossil fuels in buildings undergoing new con-
struction, reconstruction, alteration or repair.
(2) The  Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, after
consultation with the State Department of Energy and  subject to the approval of the appropriate
advisory boards, shall adopt amendments to the state building code under ORS 455.030 to increase
energy efficiency in buildings that are newly constructed, reconstructed, altered or repaired.  In
adopting the amendments, the director shall consider generally accepted model codes,  products and
product standards, the Reach Code adopted under ORS  455.500 and other available data to evaluate
codes and standards that promote energy efficiency in buildings.
[129]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The director, in  consultation with the appropriate advisory boards, shall develop a schedule
for the periodic review of energy efficiency standards and shall establish  goals for increasing the
level of energy  conservation achieved by the use of energy efficiency standards contained in the
state building code and the Reach Code. In  establishing goals and the schedule for periodic review
of standards under this section, the director shall consider the  publication schedule of generally
accepted construction codes and standards. If the  director determines that the adopted review
schedule or energy efficiency goals are not practicable  for economic or technical reasons, the di-
rector may amend the schedule or goals as the director considers appropriate.
SECTION 214. ORS 455.525 is amended to read:
455.525. (1)  In the manner provided in ORS chapter 183 for the adoption of rules and after con-
sideration of available technology and costs, the Building Codes  Structures Board and the Residen-
tial and Manufactured Structures Board,  or the Construction Industry Energy Board, may make
recommendations to the Director of the Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes for the establishment  of basic and uniform performance standards to provide maximum energy
conservation and use of passive solar energy in the design,  construction, reconstruction, alteration
and repair of buildings and other structures. Such standards  shall be submitted to the director [ of
the Department of Consumer and Business  Services ] for proposed inclusion in the state building code
by the Building Codes Structures Board or the  Residential and Manufactured Structures Board as
provided by ORS 455.030 (4) or by the Construction  Industry Energy Board as provided under ORS
455.496.
(2) Any testing requirements adopted under subsection (1) of this section do not apply to
fenestration products that are for use within residential structures if the fenestration products are:
(a) Used in the creation of sunrooms and solariums and constructed with a minimum of a  one-
half inch space between the panes; or
(b) Fenestration products used as skylights that constitute no more than  10 percent of the total
glazing used in any dwelling unit.
(3) The Residential and Manufactured Structures Board  or the Construction Industry Energy
Board shall  develop, for adoption by the director, default thermal performance values for residential
fenestration products that are produced in low volume.  Any testing requirements adopted under
subsection (1) of this section or  ORS 455.020, 455.030 or 455.496 do not apply to residential
fenestration products that are produced in low volume.
(4) Fenestration products manufactured for use as skylights that are subject to the provisions
of subsection (1) of this section and have frames that are wood, thermal break aluminum  or alumi-
num with vinyl shall be deemed  to meet any performance standards included in the state building
code when the following glazing configurations are used:
(a) A minimum one-half inch space between the panes and low-e (emissivity) glass; or
(b) Triple-layered acrylic.
(5) Regulations relating to the use and conservation  of energy adopted pursuant to ORS 455.020
(2) shall be  reviewed by the Building Codes Structures Board and the Residential and Manufactured
Structures Board or by the Construction Industry Energy Board.
SECTION 215.
 ORS 455.560 is amended to read:
455.560. As used in ORS 455.560 to 455.580, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Department” means the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(2) “Director” means the  Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes.
[130]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) “Person” means an  individual, partnership, joint venture, private or public corporation, as-
sociation, firm, public service company, political subdivision, municipal corporation, government
agency, people’s utility district, or any other entity, public or private, however organized.
(4) “Public buildings” means  any building, including outdoor area adjacent thereto, [ which] that
is open to the public during normal business  hours, except exempted buildings. Each of the following
is a public  building within the meaning of ORS 455.560 to 455.580, unless it or any portion thereof
is exempted by rule or order pursuant to ORS 455.570 (2), (3) and (4):
(a) Any building [ which] that  provides facilities or shelter for public assembly, or [ which] is used
for educational, office or institutional purposes;
(b) Any inn, hotel,  motel, sports arena, supermarket, transportation terminal, retail store, res-
taurant, or other commercial establishment [ which] that  provides services or retails merchandise;
(c) Any portion of an industrial plant building used primarily as office space; or
(d) Any  building owned by the state or political subdivision thereof, including libraries, muse-
ums, schools, hospitals, auditoriums, sports arenas and university buildings.
SECTION 216.
 ORS 455.570 is amended to read:
455.570. (1) After consultation with the Building  Codes Structures Board or with the Con-
struction Industry Energy Board, the Director of the  Department of [ Consumer and Business Ser-
vices] Building Codes, as provided in  this chapter, shall establish maximum lighting standards for
public buildings constructed on or after July 1, 1978.  Such standards may distinguish between type
of design, the uses to which buildings are put, location, age or any other applicable classification.
(2) Such standards shall allow for:
(a) Differences in lighting levels within public buildings for special  areas and uses, including but
not limited to hospital, drafting room, and advertising display, and for other  areas and activities
requiring special illumination.
(b) The interaction between lighting and heating systems.
(c) Occupational safety and health standards.
(3) The director may by rule or order exempt from the maximum lighting standards, new public
buildings or portions thereof that:
(a) Are of insufficient size to warrant maximum lighting standard regulations;
(b) Should be allowed a  specific period of time before compliance with maximum lighting stan-
dards is required;
(c) Are difficult or impractical to regulate based upon location;
(d) Are not open to the public during normal business hours;
(e) Are impractical to regulate, based upon unique design; or
(f) Would not be  benefited by regulation, based upon the insignificant amount of energy possible
to conserve.
(4) Any person subject to ORS 455.560 to 455.580 may apply to the  director for an exemption
under this section.
SECTION 217.
 ORS 455.575 is amended to read:
455.575. After consultation with the Building Codes Structures Board or with the  Construction
Industry Energy Board, the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Build-
ing Codes, as provided in ORS chapter 183, shall establish advisory maximum lighting standards for
public buildings constructed before July 1, 1978, based on the factors set forth in ORS 455.570.
SECTION 218. ORS 455.580 is amended to read:
455.580. The powers and duties given the Director of the Department  of [ Consumer and Business
[131]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Services] Building Codes by ORS 455.560 to 455.580 shall be  in addition to, and not in derogation
of, all other powers, duties and responsibilities vested in the director.
SECTION 219. ORS 455.610 is amended to read:
455.610. (1) The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall adopt, and amend as necessary,  a Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code that contains all re-
quirements, including structural design provisions, related  to the construction of residential
dwellings three stories or less above grade.  The code provisions for plumbing and electrical re-
quirements must be compatible with other specialty codes adopted by the director. The  Electrical
and Elevator Board, the Mechanical Board and the State Plumbing Board shall review,  respectively,
amendments to the electrical, mechanical or plumbing provisions of the code.
(2) Changes  or amendments to the code adopted under subsection (1) of this section may be made
when:
(a) Required by geographic or climatic conditions unique to Oregon;
(b) Necessary to be compatible with other statutory provisions;
(c) Changes to the national codes are adopted in Oregon; or
(d) Necessary to authorize the  use of building materials and techniques that are consistent with
nationally recognized standards and building practices.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 455.030, 455.035, 455.110 and  455.112, the director may, at any time
following appropriate consultation with the Mechanical  Board or Building Codes Structures Board,
amend the mechanical specialty code or  structural specialty code to ensure compatibility with the
Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code.
(4) The water conservation provisions for toilets, urinals, shower  heads and interior faucets
adopted in the Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code shall be the same as those adopted under ORS
447.020 to meet the requirements of ORS 447.145.
(5) The Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code  shall be adopted and amended as provided by ORS
455.030 and 455.110.
(6) The director, by rule, shall establish uniform standards for a municipality  to allow an alter-
nate method of construction to  the requirements for one and two family dwellings built to the
Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code in areas where the local jurisdiction determines that the  fire
apparatus means  of approach to a property or water supply serving a property does not meet ap-
plicable fire code or state building code requirements. The alternate  method of construction, which
may include but  is not limited to the installation of automatic fire sprinkler systems, must be ap-
proved in conjunction with the approval of an application under ORS 197.522.
(7) For lots of record existing before July 2, 2001, or property  that receives any approval for
partition, subdivision or construction under ORS 197.522 before July  2, 2001, a municipality allowing
an alternate method of construction to the  requirements for one and two family dwellings built to
the Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code  may apply the uniform standards established by the director
pursuant to  subsection (6) of this section. For property that receives all approvals for partition,
subdivision or construction under ORS 197.522 on or after July 2, 2001,  a municipality allowing an
alternate method of construction to the  requirements for one and two family dwellings built to the
Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code  must apply the uniform standards established by the director
pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
SECTION 220.
 ORS 455.622 is amended to read:
455.622. Notwithstanding ORS  447.020, 455.715 to 455.740, 479.810 (3) or 479.855, the Department
of [Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall adopt education, training and examination
[132]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
requirements that allow certification of inspectors  to perform inspections on one and two family
dwellings under one or more aspects  of the Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code adopted under ORS
455.610 to 455.630.
SECTION 221. ORS 455.625 is amended to read:
455.625. The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall, by rule, adopt:
(1) A list of information required for low-rise residential dwelling building permits; and
(2) A priority schedule for low-rise residential dwelling inspections  and plan review require-
ments.
SECTION 222.
 ORS 455.626 is amended to read:
455.626. The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall adopt, amend or repeal the state building code as necessary to establish viable standards  for
providing advanced telecommunications and cable service  technology to newly constructed low-rise
residential dwellings.
SECTION 223. ORS 455.627 is amended to read:
455.627. The Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes , in consultation
with the Residential and Manufactured Structures Board, shall adopt rules to create a  mandatory
random inspection program for minor electrical installations  made by electrical contractors in low-
rise residential dwellings.
SECTION 224. ORS 455.628 is amended to read:
455.628. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business  Services ] Building Codes or a munici-
pality administering and enforcing a building inspection program  under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 may
not require a plan review for one and two family dwellings  that are of conventional light frame
construction, as defined by the department by rule, if:
(a) The plans for the dwelling are designed and stamped  by a professional engineer registered
under ORS 672.002 to 672.325 or an architect registered under ORS 671.060; and
(b) The engineer or architect is certified by  the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes under ORS 455.720 as being  qualified to examine one and two
family dwelling plans.
(2) The department or municipality  is exempt from liability for any damages arising from the
nonperformance of a plan review pursuant to this section.
SECTION 225. ORS 455.630 is amended to read:
455.630. (1) The Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code shall be enforced by inspectors and building
officials qualified pursuant to ORS 455.715 to 455.740.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, enforcement  of electrical specialty code, per-
mit and licensing provisions shall be under the sole authority  of the Electrical and Elevator Board
in the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
SECTION 226. ORS 455.680 is amended to read:
455.680. (1) Plan approval and permits shall be obtained from the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes prior to construction, enlargement or alteration of any recreation
park, picnic park or organizational camp as defined in ORS 446.310.
(2) If the department determines that the  work conforms to the approved plans and specifica-
tions, it shall issue a final approval [ which] that  shall, if all other conditions  of ORS 455.010 to
455.240, 455.410 to 455.450 and 455.595 to 455.740 are met, authorize the issuance of a license by the
Oregon Health Authority to operate the park or, in the case of then currently licensed parks, shall
[133]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
authorize continued operation for the remaining part of the licensing year.
(3) In accordance with  ORS 455.010 to 455.240, 455.410 to 455.450 and 455.595 to 455.740 and in
consultation and agreement with the  authority, the department shall adopt rules to carry out this
section. The rules  adopted pursuant to this section shall be a specialty code as defined in ORS
455.010.
SECTION 227. ORS 455.685 is amended to read:
455.685. The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
may, upon an application setting  forth a set of plans and specifications that will be utilized in one
or more municipalities to acquire building  permits, review and approve the application for the con-
struction or erection of any building or structure if such set of  plans meets the requirements of the
state building code. All costs incurred by the director by virtue of the examination of such a  set of
plans and specifications shall be paid by the applicant. The  plans and specifications or any plans
and specifications required to  be submitted to a state agency shall be submitted to the director who
shall examine the instruments  and if necessary distribute them to the appropriate state agencies for
scrutiny regarding adequacy as to fire safety, life safety and all  other appropriate features. The
state agencies shall examine and promptly return the plans and specifications together  with their
certified statement as to the adequacy of the instruments regarding that agency’s area of concern.
The applicant  shall submit the plans and specifications to a local building official prior to applica-
tion for  a building permit. The local building official shall review the plan for those features re-
quired by local ordinance or by any  site-specific, geographic, geologic or climatic code requirements.
A local building official shall issue a building permit upon application and  presentation to the local
building official of such a set of plans and specifications bearing the approval of the director  if the
requirements of all other  local ordinances are satisfied. The director or local building official may
assess such fees as necessary to recover the reasonable costs incurred to  ensure the compliance of
the plans and specifications with the state building code.
SECTION 228.
 ORS 455.690 is amended to read:
455.690. Any  person aggrieved by the final decision of a municipal appeals board or a subordi-
nate officer of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes as to the ap-
plication of any provision of a specialty code may, within 30 days after the date  of the decision,
appeal to the appropriate advisory board. The appellant shall  submit a fee of $20, payable to the
department, with the request  for appeal. The final decision of the involved municipality or state of-
ficer shall be subject to  review and final determination by the appropriate advisory board as to
technical and scientific determinations related to the application of the specialty code involved.
SECTION 229. ORS 455.705 is amended to read:
455.705. (1) A manufacturer  of prefabricated structures or manufacturer of prefabricated struc-
ture components may not contract with a municipality or a person  to perform prefabricated struc-
ture plan approvals or inspections unless the person providing the  plan approvals or inspections is
certified or approved under subsection (2)  of this section or is providing plan approvals or in-
spections for a residential prefabricated structure that is intended for delivery in another state.
(2)(a) A person may  not engage in prefabricated structure plan approvals or inspections without
being certified under  ORS 455.715 to 455.740 or 479.810 unless the person is providing plan approvals
or inspections for a residential prefabricated structure that is intended for  delivery in another state.
(b) A person may not engage in the business of providing prefabricated structure plan approvals
or inspections without an approval issued by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes.
[134]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) In accordance with any applicable provisions of ORS  chapter 183, the Director of the De-
partment of [ Consumer and Business  Services ] Building Codes shall establish by rule a system for
approval and regulation of businesses and persons  who perform prefabricated structure plan ap-
provals or inspections. The system shall include but not be limited to the following provisions:
(a) Prescribing the form and content of and the times and procedures for submitting  an appli-
cation for the issuance or renewal of an approval.
(b) Prescribing the term of the approval and the fee  for the original issue and renewal in an
amount that does not exceed the cost of administering the approval system.  The charge for review
and approval of a third party inspection service shall not exceed, for the original  issue, $400 and for
the renewal, $200.
(c) Prescribing the conditions for initial issuance, renewal and  maintenance of the approval for
a person certified under ORS 455.715 to 455.740  or 479.810, including but not limited to the following
provisions:
(A) Procedures and reports for plan approvals and inspections;
(B) Ethical practices and prohibitions of conflicts of interests with  manufacturers of prefabri-
cated structures and manufacturers and suppliers of parts and services;
(C) Insurance compliance requirements;
(D) Procedures for use and application of insignia of compliance; and
(E) Fees for and procedures for use and application of certification stamps.
(d) Prescribing  other actions or circumstances that constitute failure to achieve or maintain
approval competency or that  otherwise constitute a danger to the public health or safety and for
which the director may refuse to  issue or renew or may suspend or revoke a certification, permit
or certificate.
(e) Prescribing the authority of  the department to perform oversight monitoring including but
not limited to:
(A) Right of entry and access to third party records and information;
(B) Frequency, type and extent of the oversight monitoring and inspection of third party agen-
cies and manufacturing facilities; and
(C) Frequency and description of information to be submitted as  part of the monitoring process.
(f) Prescribing fees for monitoring conducted by the department at the manufacturing  plant site
or at third party inspection service locations .[, which ] The  fees shall not exceed $60 per hour.
(4)(a) The  department shall establish by rule a manufacturer compliance program to allow for
plan approvals or inspections of prefabricated  structures or prefabricated structure components at
the facility at which  the prefabrication takes place, including but not limited to the following pro-
visions:
(A) Quality assurance programs;
(B) Procedures for use and application of insignia of compliance; and
(C) Fees for and procedures for use and application of certification stamps.
(b) A manufacturer of prefabricated structures shall  provide the department with written notice
at least  60 days before a manufacturer may provide for plan approval or inspection service as al-
lowed under subsection (2) of this section.
(c) The department is not required to provide plan approval for or inspection of any prefabri-
cated structure or prefabricated structure components unless  the department has been notified in
writing by the manufacturer of the  prefabricated structure 180 days in advance of the proposed as-
sumption of department inspections.
[135]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) A person may not rent, lease, sell, exchange, install or offer  for rent, lease, sale, exchange
or installation within this state a  prefabricated structure constructed on or after July 1, 1991, unless
it bears an insignia of compliance or certification stamp issued by the  department or a third party
indicating compliance with  this state’s building regulations and standards for prefabricated struc-
tures. The  prohibition in this subsection does not apply to a residential prefabricated structure in-
tended for delivery  in another state unless the residential prefabricated structure is installed or
offered for installation in  this state. A prefabricated structure with an insignia of compliance or
certification stamp shall be acceptable to municipalities as meeting the state  building code regu-
lations. Prefabricated structures constructed prior to July 1, 1991, are subject to  the building code
regulations in effect at the time of original construction.
(6) The provisions  of this section do not apply to employees of the department [ of Consumer and
Business Services and ] or to  testing laboratories approved under ORS chapters 447 and 479.
(7) For purposes of this section, “insignia of compliance” means the plate affixed to a  structure
by the department [ of Consumer and Business Services ] or a third party to  signify compliance with
all state building code requirements for which the structure was inspected.
(8) Prefabricated structures or components found  by the department or a third party to repre-
sent a  danger to public health or safety shall be brought into compliance with building code regu-
lations or removed from the state.
(9) All plan approvals and inspections of prefabricated structures and  prefabricated components
constructed at manufacturing plants outside of Oregon but intended for delivery  into Oregon shall
be performed by the department or conducted under ORS 455.430.
SECTION 230. ORS 455.715 is amended to read:
455.715. As used in ORS 455.715 to 455.740, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Building official” means  a person charged by a municipality with responsibility for admin-
istration and enforcement of the state building code in the municipality.
(2) “Business of providing prefabricated structure plan approvals and inspections” means  an in-
dependent contractor providing prefabricated structure plan approval or inspection services, or both,
under the following specialty codes, as provided in ORS 455.020, 455.705 and 455.715:
(a) Structural;
(b) Mechanical;
(c) Plumbing;
(d) Electrical; and
(e) Low-rise residential dwelling.
(3) “Inspector” means:
(a) A person, including a plans examiner, acting under the authority  and direction of a building
official and charged with the responsibility of routine enforcement of one or  more specialty codes
or parts of specialty codes;
(b) A person, including a plans examiner,  who provides enforcement of one or more specialty
codes or parts of specialty codes and who is personally in the business  of providing prefabricated
structure plan approvals or inspections or is employed by such a business;
(c) A specialized building inspector  certified under ORS 455.723 who is employed by a munici-
pality or by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes;
(d) A person employed by a municipality  or the department who is certified under ORS 455.732
to perform inspections under one  or more specialty codes throughout a building code administrative
region;  or
[136]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) A person designated by the Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes to ensure compliance with a specialty code or  with any requirement for
a license, registration, certification, endorsement or other authorization to perform  work related to
the administration and enforcement of the state building code.
SECTION 231. ORS 455.720 is amended to read:
455.720. (1) In accordance with applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183,  to promote effective
and uniform enforcement of the state  building code by improving the competence of building officials
and inspectors, the Director of the Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes, with the advice of the advisory boards, shall:
(a) Establish  for building officials and inspectors reasonable minimum training and experience
standards, including but not limited to  courses or subjects for instruction, facilities for instruction,
qualification of instructors and methods of instruction. The standards shall  include provisions for
determining a practical experience equivalent.
(b) Establish a  procedure to be used by municipalities to determine whether a person meets
minimum standards or has minimum training to be  appointed or employed as a building official or
inspector. The procedure shall allow for a  field examination of a person to determine if the person
meets the practical experience equivalent of a minimum standard.
(c) Subject to such terms, conditions and classifications as the director may impose,  certify
building officials as being qualified, and revoke such certifications in the  manner provided in ORS
455.740.
(d) Require an applicant for a  certificate as a building official or inspector to demonstrate
knowledge of the laws governing accessibility to buildings by  persons with disabilities by passing
an examination prescribed by the director.
(2) The director shall maintain and, upon request of municipalities, furnish information on ap-
plicants for appointment or employment as building officials or inspectors.
(3) Pursuant to ORS chapter 183, the director shall adopt  rules necessary to carry out the cer-
tification programs provided by subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The  director, by rule, may require evidence of completion of continuing education covering
any certification created under  this section as a condition of maintaining the certification. Nothing
in this subsection shall prohibit the director from delegating any of this power to a municipality.
(5) The director, with the  advice of the appropriate advisory boards, may adopt rules for certi-
fying inspectors as being qualified to enforce one or more particular  specialty codes, subject to any
terms, conditions and classifications the director may impose, and for revoking those certifications
in the manner provided in ORS 455.740.
SECTION 232.
 ORS 455.723 is amended to read:
455.723. (1) The Director of the Department of [Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes, with the advice of the appropriate advisory  boards, may adopt rules establishing one or more
programs to train, qualify and certify an  individual as a specialized building inspector authorized to
enforce portions of specialty codes. Notwithstanding ORS  455.720 (1) and 455.725, the rules may in-
clude, but need not be limited to, rules that establish:
(a) Work experience, training and other qualifications for program participation;
(b) Content and presentation requirements for training programs;
(c) Methods for verifying the qualification of the individual to enforce portions of specialty codes
as a specialized building inspector certified under this section;
(d) The portions of various specialty codes that each program will enable a  qualifying individual
[137]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to enforce and any terms, conditions or classifications applicable for that enforcement; and
(e) Requirements the director believes reasonable for the administration and enforcement of  this
section.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 446.250, 455.630, 455.720, 455.725, 479.530, 479.810 and 479.855,  the di-
rector may issue or cause to be issued a certificate as  a specialized building inspector to an indi-
vidual who successfully completes an approved training program and satisfies  qualification
verification under this section.
(3) An individual certified as a specialized building inspector under this section may conduct
inspections and enforce portions of specialty codes under ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and  479.950 and
this chapter  and ORS chapters 446, 447 and 693 as identified by the director. The enforcement of
portions of specialty codes by a specialized building inspector is  subject to any terms, conditions or
classifications applicable to that enforcement established by the director by rule.
SECTION 233. ORS 455.725 is amended to read:
455.725. (1) Upon application, the Director of the Department  of [ Consumer and Business Ser-
vices] Building Codes or an  authorized representative shall examine and evaluate any program or
facility established by a municipality or educational institution for the training of  building officials,
inspectors and specialty code inspectors and plan reviewers licensed under ORS 455.457.
(2) If the director finds that  a training program is qualified under the minimum requirements
established pursuant  to ORS 455.720, the director shall, in writing, certify the training program as
being qualified for such a period of time and upon such conditions as the director may  prescribe.
An individual complies  with any minimum requirement for building officials or inspectors established
pursuant to  ORS 455.720 when the individual satisfactorily completes a training program certified
under this section.
SECTION 234. ORS 455.732 is amended to read:
455.732. (1)  As used in this section, “building code administrative region” means a region es-
tablished by the Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
under ORS 455.042 for the uniform administration of the state building code.
(2) The authority of the director under ORS 455.720 and 455.723 to specify terms, conditions  and
classifications for the certification of inspectors includes the authority  to certify an inspector to
perform inspections under multiple specialty codes or parts of a specialty code.
(3) The  director may provide for an inspector who is likely to be employed within a specific
building code administrative region to be  certified to perform inspections throughout a building code
administrative region, whether within or outside of a municipality.  The director may recognize any
training program certified by the director under ORS 455.723 or  455.725 for purposes of certifying
an inspector to perform inspections throughout a building code administrative region. This  sub-
section does not require a municipality administering and  enforcing a building inspection program
under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 to allow an inspector certified under this  subsection who is not em-
ployed by the municipality to perform building inspections on behalf of the municipality.
(4) In determining the appropriate experience,  training or other qualifications for an inspector
under ORS 455.720 or 455.723, the director  shall consult with the appropriate advisory boards. The
factors to be considered by the director may include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Any factors specific to, or  of particular relevance to, a specialty code or to the types of
buildings, structures, systems or equipment in a geographic area that are inspected  under the spe-
cialty code;
(b) Staffing  levels or other specific criteria for building inspection programs established by a
[138]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
municipality where the inspector is  likely to be employed or for building inspection programs es-
tablished by the director; and
(c) Any  factors specific to, or of particular relevance to, the building code administrative region
within which the inspector is likely to be employed.
(5) In determining the scope of certifications and qualifications for an inspector, the director
may utilize field training equivalency, independent evaluations or other methods the  director deems
appropriate.
SECTION 235. ORS 455.735 is amended to read:
455.735. (1) The Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
may issue certificates for building officials and building inspectors under ORS 455.715 to 455.740.
(2) Any person desiring issuance of an initial certificate as a building official or  inspector shall
make application to the director upon  such forms as the director may prescribe for such purpose
and pay an application fee.
(3) If the director requires, by rule, an applicant for a  particular certification to pass an exam-
ination prepared by a national organization, the applicant shall pay in addition  to the fee required
in subsection (2) of  this section, the cost of the examination. If the director requires an applicant
for certification to pass an examination administered by the  Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes, the department may charge the applicant an examination administration
fee.
(4) Upon determining that the  applicant is qualified under ORS 455.715 to 455.740, the director
shall issue a certificate or cause a certificate to be issued to the applicant.
(5) A certificate issued  under this section shall be valid for a term established by the department
by rule. An applicant for  renewal of a certificate shall submit an application on a form approved
by the director and pay a renewal application fee.
(6) The department may adopt rules establishing certificate  renewal requirements and estab-
lishing reasonable fees under this section.
(7) The department may  charge fees for participation in training programs approved or estab-
lished by the department under ORS 455.220 or 455.715 to 455.740.
SECTION 236. ORS 455.737 is amended to read:
455.737. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 455.720 (1), the Director  of the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes , by rule, shall adopt criteria for review of the  experience and
training in building inspection and building plan  review acquired by a person outside the State of
Oregon. The criteria shall be adopted in a manner that facilitates review  of a person’s qualifications
by a local building official.
(2)(a) A local building official who wishes to employ a person who is not certified under  ORS
455.735 as an inspector shall submit the person’s qualifications to the director. The  director shall
review the stated qualifications against the criteria adopted under subsection  (1) of this section,
including verification of experience  and training. The director shall respond to the local building
official in writing within 10 working days of receiving the applicant’s qualifications, stating  whether
the person meets the applicable criteria.
(b) Upon application and payment of  the required fee, the director shall allow a person whose
qualifications meet the criteria adopted  under subsection (1) of this section to sit for any examina-
tion necessary for the required certification.
SECTION 237. ORS 455.740 is amended to read:
455.740. (1) Subject to ORS chapter 183, the Director of the  Department of [ Consumer and
[139]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Business Services ] Building Codes may deny, condition, suspend, revoke  or refuse to renew a cer-
tificate of a building official or  inspector if the director finds that the building official or inspector
has:
(a) Consistently failed to act in the public interest in the performance of duties;
(b) Failed to complete the continuing education requirements as required under ORS 455.720 (4);
(c) Provided false information to the department; or
(d) Committed an act described in ORS 455.125 or 455.129.
(2) In any revocation proceeding  under this section, the municipality that employs the building
official or inspector shall  be entitled to appear as a party in interest, either for or against the re-
vocation.
(3) When  a certification is suspended or revoked under this section, the director may also sus-
pend, deny or place conditions on that person’s right to reapply  for certification under ORS 455.735
for a period not to exceed 12 months.
(4) This section does not limit or otherwise affect the authority  of a municipality to dismiss or
suspend a building official or inspector at the discretion of the municipality.
(5) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1) to (4) of this  section, the director may
adopt rules that:
(a) Allow certifications to be placed on inactive status; and
(b) Extend continuing education compliance requirements in case of illness or hardship.
SECTION 238.
 ORS 455.770 is amended to read:
455.770. (1) In addition to any  other authority and power granted to the Director of the De-
partment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes under ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225
to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.995 and 480.510 to 480.670  and this chapter and
ORS chapters 447, 460 and 693, with respect to municipalities, building officials and  inspectors, if
the director has reason to believe that there is a failure to enforce  or a violation of any provision
of the state building code or  ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510
to 479.945, 479.995 or 480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or ORS chapter 447, 460 or  693 or any rule
adopted under those statutes, the director may:
(a) Examine building code activities of the municipality;
(b) Take sworn testimony; and
(c) With the authorization  of the Office of the Attorney General, subpoena persons and records
to obtain testimony on official actions  that were taken or omitted or to obtain documents otherwise
subject to public inspection under ORS 192.410 to 192.505.
(2) The investigative authority authorized in subsection (1) of  this section covers the violation
or omission by a municipality related to enforcement of codes or  administrative rules, certification
of inspectors or financial transactions dealing with  permit fees and surcharges under any of the
following circumstances when:
(a) The duties are clearly established by law, rule or agreement;
(b) The duty involves procedures for which the means and methods are clearly established by
law, rule or agreement; or
(c) The duty is described by clear performance standards.
(3) Prior to starting an investigation under subsection (1) of this section, the director shall notify
the municipality in writing setting  forth the allegation and the rules or statutes pertaining to the
allegation and give the municipality 30 days to respond to the  allegation. If the municipality does
not satisfy the director’s concerns, the director may then commence an investigation.
[140]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) If the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  or  the director di-
rects corrective action, the following shall be done:
(a) The corrective action  shall be in writing and served on the building official and the chief
executive officers of all municipalities affected;
(b) The corrective action shall identify  the facts and law relied upon for the required action; and
(c) A reasonable time shall be provided to the municipality for compliance.
(5) The director  may revoke any authority of the municipality to administer any part of the state
building code or ORS  446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945,
479.995 or  480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or ORS chapter 447, 460 or 693 or any rule adopted
under those statutes if the director determines after a hearing conducted  under ORS 183.413 to
183.497 that:
(a) All of the requirements of this section and ORS 455.775 and 455.895 were met; and
(b) The municipality did not comply with the corrective action required.
SECTION 239.
 ORS 455.775 is amended to read:
455.775. In  addition to any other authority and power granted under this chapter and ORS
chapters 446, 447, 460, 479, 480 and 693:
(1) The Director of the  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may,
at the discretion of the director, enforce the provisions  of the state building code and ORS 446.003
to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420,  479.510 to 479.945, 479.950, 479.995 and 480.510 to
480.670 and this  chapter and ORS chapters 447, 460 and 693 against any person regardless of
whether a permit,  certificate, license or other indicia of authority has been issued. The director may:
(a) Make an investigation;
(b) Take sworn testimony;
(c) With the authorization of the Office of the Attorney  General, subpoena persons and records;
(d) Order corrective action; and
(e) If an immediate hazard to health  and safety is imminent, issue an order to stop all or any
part of the work under the applicable specialty code.
(2) If the director has reason to believe that any person has been engaged,  or is engaging, or
is about to engage in any violation of the state building code, or ORS  446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to
446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 or  480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or ORS
chapter 447, 460 or 693 or any rule adopted under those statutes, the director may issue  an order,
subject to ORS  183.413 to 183.497, directed to the person to cease and desist from the violation or
threatened violation.
(3) If the director has reason to believe that any person has been engaged,  or is engaging, or
is about to engage in any violation of the state building code or ORS 446.003 to  446.200, 446.225 to
446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 or  480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or ORS
chapters 447, 460 and 693 or any  rule adopted under those statutes, the director may, without bond,
bring suit in the name and on behalf of  the State of Oregon in the circuit court of any county of this
state to enjoin the acts or practices  and to enforce compliance with the state building code and ORS
446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 and 480.510  to
480.670 and this chapter and ORS chapters 447, 460 and  693 and any rule adopted under those
statutes. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order or writ  of
mandamus shall be granted.
(4) This section does not grant any authority over a municipality or an inspector  employed by
a municipality.
[141]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 240. ORS 455.800 is amended to read:
455.800. As used in ORS 455.800 to 455.820:
(1) “Building official” means a person who is a building official  as defined in ORS 455.715 or a
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes employee charged with  enforce-
ment or administration of the state building code.
(2) “Building trade committee” means a group composed of experienced  and knowledgeable local
general contractors or other persons having substantial expertise  in various aspects of one and two
family dwelling construction under the Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code.
(3) “General contractor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 701.005.
(4) “Master builder” means a person certified under ORS 455.810.
(5) “Qualified construction company” means a company that has been:
(a) Continuously licensed by  the Construction Contractors Board during the preceding 60
months as a general contractor; or
(b) Continuously licensed by the Construction Contractors Board during at least the preceding
24 months as  a general contractor and by one or more other states during the balance of the pre-
ceding 60 months in an occupation equivalent to that of a general contractor.
(6) “Regular employee” means a person who:
(a) Is continuously employed by, and on  the regular payroll of, a qualified construction company;
(b) Has filed a withholding exemption certificate pursuant to ORS 316.182 for work  performed
for the qualified construction company; and
(c) Is available during working hours to supervise on-site dwelling construction, including  but
not limited to supervising the installation of:
(A) Drywall;
(B) Electrical systems;
(C) Footings;
(D) Foundations;
(E) Framing;
(F) Insulation;
(G) Mechanical systems;
(H) Plumbing systems; and
(I) Stairs.
(7) “Whole dwelling  remodel” means a project that includes the installation in an existing
dwelling of all of the following:
(a) Drywall;
(b) Electrical systems;
(c) Footings;
(d) Foundations;
(e) Framing;
(f) Insulation;
(g) Mechanical systems; and
(h) Plumbing systems.
SECTION 241.
 ORS 455.805 is amended to read:
455.805. An individual may apply to the Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes to be tested and certified as a master builder. The department shall establish uni-
form criteria for use in determining whether to grant an application. The criteria  must, at a mini-
[142]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mum, provide that:
(1) The individual must be an owner or regular employee of a qualified construction company
and be authorized by the company to provide assurance to the department that all state  and local
code requirements are met.
(2) In each of the five preceding calendar years, the  individual must either have performed or
supervised a dwelling construction or whole dwelling remodel. In at least two  of the years, the
construction or remodel must have occurred in a geographic area that  had a master builder pro-
gram.
(3) The individual must  have completed a program sponsored by a local building trade committee
or other program approved by the department, providing training relating to the  construction of one
and two family dwellings under the Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code.  A program must include
but need not be limited to instruction in:
(a) Administration;
(b) Chimneys and fireplaces;
(c) Decay and termite protections;
(d) Energy conservation;
(e) Footings and foundations;
(f) Roof-ceiling construction;
(g) Roof coverings;
(h) Site inspections;
(i) Wall construction, assemblies and coverings; and
(j) Wood and metal framing.
(4) The individual must have scored at least 75  percent on a written examination, approved and
administered by the department, covering the appropriate aspects of the Low-Rise  Residential
Dwelling Code.
(5)(a) The  individual must not be the subject of an adverse final order issued by the Construction
Contractors Board or  the  department [ of Consumer and Business Services ] based upon acts commit-
ted within 36 months preceding the application date that:
(A) Violated a specialty code, licensing or permit requirement; or
(B) Resulted in a claim being filed with the board or department against the individual.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, if the individual is an owner of a qualified construction
company, an adverse  final order issued against the company is an adverse final order issued against
that individual.
SECTION 242.
 ORS 455.810 is amended to read:
455.810. (1) An individual seeking  certification as a master builder must apply to the Department
of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  on the form prescribed by the department.
Upon determining that the applicant meets the  criteria for certification set forth in ORS 455.805, the
department shall issue the certificate.
(2) Certification as a master builder is valid for three years unless  suspended or revoked. An
individual may renew a certificate that is in good standing by:
(a) Providing evidence of continuing education as required by department rule; and
(b) Paying a renewal fee established by the department by rule.
(3) The department may deny, refuse to renew, suspend or revoke certification as  a master
builder if the individual fails or ceases to meet the criteria for certification set forth in  ORS 455.805
or engages in actions resulting in a waiver revocation under ORS 455.820 (3). The  department must
[143]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
afford an individual an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to ORS chapter 183 upon a denial or re-
fusal to renew or prior to a suspension or revocation of certification.
(4) The department may adopt  all rules necessary and proper for administering ORS 455.800 to
455.820, including but not limited to rules  establishing application, examination, certification and
renewal fees.
SECTION 243.
 ORS 455.815 is amended to read:
455.815. (1) Local government establishment of a master builder program  is voluntary. A local
government  electing  to establish or terminate a program shall notify the Department of [ Consumer
and Business Services ] Building Codes . If terminating a program, the local government must  give
the notice six months before the program terminates.
(2) The department [ of Consumer and Business  Services ] may implement a master builder pro-
gram in one or more geographic areas for which the department provides  plan review or inspection
services. A department decision  to include an area as a participant in the program affects only those
areas, and those reviews or inspections,  for which the department provides services instead of a
local  government.  The department shall notify a county prior to implementing a master builder
program in areas of the county that are served by the department.
(3) A local government may not allow an individual to perform the duties of a  master builder
unless the local government has a master  builder program. The department may allow an individual
to perform the duties of a master builder in any geographic area administered by the department.
(4) A building official of a government having a master builder program may  waive plan review
elements by that government and  may waive government performance of one or more of the required
inspections identified by department rule, including  but not limited to inspections described in sub-
section (6) of this section, if:
(a) An individual  certified as a master builder submits construction plans for a one or two family
dwelling regulated by the Low-Rise Residential Dwelling Code; and
(b) The building official determines that:
(A) The work is not of a highly technical nature; and
(B) There is no unreasonable potential risk to safety of the structure.
(5) A building official may  not waive government performance of plan review or required in-
spections for:
(a) Special design applications that are complex and highly technical engineered systems; or
(b) Unique building sites, including but not limited to sites containing geologic hazards  such as
landslide hazard areas, floodplains and wetlands.
(6) Subject to subsections (3) to (5) of this section, a building official may allow  a master builder
to verify that the master builder has properly performed an installation on a project and, to the
extent that inspection would duplicate the verification conducted by the master  builder, may waive
government performance of the following required inspections:
(a) Drywall;
(b) Footings and setbacks;
(c) Foundation walls, Ufer grounding rods and rebar;
(d) Insulation;
(e) Masonry fireplace pre-cover;
(f) Masonry rebar;
(g) Gutters, downspouts and foundation drains;
(h) Roof sheathing nailing;
[144]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Suspended ceilings;
(j) Underfloor structural; and
(k) Wall sheathing nailing.
SECTION 244.
 ORS 455.820 is amended to read:
455.820. (1) A master builder must perform  all plan review and required verifications for which
government review or inspection has been waived by  a building official. The master builder shall
maintain copies of all  documents and reports required by the government granting the waiver and
provide those copies to the building official.
(2) When waiving government performance of plan review or  required inspections, a building
official shall require the master builder to sign  a form that specifically identifies each waiver and
states that  the master builder accepts the duty of performing the review and verifications. A master
builder who accepts the duty of performing a review or verification remains  responsible for that
duty unless released by written  and signed permission of the building official. A building official may
release a master builder from  a review or verification duty by a written and signed assumption of
the review or inspection duty by the building official  or written and signed assumption of the review
and verification duty by another master builder.
(3) A building official for a government that has a master builder program:
(a) Must conduct inspections  of at least 10 percent of projects that are built under a master
builder program;
(b) May revoke a waiver for a plan review or required inspection  if the master builder fails to
properly perform, or document performance of, review or verification duties; and
(c) Must notify the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes when the
official revokes a waiver pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(4) When  revoking a waiver, a building official shall provide the master builder with a release
under subsection (2) of this section from future performance of review or verification  duties. A re-
lease does not relieve a  master builder from liability for the failure to perform, or document per-
formance of, review or verification duties prior to the revocation of the waiver.
(5) A government having a master builder program has no legal duty with regard to  plan review
or required inspections properly waived under ORS 455.815 and accepted  by a master builder in a
signed form described under subsection (2) of this  section. This subsection does not release a gov-
ernment from a duty arising due to a waiver revocation under subsection  (3) of this section or an
assumption under subsection (2) of this section.
(6) A local government may refuse to grant  recognition to a certified master builder if a waiver
granted to the master builder under that government’s master builder program has been revoked
pursuant to subsection (3)(b)  of this section. If a waiver is revoked pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of
this section, a local government or building official may send a  recommendation to the department
for action against the master builder who was granted the waiver. The local government  or building
official may also send the department any information supporting the recommendation.
SECTION 245.
 ORS 455.895 is amended to read:
455.895. (1)(a) The State Plumbing Board may impose  a civil penalty against a person as pro-
vided under ORS 447.992 and 693.992. Amounts recovered  under this paragraph are subject to ORS
693.165.
(b) The Electrical and Elevator Board may impose a  civil penalty against a person as provided
under ORS 479.995. Amounts recovered under this paragraph are subject to ORS 479.850.
(c) The Board of Boiler  Rules may impose a civil penalty against a person as provided under
[145]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 480.670. Amounts recovered under this paragraph are subject to ORS 480.670.
(2) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, or an appropriate  ad-
visory board, if any, may at its discretion impose a  civil penalty against any person who violates the
state building code or ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225  to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 446.566 to
446.646, [446.666 to 446.746,] 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 or 480.510 to 480.670, or this chapter or  ORS
chapter 447, 460 or 693, or any rule  adopted or order issued for the administration and enforcement
of those statutes. Except as provided in subsections (3), (4) and (9) of this section [ or ORS 446.995 ],
a civil penalty imposed under this section must be in an  amount determined by the appropriate ad-
visory board or the department of not more than $5,000 for each offense or, in the  case of a con-
tinuing offense, not more than $1,000 for each day of the offense.
(3) Each violation  of ORS 446.003 to 446.200 or 446.225 to 446.285, or any rule or order issued
under ORS 446.003 to 446.200 or 446.225 to 446.285, constitutes a separate violation with respect to
each manufactured structure or with respect to each failure or refusal to  allow or perform an act
required thereby, except that the maximum civil penalty may  not exceed $1 million for any related
series of violations occurring within one year from the date of the first violation.
(4) The department may impose a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 against  a public body
responsible for administering and  enforcing a building inspection program. As used in this sub-
section, “public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(5) The maximum penalty  established by this section for a violation may be imposed only upon
a finding that the person has engaged in a pattern  of violations. The department, by rule, shall de-
fine what constitutes a pattern of violations. Except as provided in subsections (1) and (10) of  this
section, moneys received from any civil penalty under this section are appropriated  continuously for
and shall be used by the department for enforcement and administration of provisions and rules de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
(6) Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
(7) A civil penalty imposed under this section may be remitted or reduced upon such  terms and
conditions as the department  or the appropriate advisory board considers proper and consistent with
the public health and safety. In any judicial review of a civil  penalty imposed under this section, the
court may, in its discretion, reduce the penalty.
(8) Any officer, director, shareholder or agent  of a corporation, or member or agent of a part-
nership or association, who personally participates in or is an accessory to any  violation by the
partnership, association or corporation of  a provision or rule described in subsection (2) of this
section is subject to the penalties prescribed in this section.
(9) In addition to the civil penalty set forth in subsection (1) or (2) of this  section, any person
who violates a provision or rule described in subsection (2) of this section may be required by  the
department or the appropriate advisory board to  forfeit and pay to the General Fund of the State
Treasury a civil penalty  in an amount determined by the department or advisory board that does
not exceed  five times the amount by which such person profited in any transaction that violates a
provision or rule described in subsection (2) of this section.
(10) If  a civil penalty is imposed for a violation of a provision of ORS 446.566 to 446.646 and the
violation relates to a filing or failure to file with  a county assessor functioning as agent of the de-
partment, the department, after deducting an amount equal to the department’s procedural,  col-
lection and other related costs and expenses, shall forward one-half  of the remaining civil penalty
amount to the county in which the manufactured structure is located at the time of the violation.
SECTION 246.
 ORS 460.005 is amended to read:
[146]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
460.005. As used in ORS 460.005 to 460.175, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Alteration” means a change or addition to equipment, other than the  ordinary repair or
replacement of an existing part of the equipment.
(2) “Certified elevator inspector” means an employee or representative of a casualty  insurance
company or companies who has passed the required examination and  has been issued a certificate
of competency as an elevator inspector by the Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes.
(3) “Elevator” means a hoisting and lowering mechanism equipped with a car  or platform that
moves in guides, and that serves two  or more landings, and includes but is not limited to
dumbwaiters, escalators, manlifts, platform hoists, vertical  parking units for motor vehicles and
moving walks.
(4) “Elevator contractor license” means an authorization issued  by the department under ORS
460.005 to 460.175 for  the licensee to engage in the business of installing, altering, repairing and
maintaining elevators.
(5) “Installation permit” means a permit issued by the department for the  installation, alteration
or repair of an elevator.
(6) “Minimum  safety standards” means safety standards provided by ORS 460.005 to 460.175 or
by rules adopted under ORS 460.005 to 460.175.
(7) “Moving walk” means a power-driven,  horizontal or inclined, or combination, passenger-
carrying device, in which the passenger-carrying surface remains parallel  to its direction of motion,
and is uninterrupted.
(8) “Operating permit” means a permit issued by the department for the operation of an elevator.
(9) “Platform hoist” means  a hoisting and lowering mechanism equipped with an open platform
that moves in  a substantially vertical direction and that travels a limited distance above or below
a building floor or dock level.
(10) “Provisional  operating permit” means a permit issued by the department on the basis of a
variance from the minimum safety standards under ORS 460.005 to 460.175.
(11) “Temporary operation authorization” means an authorization issued by the department to
operate an elevator for a specified period pending the issuance of an operating permit.
SECTION 247.
 ORS 460.024 is amended to read:
460.024. The purpose of ORS 460.005 to 460.175 is to protect  the health and safety of the people
of Oregon from the danger of unsafe elevators. To accomplish this purpose the Legislative  Assembly
intends by ORS 460.005 to 460.175:
(1) To provide minimum  safety standards for the installation, alteration, repair and maintenance
of elevators to be operated in this state.
(2) To ensure compliance with minimum  safety standards in installation, alteration, repair and
maintenance of elevators to be operated within the state.
(3) To provide for the administration and enforcement of ORS 460.005 to 460.175 by the  De-
partment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(4) To provide  for defraying the cost of administering and enforcing ORS 460.005 to 460.175 by
fees collected in connection with licensing, approval or  rejection of plans, inspections, processing
reports and issuing of elevator installation permits and operating permits.
SECTION 248. ORS 460.035 is amended to read:
460.035. (1) Fees are not required under ORS 460.005 to 460.175 to install, alter, repair,  operate
or maintain an elevator:
[147]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Under the supervision of the United States Government.
(b) That is a nonpower-driven lifting device.
(c) Located in a private residence, except for initial installation.
(2) The owner or user of an elevator described in subsection (1) of this section may request that
the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes inspect the elevator. If the
department performs the inspection, the department, notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section,
may collect the appropriate fee for performing the inspection.
(3) Pipes installed in an elevator hoistway prior to  July 1, 1961, that do not convey gases or
liquids that would endanger life if discharged into the hoistway need not be removed.
(4) ORS 460.005 to 460.175 do not apply to:
(a) Belt, bucket, scoop, roller or similar type material conveyors.
(b) Hoists for raising or lowering  materials and that are provided with unguided hooks, slings
and similar means for attachment to the materials.
(c) Material hoists used only to raise and lower  building material in buildings under con-
struction.
(d) Stackers that serve one floor only.
(e) Window-washing scaffolds.
(f) Nonpower-driven lifting devices.
(g) Amusement rides.
(h) Mine elevators.
(i) Elevators under the supervision of the United States Government.
(j) Elevators located in private residences, except for initial installation permits and installation
inspections.
(k) Other elevators and equipment as provided by the department by rule.
SECTION 249.
 ORS 460.045 is amended to read:
460.045. A person may not:
(1) Engage  in the business of installation, alteration, repair or maintenance of an elevator
without an elevator contractor license issued under ORS 460.005 to 460.175 or 479.510 to 479.945.
(2) Install, alter, repair or maintain an elevator  unless the person possesses a valid license is-
sued under ORS 460.059 or 479.630 (6).
(3) Install, alter, or commence  to install or alter, an elevator covered by ORS 460.005 to 460.175
unless the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes has issued  an installa-
tion permit.
(4) Permit or suffer an elevator to be operated, without a valid temporary operation authori-
zation or current operating permit, on property that the  person owns, controls, manages or super-
vises.
(5) Act or offer to act as a certified elevator  inspector unless the person has a current certif-
icate of competency as an elevator inspector issued by the department.
(6) Place in service a new or altered elevator without a current  operating permit issued after
a satisfactory acceptance inspection made by the department and satisfactory  acceptance tests per-
formed in the presence of a member of the department’s staff of elevator inspectors.
(7) Place in service an elevator that has caused an  injury to a person or persons unless per-
mission has been obtained from the department.
SECTION 250.
 ORS 460.055 is amended to read:
460.055. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall give its
[148]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
decision within a reasonable time, not exceeding 30 days:
(a) Approving or rejecting  plans and pertinent data for proposed elevator installations or alter-
ations submitted for the department’s examination.
(b) Issuing or denying an installation permit.
(c) Issuing or denying a certificate of competency to applicants after examinations for the cer-
tificate have been taken.
(d) Issuing or denying  operating permits for elevators inspected by a member of the department’s
staff of elevator inspectors or by a certified elevator inspector.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section operating permits may not be issued  or
renewed for elevators failing to meet minimum safety standards.
(3) A provisional operating permit may be issued for elevators whose safety standards  vary from
the minimum safety standards, if in the opinion of the  department no immediate hazard to health
or safety exists. The department shall issue a  provisional operating permit for a specific period of
time determined by the department at the time the permit is  granted. During the life of the provi-
sional operating permit, the elevator must be brought into compliance with the  safety standards
found at variance at the time of the issuance of the provisional permit.
(4) The department may adopt rules regarding installation permits and operating permits. The
rules may include, but need not be limited  to, rules for the use of standardized forms and terms and
conditions for permit validity.
(5) The department shall issue a certificate of competency as  an elevator inspector only to an
individual who has passed an examination administered by the department for that purpose and  who
is employed by  the department or is a representative of a casualty insurance company or companies
as an elevator inspector. The examination shall:
(a) Include questions, the answers to which are confined  to matters that will aid in determining
the fitness and competency of the applicant for the intended service.
(b) Include a practical demonstration of manipulative skill directly related to the intended ser-
vice, or the requirement of previous related experience in lieu of a practical demonstration.
(c) Be  maintained on file with the records of practical demonstrations for no less than three
years and shall be produced by the department upon the  request of any court, or the Electrical and
Elevator Board, or a person with a legitimate interest.
(6) If for a period of more than two years after the person is issued a  certificate of competency
as an elevator inspector,  a holder of the certificate is not employed as an elevator inspector, the
person is not  entitled to renewal of the certificate. The person may qualify for issuance of a new
certificate in the manner provided for in subsection (5) of this section.
SECTION 251.
 ORS 460.057 is amended to read:
460.057. The Department of [ Consumer and Business  Services ] Building Codes may issue a spe-
cial limited license to a  person who can document to the satisfaction of the department that the
person possesses sufficient work experience in the mechanical aspects  of elevator installation, al-
teration, maintenance and repair acquired prior to October 23, 1999. In addition  to any other con-
ditions or limitations imposed by department rule on  the scope of work that may be performed under
the license, the license shall limit the person to performing mechanical installation, alteration,
maintenance and repair on elevators.
SECTION 252.
 ORS 460.059 is amended to read:
460.059. The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may issue a spe-
cial limited license to a  person engaged in an approved apprenticeship program that allows the
[149]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
person to engage in the installation, alteration, maintenance and repair of elevators. The  depart-
ment, after consultation  with the Electrical and Elevator Board, shall establish conditions and the
specific scope of work that may be performed by a person licensed under this section.
SECTION 253. ORS 460.061 is amended to read:
460.061. (1) As used in  this section, “reciprocating conveyor” means a self-contained, power-
driven stationary  device that moves objects on a platform equipped with safety guards, or that
moves individuals on a motorized chair, along  a predetermined horizontal, inclined or vertical path
between loading and discharge points.
(2) The Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may adopt rules es-
tablishing a reciprocating conveyor mechanic license and a restricted  reciprocating conveyor me-
chanic license that allow the holder to install, alter, repair and maintain the mechanical portions
of reciprocating conveyors.
(3) If the department adopts  rules under this section, the rules shall include, but need not be
limited to, rules that establish:
(a) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the type of work experience  and training required
to qualify for a reciprocating conveyor  mechanic license or restricted reciprocating conveyor me-
chanic license;
(b) Supervision and  oversight requirements for reciprocating conveyor mechanics or restricted
reciprocating conveyor mechanics; and
(c) Procedures for administering and enforcing this section and the rules  adopted under this
section.
(4) An applicant for a  reciprocating conveyor mechanic license must demonstrate 3,000 hours
of work experience in the  installation, alteration, repair and maintenance of reciprocating conveyors
or of other forms of elevators identified by the department by rule.
(5) ORS 460.045 (2) does not apply to a reciprocating conveyor mechanic or  restricted
reciprocating  conveyor  mechanic engaged in installing, altering, repairing or maintaining the me-
chanical portions of a reciprocating conveyor.
(6) Department rules adopted under this section may  not prohibit a person who holds a license
issued under ORS 460.057, 460.059 or 479.630  (6) from installing, altering, repairing or maintaining
reciprocating conveyors or prohibit a  limited journeyman electrician licensed under ORS 479.630 (5)
from repairing or maintaining a reciprocating conveyor located in an industrial plant.
(7) Notwithstanding ORS  460.045 (2), a person is exempt from any licensing requirement estab-
lished by rules adopted under this section or established under ORS 460.057, 460.059 or 479.630 (6)
when engaging in the installation, alteration, repair or maintenance of the  mechanical portions of
a reciprocating conveyor that is located in a residence and designed  for moving an individual on a
motorized  chair.
(8)(a) The fee for the issuance  or renewal of a reciprocating conveyor mechanic license is $100
per year.
(b) The fee for the issuance or renewal of a restricted reciprocating conveyor mechanic  license
is $50 for a three-year period.
SECTION 254.
 ORS 460.065 is amended to read:
460.065. (1) A certified elevator  inspector certificate of competency expires on December 31 of
the year in which the certificate is issued or on  a date established by rule of the Department of
[Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(2) An elevator installation permit or  operating permit expires on a date established by depart-
[150]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment rule.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 460.055, a holder of a valid elevator inspector certificate  of
competency or elevator operating permit who  has complied with ORS 460.005 to 460.175 and the
rules adopted under ORS  460.085 (1) is entitled to renewal at the expiration of the certificate or
permit.
SECTION 255. ORS 460.075 is amended to read:
460.075. (1) Subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183, the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes may cancel, revoke or suspend the installation  permit, temporary
operation authorization or  operating permit for any elevator that does not comply with minimum
safety standards.
(2) Subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183, the department may suspend or revoke  the
certificate of competency of any certified elevator inspector:
(a) Whom the department  finds to be performing the work in a manner inconsistent with the
intent and purposes of ORS 460.005 to 460.175.
(b) Who fails to file in advance  with the department the name of any company for which the
inspector performs an inspection.
(c) Who willfully violates ORS 460.005 to 460.175 or rules adopted under ORS 460.085 (1).
(d) Who deliberately falsified  the application of the inspector for the certificate or the inspection
report made to the department.
(e) Who persistently fails to properly report  to the department in writing regarding elevators
inspected by the inspector.
SECTION 256.
 ORS 460.085 is amended to read:
460.085. (1) In accordance with the applicable provisions of ORS  chapter 183, the Director of the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, after consultation with the  Elec-
trical and Elevator Board, shall adopt reasonable rules:
(a) Establishing safety standards applicable to the installation of elevators.
(b) Establishing safety standards  applicable to the alteration, repair or maintenance of elevators.
The director may provide differing standards for elevators installed prior to  July 1, 1961, and ele-
vators installed on or  after July 1, 1961.
(c) Governing the  issuance, renewal, suspension and revocation of permits and certificates of
competency issued under ORS 460.005 to 460.175.
(d) Prescribing the time, place and circumstances under which  permits, licenses and certificates
of competency shall be exhibited for inspection.
(e) Governing the internal organization and procedure of the Department  of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes for administering and enforcing ORS 460.005 to 460.175.
(f) Prescribing, requiring and  governing reports by the department’s staff of elevator inspectors
and certified elevator inspectors on elevators inspected by them.
(g) Establishing standards, criteria and  intervals for the periodic inspection under ORS 460.125
of the various types of elevators.
(h) Establishing standards for the inspection of,  and safety testing on, a new or altered elevator
prior to placement of the elevator into service.
(i) Establishing reasonable  fees, in addition to the fees established by ORS 460.165, that the de-
partment considers appropriate for the purpose  of administering and enforcing ORS 460.005 to
460.175.
(2) In adopting rules under subsection (1) of this section, the director shall consider:
[151]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Technological advances in the elevator industry.
(b) The practicability of following the standards under consideration, if adopted.
(c) The  probability, extent and gravity of the injury to the public or property that would result
from failure to follow the standards under consideration.
(d) Safety standards  followed, proposed or approved by responsible members of the elevator in-
dustry.
(3) The sole purpose of subsection (1)(b) of this section  is to provide reasonable safety for life
and limb. In case of practical difficulty or  unnecessary hardship, the director shall grant exceptions
from the literal requirements or permit the use of other devices or  methods than specified pursuant
to subsection (1)(b) of this section when it is evident that reasonable safety is thereby secured.
(4) Any owner, user or other person aggrieved by  the application by the department of the
minimum safety standards established by the director pursuant to  subsection (1)(b) of this section
may appeal in the same manner and for the same reasons as provided under ORS 460.155.
SECTION 257.
 ORS 460.125 is amended to read:
460.125. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall:
(a) Except as provided in this subsection, periodically inspect each elevator to ascertain if the
elevator is being operated and maintained in accordance with ORS 460.005  to 460.175. The depart-
ment is not required to inspect an elevator if the  department is notified in writing, by the employer
of a certified elevator inspector, that inspection  will be made by the certified inspector and a copy
of the inspection report is filed with the department  within 30 days of the date the elevator is due
for inspection.
(b) Periodically check  the authenticity, appropriateness and expiration date of elevator operat-
ing permits.
(c) Review with the Electrical and Elevator  Board any appeals from the decisions of the in-
spectors.
(d) To the extent necessary to ensure safety, perform  inspections and witness safety tests of new
or altered elevators before the elevators are placed in service.
(2) Inspection reports provided to owners, users  or other affected parties shall contain a notifi-
cation of the right of appeal as provided in ORS 460.155.
(3) If the department finds that an elevator is  not being operated in compliance with ORS
460.005 to 460.175, and the rules adopted under ORS 460.005 to 460.175, the department may cause
the elevator to be disconnected from the  source of power for the elevator. The department shall give
reasonable notice to the owner or operator prior to causing  the elevator to be disconnected unless
continued operation of the elevator would constitute an immediate hazard to the  health and safety
of persons.
SECTION 258.
 ORS 460.135 is amended to read:
460.135. For the purpose of discharging any duty imposed by or exercising any  authority con-
ferred by ORS 460.005 to 460.175, the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes may, during reasonable hours, enter any building,  enclosure or upon any premises where an
elevator is in operation or about to be put into operation. No person  shall obstruct or interfere with
the department in the performance of its duties or the exercise of any  authority conferred by ORS
460.005 to 460.175.
SECTION 259. ORS 460.145 is amended to read:
460.145. When it appears to the Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes that a person subject to ORS 460.005 to 460.175 is engaged or about to  engage in an act or
[152]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
practice [ which] that  constitutes a violation of ORS 460.005 to  460.175 or rules issued thereunder,
the department may, without bond, obtain an order from an appropriate  circuit court restraining or
enjoining such act or practice.
SECTION 260. ORS 460.155 is amended to read:
460.155. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and  Business Services ] Building Codes shall hear the
appeal of an appellant:
(a) Who has filed a written request:
(A) Within 10 days of receiving written notice that an injunction will be sought; or
(B) Within 30  days after receiving notice that a permit or certificate of competency will be
canceled, revoked or suspended; or
(b) Who is affected by a notice described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) If there is a timely appeal, the injunction will not be sought or the permit or certificate of
competency will not be canceled, suspended or revoked pending the appeal unless the  reason for the
injunction, cancellation, suspension or revocation constitutes an immediate menace to health or
safety.
(3) The department shall likewise hear the appeal of an appellant who has filed a written request
and who has reason to desire a change in the minimum  safety standards or the rules under ORS
460.005 to 460.175, or has been denied a permit under ORS 460.055 or a certificate of competency.
(4) The department shall set the time and place for hearing and give the  appellant 10 days’
written notice.
(5) All appeals shall be heard within three months of receipt of  the request, except that if im-
mediate menace to health or safety is involved the appeal shall be heard within 20  days of receipt
of the request.
(6)(a) Two or  more appeals may be consolidated for hearing, if based upon substantially the same
facts.
(b) The department and the appellant may subpoena witnesses who shall receive the  same com-
pensation and mileage pay as circuit court witnesses.
(c) The appeal shall be heard by the department before the Electrical and Elevator Board.
(d) A written record shall be kept.
(e) The department shall determine the appeal after  consultation with and giving consideration
to the views of the board.
(7) Judicial review of any final order or decision of the department shall be taken pursuant to
the provisions of ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 261.
 ORS 460.165 is amended to read:
460.165. (1) Subject to ORS 460.035 (1) and 460.085 (1), the Department of [ Consumer and Busi-
ness Services ] Building Codes may collect the following fees:
(a) For each year of an elevator contractor’s license for each place of business operated by  the
applicant, $195.
(b) For the submission of plans and other pertinent data when required, for each elevator, $78.
(c) For each year of an inspection period for an operating permit:
(A) A dumbwaiter, sidewalk elevator, residential  elevator, residential inclinator or subveyor,
$60.
(B) An escalator, lowerator, manlift, stagelift, inclined elevator,  platform hoist or moving walk,
$98.
(C) A power-driven elevator with a four floor rise or under, $88.
[153]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) A power-driven elevator with over a four floor rise, but under a 10-floor rise, $108.
(E) A power-driven elevator with a 10-floor rise or over, but under a 20-floor rise, $134.
(F) A power-driven elevator with a 20-floor rise or over, $157.
(d) For a reinspection, $75.
(e) For special inspections  of hoisting or lowering mechanisms other than elevators, or for in-
spections, testing, consultations, site visits or  other services for which no fee is otherwise specified,
$75 per hour for travel and inspection time.
(f) For an elevator installation permit, if the total cost of the installation or alteration is:
(A) $1,000 or under, $98.
(B) Over $1,000 but under $15,000, $98 plus $13  for each $1,000 or fraction of $1,000 by which
the cost exceeds $1,000.
(C) $15,000 or over but under $50,000, $280 plus  $8 for each $1,000 or fraction of $1,000 by which
the cost exceeds $15,000.
(D) $50,000 or over, $553 plus  $3 for each $1,000 or fraction of $1,000 by which the cost exceeds
$50,000.
(2) If an owner or user of any elevator equipment fails to pay a fee required under  this section
within 90 days after the billing date, the department may consider the fee delinquent and  double the
amount of the fee.
SECTION 262.
 ORS 460.175 is amended to read:
460.175. All receipts from  fees, charges, costs and expenses provided for in ORS 460.005 to
460.175 shall be collected by the Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
and paid into the [ Consumer and Business Services Fund created by ORS  705.145] Department of
Building Codes Fund.
SECTION 263. ORS 460.310 is amended to read:
460.310. As used in ORS 460.310 to 460.370, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Amusement devices” means a structure, electrical or mechanical  contrivance or combina-
tion thereof [ which] that  is intended to supply revenue to  the owner or operator of the device by
providing  or  offering to provide amusement, pleasures, thrills or excitement at carnivals, fairs or
amusement parks. “Amusement device” does not include games,  concessions and associated struc-
tures.
(2) “Amusement ride” means any vehicle, boat or other mechanical  device except “water
slides” moving upon or within  a flow perimeter or structure, along cables, rails or ground, through
the air by centrifugal force or otherwise, or across water, that is used to  convey one or more indi-
viduals for amusement,  entertainment, diversion or recreation. The term “amusement ride” includes,
but is not limited to:
(a) Rides commonly known as Ferris wheels, carousels, parachute  towers, bungee jumping, tun-
nels of love and roller coasters.
(b) Equipment generally associated with winter sports activities,  such as ski lifts, ski tows, j-
bars, t-bars, ski mobiles, chair lifts and aerial tramways.
(c) Equipment not originally designed to be  used as an amusement ride, such as cranes or other
lifting devices, when used as part of an amusement ride or device.
(3) “Amusement ride inspector” means an employee or representative  of a casualty insurance
company or companies who is qualified and regularly  employed or otherwise authorized by the in-
surance company to inspect amusement rides and devices for safety.
(4) “Department” means the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
[154]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) “Director” means the  Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes.
(6) “Water slide”  means a recreational device designed to provide a descending ride on a flowing
water film into a splash down pool at the base of the slide.
SECTION 264. ORS 460.320 is amended to read:
460.320. (1) No person shall:
(a) Operate an amusement  ride or device without a valid operation permit therefor issued under
ORS 460.330, or allow an amusement ride or device owned, leased, controlled  or managed by the
person to be so operated.
(b) Operate  an amusement ride or device without first having obtained insurance from a com-
pany authorized to transact insurance in this state or an eligible surplus  lines insurer as defined in
ORS 735.405. The insurance  policy shall insure the public and all persons riding or otherwise in
contact with the ride or device against loss  or injury, in an amount not less than $1 million per
occurrence and an aggregate total of not less than $2 million.
(2) Whenever an insurance company notifies  its insured that it will no longer insure an
amusement ride or device, or that  insurance on a ride or device is no longer in force, the insurance
company shall also notify the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes , in
a form and manner prescribed by rule by the department, of the  description or identification number
of the ride or device for which insurance is canceled or suspended or is not to be renewed.
SECTION 265.
 ORS 460.330 is amended to read:
460.330. (1) An application for an operating permit to operate an amusement ride or  device shall
be made on an annual basis by the person owning the ride or device or the person’s agent  or lessee.
The application shall be on forms provided  by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes.
(2) An application for an annual operating permit  shall include an inspection report by an
amusement ride inspector employed or otherwise authorized to inspect by  the insurance carrier in-
suring the ride or device. The inspector shall indorse upon  the application any restrictions and
conditions that, in the inspector’s judgment, should be imposed  upon the operation of the amusement
ride or device to protect human life and  property. In addition, the inspector shall indicate whether
the amusement ride or device:
(a) Meets the underwriter’s standards;
(b) Meets safety standards approved by ASTM International; and
(c) Is assembled  and operated in compliance with the manual supplied by the manufacturer of
the ride or device.
(3) The inspection shall be performed no more than  90 days prior to the issuance or renewal
date of the permit. The department may issue  a temporary renewal permit without the required in-
spection report, allowing continued operation of a previously inspected ride or device if it  appears
to the department that the owner or operator has attempted to obtain an inspection,  but inspection
services are temporarily unavailable.
(4) An application shall include the name of the insurance carrier and the number of the  insur-
ance policy insuring the ride or device as required by ORS 460.320 (1)(b).
(5) The department  shall disapprove and reject an application for a permit if it determines that
the:
(a) Owner or lessee of the amusement ride or device is not insured as required by  ORS 460.320
(1)(b);
[155]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Operation does not meet safety standards as guided by the  safety standards approved by
ASTM International;
(c) Amusement ride  or device is not assembled and operated in compliance with the manual
supplied by the manufacturer; or
(d) Operation may endanger human life or property.
(6) Upon approval of an application and payment of fees as prescribed by rule, the  department
shall issue a permit authorizing operation of the amusement ride or device.
SECTION 266.
 ORS 460.350 is amended to read:
460.350. (1) In addition to the inspections  required under ORS 460.330, the Department of [ Con-
sumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  may cause an amusement ride or device to be in-
spected at any reasonable time to [ insure] ensure  compliance with ORS 460.310 to 460.370.
(2) The department may deny, suspend or revoke a permit at any time if, in its  judgment, the
amusement ride or  device for which the permit was issued is not installed or being operated in
compliance with ORS 460.310 to 460.370.
(3) The department may disconnect an unlawfully installed or operated amusement ride or device
from its source of power at any time and prevent its use  until the amusement ride or device is
brought into compliance with ORS 460.310 to 460.370.
(4) Any person may demand from the operator of any amusement  ride or device proof of a valid
operation permit issued pursuant to ORS 460.330.
SECTION 267. ORS 460.352 is amended to read:
460.352. Subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183, the Department of  [ Consumer and Busi-
ness Services ] Building Codes shall cancel, revoke or suspend the operating permit  for any person
who fails to comply with the minimum safety standards provided by ORS 460.310 to 460.370.
SECTION 268. ORS 460.355 is amended to read:
460.355. (1) In adopting rules pursuant to  ORS 460.360 (1), applicable to equipment mentioned in
ORS 460.310 (2)(b), the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall be
guided by the safety standards approved by ASTM International.
(2) The owner or  operator shall be deemed not a common carrier; however, such owner or op-
erator shall exercise the highest degree of care for the safety of users.
(3) If the department finds that  the United States Forest Service or other agency of government
has jurisdiction over and regulates  and provides inspection of the equipment mentioned in ORS
460.310 (2)(b) pursuant to promulgated safety standards not lower than  provided by ORS 460.310 to
460.370, it shall by its rules exempt operators from the requirements of ORS 460.310 to 460.370.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to:
(a) Govern the issuance, renewal, suspension and revocation of permits and  certificates of com-
petency issued under ORS 460.310 to 460.370.
(b) Govern the internal organization and procedure  of the department for administering and
enforcing ORS 460.310 to 460.370.
(c) Govern reports by the department’s staff of amusement ride inspectors  on amusement rides
or devices inspected by them.
(d) Set permit fees sufficient to pay but not to exceed the department’s costs of carrying out the
amusement ride program.
(5) In adopting rules under this section, the department shall consider:
(a) Technological advances in the amusement ride industry.
(b) The practicability of following the standards under consideration, if adopted.
[156]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The  probability, extent and gravity of the injury to the public or property that would result
from failure to follow the standards under consideration.
(d) Safety standards followed, proposed or approved  by responsible members of the amusement
ride industry and by ASTM International.
SECTION 269. ORS 460.360 is amended to read:
460.360. (1) The  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall, in com-
pliance with ORS chapter 183, make, amend, repeal,  promulgate and enforce rules to carry out ORS
460.310 to 460.370.
(2) All proceedings relating to permits under ORS 460.310 to 460.370  shall be conducted in
compliance with ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 270. ORS 460.370 is amended to read:
460.370. All moneys  from fees collected by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes under  ORS 460.310 to 460.370 shall be paid into the [ Consumer and Business Ser-
vices Fund created by ORS 705.145 ] Department of Building  Codes Fund and are continuously
appropriated to the department for use as provided in ORS 455.022.
SECTION 271. ORS 466.735 is amended to read:
466.735. Nothing in ORS 466.706 to 466.882 and  466.994 is intended to interfere with, limit or
abridge the authority of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes or the
State Fire Marshal, or any other state agency or local unit of government  relating to combustion
and explosion hazards, hazard communications or land  use. The complementary relationship between
the protection of the public safety from combustion and explosion hazards, and  protection of the
public health, safety, welfare and  the environment from releases of regulated substances from
underground storage tanks is recognized. Therefore, the  Department of Environmental Quality shall
work cooperatively with the Department of [ Consumer and Business  Services ] Building Codes , the
State Fire Marshal and local units of government in developing the rules and  procedures necessary
to carry out the provisions of ORS 466.706 to 466.882 and 466.994.
SECTION 272. ORS 468A.707 is amended to read:
468A.707. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission by rule shall:
(a) Establish an asbestos abatement program that assures the  proper and safe abatement of
asbestos hazards through contractor licensing and worker training.
(b) Establish the  date after which a contractor must be licensed under ORS 468A.720 and a
worker must hold a certificate under ORS 468A.730.
(c) Establish criteria and provisions for granting an extension of  time for contractor licensing
and worker certification .[, which] The criteria and provisions may consider the  number of workers
and the availability of accredited training courses.
(2) The program established under subsection (1) of this section shall include at least:
(a) Criteria for contractor licensing and training;
(b) Criteria for worker certification and training;
(c) Standardized training courses; and
(d) A procedure for inspecting asbestos abatement projects.
(3) In establishing the training requirements under  subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
commission shall adopt different training requirements that reflect the  different levels of responsi-
bility of the contractor or worker, so that within the category  of contractor, sublevels shall be
separately licensed or exempted and within the category of worker, sublevels shall be separately
certified or exempted. The commission shall  specifically address as a separate class, those contrac-
[157]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tors and workers who perform small scale, short duration renovating and  maintenance activity. As
used in this subsection, “small scale,  short duration renovating and maintenance activity” means a
task for which the removal of asbestos is not the primary objective of  the job, including but not
limited to:
(a) Removal of asbestos-containing insulation on pipes;
(b) Removal of small quantities of asbestos-containing insulation on beams or above ceilings;
(c) Replacement of an asbestos-containing gasket on a valve;
(d) Installation or removal of a small section of drywall; or
(e) Installation of electrical conduits through or proximate to asbestos-containing materials.
(4) The Department of Environmental Quality, on behalf of the commission, shall  consult with
the Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes and the Oregon Health Au-
thority about proposed rules for the asbestos abatement program to [ assure] ensure  that the rules
are compatible with all other  state and federal statutes and regulations related to asbestos abate-
ment.
(5) The Department of Environmental Quality shall cooperate  with the Department of [ Consumer
and Business Services ] Building Codes and the Oregon Health Authority to promote proper and safe
asbestos abatement work practices and compliance with  the provisions of ORS 279B.055 (2)(g),
279B.060 (2)(g), 279C.365 (1)(j), 468.126, 468A.135 and 468A.700 to 468A.760.
SECTION 273.
 ORS 468A.745 is amended to read:
468A.745. The Environmental Quality Commission shall adopt rules to carry out its  duties under
ORS 279B.055 (2)(g), 279B.060 (2)(g), 279C.365 (1)(j), 468A.135 and 468A.700  to 468A.760. In addition,
the commission may:
(1) Allow variances from the provisions of ORS 468A.700 to  468A.755 in the same manner vari-
ances are granted under ORS 468A.075.
(2) Establish training requirements for contractors applying for an asbestos abatement license.
(3) Establish training requirements for workers applying for a certificate to  work on asbestos
abatement projects.
(4) Establish standards and procedures to accredit asbestos abatement training courses for con-
tractors and workers.
(5) Establish standards and procedures for licensing contractors and certifying workers.
(6) Issue, renew, suspend and revoke licenses, certificates and accreditations.
(7) Determine those classes of asbestos abatement projects for  which the person undertaking the
project must notify the Department of Environmental Quality before beginning the project.
(8) Establish  work practice standards, compatible with standards of the Department of [ Con-
sumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, for the abatement of asbestos hazards and the han-
dling and disposal of waste materials containing asbestos.
(9) Provide for asbestos abatement training courses that satisfy the  requirements for contractor
licensing under ORS 468A.720 or worker certification under ORS 468A.730.
SECTION 274.
 ORS 469.700 is amended to read:
469.700. (1) The Residential and Manufactured Structures Board or the  Construction Industry
Energy Board, after public hearing and subject to  the approval of the Director of the Department
of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, shall adopt a recommended voluntary  energy
efficiency rating system  for single family residences and provide the State Department of Energy
with a copy thereof.
(2) The rating system shall provide a  single numerical value or other simple concise means to
[158]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
measure the energy efficiency of any single family residence,  taking into account factors including,
but not limited to, the heat loss characteristics of ceilings, walls, floors, windows, doors and  heating
ducts.
(3) Upon adoption of  the rating system under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the depart-
ment shall publicize the availability of the system, and encourage its voluntary use in real  estate
transactions.
(4) As used  in subsections (1) to (3) of this section, “single family residence” means a structure
designed as  a residence for one family and sharing no common wall with another residence of any
type.
SECTION 275. ORS 469.735 is amended to read:
469.735. As used in ORS 469.730 to 469.745, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Department” means the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(2) “Director” means the  Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes.
(3) “Public building” means any publicly or privately owned building  constructed prior to Jan-
uary 1, 1978, including the outdoor areas adjacent thereto, [ which] that :
(a) Is open to and frequented by the public; or
(b) Serves as a place of employment.
SECTION 276.
 ORS 469.740 is amended to read:
469.740. In accordance  with ORS chapter 183 and after consultation with the Building Codes
Structures Board or with the  Construction Industry Energy Board, the Director of the Department
of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall adopt rules establishing energy conser-
vation standards for public buildings. The standards shall provide means  of measuring and reducing
total energy consumption and shall take into account:
(1) The climatic conditions of the areas in which particular buildings are located; and
(2) The three basic systems comprising any functioning building, which are:
(a) Energized systems such as those required for heating, cooling, lighting,  ventilation,
conveyance and business equipment operation.
(b) Nonenergized systems such as floors, ceilings, walls, roof and windows.
(c) Human systems such as maintenance,  operating and management personnel, tenants and
other users.
SECTION 277.
 ORS 469.745 is amended to read:
469.745. To provide the public with a  guide for energy conservation, the Director of the State
Department of Energy shall adopt  a program for voluntary compliance by the public with the
standard adopted  by the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes under ORS 469.740.
SECTION 278. ORS 469B.103 is amended to read:
469B.103. (1) For  the purposes of carrying out ORS 469B.100 to 469B.118, the State Department
of Energy may adopt rules prescribing minimum performance  criteria for alternative energy devices
for dwellings. The department may, in prescribing criteria,  rely on applicable federal, state and local
requirements for energy efficiency,  including the state building code, state and federal appliance
standards and any specialty codes and any code adopted  by [ the Building Codes Division of ] the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(2) The State Department of Energy  shall  take into consideration evolving market conditions
in prescribing minimum performance  criteria for alternative energy devices and in determining
[159]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
credit amounts, consistent with ORS 316.116.
(3) The department,  in adopting rules under this section for solar heating and cooling systems,
shall take into consideration applicable standards of federal performance criteria  prescribed pursu-
ant to the provisions of the Solar Heating and Cooling Demonstration Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. 5506.
(4) The Director of the State Department of Energy shall adopt rules  governing the determi-
nation of eligibility, verification and certification of an alternative fuel device for purposes of  the
tax credits granted under ORS 316.116, including  but not limited to rules that further define an al-
ternative fuel device and that govern the computation of costs eligible for credit.
(5) The department shall by rule establish policies and procedures for  the administration and
enforcement of the provisions of ORS 316.116 and 469B.100 to 469B.118.
SECTION 279. ORS 469B.279 is amended to read:
469B.279. The State Department of Energy shall by rule establish the following standards relat-
ing to energy conservation projects:
(1) In consultation with the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services Building Codes Di-
vision] Building Codes, standards relating to energy savings in new construction.
(2) Standards relating to what constitutes a replacement of inefficient equipment.
(3) Standards for the determination of total project cost.
(4) Standards for the application of third party review of research and  development projects by
a qualified third party selected by the Director  of the State Department of Energy, as required in
ORS 469B.285.
SECTION 280.
 ORS 479.155 is amended to read:
479.155. (1)  As used in this section, “director” means the Director of the Department of [ Con-
sumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(2) Prior to construction  or alteration of a hospital, public building as defined in ORS 479.168,
public garage, dry cleaning establishment,  apartment house, hotel, bulk oil storage plant, school,
institution as defined in ORS  479.210, or any other building or structure regulated by the State Fire
Marshal for use and occupancy or requiring approval by the State  Fire Marshal pursuant to statute,
the owner shall submit to the director two copies of  a plan or sketch showing the location of the
building or structure with relation to the premises, distances,  lengths and details of construction as
the director shall require. A filing is not required with respect to any such building  or structure in
any area exempted by order of the State  Fire Marshal pursuant to ORS 476.030. Approval of the
plans or sketches by the director is considered approval by the State Fire Marshal and satisfies any
statutory provision requiring approval by the State Fire Marshal.
(3) A declaration of the value of the proposed construction or alteration and the appropriate  fee
required under ORS 455.210 must  accompany the plan or sketch. However, the determination of
value or valuation shall be made by the director.
(4) The director shall be  furnished with not fewer than two accurate copies of the plan or sketch
and details for the purpose  of ascertaining compliance with applicable fire prevention and protection
statutes and regulations. The plan examiner shall indicate on the plan or sketch  and in writing ap-
proval or disapproval and conditions for approval of  the construction or alteration. One copy of the
plan or sketch shall be retained by  the director and one copy shall be returned to the applicant.
No building or structure referred to in subsection (2)  of this section shall be erected or constructed
without approval  by the director if the building or structure requires approval by the State Fire
Marshal. After such approval or issuance of the required permit, construction or alteration must
comply with the plan or sketch in all respects unless modified by  subsequent permit or order of the
[160]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
director.
(5) The approval of a plan or sketch may  not be construed to be a permit for, or an approval
of, any violation of any statute  or regulation or the applicable ordinances and regulations of any
governmental subdivision of the state. The approval of a plan or sketch  may not be construed as
an approval for noncompliance with fire marshal regulations. Any condition upon approval  or dis-
approval is an order subject to appeal as other orders are appealable.
(6) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (2) and  (4) of this section, the State Fire
Marshal may, by rule, require an additional copy of  a plan or sketch for local government use and
may specify that plans or sketches submitted for review be drawn clearly and to scale.
SECTION 281. ORS 479.520 is amended to read:
479.520. The purpose of the Electrical Safety Law is to protect the  health and safety of the
people of Oregon from the danger of electrically caused shocks, fires and explosions  and to protect
property  situated  in Oregon from the hazard of electrically caused fires and explosions. To accom-
plish this purpose the Legislative Assembly intends to provide a procedure:
(1) For  determining where and by whom electrical installations are being made and where
electrical products are sold in this state.
(2) To assure the public that persons making electrical  installations in this state are qualified
by experience and training.
(3) To  assure the public that electrical installations meet minimum safety standards and that
electrical products meet electrical product safety standards.
(4) For the administration and  enforcement of the Electrical Safety Law by the Department of
[Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes and the Electrical and Elevator Board.
(5) By which the cost of administering and  enforcing the Electrical Safety Law is defrayed by
the collection  of fees in connection with the issuing of permits and electrical licenses and the col-
lection of civil penalties.
SECTION 282. ORS 479.530 is amended to read:
479.530. As used in ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and 479.995, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Approved testing laboratory” means a  testing laboratory that meets criteria for electrical
product  evaluation  established by the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Ser-
vices] Building Codes with the approval of the Electrical and Elevator Board under ORS 479.730.
(2) “Board” means the Electrical and Elevator Board established under ORS 455.138.
(3) “Certified electrical product” means an electrical  product that is certified under ORS 479.760
and that is not decertified.
(4) “Competent inspection service”  means an electrical inspection service of a city or county
administered under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 that employs electrical inspectors who  are certified to
meet standards under ORS 479.810.
(5) “Commercial  electrical air conditioning equipment” means heating, cooling, refrigeration,
dehumidifying, humidifying and filtering equipment  used for climatizing or moving of air if used in
commerce, industry or government and if installed in a place not accessible to the general public
other than the switches regulating the operation of the equipment.
(6) “Demarcation point” means the place  of interconnection between the communications cabl-
ing, terminal equipment or protective apparatus of the telecommunications  service provider and the
customer’s  premises.
(7) “Department” means the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(8) “Director” means the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
[161]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Building Codes.
(9) “Dwelling unit” means one or more rooms for the use of one or more persons as a  house-
keeping unit with space for eating, living and sleeping  and permanent provisions for cooking and
sanitation.
(10) “Electrical  installations” means the construction or installation of electrical wiring and the
permanent attachment or  installation of electrical products in or on any structure that is not itself
an electrical product.  “Electrical installation” also means the maintenance or repair of installed
electrical wiring and  permanently attached electrical products. “Electrical installation” does not
include an oil module.
(11) “Electrical product” means  any electrical equipment, material, device or apparatus that,
except as provided in ORS 479.540, requires a license or permit to install and either conveys or  is
operated by electrical current.
(12) “Equipment” means any material, fittings, devices, appliances, fixtures, apparatus or the like
that are used as part of or in connection with an electrical installation.
(13) “Field evaluation firm” means an independent organization that provides:
(a) Evaluations or testing, or both; and
(b) Documentation regarding compliance with electrical product safety  standards and with the
electrical installation safety code.
(14) “Industrial electrical equipment” means electrical products used in industry or  government
that utilize electric energy for mechanical, chemical, heating,  lighting or similar purposes, that are
designed to service or produce  a product and that are used directly in the production of the service
or product.
(15) “Installation label” means  an adhesive tag issued by governmental agencies that administer
the Electrical Safety Law to  licensed electrical contractors for application to those minor electrical
installations for which the board by rule determines to be appropriate for random inspections.
(16) “License” means a permit issued by the department  under ORS 479.630 authorizing the
person whose  name appears as licensee thereon to act as an electrical contractor, supervising
electrician, journeyman electrician, electrical apprentice or limited elevator journeyman as indicated
thereon.
(17) “Minimum safety standards” means safety standards prescribed  by concurrence of the board
and the director under ORS 479.730.
(18) “Multifamily dwelling” means a building containing more than one dwelling unit.
(19) “Oil module” means a prefabricated structure manufactured to  the specifications of the
purchaser and used outside this state in the exploration for  or processing or extraction of petroleum
products.
(20) “Permit”  means an official document or card issued by the enforcing agency to authorize
performance of a specified electrical installation.
(21) “Single family dwelling” means a building consisting solely of one dwelling unit.
(22) “Telecommunications service provider” means a telecommunications carrier  as defined in
ORS 133.721 or a telecommunications utility or competitive telecommunications provider, both  as
defined in ORS 759.005.
(23) “Uncertified product” means any electrical product that is not an electrical product certi-
fied under ORS 479.760.
SECTION 283.
 ORS 479.540 is amended to read:
479.540. (1) Except as  otherwise provided in this subsection, a person is not required to obtain
[162]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a license to make an electrical installation on residential or farm property that is owned by the
person or a member of the person’s immediate family if  the property is not intended for sale, ex-
change, lease or rent. The following apply to the exemption established in this subsection:
(a) The exemption established for a  person under this subsection does not exempt the work
performed by the person  from having to comply with the requirements for such work under ORS
chapter 455 or this chapter and rules adopted thereunder.
(b) If the property is  a building used as a residence and is for rent, lease, sale or exchange, this
subsection establishes an exemption  for work on, alterations to or replacement of parts of electrical
installations as necessary for maintenance of the existing  electrical installations on that property,
but does not exempt new electrical installations or substantial alterations to existing electrical in-
stallations on that property. As used in this paragraph, “new electrical installations or substantial
alterations” does not include the replacement of an  existing garbage disposal, dishwasher or electric
hot water heater with a similar appliance of 30 amps or less, single phase,  by a landlord, landlord’s
agent or the employee of the landlord or landlord’s agent.
(2) An electrical contractor license is not required in  connection with an electrical installation:
(a) Of meters and similar devices for measuring electricity by a  person principally engaged in
the business of generating or selling electricity in connection  with the construction or maintenance
of electrical lines, wires or equipment.
(b) Of ignition or lighting systems for motor vehicles.
(c) To be made by a person on the person’s property in connection with the person’s business.
(d) To be made by a public utility, consumer-owned utility as  defined in ORS 757.270, telecom-
munications carrier as defined in ORS 133.721, competitive telecommunications provider as  defined
in ORS 759.005 or municipality for generation, transmission or  distribution of electricity on property
that the utility, carrier, provider or municipality owns or manages.
(3) A person whose sole business  is generating or selling electricity in connection with the
construction or maintenance of electrical lines, wires or equipment, is not  required to obtain a li-
cense to transform, transmit or distribute electricity  from its source to the service head of the
premises to be supplied thereby.
(4)(a) A person is not required to obtain a license for the repair or replacement  of light fixtures,
light switches, lighting ballast, electrical outlets or  smoke alarms in a building used for housing
purposes that is owned, leased, managed or operated by  a housing authority and the person doing
the repair or replacement is a member of the housing authority’s regular maintenance staff.
(b) A license is not required for:
(A) Temporary demonstrations;
(B) A street lighting system located on a  public street or in a right of way if the system is
similar to  a system provided by a public utility and the installation or maintenance, or both, is
performed by a qualified employee  of a licensed electrical contractor principally engaged in the
business of installing and maintaining such systems; or
(C) An outdoor transmission or distribution system, whether overhead  or underground, if the
system is similar to a system  provided by a public utility and the installation or maintenance, or
both, is performed by a qualified employee of  a licensed electrical contractor principally engaged in
the business of installing and maintaining such systems.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, “qualified employee” means an employee who has regis-
tered with or  graduated from a State of Oregon or federally approved apprenticeship course de-
signed for the work being performed. The supervising electrician signature required under ORS
[163]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
479.560 (1)(b) does not apply to contractors working under this subsection.
(5) The provisions of ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and 479.995 do not apply:
(a) To electrical products owned by, supplied to  or to be supplied to a public utility as defined
in ORS 757.005, consumer-owned utility as defined in ORS 757.270, telecommunications carrier  as
defined in ORS 133.721 or competitive telecommunications provider as defined in ORS 759.005;
(b) To electrical installations made by or for a public  utility, consumer-owned utility, telecom-
munications carrier or competitive  telecommunications provider if the electrical installations are
an integral part of the equipment or electrical products of the utility, carrier or provider; or
(c) To any electrical generation plant owned or operated by a municipality to the same extent
that a utility, telecommunications carrier or competitive telecommunications provider is  exempted
under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(6) A permit is not required:
(a) For the repair  or replacement of light fixtures, light switches, lighting ballast, electrical
outlets or smoke alarms in a building used  for housing purposes that is owned, leased, managed or
operated by a housing authority; or
(b) For the repair, alteration or replacement of existing electrical products  or electrical instal-
lations authorized by ORS 479.560  (3) at an industrial plant, a commercial office building, a building
that is owned, leased, managed or operated by  the state or a local government entity or other fa-
cilities designated by the Electrical and Elevator Board when  the owner, operating manager or
electrical contractor of the facility meets the provisions of ORS 479.630 (1) and (2) and:
(A) Obtains a master permit for inspection under ORS 479.560 (3); or
(B) Obtains a master individual inspection permit under ORS 479.565.
(7) In cases of emergency in industrial plants, a permit is not  required in advance for electrical
installation made by a person licensed as a general supervising electrician, a  general journeyman
electrician or an electrical apprentice under ORS 479.630 if an application  accompanied by appro-
priate fee for a permit is submitted to the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes within five days after the commencement of such electrical work.
(8)(a) A license or permit is not required for  the installation or assembly of industrial electrical
equipment by the duly authorized agents of the factory, vendor or owner.
(b) The license and permit exemptions of this subsection do not apply  to activity in an area
where industrial electrical equipment is installed in or enters a hazardous location  or penetrates
or enters a fire rated assembly or plenum rated assembly.
(c) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Duly authorized agents”  means individuals trained by the factory or a vendor or by expe-
rience and who are knowledgeable in the operation, maintenance, repair  and installation of indus-
trial electrical equipment.
(B) “Installation or assembly” means the reassembly at a job site of equipment  that is wired and
assembled at the factory and then disassembled for shipping purposes or of existing  equipment that
is relocated. “Installation or assembly” does not include work involving field fabricated assemblies
or any other electrical product that is not an original part of the industrial  electrical equipment.
“Installation or assembly” does not include the  connection of industrial electrical equipment to a
power source.
(9) The provisions of ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and 479.995 do not apply to:
(a) Electrical installations and repairs  involving communication and signal systems of railroad
companies.
[164]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Electrical  installations and repairs involving remote and permanent broadcast systems of
radio and television stations licensed by the Federal Communications Commission if the systems are
not part of the building’s permanent wiring.
(c) The installing, maintaining, repairing or replacement of telecommunications  systems on the
provider side of the demarcation point by a telecommunications service provider.
(d) The maintaining, repairing or replacement of telecommunications equipment on the  customer
side of the demarcation point by a telecommunications service provider.
(e) Installations,  by a telecommunications service provider or an appropriately licensed elec-
trical contractor, of telecommunications systems on  the customer side of the demarcation point ex-
cept:
(A) Installations involving more than 10 telecommunications outlets; and
(B) Installations of any size that penetrate fire-resistive construction  or air handling systems or
that pass through hazardous locations.
(f) Notwithstanding paragraph (e)  of this subsection, installation of telecommunications systems
on the customer side of the demarcation point in:
(A) One and two family dwellings; and
(B) Multifamily dwellings having not more than four dwelling  units if the installation is by a
telecommunications service provider.
(g) Notwithstanding paragraph (e) of  this subsection, installation or replacement of cord or plug
connected telecommunications equipment on the customer side of the demarcation point.
(h) Notwithstanding paragraph (e) of this subsection, installation of patch cord and jumper
cross-connected equipment on the customer side of the demarcation point.
(10)(a) The board may grant partial or complete exemptions by  rule for any electrical product
from any of the provisions of ORS 455.610 to 455.630 or 479.510  to 479.945 and 479.995 if the board
determines that the  electrical product does not present a danger to the health and safety of the
people of this state.
(b) If the board grants an exemption  pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the board may
determine that the product may be installed by a person  not licensed under ORS 479.510 to 479.945.
(11) ORS 479.760 does not apply  to products described in this subsection that comply with the
electrical product safety standards established by concurrence of the  board and the [ Director of
the] Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  as described  under ORS
479.730. This  subsection does not exempt any products used in locations determined to be hazardous
in the electrical code of this state. The following apply to this subsection:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, the exemption under this subsection
applies to:
(A) The rotating equipment portion of power generation equipment.
(B) Testing equipment used in a laboratory or hospital.
(C) Commercial electrical air conditioning equipment.
(D) Prefabricated  work performed by an electrical contractor with licensed electrical personnel
in the contractor’s place of business for assembly on the job site if the work  is composed of parts
that meet the electrical product safety standards established by concurrence  of the board and the
[director] department.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the board may require any of the products
described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection to be subject to the certification requirements under
ORS 479.760 if the board determines that the product or class of  products has presented a fire or
[165]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
life safety hazard in  use. A determination under this paragraph shall be effective as to any such
product or class of products installed after the date of the determination becomes final.  The board
may reinstate any exemption removed under this paragraph if the board  determines that the reasons
for the removal of the exemption have been corrected.
(12)(a) ORS 479.610 does not apply  to installations of industrial electrical equipment unless the
board determines that the product or class of products may present a fire or life safety hazard.
(b) The board may reinstate an exemption removed under this subsection if  the product qualifies
for reinstatement under:
(A) An equipment safety program approved by the board;
(B) Equipment minimum safety standards established by concurrence of the board and  the [ di-
rector] department;
(C) An evaluation by an approved field evaluation firm;
(D) A listing from a nationally recognized testing laboratory;
(E) An evaluation of a first model of a product by the board; or
(F) Any other method approved by the board.
(13) ORS 479.760 does not apply to electrical equipment that has been installed  and in use for
one year or more.
(14) A person who holds a limited maintenance specialty contractor license  or a limited pump
installation specialty contractor license issued under ORS 479.510  to 479.945 or a person who is the
employee of such license holder and who is listed with the board as an employee is not required  to
have a journeyman license or supervising electrician’s license to perform work authorized under  the
person’s license.
(15) A person is not required to obtain a permit  for work on, alterations to or replacement of
parts of electrical installations as necessary for  maintenance of existing electrical installations on
residential property owned by the person or by a member of the person’s immediate family. This
subsection does not establish an exemption for new electrical installations or substantial alterations
to existing electrical installations.
(16) A permit is not required for those minor electrical installations  for which the board has
authorized an installation label.
(17) A residential home, as defined in ORS 443.580,  and an adult foster home, as defined in ORS
443.705, is not a multifamily dwelling and only electrical  installation standards and safety require-
ments applicable to single family dwellings apply to such homes.
(18) The permit requirements of ORS 479.550 and  the license requirements of ORS 479.620 do
not apply to cable television installations.
(19) The provisions of any electrical products code or  rule adopted pursuant to ORS 479.510 to
479.945 and 479.995 apply to cable and  such products installed as part of a cable television instal-
lation.
(20) A person is not required to  obtain a license to make an electrical installation in a prefab-
ricated structure, as defined in  ORS 455.010, that is designed for residential use and intended for
delivery in another state.
(21) As used in this section, “smoke alarm” has the meaning given that  term under ORS 479.250.
SECTION 284.
 ORS 479.560 is amended to read:
479.560. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  or a desig-
nated agent shall issue a permit to:
(a) Any applicant who has complied with  ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and the rules issued there-
[166]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under, covering an  electrical installation to be made on residential or farm property owned by the
applicant or a member of the applicant’s immediate family as allowed under ORS 479.540 (1).
(b) A licensed electrical contractor or an agent the contractor has designated  to the department
or the department’s designated agent in a record  signed by the electrical contractor. The depart-
ment or department’s designated agent shall only issue a permit under this subsection if the appli-
cation for the permit is accompanied by a  signed statement that the electrical contractor’s general
supervising electrician of record will  sign the permit before an inspection of the electrical work is
requested. A contractor or  the contractor’s general supervisor will promptly request an inspection
of electrical work performed under a permit issued under  this subsection. A permit issued under this
subsection shall state the name of the electrical contractor.
(2) A permit issued to an electrical contractor upon the  request of the contractor’s supervising
electrician is void upon the end of the employment of such supervising electrician  before completion
of the electrical installation.
(3) Except for the  installation or alteration of an electrical service, the owner, operating man-
ager or electrical contractor of an industrial plant who  meets the provisions of ORS 479.630 (1) and
(2), a commercial office building, a building that  is owned, leased, managed or operated by the state
or a local government entity or other facilities designated by the Electrical and Elevator  Board, in
lieu of the required inspection permit, may apply to the department or  municipality providing in-
spection service for  a master electrical inspection permit. Under the permit the authority having
jurisdiction shall cause a periodic  inspection to be made of the electrical installations. The authority
may also cause a cover inspection,  [ which] that  shall be made before electrical installations are
covered. The periodic inspection under the permit  shall be done at least once a year or more fre-
quently based on the needs of the particular plant,  building or facility. The department shall adopt
rules in accordance with ORS chapter 183 for:
(a) The annual issuance of the master electrical inspection permit;
(b) The conduct of the inspections on the electrical installations and electrical products;
(c) The granting of a waiver of payment of permit fees other than for the master electrical in-
spection permit; and
(d) The fixing and collecting of inspection fees at the  cost of making the inspection according
to the time required of the inspector.
SECTION 285.
 ORS 479.570 is amended to read:
479.570. (1) Except  as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person who sells electricity
may not energize an electrical installation unless the installation is first approved by an inspector
authorized to perform inspections under ORS 479.510 to 479.945.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) An  installation for which a written request to energize has been made by a licensed super-
vising electrician  qualified pursuant to ORS 479.630 (2) and to which the appropriate electrical
permit has been attached;
(b) A temporary installation of less than 480 volts made to  provide service to a construction site
or irrigation pump if the installation is properly grounded and  the appropriate electrical permit is
attached thereto;
(c) An installation within a plant  or system of a person who sells electricity. As used in this
paragraph, “person who sells electricity”  does not include small power production facilities as de-
fined in ORS 758.500 (1981 Replacement Part); or
(d) A minor electrical installation for which a valid installation label has been issued.
[167]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) Electrical installations energized without inspection pursuant to subsection (2)(a) and (b)  of
this section must receive final inspection as required by ORS 479.510 to 479.945.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 756.040,  756.060 and 757.035, the Department of [ Consumer and Busi-
ness Services ] Building Codes , in consultation with the Electrical and Elevator Board, may  adopt
rules regulating  the use of a written request by a licensed supervising electrician as described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section  as adequate authority for a person who sells electricity to energize
an electrical installation.
SECTION 286. ORS 479.630 is amended to read:
479.630. If the person pays the applicable application fee required under  ORS 479.840 and com-
plies with ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and the  rules adopted under ORS 455.117 and 479.510 to 479.945,
the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall issue:
(1) An electrical contractor’s license to a person engaging in or carrying on a business of mak-
ing electrical installations.
(2) A general supervising electrician’s license to a person who:
(a) Passes a written examination prepared by the  Electrical and Elevator Board and adminis-
tered by the department; and
(b) Submits proof satisfactory to the board that the person  has had at least four years of expe-
rience as a general journeyman electrician or its equivalent, as  determined by the board by rule, in
installing, maintaining and repairing electrical wires and equipment.
(3) A limited supervising  electrician’s license to a person who qualifies under this subsection.
A person licensed under  this subsection is authorized to supervise the class of electrical work in-
cluded in the branch of the electrical trade and for which the person has passed  the examination
administered by the department. A person qualifies under this subsection if the person:
(a) Passes a  written examination prepared by the board and administered by the department; and
(b) Submits proof satisfactory to the board that  the person has had at least four years of spe-
cialized experience in a recognized branch of the electrical trade on the journeyman level.
(4) A general journeyman electrician’s license to a person who:
(a) Passes a  written examination prepared by the board and administered by the department; and
(b) Submits proof satisfactory to the board that:
(A) The person has had at  least four years of general experience as an apprentice or its equiv-
alent, as determined by the board by rule, in installing,  maintaining and repairing electrical wires
and equipment, including not fewer than 1,000 hours in wiring on  single or multifamily dwelling
units; or
(B) If the person is licensed as a  limited residential electrician under subsection (14) of this
section, subsequent to receiving that license, the person has  worked for at least two years as a
limited residential  electrician and subsequent to those two years has completed an additional two
years’ experience as an apprentice or its equivalent, as determined by the board by rule, for  that
period of apprenticeship time worked exclusively in installing, maintaining and repairing electrical
wires and equipment in the commercial and industrial branches of the electrical trade under the
supervision of a licensed electrical contractor.
(5) A limited  journeyman electrician’s license to a person who qualifies under this subsection.
A person licensed under this subsection  is authorized to perform the class of electrical work in-
cluded in the branch of the electrical trade for  which the person has passed the examination ad-
ministered by the department. A person qualifies under this subsection if the person:
(a) Passes a  written examination prepared by the board and administered by the department; and
[168]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, submits proof satisfactory to
the board that the person has had at least four years of specialized experience  as an apprentice or
its equivalent, as determined by the board by rule, in a recognized branch of  the electrical trade;
or
(B) If applying for licensing as a limited journeyman sign electrician or limited journeyman stage
electrician, submits proof satisfactory to the board that the person  has had at least two years of
specialized experience as  an apprentice or its equivalent, as determined by the board by rule, in the
sign or stage branch of the electrical trade.
(6) A limited elevator  journeyman license to a person who qualifies under this subsection. A
person licensed under this subsection is  authorized to install, maintain and repair elevators, in-
cluding all electrical and mechanical  systems. A person qualifies under this subsection if the person
has completed an elevator  apprenticeship program, including both electrical and mechanical training
components, approved by the board  by rule and the person submits an application for licensure to
the board in writing. A person issued a license under this subsection is exempt from continuing ed-
ucation requirements established under ORS 455.117 and 479.680.
(7) An electrical apprentice’s license to a person  who has complied with ORS 660.002 to 660.210
as an electrical apprentice.
(8) An electrical apprentice’s license to a trainee toward a  limited residential electrician’s li-
cense who has complied with ORS 660.002 to 660.210 as an electrical apprentice.
(9) An electrical apprentice’s license to a trainee toward a limited journeyman’s license  in a
recognized branch of the electrical trade who is employed by an employer who also:
(a) Employs a holder of either a general  journeyman electrician’s license or a limited
journeyman electrician’s license; and
(b) Conducts an electrical training program in a recognized branch of the electrical  trade ap-
proved by the board as being a training program that will adequately prepare the trainee for the
limited journeyman’s license.
(10) A limited maintenance electrician’s license to a person  who qualifies under this subsection.
A person licensed  under this subsection is authorized to maintain, repair and replace electrical in-
stallations, including electrical components, required on the premises of  industrial plants, and
maintain, repair and replace electrical installations on systems that are less than 600 volts  phase
to phase, including electrical components,  required on the premises of commercial office buildings,
buildings occupied by the state or a local  government entity or facilities designated by the board.
The following apply to this subsection:
(a) A person qualifies under this subsection if the person:
(A) Passes a written examination prepared by  the board and administered by the department on
repair, replacement and maintenance of equipment of the type and nature normally used  in an in-
dustrial plant, commercial office building or government building and on the use  of testing equip-
ment; and
(B)(i) Completes a two-year training program approved  by the board that provides for training
and supervision of the trainee or apprentice; or
(ii) Submits proof satisfactory to  the board that the person has had sufficient experience and
related educational training in the repair, replacement and maintenance of electrical wiring  and
equipment of the type and nature used in an industrial plant, commercial  office building or govern-
ment building, as determined by the board or by an appropriate local  apprenticeship committee re-
cognized by the State Apprenticeship and Training Council.
[169]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) An annual inspection of the premises upon which  electrical work is performed by persons
licensed under this subsection shall  be made by the electrical inspector for an annual fee determined
by the board by rule, based upon the time required for the inspection, payable to the department.
(c) A person licensed under this  subsection may be employed directly by the owner, or owner’s
agent, of any government building or  commercial office building. A building owner or owner’s agent
need not be licensed under this section to supervise a limited maintenance electrician.
(d) The department,  in consultation with the board, shall adopt rules defining government
buildings and commercial office buildings subject to this subsection.
(11) A  limited building maintenance electrician’s license to a person who qualifies under this
subsection. The following apply to this subsection:
(a) A person licensed under this subsection is authorized to maintain, repair and replace the
following electrical installations required on the  premises of commercial office buildings, buildings
occupied by the state or a local government entity or facilities designated by the board in electrical
systems not exceeding 300 volts to ground:
(A) Electrical appliances;
(B) Light switches;
(C) Light fixtures;
(D) Fans;
(E) Receptacles; and
(F) Fluorescent ballasts.
(b) A person qualifies under this subsection if the person:
(A) Passes a written examination prepared by  the board and administered by the department on
maintenance, repair and replacement of equipment of the type and nature normally used in a com-
mercial office building or government building and on the use of testing equipment; and
(B) Submits proof satisfactory to the board that the person has:
(i) Had sufficient experience in the maintenance, repair  and replacement of electrical wiring and
equipment of the type and  nature normally used in a commercial office building or government
building; or
(ii) Completed a one-year training course, with  classroom and on-the-job training components
approved by the  board, on the maintenance, repair and replacement of electrical wiring and equip-
ment of the type and nature normally used in a commercial office building or government building.
(c) An annual inspection of the premises upon  which electrical work is performed by persons
licensed under this subsection shall  be made by the electrical inspector for an annual fee determined
by the board by rule, based  upon the time required for the inspection, payable to the department,
or the inspection shall be performed under an electrical master permit program.
(d) Building owners may perform work regulated  by this subsection and for which a license is
required under this subsection without obtaining a license.
(e) A person who owns more than 50 percent of a corporation that controls a building is a
building owner.
(f) A person licensed  under this subsection may be employed by the owner of a commercial office
building or the owner’s agent. A building owner or owner’s agent need not  be licensed under this
section to supervise a limited building maintenance electrician.
(12) A limited  maintenance specialty contractor license to a person who qualifies under this
subsection. A person licensed under this subsection is  authorized to engage in the electrical work
related to  the repair, service, maintenance, installation or replacement of existing, built-in or per-
[170]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
manently connected appliances, fluorescent ballasts or  similar equipment and to employ individuals
to engage in that work. This subsection does not authorize the installation of appliances,  ballasts
or other equipment if there is no existing installation of similar equipment. A person qualifies under
this subsection if the person:
(a) Submits proof satisfactory to the board  that the person has had sufficient experience in the
type of work permitted under the license issued under this subsection; and
(b) Maintains with the board a current list of all individuals employed by the  person to engage
in work permitted under this subsection.
(13) A limited pump installation specialty contractor  license to a person who qualifies under this
subsection.  A  person licensed under this subsection is authorized to engage in electrical work re-
lated to the testing, repair, service, maintenance, installation or replacement  of new or existing
pump equipment for potable or irrigation water systems, sump pumps, effluent pumps and  ground
water pumps on residential and agricultural property and  to employ individuals to engage in such
work. A person qualifies under this subsection if the person:
(a) Submits proof satisfactory to the board  that the person has had sufficient experience in the
type of work permitted under the license issued under this subsection; and
(b) Maintains with the board a current list of all individuals employed by the  person to engage
in work permitted under this subsection.
(14) A limited residential electrician’s license to a person who qualifies under  this subsection.
A person licensed under this subsection is authorized to perform the  class of electrical work in-
cluded in the branch of the electrical trade for  which the person has passed the examination ad-
ministered by the department and approved by the board. However, a person licensed  under this
subsection shall perform the electrical work  allowed by the license only on single and multifamily
dwelling units not exceeding three floors above grade.  For purposes of this subsection, the first floor
of a building is the floor that is designed for  human habitation and that has 50 percent or more of
its perimeter  level with or above finished grade of the exterior wall line. A person qualifies under
this subsection if the person:
(a) Has received the same number  of hours of electrical safety training as required by rule for
an electrical apprentice or its equivalent and has received training in electrical theory;
(b) Submits documented proof to the board of at least two years  of apprenticeship or trainee
experience in residential wiring of single and multifamily dwelling units  or its equivalent, as deter-
mined by the board by rule; and
(c) Passes a written examination prepared by the board and administered by the department.
(15) A limited renewable energy contractor license to a person who:
(a) Employs at least one full-time renewable energy technician; and
(b) Does not engage in electrical work other  than work that may be performed by a limited
renewable  energy  technician. A limited renewable energy contractor may not make, direct, supervise
or control  the making of an electrical installation unless the contractor is licensed for that activity.
(16) A limited renewable energy technician license to a  person who qualifies under this sub-
section. A person qualifies for licensing as a limited renewable energy technician if  the person
completes a two-year  apprenticeship program and passes an examination approved by the board. A
person licensed under this subsection may, while in the employ of  a licensed electrical contractor
or a limited renewable energy contractor:
(a) Install, maintain, replace or repair electrical wiring and  electrical products that convey or
operate on renewable electrical energy not exceeding 25 kilowatts AC; and
[171]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Make electrical installations not exceeding 25 kilowatts AC:
(A) On devices using renewable energy involving  wind, solar energy systems, micro-
hydroelectricity, photovoltaic systems or fuel cells.
(B) Up to the load side of an inverter.
(C) To connect generators that are sized to facilitate the inverter in an off-grid system.
SECTION 287.
 ORS 479.632 is amended to read:
479.632. Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS  479.510 to 479.945 or any rule adopted by
the Electrical  and Elevator Board under ORS 455.117, the board may not administer an examination
to, and the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may not issue  any li-
cense to, a person whose practical experience  qualification for the license is based upon training
or experience in another state if the board determines that the training or experience  is not equiv-
alent to the standards for electrical training programs prescribed in this state.
SECTION 288. ORS 479.730 is amended to read:
479.730. In compliance with ORS chapter 183 [ the Director of ] the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes , with the approval of the Electrical and Elevator  Board, shall
adopt reasonable rules:
(1) Establishing, altering or revoking minimum safety  standards for workmanship and materials
in various classifications of electrical installations.
(2) Establishing, altering or  revoking electrical product safety standards for design and con-
struction of electrical products to  be installed in this state. The standards may allow the certifica-
tion of electrical products that a testing  laboratory approved by the Director  of the Department
of Building Codes  and the board under ORS 479.760 has tested and found to be safe within  the
electrical product safety standards established under this subsection.
(3) Relating to the procedure for certifying  and decertifying electrical products to be installed
in this state. The department [ of Consumer and Business Services ], with the approval of the  board,
may limit the type of electrical products it accepts for certification under ORS 479.760 (3).
(4) Prescribing times, places and circumstances that permits shall be exhibited for inspection.
(5) Governing the internal organization and  procedure for administering and enforcing ORS
479.510 to 479.945 and 479.995.
(6) Establishing, altering,  approving or revoking minimum standards for electrical training pro-
grams.
(7)(a) Establishing which electrical products may  be field evaluated by a field evaluation firm
rather than certified;
(b) Establishing cost-based fees, requirements and procedures  for approving, maintaining and
suspending or revoking approvals of field evaluation firms;
(c) Establishing:
(A) Requirements and procedures for the field evaluation of electrical products; and
(B) Requirements and procedures for issuing field evaluation labels for the electrical  products
evaluated by field evaluation firms and testing laboratories;
(d) Establishing requirements and  procedures for preparation of reports regarding installation
safety issued by field evaluation firms;
(e) Establishing when an  inspecting jurisdiction may require a report from a field evaluation
firm; and
(f) Establishing other requirements as necessary to carry out this subsection.
SECTION 289.
 ORS 479.740 is amended to read:
[172]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
479.740. (1)  In adopting rules under ORS 479.730 the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes shall consider:
(a) Technological advances in the electrical industry.
(b) The practicability of following the standards under consideration, if adopted.
(c) The probability, extent and gravity of  the injury to the public or property [ which] that  would
result from failure to follow the standards under consideration.
(d) Safety standards followed, proposed or approved  by responsible members of the electrical
industry.
(2) After considering the factors in subsection (1) of this  section, the department may incorpo-
rate by  reference proposed safety standards of the electrical industry or independent organizations.
The department may formulate and adopt  independent safety standards if standards proposed by the
industry and independent organizations are not acceptable to [ it] the department .
SECTION 290.
 ORS 479.760 is amended to read:
479.760. (1) An electrical product may not be certified unless the product meets electrical prod-
uct safety standards established in rule  by concurrence of the Electrical and Elevator Board and the
[Director of the ] Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(2) Any person may apply to have the department [ of Consumer and Business  Services ] certify
an electrical product. The department shall certify an electrical  product if the product is shown to
meet electrical product safety standards by one of the following methods:
(a) An equipment safety program approved by the board;
(b) Equipment minimum safety  standards established by concurrence of the board and the [ di-
rector] department;
(c) An evaluation by an approved field evaluation firm;
(d) A listing from a nationally recognized testing laboratory;
(e) An evaluation of a first model of a product by the board; or
(f) Any other method approved by the board.
(3) To have an electrical product certified, a  person may submit a specimen, sample or prototype
to the department within a reasonable time before the date on which  certification will be required,
together with a fee set by the department sufficient to defray the cost of  shipment and evaluation.
The department shall evaluate the  electrical product to determine whether the product meets elec-
trical product safety standards. Not  later than six months after receipt of a specimen, prototype or
sample the department shall complete the required evaluation and give a decision certifying or  re-
jecting the product. The department may appoint a special deputy or enter  into an appropriate
contract with a testing laboratory approved by the board under this  section for the evaluation re-
quired under this subsection.
(4) The Director  of the Department of Building Codes  with the  approval of the board may
establish standards and procedures for the approval of testing laboratories to  test electrical pro-
ducts in the certification process under this section.
SECTION 291.
 ORS 479.770 is amended to read:
479.770. No person shall sell or offer for sale in this state  any new gas-fired, forced-air central
space heating equipment, clothes dryer, domestic range or new gas-fired swimming  pool heaters,
unless such  equipment, heater, dryer or range is equipped with an electric ignition pilot that com-
plies with the  rules of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes adopted
pursuant to ORS 479.740.
SECTION 292. ORS 479.810 is amended to read:
[173]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
479.810. (1) The  Electrical and Elevator Board shall administer and enforce ORS 479.510 to
479.945 and 479.995. The Director of the Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes shall appoint an adequate staff of  competent persons experienced and trained to serve as
electrical  inspectors. The board shall assist the director in reviewing determinations made by the
staff involving electrical installations or products and [ to] assist the Department of Building
Codes in formulating rules under ORS 479.730.
(2) The director, in consultation with the board, shall appoint a  representative of the
department’s staff of electrical inspectors who shall  serve ex officio as secretary of the board. This
person shall be known as the Chief Electrical Inspector.
(3) The director shall certify a person as an electrical inspector if:
(a) The person:
(A) Completes a general journeyman electrical apprenticeship program in Oregon;
(B) Has two years’ experience as a licensed electrician in Oregon; and
(C) Passes the examination required for certification as a supervising electrician; or
(b) For a person with experience outside the State of Oregon, the person:
(A)(i) Has five years’ experience in commercial or industrial electrical inspection; and
(ii) Passes the examination required for certification as a general supervising electrician; or
(B) Has six years of out-of-state experience as an electrician  and passes the examination re-
quired for certification as a general supervising electrician.
(4) The  board may, by rule, allow certification of persons as electrical inspectors with experi-
ence or training that does not meet the requirements specified in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Rules adopted under this section shall  provide for the recognition of equivalent experience
acquired by a person outside the State of Oregon.
(6) An examination taken for purposes of applying for certification as an  electrical inspector
under this section shall  not be valid for use in an application to become licensed as a supervising
electrician.
SECTION 293.
 ORS 479.815 is amended to read:
479.815. The [ Director of  the ] Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes,
with the approval of the Electrical and Elevator Board, may  adopt rules regulating or prohibiting
conflicts of interest for electrical inspectors in  regard to any work performed by an inspector or a
related party under a license issued under ORS 479.630.
SECTION 294. ORS 479.820 is amended to read:
479.820. (1) The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes shall:
(a) Check the authenticity, appropriateness and expiration dates of licenses issued under ORS
479.510 to 479.945.
(b) Inspect electrical installations and products for which  a permit or license is required by ORS
479.510 to 479.945.
(c) Inspect permits attached to electrical installations or  products for which a permit is required
by ORS 479.510 to 479.945.
(2) If the department  finds that the electrical installation or product fails to comply with mini-
mum safety standards or electrical product safety standards, the department may disconnect  or or-
der the disconnection of service thereto.
(3) If the department finds that the condition of an electrical  installation or product constitutes
an immediate hazard to life or property,  the department may cut or disconnect any wire necessary
to remove such hazard or take corrective action as provided by rules adopted under ORS 479.730.
[174]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) Upon  written request of appropriate municipal personnel, the department may make in-
spections of electrical installations and products within  cities and counties. Such inspections shall
be made at cost, in accordance with local municipal ordinances, payable on a monthly basis.
(5) For  the purpose of discharging any duty imposed by ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and 479.995 or
exercising authority conferred hereby  the department may enter, during reasonable hours, any
building, enclosure, or upon any premises where  electrical work is in progress, where an electrical
installation has been made or where electrical equipment or products may be located.
(6) A person may not obstruct or interfere  with the department in performance of any of the
department’s duties or the exercise of any authority conferred under this section.
SECTION 295. ORS 479.840 is amended to read:
479.840. (1) Upon receiving payment of  the applicable application fee, the Department of [ Con-
sumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may issue  or renew a license or permit applied for
under ORS 479.510 to 479.945. The fee to apply for or renew a license is:
(a) $125 per year for an electrical contractor license for each place of  business operated by the
applicant.
(b) $125 per year for a limited energy contractor, restricted energy contractor or limited sign
contractor license.
(c) $25 per  year for a pump specialty contractor or limited maintenance specialty contractor li-
cense.
(d) $150 per year for an elevator contractor license.
(e) $100 for a three-year license for a:
(A) General journeyman electrician;
(B) General supervising electrician;
(C) Limited supervising industrial electrician;
(D) Limited supervising manufacturing plant electrician;
(E) Limited maintenance industrial electrician;
(F) Limited maintenance manufactured dwelling or recreational vehicle electrician; or
(G) Limited journeyman manufacturing plant electrician.
(f) $50 for a three-year license for a:
(A) Limited elevator journeyman;
(B) Class A or Class B limited energy technician;
(C) Limited journeyman sign electrician;
(D) Limited journeyman stage electrician; or
(E) Limited building maintenance electrician.
(2) The Electrical and  Elevator Board shall set uniform permit fees, by rule, not to exceed the
cost of administration.
(3) The fees provided for in this section do  not apply to persons paying inspection fees under the
terms of ORS 479.560 (3) or 479.630 (10).
(4) Each electrical contractor may furnish  to the department a corporate surety bond to be ap-
proved by the department, an irrevocable letter of credit  issued by an insured institution as defined
in ORS 706.008 or a cash bond under procedures  approved by the department, in the sum of $2,000
guaranteeing the payment of  all fees provided for under ORS 479.510 to 479.945. Before commencing
any electrical job an electrical  contractor who has a current bond or letter of credit under this
subsection may apply to the department for a working permit [ which] that  shall cost  an amount
established by the department by rule. The working permit shall authorize the  electrical contractor
[175]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to commence work. The  total of all fees due for permits for each job, and the time such fees are
payable, shall be determined by the department by administrative  rule under ORS 479.730. The
contractor shall keep the bond or letter of credit  in force at all times. Any cancellation or revoca-
tion of the  bond or letter of credit shall revoke and suspend the license issued to the principal until
such time as a new bond or letter of credit shall  be filed and approved. The department may bring
an action against the surety named in the bond or the letter of credit issuer with or without joining
in such action the principal named in the bond or letter of credit.
SECTION 296.
 ORS 479.850 is amended to read:
479.850. All receipts from civil penalties,  fees, charges, costs and expenses provided for in ORS
455.895 (1)(b), 479.510 to 479.945, 479.990 and 479.995 when collected shall be:
(1) Paid into the [ Consumer and  Business Services Fund created by ORS 705.145 ] Department
of Building Codes Fund; and
(2) Used only for the enforcement and administration of ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and 479.995.
SECTION 297.
 ORS 479.853 is amended to read:
479.853. If any person is aggrieved by a  decision made upon inspection under authority of ORS
455.148, 455.150 or 479.510 to  479.945 and 479.995 of an electrical product or electrical inspection,
the person may appeal the decision. The following apply to an appeal under this section:
(1) An appeal under this section is subject to ORS chapter 183.
(2) An appeal under this section must be made first to the Chief  Electrical Inspector of the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes . The decision of the Chief Elec-
trical Inspector may  be appealed to the Electrical and Elevator Board. The decision of the Electrical
and Elevator Board may  be appealed to the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes only if codes in addition to the electrical code are at issue.
(3) If the Electrical and Elevator  Board determines that a decision by the Chief Electrical In-
spector is a major code interpretation, then the inspector shall distribute the decision in writing  to
all public and private electrical  inspection authorities in the state. The decision shall be distributed
within 60 days after the board’s determination, and there  shall be no charge for the distribution of
the decision. As used in this subsection, a “major code interpretation”  means a code interpretation
decision that affects or may affect more than one job site or more than one inspection jurisdiction.
(4) If an appeal is made under this section, an inspection  authority shall extend the electrical
plan review deadline by the number of days it takes for a final  decision to be issued for the appeal.
(5) Unless the Department of Building Codes  determines that the electrical  product or elec-
trical installation presents an immediate fire or life  safety hazard, a person may operate an elec-
trical product or electrical installation that is the subject of  an appeal under this section until the
appeal process is complete. If the department determines that an immediate  fire or life safety hazard
exists and  the product or installation may not be operated during appeal, the department shall pro-
vide the person with a written report detailing the problems found by the department. If a  determi-
nation is made under this subsection that products  described in ORS 479.540 (11) may not be
operated  during  appeal, that determination may be appealed immediately under the procedure es-
tablished in subsection (2) of this section without first completing any appeal procedure  established
by a city or county.
SECTION 298.
 ORS 479.854 is amended to read:
479.854. (1) A municipality may enact and enforce an ordinance requiring a  municipal general
supervising electrician’s license upon  the approval of the Electrical and Elevator Board and the
Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
[176]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The Electrical and Elevator Board and director may approve an ordinance  under subsection
(1) of this section  only if electrical installations within the municipality’s jurisdiction are of a unique
character beyond the education or experience of a general supervising electrician licensed under
ORS 479.630 (2), and the ordinance applies only to such installations.
(3) The director, after obtaining the opinion  of the board, shall revoke approval of an ordinance
upon a  finding that in issuing its general supervising electrician’s license, a municipality has en-
gaged in a pattern or practice of discrimination against electricians from outside the municipality.
SECTION 299.
 ORS 479.855 is amended to read:
479.855. (1) In addition to the provisions of ORS 455.010 to [ 455.310 and 455.410 to ] 455.740, any
inspection and enforcement program  established by a city or county under ORS 455.148 or 455.150
is subject to the  provisions of this section. Where the provisions of this section conflict with pro-
visions under ORS 455.010 to [ 455.310 and 455.410 to ] 455.740, the provisions of this section shall
control.
(2)(a) Except  as otherwise provided in this section, any city or county that wishes to establish
a program under ORS 455.150 to enforce and administer ORS  479.510 to 479.945 and 479.995, in-
cluding a program for inspection under  a master permit pursuant to ORS 479.560 (3), must first make
application to the Department of [ Consumer and Business  Services ] Building Codes . The program
for inspection under a master permit shall be delegated separately from the general electrical pro-
gram authorization. The department may authorize the  city or county to administer and enforce the
provisions of this section  and ORS 479.540 and 479.560 if it finds that the city or county can comply
with the minimum standards and meet the qualifications for inspections, permit applications and
other matters to  assure adequate administration and enforcement of electrical inspection programs.
The department may authorize the city or county to administer and enforce ORS 479.510 to  479.945
and 479.995 if the department finds that the city or county:
(A) Can comply with minimum standards adopted  by the Electrical and Elevator Board by rule
for inspections, permit applications and  other matters to assure adequate administration and
enforcement of ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and 479.995.
(B) Can conduct the electrical plan review, if required by the city or county,  in a timely manner
and by qualified personnel who meet the standards adopted by rule by the board.
(b) The city or county  must assume full responsibility allowed under ORS 455.010 to [ 455.310 and
455.410 to] 455.740 for the  enforcement, inspection and administration of the electrical safety laws
under that specialty code and ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and 479.995. This subsection does not require
a city or county to assume full responsibility for enforcement,  inspection and administration of the
electrical safety laws if the only  enforcement performed by the city or county involves manufactured
dwelling electrical utility connections.
(3) The department, subject to ORS chapter 183, shall revoke any authority  of a city or county
to carry on inspections, enforcement  or administration of electrical installations and electrical pro-
ducts under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 if  the department determines that the city or county fails to
comply with standards adopted by the board or otherwise is not effectively carrying out duties as-
sumed by the city or county under this section.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a city or county may not contract
with competing electrical contractors to provide permit inspection of electrical installations.
(b) A city or county may contract with competing electrical contractors to provide permit  in-
spection of electrical installations on a temporary basis by a supervising electrician if:
(A) Emergency circumstances exist; and
[177]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The city or county  has requested that the department perform permit inspections and the
department is unable to respond in a timely manner.
(c) Nothing in  this subsection prohibits a city or county from contracting with another city or
county to perform permit inspections of electrical installations by a supervising electrician.
(5) A city or county  that performs electrical installation inspections shall perform license
enforcement inspections as a part of routine installation inspections.
SECTION 300. ORS 479.860 is amended to read:
479.860. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person  who is the holder of a super-
vising electrician’s license:
(a) Who is employed by  the holder of an electrical contractor’s license may design, plan and lay
out electrical  installations for customers of the electrical contractor without obtaining any other
license, permit or certificate; or
(b) Who  is employed by an industrial plant may design, plan and lay out electrical installations
for that industrial plant.
(2) The  Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes, after
consultation with the Electrical and  Elevator Board and the State Board of Examiners for Engi-
neering and Land Surveying, may  adopt rules designating classes of board licensees that may design,
plan and lay out noncomplex electrical installations. Licensees are not subject  to any requirement
for an additional license, permit, certificate or registration when engaging in the  design, planning
or laying out of electrical installations as authorized by a rule adopted under this subsection.
SECTION 301. ORS 479.910 is amended to read:
479.910. (1) Upon payment of  an application or renewal fee, the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes shall issue  a Class B limited energy technician license to a per-
son who qualifies under ORS 479.915. A person licensed under this  section may perform limited en-
ergy electrical activity except protective signaling as defined in ORS 479.905.
(2) A person licensed under  this section shall comply with the permit and code compliance re-
quirements under ORS 479.510 to 479.945.
(3) The application fee, and the renewal fee, for a Class  B limited energy technician license are
the same as those for a Class A limited energy technician license.
(4) The Electrical and Elevator Board shall establish continuing education requirements  for
persons licensed under this section, not to exceed 24 hours of classes every three years.
SECTION 302. ORS 479.915 is amended to read:
479.915. (1) An applicant for a Class B limited energy technician license must:
(a) Submit proof satisfactory to the Electrical and Elevator Board that the person has:
(A) At least two years of experience as an apprentice in limited energy electrical activity; or
(B) At  least two years of experience equivalent to an apprenticeship in limited energy electrical
activity and completed a board-approved 32-hour training program; and
(b) Pass a written examination approved by the board and administered by the  Department of
[Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(2) An applicant for a Class A limited energy technician license must:
(a) Submit proof satisfactory to the board that the person has completed at least three  years of
experience as an apprentice, or the equivalent as determined by  the board by rule, in a recognized
branch of the electrical trade; and
(b) Pass a written examination prepared by the board and administered by the department.
(3) The board shall  determine the adequacy of any training program for qualification under the
[178]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
requirements of this section and ORS 479.910 and section 1, chapter 728, Oregon Laws 2001.
(4) The department shall issue a Class A limited energy technician license to a person  who
qualifies under subsection (2) of this section and pays the required fees.
SECTION 303. ORS 479.950 is amended to read:
479.950. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 479.510  to 479.945, 479.995 and 824.045, the Director of the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes  shall adopt rules establishing,
amending or repealing minimum safety  standards for workmanship and materials for, and the design
and construction  of electrical products used in, traction electrification and electrical communi-
cations  and  electrical signaling installations for rail fixed guideway systems operated by a mass
transit district established under ORS 267.010 to 267.390. The rules adopted  by the director under
this subsection  shall be the exclusive rules adopted for this state that establish minimum safety
standards for workmanship  and materials for, and the design and construction of electrical products
used in, traction electrification and electrical communications and electrical  signaling installations
for rail fixed guideway systems operated by a mass transit district.
(2) Before adopting rules under subsection (1) of this section, the director  [ of the Department of
Consumer and Business Services ] shall consider:
(a) Technological advances in the rail fixed guideway industry.
(b) The practicability of following the standards under consideration, if adopted.
(c) The probability, extent and gravity of the injury  to the public or to property that will result
from failure to follow the standards under consideration.
(d) Safety standards followed, proposed or approved  by responsible members of the rail fixed
guideway industry.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 479.510 to 479.945, 479.995 and 824.045, the  Department of [ Consumer
and Business Services ] Building Codes is designated as the state agency to administer and enforce
the standards established by the director [ of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services ]
under this section. The department shall adopt  rules establishing procedures for the administration
and enforcement of such standards.
SECTION 304.
 ORS 480.432 is amended to read:
480.432. (1) A person may not engage in  or work at the business of installing, extending, altering
or repairing any LP gas appliance or piping, vent or flue connection pertaining to or in connection
with LP gas installations within the state, either as  employer or individual, unless the person has
received an LP gas installation license from the State Fire Marshal in accordance with  ORS 480.410
to 480.460.
(2) A person may not do any LP gas fitting or gas  venting work, install, repair or remodel any
piping or venting or do any installation, repair service, connection or disconnection of  any LP gas
appliance that is subject to inspection under ORS 480.410 to 480.460 unless the  person has received
an LP gas fitter license from the State Fire Marshal in accordance with ORS 480.410 to 480.460.
(3) A person may not  operate any LP gas delivery equipment installed on a motorized vehicle
unless the person has received an LP gas  truck equipment license from the State Fire Marshal in
accordance with ORS 480.410 to 480.460.
(4) Any person under  the terms of this section who is required to have an LP gas fitter or LP
gas truck equipment license is also required to have  an LP gas installation license, unless the per-
son is an employee  of an employer who has an LP gas installation license as provided by this sec-
tion.
(5) A person who holds a  valid journeyman plumber license under ORS 693.060 or who is in an
[179]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
approved journeyman plumber apprenticeship established under ORS 660.002 to 660.210 is  exempt
from the licensing requirements of subsections (1) and (2)  of this section, except that the apprentice
or journeyman plumber may not install an LP  gas tank or make any connection to an LP gas tank
unless the apprentice or journeyman plumber is licensed as required under this section.
(6) A person who holds a license issued  by the Department of [ Consumer and Business
Services] Building Codes under ORS  480.630 of a class that authorizes the person to fabricate, in-
stall, alter  or repair pressure piping and to install boilers and pressure vessels by attachment of
piping connector is exempt from the licensing requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
except that the person may not install an LP gas tank or make any connection to an LP  gas tank
unless the person is licensed as required under this section.
(7) Subsections (1) to (4) of this section do  not apply to LP gas installations in a manufactured
dwelling or recreational vehicle performed during the construction of the manufactured dwelling  or
recreational vehicle, or the alteration or repair of  an LP gas installation in a manufactured dwelling
or recreational vehicle made pursuant to the manufacturer’s warranty.
SECTION 305.
 ORS 480.450 is amended to read:
480.450. (1) The installer shall notify the State Fire Marshal, before  the last day of each month,
of all new installations made during the preceding month of containers or receptacles  for liquefied
petroleum gas, including installations for private homes and apartments. The installer  shall certify
on a form provided by the State Fire Marshal that all of the new installations are  duly and properly
reported. The State Fire Marshal  may require that the notification include the location and de-
scription of the installation and  the name of the user. All fees due and payable must accompany the
notification. The replacement of empty containers  or receptacles with other containers constructed
in accordance with United States Department of Transportation  specifications is not a new instal-
lation or change in the original  installation that requires notification to the State Fire Marshal or
necessitates further inspection of  the installation. The State Fire Marshal shall collect from the in-
staller an installation  fee of $50 for each tank installed or for all tanks at the installation if the total
combined capacity is 200 gallons or less. The State Fire Marshal or deputies of the  fire marshal or
assistants shall inspect a reasonable number of the installations and  maintain a record of the in-
spections in the office of the State Fire Marshal.
(2) In addition to any installation or inspection fee, the State Fire Marshal may charge a plan
review fee, not to exceed $100, for any liquefied petroleum gas container and receptacle  plan review
required under a uniform fire code prescribed by the State Fire Marshal by rule.
(3) After the  initial installation, liquefied petroleum gas containers may be inspected once every
10 years except when changes have been made in  the original installation. An installer making
changes must notify the State Fire Marshal of the changes in the same  manner provided in this
section for new installations. The State Fire Marshal shall collect from the owner a fee of $50 for
the inspection of each container. The manner of inspection, requirement of  corrections, satisfaction
of requirements and collection of fees due and payable must conform with the  provisions of ORS
480.410 to 480.460 for  new installations. Upon request of the State Fire Marshal, LP gas installation
licensees shall furnish a list of the locations of 10-year old installations that they service.
(4) If, upon inspection of any tank, the new  installation does not comply with the requirements
of the State Fire Marshal, the State  Fire Marshal shall instruct the installer as to what corrections
are necessary for compliance with the State Fire Marshal’s requirements. The installer of the new
installation shall, within the time set by the State Fire Marshal, not  to exceed 60 days after notifi-
cation, notify the State Fire Marshal that  the new installation complies with the requirements of the
[180]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
fire marshal. If the installer fails to notify the State Fire Marshal, or the State Fire Marshal  has
reason to believe that the corrections have not been made,  the State Fire Marshal shall reinspect
the new installation and shall collect from the installer an additional fee of $125. The user, not the
installer, shall pay the additional fee resulting from actions of the user  that require correction to
achieve compliance with the requirements of the State Fire Marshal.
(5) A person who receives notice from the State Fire Marshal must correct any  improper in-
stallation within the time set by the State Fire Marshal,  not to exceed 60 days after receipt of the
notice.
(6) If the fees provided for  in this section are due and payable and are not paid within 30 days
after service of written notice  by the State Fire Marshal therefor, or if the installer fails to notify
the State  Fire Marshal by the last day of the month succeeding the month a new installation is made
or a change is made  requiring an inspection, the fees are delinquent and a penalty equal to the
greater of 10 percent of the fee amount  or $30, is imposed for the delinquency. The State Fire
Marshal shall collect all fees and penalties in the name of the State of Oregon in the same manner
that other debts are collected.
(7) The provisions of this section do not apply  to liquefied petroleum gas installations if made
entirely within the jurisdiction of a governmental subdivision granted  the exemption provided by
ORS 476.030 (3) and written evidence of the licensing of the  installation by the approved authority
is submitted to the State Fire Marshal. The provisions of this section  do not apply to LP gas in-
stallations made in  manufactured dwellings or recreational vehicles that are constructed or altered
in accordance with applicable rules of  the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building
Codes.
SECTION 306.
 ORS 480.515 is amended to read:
480.515. As used in ORS 480.510 to 480.670, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Alteration” means a change or addition to equipment, other than the  ordinary repair or
replacement of an existing part of the equipment.
(2) “Board” means the Board of Boiler Rules created under ORS 480.535.
(3) “Boiler” or “boilers” means:
(a) A closed vessel  or vessels intended for the heating or vaporizing of liquids to be used ex-
ternally to such vessel or vessels by the application of heat from combustible fuels,  electricity or
nuclear energy;
(b) Related appurtenances including but  not limited to pressure piping directly connected and
related to the safe operation of a boiler; and
(c) Pressure piping consisting of boiler or  nonboiler external piping connected to a boiler, but
not potable water nonboiler external piping.
(4) “Boiler external piping” has the meaning given the term  in the 1986 Pressure Piping Code
B 31.1, adopted by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers.
(5) “Certificate of competency” means a certificate issued under the provisions of ORS  480.565
(3).
(6) “Department” means the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(7) “Director” means the  Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes.
(8) “Installation permit” means a permit issued by the department for the  installation, alteration
or repair of a boiler or pressure vessel.
(9) “Minimum  safety standards” means the rules, regulations, formulae, definitions and inter-
[181]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
pretations for the safe construction,  installation, operation and repair of boilers and pressure vessels
either adopted by ORS 480.510 to 480.670 or adopted by the board, under ORS 480.510 to 480.670.
(10) “Nonboiler external piping” has the meaning given the term in  the 1986 Pressure Piping
Code B 31.1, adopted by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers.
(11) “Operating permit” means a permit issued by the  department authorizing the operation of
a boiler or pressure vessel.
(12) “Pressure vessel”  means containers for the containment of pressure, either internal or ex-
ternal. This pressure may be obtained from an external source or by the application of heat from  a
direct or indirect source, or any combination thereof.
(13) “Related appurtenances” means any equipment instrumental to the safe operation of a boiler
or pressure vessel.
(14) “Shop inspection”  means an inspection at a boiler or pressure vessel manufacturing, con-
struction or repair facility.
(15) “Temporary operation authorization” means an authorization issued by the department to
operate a boiler or pressure vessel for a specified period  pending the issuance of an operating per-
mit.
SECTION 307. ORS 480.520 is amended to read:
480.520. The purpose of ORS 480.510 to 480.670 is to protect the safety of the  people of Oregon
and to protect property situated in Oregon from the hazard of fires and explosions  caused by boilers
and pressure vessels. To accomplish this purpose the Legislative Assembly intends by ORS  480.510
to 480.670 to provide a system:
(1) For determining where and by whom boilers  and pressure vessels are being constructed, in-
stalled, repaired, used and operated.
(2) To ensure that only qualified persons do welding on boilers and on pressure vessels.
(3) To  ensure that boilers and pressure vessels are manufactured, installed, repaired, operated,
inspected  and  maintained so as to meet the minimum safety standards formulated and promulgated
by the Board of Boiler Rules.
(4) For the  administration and enforcement of ORS 480.510 to 480.670 by the Department of
[Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes and the board.
(5) To defray the cost of administration and the cost of enforcing ORS 480.510 to 480.670  by
establishing fees to be charged for:
(a) Issuing operating permits;
(b) Issuing installation permits;
(c) Giving examinations; and
(d) Making inspections.
SECTION 308.
 ORS 480.525 is amended to read:
480.525. (1) ORS 480.510 to 480.670 do not apply to:
(a) Boilers and pressure vessels under federal safety regulations or control.
(b) Domestic  water heaters designed for heating potable water, equipped with an approved
pressure-relieving device, containing only water and that do not exceed a:
(A) Capacity of 120 gallons;
(B) Water temperature of 210 degrees Fahrenheit;
(C) Pressure of 150 pounds per square inch gauge pressure; or
(D) Heat input of 200,000 BTU per hour.
(c) Domestic water heaters designed to create hot water instantaneously on demand without  the
[182]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
use of a storage tank.
(d) Pressure vessels containing liquefied petroleum gas that are under  the jurisdiction of the
State Fire  Marshal. However, the construction and repair of the vessels must comply with ORS
480.510 to 480.670 and are under the jurisdiction of the Board of Boiler Rules.
(e) Air tanks used in the operation of  brakes on self-propelled vehicles and trailers that are used
for transporting freight or passengers.
(f) Medical sterilizers that do not exceed one and one-half cubic feet in volume.
(g) Pressure vessels that do not exceed one and one-half cubic feet in volume and:
(A) Are not operated at gauge pressure of more than 150 pounds per square inch;
(B) Are equipped with a relief valve;
(C) Are approved under the American Society of Mechanical Engineers code  adopted by the
board;
(D) Are set at a maximum pressure of 150 pounds per square inch or less; and
(E) Are located in a place of public assembly.
(h) Pressure vessels that do not exceed five cubic feet in volume and:
(A) Are not operated at gauge pressure of more than 150 pounds per square inch;
(B) Are equipped with a relief valve;
(C) Are approved under  the American Society of Mechanical Engineers code adopted by the
board; and
(D) Are set at a maximum pressure of 150 pounds per square inch or less.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1)  of this section, if the board, upon presentation of satisfactory
evidence, determines that danger to  health or safety is evident in any pressure vessel or class of
pressure vessels exempted under subsection (1)(g) of  this section, the board may require the in-
spection or reinspection of the pressure vessel or class  of pressure vessels and make the pressure
vessel or class of pressure vessels subject to the fee, construction or other requirements of  ORS
480.510 to 480.670.
(3) The following boilers and pressure vessels are  exempt from ORS 480.510 to 480.670, except
as to all provisions relating to construction, installation, alteration or repair and to installation
permits:
(a) Boilers that are not operated at gauge pressures of  more than 15 pounds per square inch and
that are located on farms and used solely for agricultural purposes except  when used in connection
with a greenhouse.
(b) Air tanks located on farms and used solely for agricultural purposes.
(c) Boilers and pressure vessels that  are located in private residences and may be inspected only
by a boiler inspector.
(d) Pressure vessels being operated at gauge pressures  of less than 15 pounds per square inch
and equipped with a pressure relief device  set to open at a pressure that does not exceed the lesser
of the pressure vessel’s maximum allowed working  pressure or 15 pounds per square inch gauge
pressure.
(4)(a) Beverage service  tanks that have a product volume of five cubic feet or less are exempt
from ORS 480.510 to 480.670.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of  this subsection, beverage service tanks that have a
product  volume  of more than five cubic feet are exempt from ORS 480.510 to 480.670, except as to
provisions relating to installation  permits and installation inspections. The installation permit fee
for a beverage service tank is $50.
[183]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) All portable beverage tanks are exempt from ORS 480.510 to 480.670.
(5) The Director of the  Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may
adopt rules identifying boilers and  pressure vessels used in single family dwellings or other struc-
tures that may be inspected by an inspector certified under ORS 455.715 to 455.740 for a specialty
code other than the code adopted under ORS 480.545. The boilers and pressure vessels identified in
the rules shall be subject to inspection upon  installation, alteration or repair, but be exempt from
periodic inspection under ORS 480.560 and from the operating permit requirements of ORS 480.585.
(6) Notwithstanding any requirement of ORS 480.510  to 480.670 or the state building code, the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may adopt rules granting partial
or complete exemption from ORS 480.510 to 480.670 for a boiler or pressure  vessel if the board de-
termines that the boiler or pressure vessel  does not present a danger to public health or safety
within this state.
SECTION 309.
 ORS 480.530 is amended to read:
480.530. The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may:
(1) Where it appears that a person is engaging in or is  about to engage in an act or practice in
violation of any provision  of ORS 480.510 to 480.670, obtain without furnishing a bond, a restraining
order and injunction from the circuit court in the county where the  act or practice is occurring, or
is threatened, enjoining the act or practice. However, before  obtaining a restraining order and in-
junction,  unless  the act or practice constitutes an immediate threat to health and safety, the de-
partment shall first notify the person concerned  of the department’s intentions. The notice shall be
in writing, shall advise the person concerned of the department’s intentions and  shall advise the
person concerned of the right to appeal in writing within 10 days  and that the appeal will be heard
by the Board of Boiler Rules. In case there is a timely request for  an appeal, proceedings will be
stayed pending the appeal, unless the act or practice constitutes an immediate menace to health or
safety or the person concerned fails to prosecute the appeal with diligence.
(2) Keep a complete record of the types,  dimensions, maximum allowable working pressures, age,
location and date of the last recorded inspection of all  boilers and pressure vessels to which ORS
480.510 to 480.670 apply.
(3) Publish and distribute copies  of the rules and codes applicable to boilers and pressure ves-
sels.
(4) Check or cause to be checked the authenticity, appropriateness and expiration dates  of li-
censes and certificates issued under ORS 480.510 to 480.670.
(5) Administer written, oral or practical examinations to all applicants for certification  as chief
boiler inspector, deputy inspector or special inspector under ORS 480.565.
SECTION 310.
 ORS 480.535 is amended to read:
480.535. (1) The Board of  Boiler Rules is established in the Department of [ Consumer and Busi-
ness Services ] Building Codes . The  Governor shall appoint the board .[, which ] The board  shall
formulate and promulgate rules under ORS 480.510 to  480.670 for the safe construction, installation,
inspection,  operation,  maintenance and repair of boilers and pressure vessels in this state and re-
view determinations made by its staff concerning boilers and pressure vessels.
(2) Eleven persons shall constitute the board, consisting of:
(a) One person who is an owner and user or who is a representative and employee  of an owner
and user of a high pressure boiler in Oregon and who has had practical  experience with high pres-
sure boilers;
(b) One person who is a manufacturer or who is a representative  and employee of a manufac-
[184]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
turer of boilers or of pressure vessels in Oregon;
(c) One person who is  regularly engaged in the inspection of boilers and pressure vessels and
who is employed by  an insurer who may and does write policies of boiler and pressure vessels ex-
plosion insurance in Oregon;
(d) One person who is a mechanical engineer registered by the State of Oregon;
(e) One person who is a boilermaker;
(f) One person who is the owner and user or who is  a representative and employee of an owner
and user of a low pressure boiler in Oregon;
(g) One person who is  the owner and user or who is a representative and employee of an owner
and user of a pressure vessel in Oregon and who  has had practical experience with pressure vessels;
(h) One person who is an owner or  employee of a business engaged in the installation and repair
of boilers;
(i) One person who is a steamfitter;
(j) One person who is a practical steam operating engineer; and
(k) One person who is a member of the public  not otherwise eligible for appointment to the
board.
(3) A member of the board who does not continue to meet  the qualifications for board member-
ship under subsection (2)  of this section during the member’s term may not be appointed to a sub-
sequent term.
(4) The  appointment of a member of the board is subject to confirmation by the Senate pursuant
to section 4, Article III of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 311.
 ORS 480.545 is amended to read:
480.545. (1) Under ORS chapter 183 the Board of Boiler Rules may adopt and enforce rules  and
minimum safety standards to carry out ORS 480.510  to 480.670 and adopt standards for persons
performing welding on boilers and pressure vessels.
(2) All  proceedings in the administration of ORS 480.510 to 480.670 shall be conducted under
ORS chapter 183 and, additionally, where applicable, under ORS 480.615.
(3) In addition to the rules otherwise provided, and subject to ORS chapter  183, the board shall
adopt rules concerning the times, dates, frequency and manner  of giving notice to interested persons
of intention to consider one or more [ of the things  which the board may consider ] matters  under this
section.
(4) All rules and minimum safety standards adopted under this section shall be reasonable and
in substantial  conformity with generally accepted nationwide engineering standards. In adopting
rules the board  shall consider the probability, extent and gravity of injuries to health and property
[which] that  would  result from the failure to adopt the standards being considered and the standards
followed, proposed or approved by members of affected industries.
(5) The board shall adopt rules establishing a continuing education  requirement for persons de-
scribed in ORS 480.630 (8) and fees necessary for the  administration and enforcement of the con-
tinuing education requirement.
(6) Any rule adopted by the board under  ORS 480.510 to 480.670 shall be submitted to the Di-
rector of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes. The director shall
have 30 calendar days from the date of adoption of the rules to  review them. If the director fails to
disapprove the rules within the 30-day period,  the rules become effective in accordance with their
terms and as provided by law. If the director disapproves the rules within  the 30-day period, the
rules immediately shall be returned to  the board with the director’s written objections, and the rules
[185]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
do not become effective until approved by the director.
SECTION 312. ORS 480.565 is amended to read:
480.565. The Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes
shall:
(1) Appoint a chief boiler inspector who has had  practical experience in the construction,
maintenance, repair or operation of  high pressure boilers and pressure vessels as a mechanical en-
gineer, practical steam operating engineer, boilermaker or boiler inspector and who:
(a) Has passed a written examination, [ which] that  shall be confined to questions the answers
to which will aid in determining the fitness and competency  of the applicant to inspect boilers and
pressure vessels; or
(b) Holds a certificate  of competency as an inspector of boilers and pressure vessels issued by
a state that has standards of examination equal to  those of the State of Oregon and that recognizes
certificates of competency issued by the State of Oregon, and has passed  an examination that as-
sesses the applicant’s knowledge of ORS 480.510 to 480.670 and the rules adopted thereunder.
(2) Appoint deputy  inspectors who shall be responsible to the chief boiler inspector and who
shall have qualified as provided in  subsection (1) of this section, except that less practical experi-
ence shall be required.
(3) Issue a certificate  of competency as a special inspector to any individual who qualifies as
provided in subsection (1) of this section, except that no more practical experience shall  be required
than is required of a deputy inspector, and who is continuously employed by:
(a) An insurer who may and  does write policies of boiler and pressure vessel insurance in
Oregon; or
(b) Any person operating pressure vessels in this state  whose service, personnel, equipment and
supervision meet the requirements prescribed by the Board of Boiler Rules.
SECTION 313. ORS 480.570 is amended to read:
480.570. (1) A  special inspector receiving a certificate of competency under ORS 480.565 (3)(b)
may not inspect under ORS 480.510 to  480.670 any boiler or pressure vessel not used or not to be
used by the employer of the special inspector.
(2) If a special inspector holds  a certificate of competency issued under ORS 480.565 (3)(a), the
special  inspector:
(a) May conduct shop inspections of boilers and  pressure vessels manufactured or to be installed
in this state whether  or not the boilers or pressure vessels are insured or will be insured by the
employer of the special inspector; and
(b) Upon being notified that the boilers or pressure vessels are ready for inspection, shall  per-
form all  installation and operating inspections required under ORS 480.510 to 480.670 on boilers and
pressure vessels that are operated or insured by the special inspector’s employer.
(3) A boiler contractor licensed under ORS 480.630 that performs an  alteration or repair on a
boiler or pressure vessel shall utilize the services of:
(a) An authorized inspector certified under  this chapter with whom the contractor has an
agreement for inspection of the alteration or repair;
(b) A special inspector of  an insurance company with which the contractor has an inspection
contract; or
(c) A designated inspector who is authorized to inspect the alteration or repair.
(4) A special inspector’s  certificate of competency remains in force only while the special in-
spector is continuously employed by one of the persons mentioned in ORS 480.565 (3).
[186]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) If a boiler or pressure  vessel is inspected by a special inspector as provided in this section,
the boiler or pressure vessel is subject  to the installation permit and operating permit fees described
in ORS 480.600 (2) instead of the installation permit and operating  permit fees established under
ORS 480.595.
(6) The Department of [ Consumer and  Business Services ] Building Codes  may cause a deputy
inspector to inspect or reinspect all boilers and pressure vessels  that a special inspector is author-
ized or required  to inspect. However, the deputy inspector may not conduct an internal inspection
or reinspection unless:
(a) There is a question as to whether  or not the boiler or pressure vessel meets the minimum
safety standards; and
(b) The special  inspector who made the original inspection, or the employer of the special in-
spector,  is  given reasonable notice and opportunity to be present during the internal inspection or
reinspection.
(7) Subsections (1) to (6)  of this section do not apply to boilers or pressure vessels located in a
residential structure that contains fewer than six dwelling units.
SECTION 314. ORS 480.585 is amended to read:
480.585. (1) After a boiler or pressure vessel has successfully passed an installation  inspection,
the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may  issue a temporary opera-
tion authorization. The boiler or pressure vessel covered by the temporary operation  authorization
may only be operated during the period specified in the temporary operation authorization.
(2) An operating permit for  a boiler or pressure vessel shall specify the maximum pressure under
which the boiler or pressure vessel may be operated.
(3) The department may  at any time suspend or revoke an operating permit if the department
finds that  the boiler or pressure vessel, or related appurtenances, for which the permit was issued
does not comply with ORS 480.510 to 480.670. Suspension  of any permit continues in effect until the
vessel conforms to ORS 480.510 to 480.670 and  the permit is reissued. However, before suspending
or revoking a permit, the department shall first notify the person concerned of the department’s in-
tention. The notice must be in writing and  advise the person concerned of the right to appeal in
writing within 10 days and that the appeal will be heard by the  Board of Boiler Rules. If there is
a timely appeal, the department may not suspend  or revoke the permit pending the appeal unless the
reason for suspension or revocation constitutes an immediate menace to health or safety or the
person concerned fails to prosecute an appeal with diligence.
(4)(a) Except as provided in ORS 480.510 to 480.670, a person may not operate  a boiler or pres-
sure vessel unless a valid temporary operation authorization or valid operating  permit issued under
this section is attached to the boiler or pressure vessel  or posted in a conspicuous place in the room
where the boiler or pressure vessel is located.
(b) A person may not permit or suffer the operation of a boiler or pressure vessel on property
the person  owns, controls, manages or supervises unless a valid temporary operation authorization
or valid operating permit issued under this section is attached to the boiler or  pressure vessel or
posted in a conspicuous place in the room where the boiler or pressure vessel is located.
(c) The owner or lessee or person having possession of a boiler or pressure vessel may  not
permit or  suffer the operation of the boiler or pressure vessel unless a valid temporary operation
authorization or valid operating permit issued under this section is attached  to the boiler or pres-
sure vessel or posted in a conspicuous place in the room where the  boiler or pressure vessel is lo-
cated.
[187]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) The board may adopt rules waiving provisions of this section.
SECTION 315.
 ORS 480.595 is amended to read:
480.595. (1)  The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may adopt
rules regarding installation permits and operating permits. The rules may include, but need not be
limited to, rules creating standardized forms, establishing operating permit fees, establishing  permit
cycles and setting terms and conditions for permit validity.
(2) Upon timely receipt of an installation permit fee,  the department may issue an installation
permit, perform an installation inspection and issue a temporary operating authorization.
(3) Upon timely receipt of an  operating permit fee, the department may issue or renew an op-
erating permit and may perform a periodic inspection if required during the  operating permit cycle.
(4) Except as provided in ORS 480.525 and 480.600, installation permit fees are as follows:
(a) For boilers, $175.
(b) For pressure vessels, $125.
(5) Except as provided in ORS 480.600, maximum operating permit fees per year are as follows:
(a) Power boilers of 15 horsepower
or less $110
(b) Other boilers of 15 horsepower
or less $ 55
(c) Power boilers greater than 15
horsepower to 100 horsepower $110
(d) Other boilers greater than 15
horsepower to 100 horsepower $ 55
(e) Power boilers greater than 100
horsepower to 500 horsepower $110
(f) Other boilers greater than 100
horsepower to 500 horsepower $ 55
(g) Power boilers greater
than 500 horsepower $110
(h) Other boilers greater
than 500 horsepower $ 55
(i) Notwithstanding paragraphs
(a) to (h) of this subsection,
all cast iron boilers $ 55
(j) Pressure vessels having
a product volume of
20 cubic feet or less $ 50
(k) Pressure vessels having
a product volume
greater than 20 cubic feet $ 50
(6) For a reinspection, the fee is $75.
(7) For the submission  of plans and other pertinent data when required, for each boiler or
pressure vessel, the fee is $78.
SECTION 316.
 ORS 480.600 is amended to read:
480.600. (1)  For a quantity of boilers or pressure vessels operated at the same locations, each
operating permit fee under ORS 480.595 issued at the same location is $75.
[188]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 480.595 and except as provided in this subsection, the  installing, al-
tering or repairing contractor or the owner or  user of any boiler or pressure vessel that is inspected
under ORS 480.570 (1) or (2) shall pay an installation permit fee of $40 and an operating permit fee
of $40. The Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may establish operat-
ing permit  cycles by rule. The department may require payment of an installation or operating per-
mit fee as provided in ORS 480.595 if the department finds that the  boiler or pressure vessel is in
violation of the minimum safety standards.
(3) If an insurance company notifies its insured that the insurance company will no longer insure
a boiler or pressure vessel, or that insurance on a boiler  or pressure vessel is no longer in force,
the insurance company shall also notify the chief boiler inspector, in a  form and manner prescribed
by the chief boiler inspector,  of the description and vessel registration numbers of the boilers or
pressure vessels for which insurance is canceled or suspended or is not to be renewed.
(4) If an owner or user of a boiler or pressure vessel fails to pay any fee required by this chapter
within 90 days after the billing date, the department may consider the fee delinquent and  double the
amount of the fee. The court  may award reasonable attorney fees to the department if the depart-
ment prevails in an action to  collect a fee required by this chapter. The court may award reasonable
attorney fees to a defendant who prevails in an  action to collect a fee required by this chapter if
the court determines that the department had  no objectively reasonable basis for asserting the claim
or no reasonable basis for appealing an adverse decision of the trial court.
SECTION 317.
 ORS 480.605 is amended to read:
480.605. The Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes may:
(1) Collect fees for shop inspections, or for  inspections, testing, consultations, site visits or other
services  for  which no fee is otherwise specified, in the amount of $75 per hour of travel and in-
spection time.
(2) Collect a fee for welding  and inspectors’ examinations and for the renewal of inspectors’
certifications. The Board of Boiler Rules shall fix the amount of the fee.
SECTION 318. ORS 480.610 is amended to read:
480.610. All receipts from fees, charges, costs and expenses under ORS 480.510  to 480.670 shall
be collected by the Department  of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes and paid into
the [ Consumer and Business Services Fund created by ORS 705.145 ] Department of Building Codes
Fund. [ Such] Moneys described in this section  shall be used only  for the administration and
enforcement of ORS 480.510 to 480.670.
SECTION 319. ORS 480.630 is amended to read:
480.630. (1) A person  engaging in the business of installing, repairing or altering boilers or
pressure vessels must  possess a boiler contractor license issued by the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes.
(2) A person who installs, repairs or alters boilers or  pressure vessels as the employee or agent
of a business engaged in the installation, repair or alteration of boilers or pressure vessels  must
possess an employee or agent license issued by the department.
(3) The chief boiler inspector may conduct examinations for licensing an  employee or agent of
a business to establish the competency of the applicant.
(4) Upon payment of the applicable application fee, the department shall issue a  license to an
applicant who qualifies as provided in rules adopted under  ORS 455.117 by the Board of Boiler
Rules. Upon payment of the applicable renewal application fee, the department  shall renew the li-
cense of a person who complies with  ORS 480.510 to 480.670 and the rules adopted by the board
[189]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under ORS 455.117 or 480.545. The fee to apply for or renew a license is:
(a) $27.50 per year for an employee or agent license.
(b) $165 per year for a boiler contractor license.
(5) A person required to be licensed under this  section may not install, alter or repair a boiler
or pressure vessel unless  an installation permit is first secured from the department. The department
shall issue permits only to persons possessing a valid boiler contractor license  or as provided by the
department by rule.
(6) If an emergency exists, a permit under subsection (5) of this section is not  required in ad-
vance for boiler  or pressure vessel installations or repair, provided that an application accompanied
by the appropriate fee for the permit is submitted  to the department within five days after the
commencing of the boiler or pressure vessel work.
(7) The license and examination requirements of  this section and ORS 480.632 do not apply when
a person is brought in  from out of state to repair or alter a boiler or pressure vessel utilizing special
tools or a special process for which that person is uniquely qualified. The activity shall be  limited
solely  to  the special process and the person performing the work shall have qualifications that meet
or exceed license standards as determined by the chief boiler inspector.  The chief boiler inspector
shall be notified prior to performance of any work under this subsection.
(8) If a license issued under subsection  (4) of this section is of a class that authorizes a person
to perform work equivalent to that performed by pressure vessel installers,  building service me-
chanics, boilermakers or pressure piping  mechanics, the person must comply with continuing edu-
cation requirements.
SECTION 320.
 ORS 480.647 is amended to read:
480.647. (1) The Board of Boiler Rules may adopt rules creating quality control  procedures for
welding on nonboiler external piping and may adopt its own Oregon welded stamp symbol.
(2) The board may not require the adoption of “R” stamp provisions of the National  Board of
Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors or the American Society of  Mechanical Engineers Certifica-
tion of Authorization requirements related to boilers for welding on nonboiler external piping.
(3) The board shall accept an “R” stamp certificate of authorization  by the National Board of
Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors or  the American Society of Mechanical Engineers as meeting
the requirements of subsection (1) of  this section and may accept any other quality control program
for welding that is at least equivalent to the Oregon quality control procedures adopted  under sub-
section (1) of this section.
(4) All review  by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes for indi-
vidual approval of quality control procedures and requirements shall be charged at the shop in-
spection rates under ORS 480.605.
SECTION 321.
 ORS 480.670 is amended to read:
480.670. The Board of Boiler Rules may impose a civil penalty for  a violation of ORS 480.510 to
480.670 or rules adopted for the administration and enforcement of those sections. Moneys received
by the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes or the board from  civil
penalties imposed under this section  or ORS 455.895 (1)(c) shall be deposited to the [ Consumer and
Business Services Fund created under  ORS 705.145 ] Department of Building Codes Fund and used
only for the administration and enforcement of ORS 480.510 to 480.670 and 480.990 (8).
SECTION 322.
 ORS 634.063 is amended to read:
634.063. Nothing in ORS 634.057 shall limit the authority of a city, town, county or other poli-
tical subdivision of this state to adopt or enforce a  local ordinance, rule or regulation strictly nec-
[190]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
essary to comply with:
(1) The Uniform Building Code published by the International Conference of Building  Officials,
as amended and adopted by the Director of the Department of  [ Consumer and Business Services ]
Building Codes;
(2) A uniform fire code; or
(3) Any requirement of a state or federal statute or regulation pertaining to pesticides.
SECTION 323.
 ORS 672.107 is amended to read:
672.107. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Significant structure” means:
(A) Hazardous facilities and special occupancy structures, as defined in ORS 455.447;
(B) Essential facilities, as defined  in ORS 455.447, that have a ground area of more than 4,000
square feet or are more than 20 feet in height;
(C) Structures that the Director of  the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Build-
ing Codes determines to have irregular features; and
(D) Buildings that are customarily occupied by human beings and are more than  four stories or
45 feet above average ground level.
(b) “Significant structure” does not mean:
(A) One-family and two-family dwellings and accompanying accessory structures;
(B) Agricultural buildings or equine facilities, both as defined in ORS 455.315; or
(C) Buildings located on lands exempt from Department of [ Consumer and Business  Services ]
Building Codes enforcement of building code regulations.
(2) Consistent with ORS 672.255, the State Board  of Examiners for Engineering and Land Sur-
veying shall adopt rules establishing standards of competence in structural engineering analysis  and
design relating to seismic influence.
(3) An  engineer may not provide engineering services for significant structures unless the engi-
neer possesses a valid professional structural engineer certificate of  registration issued by the
board.
SECTION 324.
 ORS 693.025 is amended to read:
693.025. (1) A utility company, energy service provider or water supplier whose employees install
low-flow showerheads or faucet aerators  shall furnish evidence to the Department of [ Consumer and
Business Services ] Building Codes , in the form of a public liability policy issued by an insurance
company qualified to do  business in Oregon, that the company, provider or water supplier and its
employees are protected against liability for injury or death to  persons and loss of or damage to
property resulting from the installation.
(2) A person who contracts with a utility company, energy service provider or water  supplier
to perform  the functions described in subsection (1) of this section shall furnish evidence to the de-
partment [ of Consumer and Business Services ], in the form of a public  liability policy issued by an
insurance company qualified to do business in Oregon, that the contractor  and its employees are
protected against liability for injury or death to persons and loss of or damage to property  resulting
from the installation.
(3) The amount of the liability insurance required under subsections  (1) and (2) of this section
shall be in the amount of not less than $25,000 for bodily injury to one or more persons and  not less
than $25,000 for property damage.
(4) A person who performs, or who contracts to have performed, a  service described in sub-
section (1) of this section may not perform any  additional service for which a license is required
[191]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under ORS chapter 693 unless the person is licensed under ORS chapter 693 to perform the addi-
tional service. A person not licensed under ORS chapter 693 who performs services that are not
described in subsection (1)  of this section for which a license is required under ORS chapter 693 is
subject to civil penalty under ORS 693.992.
(5) Every utility company, energy service provider or water supplier shall include in  any con-
tract for the performance of a service described in  subsection (1) of this section a statement that,
under penalty of ORS 693.992, the contractor  may not perform any service for which a license is
required under ORS chapter 693, except installation of low-flow showerheads or faucet  aerators,
unless the contractor is licensed under ORS chapter 693 to perform that service.
SECTION 325.
 ORS 693.115 is amended to read:
693.115. (1) The State  Plumbing Board is established in the Department of [ Consumer and Busi-
ness Services ] Building Codes , consisting of seven members appointed by the Governor. The ap-
pointment of  a member of the board is subject to confirmation by the Senate pursuant to section 4,
Article III of the Oregon Constitution.
(2) The members of the board shall be as follows:
(a) One journeyman plumber with 10 or more years’ experience  in the trade or calling of
journeyman plumber;
(b) One licensed plumbing contractor;
(c) One local plumbing inspector who is a journeyman plumber;
(d) One registered professional mechanical engineer;
(e) One officer or employee of the Oregon Health Authority;
(f) One plumbing equipment  supplier who otherwise qualifies by experience in the industry or
one building official; and
(g) One member of the general public.
(3) The term of office of each member is four years, but a member serves  at the pleasure of the
Governor. Before the expiration of the term of a  member, the Governor shall appoint a successor.
A member is not eligible for appointment to more than two full terms of office. If there is a  vacancy
for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment to become immediately  effective for the
unexpired term.
(4) A  member of the board shall receive compensation and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 326.
 ORS 693.165 is amended to read:
693.165. All moneys received by the Department of [ Consumer and  Business Services ] Building
Codes or the State Plumbing Board under ORS 447.010  to 447.156, 447.992 and 455.895 (1)(a) and this
chapter shall be  paid into the [ Consumer and Business Services Fund created by ORS 705.145 ] De-
partment of Building Codes Fund . [Such] Moneys described in this section  shall be used only
for the administration and enforcement of ORS 447.010 to 447.156 and 447.992 and this chapter.
SECTION 327. ORS 701.083 is amended to read:
701.083. The Construction Contractors  Board may allow a residential contractor to participate
in a specialized education program under  ORS 701.120 in lieu of completing continuing education
described in ORS 701.082 (1)(c). The board may establish  a minimum number of specialized education
program hours or courses that the residential  contractor must complete during a two-year period
to substitute for all or part of the required continuing education hours. If the specialized  education
program provides training in one- and two-family dwelling construction, the board  may approve the
specialized education program  as a substitute for continuing education only if the program meets the
program criteria described in ORS 455.805 (3)  and Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ]
[192]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Building Codes rules adopted under ORS 455.810.
SECTION 328. ORS 701.230 is amended to read:
701.230. At least once each month, the Construction  Contractors Board shall provide to inves-
tigative units of the Department of Revenue, Department of  Consumer and Business Services , De-
partment of  Building Codes  and Employment Department the name and address of each person
who acts as a contractor  in violation of this chapter or who knowingly assists an unlicensed person
or a licensed contractor that is not properly endorsed to act in violation of this chapter.
SECTION 329. ORS 701.272 is amended to read:
701.272. (1)  The Construction Contractors Board may enter into interagency agreements with
the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes for the  department to perform
duties on behalf of the board under this chapter regarding:
(a) Licenses, registrations and other authorizations; or
(b) Regulated activities of a contractor.
(2) Subject to  the approval of the Director of the Department of [ Consumer and Business Ser-
vices] Building Codes or the affected advisory board, the department or advisory board may enter
into an agreement  with the Construction Contractors Board under this section regarding perform-
ance by the advisory board of  Construction Contractors Board duties. An agreement described in
this subsection  is considered for purposes of this section to be an agreement between the department
and the Construction Contractors Board.
(3) An interagency agreement under this section may provide for the department to perform  all
or part of the duties  described in the agreement within one or more areas within the state or on a
statewide basis. Any department employees  utilized to carry out an agreement under this section
shall remain employees of the department without loss of seniority or  reduction in pay or benefits,
but the agreement may provide for the board  to retain control over the final work product of the
employees. An agreement  under this section may not be used to avoid any provision of a collective
bargaining agreement.
(4) An interagency agreement under this section may provide for:
(a) Good faith cooperation between the department and the  board to enable the department and
the board to carry out their respective duties under law or under the agreement;
(b) The sharing of resources, including but not limited  to the department system described in
ORS 455.095 and 455.097, equipment, systems, processes and records,  documents and other informa-
tion;
(c) Using department and board information, including but not limited to complaints,  reports,
findings and orders, to carry out the laws  that the department administers and enforces on behalf
of the board;
(d) Ensuring the security of information shared under the agreement;
(e) Purchases by the department of supplies and equipment to carry out duties  on behalf of the
board, subject to the board’s reimbursement of the department;
(f) The use of financing  agreements to provide resources necessary or convenient to carry out
the agreement; and
(g) Acceptance by the department of moneys in payment of board  fees, the temporary retention
and transfer of fee  moneys and the reimbursement of the department’s expenses under the agreement
from those fee moneys.
(5)(a) A financing agreement provided for as described in subsection (4)(f) of this section is  ex-
empt from ORS 283.085 to 283.092 and ORS chapter 286A.
[193]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Any board moneys accepted by the  department as provided in subsection (4)(g) of this section
must be identified and  accounted for separately from any other moneys in the possession of or
available to the department. Board moneys temporarily retained by the department, regardless  of
where kept or deposited,  are moneys of the board. The retained moneys are not subject to any ap-
propriation to the department, any authorization for or limitation on  the expenditure of moneys by
the department, any restriction on the source, use or transfer of department moneys  or any judg-
ment, lien or other claim against moneys of the department.  Notwithstanding any requirement or
limitation on the retention of moneys by a state agency, the retention  of board moneys by the de-
partment under an interagency agreement described in this  section shall be governed solely by the
terms of the agreement.
(6) An interagency agreement under this section may not:
(a) Delegate the authority of  the board or the board administrator to establish policies or to
make a final determination on any matter;
(b) Allow the department  to hold board fee moneys in a department account that does not allow
for the separate tracking and accounting of those moneys;
(c) Allow the department to hold board fee moneys past the end of the fiscal quarter in which
the fee moneys were collected; or
(d) Transfer board expenses to the department.
SECTION 330.
 ORS 701.550 is amended to read:
701.550. The Construction Contractors Board shall provide an annual notice to each  contractor
licensed under this chapter that informs contractors of the  rules developed by the Director of the
Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes pursuant to ORS 455.355  prohibit-
ing the  installation of thermostats that contain mercury and requiring proper disposal of thermostats
that contain mercury.
SECTION 331. ORS 705.145 is amended to read:
705.145. (1) There is created in the State Treasury a fund  to be known as the Consumer and
Business Services Fund, separate and distinct from the General Fund. All moneys collected or re-
ceived by the Department  of Consumer and Business Services, except moneys required to be paid
into the Workers’ Benefit Fund, shall be paid into  the State Treasury and credited to the Consumer
and Business Services  Fund. Moneys in the fund may be invested in the same manner as other state
moneys and any interest earned shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The department shall keep a record of all moneys deposited  in the Consumer and Business
Services Fund that shall indicate, by separate account, the source from which  the moneys are de-
rived, the interest earned and the activity or program against which any withdrawal is charged.
(3) If moneys credited to any one account are withdrawn, transferred  or otherwise used for
purposes other than the program or  activity for which the account is established, interest shall ac-
crue on the amount withdrawn from the date of withdrawal and until such funds are restored.
(4) Moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated to the department for its administrative
expenses and for its expenses in carrying out its functions and duties under any provision of law.
(5) Except as  provided in ORS 705.165, it is the intention of the Legislative Assembly that the
performance of the various duties and functions of the department  in connection with each of its
programs shall be financed by the fees, assessments and charges established and collected in  con-
nection with those programs.
(6) There is created by transfer from the Consumer and Business Services Fund a revolving ad-
ministrative account in the amount of $100,000. The revolving account shall be  disbursed by checks
[194]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or orders issued by the Director of the  Department of Consumer and Business Services  or the
Workers’ Compensation Board and drawn upon the State Treasury,  to carry on the duties and
functions of the department and the board.  All checks or orders paid from the revolving account
shall be reimbursed by a warrant drawn in favor of the department charged against the Consumer
and Business Services Fund and recorded in the appropriate subsidiary record.
(7) For the purposes of ORS chapter  656, the revolving account created pursuant to subsection
(6) of this section may also be used to:
(a) Pay compensation benefits; and
(b) Refund to employers  amounts paid to the Consumer and Business Services Fund in excess
of the amounts required by ORS chapter 656.
[(8) Notwithstanding subsections (2), (3) and (5) of  this section and except as provided in ORS
455.220 (1),  the moneys derived pursuant to ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.210, 446.225 to 446.285,
446.395 to 446.420, 446.566 to 446.646, 446.661 to 446.756 and 455.220 (1)  and deposited to the fund,
interest earned on those moneys and withdrawals of moneys for activities or  programs under ORS
446.003 to 446.200, 446.210, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 446.566 to 446.646 and 446.661 to
446.756, or education and training  programs pertaining thereto, must be assigned to a single account
within the fund. ]
[(9) Notwithstanding subsections (2), (3)  and (5) of this section, the moneys derived pursuant to
ORS 455.240 or 460.370 or from state  building code or specialty code program fees for which the
amount is established by department rule pursuant  to ORS 455.020 (2) and deposited to the fund, in-
terest earned on those moneys and withdrawals of moneys for activities or programs  described under
ORS 455.240 or 446.566 to 446.646, 446.661 to 446.756 and 460.310 to 460.370, structural or mechanical
specialty code programs or activities for which a fee is collected under ORS 455.020 (2),  or programs
described under subsection (10) of this section that provide training and education for persons employed
in producing, selling, installing, delivering or inspecting manufactured structures or manufactured
dwelling parks or recreation parks, must be assigned to a single account within the fund. ]
[(10) Notwithstanding ORS 279.835 to 279.855 and ORS chapters  279A and 279B, the department
may, after consultation with the appropriate specialty code advisory boards established under ORS
455.132, 455.135, 455.138, 480.535 and 693.115, contract for public or private parties to develop or pro-
vide training and education programs relating to the state building code and associated licensing  or
certification programs.]
SECTION 332.
 ORS 705.250 is amended to read:
705.250. (1) The Electrical and Elevator Board established in ORS 455.138, the Board of Boiler
Rules established in  ORS 480.535 and the State Plumbing Board established in ORS 693.115 shall
each meet at least four times per year  at times and places specified by the Director of the Depart-
ment of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes after consultation with the board, or  at
times and places specified by the call of a majority of the members  of the board after consultation
with the director.
(2) The Building Codes Structures Board established in ORS 455.132, the Residential  and Man-
ufactured Structures Board established in  ORS 455.135, the Mechanical Board established in ORS
455.140 and the Construction Industry Energy Board established in ORS 455.492  shall each meet at
least twice per year  at times and places specified by the director [ of the Department of Consumer
and Business Services ] after consultation with the board, or at times and places specified  by the call
of a majority of the members of the board after consultation with the director.
SECTION 333. ORS 822.310 is amended to read:
[195]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
822.310. (1) The holder of a current, valid vehicle transporter certificate issued under this  sec-
tion may exercise the following privileges under this certificate:
(a) The person is not subject  to the prohibitions and penalties under ORS 822.300 while trans-
porting vehicles as provided under this section.
(b) The person is entitled  to apply for and receive a sufficient number of special vehicle trans-
porter  plates  or devices and may transport vehicles as provided under this section while displaying
the plate or device. Only one plate or device shall be displayed on a vehicle.  The plates or devices
shall require a fee for issuance as  provided in ORS 805.250. A plate or device issued under this
paragraph may be used on any vehicle transported by the person.
(c) The person may drive  or tow on its own wheels over the highways of this state any unreg-
istered vehicle or manufactured structure from outside this state or from  manufacturers or dealers
within this state to a prospective purchaser, manufacturer or dealer in this or  any other state, ter-
ritory or foreign country. This paragraph only permits the person to  transport manufactured
structures from the place of manufacture to  the place of business of a manufactured structure dealer
holding a  license under ORS 446.691 or 446.696 or a temporary manufactured structure dealer li-
cense under ORS 446.701  or to a place outside of Oregon. Any other movement of a manufactured
structure by the person must be under a trip permit issued by a county as agent for  the Department
of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(2) The Department of Transportation shall provide for the  issuance and renewal of vehicle
transporter  certificates  under this section to persons regularly engaged in businesses that require
the certificates.
(3) Vehicle transporter certificates issued under this section are subject to all of the following:
(a) A certificate described in this section is valid for a one-year  period and shall be renewed as
provided by the department.
(b) The department shall  not issue a certificate to a person until the fee for issuance of the
certificate under ORS 822.700 is paid.
(4) The department may adopt necessary rules for  the administration of the laws relating to the
regulation of vehicle  transporters, the issuance and renewal of vehicle transporter certificates, the
issuance of  vehicle transporter identification cards and the issuance of vehicle transporter plates.
The rules adopted under this subsection must be consistent  with any rules regarding vehicle trans-
porters that are adopted under ORS chapter 825. The rules may include,  but are not limited to,
grounds and procedures for the revocation, denial or suspension  of vehicle transporter certificates
and for placing vehicle transporters on probationary status.
(5) A person issued a certificate under this section is subject to regulation  under ORS chapter
825.
SECTION 334.
 Section 8, chapter 59, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) The governing body of a city or county may impose a construction tax by adoption
of an ordinance or resolution that conforms to the  requirements of this section and section 9 ,
chapter 59, Oregon Laws 2016  [ of this 2016 Act ].
(2)(a) A  tax may be imposed on improvements to residential real property that result in a new
residential  structure  or additional square footage in an existing residential structure, including re-
modeling that adds living space.
(b) An ordinance or resolution imposing the  tax described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
must state the rate of the tax. The tax may not exceed one percent  of the permit valuation for
residential construction permits issued by the city or county either  directly or through [ the Building
[196]
HB 3189
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
Codes Division of ] the Department of [ Consumer and Business Services ] Building Codes.
(3)(a) A tax may  be imposed on improvements to commercial and industrial real property, in-
cluding the commercial and  industrial portions of mixed-use property, that result in a new structure
or additional square footage in an existing structure, including remodeling that adds living space.
(b) An ordinance or resolution imposing the tax described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection
must state the rate and base of the tax.
(4) Taxes imposed pursuant to this section shall be paid at the time specified  in ORS 320.189 to
the city or county that imposed the tax.
(5)(a) This section and section 9 , chapter 59, Oregon Laws 2016,  [of this  2016 Act ] do not apply
to a tax described in section 1 (2), chapter 829, Oregon Laws 2007.
(b) Conformity of a tax imposed pursuant to this section by a city or county  to the requirements
of this section and section 9 , chapter  59, Oregon Laws 2016,  [of this 2016 Act ] shall be determined
without regard to any tax described in section 1 (2), chapter 829, Oregon Laws  2007, that is imposed
by the city or county.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 335. The transfer of duties, functions,  powers, records, property, employees
and moneys by sections 6, 7 and 8 of this  2017 Act does not become operative until the Di-
rector of the Department of Building Codes has been  appointed and has qualified. Until ap-
pointment and  qualification, the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall
continue to perform the duties and functions, exercise the powers and have  charge of the
records, property, employees and moneys.
SECTION 336. Except as provided in section 335 of this 2017 Act,  sections 1 to 14 of this
2017 Act and the amendments to statutes and session law and  by sections 15 to 334 of this
2017 Act become operative on January 1, 2018.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 337. The unit captions  used in this 2017 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
[197]