Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $3,000,000 for distribution to McMinnville Fire
District for land acquisition, planning and construction of a new fire station.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $3,000,000 for distribution to Sheridan Fire
District for implementation of a sustainability initiative.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $2,500,000 for distribution to the City of Mosier
for design and construction of the Mosier Center.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for distribution  to the City of Talent
for seismic upgrades  at emergency service facilities, land acquisition, design and con-
struction of an emergency operations center and training  space, construction of an evidence
control and storage facility and upgrades for emergency vehicle and supplies storage.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $133,000  for distribution to the Emergency
Communications of Southern Oregon (ECSO) for base station radios for  the dispatch center.
SECTION 6. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $633,000 for distribution to the Emergency
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4522
HB 3870
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Communications of Southern Oregon (ECSO) for radio management  and over-the-air pro-
gramming systems.
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $253,000  for distribution to the Emergency
Communications of Southern Oregon (ECSO) for emergency dispatch systems.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $305,000 for distribution to the Emergency
Communications of Southern Oregon (ECSO) for  acquisition and installation of solar energy
generation equipment for radio tower sites.
SECTION 9. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,800,000 for distribution to Jackson County
for design and construction of a sobering center.
SECTION 10.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development  Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,975,000 for distribution  to Lake County for
procurement of equipment, software and vehicles for emergency services, design, planning
and construction of Christmas Valley office spaces and  design, planning and construction of
a justice center.
SECTION 11.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development  Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $1,700,000 for distribution to Grant County
for procurement of vehicles  for the Grant County Sheriff’s Office, operations and personnel
for the Grant  County Sheriff’s Office and equipment and infrastructure replacement and
modernization for the Grant County Sheriff’s Office.
SECTION 12. In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000  for distribution to the Rogue
Siskiyou Regional Training Center for design, planning and construction  of the Rogue
Siskiyou Regional Training Facility.
SECTION 13. In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000 for distribution to  Harney County
for design, planning and construction  of the Lincoln Justice Center and the Harney County
Jail.
SECTION 14. In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $600,000  for distribution to the Alsea Com-
munity Action Collaborative for facility management  and site upgrades for the Benton
County Community Health Center site, feasibility, research and  cost evaluation for health
services and operations sustainability of  the facility and acquisition and storage of emer-
gency supplies and equipment at the facility.
SECTION 15. In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
[2]
HB 3870
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $1,350,000 for distribution to Central Coast
Fire and Rescue for acquisition of the Waldport Fire Hall and  facility upgrades and im-
provements to the Waldport Fire Hall.
SECTION 16.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development  Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $5,300,000 for distribution to the City of
Toledo for renovations and seismic upgrades to the Toledo Public Safety Building.
SECTION 17. In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000  for distribution to the City of
Hillsboro for the design, planning and construction of South Hillsboro Fire Station 9.
SECTION 18. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development  Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $10,000,000 for distribution to the City of
Gresham for the design, planning and  construction of a fire station to replace Fire Station
74.
SECTION 19. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[3]