Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of the State Fire Marshal, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the  General Fund, the amount of $____, for personnel costs related to the Oregon
Safety Assessment Program (OrSAP) established under ORS 401.256.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3163