Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund  is established in the State
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1959
HB 3270
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Con-
servation and Recreation Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State Fish and  Wildlife
Commission to carry out conservation, wildlife management and habitat improvement activ-
ities, and other activities under  the wildlife laws that serve to protect, maintain or enhance
wildlife resources in the State of Oregon.
(3) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys transferred to the fund under section 9 of this 2017 Act;
(b) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund; and
(c) Gifts, grants, contributions or  other donations received by the commission from any
public or private source.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in sections 1 to 10 of this 2017 Act:
(a) “Beverage” means a beverage listed in ORS 459A.702 (1).
(b) “Distributor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 459A.700.
(c) “Wholesale beverage tax” means the tax imposed under this section.
(2)(a) A tax is imposed on the sale at wholesale of beverages in this state.
(b) The tax is imposed at the  rate of 2.34 percent of the total wholesale price of a
beverage.
(3) A distributor  may collect the tax imposed under this section from the purchaser at
wholesale of the beverage. The amount of  the tax must be stated separately on the invoice
or receipt given to the purchaser for the sale to which the tax relates.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section,  the wholesale beverage tax is a liability
of the distributor.
SECTION 3.
Every distributor shall:
(1) Keep records and render statements sufficient to show whether there is a wholesale
beverage tax liability.
(2) Comply with rules adopted by  the Department of Revenue with respect to the whole-
sale beverage tax.
SECTION 4. (1) Every distributor is liable for the wholesale beverage tax and shall file  a
return with the Department of Revenue, on or before the last day  of the month following the
end of each calendar quarter, reporting the amount of wholesale beverage  tax due during the
quarter. The department shall  prescribe the form of the return required by this section. The
rules of the department shall require that returns be made under penalties  for false swear-
ing.
(2) The distributor may withhold an administrative reimbursement charge of  five percent
of the wholesale beverage tax due under this section.
(3) When a return  is required under subsection (1) of this section, the distributor re-
quired to make the return shall remit the wholesale beverage tax due  to the department at
the time fixed for filing the return.
SECTION 5. If the amount paid by a  distributor to the Department of Revenue under
section 4  of this 2017 Act exceeds the amount of wholesale beverage tax payable, the de-
partment shall refund the amount of the excess with interest at the rate established  under
ORS 305.220 for each month or fraction of a month from the date of payment  of the excess
until the date of the refund. A refund may not  be made to a distributor that fails to claim
the refund within two years after the due date for filing the  return to which the claim for
[2]
HB 3270
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
refund relates.
SECTION 6. (1) Every distributor is deemed to hold the amount of wholesale beverage
taxes due under section 4 of this 2017 Act  in trust for the State of Oregon and for payment
to the Department of Revenue  in the manner and at the time provided under section 4 of this
2017 Act.
(2) At any time the distributor fails to remit any  amount of wholesale beverage taxes
deemed to be held in trust for the State of Oregon,  the department may enforce collection
by the issuance of a distraint warrant for the collection of the delinquent amount and  all
penalties, interest and collection charges accrued on the delinquent amount.  The warrant
shall be issued, docketed and proceeded upon  in the same manner and shall have the same
force and effect as warrants for the collection of delinquent income taxes.
SECTION 7. Unless the context  requires otherwise, the provisions of ORS chapters 305,
314 and 316 governing the audit and examination of reports and returns, confidentiality of
reports and returns, determination of deficiencies, assessments, claims for refunds, penal-
ties, interest, jeopardy  assessments, warrants, conferences and appeals to the Oregon Tax
Court, and related procedures,  apply to sections 1 to 10 of this 2017 Act as if the wholesale
beverage tax were a tax imposed upon or measured by net income.
SECTION 8.
(1) Public records of  moneys received by the Department of Revenue pur-
suant to sections 1 to 10 of this  2017 Act are exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.410 to
192.505. Nothing in this section shall limit the  use that can be made of such information for
regulatory purposes or its use and admissibility in any enforcement proceedings.
(2) If a conflict is  found to exist between subsection (1) of this section and ORS 314.835,
ORS 314.835 controls.
SECTION 9. (1) All moneys received by the Department of Revenue pursuant  to sections
1 to 10 of this 2017 Act and  interest on the moneys shall be paid to the State Treasurer to
be held in a suspense account established under ORS 293.445.
(2) After the payment of refunds under section 5 of this 2017 Act:
(a) Moneys necessary to  reimburse the Department of Revenue for the actual costs in-
curred by the department in administering the  wholesale beverage tax, not to exceed two
percent of wholesale beverage tax collections, are continuously appropriated to  the depart-
ment; and
(b) The balance of the moneys received shall be transferred  to the Oregon Conservation
and Recreation Fund established in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 10.
(1) The State Fish and Wildlife Commission shall keep a record of all mon-
eys deposited in the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund.
(2) The record shall indicate by separate cumulative  accounts the source from which the
moneys are derived and the individual activity or program against which  each withdrawal is
charged.
(3) Notwithstanding the confidentiality provisions of section 7 of  this 2017 Act, the com-
mission shall use the record created under this  section to report, in the budget documents
of the commission submitted to the Legislative Assembly, on the use  of these funds for the
benefit and conservation of the native fish and wildlife of this state. The report may not
contain information from which  information about a particular taxpayer may be determined.
SECTION 11.
Section 2 of this 2017 Act applies to beverages sold by a distributor  to a
purchaser at wholesale on or after January 1, 2019.
[3]
HB 3270
1
2
3
SECTION 12. This 2017 Act shall be submitted to the people for their approval or re-
jection at the next regular general election held throughout this state.
[4]