Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 409.185 is amended to read:
409.185. (1)(a) The Director of Human Services  shall oversee the development of standards and
procedures for assessment, investigation and enforcement of child protective services.
(b) The director shall ensure that the standards  and procedures developed under this
subsection require that assessments and investigations of reports of child abuse conducted
by the department are conducted by the program that  specializes in training, investigations
and safety, if the reported abuse involves:
(A) A person under  18 years of age who is residing in a youth correction facility, as de-
fined in ORS 420.005, a youth care center,  as defined in ORS 420.855, or a detention facility
established under ORS 419A.010 to 419A.020 and 419A.050 and 419A.063; or
(B) A child residing with a foster family or in a  foster home, if the foster family or foster
home is certified by the department unless the person who  is the subject of the assessment
or investigation is the child’s parent.
(2)(a) The Department of Human Services shall take action to implement  the provision of child
protective services as outlined in ORS 417.705 to 417.800 and based on the  recommendations in the
1992 “Oregon Child Protective Services Performance  Study” published by the University of Southern
Maine.
(b) In all substantiated  cases of child abuse and neglect, the role of the department is to com-
plete a comprehensive family assessment of risk of abuse  or neglect, or both, assess service needs
and provide immediate protective services as necessary.
(c) The department shall provide remedial services needed to ensure the safety of the child.
(d) In  all cases of child abuse and neglect for which a criminal investigation is conducted, the
role of law enforcement  agencies is to provide a legally sound, child sensitive investigation of
whether abuse or neglect or both have occurred and  to gather other evidence and perform other
responsibilities in accordance with interagency agreements.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1478
SB 915
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(e) The department and law enforcement agencies shall conduct the investigation  and assess-
ment concurrently, based upon the  protocols and procedures of the county child abuse multidisci-
plinary team in each jurisdiction.
(f) When the department and law  enforcement agencies conduct a joint investigation and as-
sessment, the activities of the department and agencies are to be clearly differentiated by the pro-
tocols of the county child abuse multidisciplinary team.
(g) Nothing  in this subsection is intended to be inconsistent with ORS 418.702, 418.747 and
418.748 and ORS chapter 419B.
(h) In all cases of child abuse for which an investigation  is conducted, the department shall
provide a child’s parent, guardian or caregiver  with a clear written explanation of the investigation
process, the court hearing process and the rights of the parent, guardian  or caregiver in the abuse
investigation and in the court proceedings related to the abuse investigation.
(3) Upon receipt of a recommendation of the Children’s Advocate  under ORS 417.815 (2)(e), the
department shall implement the recommendation or give the Children’s  Advocate written notice of
an intent not to implement the recommendation.
[2]