Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery
bonds pursuant to ORS  286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $15 million in net
proceeds and interest  earnings for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section,
plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be  necessary to pay bond-
related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred  to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the  Levee Project Grant Fund es-
tablished under ORS 285B.421, to be used for any purpose for  which funds in the Levee
Project Grant Fund may be used, including, but not limited  to, grants for investigating the
adequacy of levees and improving levees so they may be certified and accredited.
(3) Lottery bonds authorized  under this section must be issued no later than June 30,
2024.
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public  education or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Levees are an  integral part of the commercial and industrial infrastructure of this
state.
(b) The inspection, accreditation, certification and repair of levees will  promote economic
development within this state.
SECTION 2.  ORS 285B.421 is amended to read:
285B.421. (1) The  Levee Project Grant Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Levee Project Grant  Fund must be credited
to the fund. The Levee Project Grant Fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund  under section
33, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, and section 1 of this 2023  Act  and may include moneys ap-
propriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the  Legislative Assembly or otherwise
and interest earned on moneys in the fund.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 851
HB 2307
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for the Oregon Infrastructure Finance Authority to provide  grants under ORS 285B.420 for
levee projects as defined in ORS 285B.410.
(3) Grants from the fund for  planning projects are limited to a maximum of $2 million per ap-
plicant per biennium.
(4) Grants from the fund for  construction or capital improvement projects may not exceed an
amount equal to 80 percent of the total cost of the project.
(5) A grant may not be awarded from the fund unless  the applicant pledges matching funds to
the project of at least 20 percent of the amount of the grant.
(6) At least 60 percent of the dollar  value of grants awarded from the fund in any biennium shall
be used to provide assistance with levee projects to rural or distressed  areas as those terms are
defined in ORS 285A.010.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[2]