Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Health care practitioner” means a:
(A) Physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(B) Dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679;
(C) Nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
(D) Physician assistant licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525; or
(E) Certified registered nurse anesthetist licensed under ORS chapter 678.
(b) “Prospective health care practitioner” means a person  who has been accepted into,
but has not yet started, a qualifying health profession degree program.
(c) “Qualifying health profession degree program” means  a degree program that meets
the educational requirements for licensure as a physician, dentist, nurse practitioner,  phy-
sician assistant or certified nurse anesthetist.
(d) “Recipient” means a person who has been selected by the  Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission to receive an Indian Health Scholarship under subsection (4)  of this sec-
tion.
(e) “Service agreement” means the agreement executed by a  prospective health care
practitioner under subsection (3) of this section.
(f) “Tribal service site” means a  health care facility located in Oregon that serves a pa-
tient population that the commission determines by rule to be at least 50 percent members
of a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(2) There is created the Indian Health Scholarship  Program, to be administered by the
commission pursuant to rules adopted by the commission. The  commission shall determine
who shall receive scholarships under subsection (4) of this section.
(3) A prospective health care practitioner who wishes  to participate in the program shall
submit an application to the commission in accordance with  rules adopted by the commis-
sion. To  be eligible to receive an Indian Health Scholarship, a prospective health care prac-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3965
SB 911
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
titioner must:
(a) Be a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe; and
(b) Execute a service agreement stating that:
(A) Immediately  upon the recipient’s completion of the health profession degree, resi-
dency or training, as established for each degree by the commission  by rule, the recipient
will practice as a health  care practitioner at a tribal service site for a minimum of two years;
and
(B) While practicing as a health care practitioner at a tribal service site,  the recipient
must meet other requirements established by the commission by rule.
(4) The commission shall provide a scholarship  covering the entire cost of tuition and
fees for a recipient’s education in a qualifying health profession degree program.
(5)(a) A recipient who fails  to complete the health profession degree for which the
scholarship was awarded shall repay the amount received to the commission.
(b) A recipient  who fails to complete the terms of the service agreement shall repay the
amount received plus  an additional penalty of 10 percent of the amount received to the
commission. The total amount to be paid under this  paragraph shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis for every full month that the recipient complied with the service agreement.
(c) Upon the death of a recipient,  any obligation of the recipient under this subsection
to repay the commission shall be canceled.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any case of extreme hardship or  for
other good cause shown, the commission may waive, in whole or in part, the right of the
commission to recover moneys made available under this section.
(6) In the event that a recipient is required  to repay the commission under subsection
(5) of this section, the commission may:
(a) Collect any amounts due;
(b) Have any amounts due  be collected by the Collections Unit in the Department of Re-
venue under ORS 293.250; or
(c) Contract with a collections agency to collect any amounts due.
(7) Any moneys received or collected by the commission under subsections (5)  and (6) of
this section shall  be deposited into a separate fund held by the commission for the purpose
of carrying out the provisions of this section. The commission may not use the  moneys in
that fund for any other purpose.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2017 Act first applies to the 2018-2019 academic year.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______ for the
purpose of administering the Indian Health Scholarship Program created in section 1 of this
2017 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2017.
[2]