Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Investigations of School Employee Misconduct  is es-
tablished.
(2) The task force consists of 15 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of  the Senate shall appoint one nonvoting member from the majority
party of the Senate and one nonvoting member from a minority party of the Senate.
(b) The  Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one nonvoting member
from the majority party of the House of Representatives and  one nonvoting member from a
minority party of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint 11 members as follows:
(A) Two members who are parents of students in the public schools of this state;
(B) Two members who are students in the public schools of this state;
(C) One member who represents  a statewide organization that primarily represents li-
censed educators;
(D) One member who represents a statewide association  that represents district attor-
neys;
(E) One member who represents a statewide association that represents chiefs of  police;
(F) One member who represents a statewide association of school board members;
(G) One member who is a superintendent of a school district;
(H) One member who is a representative of the Department of Education; and
(I) One member who is a representative of the Teacher Standards and  Practices Com-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4284
HB 3744
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mission.
(3) The task force shall evaluate the adequacy of the procedures for  reporting and in-
vestigating school  employee misconduct, including the abuse and sexual conduct provisions
of ORS 339.370 to 339.400. As part of the evaluation, the task force shall consider:
(a) Potential changes to the provisions of ORS 339.370 to  339.400 and the potential
enactment of any additional laws necessary  to ensure that school districts are held ac-
countable for investigating and responding to reports of misconduct;
(b) The establishment of a statewide  standard for investigations that are conducted by
school districts in response to allegations of misconduct; and
(c) The public provision  of the outcomes of Department of Education investigations of
school employees,  contractors, agents and volunteers under ORS 339.370 to 339.400 in a
manner that is similar to the  provision of information by the Teacher Standards and Prac-
tices Commission as required by ORS 342.203.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The Governor shall select one member  of the task force to serve as chairperson and
another to serve  as vice chairperson, for the terms and with the duties and powers necessary
for the performance of the functions of the offices as the Governor determines.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to education no later than December 15, 2026.
(11) The Department of Education shall provide staff support to the task force.
(12) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative Assembly serve
as volunteers on the task force and, unless they are qualified members, as defined in  ORS
292.495, are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
(15) All appointments to the task force made under subsection (2) of  this section must
be completed by October 1, 2025.
(16) The task force shall have its first meeting on or before November 1, 2025.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]
HB 3744
1
[3]