Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Forestry Department, in  collaboration with the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department  and the Housing and Community Services Department, shall
study methods for improving active forest management in this state, including:
(a) Identifying barriers to using the most effective forest and wildfire  management
techniques to reduce wildfires;
(b) Identifying obstacles to using the  timber harvest of standing and burned forests as
an effective mitigation tool against future wildfires;
(c) Identifying the  economic impacts of increasing present harvest numbers, including
the use of timber  harvest of standing and burned forests, to generate increased revenue to
local schools, municipalities, counties and the state  as a measure to lower taxes and increase
services to all Oregonians;
(d) The ability to expand the use of the Good Neighbor  Authority Agreement by the State
Forestry Department on federal lands in Oregon to  improve forest resiliency to wildfire; and
(e) Identifying the number of Oregon mills producing  lumber and wood products by type
in 1980 and the number of Oregon mills producing lumber and wood products by type in 2025.
(2) No later than September 15, 2027, the department shall report to the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources, housing and agriculture,
in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, the findings of the  study described in subsection (1)
of this section and recommendations for:
(a) Using the most effective forest  and wildfire management techniques backed by re-
search and positive outcomes nationally or internationally to reduce wildfires;
(b) Using the timber harvest of standing and burned forests as an effective mitigation
tool against future wildfires;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4217
HB 3508
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(c) Strategies to promote the use of the  Good Neighbor Authority Agreement on federal
lands;
(d) Any other plans for improving active forest management developed by the depart-
ment; and
(e) Legislative changes necessary to implement the recommendations  under this sub-
section.
(3) The department may contract with a private organization to conduct the study  re-
quired under this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Forestry Department, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $500,000, which may be expended for carrying out the provisions
of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]