Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Department of  Fish and Wildlife shall establish and operate a fish
incubation nursery program for the rearing of salmonids  on salmon-bearing or potentially
salmon-bearing waterways located in the Counties  of Coos, Curry or Douglas and within 100
miles of the Pacific Ocean.
SECTION 2. The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall report on  the establishment
and operation of the fish incubation nursery program required under section 1 of this 2025
Act, including but not limited  to any findings or recommendations of the department re-
garding the  program, to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly relating to na-
tural resources in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $470,000,  which the department shall expend for es-
tablishing and operating the fish incubation nursery  program required under section 1 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1377