Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 350.395 is amended to read:
350.395. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Associate transfer  degree” means an associate degree that is awarded by a community
college and that is  intended to allow a student to apply the credits earned for the degree toward a
baccalaureate degree.
(b) “Community college” means a community college operated under ORS chapter 341.
(c) “Foundational curriculum” means a curriculum established under ORS 350.400.
[(c)] (d) “Public university” means a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
[(d)] (e)  “Transfer program” means a one-year program that is designed to allow a student to
apply the credits earned through the program toward a baccalaureate degree.
(f) “Unified statewide transfer  agreement” means an agreement established under ORS
350.404.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall develop standards related to the ability
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 87
SB 1521
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of students to apply credits earned through courses of study at community  colleges to baccalaureate
degrees awarded by public universities. The standards shall be known  as the “Transfer Student Bill
of Rights and Responsibilities.”  In developing these standards, commission staff shall consult
with the advisory committee established in section 3 of this 2020 Act.
(3) The standards developed under this section must include:
(a) Admission  standards to public universities for students who have earned an associate trans-
fer degree  or who have attained the  optimal number of academic credits identified in a unified
statewide transfer agreement .
(b) Processes to  align requirements for community college courses and public university courses
to ensure that credits earned for  completion of sufficiently similar courses are fully transferable
between all community colleges and public universities.
(c) Processes to minimize the number of credits  that students who have either earned an asso-
ciate transfer degree or who have completed all coursework in a transfer program,  founda-
tional curriculum or unified statewide transfer agreement  would need to complete prior to
receiving various types of baccalaureate degrees at public  universities[ , including identifying majors
in baccalaureate degree programs that require more than two years to complete after a  student has
earned an associate transfer degree ].
[(d) Processes to minimize the  number of credits that students who have completed a transfer pro-
gram would need to complete prior  to receiving various types of baccalaureate degrees at public uni-
versities.]
(d) Methods for minimizing the complexity of unified statewide transfer agreements.
(e) Processes requiring:
(A) The chief academic officer of  a community college or public university requesting a
variance to an established unified statewide transfer agreement to,  at the request of the
advisory committee established in section 3 of this 2020 Act, provide information  to the
committee on the pedagogical requirements  supporting the position of the community college
or public university; and
(B) The chief academic officers of community colleges or  public universities who disagree
over the inclusion or exclusion of courses in a unified  statewide transfer agreement to, at
the request of the advisory committee established in section 3 of this 2020  Act, provide in-
formation to the committee on the pedagogical requirements supporting the positions  of the
community colleges or public universities.
[(e)] (f)  Processes by which a community college would award an  associate degree to a student
upon completion of necessary credits, regardless of whether the  student applied to receive the de-
gree or whether the student earned the credits for  the degree at a community college or a public
university.
[(f)] (g)  Processes to evaluate and make recommendations for the development of  associate
transfer degrees or unified statewide transfer agreements  in specific areas of  study[ , including
engineering].
[(g)] (h)  Any other issues identified by the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission that re-
late to courses of study  at community colleges and the ability of a student to transfer credits to a
community college or a  public university, to be admitted to a public university or to earn a degree
at a community college or a public university.
[(h)] (i) Requirements that students must meet in  order to benefit from the standards described
in paragraphs (a) to [ (g)] (h)  of this subsection.
[2]
SB 1521
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) [ Each community college and public  university shall submit annual reports to ] The Higher
Education Coordinating Commission [ related to ] shall annually submit a report in  the manner
provided by ORS 192.245 to the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
setting forth :
(a) The number of students who attend a community college and then a  public university[ , or a
public university and then a community college ].
(b) The number of students who attend one community college and then a different community
college.
(c) The  number of students who transfer from a community college to a public university and
who have an associate transfer degree or have completed a transfer program.
(d) The average number of credits students have when they transfer from a  community college
to a public university  and the average number of credits accepted by the public university .
(e) The average  number of credits students have when they attend one community college and
then a different community college.
(f) The  average number of credits that a student earning an associate transfer degree completed
at a community college.
(g) The average number of credits students who have transferred from a community  college to
a public university must earn prior to  receiving a baccalaureate degree compared to the average
number of credits students who did not transfer from a community college must  earn prior to re-
ceiving a baccalaureate degree.
(h)(A) The number and nature  of the requests submitted under subsection (3)(e) of this
section to the advisory committee established in section 3 of this 2020 Act; and
(B) The determination reached  by the committee for each request described in subpara-
graph (A) of this paragraph.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 350.412 is amended to read:
350.412. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall regularly convene represen-
tatives from community colleges and public universities listed in ORS 352.002 in order to:
(a) Facilitate the coordination and establishment  of foundational curricula described in ORS
350.400; and
(b) Facilitate the development, and ensure the continued  alignment, of the unified statewide
transfer agreements described in ORS 350.404.
(2) The commission shall provide staffing for each meeting held  under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The commission shall seek to  ensure that community colleges, public universities listed in
ORS 352.002 and students are informed and engaged  on the current status and developments of
foundational curricula and unified statewide transfer agreements.
(4) Each community college and public university listed in ORS  352.002 shall report annually to
the commission, for each  unified statewide transfer agreement established under ORS 350.404, the
number of academic credits that were successfully transferred in  that major course of study by
students who transfer from a community college to a public university.
(5) [ To the extent relevant data  is available, ] The commission shall report annually to the Legis-
lative Assembly on :
(a) Whether existing unified statewide transfer agreements are meeting  the goals set forth in
ORS 350.404 (2)[ .];
(b) Whether, in meeting the goals set forth in ORS 350.404 (2), there are differences  in
[3]
SB 1521
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
outcomes for students on a disaggregated basis;
(c) The rates and numbers of completion of the foundational curricula and unified state-
wide transfer agreements on a disaggregated basis; and
(d) Recommendations for  improving the equity, consistency and efficiency of credit
transfer.
(6) Each community college and public university listed in ORS 352.002 shall timely pro-
vide the commission with any requested data necessary for the  commission to comply with
the reporting requirements set forth in subsection (5) of this section.
SECTION 3.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall establish an advisory
committee consisting of faculty, staff and  administration representatives from community
colleges and public universities listed in ORS 352.002, and any other parties the commission
deems necessary. The advisory committee shall  provide advice and recommendations to
commission staff on:
(1) Designing standards to effectively implement ORS 350.395;
(2) Developing an electronic  system for the dissemination of information regarding
foundational curricula established under ORS 350.400 and unified statewide transfer  agree-
ments established under ORS 350.404; and
(3) Any other needs and processes that may be required for the implementation of ORS
350.395 to 350.412.
SECTION 4.
Not later  than December 15, 2020, the Higher Education Coordinating Com-
mission shall submit a report to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related
to education describing any additional legislation or funding that  is required to develop an
electronic system for the dissemination  of information regarding foundational curricula and
unified statewide transfer agreements in the manner  set forth in section 3 (2) of this 2020
Act.
SECTION 5. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Dual credit programs” includes dual  credit programs, sponsored dual credit pro-
grams and assessment-based learning credit programs, as those terms are defined by the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission by rule.
(b) “Foundational curricula” means curricula established for public post-secondary  insti-
tutions of education in this state under ORS 350.400.
(2) No later than December 1, 2020, the commission shall convene:
(a) High school teachers of courses that are offered as part of a dual credit program;
(b) Administrators at high schools that offer dual credit programs;
(c) Faculty at community colleges and public universities listed in ORS  352.002 that teach
courses as part of a dual credit program; and
(d) Administrators at community colleges or public  universities listed in ORS 352.002 that
are in a partnership to offer dual credit programs.
(3) The persons convened as provided by subsection (2) of this section shall  assist in
aligning credits earned through dual credit programs with requirements  of foundational
curricula by:
(a) Prescribing guidance for determining which courses offered in dual credit  programs
are aligned with foundational curricula.
(b) Documenting dual credit program courses that are within foundational curricula.
(c) Identifying criteria that support articulation of credits  earned through dual credit
[4]
SB 1521
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
programs offered in high school to  credits accepted by community colleges and public uni-
versities listed in ORS 352.002.
(d) Developing additional foundational curricula lists upon approval of unified  statewide
transfer agreements developed under ORS 350.404.
(4) The commission shall submit reports detailing its compliance with  this section to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education as follows:
(a) A preliminary report no later than March 31, 2021.
(b) A final report no later than August 31, 2021.
SECTION 6.
Sections 4 and 5 of this 2020 Act are repealed on December 31, 2021.
SECTION 7.  Section 1, chapter 113, Oregon Laws 2018, as amended by section  3, chapter 113,
Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Accelerated college credit program”  has the meaning given that term in [ section 6 of this
2018 Act ] ORS 350.420.
(b) “Credit toward general education” has the  meaning given that term in [ section 6 of this 2018
Act] ORS 350.420.
(2) The Higher  Education Coordinating Commission shall prepare an annual report on acceler-
ated college credit programs in the manner provided by this section.
(3) For the  purpose of the report required by this section, the commission shall collaborate with
public post-secondary institutions of education in  this state to determine the method for providing
a representative sampling of:
(a) Students from each institution who are:
(A) Graduates of a high school in this state;
(B) Enrolled in the first year at a post-secondary institution of  education for the first time, ex-
cept for any enrollment related to an accelerated college credit program; and
(C) Seeking a post-secondary certificate or degree.
(b) The number of credits from  an accelerated college credit program that a student attempted
to transfer to the post-secondary institution of education.
(4) The report required by this section must include the following information from  the repre-
sentative sampling based on the previous school year:
(a) The number and percentage of students who attempted to transfer a credit  from an acceler-
ated college credit program to a public post-secondary institution of education in this state.
(b) Of the students identified  under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the number and percentage
of students whose credits were accepted.
(c) Of the credits accepted, the number and percentage  that were accepted as credit toward
general education.
(d) Of the students identified  under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the number and percentage
of students whose credits were not accepted.
(e) Of the students identified under paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the high schools from which
the students graduated, if available.
(f) Of the students identified under paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the number and
percentage of students whose credits from  the foundational curriculum established under
ORS 350.400 were accepted or not accepted.
(5) To the extent practicable, and in addition  to the information described in subsection (4) of
this section, the report must include,  from all students in this state described in subsection (3)(a)
[5]
SB 1521
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of this section, the number of students  who attempted to transfer a credit from an accelerated col-
lege credit program to a public post-secondary institution of education in this state.
(6) To the extent  practicable, the information collected under subsections (4) and (5) of this
section must be disaggregated by:
(a) The student’s characteristics, including race, ethnicity and gender;
(b) The post-secondary institution of education that accepted or  did not accept a transfer of a
credit from an accelerated college credit program;
(c) The type of accelerated college credit program in which the student participated; and
(d) The class of the accelerated college credit program in which the student participated.
(7) No later than September 1  of each year, each public post-secondary institution of education
must provide to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission the information required under this
section.
(8) No later than December 1 of each year, the report required under this section must be:
(a) Submitted to  the Governor, the Department of Education, the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to education, the  board of education of each community college district
in this state and the governing board of each public university listed in ORS 352.002; and
(b) Made available to each school district in this state.
(9) Nothing in this section is  intended to supersede the authority of a post-secondary institution
of education, or the faculty of an institution, to prescribe  an educational program or a course of
study as provided by ORS 341.290 (3) or 352.146. [2018 c.113 §1; 2018 c.113 §3]
SECTION 8.
The amendments to section 1, chapter 113,  Oregon Laws 2018, by section 7
of this 2020 Act become operative on July 1, 2020.
SECTION 9.  ORS 348.280 is amended to read:
348.280. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall:
(a) Determine  which students are eligible to receive scholarships under ORS 348.270 and 348.272.
(b) Grant the appropriate scholarships under ORS 348.270 and 348.272.
(c) Make necessary rules for application and distribution  of the benefits available under ORS
348.270 and 348.272 and this section.
(d) In awarding scholarships pursuant to its authority under ORS  348.520, give priority to stu-
dents who are eligible to receive scholarships under ORS 348.270 and 348.272.
(2) If the accounts established or designated by the State Treasurer under ORS 131A.360
and 131A.365 do not contain sufficient moneys to provide scholarships to each student who
is eligible to receive a scholarship under ORS 348.270, the commission shall:
(a) Use  all moneys available in the accounts established or designated by the State
Treasurer under ORS 131A.360 and 131A.365 to provide scholarships to students  who are eli-
gible to receive a scholarship under ORS 348.270; and
(b) Award moneys from the Oregon Opportunity Grant program to  students who are el-
igible to receive a scholarship under ORS 348.270.
[(2)] (3)  The [ Higher Education Coordinating ] commission shall establish rules and procedures
necessary to carry  out the provisions of ORS 348.270 and 348.272 and this section, including but not
limited to the usual and customary rules for analyzing financial need.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 352.011 is amended to read:
352.011. (1) As used  in this section, “professional doctorate degree” means a first profes-
sional degree, excluding a Doctor of Philosophy degree, that:
(a) Represents a category of qualifications in a professional subject area  that requires
[6]
SB 1521
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
students to have  previously completed specified undergraduate coursework or obtained pre-
vious undergraduate degrees before enrolling in  the professional doctorate degree granting
program; and
(b) Is awarded upon completion of a program that provides the knowledge  and skills for
the recognition, credential or license required for professional practice.
(2) Western Oregon University, Southern Oregon University and Eastern Oregon University are
established as  comprehensive universities that offer a full range of baccalaureate programs and
graduate programs through the master’s degree  and the professional doctorate degree .
SECTION 11.
 ORS 352.089 is amended to read:
352.089. (1) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 shall adopt a  mission statement for the
university, and shall forward the statement to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(2) A public  university listed in ORS 352.002 shall submit any significant change in the
university’s  academic  programs to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission. The commission
shall establish a  process for reviewing the significant program change for approval. The commission
shall establish, by rule, what constitutes a significant change to a university’s  academic program.
The commission shall further ensure that approved programs:
(a) Are consistent with the mission statement of the university;
(b) Do not unnecessarily duplicate academic programs offered by Oregon’s other public  univer-
sities;
(c) Are not located in a geographic  area that will cause undue hardship to Oregon’s other public
universities; [and]
(d) Are allocated among Oregon’s public  universities to maximize the achievement of statewide
needs and requirements ; and
(e) Submitted by Western Oregon University, Southern Oregon University  or Eastern
Oregon University comply with ORS 352.011 .
(3)(a) Pursuant to ORS 350.090, on or  before September 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall submit a consolidated funding request to  the
Governor on behalf of all public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(b) The Governor’s budget may include funding requests from public universities.
(4) As part of a funding request submitted  under subsection (3) of this section, a public univer-
sity listed in ORS  352.002 may request, and appropriations may include but are not limited to,
funding for education and general operations,  statewide public services, state-funded debt service,
capital improvements, deferred maintenance, special initiatives and investments or any  other pur-
pose authorized by ORS 350.075 (3)(e). Any moneys appropriated to pay  debt service for state bonds
must be held by the State Treasurer pursuant to an agreement entered into by the  State Treasurer
and a public university under ORS 352.135 (2).
(5) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 that wishes to  request the issuance of state bonds,
including a public university that elects to remain eligible to receive proceeds of  state bonds under
ORS 352.402, must make a request to this effect to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission.
The commission shall establish a process for reviewing  the request to issue state bonds. The com-
mission shall decide whether, and in what manner, to make a request  for the issuance of state bonds
to the Legislative Assembly.
(6)(a) Each public university listed in ORS 352.002 shall respond to  a request for data from the
Legislative Assembly or other state body by submitting the requested information to the  Higher
Education Coordinating Commission. The commission  shall consolidate the data received from public
[7]
SB 1521
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
universities. The commission  shall be responsible for providing the data to the Legislative Assembly
or other requesting entity.
(b) As used in  this subsection, “data” means any information that, as of August 14, 2013, is
collected by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission from each university and reported  to
the Legislative Assembly or any other state entity, including but not limited to  retention and grad-
uation rates and demographic information on students.
SECTION 12.
This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[8]