Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 660.010 is amended to read:
660.010. As used in ORS 660.002 to 660.210, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Apprentice” means a worker who is at least  16 years of age, except when a higher minimum
age is otherwise required by law, and who  is employed to learn an apprenticeable occupation under
standards of apprenticeship approved by the State Apprenticeship and  Training Council and under
an apprenticeship agreement recognized by the council.
(2) “Apprenticeable occupation” means a skilled trade that:
(a) Is customarily learned  in a practical way through a structured, systematic program of on-
the-job supervised training;
(b) Is clearly identified and commonly recognized throughout  an industry  or as a skilled
trade;
(c) Involves manual, mechanical or technical skills and knowledge  that require a minimum of
2,000 hours of on-the-job supervised training; and
(d) Requires related instruction to supplement the on-the-job training.
(3) “Apprenticeship agreement” means  a written agreement between an apprentice and either
the apprentice’s program sponsor or the local joint committee acting as the agent for the  program
sponsor that contains the minimum terms and conditions of the employment  and training of the ap-
prentice.
(4) “Course of study” means a  course of study for the instruction of apprentices or trainees es-
tablished in accordance with ORS 660.157.
(5) “District school board”  includes the boards of community college service districts, education
service districts, common school districts and community college districts.
(6) “Employer” means any person , including a local government or a local service  district,
employing the services of an apprentice, regardless of whether the person is a party to  an appren-
ticeship agreement with the apprentice.
(7) “Journeyworker” means a worker who has attained a level of skill,  abilities and competen-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2064
HB 2373
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cies recognized within an industry as  having mastered the skills and competencies required for the
occupation.
(8) “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
[(8)] (9)  “Local joint committee” includes local joint apprenticeship committees, local joint
training committees and trade committees.
(10) “Local service district” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
[(9)] (11) “Program” means the total system  of apprenticeship as operated by a particular local
joint committee, including the committee’s registered standards and all other  terms and conditions
for the  qualification, recruitment, selection, employment and training of apprentices in that
apprenticeable occupation.
[(10)] (12)  “Trainee” means a worker who is at least 16  years of age, except when a higher
minimum age is otherwise required by law, and who is to receive, in part consideration for services,
complete instruction in an occupation that meets all the requirements of  an apprenticeable occupa-
tion, except  that such occupation requires, in the opinion of the council, less than 2,000 but not less
than 1,000 hours of on-the-job supervised training.
[(11)] (13)  “Training agent” means an employer  that is registered with a local joint committee
and the Apprenticeship and Training Division of the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 660.120 is amended to read:
660.120. (1) The State Apprenticeship and Training Council, under the direction of the Appren-
ticeship and Training Division of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries, shall enforce the provisions
of ORS 660.002 to 660.210 in order  to carry out the intent and purposes of those provisions. The
State Director of Apprenticeship  and Training, the division and the council may conduct investi-
gations, issue subpoenas and subpoenas  duces tecum, obtain evidence, administer oaths and take
testimony in all matters relating to the council’s duties and functions as set  forth in ORS 660.002
to 660.210 when the information sought is relevant  to a lawful investigative purpose and is reason-
able in scope. The council and the division shall adopt rules for gathering  information through
subpoenas or testimony.  The rules must include procedures through which a party may object to
providing information. After being served  with a subpoena, if a person refuses, without reasonable
cause, to be examined, to answer any question or to produce any  document or other thing as re-
quired by the subpoena, the director, the division or the council may petition the  circuit court in
the county in which the investigation is pending for an order directing the person to  show cause
why the person has not complied with the subpoena and should  not be held in contempt. The di-
rector, division or council shall serve the court’s order upon the person in  the manner provided by
ORCP 55 D. If the person fails to show cause for the noncompliance, the court shall order the person
to comply with the subpoena within such time as the court shall direct and may hold the person  in
contempt.
(2) The division, on behalf of the council, may bring suit  in a court of proper jurisdiction in the
name of the Bureau of Labor and Industries, or  in the name of an apprentice on behalf of the ap-
prentice, through the district attorney or the Attorney General.
(3) The  council and the division may adopt rules that are reasonably necessary to enforce and
administer ORS 660.002 to 660.210. In adopting the rules, the  council and the division shall comply
with ORS chapter 183. In addition, if the council and  the division find that it would be impractical
for a number or all of the local joint committees in the state to  develop criteria concerning a par-
ticular matter, the council and the division may adopt rules on the matter. The rules  shall govern
on that matter except to the extent that a local joint committee’s approved standards contain ex-
[2]
HB 2373
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ceptions.
(4) The council and the division also shall:
(a) Establish policy of  the program so as to encourage the promotion, expansion and improve-
ment of programs of apprenticeship and training;
(b) Approve and  register program standards and modifications to program standards that are
submitted by appropriate local joint committees  as provided in ORS 660.126, if the standards and
modifications are in substantial conformity with the statewide standards approved under  ORS
660.155;
(c) Establish committees  and approve nominations of members and alternates to local joint
committees and state joint committees to ensure balanced representation of employer and  employee
groups;
(d) Deregister standards and terminate  entire programs, and remove any or all members of any
committee, for inactivity or inadequate activity, or for failure to abide by the  provisions of ORS
660.002 to 660.210 or by the rules and policies of the council and the division;
(e) Cooperate with interested local governments and  state and federal agencies, including the
Department of Education, the State Workforce and Talent Development Board and other providers
of related training and curriculum such as community college districts,  community college service
districts, education service districts , local service districts  and recognized industry programs; and
(f) Perform such other functions and duties as are necessary or appropriate to carry out the
purposes of ORS 660.002 to 660.210.
(5) The council shall hold  at least four regular public meetings each year. Executive sessions
shall be  held on call of the chairperson, or at the written request of a majority of the members of
the council.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 660.135 is amended to read:
660.135. (1)  In each locality where apprentices are employed, the State Apprenticeship and
Training Council  may approve as many local joint committees as are necessary to serve the needs
of the various apprenticeable occupations. Local joint committees in  building and construction
trades occupations may be approved by the council only as group programs serving multiple  em-
ployers.  The council may approve only  one local joint committee for firefighters within an
area or region that is subject to the jurisdiction of a local  government or local service dis-
trict.
(2) Each local joint  committee shall have no more than eight principal members, all actively
participating in apprenticeship  programs, and shall consist of an equal number of representatives
of employers and employees. One alternate member  may be selected for each principal committee
member. Committee members and the alternate members shall  be selected pursuant to procedures
established by  the council. The alternate members may attend all committee meetings, participate
in discussions and perform such duties as may be delegated to them by the committee, but may not
vote at committee meetings except when actually substituting for an absent principal  committee
member for their respective employer or employee.
(3) To qualify  as a local joint committee member representing employees, a prospective employee
representative must be a member of the collective bargaining unit if a  collective bargaining agree-
ment exists for the trade or occupation that is the subject of the apprenticeship  or training program
administered by the  committee. If no collective bargaining agreement exists, the prospective em-
ployee representative must be, or have been, a skilled practitioner of the particular trade or  occu-
pation that is the subject of the apprenticeship or training program administered by the  committee.
[3]
HB 2373
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) Each local joint committee shall select a chairperson and  a secretary, for such terms and
with such powers and duties necessary for the performance of the functions of  those offices as the
committee determines. A quorum for the  transaction of committee business consists of two repre-
sentatives of employers and two representatives of employees. Each local joint  committee shall meet
as often as is necessary to transact business. Meetings may be called by  the chairperson or at the
request of the majority of the members of the committee.
(5) When an individual is employed by a joint industry group, association or trust to assist local
joint apprenticeship or training committees, trade committees or state joint committees in the  per-
formance of their statutory duties, the individual  is authorized to perform any clerical, ministerial
or other functions as the committees may direct.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 660.157 is amended to read:
660.157. (1) Each state joint committee, with the prior approval  of the State Apprenticeship and
Training Council, shall prescribe a  standard course of study, developed from a trade analysis, for
the trade[ ,] or  craft , or an analysis of the practices of the  [industrial] occupation , over which the
committee exercises jurisdiction. Each such course of study  shall include instructional objectives
and an outline of course content for related instruction and manipulative instruction in  the class-
room. The prescribed course shall also provide for evaluation procedures and instruments for
measuring performance. For all programs in apprenticeable occupations  a minimum of 144 hours of
related instruction per year is recommended.
(2) Except  as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no course of study for the instruction
of apprentices or trainees that has not been prescribed pursuant to subsection  (1) of this section
may be implemented under ORS 660.002 to 660.210.
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, any course of study for  the instruc-
tion of apprentices or trainees may be implemented under ORS  660.002 to 660.210 where such course
of study:
(a) Involves instruction in any trades , [ or] crafts  or occupations  where the industry , local
government or local service district  will provide the facilities for training;
(b) Prepares apprentices and trainees in any trades , [ or] crafts  or occupations ;
(c) Requires expert instructors to meet the  level of skill and training required by the industry ,
the local government or the local service district ;
(d) Is substantially equivalent to the standard course prescribed under subsection (1) of this
section; and
(e) Is supervised by a local joint committee or by a joint industry trust fund committee.
(4) Where a course of study meets the requirements of subsection  (3) of this section, such course
shall be approved:
(a) By the state joint committee;
(b) By the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for apprenticeship training credit; and
(c) By the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for  community college associate degrees.
(5) Operation of a course  of study under subsection (3) of this section shall be the responsibility
of the recognized local apprenticeship committee or local industry trust fund  or recognized local
employee  organization.  Such local committee, trust or organization may prescribe criteria for en-
rollment into the course of study.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 660.162 is amended to read:
660.162. The Higher Education Coordinating Commission,  in cooperation with the State Ap-
prenticeship and Training Council and  the appropriate state joint committee, by rule shall adopt
[4]
HB 2373
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
policies, standards and  programs to carry out the provisions of ORS 660.002. Such policies, standards
or programs may involve any of the following matters:
(1) Development of courses of study for apprentices and trainees in the trade, craft or
[industrial] occupation over which the committee exercises jurisdiction.
(2) Operation of related instruction classes by district school boards  and in courses implemented
under ORS 660.157 (3).
(3) Development of uniform standards  covering occupational qualifications and teacher training
requirements for instructors.
(4) Preservice and inservice training for instructors.
(5) Evaluation procedures for determining credit for apprenticeship training toward community
college associate degrees.
(6) Defining procedures for granting credit for  work experience to instructors, skilled craftsmen
or journeyworkers toward the requirements of a community college associate degree.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Bureau of Labor and Industries, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out  of
the General Fund, the amount of $_____,  for the purpose of establishing a firefighter ap-
prentice program under ORS 660.002 to 660.210.
SECTION 7. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[5]