Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall study the
schools of this state and develop a list of job profiles for each unlicensed job at a school.
(2) The job profiles must use standardized job titles and descriptions  of the work associ-
ated with the jobs to facilitate adoption by school districts and statewide uniformity.
(3) No later than July 1, 2027, the department shall:
(a) Finalize and distribute the job profiles to each school district in this state.
(b) Finalize and distribute the job profiles to the Department of Education.
(c) Publish the job profiles  to the website of the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services.
(4) The department may enter into a contract with a third party  to carry out the re-
sponsibilities of the department under this section.
(5)(a) The department shall convene an advisory committee to advise the department  in
carrying out this section.
(b) The advisory committee must include representation from the Department of  Edu-
cation, the Coalition of Oregon  School Administrators and the Oregon School Employees
Association.
(c) The advisory committee shall conduct its first meeting no later than December 1,
2025.
(6)(a) No later than December 1, 2026, the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services
shall submit an interim report on the findings and recommendations from  the study, in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to education.
(b) No later than July 1, 2027, the department shall submit a final report on the  findings
and recommendations from the study,  in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 947
SB 446
1
2
3
4
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]