Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468.442 is amended to read:
468.442. As used in ORS 468.442 to 468.449:
(1) “Light-duty zero-emission vehicle” means a motor vehicle that:
(a) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 8,500 pounds or less;
(b) Is capable of attaining a speed of 55 miles per hour or more; and
(c) Is powered:
(A) Primarily by an electric battery and may or may not use a flywheel energy storage device
or a capacitor that also stores energy to assist in vehicle operation.
(B) By polymer electrolyte membrane fuel cells or proton exchange  membrane fuel cells that use
hydrogen fuel and oxygen from the air to produce electricity.
(C) Primarily by a zero-emission energy storage device that provides enough power  for the ve-
hicle to travel 75 miles or more  using only electricity and may or may not use a backup alternative
power unit that does not operate until the energy storage device is fully depleted.
(2) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.360.
(3) “Neighborhood electric vehicle” means a low-speed vehicle that:
(a) Is powered using an electric battery;
(b) Has a gross vehicle weight not exceeding 3,000 pounds; and
(c) Has at least four wheels.
(4) “Person” means a person as defined in ORS  174.100 [ or a public body as defined in ORS
174.109].
(5) “Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle” means a hybrid electric motor vehicle that:
(a) Has zero evaporative emissions from its fuel system;
(b) Has an onboard electrical energy storage device with  useful capacity of 10 or more miles
of urban dynamometer driving schedule  range, as described by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency, on electricity alone;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3565
HB 3716
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Is equipped with an onboard charger;
(d) Is rechargeable from an external connection to an off-board electrical source;
(e) Meets the super ultra-low emission vehicle  standards for exhaust emissions, as defined by the
Environmental Quality Commission by rule;
(f) Has a warranty of at least 15 years and 150,000 miles on emission control components; and
(g) Is capable of attaining a speed of 55 miles per hour or more.
(6) “Qualifying vehicle” means a motor vehicle that:
(a) Is a:
(A) Light-duty zero-emission vehicle;
(B) Neighborhood electric vehicle;
(C) Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle; or
(D) Zero-emission motorcycle;
(b) Is new, or has been previously used only as a dealership floor model or test-drive vehicle;
(c) Has not previously been registered;
(d) Is constructed entirely from new parts that have never been the subject of a retail sale;
(e) Has a base manufacturer’s suggested retail price of less than:
(A) $50,000; or
(B) If the motor vehicle is powered as described in subsection (1)(c)(B) of this section, $60,000;
(f) Is  covered by a manufacturer’s express warranty on the vehicle drive train, including the
applicable energy storage system or battery pack, for at least 24 months from  the date of purchase;
and
(g) Is certified by the manufacturer to comply with all applicable federal safety standards  issued
by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration for  new motor vehicles and new motor ve-
hicle equipment.
(7)(a) “Vehicle dealer” means:
(A) A person engaged in business  in this state that has been issued a vehicle dealer certificate
under ORS 822.020; and
(B) A person  engaged in business in another state that would be subject to ORS 822.005 if the
person engaged in business in this state.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a person is not a vehicle dealer for  pur-
poses of ORS 468.442 to 468.449 to the extent the person:
(A) Conducts an event that lasts less than seven consecutive days, for  which the public is
charged admission and at which otherwise qualifying vehicles are sold at auction; or
(B) Sells an otherwise qualifying vehicle at auction at an event described in this paragraph.
(8) “Zero-emission motorcycle” means a motorcycle that:
(a) Has zero evaporative emissions from its fuel system;
(b) Is capable of attaining a speed of 55 miles per hour or more;
(c) Is designed to travel on two wheels; and
(d) Is powered by electricity.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 468.444 is amended to read:
468.444. (1) The Department of  Environmental Quality shall establish a program for providing
rebates to [ persons] individuals that purchase or lease qualifying vehicles for use in this state. The
Director of the Department of Environmental Quality  may hire or contract with a third-party or-
ganization to implement and serve as the administrator of the program required by this section.
(2) The department may:
[2]
HB 3716
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Specify design features for the program; and
(b) Establish procedures to:
(A) Prioritize available moneys for specific qualifying vehicles; and
(B) Limit the number of rebates available for each type of qualifying vehicle.
(3) The purchaser  or lessee of a qualifying vehicle may apply for a rebate for a portion of the
purchase price or may choose to assign the rebate to a vehicle dealer or lessor.
(4) Rebates under the program shall be made from moneys credited to or deposited in the  Zero-
Emission Incentive Fund established under ORS 468.449.  A rebate may not be made until there are
sufficient moneys available in the fund to make the rebate.
(5) The department shall prescribe the rebate application procedure for  purchasers and lessees.
All rebate applications must include a declaration under penalty of perjury in the form required by
ORCP 1 E.
(6) Rebates for qualifying vehicles shall be set annually by the department as follows:
(a) For light-duty zero-emission vehicles and plug-in  hybrid electric vehicles with an
electrochemical energy storage capacity of 10 kilowatt hours or  more, up to $2,500 but no less than
$1,500.
(b) For light-duty zero-emission vehicles or plug-in  hybrid electric vehicles with an
electrochemical energy storage capacity of less than 10 kilowatt  hours, up to $1,500 but no less than
$750.
(c) For neighborhood electric vehicles, up to $750 but not less than $375.
(d) For zero-emission motorcycles, up to $750 but not less than $375.
(7) To be eligible for a rebate, [ a person ] an individual requesting a rebate under the program
shall:
(a) Purchase or lease a qualifying vehicle. A lease must have a minimum term of 24 months.
(b) Provide proof of an intent to use the qualifying vehicle  primarily on the public highways of
this state, which  may be satisfied by providing proof of registration of the qualifying vehicle in
Oregon.
(c) Submit an application for a  rebate to the administrator of the program within six months
after the date of purchase of the qualifying vehicle or six months  after the date the lease of the
qualifying vehicle begins.
(d) Retain registration of the  qualifying vehicle for a minimum of 24 consecutive months after
the date of purchase or the date the lease begins.
(8) An individual is not eligible to receive a rebate  if the individual or a member of the
individual’s household has received a rebate described in this section or  a charge ahead re-
bate, as defined in ORS 468.446, within the past four years.
[(8)] (9)  A rebate recipient  may not make or allow any modifications to the qualifying vehicle’s
emissions control systems, hardware, software calibrations or hybrid system.
[(9)(a)] (10)(a) If a rebate recipient sells the qualifying vehicle or terminates the qualifying ve-
hicle lease before the end of 24 months, the rebate recipient shall:
(A) Notify the administrator of the program of the sale or termination; and
(B) Reimburse the administrator for the rebate  in a prorated amount based on the number of
months that the rebate recipient owned or leased the qualifying vehicle.
(b) The administrator  may waive the reimbursement requirement under paragraph (a) of this
subsection if the administrator  determines that a waiver is appropriate given unforeseeable or una-
voidable circumstances that gave rise  to a need for the rebate recipient to sell the qualifying vehicle
[3]
HB 3716
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or terminate the qualifying vehicle lease before the end of 24 months.
[(10)] (11) Rebate recipients may be requested to participate in ongoing research efforts.
[(11)] (12) The administrator of the  program shall work to ensure timely payment of rebates with
a goal of paying rebates within 60 days after receiving an application for a rebate.
[(12)] (13)  A vehicle dealer may advertise the program on the premises owned or operated  by
the vehicle dealer. If no moneys are available from the program or the program otherwise changes,
a vehicle dealer who  advertises the program may not be held liable for advertising false or mis-
leading information.
[(13)] (14) The Environmental Quality Commission may adopt any rules necessary to  carry out
the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 468.446, as amended by section 9, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
468.446. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Charge ahead rebate” means a rebate for the purchase  or lease of a new or used light-duty
zero-emission vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle  issued through the Charge Ahead Oregon
Program established under this section.
[(b) “Low-income service provider” means an organization that provides health, dental, social, fi-
nancial, energy  conservation or other assistive services to low or moderate income individuals or low
or moderate  income households, as further defined by the Environmental Quality Commission by
rule.]
[(c)] (b)  “Qualifying household” means a household with income that does not  exceed 400 per-
cent of federal poverty guidelines.
(2) The Department of Environmental Quality shall establish a Charge Ahead Oregon  Program
for providing charge ahead rebates to  qualifying households [ and low-income service providers ]. The
Director of the Department of Environmental Quality  may hire or contract with a third-party or-
ganization to implement and serve as the administrator of the program required by this section.
(3) The department may:
(a) Specify design features for the program; and
(b) Establish procedures to:
(A) Prioritize available moneys to specific income levels or geographic areas; and
(B) Limit the number of charge ahead rebates available.
(4) An eligible purchaser  or lessee of a new or used light-duty zero-emission vehicle or plug-in
hybrid electric vehicle may apply  for a charge ahead rebate for a portion of the purchase price or
may choose to assign the charge ahead rebate to a vehicle dealer or lessor.
(5) Rebates under the Charge Ahead Oregon Program shall  be made from moneys credited to
or deposited in the Zero-Emission Incentive Fund established under ORS 468.449 or the  Charge
Ahead Zero-Emission Incentive Fund established under section  13, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2024.
A rebate may not be made unless there are sufficient moneys available to make the rebate.
(6) The department shall prescribe the rebate application  procedure for eligible purchasers and
lessees. All rebate applications must include a declaration under penalty of  perjury in the form re-
quired by ORCP 1 E.
(7) Charge ahead rebates shall be:
(a) Up to $7,500  for the purchase or lease of a new light-duty zero-emission vehicle or plug-in
hybrid electric vehicle, but not less than $2,500; or
(b) Up to $5,000 for the purchase  or lease of a used light-duty zero-emission vehicle or plug-in
[4]
HB 3716
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
hybrid electric vehicle, but not less than $2,500.
(8) To be eligible for a charge ahead rebate, [ a person ] an individual requesting a rebate under
the program must:
(a) Be a member of a qualifying household [ or be a low-income service provider ].
(b) Purchase or  lease a new or used light-duty zero-emission vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric
vehicle. A lease must have a minimum term of 24 months.
(c) Provide proof of an intent to use the light-duty  zero-emission vehicle or plug-in hybrid elec-
tric vehicle primarily on the public highways of  this state, which may be satisfied by providing proof
of registration of the vehicle in Oregon.
(d) Submit an application for a charge ahead rebate to the administrator of the program  within
six months of the date of purchase or six months from the date the lease begins.
(e) Retain registration of the light-duty zero-emission vehicle for a minimum  of 24 consecutive
months following the date of purchase or following the date the lease begins.
(9) [ A person ] An individual that receives a charge ahead rebate may not make or allow any
modifications to the vehicle’s emissions control systems,  hardware, software calibrations or hybrid
system.
(10)(a) If a charge ahead rebate recipient sells the vehicle or terminates the vehicle  lease before
the end of 24 months, the charge ahead rebate recipient shall:
(A) Notify the administrator of the program of the sale or termination; and
(B) Reimburse the administrator for the rebate  in a prorated amount based on the number of
months that the rebate recipient owned or leased the qualifying vehicle.
(b) The administrator  may waive the reimbursement requirement under paragraph (a) of this
subsection if the administrator  determines that a waiver is appropriate given unforeseeable or una-
voidable circumstances that gave rise  to a need for the rebate recipient to sell the qualifying vehicle
or terminate the qualifying vehicle lease before the end of 24 months.
(11) Charge  ahead rebate recipients may be requested to participate in ongoing research efforts.
(12) The administrator of the program shall work to ensure timely payment of charge ahead re-
bates with a goal of paying rebates within 60 days  of receiving an application for a charge ahead
rebate.
(13) In establishing the Charge Ahead Oregon Program, the department shall  provide opportu-
nities for public comment by  qualifying households[ , low-income service providers ] and [ other]
community-based organizations that are located  in areas of this state that have elevated concen-
trations of air contaminants attributable to motor vehicle emissions, relative to  other areas of the
state. The department shall use the comments received pursuant to this  subsection to inform, eval-
uate and strengthen the design of the program in order to increase the usage  of light-duty zero-
emission vehicles and plug-in hybrid electric vehicles.
(14) The administrator of the  program shall, throughout the course of implementing the program,
conduct community outreach  to qualifying households[ , low-income service providers ] and [ other]
community-based organizations that are located in areas of this state  that have elevated concen-
trations of air contaminants attributable  to motor vehicle emissions, relative to other areas of the
state, in order to:
(a) Solicit feedback on program implementation; and
(b) Take steps to ensure that the program is promoted effectively.
(15) A vehicle dealer may advertise the Charge Ahead  Oregon Program on the premises owned
or operated by the vehicle dealer. If no moneys are available from the program  or the program
[5]
HB 3716
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
otherwise changes, a vehicle  dealer who advertises the program may not be held liable for adver-
tising false or misleading information.
(16)(a) A charge ahead rebate may not be combined with a rebate described in ORS 468.444.
(b) An  individual is not eligible to receive a charge ahead rebate if the individual or a
member of the individual’s household has received a charge ahead rebate or a rebate de-
scribed in ORS 468.444 within the past four years.
(17) An organization that the department has hired or contracted with to implement and  serve
as the administrator of the program may offer  expanded financing mechanisms for program partic-
ipants, including, but not limited to, a loan or loan-loss reserve credit enhancement program  to in-
crease consumer access to new or used light-duty zero-emission vehicles and plug-in  hybrid electric
vehicles.
(18) The Environmental Quality Commission may adopt  any rules necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 468.449, as amended by section 11, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
468.449. (1) The  Zero-Emission Incentive Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Zero-Emission  Incentive Fund shall be cred-
ited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Zero-Emission Incentive Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts transferred to the fund by the Department of Revenue under ORS 320.435;
(c) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(d) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any public or private source; and
(e) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) The Department of Environmental  Quality shall encourage gifts, grants, donations or other
contributions to the fund.
(4) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the department to be used to carry out
the provisions of ORS 468.442 to 468.449.
(5)(a) No more than 10 percent of the moneys deposited in  the fund per biennium may be ex-
pended to pay administrative expenses incurred in the administration of ORS 468.442 to 468.449 by:
(A) The department; and
(B) Any third-party organization  that the department hires or contracts with under ORS 468.444
and 468.446.
(b) As used in this subsection, “administrative expenses” does not include expenses incurred  by
the department or third-party organizations in:
(A) Conducting community outreach under ORS 468.446 (14); or
(B) Otherwise engaging in efforts to promote transportation electrification  through participation
in the programs established under ORS 468.444 and 468.446.
(6)(a) The Environmental Quality Commission may adopt by rule  provisions for the allocation
of moneys deposited in the fund between the programs established under ORS 468.444 and 468.446.
(b) Rules adopted under this subsection  must require that at least [ 20] 60 percent of the moneys
deposited in the fund per  biennium are allocated to fund the provision of rebates through the Charge
Ahead Oregon Program established under ORS 468.446.
(c) The amount required to be allocated under paragraph (b) of this subsection in  any biennium
shall be reduced, but not below zero, by the amount deposited from any other source  in the Charge
[6]
HB 3716
1
2
Ahead Zero-Emission Incentive Fund established under section 13, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2024.
[7]