Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 813.021 is amended to read:
813.021. (1) When a court, in accordance  with ORS 813.020, requires a person to complete a
screening interview and a treatment program, the court shall require the person to  do all of the
following:
(a) Complete a screening interview for the purpose of determining appropriate placement  of the
person in a program for treatment for alcoholism, drug dependency or dependency on inhalants.
(b) Pay directly to the agency or organization conducting  the screening interview a  fee of
[$150] $250.
(c) Complete the treatment program to which the person is referred.
(d) Pay for the treatment program to which the person is referred.
(2) The screening interview required  by this section shall be conducted by an agency or organ-
ization designated by the court. The designated agency or organization  must meet the standards set
by the Director of the  Oregon Health Authority to conduct the screening interviews. Wherever
possible a court shall designate agencies or organizations to perform the  screening interview that
are separate from those that may be designated to carry out a treatment program.
(3) An  agency or organization doing a screening interview under this section may not refer a
person to  a treatment program that has not been approved by the Director of the Oregon Health
Authority.
(4) The agency or organization conducting  a screening interview under this section shall moni-
tor the progress of the person referred to the  agency or organization. The agency or organization
shall make  a report to the referring court stating the person’s successful completion or failure to
complete all or any part of the screening interview or of the  treatment program to which the person
was referred by the agency or organization performing the screening interview. The report  shall be
in a form determined by agreement between the  court and the agency or organization providing the
screening  interview.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 813.021 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to fees
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 613
HB 3174
1
2
3
4
imposed on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]