Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, for ground water studies and investigations,  or other
ground water data gathering and analysis needed to assess and manage  Oregon’s ground
water resources, conducted in cooperation with  the United States Geological Survey in pri-
ority basins determined by the department.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2132