Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 315.514 is amended to read:
315.514. (1) A credit against the taxes that are otherwise due  under ORS chapter 316 or, if the
taxpayer is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317 or 318, is allowed to a taxpayer  for certified film
production development contributions made  by the taxpayer to the Oregon Production Investment
Fund established under ORS 284.367.
(2)(a) The Department of Revenue shall, in cooperation with the Oregon Film and  Video Office,
conduct an auction of tax credits under this section.  The auction may be conducted no later than
April 15 following December 31 of any tax year for  which the credit is allowed. The department may
conduct the auction in the manner that it determines is best  suited to maximize the return to the
state on the sale of tax credit certifications and shall announce  a reserve bid prior to conducting
the auction. The reserve amount  shall be at least 90 percent of the total amount of the tax credit.
Moneys necessary to  reimburse the department for the actual costs incurred by the department in
administering an auction, not to exceed 0.25 percent of  auction proceeds, are continuously appro-
priated to the department. The department shall deposit net receipts from  the auction required un-
der this section in the Oregon Production Investment Fund.
(b) The Oregon Film and Video Office shall adopt rules in order to achieve the following  goals:
(A) Subject to paragraph (a) of this subsection, generate contributions for which tax credits of
[$20 million] $28 million are certified for each fiscal year;
(B) Maximize income and  excise tax revenues that are retained by the State of Oregon for state
operations;  and
(C) Provide  the necessary financial incentives for taxpayers to make contributions, taking into
consideration the impact of granting a credit upon a taxpayer’s federal income tax liability.
(3) Contributions made under this section shall be deposited in the Oregon Production  Invest-
ment Fund.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3808
HB 3329
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
(4)(a) Upon receipt of a contribution, the Oregon  Film and Video Office shall, except as provided
in ORS 315.516, issue to the  taxpayer written certification of the amount certified for tax credit
under this section to the extent the amount certified for tax credit, when added to all  amounts
previously certified for tax credit under this  section, does not exceed [ $20 million] $28 million for
the fiscal year in which certification is made.
(b) The Oregon Film and Video Office  may issue a certification for a credit under this section,
and a credit may be allowed, for the tax year in which a contribution  is made, or for the tax year
immediately preceding the tax year in which a contribution  is made and for auctions conducted no
later than April 15 following December 31 of any tax year for which the credit is allowed, if no re-
turn has yet been filed for the preceding tax year.
(c) The Oregon Film and Video Office and the department are not liable, and a  refund of a
contributed amount need not be made, if  a taxpayer who has received tax credit certification is
unable to use all or a portion of the tax credit to offset the tax liability of the taxpayer.
(5) To the extent  the Oregon Film and Video Office does not certify contributed amounts as el-
igible for a tax credit under this section, the taxpayer may request a refund of the amount the tax-
payer contributed, and the office shall refund that amount.
(6)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a tax credit claimed under  this
section may not exceed the tax liability  of the taxpayer and may not be carried over to another tax
year.
(b) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under  this section that is not used by the taxpayer in a
particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability for the next
succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax year  may be carried
forward and used in  the second succeeding tax year, and likewise, any credit not used in that second
succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the third succeeding tax year but may  not
be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(c) A taxpayer is not eligible for a tax credit under this section if the first tax year  for which
the credit would otherwise be allowed begins on or after January 1, 2030.
(7) If a tax credit is claimed under this section by a  nonresident or part-year resident taxpayer,
the amount shall be allowed without proration under ORS 316.117.
(8) If the amount of  contribution for which a tax credit certification is made is allowed as a
deduction for federal tax purposes, the amount of the contribution shall be  added to federal taxable
income for Oregon tax purposes.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 315.514 by section 1 of this 2025 Act  apply to fiscal
years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]