Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Human  Services, in collaboration with the Oregon Health
Authority, shall establish a  statewide Center of Excellence on Behavioral Health for Older
Adults and People with Disabilities. The center shall:
(1) Promote the behavioral health of older adults and people with disabilities residing in
this state through a network of state and local services and support systems that  reach out
to older adults and people with disabilities who have mental health and substance  use disor-
ders;
(2) Identify and emphasize  programs, research, technology and policy issues addressing
behavioral health for older adults and  people with disabilities who have mental health or
substance use disorders; and
(3) Provide leadership, best practices, support and training focusing  on behavioral health
issues related to older adults and people with disabilities who have  mental health or sub-
stance use disorders.
SECTION 2. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human Services,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out
of the General  Fund, the amount of $2 million, which may be expended for carrying out
section 1 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The department shall enter into an interagency agreement with the Oregon  Health
Authority to transfer a portion of the  funds appropriated by this section from the depart-
ment to the authority to be expended by the  authority in carrying out its responsibilities
under section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1240