Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 2. No later than January 1, 2027,  every agency shall review the agency’s rules
and amend the rules to  simplify the rules and eliminate redundancy within the agency’s rules
and with the rules of other agencies.
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1211