Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Bureau of Labor and Industries shall study issues regarding  the pay-
ment of certain  bonuses for purposes of laws relating to pay equity. The bureau shall submit
a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for leg-
islation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative Assembly related to business and labor
no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2912