Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) To elevate the experiences of and improve the health and quality of life
of older adults in Oregon and enhance the attractiveness of communities  in Oregon to people
of all ages, each agency listed in subsection (2) of this section shall, in  determining whether
and how to act, consider the effects of the action on older adult populations.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies to:
(a) The Oregon Health Authority;
(b) The Department of Human Services;
(c) The Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(d) The Oregon Business Development Department;
(e) The Department of Education;
(f) The Department of Transportation;
(g) The Bureau of Labor and Industries;
(h) The Housing and Community Services Department;
(i) The Department of Land Conservation and Development;
(j) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs;
(k) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission;
(L) The Employment Department;
(m) The division of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services that serves as  the
office of economic analysis;
(n) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board; and
(o) Local workforce development boards, as defined in ORS 660.300.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Shared Future Oregon Task Force is established.
(2) The task force consists of:
(a) Two members appointed by the President of  the Senate from among the members of
the Senate, including one member from the majority party and one member from the mi-
nority party.
(b) Two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of  Representatives from among
the members of  the House of Representatives, including one member from the majority party
and one member from the minority party.
(c) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority or the director’s designee.
(d) The Director of Human Services or the director’s designee.
(e) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business  Services or the director’s
designee.
(f) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department  or the director’s
designee.
(g) The Superintendent of Public Instruction or the superintendent’s designee.
(h) The Director of Transportation or the director’s designee.
(i) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries or the commissioner’s
designee.
[2]
HB 3497
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(j) The Director of the Housing and Community Services Department or the  director’s
designee.
(k) The Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development  or the
director’s designee.
(L) The Director of Veterans’ Affairs or the director’s designee.
(m) The  executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission or the
executive director’s designee.
(n) The Director of the Employment Department or the director’s designee.
(o) The chairperson of the Governor’s Commission on Senior Services.
(p) A representative of the division of the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services
that serves as the office of economic analysis.
(q) The chairperson of  the State Workforce and Talent Development Board or the
chairperson’s designee.
(r) Four community members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(A) A representative  of a statewide nonprofit organization focused on older adults that
has technical expertise on aging  and on building capacity within organizations to better serve
older adults.
(B) A representative of an organization  that advocates for older adults and has broad
membership throughout this state.
(C) Two representatives of the coalition described in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Develop a multisector plan for aging that:
(A) Provides a comprehensive  framework for Oregon state government, local govern-
ments, private and nonprofit sector entities and philanthropists and philanthropic organiza-
tions to implement coordinated statewide strategies and partnerships to promote healthy
aging and prepare for the growth of this state’s older adult population;
(B) Includes guidance to state agencies on complying with section 1 of this 2025 Act;
(C) Identifies opportunities for systems  change to support older Oregonians living and
aging in their communities, including in the priority areas of housing, overall  health, paid
and unpaid caregiving, workforce and economic vitality;
(D) Includes recommendations to better coordinate federal, state and  local government
programs and services to  serve and support the needs of older adults, their families and their
caregivers;
(E) Includes recommendations to better engage older adults in efforts to address
workforce shortages, especially in the areas of  early childhood education, caregiving and
end-of-life care;
(F) Includes recommendations for reducing substance use among older adults;
(G) Includes key data indicators, with 10-year targets, to support  implementation of the
plan; and
(H) Includes strategies and rubrics to measure progress in implementing the plan.
(b) Develop recommendations, including recommendations for  legislation if necessary, for
an appropriate continuing body to:
(A) Oversee and coordinate implementation of the plan developed under this section;
(B) Update, oversee and create consistent tools for  state agencies to implement the
guidance in the plan; and
[3]
HB 3497
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Update the plan as necessary based on key performance indicators.
(4) In developing the plan described in subsection  (3) of this section, the task force shall:
(a) Engage with interested parties in the community and provide updates on the plan’s
development and implementation;
(b) Review and consider research and  reports relevant to developing a comprehensive
plan for aging in this state;
(c) Coordinate  with and regularly solicit input from a coalition of private entities,
nonprofit organizations, membership organizations, culturally specific entities,
philanthropists and philanthropic organizations and other interested parties convened for the
purpose of understanding the impacts of the demographic shift in Oregon  toward an older
population and engaging in research, advocacy and  coordination to create systems change
to support older Oregonians living and aging in their communities; and
(d) Before finalizing the plan,  solicit and incorporate comments on the draft plan from
the coalition described under this subsection.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The President of the Senate and  the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
appoint one of the task force’s members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to addressing Oregon’s aging  population no later than December 15, 2026.
The report must contain:
(a) A final multisector plan for aging;
(b) Recommendations for an appropriate continuing body to oversee implementation of
the plan and recommendations for legislation as necessary to create or  provide authority to
the recommended body; and
(c) Recommendations for  any other legislative changes or budgetary actions necessary
to implement the plan.
(12) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall provide  staff support to the task
force.
(13) No later than 60 days after  appointments to the task force have been completed, the
Legislative Policy and Research Director shall work with the chairperson of the  task force
to prepare a work plan for the task force to review and adopt. The task force, by  official
action, may modify the work plan.
(14) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(15)(a) Community members of the task force who are appointed by  the Governor and
who have incomes at  or below 400 percent of the federal poverty guidelines are entitled to
[4]
HB 3497
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
compensation for actual and necessary expenses incurred  by the members in the perform-
ance of their official duties, as provided in ORS 292.495.
(b) Members of the task force who are  members of the Legislative Assembly are entitled
to a per diem as provided in ORS 171.072 (4).
(c) Members not described in paragraph (a) or  (b) of this subsection are not entitled to
compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(16) The task force may accept public or private funding to carry out  the goals of this
section.
(17) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]