Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As  used in this section, “antisemitism” means a perception of Jews which
may be expressed  as hatred toward Jews or through rhetorical or physical manifestations
directed toward Jewish or  non-Jewish individuals or their property, toward Jewish commu-
nity institutions or toward religious facilities.
(2) The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that it is the policy  of this state to
combat antisemitism.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2150