Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Transportation shall:
(1) Add a southbound auxiliary lane on Interstate 5 across Boone Bridge beginning at  the
Exit 283 entrance ramp and ending at the Exit 282A exit ramp;
(2) Add a second exit lane to the Exit 282A exit ramp; and
(3) Make seismic improvements to Boone Bridge.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4297