Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 321.015 is amended to read:
321.015. (1) For the calendar years beginning  January 1, [ 2024] 2026, and  January 1, [ 2025]
2027, there is levied a privilege  tax of [ 90.00]  cents per thousand feet, board measure, upon
taxpayers for the privilege of harvesting of all merchantable forest products harvested  on
forestlands. Subject to ORS 321.145, the  proceeds of the tax shall be transferred as provided in ORS
321.152 (2) to  the Forest Research and Experiment Account for use for the forest resource research,
experimentation and studies described in ORS 526.215 and for the Forest Research  Laboratory es-
tablished under ORS 526.225.
(2) Except as provided in  ORS 477.760, in addition to the tax levied by subsection (1) of this
section, there is  levied a forest products harvest tax upon taxpayers of 62.5 cents per thousand feet,
board measure, for the privilege of harvesting all  merchantable forest products harvested on
forestlands for the payment of benefits related to fire suppression as provided in ORS 321.005  to
321.185, 321.560 to 321.600 and 477.440 to 477.460.
(3) For  the calendar years beginning January 1, [ 2024] 2026, and January 1, [ 2025] 2027, in ad-
dition to the  taxes levied under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, there is levied a privilege tax
upon taxpayers for the privilege of harvesting  all merchantable forest products harvested on
forestlands in the amount of [ 253.46]  cents per thousand feet, board measure, for the pur-
pose of administering the Oregon Forest Practices Act in an amount not to exceed 40  percent of the
total expenditures approved by the Legislative Assembly for this purpose,  including salary adjust-
ments approved by the Legislative Assembly for fiscal years [ 2024] 2026 and [ 2025] 2027.
(4) For  the calendar years beginning January 1, [ 2024] 2026, and January 1, [ 2025] 2027, in ad-
dition to the taxes  levied by subsections (1) to (3) of this section, there is levied a privilege tax of
[21]  cents per thousand feet, board measure, upon taxpayers  for the privilege of harvesting
all merchantable forest  products harvested on forestlands. Subject to ORS 321.145, the proceeds of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 414
HB 2816
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
the tax  shall be transferred as provided in ORS 321.152 (5) to the subaccount established pursuant
to ORS 350.520 for use by Oregon State University for the purpose of making investments  in pro-
fessional forestry education at the College of Forestry.
(5) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the  taxes shall be measured by and be applicable to
each per thousand feet, board measure,  on the total quantity of forest products harvested in this
state measured by use of any log scale which is or may  be in general use in the logging industry
and which is designed to measure total volume of merchantable forest products in board feet.  How-
ever, if the Department of Revenue finds that the scale used  by any taxpayer in computing the taxes
due under ORS 321.005 to 321.185 and 321.560 to 321.600 does not accurately reflect the  total
quantity of merchantable forest products harvested by the taxpayer, it may require the  taxpayer to
adopt another log scale  in general use in the industry which in the department’s opinion will accu-
rately reflect merchantable harvest in board feet.
(6) The first 25,000 feet, board measure, of forest products harvested annually by any  taxpayer
during each calendar year shall be excluded from the total quantity of harvested forest products that
constitutes the measure of the taxes under ORS 321.005 to 321.185 and 321.560 to 321.600.
(7)(a) Not later than March 10 of each odd-numbered  year, the Legislative Assembly shall begin
considering the biennial forest products harvest tax rates levied under subsections (1),  (3) and (4)
of this section.
(b) Upon request of the Legislative Revenue Officer or  the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the State
Forestry Department shall provide the respective officers with relevant timber harvest data  for the
purposes of paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]