Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act:
(1) “Curriculum” means a complete course of study for a particular content area or grade
level, including any required supplemental materials or associated online instruction.
(2) “Education savings account”  or “ESA” means an account to which funds are allocated
by the State Treasurer to the parent of an eligible student in order to pay for qualified  edu-
cation expenses pursuant to the requirements  and conditions of sections 1 to 7 of this 2021
Act.
(3) “Education service provider” means a person or organization  that receives payments
from an  education savings account in exchange for authorized expenditures. Education ser-
vice providers include:
(a) Private schools;
(b) Nonpublic online learning programs or courses;
(c) State institutions of higher education, including:
(A) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002;
(B) Community colleges established under ORS chapter 341; or
(C) Any other post-secondary institutions of education that  were originally established
in this state, are tax exempt under section 501(c)(3) of  the Internal Revenue Code, and are
accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United  State De-
partment of Education.
(d) Public schools, including public charter schools;
(e) Private tutors and tutoring facilities;
(f) Companies that provide educational materials or curriculum;
(g) Individuals or businesses that provide education-related therapies or services; or
(h) Any other providers of educational services approved by the State Treasurer.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1396
SB 658
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) “Eligible student” means a resident of this  state who is eligible to enroll in a public
elementary or secondary school or with any other education service provider.
(5) “Parent” means the parent, legal guardian or other person who has the legal duty  to
ensure a child receives an education as provided by ORS 339.020.
(6) “Private tutoring” means:
(a) Tutoring services provided by a tutor or tutoring  facility that is accredited by a re-
gional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Educa-
tion; or
(b) A person who:
(A) Is eligible to work as a teacher in this state;
(B) Has taught at an institution of higher education;
(C) Is a subject matter expert; or
(D) Is otherwise approved by the State Treasurer.
(7) “Student” means an eligible student  who is participating in the ESA program under
sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) A parent may establish an ESA for  an eligible student by entering into
a written agreement as  provided in this section. A written agreement is valid for one year
and must  be renewed for each subsequent school year. Renewals of written agreements shall
be as provided by section 3 (5) of this 2021 Act.
(2)(a) The State  Treasurer shall create a standard written agreement that a parent can
submit to establish an ESA for an eligible student of the parent. The  State Treasurer shall
ensure that written agreement forms are available online and may be submitted online.
(b) The State Treasurer must approve the establishment of an ESA for an eligible student
if a written agreement is entered into pursuant to this section.
(c) A parent must  enter into a separate written agreement for each eligible student of
the parent. No more than one ESA may be established for each eligible student.
(3) A  written agreement entered into by the parent of an eligible student must provide
that:
(a) The student will receive instruction for the school  year for which the written agree-
ment applies in at least the subjects of reading, language, mathematics, science  and social
studies;
(b) The student will not  enroll as a full-time student in a public school for the school year
for which the written agreement applies;
(c) The parent will use the funds in the ESA only for qualifying expenses as  described in
section 4 of this 2021 Act;
(d) The parent and the  student will comply with the rules and requirements of sections
1 to 7 of this 2021 Act and any related rules or policies adopted by the State Treasurer;
(e) The student  will receive a grant, in the form of moneys deposited pursuant to section
3 of this 2021 Act, in the ESA established for the student; and
(f) If the student qualifies as a child with a  disability, as defined in ORS 343.035, the State
Treasurer shall  ensure that the parent who signs the agreement receives notice that par-
ticipation in the ESA program is a parental placement of the eligible student under 20 U.S.C.
1412 along with an explanation of the rights that  parentally placed students possess under
the federal Individuals with Disabilities Act and any applicable state laws.
(4) Upon entering into or renewing a written agreement,  the State Treasurer shall pro-
[2]
SB 658
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vide a parent with a  written explanation of the allowable uses of ESA funds, the responsi-
bilities of the parent, the duties of the State Treasurer and the  role of any private financial
management firms or other private organizations that the  State Treasurer may contract
with to administer sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act pursuant to section 5 of this 2021 Act.
(5) Compliance with the written agreement shall satisfy the compulsory school attend-
ance requirements  of ORS 339.010. Students participating in the ESA program described in
sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act who are not enrolled as a  full-time student in a private school
shall be exempt from the requirements of ORS 339.035.
(6) The State Treasurer shall annually  renew an eligible student’s ESA unless notified
by a parent that the parent wishes to terminate the ESA. An eligible student with a disability
shall remain eligible for renewal of an ESA as long as the student remains eligible to be  en-
rolled in a public school.
(7)(a) Upon notice to the State  Treasurer, a student may enroll full-time in a public
school. When the student enrolls full-time in a public school:
(A) The written agreement between the parent and the  State Treasurer shall be sus-
pended, and no further  funds shall be deposited into the student’s ESA until the student
again qualifies for education expenses pursuant to the requirements  and conditions of
sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act.
(B) The written  agreement between the parent and the State Treasurer shall terminate
upon the request of  the parent or upon the student turning 25 years of age, whichever occurs
first. Any remaining ESA  funds in the student’s account upon termination shall revert to the
General Fund.
(b) The State Treasurer shall adopt rules and policies to allow ESA  students to enroll
full-time in a public school at any time in order to provide the least disruptive process.
(8) Nothing in sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act shall  be construed to require that a student
with an ESA be enrolled, full-time or part-time, in a private school.
(9) The written agreement terminates automatically if a student no longer resides in  this
state. Upon termination, any moneys remaining in the  ESA shall revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 3.
(1) If the parent of an eligible student enters into a written agreement pur-
suant to section 2 of this 2021 Act, a grant of  moneys must be transferred from the Educa-
tion Savings Program Fund  established in section 12 of this 2021 Act into the ESA of the
eligible student.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this  section, the grant
required by subsection (1) of this section must, for  the school year for which the grant is
made, be in an amount equal to one of the following:
(A) For an eligible student who is  a child with a disability, as defined in ORS 343.035,
$6,500.
(B) For an eligible student with a household income that is less than 185 percent  of the
federal poverty level, $6,500.
(C) For an eligible student not described in  subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph,
$4,900.
(b) For each biennium, the amounts  identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall
be adjusted by the  same percentage by which the amount appropriated to the State School
Fund for  the biennium is increased or decreased compared with the preceding biennium, as
determined by the Department of  Education after consultation with the Legislative Fiscal
[3]
SB 658
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Officer.
(3) The State Treasurer may deduct  no more than three percent from each grant for the
administrative costs incurred by  the State Treasurer in implementing the provisions of
sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act.
(4) Any moneys remaining in an ESA at the end of a school year shall roll over  to the
next school year.
(5) A written agreement is automatically renewed for each school year until:
(a) The student is no longer a resident of this state;
(b) The student graduates from college with a bachelor’s degree;
(c) The student turns 25 years of age; or
(d) The ESA is revoked by the State Treasurer for substantial misuse of funds.
(6) After four consecutive years after high  school graduation, if the student has not en-
rolled in a  post-secondary institution of education, or if the student turns 25 years of age,
whichever occurs first, the ESA shall be  closed and any unused funds shall revert to the
General Fund.
(7) If a written agreement is terminated for any reason, any moneys  remaining in the
ESA shall revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 4.
(1) Moneys deposited in an ESA pursuant to section 3 of this 2021 Act may
be expended only for:
(a) Tuition and fees at a private school;
(b) Tuition and fees for nonpublic online learning programs;
(c) Private tutoring;
(d) Services contracted for and provided  by a public school or public charter school, in-
cluding individual classes, extracurricular activities and programs in these schools;
(e) Textbooks, curriculum or other instructional materials, including any supplemental
materials required by a curriculum, private  school, private online learning program, state
institution of higher education or public school;
(f) Computer hardware or other technological  devices that are primarily used to help
meet a student’s educational needs;
(g) Educational software and applications;
(h) Uniforms purchased from or through a private school;
(i) Fees for nationally standardized assessments, advanced placement  examinations,
state-recognized industry certification exams and examinations related to  a post-secondary
institution of education admission, and any tuition and fees for related preparatory courses;
(j) Fees for summer education  programs and specialized after-school education programs,
but not for after-school child care;
(k) Educational services and therapies, including  occupational, behavioral, physical,
speech-language and audiology therapies;
(L) Tuition and fees at a state institution of higher education;
(m) Fees for transportation paid to a fee-for-service transportation provider for the  stu-
dent to travel to and from a participating education service provider;
(n) Fees for the management of the ESA; and
(o) Any other educational expense approved by the State Treasurer.
(2) ESA funds may not be refunded, rebated or shared with a parent or student  in any
manner.
[4]
SB 658
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) Any refund or rebate for goods or services purchased with ESA funds shall be credited
directly to the ESA of the student.
(4) Parents may make  payments for the costs of educational goods and services not
covered by the funds in the ESA of the student.
(5) Personal deposits into an ESA are not permitted.
(6) Funds deposited in the student’s ESA do not constitute taxable income to the parent
or the student.
SECTION 5.
(1) The State Treasurer may contract with private organizations to carry
out sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act as  long as the private organizations charge only reason-
able fees, based on market rates, for  services. The authority of this subsection includes
contracting with private financial management firms to manage ESAs.
(2) The State Treasurer shall implement a system for payment for services from  ESAs
to education service providers by electronic funds transfer,  including debit cards, electronic
payment systems or any other means of electronic payment that the State Treasurer deter-
mines to be  commercially viable, cost-effective and user-friendly. The State Treasurer may
not adopt a system that relies exclusively on requiring parents  to be reimbursed for out-of-
pocket expenses. The State Treasurer shall provide maximum flexibility to  parents by facili-
tating direct payments to education service providers as  well as requests for preapproval and
reimbursement for qualifying expenses.
(3) The State Treasurer shall implement a commercially viable,  cost-effective and user-
friendly system for  publicly rating, reviewing and sharing information about education ser-
vice providers.
(4) If  an education service provider requires partial payment of tuition or fees prior to
the start of the school year to reserve  space for a student admitted to the education service
provider, the partial payment may  be paid by the State Treasurer prior to the start of the
school year in which the ESA is awarded. The partial payment may not exceed  $3,500 and
must be deducted in an equitable manner  from subsequent account deposits to ensure ade-
quate funds remain available throughout the school year. If a  student decides not to attend
the education service provider, the amount of the partial payment must be returned  to the
State Treasurer by  the education service provider. Only one partial payment per student may
be made per year as allowed by this subsection.
(5) The State Treasurer  shall have the authority to conduct or contract for the auditing
of individual ESAs and shall, at a minimum, conduct random audits of ESAs on an  annual
basis.
(6)(a) The State Treasurer shall  have the authority to terminate a written agreement and
to make any parent of an eligible student ineligible to enter into a new a written agreement
in the event of substantial misuse of ESA funds.
(b) The State Treasurer  shall create procedures to ensure that a fair process exists to
determine whether a substantial misuse of ESA funds has occurred.
(c) The State Treasurer shall have the authority to refer suspected cases of substantial
misuse of  ESA funds to the Attorney General or the district attorney of the county in which
the parent resides for investigation if evidence of fraudulent use of ESA funds is obtained.
(d) A parent  may appeal the State Treasurer’s decision to make the parent ineligible for
the program as a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(7) The State Treasurer may bar an education service provider from the program if the
[5]
SB 658
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
State Treasurer determines that the education service provider has:
(a) Intentionally and substantially misrepresented information or failed to refund  any
overpayments in a timely manner;
(b) Routinely failed to provide students with promised educational services; or
(c) Regularly failed to comply with the provisions of sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act  or
any rules adopted by the State Treasurer.
(8)(a) The State Treasurer shall by rule create procedures to ensure that a fair  process
exists to determine whether an education service provider may be barred from participating
in the program.
(b) If an education service provider is barred from the program, the State Treasurer shall
immediately notify parents who have made payments from their student’s ESA to  the barred
education service provider of the decision.
(c) An  education service provider may appeal the State Treasurer’s decision to bar the
provider from the program as a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(9) The State Treasurer may accept gifts and grants from any source to cover  adminis-
trative costs, to inform the public about ESAs or to fund additional ESAs.
(10) The  State Treasurer may adopt rules that are not inconsistent with sections 1 to 7
of this 2021 Act and that are necessary for the administration of sections 1 to 7  of this 2021
Act, including establishing:
(a) An online anonymous fraud reporting service, or contracting for the provision of  that
service.
(b) An anonymous telephone hotline for fraud reporting.
(c) Policies  that require either a surety bond for education service providers receiving
more than $100,000 in program funds or insurance for account holders.
(d) Procedures for refunding payments from a  participating education service provider
back to an ESA.
(e) Procedures for entering into reciprocal agreements with other state  ESA agencies or
entities to recognize and allow education service providers approved in other states  to re-
ceive payments from ESAs under sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act.
(11) Rules or policies adopted by the State Treasurer shall focus on easing parental  in-
volvement and encouraging educational service  providers to provide parents with a broad
array of educational options.
(12) The State Treasurer shall maintain an updated list of participating education service
providers and shall ensure that the list is available online.
(13) The State Treasurer shall administer an annual survey of parents who enter  into or
renew written agreements pursuant to section 2 of this 2021 Act. The survey must ask  each
parent to indicate:
(a) The number of years the parent has entered into or renewed a written agreement;
(b) The relative satisfaction of the parent with the program established  pursuant to
sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act; and
(c) The opinions of the parent regarding any topics, items or issues that the State
Treasurer determines may aid the State Treasurer  in evaluating and improving the effec-
tiveness of the program established pursuant to sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6.
(1) To be eligible to accept payments from an ESA, an education service
provider shall:
[6]
SB 658
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Submit notice to the State Treasurer of the intent to participate.
(b) Provide parents with a receipt for all qualifying educational expenses.
(c) Agree not to refund, rebate or share ESA funds with parents or students in any
manner, except that ESA funds may be remitted or refunded  to an ESA in accordance with
procedures established by the State Treasurer.
(d) Certify that the education service provider will  not discriminate based on race, color,
ethnicity or national origin.
(e) Agree  to submit any employee who will have contact with students to a criminal
background check.
(f) Provide the State Treasurer with any additional information  that may be requested
to ensure the services provided to parents  are qualifying educational expenses. If the edu-
cation service provider is unable  to provide the additional information, the State Treasurer
may bar the education service provider from participating in the program.
(2) If it is reasonably expected that an education service provider will receive  payments
from ESAs in an amount that exceeds $100,000 during any school year, the State  Treasurer
may require the education service provider to:
(a) Post a surety bond in an amount equal to the amount reasonably expected  to be paid
to the education service provider from ESAs during the school year; or
(b) Provide evidence satisfactory to the State Treasurer that the education service pro-
vider otherwise has sufficient assets to  pay the State Treasurer an amount equal to the
amount described in this section.
(3) Nothing in sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act  shall be deemed to limit the independence
or autonomy of  an education service provider or to make the actions of an education service
provider the actions of this state.
(4) The State Treasurer or any other state agency  may not regulate the educational
program of an education service provider that accepts funds from an ESA.
(5) An education  service provider shall be given the maximum freedom to provide for the
educational needs of ESA students without governmental control.
(6) Nothing in sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act shall be construed to  expand the regulatory
authority of the state, its officers or  any school district to impose any additional regulation
of education service providers  beyond those necessary to enforce the requirements of
sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 7.
(1) At a parent’s request, an eligible student’s local school district shall
permit a student who is being educated pursuant to an ESA to  participate in the statewide
assessment system described in ORS 329.485. The school district may not  charge a fee to
parents who elect to have their eligible student participate in the statewide assessment.
(2) The results of the statewide assessments for students being educated pursuant  to an
ESA shall be reported to  the Department of Education separate from the results of students
enrolled in the schools of a school district.
(3) A school district that previously enrolled an eligible student shall  provide an educa-
tion service provider that has enrolled an eligible student with a complete  copy of the
student’s school records, while complying with 20 U.S.C. 1232g.
SECTION 8. (1) In any legal proceeding challenging the  application of sections 1 to 7 of
this 2021 Act to an education service provider,  the respondent bears the burden of estab-
lishing that the law is necessary and does not impose any undue  burden on an education
[7]
SB 658
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
service provider.
(2) No liability shall arise on the part of the State Treasurer or this state or of any school
district based on the award or use of an ESA pursuant to sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act.
(3) If any part of sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act  is challenged as violating either the
United States  Constitution or the Oregon Constitution, parents of eligible students may be
permitted to intervene to defend the constitutionality of sections 1  to 7 of this 2021 Act. For
the purposes of judicial administration, a court may limit  the number of parents permitted
to intervene or require that all parents file a joint brief, so long as parents  are not required
to join any brief filed on behalf of any respondent.
(4) If any provision  of sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act, or the application of sections 1 to
7 of this 2021 Act to any person or circumstances, is held invalid, the invalidity  does not af-
fect other provisions or applications of sections 1 to  7 of this 2021 Act that can be given ef-
fect without the invalid provision or application and any provisions of sections  1 to 7 and 12
of this 2021 Act are severable.
SECTION 9.
(1) Sections 1 to 7 and 12 of this 2021 Act become  operative January 1, 2022.
(2) The State  Board of Education, Department of Education, and State Treasurer may
take any action before the operative  date specified in subsection (1) of this section to ensure
that students first be allowed to participate in the program  established by sections 1 to 7 and
12 of this 2021 Act during the 2022-2023 school year.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding section 3 (2)(b) of this 2021 Act,  the amounts identified in
section 3 (2)(a) of this 2021 Act shall first be adjusted beginning in the 2023-2025 biennium.
SECTION 11. Section 12 of this  2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 12. (1) The Education Savings  Program Fund is established within the State
School Fund.
(2) The Education Savings Program Fund shall consist of moneys transferred as  provided
by ORS 327.008 and any other state or federal moneys available  for the purposes of the pro-
gram established by sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act.
(3) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the State Treasurer for the
purpose of making deposits under section 3 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 13.  ORS 327.008 is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from  public and private sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School  Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Fund for Student Success, moneys transferred from the  Education Sta-
bility Fund and the Oregon Marijuana Account and moneys received  as provided in paragraph (b)
of this subsection.
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for  the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077,  327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961 and sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act .
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant, consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a  facility grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as pro-
vided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
[8]
SB 658
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases to  operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of  termination or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to  each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s  general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be  apportioned from the State School Fund to each education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall  be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in  the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district may  not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of  the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed $7 million in any biennium. If  the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the  Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for facility
grants among  those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does not  exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend from the State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125 (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of  $55 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from  the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the  amounts identified in this subsection shall be adjusted by the same
percentage  by  which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English  Language Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the  State
[9]
SB 658
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this  section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development  of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration  of a program to increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million from  the State School
Fund for  deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS 332.337.
Notwithstanding  ORS  332.337, the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy School
Facilities Fund under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing for  elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
(18) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer  to the Education
Savings Program Fund established by  section 12 of this 2021 Act the amount necessary to
make the deposits required by section 3 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 14.
(1) The  amendments to ORS 327.008 by section 13 of this 2021 Act become
operative July 1, 2022.
(2) The amendments to ORS 327.008 by section 13 of this 2021 Act apply to State School
Fund distributions commencing with the 2022-2023 school year distributions.
SECTION 15. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[10]