Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 211, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 211.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  [ the limitation on expenditures
established by section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5023), ] the amount
of $1,600,000 is established  for the biennium beginning July 1,  [ 2021] 2023, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services  Economic
Development Fund to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for infrastructure, [ is increased
by $1,600,000,] for a grant to the Port of Port Orford for a seafood hub redevelopment project.
SECTION 2. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2325