Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 5 of this 2020 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 657.
SECTION 2. (1) This section applies to an individual whose most recent employing unit
is an agricultural cooperative doing business in Oregon that filed  a voluntary petition for
relief under the United States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. 101 et seq.) in calendar  year 2019.
(2) An individual  is eligible to receive extended bankruptcy benefits for a week in an
amount equal to the weekly benefit amount of the individual’s  most recent unemployment
benefit claim if:
(a) Prior to  the week, the individual has received all of the regular benefits that were
available to the individual under this chapter;
(b) The individual is not eligible for any other benefits, including benefits  provided under
any federal law extending benefits beyond those provided for as regular benefits; and
(c) At the time of filing an initial or additional claim, the individual is unemployed due
to the bankruptcy of an agricultural cooperative described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The maximum extended bankruptcy benefits amount an individual may receive  under
this section is  26 times the weekly benefit amount of the individual’s most recent unem-
ployment benefit claim.
(4) An individual who is entitled to benefits under this section shall  continue to be so
entitled until the earlier of the date on which:
(a) The individual returns to full-time employment for any employing unit; or
(b) The individual exhausts the individual’s eligibility  for extended bankruptcy benefits
under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Benefits are payable under this section only to the extent  that funds are available in
the State Extended Bankruptcy Benefits Fund established under section 5 of this 2020 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 184
SB 1571
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) If the Employment  Department recovers any overpayments of benefits paid under this
section, the department shall  deposit the recovered amounts in the State Extended Bank-
ruptcy Benefits Fund.
(7) The Director of the  Employment Department may adopt such rules as the director
considers necessary  to the administration of extended bankruptcy benefits payable under this
section.
(8) An employer shall be charged for extended bankruptcy benefits  in the manner pro-
vided in this chapter for charging employers for regular benefits.
SECTION 3.
 (1)  Section 2 of this 2020 Act applies to weeks that begin on or after the ef-
fective date of this 2020 Act.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  with respect to individuals who are
unemployed due  to the bankruptcy of an agricultural cooperative described in section 2 (1)
of this 2020 Act on the effective date of this 2020  Act and who are otherwise eligible to re-
ceive extended bankruptcy benefits, section  2 of this 2020 Act applies to weeks that begin
before, on or after the effective date of this 2020 Act.
(b) Extended bankruptcy benefits  that are retroactively payable by operation of this
subsection must be claimed by the eligible individual, in the  manner prescribed in ORS
chapter 657 for claiming regular benefits, within 60 days following the  effective date of this
2020 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) If the United States  Secretary of Labor serves notice that the provisions
of section 2 of this 2020 Act fail to meet  the requirements of the Social Security Act or the
Federal Unemployment Tax Act, section 2 of this 2020 Act shall no longer be  of any force or
effect.
(2) The Director of the Employment  Department shall notify the Legislative Counsel as
soon as practicable after receipt of the notice described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 5.  (1) The State Extended Bankruptcy Benefits Fund is established in the  State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Notwithstanding  ORS 657.815, all
moneys in the State  Extended Bankruptcy Benefits Fund are continuously appropriated to
the Employment Department for the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The State Extended Bankruptcy Benefits Fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly; and
(b) Recovered amounts deposited in the fund by the department under section 2 (6) of this
2020 Act.
(3) Moneys in the fund may be used solely to pay:
(a) Extended  bankruptcy benefits under section 2 of this 2020 Act and under rules pre-
scribed by  the Director of the Employment Department pursuant to section 2 of this 2020
Act; and
(b) The actual costs incurred by the department in administering section 2 of this  2020
Act and rules prescribed by the director pursuant to section 2 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 6.
There is appropriated to the Employment  Department, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2020, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for  the purposes of
paying extended bankruptcy benefits authorized under section 2 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]
SB 1571
1
[3]