Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
MEDICALLY UNNECESSARY RESEARCH ON DOGS OR CATS
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Clinical veterinary research” means research  on an animal with a naturally occur-
ring disease or injury that is conducted:
(A) For the benefit of the animal; and
(B) With the intention of studying the effect of a procedure, device or  treatment proto-
col.
(b) “Directly fund” does not mean the issuance of funds for:
(A) The construction or maintenance of a research facility;
(B) The purchase or maintenance of general-use equipment;
(C) Overhead costs;
(D) Capital improvements; or
(E) Faculty or employee salaries.
(c) “Laboratory research” has the meaning given that term in ORS 609.410.
(d) “Medically unnecessary laboratory research” means laboratory  research on an animal
that is undertaken for a primary purpose other than  improving the health, welfare or safety
of the animal.
(e) “Research facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 609.410.
(f) “Veterinary education” means laboratory research on an animal for the purpose  of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4950
HB 3978
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
training veterinary professionals under a program accredited by the American  Veterinary
Medical Association.
(2) A research facility may not use public funds, in whole or  in part, to directly fund
medically unnecessary laboratory research on dogs or cats that  is classified under a pain and
distress category D or E by the United States Department of Agriculture.
(3) This section does not apply to a procedure performed on a  dog or cat for the purpose
of veterinary education or clinical veterinary research.
RESEARCH ON NONHUMAN PRIMATES
SECTION 2.
A person may not conduct research or testing on a  nonhuman primate at
the Oregon National Primate Research Center at the Oregon Health and Science  University.
SECTION 3. (1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on May 1, 2029.
(2) Section 2 of this 2025 Act does  not apply to research or testing on any nonhuman
primate at the Oregon National Primate Research Center at  the Oregon Health and Science
University if that research or testing is  funded by a grant obtained by the center prior to
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.  ORS 353.090 is amended to read:
353.090. (1) The Oregon Health  and Science University shall annually publish on a publicly ac-
cessible website of the university:
(a) The number of nonhuman primates, listed by species, that, in the previous year:
[(A) Were used in research at the university. ]
[(B)] (A)  Were used in breeding at the university.
[(C)] (B)  Were born at the university.
[(D)] (C) Were purchased or sold by the university.
[(E)] (D)  Were injured, or died, in a manner that resulted in an animal welfare  citation by the
United States Department of Agriculture.
(b) Links to publicly accessible websites that include descriptions  of research using nonhuman
primates.
(c) The total amount of moneys awarded to  the university’s Oregon National Primate Research
Center during the previous fiscal year.
(d) Any inspection reports of  the United States Department of Agriculture related to animal
welfare at the university that include information about nonhuman  primate welfare during the pre-
vious year.
(e) Documentation of the accreditation of the university’s Oregon  National Primate Research
Center.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1)  of this section do not require disclosure of public records
described in ORS 192.345 or 192.355.
SECTION 5. The amendments to ORS 353.090 by section 4  of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2031.
SECTION 6. (1) The Task Force on Planning the Elimination of Research on Nonhuman
Primates is established.
(2) The task force:
(a) Consists of an odd number of  up to 11 members appointed by the president of the
Oregon Health and Science University.
[2]
HB 3978
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Must include:
(A) At least one member who represents organized labor; and
(B) At least one member who represents animal-related community  outreach or support
services.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Draft  a plan for eliminating the breeding of, and research on, nonhuman primates at
the university’s Oregon National Primate Research Center.
(b) Report on the plan as described in subsection (11) of this section.
(4) At minimum, the plan must:
(a) Describe a  strategy for eliminating the breeding of, and research on, nonhuman
primates at the center  after April 30, 2029, unless grant funding obtained on or before the
effective date of this 2025 Act necessitates a longer time frame for completing  the research.
(b) Identify employee positions that  will be impacted by eliminating the breeding of, and
research on, nonhuman primates at the center and describe a  plan to transition the persons
in the employee positions to ensure minimal disruption for the center workforce.
(c) Propose a schedule to phase out or conclude all  breeding of, and research on, non-
human primates.
(d) Use, as a model, any publicly available information  related to eliminating the breeding
of, or research on, nonhuman primates at a facility other than the center  that conducts, or
previously conducted, research on nonhuman primates.
(e) Describe all active grants awarded to the center or to  the university for purposes
related to the center, including the purpose of the grant, the funding amount of the  grant
and the expiration of the grant, to the extent permitted by federal laws and rules.
(f) Describe plans for the humane disposition or relocation of all  nonhuman primates at
the center  after eliminating the breeding of, and research on, nonhuman primates at the
center, consistent with all applicable state and federal rules and laws.
(g) Identify the  costs of, and opportunities for, humane disposition or providing long-term
care to nonhuman primates  at the center after eliminating the breeding of, and research on,
nonhuman primates at the center, including a review  of any potential public or private
partnerships for providing the long-term care.
(h) Describe any modifications to center facilities or  requirements that must occur dur-
ing the transition to eliminating the breeding of, and  research on, nonhuman primates at the
center.
(i) Provide analysis and recommendations concerning how  to address any continuing
medical or behavioral care for nonhuman primates  at the center before eliminating the
breeding of, and research on, nonhuman primates at the center.
(j) Describe federal, state and local requirements  with which the center is obligated to
comply and create a plan for complying with  the requirements during the transition to
eliminating the breeding of, and research on, nonhuman primates at the center.
(5) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(7) The president of the university shall select one member of the task force to serve as
chairperson and another to serve as vice chairperson, for the terms  and with the duties and
[3]
HB 3978
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
powers necessary for the performance of the functions of the offices as the president of  the
university determines.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the president  of the university shall make an
appointment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report on the plan described in  subsection (3)(a) of this
section in the manner provided in ORS 192.245,  and may include recommendations for legis-
lation, to an interim committee of the  Legislative Assembly related to the university no later
than January 15, 2026.
(12) The university shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of the task  force serve as volunteers on the task force and, unless they
are qualified members, as defined in ORS 292.495,  are not entitled to compensation or re-
imbursement for expenses.
(14) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
(15) All appointments to  the task force made under subsection (2) of this section must
be completed by the later of 30 days  after adjournment sine die of the 2025 regular session
of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly or October 1, 2025.
(16) The task force shall have its first meeting on or before the later of 90 days  after
adjournment sine die of the 2025 regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly or
December 1, 2025.
SECTION 7.
Section 6 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2041.
SECTION 8.  ORS 192.690, as amended by section 43, chapter 95, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
192.690. (1) ORS 192.610 to 192.705 do not apply to any of the following:
(a) Deliberations of the Psychiatric Security Review Board or the State Board of  Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision.
(b) Deliberations of state agencies conducting hearings on contested cases  in accordance with
the provisions of ORS chapter 183.
(c) Deliberations of the Workers’ Compensation Board  or the Employment Appeals Board of
similar hearings on contested cases.
(d) Meetings of the state lawyers assistance committee operating under  the provisions of ORS
9.568.
(e) Meetings of the personal  and practice management assistance committees operating under
the provisions of ORS 9.568.
(f) Meetings of county  child abuse multidisciplinary teams required to review child abuse cases
in accordance with the provisions of ORS 418.747.
(g) Meetings of child fatality review teams required to review  child fatalities in accordance with
the provisions of ORS 418.785.
(h) Meetings of peer review committees in accordance with the provisions of ORS 441.055.
(i) Mediation conducted under ORS 36.252 to 36.268.
[4]
HB 3978
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(j) Any judicial proceeding.
(k) Meetings of the Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors  or its designated
committee  regarding  candidates for the position of president of the university or regarding sensitive
business, financial or  commercial matters of the university not customarily provided to competitors
related to financings, mergers, acquisitions or joint ventures or  related to the sale or other dispo-
sition of, or substantial change in  use of, significant real or personal property, or related to health
system strategies.
(L) Oregon Health and Science University faculty or staff committee meetings.
(m) Meetings of Transfer Council subcommittees that  are established under ORS 350.426 and
that relate to the common course numbering  system and the coordination, establishment, alignment,
effectiveness and maintenance of foundational curricula.
(n) Communications between or among members of a governing body that are:
(A) Purely factual or educational in nature and  that convey no deliberation or decision on any
matter that might reasonably come before the governing body;
(B) Not related to any matter that, at any time, could reasonably  be foreseen to come before the
governing body for deliberation and decision; or
(C) Nonsubstantive in  nature, such as communication relating to scheduling, leaves of absence
and other similar matters.
(o) Meetings  of the Task Force on Planning the Elimination of Research on Nonhuman
Primates established by section 6 of this 2025 Act.
(2) Because of the grave risk to public health and safety that would  be posed by misappropri-
ation or misapplication of information considered during such  review and approval, ORS 192.610 to
192.705 shall not apply to review and approval of  security programs by the Energy Facility Siting
Council pursuant to ORS 469.530.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 192.690, as amended by section 43,  chapter 95, Oregon Laws 2024, and section
8 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
192.690. (1) ORS 192.610 to 192.705 do not apply to any of the following:
(a) Deliberations of the Psychiatric Security Review Board or the State Board of  Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision.
(b) Deliberations of state agencies conducting hearings on contested cases  in accordance with
the provisions of ORS chapter 183.
(c) Deliberations of the Workers’ Compensation Board  or the Employment Appeals Board of
similar hearings on contested cases.
(d) Meetings of the state lawyers assistance committee operating under  the provisions of ORS
9.568.
(e) Meetings of the personal  and practice management assistance committees operating under
the provisions of ORS 9.568.
(f) Meetings of county  child abuse multidisciplinary teams required to review child abuse cases
in accordance with the provisions of ORS 418.747.
(g) Meetings of child fatality review teams required to review  child fatalities in accordance with
the provisions of ORS 418.785.
(h) Meetings of peer review committees in accordance with the provisions of ORS 441.055.
(i) Mediation conducted under ORS 36.252 to 36.268.
(j) Any judicial proceeding.
(k) Meetings of the Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors  or its designated
[5]
HB 3978
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
committee  regarding  candidates for the position of president of the university or regarding sensitive
business, financial or  commercial matters of the university not customarily provided to competitors
related to financings, mergers, acquisitions or joint ventures or  related to the sale or other dispo-
sition of, or substantial change in  use of, significant real or personal property, or related to health
system strategies.
(L) Oregon Health and Science University faculty or staff committee meetings.
(m) Meetings of Transfer Council subcommittees that  are established under ORS 350.426 and
that relate to the common course numbering  system and the coordination, establishment, alignment,
effectiveness and maintenance of foundational curricula.
(n) Communications between or among members of a governing body that are:
(A) Purely factual or educational in nature and  that convey no deliberation or decision on any
matter that might reasonably come before the governing body;
(B) Not related to any matter that, at any time, could reasonably  be foreseen to come before the
governing body for deliberation and decision; or
(C) Nonsubstantive in  nature, such as communication relating to scheduling, leaves of absence
and other similar matters.
[(o) Meetings of the Task Force on Planning the Elimination  of Research on Nonhuman Primates
established by section 6 of this 2025 Act. ]
(2) Because of the grave risk to public health and safety that would  be posed by misappropri-
ation or misapplication of information considered during such  review and approval, ORS 192.610 to
192.705 shall not apply to review and approval of  security programs by the Energy Facility Siting
Council pursuant to ORS 469.530.
SECTION 10.
The amendments to  ORS 192.690 by section 9 of this 2025 Act become op-
erative on January 2, 2041.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 11. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 12. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[6]