Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on California’s Knox-Keene Health  Care Service Plan Act
of 1975 is established.
(2) The task force consists of seven members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate  shall appoint three members from among members of the
Senate, including at least one member selected by the Minority Leader of the Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint four members  from among
members of the House of Representatives, including at least  two members selected by the
Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.
(3) The task  force shall study the provisions of California’s Knox-Keene Health Care
Service Plan Act of 1975 to determine the appropriateness  and feasibility of adopting in this
state any of the  provisions pertaining to the regulation of health maintenance organizations.
(4) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective. If the vacancy is caused  by the departure of a mem-
ber selected by the Minority Leader of the Senate  or House of Representatives, the Minority
Leader shall select the member to fill the vacancy.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force may presession file legislation in the  manner provided in ORS 171.130
for interim committees. All legislation recommended by official action  of the task force must
indicate that it is introduced at the request of the task force.
(11) The task force shall report to  the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 853
SB 574
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
ORS 192.245 at any time  within 30 days after its final meeting or at a time the President and
Speaker designate.
(12) The Legislative Policy and Research Director may employ persons necessary for the
performance of the functions of the task force. The director shall fix the  duties and amounts
of compensation of these employees. The task force shall use the services of continuing  leg-
islative staff, without employing additional persons, to the greatest extent practicable.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to  confidentiality, to furnish the information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on December 31, 2021.
[2]