Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Court Administrator shall  study methods for improving the effi-
ciency of probate proceedings  and shall report to an appropriate committee or interim com-
mittee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 1, 2018.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3441