Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2020 Act is added to and made a part of  ORS chapter 279C.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “water project” means a  project to construct,
reconstruct or repair pipe, piping materials, interceptors, treatment  plants or other facilities
necessary to:
(a) Pump, treat and distribute drinking water; or
(b) Collect, treat and dispose of liquid and solid waste.
(2) A local government, local contracting agency or local contract review board  may not
enact, adopt or enforce an ordinance, resolution, rule  or other law that prohibits, restricts
or limits an evaluation, comparison or use of pipe or piping materials for a water project if:
(a) The pipe or piping materials meet  current standards or performance specifications
of:
(A) ASTM International, or its successor organization;
(B) The American Water Works Association, or its successor organization;
(C) The American National Standards Institute, or its successor organization;
(D) NSF International, or its successor organization; or
(E) A licensed professional engineer; and
(b) Moneys appropriated from the State Treasury directly or indirectly provided all  or a
portion of the funding for the water project.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not:
(a) Limit  a licensed professional engineer’s professional judgment, opinion, recommen-
dation or specification with respect to appropriate pipe or  piping materials or the perform-
ance of pipe or piping materials in connection with a specific water project; or
(b) Apply to design or construction specifications that a licensed  professional engineer
develops for a specific water project in consultation with a local  government, local con-
tracting agency or local contract review board.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 199
HB 4043
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2020 Act applies to a procurement for a water  project that
a public body first advertises or otherwise solicits or, if the public body does not  advertise
or otherwise solicit the water project,  to a public contract for a water project that a public
body enters into on or after the operative date specified in section 4 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Section 2 of this 2020 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2021.
(2) A local government, local contracting agency or  local contract review board may
adopt, amend, enact or repeal an ordinance, resolution, rule or other law before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary to enable the local govern-
ment, local contracting agency  or local contract review board to conform, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section, to the requirements set forth in
section 2 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2020 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2020
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]