Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out  of the General Fund the amount of $4,000,000, for distribution to Harney County
for implementation of critical flood mitigation alternatives identified within the 2022  “Silvies
Drainage Flood Management and Mitigation Report,”  including performance of an impacts
analysis, planning, design, permitting,  construction, outreach and any other activities asso-
ciated with implementation of critical flood mitigation alternatives.
SECTION 2. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3424