Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 311.385 is amended to read:
311.385. (1) The tax collector  shall deposit all property tax moneys with the county treasurer
no later than:
(a) One business day after:
(A) Payment of the moneys is made in person at the office of the tax collector; or
(B) The tax collector receives moneys collected  by a financial institution or other collection
agency; or
(b) Thirty calendar days after the payment arrives by mail in the county mail receptacle.
(2) The tax collector shall take a receipt for all moneys deposited with the county treasurer.
(3)(a) The county treasurer shall withhold an amount equal to three percent of all moneys
deposited with the county treasurer under this section for use by the county for the admin-
istration of the property tax laws of this state.
(b) The balance  of the  property tax moneys shall not be deposited in any account other than
the unsegregated tax collections account, except as provided in ORS 311.370, 311.484 and 311.508.
(4) No later than one business day after receiving notice of  collection of tax moneys by a fi-
nancial institution or other collection agency, the tax collector shall notify the  county treasurer of
the collection of those tax moneys.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (3)(a) of this section and  ORS 311.370, 311.484 and
311.508, the county treasurer shall deposit all property tax  moneys to an account in the records of
the county treasurer designated as the unsegregated tax collections account.  Only those moneys
that will be distributed  under ORS 311.390 and interest earned from the investment of those moneys
shall be deposited to the unsegregated tax collections account.
(6) As used in this section, “property tax moneys”  includes all ad valorem taxes and all taxes
on property, as defined in ORS 310.140, and all other amounts specifically authorized by law to be
included on the assessment and tax roll, that are certified for collection under ORS 310.060 or  other
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2265
HB 2088
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
law and any interest on those taxes.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 311.385 by section 1 of this 2023  Act apply to
property tax moneys deposited with the county treasurer on or after the effective  date of
this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Department of Revenue,  for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $  for deposit in the
County Assessment Function Funding Assistance Account created under ORS 294.184.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]