Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
LICENSURE
OPERATIVE JANUARY 1, 2018
SECTION 1. Definitions. As used in sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Governing body of a local public health authority” has  the meaning given that term
in ORS 431.003.
(2) “Inhalant delivery system” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
(3) “Local public health authority” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431.003.
(4) “Premises” means the real  property on which a business that makes retail sales of
tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems is located.
(5) “Tobacco products” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
SECTION 2.
Purposes. The purpose of sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act is  to improve
enforcement of local ordinances and rules, state laws and rules and federal laws and  regu-
lations that govern the retail sale of tobacco products and inhalant delivery systems.
SECTION 3. Licensure requirement.  A person may not  make a retail sale of a tobacco
product or an inhalant delivery system at or from a premises located in this state unless  the
person sells the tobacco product or inhalant delivery system at or from a  premises for which
a license has been issued under section 5 of this 2017 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4284
HB 3388
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 4. Premises to  which Act does not apply. Notwithstanding section 3 of this
2017 Act, sections 1  to 13 of this 2017 Act do not apply to a person making a retail sale of
an inhalant delivery system at a medical marijuana dispensary  registered under ORS
475B.450 or at a premises for which a license has been issued under ORS 475B.110,  unless the
person makes a retail sale of an inhalant delivery system that contains nicotine.
SECTION 5. Licensure. (1) The Department of Revenue  shall issue licenses to, and an-
nually renew licenses for,  a person that makes retail sales of tobacco products or inhalant
delivery systems at qualified premises.
(2) To be qualified for licensure under this section, a premises:
(a) Must be a premises that is fixed and permanent;
(b) May not be located in an area that is zoned exclusively for residential use; and
(c) Must meet any qualification for  engaging in the retail sale of tobacco products and
inhalant delivery systems enacted as an ordinance by the governing body of a local public
health authority under section 17 of  this 2017 Act, provided that the department has knowl-
edge of the qualification pursuant to  an agreement entered into under section 12 of this 2017
Act.
(3) For the purpose of licensing premises  under this section, the department shall adopt
rules establishing:
(a) Procedures for applying for and renewing licenses; and
(b) Licensure application, issuance and renewal fees.
(4) An application submitted under  this section and information related to applying for
or renewing a license under this section is confidential  and not subject to public disclosure
under ORS 192.410 to 192.505. However, an application submitted under this section  and in-
formation related to applying for or renewing a license under this section may be shared with
the Department of Justice, the Oregon Health Authority or a local public health authority.
(5) The Department of Revenue shall publish a list that includes the name of  each person
to whom a license has been issued under this  section, the address of each premises for which
a license has been issued under this section and any  other information that the department
determines is relevant to the public with respect  to the retail sale of tobacco products and
inhalant delivery systems.
(6) Fees established under subsection (3)(b) of  this section must be reasonably calculated
not to  exceed the costs associated with the department administering sections 1 to 13 of this
2017 Act.
(7) All moneys collected under this section  shall be deposited in the suspense account
described in section 10 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6.
Proof of licensure.  A person to whom a license has been issued under section
5 of this 2017 Act must post proof of licensure in a clear  and conspicuous place at the
premises for which the license has been issued.
SECTION 7. Revocation, suspension, refusal to issue or renew. (1) The Department of
Revenue may revoke,  suspend or refuse to issue or renew a license issued under section 5
of this 2017 Act if the person that  holds or seeks the license, an individual who participates
in the management of the  premises for which the license has been or would be issued or an
individual who is employed for the purpose of making retail sales at the premises:
(a) Violates sections 1  to 13 of this 2017 Act, a rule adopted under sections 1 to 13 of this
2017 Act or any other state law or rule or federal law or regulation that  governs the retail
[2]
HB 3388
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems or state taxation;
(b) Violates an ordinance enacted by the governing body  of a local public health authority
or a  rule adopted by a local public health authority that governs the retail sale of tobacco
products or inhalant delivery systems; or
(c) Makes a false statement to the department.
(2) The department may only revoke, suspend or  refuse to issue or renew a license pur-
suant to subsection (1)(b) of this section if a local public health authority:
(a) Has provided the person that holds or seeks the license, the individual who  partic-
ipates in the management of the premises for which the license has been  or would be issued
or the individual who is employed for the purpose of making retail sales  at the premises with
a process for contesting the violation that is substantially similar to the process  provided
under ORS 183.413 to 183.470; and
(b) Provides the department with a final  order that establishes the person or individual
is in violation of an ordinance that  is substantially similar to the requirements for a final
order under ORS 183.470.
(3) Except as provided by state  tax law or as otherwise identified by the department by
rule or order, a decision by the department to revoke, suspend  or refuse to issue or renew
a license under this section may be appealed as a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 8.
Civil penalty.  (1) The Department of Revenue may impose a civil penalty
against a  person that holds or seeks a license issued under section 5 of this 2017 Act if the
person that holds or seeks the  license, an individual who participates in the management of
the premises for which the license has been or would be issued or an individual who is em-
ployed for the purpose of making retail sales at the premises:
(a) Violates sections 1  to 13 of this 2017 Act, a rule adopted under sections 1 to 13 of this
2017 Act or any  other state law or rule or federal law or regulation that governs the retail
sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems or state taxation; or
(b) Makes a false statement to the department.
(2) A civil penalty imposed under this section may not exceed $1,000 per violation.
(3) Amounts collected by  the department under this section shall be deposited in the
suspense account described in section 10 of this 2017 Act.
(4) Except as provided by state  tax law or as otherwise identified by the department by
rule or order, an imposition of a civil penalty under this section may be appealed  as a con-
tested case under ORS chapter 183.
(5) If a  civil penalty is imposed under this section, a civil penalty may not be imposed for
the commission of the same act  under ORS 431A.178 or pursuant to an ordinance or rule
adopted under section 17 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 9.
Seizure and forfeiture of contraband tobacco products and  contraband
inhalant delivery systems.  (1) For purposes of this section, a tobacco product  or inhalant
delivery system sold or held for sale at or from a premises for which a license has  not been
issued under  section 5 of this 2017 Act is a contraband tobacco product or contraband
inhalant delivery system.
(2) A contraband tobacco product or contraband  inhalant delivery system found by the
Department of Revenue or a law enforcement agency may be seized immediately by the de-
partment or agency and is  subject to forfeiture. If seized and forfeited under this section,
the contraband tobacco product or the contraband  inhalant delivery system must be de-
[3]
HB 3388
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
stroyed.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 305.280 or 323.416,  a seizure and forfeiture made under this
section may be appealed to the  magistrate division of the Oregon Tax Court within 30 days
of the date of the seizure in the manner provided in ORS 305.404 to 305.560.
SECTION 10. Suspense account for administration and  enforcement.  (1) Amounts col-
lected by the Department of Revenue under sections 5 and 8 of this 2017 Act  shall be paid
to the State Treasurer to be held in a suspense account established under ORS 293.445.
(2) From moneys held in the suspense account, the department may  pay expenses related
to the administration and enforcement of sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act.
(3) Amounts necessary to make payments as described in subsection (2) of this section
are continuously appropriated to the department from the suspense account.
SECTION 11. Rules. The Department of Revenue may adopt rules necessary for the ef-
fective administration of sections 1 to 13 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 12. Intergovernmental agreements.  (1) The Department of Revenue  and the
Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Share information necessary for the effective  administration of sections 1 to 13 and
17 of this 2017 Act and ORS 431A.175 and 431A.183; and
(b) Enter into an agreement for purposes of collecting fee moneys  for the authority
pursuant to ORS 431A.183 from each  retailer of tobacco products or inhalant delivery sys-
tems at the same time  that the department collects fee moneys under section 5 of this 2017
Act from the retailer, and transferring  the fee moneys to the authority for deposit in the
Oregon Health Authority Fund established under ORS 413.101.
(2) The Department of Revenue and each local public health authority shall:
(a) Share information necessary for the effective administration  of sections 1 to 13 and
17 of this 2017 Act; and
(b) Enter into an agreement for  purposes of collecting any fee moneys for the local public
health authority pursuant to section 17 of this 2017 Act from each retailer of tobacco pro-
ducts or inhalant delivery systems  located within the area over which the local public health
authority has jurisdiction at the same time that the  department collects fee moneys under
section 5 of this 2017 Act from  the retailer, and transferring the fee moneys to the local
public health authority for deposit in a fund of the local public health authority.
SECTION 13.
Suspense account for fee money transfers. (1) Amounts collected by the
Department of Revenue pursuant to agreements entered into  under section 12 of this 2017
Act shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be held  in a suspense account established under
ORS 293.445.
(2) From moneys held in the suspense account, the department  shall make transfers to
the Oregon Health Authority and  local public health authorities as required by section 12 of
this 2017 Act.
(3) Amounts necessary to make transfers as described  in subsection (2) of this section
are continuously appropriated to the department from the suspense account.
STATE PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY LAWS
EFFECTIVE 91ST DAY AFTER SINE DIE
SECTION 14.  ORS 431A.183 is amended to read:
[4]
HB 3388
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
431A.183. [(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall: ]
[(a) Coordinate with law enforcement  agencies to conduct random, unannounced inspections of
wholesalers and retailers of  tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems to ensure compliance with
the laws of this state designed to discourage the  use of tobacco products and inhalant delivery systems
by minors, including ORS 163.575, 163.580, 167.400, 167.402 and 431A.175; and ]
[(b) Submit a report describing: ]
[(A) The activities carried out to enforce the laws listed  in paragraph (a) of this subsection during
the previous fiscal year; ]
[(B) The extent of success achieved in reducing the availability  of tobacco products and inhalant
delivery systems to minors; and ]
[(C) The strategies to be utilized for enforcing the laws listed in paragraph (a)  of this subsection
during the year following the report. ]
[(2) The authority shall adopt rules concerning random inspections of places  that distribute or sell
tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems  that are consistent with any federal law or regulation
relating to the inspection of such places. The rules shall provide that inspections may take place: ]
[(a) Only in areas open to the public; ]
[(b) Only during the  hours that tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems are distributed or
sold; and]
[(c) No more frequently than once  a month in any single establishment unless a compliance problem
exists or is suspected. ]
[(3) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission, pursuant to an agreement  or otherwise, may assist
the authority with the authority’s duties under subsection (1)(a) of this section and  the enforcement of
ORS 431A.175. ]
(1) The Oregon Health Authority may inspect the premises of a  business that engages in
the wholesale or  retail sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems to ensure
compliance with:
(a) ORS 431A.175 or a rule adopted under ORS 431A.175; or
(b) A state law or rule or federal law or regulation that governs the wholesale or retail
sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems for purposes related  to public health
and safety.
(2) The authority shall  adopt rules for the effective administration of this section. Rules
adopted under this section must be consistent with any federal law or regulation relating  to
the inspection of businesses that  engage in the wholesale or retail sale of tobacco products
or inhalant delivery systems.
(3) The authority shall adopt by rule  fees necessary to pay the expenses of administering
and enforcing this section and section 17 of this 2017 Act and ORS  431A.175. Pursuant to an
agreement entered into under section  12 of this 2017 Act, the Department of Revenue shall
collect the fee moneys for, and transfer the fee moneys to, the authority. Moneys transferred
to the authority under this section  must be deposited in the Oregon Health Authority Fund
established under ORS 413.101. Moneys deposited in the  fund under this section are contin-
uously appropriated to the  authority for the purposes of administering and enforcing this
section and section 17 of this 2017 Act and ORS 431A.175.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 431A.178 is amended to read:
431A.178. [(1) The  Oregon Health Authority may impose a civil penalty for each violation of ORS
431A.175. A civil penalty imposed under this section may not be less than $250 or more than $1,000. ]
[5]
HB 3388
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) The  Oregon Health Authority may impose a civil penalty against a person that en-
gages in the wholesale or retail sale of tobacco products or inhalant  delivery systems, as
those terms are defined in ORS 431A.175, if the person violates:
(a) ORS 431A.175 or a rule adopted under ORS 431A.175; or
(b) A state law or rule or federal law or regulation that governs the wholesale or retail
sale of tobacco products  or inhalant delivery systems for purposes related to public health
and safety.
(2) A civil penalty imposed under this section may not be more than  $5,000 per violation.
[(2)(a)] (3)(a) Amounts  collected under [ subsection (1) of ] this section shall be deposited in the
Oregon Health Authority Fund  established under ORS 413.101. Except as provided in paragraph (b)
of this subsection, moneys deposited in the fund under this subsection  are continuously appropriated
to the authority for the purpose of  carrying out the duties, functions and powers of the authority
under ORS 431A.175 and 431A.183.
(b) At the end  of each biennium, the authority shall transfer the unobligated moneys collected
under [ subsection (1) of ] this section remaining in the fund to the Tobacco  Use Reduction Account
established under ORS 431A.153.
(4) If a  civil penalty is imposed under this section, a civil penalty may not be imposed for
the commission of the same act under section 7 or 17 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 16.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Inhalant delivery system” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
(b) “Tobacco products” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may enter into an agreement with a federal agency to
assist in the monitoring  and enforcement of federal laws and regulations related to tobacco
products or inhalant delivery systems. For purposes of this section, the authority may:
(a) Adopt any  rule necessary to implement an agreement entered into under this sub-
section; and
(b) Take any action necessary to fulfill the authority’s duties  under an agreement en-
tered into under  this subsection, including permitting employees of the authority to be
commissioned as federal officers.
(3)(a) The authority may apply  for and accept moneys from the federal government or
other public or private sources and, in accordance with any federal restriction  or other
funding source restriction, use  those moneys to carry out functions related to preventing the
use of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems by individuals who are not the minimum
age required to purchase tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems.
(b) Moneys received by the authority under  this subsection shall be deposited in the
Oregon Health Authority Fund established under  ORS 413.101. Moneys deposited in the fund
under this subsection  are continuously appropriated to the authority. Moneys subject to a
federal restriction or other funding  source restriction must be deposited in a separate sub-
account and accounted for separately from other fund moneys.
(4) The authority may  enter into an agreement with the Oregon Liquor Control Com-
mission or the Department of State Police for purposes  of fulfilling the functions of the au-
thority under this section.
LOCAL REGULATION
EFFECTIVE 91ST DAY AFTER SINE DIE
[6]
HB 3388
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 17. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Governing body of a local public health authority” has the meaning  given that term
in ORS 431.003.
(b) “Inhalant delivery system” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
(c) “Local public health authority” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431.003.
(d) “Tobacco products” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
(2) Each local public health authority:
(a) Shall enforce standards established by state law or rule relating to  the regulation of
the retail sale  of tobacco products and inhalant delivery systems for purposes related to
public health and safety;
(b) May enforce, pursuant to an ordinance  enacted by the governing body of the local
public health authority, standards for regulating the retail sale of tobacco products  and
inhalant delivery systems for purposes related to public health  and safety in addition to the
standards described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, including qualifications for  engaging
in the retail sale  of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems that are in addition to the
qualifications described in section 5 of this 2017 Act; and
(c) May use outreach and educational services  to provide businesses that engage in the
retail sale of tobacco products  or inhalant delivery systems with information pertaining to
local ordinances and rules, state laws and rules and federal laws and regulations regulating
the retail sale of tobacco products and inhalant delivery systems.
(3) A local public health authority may impose on businesses that engage in the  retail
sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems a fee for paying the expenses of  activ-
ities described in subsection (2) of this section. Pursuant to  an agreement entered into under
section 12 of this 2017 Act, the Department of Revenue shall collect the fee moneys for, and
transfer the fee  moneys to, the local public health authority. Moneys transferred to a local
public health authority under this subsection must be deposited in a fund of the  local public
health authority. Moneys deposited in  a fund under this subsection may only be spent by the
local public health authority for the purposes of subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A local public health authority may impose a civil penalty not  to exceed $5,000 on a
business that engages in the retail sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems for
violating a standard described in subsection (2) of this  section. If a civil penalty is imposed
under this section, a civil penalty may not be imposed for the commission  of the same act
under ORS 431A.178 or section 7 of this 2017 Act.
(5) A local public health authority may:
(a) Perform the duties described in this section in accordance with ORS 431.413 (2)  or (3);
or
(b) Enter into an agreement with  the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 190.110 to
administer and enforce, within the  jurisdiction of the local public health authority, the
standards and processes established by state law and  rule regarding the regulation of the
retail sale of tobacco products and inhalant delivery systems.
(6) The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Ensure that state standards established by state law and rule regarding the  regu-
lation of the retail sale of tobacco products and inhalant delivery systems  are administered
and enforced consistently throughout this state;
(b) Establish a database or other mechanism for collecting information from local  public
[7]
HB 3388
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
health authorities and the general  public regarding the regulation of the retail sale of to-
bacco products and inhalant delivery systems for purposes related to  public health and
safety, including any information related to complaints about a person that  makes retail
sales of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems;
(c) Provide technical assistance to local public health authorities regarding the regulation
of the retail sale of tobacco products and inhalant delivery systems;
(d) Assess the effectiveness of state and local programs for regulating the retail sale of
tobacco products and inhalant delivery systems; and
(e) Adopt any rules necessary to implement or  administer the duties of the Oregon
Health Authority under this section.
REPEALS
EFFECTIVE 91ST DAY AFTER SINE DIE
SECTION 18. Repeal. ORS 181A.330, 181A.335 and 431A.180 are repealed.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 19. Abolishment of State  Police Tobacco Law Enforcement Fund.  The State
Police Tobacco Law Enforcement Fund is abolished. On the effective date of this 2017 Act,
moneys in the fund shall be transferred to the State Treasurer for  deposit in the General
Fund, and the moneys shall be available for general governmental purposes.
SECTION 20.
Applicability. The amendments to ORS 431A.178 by section 15 of this 2017
Act apply to violations for conduct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 21. Operative date.  (1) Sections 1 to 13  of this 2017 Act become operative on
January 1, 2018.
(2) The Department  of Revenue, the Oregon Health Authority and local public health
authorities may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section that is  necessary to enable the department, the Oregon Health Authority and local
public health authorities to exercise, on and after the operative date  specified in subsection
(1) of this section, all the duties, functions and powers conferred on the department, the
Oregon Health Authority and local public  health authorities by sections 1 to 13 of this 2017
Act.
SECTION 22.
Section and unit captions.  The section and  unit captions used in this 2017
Act are provided only for the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the stat-
utory law of this state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 23.
Effective date.  This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on
which the 2017 regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[8]