Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $22,500,000, which shall be  allocated to Oregon
State University and may be expended  in the following amounts for the following programs
at the university:
(1) For the agricultural experiment station and branch stations, $12,000,000;
(2) For the Oregon State University Extension Service, $8,800,000; and
(3) For the Forest Research Laboratory, $1,700,000.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1698