Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department  of Fish and Wildlife shall establish and make
available special cougar tags that allow the holder to  use one or more dogs to hunt or pursue
cougars.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 497.132, a  purchaser of a sportspac license may use dogs to hunt
or pursue cougars only if the purchaser obtains a special cougar tag under this section.
(3) The department may not charge the purchaser of  a sportspac license an additional fee
for the special cougar tag.
SECTION 2.  ORS 498.164 is amended to read:
498.164. (1) Except as provided in [ subsections (2) and (3) ] subsection (2)  of this section, a per-
son may not use bait to attract or take black bears or use  one or more dogs to hunt or pursue black
bears or cougars.
(2) [Nothing in ] Subsection (1) of this section [ prohibits] does not apply to:
(a) The use of bait or one  or more dogs by employees or agents of county, state or federal
agencies while acting in their official capacities.
[(3)] (b) [Nothing in subsection (1) of this section prohibits ] The use of bait or  dogs by persons for
the taking of black  bears or cougars in accordance with the provisions of ORS 498.012 relating to
taking wildlife that is causing damage.
(c) The use of one or more dogs for hunting or pursuing cougars  by a person holding a
special cougar tag issued under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
[(4)] (3)  [ Any ] A  person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a  Class A
misdemeanor and, upon  conviction, shall in addition to appropriate criminal penalties have the
person’s privilege to apply for any hunting license suspended for a period of five years  for a first
offense and permanently suspended for any subsequent offense.
[(5)] (4) [ For the purposes of ] As used in  this section, “bait” means any material placed for  the
purpose of attracting or attempting to attract bears.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1641