Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 543A.305 is amended to read:
543A.305. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Holder” has the meaning given that term in ORS 543.075.
(b) “In-stream water right” has the meaning given that term in ORS 537.332.
(c) “Reauthorize” has the meaning given that term in ORS 543.075.
(2) An in-stream water right [ shall] resulting from a conversion under subsection (3) of this
section must:
(a) Be subject to the limitations of ORS 537.350 [ and shall].
(b) Be maintained in perpetuity, in trust for the people of the State of Oregon.
(c) [ The] Have a  priority date [ of the in-stream water right shall be ] that is  the same as that
of the converted hydroelectric water right.
(d) [ The] Have a  location [ of the  in-stream water right shall be ] that is  the same as the point
of diversion identified in the hydroelectric water right.
(3) Upon a finding  by the Water Resources Director that conversion will not result in
injury to other existing water rights, the director shall convert up to the full amount of a
water right associated with a hydroelectric project to an in-stream water right:
[(3)] (a) Five years after the use of water under a hydroelectric water right ceases[ , or ];
(b) Upon expiration of a hydroelectric water right not otherwise  extended or reauthorized[ ,
or];
(c) Upon expiration of a time-limited hydroelectric water right  that is transferred under
ORS 540.520 and 540.530; or
(d) At any time  [ earlier] with the written consent of the holder of the hydroelectric water
right[, up to the full amount of the water right associated with the hydroelectric project shall be  con-
verted to an  in-stream water right, upon a finding by the Water Resources Director that the conversion
will not result in injury to other existing water rights ].
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4663
SB 1192
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
(4) In [ making the evaluation ] determining  whether to issue a finding described in sub-
section (3) of this section , the director shall consider the actual use of  the hydroelectric project
and the resulting impacts on actual use by other existing water rights as of October 23, 1999.
(5) In converting all or part of a hydroelectric water right to an in-stream water right
under subsection (3) of this section,  the director may include mitigation measures as  conditions
of the in-stream  water right to avoid injury and to ensure the continuation of authorized water uses
by other existing water rights.
[(4)] (6)  If [ the] a  hydroelectric project  is authorized by a pre-1909 unadjudicated claim of
registration[ ,]:
(a) [ the] A  determination , under subsection (3) of  this section,  of  whether conversion will
result in injury  to other existing water rights:
(A) [ shall] Must  be based upon an evaluation of the actual use as measured  during the five
years preceding the conversion action[ ,]; and
(B) [shall] May  not  constitute a determination under ORS 537.670 to 537.695 as to the underly-
ing claim of registration of the pre-1909 use.
(b) Judicial review of a final order relating to [ such] a conversion  under subsection (3) of  this
section shall be limited to review of the conversion action.
[(5)] (7) Subsection (3) of  this section [ shall] does  not apply to projects on boundary waters
that operate with water rights issued  by the State of Oregon and by any other state , except upon
the written request of the water right holder.
[(6)] (8)  If hydroelectric production is not the sole beneficial use authorized by a water right,
subsection (3) of  this section [ shall apply ] applies only to conversion of  that portion of the water
right used exclusively for hydroelectric purposes.
[(7)] (9) A hydroelectric water  right may not be converted under subsection (3) of  this
section [ shall not apply ], on the basis that use  of water under the hydroelectric water right
has ceased for five years,  if :
(a) The holder, at any time prior to conversion [ under subsection (3) of this  section ], transfers
the hydroelectric water right under ORS 540.520  and 540.530[ , except that if a time-limited hydro-
electric water right is transferred under ORS 540.520 and  540.530, the provisions of this section shall
apply at the time of expiration of the time-limited water right. ]; or
(b)(A) During any part of the period of five years, the use of water under the hydroelec-
tric water right ceased as a  result of an instruction from the Federal Energy Regulatory
Commission to stop generating electricity;
(B) The hydroelectric project has the capacity to generate power at the  maximum rate
authorized by the hydroelectric water right; and
(C) The holder is ready, willing and able to use the  hydroelectric water right to generate
power.
SECTION 2.
The exception described in ORS 543A.305 (9)(b) applies if:
(1) A use of water ceased, as described in ORS 543A.305 (9)(b)(A), before, on or after  the
effective date of this 2025 Act; and
(2) The criteria described in ORS 543A.305 (9)(b)(B) and (C) are also met.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2036.
[2]