Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 731.820 is amended to read:
731.820. (1)(a) For the purpose of maintaining and paying the expenses of the office of State
Fire Marshal  [ and paying the expenses incident thereto ] and for the purposes specified in sub-
section (4) of this section , every insurer transacting insurance covering the peril of fire  shall pay
a tax to the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services,  on or before April 1
of each year, equal to 1.15 percent of the gross amount  of premiums [ received by it or its insurance
producers] the insurer or the insurer’s insurance producers receive  from such  business, from
and under [ its] the insurer’s  policies covering direct domestic risks in  the preceding calendar year
after deducting the amount of return premiums  paid and the amount of dividend payments made to
policyholders or, in the case of a reciprocal insurer, the amount of savings paid or credited  to the
accounts of subscribers, with respect to such policies.
(b) For the purpose of  paragraph (a) of this subsection the following portions of the amounts
required to be reported by line of business  in the annual financial statement required by ORS
731.574 [shall be considered ] are  premiums for insurance covering the peril of fire:
(A) Fire, 100 percent.
(B) Homeowners and farm owners multiple peril, 65 percent.
(C) Commercial multiple peril, 50 percent.
(D) Inland marine, 20 percent.
(E) Automobile physical damage, eight percent.
(F) Aircraft physical damage, eight percent.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3769
HB 3404
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) If an insurer ceases to do business or collect  premiums on direct domestic risks, [ it
thereupon] the insurer  shall [ make a ] report to the director [ of its ] concerning any  premiums sub-
ject to taxation as provided in subsection  (1) of this section and collected or due as of the date when
[it] the insurer  ceased to do  business or collect premiums on direct domestic risks[ , and not
theretofore] that the insurer has not  reported  previously, and  shall [ forthwith] immediately pay
to the director the tax [ thereon] due on the unreported policies .
(3) If the director, during the period in which the director  under ORS 731.836 may collect taxes
owing under this section, finds the amount of such taxes paid by an  insurer to have been incorrect,
the director shall charge or credit the  insurer with the difference between the correct amount of tax
and the amount actually paid.
(4) The director shall  deposit 15 percent of the amount the director collects each year
under subsection (1)(a) of this  section into the Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and Community
Protection Fund.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 731.820, as amended by section 1 of this 2021 Act, is amended to read:
731.820. (1)(a) For the purpose of maintaining and paying the expenses of the office of  State Fire
Marshal [ and for the purposes specified in subsection (4) of this  section ], every insurer transacting
insurance covering the peril of fire shall pay a tax to  the Director of the Department of Consumer
and Business Services, on or before April 1 of each year, equal to 1.15 percent of the  gross amount
of premiums the insurer or the insurer’s insurance producers receive from such  business, from and
under the insurer’s  policies covering direct domestic risks in the preceding calendar year after de-
ducting the amount of return premiums paid and the amount of dividend payments  made to
policyholders or, in  the case of a reciprocal insurer, the amount of savings paid or credited to the
accounts of subscribers, with respect to such policies.
(b) For the purpose of paragraph (a) of this subsection the following  portions of the amounts
required to be reported by line of business in  the annual financial statement required by ORS
731.574 are premiums for insurance covering the peril of fire:
(A) Fire, 100 percent.
(B) Homeowners and farm owners multiple peril, 65 percent.
(C) Commercial multiple peril, 50 percent.
(D) Inland marine, 20 percent.
(E) Automobile physical damage, eight percent.
(F) Aircraft physical damage, eight percent.
(2) If an insurer ceases to do business or collect premiums on direct  domestic risks, the insurer
shall report to the director concerning any premiums subject to  taxation as provided in subsection
(1) of this section and collected or due as of the date  when the insurer ceased to do business or
collect premiums on direct domestic risks that the insurer has not  reported previously, and shall
immediately pay to the director the tax due on the unreported policies.
(3) If the director, during the period in which the director  under ORS 731.836 may collect taxes
owing under this section, finds the amount of such taxes paid by an  insurer to have been incorrect,
the director shall charge or credit the  insurer with the difference between the correct amount of tax
and the amount actually paid.
[(4) The director shall deposit  15 percent of the amount the director collects each year under sub-
section (1)(a) of this section into the Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and Community Protection Fund. ]
SECTION 3.
Sections 4, 5 and 6 of  this 2021 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 477.
[2]
HB 3404
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 4.
(1) The Oregon Wildfire Preparedness  and Community Protection Fund is
established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Moneys in
the Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and Community Protection Fund are continuously  appro-
priated to the State Fire Marshal for the purposes specified in this section and section 5  of
this 2021 Act.
(2)(a) At the written request of the State Fire Marshal, the State  Treasurer shall trans-
fer moneys from the balance available in the  Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and Community
Protection Fund on August 1  of each year to the following funds in accordance with the al-
locations specified in each subparagraph of this paragraph:
(A) Sixty percent to the State Fire Marshal Fund. The  State Fire Marshal shall retain
the transferred  moneys in a special account and expend the moneys as provided in section
5 (1) of this 2021 Act.
(B) Twenty percent to the State Forestry Department Account. The State Forester shall
retain the transferred moneys in a special subaccount  and expend the moneys as provided
in section 5 (2) of this 2021 Act.
(C) Twenty percent to the Watershed Conservation Grant Fund. The Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board shall retain the transferred moneys in a special account and expend the
moneys as provided in section 5 (3) of this 2021 Act.
(b) Each agency that receives a transfer of funds from the Oregon Wildfire  Preparedness
and Community Protection Fund under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall keep a record
of the account or subaccount into which the agency deposits the transferred  moneys, indi-
cating the source of the transfer and the  activity or program against which the agency
charges any withdrawal. An agency may invest the  moneys in the applicable account or
subaccount described in paragraph (a)(A), (B) or (C) of this subsection in the same  manner
as other state moneys. The agency  must credit any interest earned on investments to the
appropriate account or subaccount.
(c) The State Fire Marshal shall reserve 15 percent of the moneys transferred from  the
Oregon Wildfire Preparedness  and Community Protection Fund to the State Fire Marshal
Fund under this subsection for transfer  to the revolving fund described in section 6 of this
2021 Act.
(d) Each agency that receives a transfer of funds from the Oregon Wildfire  Preparedness
and Community Protection Fund under paragraph (a) of this subsection may retain  a portion
of the transferred moneys to pay  the agency’s costs in administering the account or subac-
count into which the agency deposits the transferred moneys.
(e) If  moneys credited to an account or subaccount are withdrawn, transferred or oth-
erwise used for a program other than a program or activity described in section 5 of this 2021
Act, interest accrues at the rate specified in ORS 82.010 on the amount withdrawn from the
date of the withdrawal until the moneys are restored.
(3) The Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services shall pay into the
State Treasury to the credit of the Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and  Community Protection
Fund all moneys the director receives from the surcharge described in section 8 of this  2021
Act. The director may retain from the moneys the director receives an  amount sufficient to
pay the director’s costs of collecting the surcharge, and related costs.
(4) The total amount that the Director of the Department of Consumer  and Business
Services and all agencies  listed in subsection (2)(a) of this section may retain from the
[3]
HB 3404
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
moneys in the Oregon  Wildfire Preparedness and Community Protection Fund to pay costs
associated with administering a  fund, account, subaccount, expenditure, grant or program
described in this section or section 5 of this 2021 Act may not exceed, in  the aggregate, more
than 10 percent  of the balance of the Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and Community Pro-
tection Fund on August 1 of each year.
(5) The State Fire Marshal, the Oregon Watershed  Enhancement Board and the State
Forestry Department may  accept, from whatever source, gifts or grants of moneys given for
the purposes set forth in  section 5 of this 2021 Act. Each agency shall deposit any such
moneys into the Oregon Wildfire Preparedness and  Community Protection Fund. All moneys
deposited in this manner are available  for allocation as described in subsection (2)(a) of this
section, unless the donor  or grantor of the moneys specifies a condition for the use of the
moneys, in which case the agency that received the gift or grant shall use the  moneys in
conformance with the condition the donor or grantor specified.
SECTION 5.
(1)(a) The State Fire Marshal shall expend moneys or provide grants from
the special account of the  State Fire Marshal Fund described in section 4 (2)(a)(A) of this
2021 Act to assist communities in:
(A) Preparing for and protecting against wildfires;
(B) Funding full-time firefighters; and
(C) Developing and implementing, in coordination with the  State Forestry Department,
community wildfire protection plans and programs that are  based upon or that comply with
standards promulgated by the National Fire Protection  Association’s Firewise USA and the
Fire Adapted Communities Learning Network or that otherwise serve community  needs for
protection against wildfires.
(b) The  State Fire Marshal shall adopt rules to guide the State Fire Marshal’s imple-
mentation of the programs described in this subsection. At a minimum, the rules must:
(A) Specify the purposes,  goals and criteria for funding projects under paragraph (a) of
this subsection, along with criteria for evaluating the success of each project;
(B) Specify the purposes, goals and eligibility criteria for  grants under paragraph (a) of
this subsection, along with criteria for determining whether  a grant recipient has made use
of grant moneys in accordance with the purposes and goals; and
(C) Provide forms and specify application procedures by means of  which a community
may apply for a grant under this subsection.
(2)(a) The State Forestry Department shall use moneys from the  special subaccount of
the State Forestry  Department Account described in section 4 (2)(a)(B) of this 2021 Act to
provide grants or implement programs that:
(A) Restore landscape resiliency;
(B) Promote wildfire prevention education in coordination with the State Fire Marshal;
(C) Reduce hazardous fuel levels to improve forest health; and
(D) Reduce forest vulnerability to drought, insect infestation  and disease by taking ap-
propriate forest management actions such as thinning and prescribed burning.
(b) In implementing the programs  described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the de-
partment shall give priority to programs, activities  or projects that protect lives, communi-
ties and infrastructure, that improve and enhance watershed health, water  quality and
resiliency in response to changes in the climate and that achieve reductions in wildfire  risk.
After seeking and  receiving necessary permissions and cooperation, the department may
[4]
HB 3404
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
conduct programs on federal, state, tribal, local and private lands.
(c) The department shall establish a committee that includes representatives  from other
committees upon which the department relies for advice concerning the types of  programs
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection and  representatives from insurers that are
subject to the requirements of section 8 of this  2021 Act. The committee shall advise the
department concerning priorities and allocation decisions the department makes under par-
agraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(3)(a) The Oregon  Watershed Enhancement Board shall use moneys from the special ac-
count of the Watershed Conservation Grant  Fund described in section 4 (2)(a)(C) of this 2021
Act to provide grants for programs,  activities and projects on federal, state, tribal, local and
private lands that:
(A) Restore landscape resiliency;
(B) Reduce hazardous fuel levels to improve forest health;
(C) Reduce forest vulnerability to  drought, insect infestation and disease by taking ap-
propriate forest management actions such as thinning and prescribed burning; and
(D) Support recovery activities such as reforestation, watershed rehabilitation, drinking
water protection, slope stabilization and erosion control in areas that were subjected to
wildfires.
(b) In making grants  under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the board shall give priority
to programs, activities or projects that:
(A) Improve and enhance watershed health, water quality and resiliency in response to
changes in the climate; and
(B) Achieve reductions in wildfire risk.
(c) The board shall establish a committee  that includes representatives of owners and
managers of federal, state, tribal, local and private  lands described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection and representatives of insurers that are subject to the requirements  of section 8
of this 2021  Act. The committee shall advise the board concerning priorities and allocation
decisions the board makes under this subsection.
(4) The department and the board shall  each, by rule, devise appropriate standards for
identifying and measuring improvements attributable to,  and outcomes that result from, the
respective grants, programs, activities and projects for which the department has responsi-
bility under subsection (2)(a) of this section and for which the board has responsibility under
subsection (3)(a) of this section. Subject to the judgment of the department or board,  as ap-
propriate, and to the advice of the  appropriate committee described in subsection (2)(c) or
(3)(c) of this section, improvements and outcomes may include, but are not limited to:
(a) The number of acres of land the  grants, programs, activities and projects have
brought to a measurable level of protection against wildfire;
(b) Comparative response times for fire protection resources before and after expenditure
of grant moneys or implementation of the programs, activities or projects;
(c) Comparative measurements of property lost before and  after expenditure of grant
moneys or implementation of the programs, activities or projects;
(d) Estimates of savings in  public expenditures for fire protection that result from ex-
penditure of grant moneys or implementation of the programs, activities or projects;
(e) Changes in assessments  of the risk of property damage or destruction before and af-
ter expenditure of  grant moneys or implementation of the programs, activities or projects;
[5]
HB 3404
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and
(f) Other measurements that program stakeholders identify or suggest.
(5) The State Fire Marshal,  the State Forestry Department and the Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board shall jointly:
(a) Consult and cooperate with each of the other agencies  identified in this subsection in
adopting rules to implement the areas of responsibility each agency has  under this section;
and
(b) Coordinate with each of the other agencies in developing  and implementing programs
and activities to the maximum extent practicable in order to reduce duplication  and over-
lapping or redundant efforts.
(6) By  December 31 of each year, the State Fire Marshal, the State Forester and the
executive director of the  Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall submit a joint report
to the Governor and to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly with  oversight
over forestry issues, with copies  to insurers that are subject to the requirements of section
8 of this  2021 Act and to stakeholders associated with the agencies’ grants, programs, ac-
tivities and projects under this section. The report must describe  in detail the agencies’ ac-
tivities under this section and, at a minimum, must include:
(a) A list  of the amounts the agencies expended from the Oregon Wildfire Preparedness
and Community Protection Fund during the previous 12 months;
(b) A list of the projects the agencies funded or conducted in the previous 12 months,
together with the cost of each  project and a summary of the goals and results of each
project;
(c) A list of all  grants the State Fire Marshal awarded within the previous 12 months
under subsection (1)(a) of this section and section 6 of this 2021 Act, along with a list of  the
grant recipients, the amount each grant recipient received and the  purpose and goals of each
grant; and
(d) A list of projects, grants and other activities the agencies have planned for the up-
coming calendar year.
SECTION 6.
(1) The State Fire Marshal shall use the amount  reserved in the State Fire
Marshal Fund under section 4 (2)(c) of this 2021 Act to  create a revolving fund from which
the State Fire Marshal may disburse moneys to rural fire protection  districts located within
areas of this state that are at a high risk for  wildfires and that lack necessary critical ca-
pacities for responding to wildfire emergencies within the boundaries of the rural  fire pro-
tection district.
(2) The State  Fire Marshal by rule may determine which areas of this state are at a high
risk of wildfires and the criteria for determining whether a rural fire protection district
lacks necessary critical capacity for responding to wildfire emergencies.
SECTION 7.
Section 8 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 742.
SECTION 8. (1)(a) Every insurer that transacts insurance in this state shall remit to the
Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services an annual  surcharge of $5
for each policy of insurance the insurer issues in this state that is property insurance, other
than policies of motor vehicle liability insurance or insurance that covers  a tenant’s loss of
personal property from  residential premises. The surcharge is in addition to and not in lieu
of any other tax, fee  or charge that the insurer is otherwise liable to pay. The insurer shall
remit the proceeds of the surcharge each calendar year  as provided in paragraph (d) of this
[6]
HB 3404
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
subsection.
(b) An insurer shall pay the surcharge described in paragraph (a) of this  subsection on
the total number of policies the insurer retains in the insurer’s portfolio on  December 31 of
each year.
(c) Regardless of the number of policies of insurance an  insurer issues that are property
insurance, the minimum  amount that an insurer that transacts insurance in this state must
remit to the director each calendar year under this subsection is $1,000.
(d) Each insurer shall pay the amount due to the director under this  subsection not later
than July 15 of each year.
(2)(a) Not later than August 15 of each year, the  director shall issue a notice of arrears
to each insurer that fails to pay the  amount due under this section by July 31 of that year.
In the notice, the director shall provide an  opportunity for the insurer to appeal the amount
in arrears, shall specify the amount and schedule of  any applicable late fees or penalties and
shall indicate a date by which the insurer must pay the amount in arrears or be subject to
the late fee or penalty and possible referral to the Department of Revenue for  collection of
the amount due.
(b) If the director determines after the insurer’s appeal that the insurer’s  debt is valid
and that the amount of the debt is correct or if the insurer has  not paid an amount in ar-
rears by the date indicated in the director’s notice, the  director shall make a final determi-
nation of the amount due  from the insurer, liquidate the debt and refer the debt to the
Department of Revenue for collection under ORS 293.250.
(3)(a) Each insurer that is subject to the requirement set forth in subsection (1) of  this
section may  recoup the amount for which the insurer is liable by one of the following
methods:
(A) The insurer may each year charge and collect from each of the  insurer’s insureds
not more than the amount of the surcharge on each  of the insured’s policies of insurance
that is property insurance.
(B) The insurer may recoup the surcharge through the insurer’s premium rates.
(b) An insurer that, in the  first year after the surcharge is due, does not recoup under
paragraph (a) of this subsection the entire amount the insurer remitted to the director under
subsection (1) of this section may, during the following  year, recoup the remaining amount
by collecting a surcharge that exceeds the amount specified in paragraph (a) of this  sub-
section by not more than the amount necessary to recoup the surcharge.
(4)(a) A surcharge that  an insurer collects under subsection (3) of this section is not a
premium for any purpose, including liability for any tax upon premiums or  any commissions
that an insurance producer may receive.
(b) If an insurer elects to collect a surcharge under subsection (3)(a) of this section, the
insurer shall disclose the amount and nature of the surcharge on a bill or  policy declaration
the insurer provides to an insured.
(5) The director shall deposit  all moneys the director receives under this section into the
Oregon Wildfire  Preparedness and Community Protection Fund established under section 4
of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 9.
The surcharge described in section 8 of this 2021 Act applies to policies of
insurance that an insurer issues or renews on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 10. (1) An annual filing fee of $10  is hereby imposed on all property tax ac-
[7]
HB 3404
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
counts in this state having a  total real market value greater than $350,000 as shown on the
assessment and tax roll for the property tax year to which the filing fee relates.
(2) The filing fee shall be shown on the assessment and tax roll and collected in  the same
manner as  ad valorem property taxes imposed on the tax account are collected, subject to
the same provisions relating to refunds, delinquency and appeals, as applicable.
(3)(a) The tax collector may withhold four percent of the amount of the filing fees col-
lected to reimburse the county for the costs of administration relating to the filing fee.
(b) The balance of the filing fees shall be  deposited in the Oregon Wildfire Preparedness
and Community Protection Fund established under section 4 of this 2021 Act and may be used
for any purposes for which moneys in the fund may be used.
SECTION 11.
Section 10 of this 2021 Act applies to property tax  years beginning on or
after July 1, 2022.
SECTION 12. The amendments to  ORS 731.820 by section 2 of this 2021 Act become op-
erative on July 1, 2031.
SECTION 13. Sections 4, 5, 6, 8 and 10 of this 2021 Act are repealed on July 1, 2031.
[8]