Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
LEADERSHIP
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Corrections shall create a comprehensive leadership
development, training and retention program to  provide staff with the essential knowledge
on women who are  adults in custody, including research and evidence-based practices that
are needed to properly manage a women’s correctional facility.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to address department policies  that create barriers
to gender-responsive practices.
(3) The department shall adopt by  rule trauma-informed and gender-responsive policies
that address the unique needs of women who are adults in custody, including rules:
(a) Implementing gender-responsive management, security and  operations across the
department.
(b) Addressing the needs of diverse, historically underserved populations.
(c) Ensuring that departmental initiatives are implemented in  accordance with a
gender-responsive and trauma-informed philosophy.
(d) Ensuring policies and  procedures related to commissary and clothing are gender-
specific and culturally responsive and accommodate the gender identity of all adults  in cus-
tody.
(e) Resolving conflicting philosophies and disjointed communication among security and
all other sections  of the department through the development of gender-responsive and
trauma-informed operational policies and procedures, cross-training programs and  team-
building exercises.
(f) Ensuring  visibility and accessibility of facility leadership and managers to adults in
custody.
[2]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) Implementing diverse and robust feedback methods for staff and adults in  custody to
communicate with leadership and management.
SECTION 2.
As soon as practicable after the effective  date of this 2025 Act, the Depart-
ment of Corrections shall:
(1) Adopt the rules described in section 1 of this 2025 Act; and
(2) Ensure that the rules described in section 1 (3) of this 2025 Act are implemented and
enforced at Coffee Creek Correctional Facility.
STAFFING AND TRAINING
SECTION 3.
(1) The Department of Corrections shall improve hiring protocols for  cor-
rections officers who work with women, by taking actions that include:
(a) Defining the knowledge, attitudes, skills and competencies required to work  with
women and incorporating these elements into hiring and screening procedures.
(b) Ensuring the hiring process identifies candidates with aptitude, interest and experi-
ence in working with women.
(c) Developing and implementing  a pre-employment screening tool to gauge whether a
candidate will be able to appropriately work with women.
(2) The department shall develop and  enhance job descriptions to reflect the responsibil-
ity of working with women, including adults in custody with diverse racial, ethnic, gender
or social identities. The job descriptions at a minimum must:
(a) Define professionalism to  include treating all adults in custody with dignity and re-
spect.
(b) Emphasize the importance of  viewing women’s behaviors in the larger ecological
context in which they developed.
(c) Acknowledge the role of trauma-informed  approaches in preventing the
revictimization of women.
(d) Emphasize the importance of improving facility and community-based outcomes.
(3) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall  conduct a study to determine the ratio
of staff to adults in custody at  each Department of Corrections institution sufficient to af-
ford each adult in custody a safe environment.
SECTION 4.
The Department of Corrections shall:
(1) Ensure  that Coffee Creek Correctional Facility implements the pre-employment
screening tool described in section 3 (1)(c) of this 2025 Act  to help identify candidates for
employment who are competent to work with women.
(2) Launch a comprehensive, gender-responsive staff training and support  protocol that
supports staff wellness and is mandated for all management, staff and  individuals who make
decisions impacting Coffee Creek Correctional Facility.
CULTURE
SECTION 5. (1) The Department of Corrections shall  ensure staff adhere to a zero-
tolerance policy for communication and behavior  that is unprofessional, disrespectful and
dehumanizing.
(2) The department shall take proactive steps to implement a  culture of respect and
[3]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dignity, including:
(a) Ensuring that staff are adhering to the zero-tolerance policy  described in subsection
(1) of this  section, including refraining from the use of derogatory language, swearing, yelling
and the use of racist, sexist, misogynistic, homophobic and transphobic language.
(b) Informing staff of the consequences of failing to adhere to the zero-tolerance policy.
(c) Actively addressing the code of silence regarding the mistreatment  of adults in cus-
tody.
(d) Requiring the leadership  of the facility to address facility culture annually by dis-
tributing an action plan to all staff and adults in custody that reinforces a culture of respect
and dignity and the zero-tolerance policy described in subsection (1) of this section.
(e) Eliminating any element  of paramilitary culture or philosophy, including but not
limited to:
(A) Titles and rankings.
(B) Uniforms.
(C) Language.
(D) Imagery, symbols and signage.
(3) Within the first six months  of hiring and every 18 months thereafter, all corrections
officers shall participate in meetings between adults in custody  and corrections officers that
are facilitated by a community-based organization for the  purpose of cultivating an under-
standing of the unique experiences and difficulties of incarceration.
(4)(a) The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training  shall review all com-
plaints received about a certified  corrections officer, as defined in ORS 181A.355, to deter-
mine whether the allegations in the complaint, if proven, would lead  an objectively
reasonable person to conclude that the corrections officer violated employment, training  or
certification standards for public safety professionals established  by the Board on Public
Safety and Standards and Training.
(b) When a complaint is made against a employed corrections officer  or a certified cor-
rections officer who is not employed in a certifiable position  for conduct that, if proven,
would violate the certification requirements under ORS 181A.410 or any rules adopted  under
ORS 181A.410, the department  shall present the complaint to the Corrections Policy Com-
mittee described in ORS 181A.375 for disposition.
ACCESS TO COURTS
SECTION 6.
(1)(a) The Judicial Department shall establish,  manage and administer a law
library at each Department of Corrections institution that  is modeled after the Multnomah
Circuit Court Legal Resource Center.
(b) The Judicial Department shall provide to  each adult in custody at a Department of
Corrections institution access to the courts and legal resources to the same extent enjoyed
by the general public.
(2) The Department of Corrections shall provide to each adult in custody at a Department
of Corrections institution access to the following at no cost:
(a) The courts and legal resources to the same extent enjoyed by the general public.
(b) The law library established under subsection (1) of  this section at the facility in which
the adult in custody is incarcerated regardless of the claim  or legal issue, during regular
[4]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
business hours, evenings and at least one weekend day per week.
(c) Legal research  materials on tablet computers available from housing units or on
kiosks.
(d) Computers and printers for word processing, copying and printing of documents  re-
lated to legal issues, during regular business hours, evenings and  at least one weekend day
per week.
(e) Telephones for  the purpose of calling courts to inquire about court processes or the
court case of the adult in custody.
(f) The Internet to conduct legal research,  including access to websites for state and
federal courts and the Oregon State Bar.
(g) Information about the court case of the adult in custody through electronic state  and
federal databases.
(h) Forms through the Judicial Department Forms Center website.
(i) Printed legal forms in the law library free of charge.
(j) Document copying, envelopes and  postage in the law library to mail any documents
necessary to address any legal issues concerning and identified by the adult in custody.
(k) Access  to private and comfortable rooms that conform to any applicable requirements
of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990  (42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) for making legal
telephone calls, appearing remotely at hearings and taking notes.  For purposes of making
legal telephone calls, an  adult in custody must have access within seven days of requesting
use of the telephone.
(L) Any court proceeding by telephone or video conference for the entirety of the  hear-
ing.
(3) The Judicial Department shall:
(a) Develop and publish detailed policies and procedures for  use by court staff to ensure
consistent and proper  processing of fee waiver and deferral requests submitted by adults in
custody.
(b) Allow filings to be  accepted pending the processing of a fee waiver or deferral request.
(c) Develop and deliver ongoing training for judicial staff at all courts in this  state, in-
cluding:
(A) An  overview of the policies and procedures of the Judicial Department and Depart-
ment of Corrections related to the ability of an adult in custody to  attend court proceedings
and communicate with the court.
(B) Information related to access to justice  issues experienced by adults in custody, in-
cluding barriers to communication with courts, challenges of  remote attendance at court
proceedings and the negative  consequences to adults in custody associated with missing a
court proceeding or attending a court proceeding in person.
(C) How to identify and secure the appearance of adults in custody.
(d) Ensure that each adult in  custody appears by telephone or video at each court pro-
ceeding unless the adult in custody or the attorney for the  adult in custody voluntarily
communicates another preference to the court.
(e) Schedule cases involving telephone or video appearances by adults in custody to begin
at a specific time and last for a specific duration.
(4) The Department of Corrections shall establish a dedicated point person at  each De-
partment of Corrections institution to provide the following services:
[5]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Be  available for adults in custody, attorneys, legal staff or court staff to contact with
questions or concerns regarding legal matters.
(b) Coordinate court appearances  for an adult in custody or troubleshoot issues con-
cerning the ability of an adult in custody to participate in a hearing.
(c) Contact the court if an adult in custody is unable to appear or missed the hearing.
(d) Be available for the court to contact if the court  experiences connection issues lead-
ing up to or during a hearing.
(5) The Judicial Department shall modify hearing  notices to include information about
what types of appearances are permitted and how to request each type of appearance.
(6) If an adult in custody is transported for an in-person  court appearance, the Depart-
ment of Corrections may not cause the adult  in custody to lose their housing or job assign-
ments and shall ensure that necessary personal care items, paperwork and medications are
transported with the adult in custody.
OPERATIONAL AND FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS
SECTION 7.
Feasibility study; report.  (1) The Department of Corrections shall conduct a
feasibility study and prepare a report on  creating a system of women’s regional justice cen-
ters across this state to function as an alternative model of caring for adults in custody.
(2) The department shall submit the report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to the judiciary no later than September 15, 2027.
(3) The department  shall publish the report on a public-facing website no later than
September 15, 2027.
SECTION 8. Grievances. (1) The Department of Corrections  may not deny a grievance for
reasons of form if the content of the grievance is clear. If a grievance  is denied, the de-
partment shall explain the reason for the denial in person and in writing to  the adult in
custody.
(2) The department shall liberally extend the timelines for filing and appealing grievances.
(3) Unless an adult in custody can  demonstrate a reasonable basis for being untimely, an
adult in custody shall submit grievances and  appeals to the Department of Corrections in-
stitution grievance coordinator or designee on the following timelines:
(a) A grievance  within 90 calendar days from the date on which the incident or issue
giving rise to the grievance occurred.
(b) An initial appeal within 45 calendar days from  the date that the grievance coordinator
or designee sent the initial grievance response to the adult in custody.
(c) A final appeal within 45 calendar days from the  date that the grievance coordinator
or designee sent the initial appeal response to the adult in custody.
(4) The department shall:
(a) Provide grievance forms in the preferred language of an adult in custody.
(b) Establish and maintain an electronic system for adults in custody to access and  sub-
mit grievances on tablet computers.
(c) Ensure anonymous reporting options.
(d) Revisit grievance protocols every  three years, including requirements and timelines
for filing grievances and appeals.
[6]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Provide semiannual in-service  training to staff on the components of the grievance
protocol and their duties within that protocol.
(f) Ensure that  adults in custody know their rights and responsibilities regarding griev-
ances, including the process and timelines for filing and appeals.
(g) Establish a monitoring protocol to identify when staff  retaliate against adults in
custody who file grievances and a  corresponding disciplinary protocol for staff who engage
in retaliation.
(h) Formally monitor and track staff adherence to grievance protocols, especially  during
the rollout of improved protocols, through measures such as meeting with adults in  custody
and staff regularly and distributing anonymous surveys.
(i) Establish an  electronic system to track data related to grievances, including but not
limited to:
(A) Staff performance.
(B) Trends and issues.
(C) Reasons for accepting or denying each filed grievance.
(D) Disciplinary, medical and mental health metrics.
(j) Collect and digitize all previously  filed grievances in its possession for the purpose of
generating usable data to inform future improvements to the grievance process.
(5) The department may not:
(a) Forward  or otherwise make available a filed grievance to the individual who is the
subject of the grievance.
(b) Prevent an adult in custody from filing a tort claim notice under ORS 30.275 because
the adult in custody filed a grievance.
(c) Retaliate against an adult in custody for assisting another adult in custody with  filing
a grievance.
SECTION 9.
Intake. (1) The Department of Corrections may use  the Coffee Creek
Correctional Facility to conduct intake exclusively for adults in custody who will  serve the
entire length of their sentence at the facility.
(2) The department shall conduct intake for all  other adults in custody at another De-
partment of Corrections institution.
(3) The department shall provide  women with a gender-responsive and trauma-informed
intake process, space and orientation.
SECTION 10. Basic conditions and needs.  (1) The Department of  Corrections, in consul-
tation with independent health experts, shall establish fresh food and nutrition requirements,
support enhanced food quality, variety and portion size and  expand the performance recog-
nition award system for kitchen workers.
(2) The department shall:
(a) Accommodate special diets and ensure that all adults in custody with  specific nutri-
tional needs are able to get those needs met.
(b) Provide more nutritious food choices to adults in custody.
(c) Ensure work crews have larger sack lunches to  provide the adults in custody on the
work crew with the necessary  caloric energy and nutrition to support their work while away
from the Department of Corrections institution.
(d) Offer a kitchen program at each Department of Corrections institution that provides
vocational education and enrichment beyond the  food handler card, supported by staff and
[7]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
adults in custody with professional culinary experience.
SECTION 11.
Maintenance and repair.  (1)(a) The Department of Corrections shall con-
tract with  an independent third party to audit and prepare a report on the infrastructure
at each Department of Corrections institution  every three years. The report must include a
timeline for addressing outstanding issues and a schedule for follow-up reporting.
(b) The  department shall submit the report, and may include recommendations for leg-
islation, to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to the judiciary no
later than September 15 of each year the audit occurs.
(2) At all Department of Corrections institutions, the department shall:
(a) Provide modernized HVAC systems with  HEPA filtration systems to ensure all adults
in custody have access to appropriate heating, cooling  and smoke filtration during wildfire
season.
(b) Ensure that the temperature of housing units is between 68 degrees  and 76 degrees
Fahrenheit.
(c) Provide adequate shaded or covered  areas outside for adults in custody to recreate
safely and comfortably.
(d) Ensure that all bunk beds are designed to prevent adults in custody from falling off.
SECTION 12.
The Department of Corrections shall comply with section 11 (2)(a) of  this
2025 Act by May 1, 2028.
SECTION 13. Facility design and structure.  The Department of Corrections shall:
(1) Ensure all cells include a privacy curtain for the cell toilet.
(2) Study and implement mitigation measures to  reduce noise levels from cell doors
opening and closing, including modifications to door mechanisms and permitting  adults in
custody to control their own cell doors during specified hours.
(3) Ensure that lights do not impact or inhibit the ability of adults in custody to sleep.
(4) Make immediate improvements to the current  facility space to ensure that it reflects
a more human-centered, gender-responsive and trauma-informed atmosphere.
(5) Enhance  and create opportunities for safe areas for adults in custody to engage in
wellness and self-care apart from their cells.
(6) Implement at all Department  of Corrections institutions visual enhancements in all
units, common spaces and program spaces to  improve the mental health and well-being of
adults in custody and staff, including placing items on the walls that offer hope and encour-
agement.
(7) Ensure visiting spaces in all Department of Corrections  institutions support produc-
tive and nurturing visits with family, children or other approved individuals, including en-
suring that the space:
(a) Allows for private conversations.
(b) Is child friendly with toys, a changing table and access to healthy and affordable
snacks in a vending machine.
(c) Provides the adult in custody  sufficient access to their children, family or other ap-
proved individuals.
(8) Establish dignified, gender-responsive and trauma-informed spaces  on the units where
adults in custody can de-escalate.
(9) Implement improvements to the Special Housing Unit space and protocols, including:
(a) Installing frosted films for  coverage in all cells to ensure that no one can look into
[8]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the cell when an adult in custody is showering.
(b) Removing the floor to ceiling closet-size cages and removing shackles from the wall.
(c) Ending the use of tethers or  similar items to walk adults in custody around the seg-
regation units and implementing alternative approaches to safe and secure movement  or
transfer practices within  the Special Housing Unit that are more human-centered, dignified,
gender-responsive and trauma-informed.
(d) Allowing adults in custody with a level 3 classification  to visit another adult in cus-
tody who is in segregation.
(10) Redesign the  housing units to eliminate open-dorm style housing and replace that
housing with divided rooms where small groups of adults in custody can be housed.
SECTION 14.
The Department of  Corrections shall comply with section 13 (9) of this 2025
Act within six months after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 15. Technology. The Department of Corrections shall:
(1) Rescind the current telephone validation requirement.
(2) Provide telephone calls and video visits free of charge.
(3) Install additional video call kiosks to ensure one kiosk for every four  adults in cus-
tody.
(4) Allow adults in custody to make video calls on tablet computers.
(5) Provide each adult in custody  with their own tablet computer at all Department of
Corrections institutions.
(6) Provide Internet access related to websites, applications and other digital  resources
for adults in custody through a  secondary wireless network subject to reasonable re-
strictions.
(7) Provide access to the computer lab during regular business hours, evenings and  at
least one weekend  day per week for adults in custody to independently work on legal, edu-
cational or occupation-related work, including using office, presentation and word-processing
software applications that are commonly employed in professional and school settings.
SECTION 16.
Unclothed body searches.  The Department of Corrections:
(1) May not use routine or randomized unclothed body searching.
(2) May use an  unclothed body search only upon a determination that probable cause
exists and with written approval from a supervisor.
(3) May use body scanning devices prior to conducting any unclothed body searches  sub-
ject to the following policies:
(a) A body scanner search may not occur without probable cause to warrant the  body
scan and prior written approval from a supervisor.
(b) The outcome of any body scan must be documented.
(c) Refusal of a body scan by an adult in custody does not constitute probable cause.
(d) The number of body scans each adult in custody is subjected to must be monitored.
(e) The department shall implement a maximum limit on the use of body scans on each
adult in custody to ensure safe levels of radiation.
(f)(A) The department shall establish medical exemptions by which adults in  custody may
elect not to undergo a body scan.
(B) Invocation of a medical exemption under subparagraph  (A) of this paragraph does not
alter the probable cause and written approval requirements for conducting an unclothed body
search described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[9]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) The  department shall ensure staff are adequately trained to read body scans accu-
rately, to avoid false identification of contraband and to enforce safe radiation limits.
(4) The department may not discipline, retaliate against or coerce an adult in  custody for
refusing a body scan or unclothed body search that lacks probable cause.
(5) The department shall:
(a) Post  guidance in areas where unclothed body searches are conducted to remind cor-
rections staff what is appropriate and not appropriate.
(b) Ensure staff explain each step  of the unclothed body search and its purpose to an
adult in custody before conducting the search, using professional language  and a respectful
tone and without additional commentary.
(c) Limit punitive responses when unclothed body searches reveal  addiction-related
contraband or harmless items.
(d) Ensure that if an unclothed body search is conducted, staff  shall keep accurate re-
cords of the information regarding the search, including:
(A) The name, race and ethnicity of the adult in custody subjected to the search.
(B) The name of the officer who ordered or conducted the unclothed body search.
(C) When and where the unclothed body search transpired.
(D) What alternatives to an unclothes body search were considered.
(E) The detailed reason that the unclothed body search was warranted.
(F) Any contraband that was recovered from the unclothed body search.
(e) Report on a monthly basis to  the Corrections Ombudsman the information described
in paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(f) Record, maintain and analyze data on the race and ethnicity  of adults in custody who
are subjected  to unclothed body searches to identify potential discrimination in unclothed
body searching practices.
(6) The information described in subsection (5)(d) of this section is a public record  for
purposes of ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
DISCIPLINE
SECTION 17.
(1) The Department of Corrections shall implement  a comprehensive
gender-responsive, evidence-based and trauma-informed discipline and sanctions system for
adults in custody.
(2) The system described under subsection (1)  of this section must incorporate policies
and practices that:
(a) Promote  positive reinforcement and positively state expectations alongside basic fa-
cility rules that highlight important concepts for women, such as self-care, relational ag-
gression and emotional and physical safety.
(b) Encourage circle processes and other  restorative approaches that safely and effec-
tively utilize peer mediation or support.
(c) Balance support  and accountability by acknowledgment of the strengths or assets of
adults in custody as often as challenges.
(d) Utilize affirmations, reinforcers and encouragers instead of confrontation.
(e) Relay positive behaviors in log books and during shift changes.
(f) Set a positive tone at each shift  change and utilize collaborative problem-solving
[10]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
techniques to prevent and de-escalate problems.
(g) Develop a discipline protocol and  misconduct grid that is specific for women given
their research-based risks, strengths and needs.
(h) Ensure that disciplinary hearings are intentionally designed  and facilitated to be
trauma-informed, including taking trauma into account as part  of any review, analysis or
decision-making and incorporating mental health support protocols into the process.
(i) Limit the punitive use of segregation and cell-ins by  requiring prior exhaustion of all
other alternatives.
(j) Address the over-broad  discretion of officers to impose sanctions. The department
shall adopt rules to limit the amount of discretion officers have in  determining discipline and
to update and expand policies and procedures regarding progressive discipline to ensure  the
discipline is gender-responsive, trauma-informed, easily understandable and consistently uti-
lized.
(k) Prioritize the least punitive discipline possible for each type of sanction, including
writing essays or performing cleaning tasks.
(L) Require the development of training videos to educate corrections officers in reducing
inconsistency and utilizing the lease punitive actions.
(m)(A) Minimize use  of punitive cell-ins and other lockdowns to allow adequate exercise,
mental stimulation, access to natural light and socializing.
(B) Utilize cell-ins only when low-level responses have been ineffective in  motivating
change.
(C) Provide that progressive discipline may not be based  on infractions that are more
than 60 days old and that face sheets are replaced every 60 days.
(n) Limit the number of discipline reports that can be attributed to an adult in  custody
for a single infraction-related event to one discipline report.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Adopt  rules modifying hearings protocols for adults in custody with a behavioral
health diagnosis to allow behavioral health staff to evaluate the ability of an adult  in custody
to understand an alleged infraction and the hearing process.
(b) Dismiss infractions for cases where the alleged infraction is directly associated with
an act of self-harm or a suicide attempt.
(c) Identify whether the mental health status of the adult in custody  contributed to the
alleged violation, and, if so, determine whether sanctions should be modified because of  the
mental health status of the adult in custody.
(d) Track conduct orders and misconduct reports.
(e) Implement a  process for tracking misuse of the discipline process, broken out for
each issuing officer, including whether the discipline imposed  was appropriate for the mis-
conduct. The assistant superintendent of security and the gender-responsive  manager shall
review the  tracking information for compliance with policy. Any misuse of discipline by an
officer must be recorded in the officer’s personnel file. If a pattern of misuse exists,  the
department shall impose corrective measures on the officer. The department shall use data
described in this paragraph to work collaboratively  with behavioral health staff and other
staff to address potential underlying causes for misconduct.
(f) Adopt rules allowing for the inclusion of positive entries in face sheets.
(g) Eliminate the use of disciplinary segregation units or, at minimum, ensure  that dis-
[11]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ciplinary segregation is a last resort and never exceeds 15 consecutive days.
(4) The department  may not hold adults in custody in segregation during disciplinary in-
vestigations.
(5) The department shall ensure that:
(a) Within two hours of being placed in restrictive  housing, an adult in custody receives
any requested book,  a pen or pencil, paper, envelopes, the personal address book of the adult
in custody, soap, a toothbrush, toothpaste, shampoo and deodorant.
(b) Adults in custody in restrictive housing are allowed  to access, within 24 hours of
confinement, three 25-minute visitation periods per week to be conducted via  live audiovisual
technology.
(c) Adults in custody in restrictive housing are provided with at least 15 hours per  week
of structured in-cell programming, which must include visits of at least 30  minutes at least
twice per week from the case manager of  the adult in custody and at least five times per
week from representatives for a variety of other services.
SECTION 18.
Lockdowns. (1) The Department of Corrections  shall provide all adults in
custody, other than adults in custody with a disciplinary  status, a minimum of eight hours
out of cell per day.
(2) The department shall:
(a) Adopt clear,  official and written policies and procedures determining when and how
lockdowns can be implemented.
(b) Digitally record and  retain the name of the staff member who initiated a lockdown,
the purpose of the lockdown and the length of the lockdown.
(c) Ensure that all lockdowns are  approved by an assistant superintendent of security
or a superior of an assistant superintendent of security.
(d) Provide that a staff member who violates this subsection is disciplined.
(3) The written policies and procedures adopted  under subsection (2) of this section are
public records for purposes of ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
SUPPORT FOR SURVIVORS
SECTION 19.
(1) The Department of Corrections shall ensure that adults in custody have
access to linguistically and culturally specific resources and services  for survivors of do-
mestic violence, intimate partner violence or sexual assault.
(2) To provide  the services described in subsection (1) of this section, the department
shall:
(a) Enter contracts and collaborate with community-based providers with relevant  ex-
pertise.
(b) Provide all adults in custody with tablet computers onto which programming  can be
loaded and accessed for free whenever needed.
(c) Report quarterly on a public-facing website all available programs for survivors.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Identify survivors in a trauma-informed manner as early as possible and connect the
survivors with appropriate resources.
(b) Adopt rules incorporating the identification of survivors into the intake  assessment
process.
[12]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Adopt rules to identify adults in custody who did not disclose prior abuse or trauma
at intake and  to provide the adults in custody, once they are identified, with appropriate
services, including counseling and advocacy programs.
(d) Establish a position to oversee survivor services. This position shall  conduct ongoing
outreach to ensure survivors are able to access and are receiving appropriate services.
(4) The  department shall engage a consultant or community-based organizations with
expertise in gender-responsive and trauma-informed correctional  practices to implement a
training protocol for  all existing and new staff that is designed improve staff professionalism
and address any issues regarding accountability for unprofessional, disrespectful or
dehumanizing staff behaviors.
(5) The department shall adopt rules requiring:
(a) All staff members  to be trained specifically on trauma-informed and gender-
responsive principles at least once per year.
(b) Mandated regular review sessions.
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES
SECTION 20.
(1) The Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Implement mental health screening for all adults in custody during intake and  con-
duct in-depth assessments where indicated.
(b) Offer mental health treatment immediately upon intake.
(c) Adopt rules establishing a continuum of mental health resources.
(d) Ensure that  all mental health screenings, assessments, treatments and resources are
gender-responsive, culturally specific and designed to address underlying trauma.
(2) The department shall:
(a) Implement drug and alcohol  screening for all adults in custody during intake and
conduct in-depth assessments where indicated.
(b) Offer detox support and substance use disorder treatment immediately upon intake.
(c) Adopt rules establishing a continuum of resources, including twelve-step meetings and
other tools, to address substance use disorder.
(d) Ensure  that substance use disorder screenings, assessments, treatments and re-
sources are gender-responsive, culturally-specific and designed to address underlying trauma
rather than to simply achieve abstinence.
(3) The  department shall ensure all adults in custody have access to various self-help
materials, including but not limited to books, music, digital content,  aural tools and supports
and sensory accommodations.
(4) The department shall:
(a) Maintain a portal containing a comprehensive list  of available supports, services and
programs at each Department of Corrections institution, including a description of  services
and their respective time commitment and eligibility  requirements, detailed information
about how to enroll or gain access on a tablet  computer and a portal to view appointments,
send inmate communications and request services.
(b) Ensure that work schedules for an adult in custody do not interfere with the  ability
of the adult in  custody to access behavioral health supports, either by allowing the adult in
custody to miss work for  appointments, classes and support groups or by ensuring that these
[13]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
activities are offered and accessible during nonwork hours.
(c) Ensure that behavioral health sessions,  groups, crisis intervention and dayrooms op-
erate as usual when a prison is on lockdown or modified operations.
(5) The department shall  develop a robust, facility-wide data collection and management
system that  consolidates comprehensive information from each department of the facility
into an organized, exportable database. The database must track individual service data while
maintaining the ability to provide aggregate, deidentified information to  agency partners, as
well as disaggregated data to assess racial disparities and promote equity.
(6)(a) The department shall partner with Trauma Informed Oregon  or other trauma
subject matter experts to conduct and publish an assessment every three years to identify
strategies to make the prison environment trauma-informed.
(b) The published assessment must be provided within three months of publication to the
committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary.
(c) Within  30 days following publication of the assessment, the department shall submit
an action plan to carry out  the recommendations in the assessment to the committees or
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary.
PRISON RAPE ELIMINATION ACT
SECTION 21.
(1) There is created in the office of Corrections Ombudsman established in
ORS 423.400 the position of compliance  manager to ensure all operations of the Department
of Corrections comply with best practices of the Prison Rape Elimination Act of  2003 (P.L.
108-79, 117 Stat. 972, 34 U.S.C. 30301 to 30309) and related regulations.
(2)(a) The department, in collaboration with outside experts, shall develop and implement
specialized training and education for staff and adults in  custody, including skills demon-
stration requirements, follow-up assessments  and gender-responsive and trauma-informed
implementation of the Prison Rape Elimination Act.
(b) The specialized training and education for implementation of the Prison  Rape Elimi-
nation Act must include:
(A) Appropriate investigation practices.
(B) Confidentiality practices.
(C) The dynamics of custodial sexual abuse for women and gender diverse populations.
(D) Components of institutional culture and its effects on predatory behaviors.
(E) Immediate and long-term  medical and mental health care needs of survivors of sexual
abuse.
(F) Professional boundaries and ethics.
(3) The department shall ensure that all adults  in custody have confidential and anony-
mous opportunities to share concerns about safety, reporting, responses or investigations
with the Corrections Ombudsman.
(4) The department  shall establish an oversight board to support compliance with the
Prison Rape Elimination Act. The board must meet at least quarterly to assess  all matters
related to  compliance with the Prison Rape Elimination Act, including existing policies, best
practices, audit documents, reports, disaggregated data, retaliation monitoring records and
any statutorily required post-incident review reports.
(5) Upon request by the board, the department shall  provide to the board additional re-
[14]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ports or data that would be conducive to promoting safety, accountability,  transparency and
equity.
(6) The Governor shall appoint members  to the board, including but not limited to the
Corrections Ombudsman, individuals on the Governor’s  advisory panel on gender responsive
practices in corrections and individuals representing  organizations with relevant legal and
subject matter expertise.
(7) The board shall regularly submit its findings and recommendations  as a report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the
committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary.
(8) The department shall:
(a) Adopt  rules establishing ongoing, automated monitoring to flag issues related to
compliance with the Prison  Rape Elimination Act and particular staff members or facilities.
Upon identification, all relevant information must be subject to internal and external review,
including information regarding progressive discipline or other steps that have been taken
in response to  issues. This data must be included in the reports submitted under subsection
(7) of this section.
(b) Establish more comprehensive data collection  regarding reports related to compliance
with the Prison Rape Elimination  Act, including demographically disaggregated information
and qualitative analysis using report narratives.
(c) Establish an on-site presence for adults in custody to receive counseling services from
professionals who are not employees of the department related to violations of the Prison
Rape Elimination Act.
(d) Ensure that adults in custody who report a violation of  the Prison Rape Elimination
Act have ongoing and documented input regarding their preference  for safe housing options.
(e) Establish a reporting mechanism to identify  and track adults in custody who have
made reports related to the  Prison Rape Elimination Act. The reporting mechanism must
collect and maintain the following information:
(A) Whether the adult in custody was placed in segregation following the report.
(B) If the adult in  custody was placed in segregation following the report, what alterna-
tive options staff considered.
(C) What periodic reviews have been conducted.
(D) Disaggregated data to allow for any racial, demographic or  other disparities to be
identified and remedied.
SUPPORT FOR PARENTS AND FAMILIES
SECTION 22.
(1) The Department of Corrections shall adopt rules to expand opportunities
for parents, children and families to connect with an adult in  custody, including rules es-
tablishing that:
(a) Children have a presumptive right to visit a parent who is an adult in custody.
(b) Individuals having difficulty being approved to visit a family member who is an adult
in custody must be assigned a  dedicated point of contact within the visiting services unit for
individualized assistance.
(c) The visiting services unit shall track and report data regarding family members’
visitation applications that are approved or denied, as well  as those for which an adminis-
[15]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
trative review is requested, including processing times and outcomes.
(d) The visiting services unit shall maintain the data described in paragraph (c) of  this
subsection in disaggregated form to identify and address disparities and promote equity.
(e) The department shall  allow a teenage child to visit a parent who is an adult in custody
without an accompanying adult if a guardian or caregiver of the child consents.
(f) The department shall hold at least four family events per  year, including those that
can be attended by adult children and other family members.
(g) Staff who  oversee visitation must receive specialized training regarding trauma-
informed interactions with children and families.
(2) The department shall:
(a) Establish a point of contact for visitors with special needs to arrange for  accessibility
items in advance.
(b) Ensure that the visiting alerts website is updated daily and  establish a text alerts
system to provide notifications.
(c) Allow families who live far  from the facility the opportunity to make appointments
for visitation, so that they are not  turned away if a visitation session has reached maximum
capacity.
(d) Ensure there  are at least two family advocates or an advocate program at each De-
partment of Corrections institution.
(e) Adopt rules, in  collaboration with the Department of Human Services child welfare
division and the Judicial Department, to develop  a process to facilitate the ability of adults
in custody to participate in mediation related to juvenile dependency or family law matters.
(3) The Department of  Corrections, in cooperation with the Department of Human Ser-
vices, shall ensure that adults in custody  have meaningful opportunities to participate in
cases under the jurisdiction of the Department of Human Services,  including but not limited
to programs, demonstrating parenting skills, effectively planning for reunification, commu-
nication with the Department of Human  Services, communication with their juvenile de-
pendency attorney and participation in related court hearings.
SECTION 23.
The Department of Corrections shall establish a prison  nursery program
at Coffee Creek Correctional Facility.
TRANSGENDER, NONBINARY AND GENDER DIVERSE ADULTS IN CUSTODY
SECTION 24. (1) The Department of Corrections, in collaboration  with individuals with
lived experience, advocacy  organization and other agencies or parties with subject matter
expertise, shall adopt rules  to develop a comprehensive set of policies and procedures in the
areas of medical care, behavioral health services, housing and  operations for transgender,
nonbinary and gender diverse adults in custody. At a minimum, the rules must include:
(a) A global policy that addresses staff responsibilities, disclosure of  information, facility
and agency multidisciplinary teams, housing and training.
(b) Procedures to implement the policy provisions.
(c) A detailed policy regarding body searches;
(d) An employee manual.
(e) A guide for transgender, nonbinary and gender diverse adults in custody.
(2) At least every three years, the  department shall convene the interested parties de-
[16]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
scribed in subsection (1)  of this section to review the rules and identify opportunities for
improvement.
(3) The department shall designate  a transgender care specialist at each Department of
Corrections institution to provide coordination of efforts and training across staff and adults
in custody on best practices for  supporting transgender, nonbinary or gender diverse adults
in custody. Each transgender care specialist shall have relevant expertise and authority to
resolve barriers to care and address issues of noncompliance.
(4) The existing Transgender  and Intersex Committee at the department shall be ex-
panded to include individuals with lived experience and subject matter expertise.
(5) The department shall expand training for staff, contractors,  volunteers and adults in
custody and ensure that  training is developed and delivered in collaboration with individuals
with lived experience and subject matter expertise. Training for staff, contractors and vol-
unteers must address the following topics:
(a) An overview of medically necessary gender-affirming treatment pursuant  to best
practices and guidelines established by  the Oregon Health Authority in accordance with
chapter 228, Oregon Laws 2023,  and delivered by an independent provider of gender-affirming
treatment and a representative from the Oregon Health Authority.
(b) Best practices for staff to support transgender, nonbinary and gender  diverse adults
in custody, with respect to matters including mental health assessments, housing, griev-
ances, work assignments and non-discrimination.
(c) Harmful stereotypes.
(d) Preventing, identifying and responding to bullying, harassment and discrimination.
(e) Appropriate ways to intervene in misconduct by staff or other adults in custody.
(f) Techniques to  recognize and intervene when adults in custody are experiencing mental
health challenges.
(6) The department shall create clear, transparent and flexible  gender-affirming treat-
ment policies for staff  and adults in custody pursuant to guidelines established by the Oregon
Health Authority in accordance with chapter 228, Oregon Laws 2023.
(7) The department shall ensure:
(a) Staff responsible for making decisions regarding housing, medical care or behavioral
health have specialized training to address the needs  of transgender, nonbinary and gender-
diverse adults in custody.
(b) Training for behavioral health staff includes a focus on conducting mental  health as-
sessments for transgender, nonbinary and gender-diverse adults in custody.
(8) The  department shall invite additional independent gender-affirming care providers
to sit on the Gender Nonconforming-Therapeutic Levels of Care Committee to  inform and
assist with decision-making.
(9) The department shall move oversight of gender-affirming care to the medical  services
division from the behavioral health services division.
(10) The department shall make electrolysis and other gender-affirming  care services and
resources available at all Department of Corrections institutions.
(11) The department shall  collect the following data and provide it to the Corrections
Ombudsman:
(a) The  amount of time between when an adult in custody submits a form to the de-
partment identifying the adult  in custody as transgender and making a housing request to
[17]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
when a housing decision is made.
(b) The  amount of time between when an adult in custody submits a form to the de-
partment identifying the adult in custody as transgender, nonbinary or gender-
nonconforming to when the adult in custody receives a response from the department.
(c) The amount of time between when an adult  in custody receives a medical recom-
mendation for gender-affirming surgery or treatment to when the  recommendation is im-
plemented.
RESEARCH-BASED PROGRAMS
SECTION 25.
(1) The Department of  Corrections shall conduct a comprehensive analysis
of available programs for adults in custody on an annual basis.
(2) The department shall view addiction as a serious public health issue, the treatment
of which is a necessity, not a privilege or an incentive.
(3) The department shall eliminate punitive  responses to drug use that pose barriers to
substance use treatment, ensure all  adults in custody have access to substance use treat-
ment and eliminate protocols that punish adults in custody for drug use.
(4) The department shall ensure the availability  of and access to culturally responsive
programs that address women’s diverse, intersecting identities and experiences.
SUPPORTS FOR REENTRY INTO THE COMMUNITY
SECTION 26. (1) The Department of  Corrections shall ensure that comprehensive safety
planning resources are made available to survivors of  domestic violence, intimate partner
violence or sexual assault, including personalized risk  assessments, information about
emergency resources and connections to community support services.
(2) The department shall ensure that all adults in custody have  access to reentry plan-
ning and a gender-responsive and trauma-informed  continuum of care from incarceration
through reentry.
(3) The  department shall develop and implement a gender-responsive and trauma-
informed continuum of care with interested community parties to ensure  that basic and
other needs of adults in custody are addressed well in advance of their release.
(4) The department shall ensure case  and reentry plans are culturally responsive and
address the diverse, intersecting identities of each adult in custody.
(5) The department shall assist each  adult in custody with ongoing development of a re-
entry plan, which must include but need not be limited to:
(a) Arrangements for short-term and long-term housing.
(b) Contact with children, family members and community supports.
(c) Parenting needs and supports.
(d) Employment assistance.
(e) Transportation needs.
(f) Information regarding accessing resources within the community.
(g) Medical care planning.
(h) Safety planning.
(i) Technology proficiency.
[18]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) The department shall provide basic  necessities to all adults in custody upon release,
including:
(a) Clothing that does not clearly identify people as being newly released from prison.
(b) Hygiene items.
(c) Safe transportation to their community.
(d) State identification.
(e) Choice of luggage or bag.
(7) The department shall ensure that adults in custody have necessary  medical appoint-
ments scheduled prior to release.
(8) The department shall ensure that, where there is an  identified need, wrap-around
teams create comprehensive care plans for higher-needs adults in custody.  These teams
must regularly  convene and include providers of behavioral health and medical services,
prescribers and correctional counseling staff.
(9) The department shall increase work furlough opportunities for adults in custody.
DASHBOARD
SECTION 27.
(1) The Department of Corrections  shall add the following information to
the existing public-facing disciplinary segregation dashboard:
(a) Placements in segregated housing related to  post-report Prison Rape Elimination Act
of 2003 (P.L. 108-79, 117 Stat. 972, 34 U.S.C. 30301 to 30309) safety concerns.
(b) The number of unclothed body searches conducted in each  Department of Corrections
institution, whether any contraband  was recovered, the nature of the recovered contraband
and the race and ethnicity of the adult in custody  who is subjected to an unclothed body
search.
(c) A list and description of  all programs and services offered within each Department
of Corrections institution, how many adults in custody are served  annually by each program
or service, the eligibility  requirements for each program or service, the number of available
spots in each program or  service, whether there is a waitlist for each program or service
and how long the average wait time is to participate in each program or service.
(d) The number of lockdowns  and modified operations per week, the reason for each
lockdown and modified operation and the duration of each lockdown and modified operation.
(2) The department shall expand the unusual incident report dashboard  to track metrics
that are important for adults in custody, including but not limited to metrics related to:
(a) Medical or mental health.
(b) Grievances.
(c) Discipline.
SECTION 28.
As used in sections 1 to 27 of this 2025  Act, “Department of Corrections
institution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 421.005.
CONDITIONS OF POST-PRISON SUPERVISION
SECTION 29.  ORS 144.102 is amended to read:
144.102. (1) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or local supervisory authority
responsible for correctional  services for a person shall specify in writing the conditions of post-
[19]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
prison supervision imposed under ORS 144.096. A copy of the conditions  must be given to the person
upon release from prison or jail.
(2) The  board or the supervisory authority shall determine, and may at any time modify, the
conditions of post-prison supervision, which may include,  among other conditions, that the person
shall:
(a) Comply with the conditions of post-prison  supervision as specified by the board or supervi-
sory authority.
(b) Be under the supervision of  the Department of Corrections and its representatives or other
supervisory authority and abide by their direction and counsel.
(c) Answer all reasonable inquiries of the board, the department or the supervisory authority.
(d) Report  to the parole officer as directed by the board, the department or the supervisory au-
thority.
(e) Not own, possess or be in control of any weapon.
(f) Respect and obey all municipal,  county, state and federal laws, and in circumstances in which
state and federal law conflict, obey state law.
(g) Understand that the board  or supervisory authority may, at its discretion, punish violations
of post-prison supervision.
(h) Attend a victim impact treatment session in a county that has a victim impact program.
(i) For crimes constituting delivery of a controlled substance, as those terms are defined in ORS
475.005, or for telephonic harassment under ORS 166.090, or for crimes  involving domestic violence,
as defined in ORS 135.230, be  prohibited from using Internet websites that provide anonymous text
message services.
(3) If the person is required to report as  a sex offender under ORS 163A.010, the board or su-
pervisory authority shall include as a condition of post-prison supervision that  the person report
with the Department of State Police, a city police department, a county sheriff’s office or the
supervising agency:
(a) When supervision begins;
(b) Within 10 days of a change in residence;
(c) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s date of birth;
(d) Within 10 days of the first  day the person works at, carries on a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(e) Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or attendance  status at an institution of higher
education.
(4)(a) The board or supervisory authority may establish special conditions that the board or su-
pervisory authority considers necessary because of the individual circumstances of the  person on
post-prison supervision.
(b) If the person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of a sex crime, as  defined in
ORS 163A.005,  the board or supervisory authority shall include all of the following as special con-
ditions of the person’s post-prison supervision:
(A) Agreement to comply with a curfew set by the board, the supervisory authority or the
supervising officer.
(B) A prohibition against contacting a person under 18  years of age without the prior written
approval of the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(C) A prohibition against being present more than one time, without the prior  written approval
of the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer, at a  place where persons under 18 years
[20]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of age regularly congregate.
(D) In addition to  the prohibition under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, a prohibition
against being present, without  the prior written approval of the board, supervisory authority or
supervising officer, at, or on  property adjacent to, a school, child care center, playground or other
place intended for use primarily by persons under 18 years of age.
(E) A prohibition against working or volunteering at a school, child  care center, park, play-
ground or other place where persons under 18 years of age regularly congregate.
(F) Entry into and completion of or successful discharge  from a sex offender treatment program
approved by the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer. The program  may include
polygraph and plethysmograph testing. The person is responsible  for paying for the treatment pro-
gram.
(G) A prohibition  against direct or indirect contact with the victim, unless approved by the
victim, the person’s treatment provider and the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(H) Unless otherwise indicated  for the treatment required under subparagraph (F) of this para-
graph, a prohibition against  viewing, listening to, owning or possessing sexually stimulating visual
or auditory materials that are relevant to the person’s deviant behavior.
(I) Agreement to consent to a search of the person  or the vehicle or residence of the person
upon the request of a representative of the board or supervisory authority  if the representative has
reasonable grounds to believe that evidence of a violation of a  condition of post-prison supervision
will be found.
(J) Participation in random polygraph examinations to obtain information for  risk management
and treatment. The person is responsible for paying the  expenses of the examinations. The results
of a  polygraph examination under this subparagraph may not be used in evidence in a hearing to
prove a violation of post-prison supervision.
(K) Maintenance of a driving log and  a prohibition against driving a motor vehicle alone unless
approved by the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(L) A prohibition against using a post-office box unless approved by the board, supervisory  au-
thority or supervising officer.
(M) A prohibition against residing in a dwelling  in which another sex offender who is on pro-
bation, parole or post-prison supervision resides unless approved by  the board, supervisory authority
or supervising officer, or in which more than one other sex offender who is on probation, parole or
post-prison supervision resides unless approved by the board or the director of the supervisory  au-
thority, or  a designee of the board or director. As soon as practicable, the supervising officer of a
person subject to the requirements of this subparagraph shall review the  person’s living arrange-
ment with  the person’s sex offender treatment provider to ensure that the arrangement supports the
goals of offender rehabilitation and community safety.
(c)(A) If the person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of a sex crime, as defined
in ORS 163A.005, or an assault, as defined in  ORS 163.175 or 163.185, and the victim was under 18
years of age, the board or supervisory authority, if requested by the victim, shall include as a special
condition of the person’s post-prison supervision that the person not reside within three miles of the
victim unless:
(i) The victim resides in a county having a population of less  than 130,000 and the person is
required to reside in that county under subsection (7) of this section;
(ii) The  person demonstrates to the board or supervisory authority by a preponderance of the
evidence that no mental intimidation or pressure was brought to bear during the  commission of the
[21]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
crime;
(iii) The person demonstrates  to the board or supervisory authority by a preponderance of the
evidence that imposition of the condition will deprive the person of  a residence that would be
materially significant in  aiding in the rehabilitation of the person or in the success of the post-prison
supervision; or
(iv) The person resides in a halfway house.
(B) A victim may request imposition of the special condition of  post-prison supervision described
in this paragraph at  the time of sentencing in person or through the prosecuting attorney. A victim’s
request may be included in the judgment document.
(C) If the board or supervisory authority imposes  the special condition of post-prison supervision
described in this paragraph and  if at any time during the period of post-prison supervision the victim
moves to within three miles of  the person’s residence, the board or supervisory authority may not
require the person to change the person’s  residence in order to comply with the special condition
of post-prison supervision.
(d)(A) If  a person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of stalking under ORS
163.732 (2)(b) or violating a court’s stalking protective order under ORS 163.750 (2)(b), the board  or
supervisory authority may include as a special condition of the person’s post-prison supervision
reasonable residency restrictions.
(B) If the board or supervisory authority imposes  the special condition of post-prison supervision
described in this paragraph and  if at any time during the period of post-prison supervision the victim
moves to a location that causes the person to be in violation of the special condition of post-prison
supervision, the board or supervisory authority may not require the person to change the  person’s
residence in order to comply with the special condition of post-prison supervision.
(5)(a) The board  or supervisory authority may require the person to pay, as a condition of
post-prison supervision, compensatory fines, restitution or attorney fees:
(A) As determined, imposed or required by the sentencing court; or
(B) When previously required as a condition of any type of supervision that is later revoked.
(b) The board may require a person to  pay restitution as a condition of post-prison supervision
imposed for an offense other than the offense for which the restitution was ordered if the person:
(A) Was ordered to pay restitution as a result of another conviction; and
(B) Has not fully paid the restitution by the time the person has completed the period of post-
prison supervision imposed for the offense for which the restitution was ordered.
(6) A person’s failure to apply for or accept employment at a workplace  where there is a labor
dispute in progress does not constitute a violation of the conditions of post-prison supervision.
(7)(a) When  a person is released from imprisonment on post-prison supervision, the board shall
order as a condition of  post-prison supervision that the person reside for the first six months after
release in the county that last supervised the person, if the person was on active supervision  as an
adult for a felony at the time of the offense that resulted in the imprisonment.
(b) If the person was not on active supervision as an adult  for a felony at the time of the offense
that resulted in the imprisonment, the board shall order  as a condition of post-prison supervision
that the person reside for the first six months after release in the county where the person  resided
at the time of the offense that resulted in the imprisonment.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (b) of this subsection:
(A) The board shall determine the county where the person resided at the  time of the offense
by examining records such as:
[22]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) An Oregon driver license, regardless of its validity;
(ii) Records maintained by the Department of Revenue;
(iii) Records maintained by the Department of State Police;
(iv) Records maintained by the Department of Human Services;
(v) Records maintained by the Department of Corrections; and
(vi) Records maintained by the Oregon Health Authority.
(B) If the person did not have an identifiable address at  the time of the offense, or the address
cannot be determined,  the person is considered to have resided in the county where the offense oc-
curred.
(C) If the person is serving multiple sentences, the county of residence is determined  according
to the date of the last arrest resulting in a conviction.
(D) In determining the person’s county of  residence, the board may not consider offenses com-
mitted by the person while the person was incarcerated in a Department of Corrections facility.
(d) Upon motion of the board, the supervisory authority, the person, a victim or a district at-
torney,  the  board may waive the residency condition under paragraph (b) of this subsection only
after making a finding that one of the following conditions has been met:
(A) The person provides proof of employment with no set ending date  in a county other than the
county of residence determined under paragraph (c) of this section;
(B) The person is found to pose a significant danger to a victim of the person’s crime residing
in the county of residence, or a victim or victim’s family residing in  the county of residence is found
to pose a significant danger to the person;
(C) The person has a spouse or biological or adoptive family residing in a county other than  the
county of residence who will be materially significant in aiding in the  rehabilitation of the person
and in the success of the post-prison supervision;
(D) As another condition  of post-prison supervision, the person is required to participate in a
treatment program that is not available in the county of residence;
(E) The person requests release to another state; or
(F) The board finds other good cause for the waiver.
(e) The board shall consider eligibility  for transitional housing programs and residential treat-
ment programs when determining whether to waive the residency condition under paragraph  (b) of
this subsection, and the acceptance of the person into a  transitional housing program or a residen-
tial treatment program constitutes good cause as described in paragraph (d)(F) of this subsection.
(f) Upon motion of the  person, the board may waive the residency condition under para-
graphs (a) or (b) of this subsection if the board finds that the person may be at risk of  abuse
or harm as a result of residing in the county.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Attends,” “carries on a vocation,” “institution of higher education” and “works”  have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(b)(A) “Dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 469B.100.
(B) “Dwelling” does not mean a residential treatment facility or a halfway house.
(c) “Halfway house” means a residential facility that provides  rehabilitative care and treatment
for sex offenders.
(d) “Labor dispute” has the meaning given that term in ORS 662.010.
CAPTIONS
[23]
SB 1120
1
2
3
4
SECTION 30.
The unit and section captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory  law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[24]