Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Corrections shall study the condition of the facilities
at the Oregon State Penitentiary that are used to execute an adult in custody who is  con-
victed and sentenced under ORS 163.150, including:
(a) The operational status and condition of the facilities.
(b) The cost to  renovate the facilities consistent with national standards if the facilities
are dismantled and rendered inoperable pursuant to the direction of the executive branch.
(c) The impact on the criminal justice system in Oregon  if the facilities are dismantled
and rendered inoperable.
(2) No later than February 15  of each year, the department shall provide the results of
the study described in subsection (1) of this  section, along with any recommended legislative
changes, in a report to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to the
judiciary in the manner provided under ORS 192.245.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2047.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3665