Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 610.150 is amended to read:
610.150. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Area of known wolf activity” means  an area designated by the State Department of
Fish and Wildlife as having known wolf activity.
[(a)] (b) “Livestock” means ratites, psittacines, horses, mules,  jackasses, cattle, llamas, alpacas,
sheep, goats, swine, bison, domesticated fowl and any fur-bearing animal bred and  maintained com-
mercially, or otherwise, within pens, cages or hutches.
[(b)] (c)  “Working  dog” means any animal of the species Canis familiaris used to aid in the
herding or guarding of livestock.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture  shall establish and implement a wolf depredation com-
pensation and financial assistance grant program, using  moneys in the Wolf Management Compen-
sation and  Proactive Trust Fund established under ORS 610.155, to provide grants to assist counties
to implement county programs under which:
(a) Compensation is [ paid] provided to persons who suffer  probable or confirmed loss or injury
to livestock or working dogs due to wolf depredation; and
(b) Financial assistance is provided to  persons who implement livestock management techniques
or nonlethal wolf deterrence techniques designed to discourage wolf depredation of livestock.
(3) Subject to available funding in  the Wolf Management Compensation and Proactive Trust
Fund established under ORS 610.155, a county qualifies for a grant [ under the  wolf depredation
compensation and financial assistance grant program ] if the county:
(a) Establishes a county  program to[ :] provide compensation and financial assistance as de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section;
[(A) Compensate persons who suffer loss or injury to livestock or working  dogs due to wolf
depredation; and]
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 42
HB 4107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(B) Provide financial assistance to persons who implement  livestock management techniques or
nonlethal wolf deterrence techniques designed to discourage wolf depredation of livestock. ]
(b) Contributes  an amount of moneys equal to 10 percent of the amount necessary to implement,
during the calendar year, the county program[ .];
(c) Establishes [ a procedure ] procedures  by which persons applying , under  the county pro-
gram, for:
(A) Compensation [ under the county program ] provide evidence of the probable or confirmed
loss or injury [ to livestock or working dogs  due to wolf depredation. Evidence of the loss or injury
must include], including a finding by the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife or the department’s
designated agent that wolf depredation was the probable cause of the loss or injury[ .]; and
(B) Financial assistance provide an estimate of the potential  cost of the livestock man-
agement techniques or nonlethal wolf deterrence techniques; and
(d) Establishes a county advisory committee to oversee the county program, consisting of  one
county  commissioner,  two members who own or manage livestock and two members who support
wolf conservation or coexistence with wolves. The county advisory committee, once established  by
the county, shall agree upon two county business representatives to serve  as additional county ad-
visory committee members.
[(e) Establishes a procedure  by which persons applying for financial assistance under the county
program provide an estimate of the potential cost of  the livestock management techniques or nonlethal
wolf deterrence techniques designed to discourage wolf depredation. ]
(4) In accordance with the Oregon Wolf Conservation and Management Plan, the Director of
Agriculture shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section, including [ but not limited
to] rules that  require participating counties to :
(a) [ Require that ] Prioritize awarding grants to  livestock owners and managers experiencing
above-normal probable or confirmed loss or injury to livestock or  working dogs due to wolf
depredation [ be given priority  by counties for grant moneys received under the wolf depredation com-
pensation and financial assistance grant program. ];
[(b) Require counties participating in the wolf depredation compensation and  financial assistance
grant program to: ]
[(A) Prepare an annual report that  specifies the actions taken by, and compensation paid and fi-
nancial assistance provided to, counties  under the wolf depredation compensation and financial assist-
ance grant program; ]
(b) Prepare annual reports that describe the counties’ actions taken under  the county
grant programs, including the amounts provided as compensation and financial assistance;
[(B)] (c)  Distribute grant program funds, to the extent possible, in an equal and balanced manner
between [ payments to compensate for loss or injury to livestock or working dogs due to wolf
depredation and payments to implement livestock management techniques or nonlethal wolf deterrence
techniques designed to discourage wolf depredation of livestock ] compensation and  financial as-
sistance, with a minimum of 30 percent of grant program funds being distributed  for [ livestock
management techniques or nonlethal wolf deterrence  techniques designed to discourage wolf
depredation of livestock ] financial assistance ; [ and]
[(C)] (d)  Establish compensation rates for probable or confirmed  loss or injury to livestock
animals or working dogs due  to wolf depredation , of not more than $15,000 per livestock animal
or working dog,  that are based  on [ fair market value and ] the recommendation of the county advi-
sory committee described in subsection (3)(d) of this section[ .] as to  fair market value, and the
[2]
HB 4107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
following:
(A) A multiplier of  seven times the fair market value of cow calves and yearlings, sheep
and goats;
(B) A multiplier of three times the fair market value of  cows not described in subpara-
graph (A) of this paragraph; and
(C) The fair market value of horses, other livestock not specifically  described in this
paragraph and working dogs; and
[(c)] (e)  Establish eligibility requirements for compensation under county programs  that ensure,
contingent upon available funds, that:
(A) Outside an area of known wolf activity, [ as designated by the State  Department of Fish and
Wildlife, confirmed  loss or injury to livestock or working dogs shall be compensated ] the compen-
sation is provided regardless of the preexistence of wolf deterrence techniques;
(B) Within an area of known wolf activity, [ as designated by the  State Department of Fish and
Wildlife, confirmed loss or injury to livestock or working dogs, as  well as missing livestock above the
level based on loss or  injury attributable to causes other than wolf depredation established by the
county advisory committee described in  subsection (3)(d) of this section, shall be compensable ] the
compensation is provided only  if owners have demonstrated implementation of  best management
practices to deter wolves, including reasonable use  of nonlethal methods when practicable[ , giving
priority for compensation of confirmed losses at fair market value and with other compensation  claims
determined according to the recommendation of the county advisory committee ]; and
(C) Any compensation [ for loss or injury to livestock or working dogs due to wolf depredation ] is
based upon a finding by  the local advisory committee that the person did not unreasonably or
purposefully create circumstances that attract wolves or encourage conflict  between wolves and
livestock or working dogs.
(5) Each biennium the State Department of Agriculture shall :
(a) Prepare a report that specifies the actions taken by counties, compensation  and financial
assistance provided [paid] by counties and financial assistance provided to counties under the wolf
depredation compensation and financial assistance grant program[ , and];
(b) [Shall] Submit the report , in the manner provided in ORS 192.245,  to committees or in-
terim committees of  the Legislative Assembly  related to natural resources;  and
(c) Post the report on the department’s website for public access.
(6) The [ State Department of Agriculture ] department may use moneys in the Wolf Management
Compensation and Proactive Trust Fund established under ORS  610.155 to pay expenses incurred in
administering the wolf depredation compensation and financial assistance grant program.
[3]