Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 4, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2017 (Ballot Measure 98), is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  The amounts appropriated, allocated or otherwise made available under section 2 ,
chapter 1, Oregon  Laws 2017,  [ of this 2016 Act ] and apportioned under section 3 , chapter 1,
Oregon Laws 2017 (Ballot Measure 98 (2016)),  [ of this 2016 Act ] shall be in addition to the total
amount the Legislative Assembly would otherwise appropriate, allocate or make available for a
biennium for funding kindergarten through grade 12 public education , including any amounts  in
the State School Fund .
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund,  the amount of $294,000,000, which shall be deposited in the High School Grad-
uation and College  and Career Readiness Fund established by section 2, chapter 1, Oregon
Laws 2017 (Ballot Measure 98 (2016)).
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4277