Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “State agency”  means any officer, board, commission, department, division or insti-
tution in the executive or administrative branch of state government.
(b) “Survey”  means the solicitation of the opinions, experiences or beliefs of a statis-
tically significant number of persons not employed by the state agency.
(2) A state agency that conducts a survey shall  report in the manner provided in ORS
192.245 no later than three business days after receiving the results of the survey. The report
must include:
(a) The results of the survey; and
(b) The approximate time when the state agency plans  to release the results of the sur-
vey to the public.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 119