Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Fire Marshal may issue grants to dispensaries  described in
ORS 480.341 to facilitate the installation of self-service dispensing devices. Grants may  be for
all or part of the  installation costs of the devices, but may not total more than
$  for each dispensary.
(2) The State Fire Marshal may adopt rules  the State Fire Marshal deems reasonable for
the administration and enforcement of the grant program described in subsection (1) of this
section.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $_______, which may be expended by the State Fire Marshal to
carry out the grant program described in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 282