Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 166.370 is amended to read:
166.370. (1)(a) Any person who intentionally possesses a loaded  or unloaded firearm or any other
instrument used as a dangerous  weapon, while in or on a public building, shall upon conviction be
guilty of a Class C felony.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, in  a prosecution under this section for the
possession  of  a firearm within the Capitol  by a person not described in paragraph (c) of this
subsection, within the passenger terminal of a commercial service airport with over  one million
passenger boardings per year or on school grounds  subject to a policy described in ORS 166.377, if
the person proves by a preponderance of the evidence that, at the time of the  possession, the person
was licensed under  ORS 166.291 and 166.292 to carry a concealed handgun, upon conviction the
person is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) Members of the Legislative Assembly who are licensed under ORS 166.291  and 166.292
to carry a concealed handgun, and legislative branch employees who are  licensed under ORS
166.291 and 166.292 to carry a  concealed handgun, qualify for the affirmative defense de-
scribed in subsection (3)(g) of this section concerning the possession of a firearm within the
Capitol.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a person who inten-
tionally possesses:
(A) A firearm in a court facility is  guilty, upon conviction, of a Class C felony. A person who
intentionally possesses a firearm in a court facility shall surrender the  firearm to a law enforcement
officer.
(B) A weapon, other than a firearm, in a court facility may be required to  surrender the weapon
to a law enforcement officer or to immediately  remove it from the court facility. A person who fails
to comply with this subparagraph is guilty, upon conviction, of a Class C felony.
(C) A firearm in a local court facility is guilty, upon conviction, of a Class C felony if,  prior to
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4472
HB 3742
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the offense, the presiding judge of the  local court facility entered an order prohibiting firearms in
the area in which the court conducts business and during the hours in which the court operates.
(b) The presiding judge  of a judicial district or a municipal court may enter an order permitting
the possession of specified weapons in a court facility.
(c) Within a shared court facility,  the presiding judge of a municipal court or justice of the
peace district may not  enter an order concerning the possession of weapons in the court facility that
is in conflict with an order entered by the presiding judge of the circuit court.
(3) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A police officer or reserve officer, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355.
(b) A parole and probation officer, as defined in ORS 181A.355, while the  parole and probation
officer is acting within the scope of employment.
(c) A federal officer, as defined in ORS 133.005, or a certified reserve officer  or corrections of-
ficer, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355, while the federal officer,  certified reserve officer
or corrections officer is acting within the scope of employment.
(d) A person summoned by an officer described in paragraph (a), (b)  or (c) of this subsection to
assist in making an arrest or  preserving the peace, while the summoned person is engaged in as-
sisting the officer.
(e) An honorably retired law enforcement officer.
(f) An active or reserve  member of the military forces of this state or the United States, when
engaged in the performance of duty.
(g) A person who is licensed under ORS 166.291 and  166.292 to carry a concealed handgun, ex-
cept as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(h) A person who is authorized by the officer  or agency that controls the public building to
possess a firearm or dangerous weapon in that public building.
(i) An employee of the United States Department of Agriculture, acting within the scope of em-
ployment, who possesses a firearm in the course of the lawful taking of wildlife.
(j) Possession of a firearm on school property if the firearm:
(A) Is possessed by a person who is not otherwise prohibited from possessing the firearm; and
(B) Is unloaded and locked in a motor vehicle.
(k) A person who  possesses a firearm in the passenger terminal of a commercial service airport,
if the firearm  is unloaded and in a locked hard-sided container for the purposes of transporting the
firearm as checked baggage in accordance with federal law.
(4)(a) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this  section, the exceptions listed in subsection
(3)(d) to (k) of this section constitute affirmative defenses to a charge of violating  subsection (1)(a)
of this section.
(b) A person may not use the affirmative defense described in subsection (3)(e) of this section
if the person has been convicted of an offense that would make  the person ineligible to obtain a
concealed handgun license under ORS 166.291 and 166.292.
(5)(a) Any person who knowingly, or with reckless disregard for the safety of another, discharges
or attempts to discharge a firearm at a place that the person knows is a school shall upon con-
viction be guilty of a Class C felony.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to the discharge of a firearm:
(A) As part of a program approved by a school in the school  by an individual who is partic-
ipating in the program;
(B) By a law enforcement officer acting in the officer’s official capacity; or
[2]
HB 3742
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
(C) By an employee of the United States Department of Agriculture,  acting within the scope of
employment, in the course of the lawful taking of wildlife.
(6) Any weapon  carried in violation of this section is subject to the forfeiture provisions of ORS
166.279.
(7) Notwithstanding the fact that a  person’s conduct in a single criminal episode constitutes a
violation of both subsections (1) and (5) of this section, the district attorney may charge  the person
with only one of the offenses.
(8) As used in this section, “dangerous weapon” means a dangerous weapon  as that term is de-
fined in ORS 161.015.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 166.262 is amended to read:
166.262. A peace officer may not arrest or charge a  person for violating ORS 166.250 (1)(a) or
(b) or 166.370 (1)(a) if the person has in the person’s immediate possession:
(1) A valid license to carry a firearm  as provided in ORS 166.291 and 166.292, unless the person
possesses a firearm :
(a) Within the Capitol[ ,] and is not a person described in ORS 166.370 (1)(c);
(b) Within the passenger terminal  of a commercial service airport with over one million pas-
senger boardings per year ; or
(c) On school grounds subject to a policy described in ORS 166.377;
(2) Proof that the person is a law enforcement officer; or
(3) Proof that the person is an honorably retired law enforcement officer,  unless the person has
been convicted  of an offense that would make the person ineligible to obtain a concealed handgun
license under ORS 166.291 and 166.292.
[3]