Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of State Lands shall establish a program to coordinate  with
federal agencies and to assist Oregon’s counties in negotiating  for the county’s purchase,
acquisition or long-term lease of federal land for  forest management, wildfire prevention,
transportation routes, housing or commercial activity.
SECTION 2. On or before January 1, 2027, the Department of State Lands shall contact
each county in this state and the director of each federal agency that owns land  in this state
to provide notice about the program under  section 1 of this 2025 Act and to explore the
availability of a county purchase of available federal lands.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4677