Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Bureau of Labor and Industries, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out  of
the General Fund, the amount of $250,000 to carry out the provisions of ORS 660.220.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 715