Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 657.221 is amended to read:
657.221. [(1)] (1)(a) Benefits based on services  performed in other than an instructional, research
or principal administrative capacity for an educational institution  or institution of higher education
shall be payable to an individual in the same  amount, on the same terms and subject to the same
conditions as benefits payable on the basis of other service subject to this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, benefits shall not be paid on the
basis of such services for any week of  unemployment that commences during a period be-
tween two successive academic years or terms  if the individual performs such services in the
first academic  year or term and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will
perform any such services in the second academic year or term for any institution.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, if  benefits are denied to an indi-
vidual for any week under paragraph (b) of this subsection and such individual  was not of-
fered an opportunity  to perform such services for the institution for the second of such
academic years or terms, such individual  shall be entitled, if otherwise eligible, to payment
of benefits for each week for which the individual filed  a timely claim for benefits and for
which benefits were denied solely by reason of paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(2) With respect to the application of this section, the following shall apply:
(a) An employee who terminates an employee-employer relationship by  electing not to
accept an offer  of work for a subsequent academic year or term, other than by reason of
labor negotiations or a labor dispute in progress,  shall be deemed to have voluntarily left
work. The effective date of such leaving shall be the date on which the  individual notifies the
institution of  the election not to accept the offer of work for the subsequent period, except
that if such individual continues to work under  the terms of a previously existing contract
or agreement, the effective date of leaving shall be the last day worked for the institution.
(b) If the institution does not extend to the individual an offer of work or provide  a rea-
sonable assurance the individual is expected to return to  work for the institution following
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1351
HB 2198
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
the period between the academic years or terms, the separation from work shall be consid-
ered an involuntary leaving or layoff.
(3) With respect to any services described in subsection  (1)(a) of this section, compen-
sation payable on the basis of such services shall be denied to any individual for any week
that commences during an established and customary  vacation period or holiday recess if
such individual performs such services in the period immediately before  such vacation period
or holiday recess, and there is reasonable assurance that  such individual will perform such
services or any services described in ORS  657.167 (1) in the period immediately following such
vacation period or holiday recess.
(4) With respect to  any services described in subsection (1)(a) of this section, benefits
based on such services shall be denied as specified in subsections (1) and (3)  of this section
to any individual who performed such services in an institution while in the employ of  an
education service district established by ORS  chapter 334, providing 50 percent or more of
the individual’s time is in the performance of services in such institution.
(5) Subsections (1)(b), (3) and (4) of this section do not apply to benefits that are other-
wise payable based on services consisting of:
(a) The operation or maintenance of facilities;
(b) Janitorial services;
(c) School food preparation and service;
(d) Early intervention services and support for such services; or
(e) Prekindergarten services and support for such services.
[(2)] (6) [ This section  applies ] Subsections (1), (3) and (4) of this section apply  only to service
performed for an educational institution or institution of higher education operated by:
(a) A nonprofit employing unit;
(b) This state;
(c) A political subdivision of this state; or
(d) An Indian tribe.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 657.221 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to weeks
of unemployment beginning on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[2]