Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Offshore Wind is established.
(2) The task force consists of members appointed  by the Director of the State Depart-
ment of Energy. The  members of the task force must reflect the diversity of stakeholders
engaged in and affected by state policy decisions related to offshore wind.
(3) The task force shall study how the state may support the  development of offshore
wind energy generation and transmission, including, but not limited to, examining:
(a) The state’s role with respect to siting offshore facilities and offshore and  onshore
infrastructure that supports offshore facilities;
(b) Methods and mechanisms for  coordinating with relevant federal agencies and local
communities; and
(c) Actions the state and state agencies  may take to integrate and interconnect
federally-designated offshore wind areas and  offshore facilities with this state’s electric grid.
(4) A majority of members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(8) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(9) The State Department of Energy shall provide staff support to the task force.
(10) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3324
HB 3069
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(11) The task force shall report on its findings and recommendations in  the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to energy and economic development no later
than September 15, 2023.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the  State Department of Energy, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $  for the purpose of
carrying out the duties of the Task Force on Offshore Wind established in section 1 of this
2023 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]