Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Licensed  child care facility” means a child care center certified under ORS 329A.280
that is operating under authority of a valid business license.
(b) “Local public health authority” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431.003.
(c) “Syringe service program” means a program that provides services including  free
sterile needles and syringes and safe disposal for needles and syringes.
(2) Each local public health authority shall establish a program  to register syringe ser-
vice programs that operate  within the jurisdiction of the local public health authority. The
registration program must require that a syringe service program:
(a) Renew its registration once every two years;
(b) Establish policies and procedures for enlisting community support for  the operation
of the syringe service program, including the development of a community advisory  board
that reflects the community in which the syringe service program operates;
(c) Assist individuals who use the syringe service  program in accessing substance use
disorder treatment services, which includes referring individuals  to substance use disorder
treatment programs; and
(d) Annually report to the local public health  authority on at least the following infor-
mation:
(A) The number of syringes distributed and collected;
(B) The rates of participation in the syringe service program; and
(C) The number of individuals whom  the syringe service program referred to substance
use disorder treatment programs.
(3) A syringe service program  that operates in more than one local public health au-
thority jurisdiction shall register with the local public health authority responsible for each
jurisdiction in which the syringe service program operates.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4718
HB 3956
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(4) A syringe service program may not provide services  within 1,000 feet of the real
property comprising an existing:
(a) Public or private elementary, secondary  or career school attended primarily by mi-
nors; or
(b) Licensed child care facility.
(5) Sterile needles and syringes  and other items provided by a syringe service program
may not be considered drug paraphernalia as defined in ORS 475.525.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 430.590 is amended to read:
430.590. (1) It is unlawful for any person to commence operating a methadone clinic:
(a) Within 1,000 feet of the real property comprising an existing public  or private elementary,
secondary or career school attended primarily by minors; or
(b) Within 1,000 feet of the real property comprising an existing licensed  child care facility. As
used in this section, “licensed child care facility” means a child care  center certified under ORS
329A.280 that is operating under authority of a valid business license.
(2) Commencing  operation of a methadone clinic within 1,000 feet of a school or licensed child
care facility is a nuisance and operation of the clinic shall  be enjoined and abated as provided in
ORS 105.550 to 105.600.
(3) For purposes of this section, “within 1,000 feet” means a  straight line measurement in a ra-
dius extending for 1,000  feet or less in every direction from any point on the boundary line of the
real property comprising an existing public  or private elementary, secondary or career school or an
existing licensed child care facility under this section.
[(4) A county or a local public  health authority, as defined in ORS 431.003, may waive the siting
restrictions under this section to the extent necessary to remove unreasonable barriers to patients’ ac-
cessing medically necessary treatment at methadone clinics. ]
[2]