Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  are appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  distribution to the following
entities for the following purposes:
(1) $3,500,000 to the Oregon Community Food System Network for  grants for small-scale
farms and ranches.
(2) $2,000,000 to the Oregon Community Food System Network to support  food hubs and
regional food system infrastructure.
(3) $2,000,000 to the  Oregon Farmers Market Association to support local food system
resilience and increase access for communities and agricultural producers.
(4) $500,000 to the Oregon Farmers Market Association for grants to farmers markets
to cover costs associated with acceptance of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance  Program
benefits.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2980