Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Public Employees  Retirement Board shall study the use of intercept
agreements with respect to pension obligation bonds and report to an appropriate committee
or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly on the results of the study no later  than
December 31, 2017.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1680