Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) To  the extent consistent with federal law and the interstate compact
described in ORS 507.010, and notwithstanding ORS 537.801 to 537.860 and any other contrary
provision of law in this state, the Water Resources Commission shall allow the  appropriation
of water from the mainstem of the Columbia  River for beneficial use, including irrigation, in
this state at a total rate and duty of two percent of the  average annual flow of the mainstem
of the Columbia River.
(2) The provisions of ORS  chapters 536 to 540 apply to the appropriation of water required
under subsection (1) of this section to the  extent the provisions are not inconsistent with the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2.  ORS 270.165 is amended to read:
270.165. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services acting on behalf of the  State of
Oregon may grant an easement or right of way on any real property under  its control if the de-
partment determines that the easement or right of way would be in the public interest.
(2) A state agency shall grant an easement  over any real property under its control if the
easement is necessary  to facilitate the appropriation of water from the mainstem of the
Columbia River pursuant to section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(3) A state agency that  grants an easement described in subsection (2) of this section
may charge an amount for the easement that does not exceed the fair market  value of the
easement.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3369