Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Coordinated care organization” and “medical assistance” have  the meanings given
those terms in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Residential treatment facility” and “residential treatment home”  have the meanings
given those terms in ORS 443.400.
(c) “Secure residential treatment facility” means a facility described in ORS 443.465.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall convene, or contract with a third  party to con-
vene, a work group to  study the feasibility of and develop a plan for transferring responsi-
bility from the authority to coordinated care  organizations to administer adult residential
health service benefits in the medical assistance program and assume the  financial risk of
administering the benefits. In conducting the study, the work group shall:
(a) Develop objectives for the transfer of responsibility described in this section;
(b) Assess the viability of including long term care services and supports in the transfer
of responsibility described in this section;
(c) Develop phased implementation timelines for  each facility type, including secure res-
idential treatment facilities, residential treatment facilities and residential  treatment homes;
(d) Develop recommendations about capacity  building, funding and other resources
needed for the implementation and sustainability of the transfer of responsibility  described
in this section; and
(e) Develop recommendations about statutory, regulatory and  contractual changes
needed for the implementation and sustainability of the transfer of responsibility  described
in this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2425
HB 2206
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
(3) The work group must include:
(a) Representatives of:
(A) Coordinated care organizations who have expertise in behavioral health;
(B) Coordinated care organizations who have expertise in care coordination;
(C) Community mental health programs;
(D) Entities that provide coordination of care services to individuals with serious  and
persistent mental illness;
(E) Secure residential treatment facilities;
(F) Residential treatment facilities;
(G) Residential treatment homes;
(H) Adult foster homes as defined in ORS 443.705;
(I) Long term care facilities as defined in ORS 442.015;
(J) Labor organizations that represent the behavioral health workforce;
(K) Behavioral health advocacy organizations;
(L) The nine federally recognized Indian tribes in Oregon;
(M) The Medicaid, Behavioral Health and Quality and Compliance units of  the Health
Systems Division of the authority; and
(N) The Program Integrity Audit Unit of the authority; and
(b) Medical assistance recipients with lived experience.
(4) No later than August 15, 2025,  the authority, in partnership with two to four members
of the work group required under this section, shall hire a consultant  to assist the work
group in conducting the study and developing the recommendations described in  this section.
(5) The work group shall first meet no later than October 1, 2025.
(6) No later than December 15, 2027, the authority shall report to the Legislative  As-
sembly, in the manner provided  in ORS 192.245, the preliminary findings and recommen-
dations of the work group, including recommendations  about needed statutory changes and
funding.
(7) No  later than December 15, 2028, the authority shall report to the Legislative As-
sembly, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, the final  recommendations of the work
group, including recommendations for proposed legislative changes.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]