Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) There is created the Oregon Perinatal  Collaborative in the Oregon Health
and Science University.
(2) The responsibilities of the Oregon Perinatal Collaborative shall include:
(a) Coordinating statewide  efforts for quality improvement in maternal and childhood
health; and
(b) Developing policy recommendations to further maternal and childhood health.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000,  for distribution to the Oregon Health and Science
University for carrying out section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 540