Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 359.400 is amended to read:
359.400. As used in ORS 359.400 to 359.444:
(1) “Community Cultural Participation Grant  Program” means the program created by ORS
359.436.
(2) “Core partner agencies” means the Oregon Arts  Commission, the Oregon Council for the
Humanities, the Oregon Heritage Commission, the Oregon Historical Society and the  State Historic
Preservation  Officer.
(3) “Cultural Development Grant Program” means the program created by ORS 359.431.
(4) “Cultural Impact Program” means the program created by section 3 of this  2023 Act.
[(4)] (5) “Cultural organization” means:
(a) An entity that is:
(A) Exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(B) Organized  primarily for the purpose of producing, promoting or presenting the arts, heritage
and humanities to the public or organized primarily for identifying, documenting, interpreting and
preserving cultural resources.
(b) A federally recognized Indian tribe.
[(5)] (6)  “Trust for Cultural Development  Account” means the account established by ORS
359.405.
(7) “Trust for Cultural Impact Account” means the account established by section 4  of
this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2.
Sections 3 and 4 of this 2023 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 359.400
to 359.444.
SECTION 3. (1) There is created the Cultural Impact Program to be  administered by the
Administrator of the Arts Program under the direction of  the Trust for Cultural Develop-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1205
HB 2498
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment Board.
(2) The purpose of the program is  to provide ongoing financial support of Oregon’s cul-
tural organizations.
(3) No later than August 1 of each year, under the direction of the  Trust for Cultural
Development Board, the Arts Program shall disburse the investment earnings, interest  and
other income deposited in the Trust for Cultural Impact Account during the previous  fiscal
year, to counties and federally recognized Indian tribes on a per capita basis.
(4) Counties and federally recognized Indian tribes shall award grants locally,  as specified
in the local cultural  plan, to cultural organizations that serve the residents of and visitors
to their  county or members of their tribe for the purposes of advancing, preserving or sta-
bilizing those organizations.
(5) Before awarding grants under this section, counties and tribes shall review and  up-
date their local cultural plans, in accordance with the process described in ORS 359.436.
(6) The Administrator  of the Arts Program may also use moneys in the Trust for Cul-
tural Impact Account  to provide technical assistance to counties and federally recognized
Indian tribes carrying out their duties to award Cultural Impact Program grants.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Trust for Cultural Impact Account is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Investment earnings, interest and
other income earned by the Trust for Cultural Impact  Account shall be credited to the ac-
count.
(2) All moneys  in the Trust for Cultural Impact Account are appropriated continuously
to the Oregon Business Development  Department for the Arts Program to carry out the
provisions of section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.  ORS 359.416 is amended to read:
359.416. (1) The Trust for Cultural Development  Board shall oversee management of the Trust
for Cultural Development Account  and the Trust for Cultural Impact Account  and  shall provide
direction  to  the Administrator of the Arts Program for the coordination, administration and evalu-
ation of the Cultural Development Grant Program, the Community  Cultural Participation Grant
Program, the Cultural Impact Program  and  the use of funds received by core partner agencies
under ORS 359.441.
(2) In accordance with  applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183, the board may adopt rules
necessary for the administration of ORS 359.400 to 359.444.
SECTION 6.  ORS 359.421 is amended to read:
359.421. The Administrator of the Arts Program  shall provide staff support to the Trust for
Cultural Development Board. Under the direction of the board, the administrator shall:
(1) Coordinate grant management;
(2) Provide Trust for Cultural Development Account  and Trust for Cultural Impact Account
management and accounting;
(3) Work with  cultural agencies and their constituents to communicate with and educate the
public on the role culture plays in the lives of citizens and communities; and
(4) Evaluate the Cultural Development Grant Program, the Community  Cultural Participation
Grant Program , the Cultural Impact Program  and  the use of funds received under [ section 13,
chapter 954, Oregon Laws 2001, ] ORS 359.441 by core partner agencies.
SECTION 7.
(1) For  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Oregon
[2]
HB 2498
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an  amount that produces $200 million in net pro-
ceeds for the purposes described in section 3 of this 2023 Act,  plus an additional amount es-
timated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred  to the
Oregon Business  Development Department for deposit in the Trust for Cultural Impact Ac-
count established in section 4 of this 2023  Act, to provide moneys to counties and federally
recognized Indian tribes for disbursement  to cultural organizations that serve the residents
of and visitors to their county or members of  their tribe in order to advance, preserve or
stabilize those organizations.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public  education or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) The grants described in this section will leverage art and cultural resources to create
vibrant public spaces that integrate art and cultural and natural amenities, sustain Oregon’s
rich arts and cultural experiences and  enhance a strong sense of place and community
identity.
(b) The factors described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection have the effect of creating
jobs, expanding business and  tax revenues and enhancing the economic vitality of Oregon
communities.
SECTION 8.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[3]