Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 339.420 is amended to read:
339.420. Upon application of the parent or guardian of the child, or, if the child has  attained the
age of majority, upon application of the child, a child attending [ the] a public school :
(1) May be excused from school for periods not  exceeding two hours in any week for [ elementary
pupils] students in kindergarten through grade  eight  and five hours in any week for [ secondary
pupils] students in grades 9 through 12  to attend weekday schools giving instruction in religion.
(2) Must  be excused from school for periods not exceeding one hour in any week to attend
a released time course as provided by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Released time course” means a course in religious instruction for which a  student
is excused from school to attend.
(b) “School district” means a school district as defined in ORS 332.002 or a public  charter
school.
(c) “Sponsoring entity” means an entity that  provides instruction for a released time
course and that complies with the requirements of a policy adopted by a school district as
provided by subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Each school district shall adopt a policy that provides for the excusal of a  student
from school to attend a released time course.
(3) A policy adopted under this section must require that:
(a) A student be excused to attend a released time course only as provided  by ORS
339.420.
(b) The school district awards academic credit for  the completion of a released time
course. When determining how much academic credit to  award for completion of a released
time course, the school district shall consider:
(A) The number of hours of classroom instruction time.
(B) The course syllabus, requirements and materials.
(C) The methods of assessment used in the course.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4096
HB 3695
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
(D) The qualifications of the course instructor, which must align with  the school
district’s requirements for teachers.
(c) The sponsoring entity maintains  attendance records and makes the records available
to the school district the student attends.
(d) Transportation to and from the place of instruction for the released  time course is
the responsibility  of the sponsoring entity, the student or the parent or guardian of the
student.
(e) The sponsoring entity makes provisions for and assumes liability for the student while
the student is under the control of the sponsoring entity.
(f) No school district funds are expended in relation to a released time course.
(g) Released time courses are not  held on school property unless permitted as provided
by ORS 332.172.
(h) The student assumes responsibility for any missed school work.
(4) Any time period for  which a student is excused to attend a released time course is
considered as time the student is attending the school from which the student is excused for
the purpose of ORS 327.061  and for the purpose of instructional time requirements prescribed
by the State Board of Education.
(5) Any person or organization aggrieved by a violation of this section may  bring an
action against the school district responsible for the violation  and may seek appropriate re-
lief, including injunctive relief, monetary damages,  reasonable attorney fees and court costs.
[2]