Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Transportation shall establish a program  to award
grants to public and private entities for erecting and  maintaining livestock safety fencing
along state highways.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to administer the grant program. The rules must:
(a) Specify the application process and eligibility criteria for the grant program;
(b) Include a methodology for identifying those portions of the state highways that are
at high risk of conflict between the traveling public and livestock; and
(c) Establish a  method for reviewing and approving grant applications and distributing
grant funds.
(3) The department shall convene an advisory group consisting  of stakeholders that rep-
resent the interests of affected counties and property owners. The group  shall advise the
department on:
(a) Identifying high risk portions of the state highways; and
(b) Eligibility criteria,  the applicant selection process and expectations for recipients of
grants awarded under this section.
(4) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement the provisions of  this
section.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Transportation, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $ , to administer  and award grants under section 1 of
this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1263