Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A  hospital licensed under ORS 441.025 shall report annually to the Bureau
of Labor and Industries and the Oregon Health Authority the amount of money the hospital
spends, if any, on third parties  to consult on or implement strategies to discourage, avoid
or prevent labor organizing.
(2) A hospital shall report the information described in subsection (1)  of this section in
the form and manner prescribed by the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1930