Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used  in this section, “community health worker” and “medical as-
sistance” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 414.025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2694
HB 2216
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall assess current fee-for-service billing  practices
with respect to community health workers serving medical assistance  recipients to identify
funding improvements and expansions that will ensure adequate and sustainable funding. The
assessment must include, but is not limited to:
(a) A review of  the current billing codes for community health workers to ensure that
each code takes into account the full range and duration of the scope  of services provided
by community health workers;
(b) A review of and revisions to billing codes for services that fall within the  scope of
practice of community health workers but are not currently available  to community health
workers, including social determinants of health codes as primary diagnostic codes;
(c) Revisions to current  billing structures for community health workers to align the
structures with the most recent  Medicare physician fee schedule codes for community health
integration, social determinants of health and principal illness navigation services;
(d) Revisions to  current reimbursement rates for community health workers to align the
rates with the full duration and nature of work performed,  including consideration of labor
costs, the mix of services provided, caseloads and supervision costs;
(e) A  review of current reimbursement codes, rates and mechanisms for community
health workers to ensure access to the full array of diverse settings  in which community
health workers practice, both clinical and community based; and
(f) A study  of the economic model of community health worker organizations to identify
ways that policies or fee schedules can be designed  to more closely fit the model in practice.
(3) The authority may contract with  a third party to conduct the assessment described
in this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section, “community health  worker” and “medical as-
sistance” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 414.025.
(2) The Oregon Health  Authority shall assess current payment pathways, other than
fee-for-service, with respect to community health workers  serving medical assistance recip-
ients in nonclinical settings to identify ways to improve access to  adequate and sustainable
funding. The assessment must include, but is not limited to, a review of:
(a) Existing non-fee-for-service payment pathways, including in lieu  of services, value-
based payments, health-related services and the Supporting  Health for All through
REinvestment (SHARE) initiative;
(b) How a community health  worker may access sustainable funding for services provided
to medical assistance recipients without the supervision of a clinical supervisor;
(c) How  a community health worker who is not affiliated with an organization or com-
munity care hub may access sustainable funding for services  provided to medical assistance
recipients;
(d) How community health worker services may be used to support the provision  of
health-related social needs services, such as housing supports, nutritional  assistance and
climate-related assistance, approved for the demonstration project under 42  U.S.C. 1315 by
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services; and
(e) The need to  establish and support community care hubs and the role of community
care hubs in streamlining the billing  process for community health workers and community
health worker organizations.
(3) The authority may contract with  a third party to conduct the assessment described
[2]
HB 2216
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
in this section.
(4) The authority shall submit a report in the manner provided in ORS 192.245,  including
a plan for implementing the improvements identified in the assessment conducted under this
section, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health no  later
than November 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section, “community health  worker,” “coordinated care
organization” and “medical  assistance” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 414.025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide technical  assistance and support for co-
ordinated care organizations and community health worker organizations  in establishing
billing structures  or alternative payment pathways for community health worker services
that are provided to medical assistance  recipients. The technical assistance and support shall
be provided in collaboration with coordinated care organizations’  traditional health worker
liaisons.
(3) The authority may contract with a third party to provide the  technical assistance and
support described in this section.
SECTION 4. Sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which  may be expended for carrying out the pro-
visions of sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[3]