Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Prescription Drug Affordability Board established  in ORS 646A.693 shall
develop a plan  that consolidates and aligns the objectives of the Prescription Drug
Affordability Board and the Prescription Drug  Price Transparency Act. No later than De-
cember 15, 2026, the board shall submit a report to the interim committees  of the Legislative
Assembly related to health, in  the manner provided in ORS 192.245, that includes recom-
mendations for legislation that:
(1) Ensures the  work of the Prescription Drug Affordability Board focuses on the pre-
scription drugs, reported through the Prescription Drug Price Transparency Act, that are:
(a) Increasing in price by more than 10 percent from one year to the next;
(b) Reported as the top  25 prescription drugs in year-over-year health plan spending in-
creases; or
(c) Reported as the top 25 prescription drugs with the highest overall health care spend-
ing;
(2) Aligns all reporting requirements for prescription drugs that are:
(a) Increasing in price by more than 10 percent from one year to the next;
(b) Reported as the top 25 prescription drugs in year-over-year  health plan spending in-
creases; or
(c) Reported as the top 25 prescription drugs with the highest overall health care spend-
ing;
(3) Identifies entities within the  prescription drug supply chain that should be included
in transparency reporting requirements established by the  Prescription Drug Price Trans-
parency Act;
(4) Ensures prescription drug price transparency reporting  requirements are consistent
through the prescription drug supply chain;
(5) Ensures trade secrets and confidential information are  protected, including by en-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3116
HB 2599
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
suring that prescription drug pricing data can be reported in an aggregated form; and
(6) Makes additions to the requirements for membership of the  Prescription Drug
Affordability Board, as described in ORS  646A.693, to reflect representation of stakeholders
subject to prescription drug price transparency reporting.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]