Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of  ORS chapter 279C.
SECTION 2. (1) As  used in this section, “water project” means a project to construct,
reconstruct or repair pipe, piping materials, interceptors, treatment  plants or other facilities
necessary to:
(a) Pump, treat and distribute drinking water; or
(b) Collect, treat and dispose of liquid and solid waste.
(2) A local  government, local contracting agency or local contract review board may not
enact, adopt or enforce an ordinance, resolution,  rule or other law that prohibits, restricts
or limits an evaluation, comparison or use of pipe or piping materials for a water project if:
(a) The pipe or piping materials  meet current standards or performance specifications
of:
(A) ASTM International, or the successor organization of ASTM International;
(B) The American Water  Works Association, or the successor organization of the
American Water Works Association;
(C) The American National Standards Institute, or the successor organization  of the
American National Standards Association;
(D) NSF International, or the successor organization of NSF International; or
(E) A licensed professional engineer; and
(b) Moneys appropriated from the State Treasury directly or indirectly provided all or a
portion of the funding for the water project.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not:
(a) Limit a licensed professional engineer’s professional judgment, opinion,  recommen-
dation or specification with respect to  appropriate pipe or piping materials or the perform-
ance of pipe or piping materials in connection with a specific water project; or
(b) Apply to  design or construction specifications that a licensed professional engineer
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1137
HB 2310
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
develops for a specific  water project in consultation with a local government, local con-
tracting agency or local contract review board.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act applies to a procurement for a water project that
a public body first advertises or otherwise solicits or, if the public body does not advertise
or otherwise solicit the water project, to a public contract for a  water project that a public
body enters into on or after the operative date specified in section 4 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Section 2 of this 2021 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) A local government, local contracting  agency or local contract review board may
adopt, amend, enact or repeal an ordinance, resolution, rule or other law before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section that  is necessary to enable the local govern-
ment, local contracting agency or local contract review board to conform, on  and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, to  the requirements set forth in
section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]