Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_____, for the State  Fire Marshal, for personnel costs related
to the Oregon Safety Assessment Program (OrSAP) established under ORS 401.256.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 269