Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2025 Act shall be known and may be cited as the
Oregon Behavioral Health Consumer Engagement Act.
SECTION 2. The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Increased  participation by consumers of behavioral health services promotes identifi-
cation of existing gaps in the delivery of services provided  within the mental and behavioral
health system, improves the quality of behavioral health services delivered and results  in
positive experiences and improved behavioral health outcomes for consumers.
(2) A coordinated system is necessary to increase consumer engagement  decision-making
and strategic input regarding the service delivery options that  are available within the ex-
isting behavioral health system.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Consumer” means a person who has  received or is receiving behavioral health ser-
vices.
(b) “Consumer supporter technical assistance center” means  a nonprofit organization
that operates as a peer-run organization.
(c) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization described in section 501(c)(3) of  the
Internal Revenue Code that is exempt from income tax under section 501(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(d) “Peer-run organization” means an organization:
(A) That is fully independent, separate and autonomous from other behavioral  health
services; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1412
HB 2042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) In which  a majority of the leadership and staff who perform oversight and decision-
making on  governance, financial, personnel, policy and program issues in the organization
are individuals who have received behavioral health services.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall develop, implement  and administer a program to
support consumer engagement efforts aimed at increasing and optimizing consumer  in-
volvement in planning and decision-making surrounding  the access to, and the delivery of,
behavioral health services in this  state. In implementing the program, the authority shall
enter into a contract with a  consumer supporter technical assistance center to provide
technical and financial assistance to the center to carry out activities that may include,  but
need not be limited to:
(a) Identifying and creating opportunities for consumer involvement in policy-making
initiatives concerning the quality of services delivered within the behavioral health system.
(b) Offering training for consumer education on:
(A) How to navigate the coordinated behavioral health system in this state.
(B) Self-directed care or peer-operated service models as behavioral health care options.
(c) Developing and preparing informational and instructional materials, to be  distributed
throughout this state, regarding the ways in which consumers may  participate in policy-
making and legislative processes.
(d) Working with state and local behavioral health organizations, county  behavioral
health programs and other local agencies and coordinated care  organizations, to develop
methods to facilitate consumer participation and representation in policy discussions re-
garding the quality and type of behavioral health services delivered to consumers.
(e) Representing the interests of consumers of historically  marginalized communities or
groups in advocating for increased consumer engagement.
(f) Improving the quality of services delivered within the behavioral health system.
(g) Reducing  barriers to accessing culturally and linguistically competent behavioral
health care for consumers of historically marginalized groups.
(h) Participating in national, state and local consumer self-help initiatives.
(i) Collaborating with and providing technical assistance to community behavioral  health
organizations to improve delivery of behavioral services.
(3) The authority shall prescribe by rule  the requirements for a consumer supporter
technical assistance center that receives funding under this section.
(4) A consumer supporter technical assistance center that  contracts with the authority
shall submit an annual progress report  to the authority setting forth, at a minimum, the
following:
(a) The status of consumer engagement efforts and results of  the outreach projects
conducted by the consumer supporter technical assistance center.
(b) Data and metrics associated with  the consumer engagement efforts described under
subsection (2) of this section, including the number and demographics of  consumers reached,
geographic access to state and local behavioral  health services and behavioral health out-
comes.
(c) A description of  any consumer training developed and implemented throughout this
state by the consumer supporter technical assistance center.
(d) A description of any technical assistance provided by the consumer supporter  tech-
nical assistance center.
[2]
HB 2042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Identified areas within the behavioral health system that are in need  of improvement.
(f) Any coordinated initiatives directed at increasing opportunities for  consumer in-
volvement in the behavioral health workforce.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 430.073 is amended to read:
430.073. (1)(a) As used in this section and ORS  430.075, “consumer” means a person who has
received or is receiving mental  or behavioral  health, addiction or substance use disorder services.
(b) “Consumer” does not include individuals  who receive compensation paid by the state
for performing work as an employee or  a contractor within the mental or behavioral health
systems.
(2) Consistent with  the principles embodied in ORS 430.071 to support and promote independence
and self-determination for persons receiving mental health, addiction or  substance use disorder ser-
vices, the Director of the Oregon Health Authority shall  maintain a Consumer Advisory Council to:
(a) Advise the director on the provision of  mental health, addiction and substance use disorder
services by the Oregon Health Authority  and operate as a representative body that facilitates input
from and communication with the peer constituency of the council.
(b) Review, evaluate and provide feedback, as permitted  by federal law, on select deidentified
site review reports related to mental health,  addiction and substance use disorder services provided
by the authority.
(c) Review, evaluate or publish impacts, advisories or  fiscal benefit estimates for the director
or the peer  constituency of the council, or as public information, concerning any policy proposals
developed in accordance with ORS 430.071.
(d) Recommend policies in accordance with ORS 430.071.
(e) Provide perspectives and experiences.
(f) Communicate concerns, emergency needs or general conditions related  to the delivery of
mental health, addiction and substance use disorder services.
(3) The director shall appoint 15 to 25 consumers to the council  from a list of candidates sub-
mitted by:
(a) Existing consumers on the council; or
(b) A seven-person committee, appointed by the members of the  council, consisting of individuals
who represent independent consumer-run organizations, consumer-run  advocacy organizations and
consumer-operated advisory councils that are active or headquartered in this state.
(4) In selecting the candidates to be submitted to the director under subsection (3) of this  sec-
tion, the council or committee shall  strive for the balance described in subsection (5) of this section
and otherwise encourage outreach to new members and diverse groups in the consumer or  peer
community.
(5) In making appointments  to the council, the director shall strive to balance the representation
according to geographic areas of the state, race, ethnicity, gender identity and age.
(6) The authority shall provide administrative support to the council.
(7) A member of the council  is entitled to compensation in an amount determined by the director
and to actual and necessary travel expenses incurred by the member in the  performance of the
member’s official duties. Claims for compensation and expenses  shall be paid out of funds appropri-
ated to the authority for purposes of the council.
SECTION 5.
The Oregon Health Authority shall take all steps necessary before the  op-
erative date specified in section 7 of this 2025 Act to enable the authority to  carry out, on
and after the operative date specified in section  7 of this 2025 Act, the provisions of section
[3]
HB 2042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, which shall be  expended for carrying out the pro-
visions of section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]