Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 9, chapter 109, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec 9.  In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the following  amounts for distribution to the following entities for the following
infrastructure projects to support the development of housing:
(1) $2,100,000 to the City of Albany for extension of water and sewer infrastructure.
(2) $3,000,000 to the City of Beaverton for the Kemmer Booster Pump Station to provide drinking
water supply to new neighborhoods in Cooper Mountain Community Plan Area.
(3) $1,500,000 to the City of Butte  Falls for wastewater treatment plant and lift station upgrades.
(4) $1,186,000 to  the City of Chiloquin for water, sewer and stormwater improvements for
Street/King Kong Housing Development and Valley Street/Mountain Street.
(5) $3,000,000 to the City of Cottage Grove  to install water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure
for a 35-acre parcel the city owns for housing development.
(6) $1,000,000 to the  City of Creswell for wastewater treatment facility upgrades and connections
to a regional treatment facility.
(7) $1,300,000 to the City of  Culver for mainline sewer reroute to provide sewer to residential
development.
(8) $1,000,000 to the City of Dallas for  sewer and stormwater infrastructure upgrades for La
Creole Node master plan.
(9) $6,000,000 to the City of Eugene for  water and sewer infrastructure improvements along
Crow Road.
(10) $1,900,000 to the City of Florence for water, sewer and wastewater infrastructure for four
blocks of city-owned property to be developed.
(11) $1,000,000 to  the City of Gold Hill for replacement of water distribution main line and im-
provements and upgrades to water treatment facilities.
(12) $3,000,000 to  the City of Gresham for water, sewer and stormwater improvements for the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3229
HB 2018
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
redevelopment of former  Kmart property in Civic Neighborhood at NW Eastman Parkway and NW
Burnside Road.
(13) $2,438,595 to the City of Hood River for water, sewer and stormwater site improvements  for
7.1 acres of city-owned land for housing development.
(14) $1,100,000 to the City of Hubbard for upgrades to a wastewater lift  station, water system
improvements and wastewater system improvements.
(15) $500,000 to the City of Independence for sewer infrastructure  for Polk Community Devel-
opment Corporation on Gun Club Road.
(16) $1,705,000 to the City of  Irrigon for water and sewer infrastructure for the Tumbleweed
development and the Molly development.
(17) $100,000 to the City of Klamath Falls for a new sewer lift station for  housing development.
(18) $250,000 to the Klamath Housing Authority for a new sewer lift station for housing devel-
opment.
(19) $1,753,185 to  the City of Lake Oswego for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure im-
provements for Habitat for Humanity development.
(20) $3,000,000 to the City of Lincoln City for a booster pump  station for Spring Lake housing
development.
(21) $1,425,000 to  the City of Madras for [ stormwater infrastructure for The Heights at Yarrow
Apartments and Belmont Lane  Apartments ] public road improvements, utility connections and
sewer and water improvements .
(22) $2,709,000 to the City of Manzanita for water and stormwater infrastructure for residential
housing development.
(23) $195,094 to the City of  McMinnville for water, stormwater and sewer infrastructure gap
funding for housing development.
(24) $945,000 to the City of Medford to construct a regional stormwater facility to serve the New
Spirit development.
(25) $1,200,000 to the  City of Monmouth for water, sewer and stormwater improvements for
Riddle Road development.
(26) $900,000 to the City of North Bend for  stormwater and sewer collection system upgrades for
Gloria Dei site development and water, sewer and  stormwater infrastructure improvements for
Maple Leaf development.
(27) $3,000,000 to the Oak Lodge  Water Services Authority for wastewater treatment facility
upgrades.
(28) $1,650,000 to the  City of Phoenix for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure improve-
ments to extend water line to service developable property.
(29) $2,000,000 to the City  of Prineville for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure for
multifamily development.
(30) $2,500,000 to the City of  Redmond for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure for
Northpoint Vista development.
(31) $1,500,000 to the City of Shady Cove for development of the city drinking water system.
(32) $3,000,000 to the City of Siletz for wastewater treatment plant upgrades.
(33) $3,000,000 to the City of Springfield for sewer infrastructure improvements for Glenwood
Riverfront area development.
(34) $3,000,000 to the City of Stayton for sewer infrastructure improvements along Ida Street and
Marion from Evergreen to 4th.
[2]
HB 2018
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
(35) $2,865,000  to the City of Sutherlin for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure im-
provements for Oak Terrace Village housing development.
(36) $300,000 to the City of  Talent for water and sewer system development charges for
infrastructure and water,  sewer and stormwater infrastructure improvements for housing develop-
ment.
(37) $274,057 to the City of Tillamook for improvements for Jones-Knudson Apartments.
(38) $1,566,000 to the City of Tigard for sewer and  stormwater infrastructure improvements for
housing development.
(39) $3,000,000 to the Tualatin Valley Water District for upgrades to the pump station on SW
189th Avenue in Beaverton.
(40) $6,000,000 to Prosper Portland for  the extension of NW Johnson Street and associated water
and sewer utilities to support the construction of new affordable housing units.
(41) $6,000,000 to Prosper Portland for the construction of a  new SW Water Avenue and asso-
ciated  water  and sewer utilities to support new affordable housing units as a part of the OMSI
District Master Plan.
(42) $4,000,000 to the Warm Springs Housing Authority for  interior and exterior rehabilitation
of two-, three- and four-bedroom houses used as rental units on the Warm Springs Reservation.
(43) $635,000 to the Linn-Benton Housing Authority for infrastructure and site utility costs  for
the Valor Place Apartments in Albany.
(44) $300,000 to the City of Salem for an affordable veterans housing development in West Salem.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]