Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Transportation shall study issues related  to electric as-
sisted bicycles and motor assisted scooters. The department shall  submit a report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the
Joint Committee on Transportation no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2823