Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Policy and Research Officer shall study federal affairs.  The
officer shall submit  a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include rec-
ommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related
to veterans, emergency management and federal and world affairs no later than  September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1386