Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission,  in collaboration with the Sys-
tem of Care Advisory Council established in ORS 418.978, the  Oregon Health Authority and
the Department of Education, shall conduct a study  to assess the feasibility of increasing the
services of school-based substance use prevention, screening, intervention and referral  pro-
grams. The study shall  examine programs operating in kindergarten through grade 12
schools that include:
(a) Evidence-based, community-based or culturally informed alcohol and drug prevention
strategies;
(b) Universal screening for substance use and other behavioral health needs;
(c) A screening, brief intervention and treatment approach;
(d) Disciplinary diversion for youth in possession of controlled substances;
(e) Employing or contracting  with certified prevention specialists or certified alcohol and
drug counselors;
(f) Providing or partnering with providers of low-barrier outpatient treatment;
(g) Community-based partnerships that address substance use; or
(h) Youth leadership  and decision-making related to substance use prevention and policy.
(2) The commission shall conduct a study to analyze  gaps in the provider workforce and
service delivery system for youth in need of all levels of substance use disorder treatment.
(3) No later than September 15, 2026, the commission shall report to  the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to health, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,
on the findings of the studies conducted under this section and shall include recommen-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3243
HB 2502
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
dations to:
(a) Support and proliferate school-based substance use prevention, screening,  inter-
vention and referral programs;
(b) Alleviate gaps in school-based delivery models across this state; and
(c) Support community-based partnerships, including but not limited to partnerships with
local child welfare agencies, county community corrections agencies,  community-based or-
ganizations and school-based health centers.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Alcohol and  Drug Policy Commission, in collaboration with the Sys-
tem of Care Advisory Council established in ORS  418.978, shall develop a comprehensive plan
for a youth continuum of care to prevent, treat and provide recovery services for  substance
use disorders. The plan shall  include recommended statutory, regulatory and funding
changes for state agencies that serve youth.
(2) All state agencies that serve youth shall:
(a) Participate in  the development of the comprehensive plan and cooperate in any nec-
essary data sharing agreements; and
(b) Implement any needed changes to rules,  program standards, grants or contracts
identified in the comprehensive plan.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon  Health Authority, in partnership with the Department of
Education and the  Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission, shall provide grants to approved
recovery schools, as defined in ORS 336.680, to:
(a) Offset costs for screenings; and
(b) Provide capacity for:
(A) Billing and reimbursement for health services;
(B) Nonbillable treatment and recovery services; and
(C) The establishment and implementation of alternative peer group models.
(2) The authority shall  adopt rules as necessary to carry out the provisions of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 4.
The Alcohol and  Drug Policy Commission, in partnership with the Oregon
Health Authority, shall establish a multimedia public education  and awareness campaign di-
rected at youth and families about substance use disorder, community resources and educa-
tion opportunities.
SECTION 5.
The Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission, in collaboration with the Oregon
Health and Science University, shall  provide education and technical assistance to providers
of youth substance use disorder treatment and early intervention.
SECTION 6. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 7. (1) Section 3 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]