Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Environmental  Quality shall study harmful algal
blooms and make recommendations for legislation.
(2) The department shall provide the results of the study and recommendations in a  re-
port to the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative Assembly,  in the manner pro-
vided in ORS 192.245, no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2237