Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 93.
SECTION 2. An easement may be created by an instrument in which  the owner of the
land burdened by the easement is also the owner of the easement. Such an easement:
(1) Is effective upon recording, unless otherwise specified in the instrument;
(2) May not be considered void, voidable or terminated due to  the operation of merger
at the time of creation or at a later time; and
(3) May be conveyed as any other easement.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 105.170 is amended to read:
105.170. For purposes of ORS 105.170 to 105.185:
(1) “Easement” means :
(a) A nonpossessory interest in the land of another which entitles the holders  of an interest in
the easement to a private right of way, embodying the right to pass across another’s land ; or
(b) An easement created under section 2 of this 2025 Act .
(2) “Holders of an interest in an easement” means those with  a legal right to use the easement,
including the owner of the land across which  the easement passes if the owner of the land has the
legal right to use the easement.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 976