Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $250,000, which shall be distributed by the department,  based
on calculations made under ORS 327.859, to  school districts to use on existing career and
technical education programs if the school district:
(1) Has a high school that is a remote small high school, as determined by  the depart-
ment; and
(2) Demonstrates  how the existing career and technical education programs satisfy el-
igibility requirements for moneys received under ORS 327.853 to  327.895 and how the estab-
lishment or expansion of career and technical education programs would not satisfy
eligibility requirements under ORS 327.853 to 327.895.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3133