Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 315.266 is amended to read:
315.266. (1)(a)  In addition to any other credit available for purposes of ORS chapter 316, an eli-
gible resident individual shall be allowed a credit against  the tax otherwise due under ORS chapter
316 for the tax year in an amount equal  to nine percent of the earned income credit allowable to
the individual for the same tax year under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  for a taxpayer with a dependent under the
age of three at the close of the tax year, the credit allowed under this  section shall be in an amount
equal to 12 percent of the earned income credit allowable to  the individual for the same tax year
under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code.
[(2) A resident individual may claim a credit under this  section, using either a Social Security
number or an individual  taxpayer identification number, if, but for section 32(m) of the Internal Re-
venue Code, the individual  would otherwise be eligible to claim a credit under section 32 of the Internal
Revenue Code. The credit allowed as provided in this subsection shall equal  the percentage, as stated
in subsection (1) of this section, of the amount  that would be allowed on a federal return, based on the
amount of the individual’s earned income  and the other provisions of section 32 of the Internal Revenue
Code.]
[(3)] (2) An eligible nonresident  individual shall be allowed the credit computed in the same
manner and subject  to the same limitations  as the credit allowed a resident by subsection  (1) [ or
(2)] of this section. However, the credit shall be prorated using the proportion provided in ORS
316.117.
[(4)] (3) If a  change in the taxable year of a taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085, or if
the Department of Revenue terminates  the taxpayer’s taxable year under ORS 314.440, the credit
allowed by this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with ORS 314.085.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4397
HB 3691
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
[(5)] (4) If a change in the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or  from nonresident
to resident occurs, the credit allowed by this section shall be  determined in a manner consistent
with ORS 316.117.
[(6)] (5) If the amount allowable  as a credit under this section, when added to the sum of the
amounts allowable as payment of tax under  ORS 316.187 or 316.583, other tax prepayment amounts
and other refundable  credit amounts, exceeds the taxes imposed by ORS chapters 314 and 316 for
the tax year after application of any nonrefundable  credits allowable for purposes of ORS chapter
316 for the  tax year, the amount of the excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer as provided in ORS
316.502.
[(7)] (6) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules for purposes of this section, including  but
not limited to rules relating to proof of eligibility[ ,] and the  furnishing of information regarding the
federal earned income credit claimed by the  taxpayer for the tax year[  and policies and guidelines
for the determination of the amount of credit allowed under subsection (2) of this section ].
[(8)] (7) Refunds attributable to the earned income credit allowed under this section do not bear
interest.
SECTION 2.
 Section 6, chapter 880, Oregon Laws 2007, as amended by section  1, chapter 750,
Oregon Laws 2013, and section 32, chapter 579, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  ORS 315.266 applies to tax years beginning before January 1, [ 2026] 2032.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 315.266 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]