Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 291.263 is amended to read:
291.263. (1) As used in this section, “state agency” [ includes any state  officer, department, board,
commission or court, the Legislative Assembly, its committees, officers  and employees. ] or “agency”
means every state officer, board, commission,  department, institution, branch or agency of
state government, the costs of which are paid wholly  or in part from funds held in the State
Treasury, except:
(a) The Legislative Assembly and the courts, and their officers and committees;
(b) The Public Defense Services Commission; and
(c) The Secretary of State and the State Treasurer in the  performance of the duties of
their constitutional offices.
(2)(a) A state agency shall inform  the Director of the  Oregon Department of Administrative
Services of any [ position] budgeted position in  the agency  that has remained vacant for a contin-
uous period of six months by  including a report on the position in the estimate submitted to the
[department] Oregon Department of Administrative Services  under ORS 291.242. The department
may consider the vacancy in its determinations under ORS 291.244 and may reduce the  amount al-
lotted to the state agency.
(b) If a state agency wants  to retain an unfilled position included in the estimate sub-
mitted to the department under ORS 291.242, the agency  shall give the director specific and
valid reasons for retaining the position.
(c) If the director determines that the reasons given by the agency are insufficient:
(A) The director shall inform the agency of the reasons why retaining the  position sub-
mitted by the agency are insufficient; and
(B) The agency may not fill the position.
(3) The director shall report each quarter on  actions taken under this section to the
President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House  of Representatives, the Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 and the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1296
HB 2225
1
2
3
4
5
(4) An agency that has been prohibited from filling a vacant position under  subsection (2)
of this section may include a request to fill the position  in the agency budget submitted for
consideration during the legislative budgeting process of  a regular or special session of the
Legislative Assembly.
[2]