Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of the wildlife laws.
SECTION 2. Each biennium the State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall prepare a
report that estimates the net change in wolf population during the preceding two-year period.
The department shall submit the report  to the Legislative Assembly as provided under ORS
192.245 and post the report on the department’s website for public access.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 610.155 is amended to read:
610.155. (1) The Wolf Management Compensation  and Proactive Trust Fund is established sepa-
rate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on the moneys in the Wolf Management
Compensation and Proactive Trust Fund shall be credited to the  fund. All moneys in the fund are
continuously appropriated to the State Department of Agriculture for the purpose of  establishing
and implementing the wolf depredation compensation and  financial assistance grant program de-
scribed in ORS 610.150.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative  Assembly for the purposes
of the fund and any gifts, grants, donations, endowments or  bequests from any public or private
source. The State Department of Agriculture may seek out and receive any gifts, grants, donations,
endowments or bequests for the  purpose of establishing and implementing the wolf depredation
compensation and financial assistance grant program described in ORS 610.150. The department
shall deposit such moneys into the fund.
(3) The Legislative Assembly shall identify  the amount of state funding necessary to
provide counties with assistance sufficient for counties to carry  out the essential features
of county programs described in ORS 610.150.
(4) Prior to  making any appropriation for a biennium to the fund, the Legislative As-
sembly shall review  the estimated change in wolf population contained in the State Depart-
ment of Fish and Wildlife biennial report filed under section 2 of this 2018 Act. The
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 8
HB 4106
1
2
3
4
5
6
Legislative Assembly shall, to  the extent the Legislative Assembly deems practicable, estab-
lish the appropriation in an amount  that is greater than the amount identified by the Leg-
islative Assembly under subsection  (3) of this section and that, relative to the amount
appropriated to the fund for  the preceding biennium, fully reflects the estimated change in
wolf population.
[2]