Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Shelter Plus program is  established in the Department of Human
Services. The purpose of the program is  to provide temporary shelter and wraparound social
and medical services to individuals discharged from hospitals who  do not have appropriate
housing in which to recover. The program shall be administered in  collaboration with public
and private organizations and  service providers, which may include but are not limited to
one or more of the following that serve the area where a respite medical shelter is located:
(a) Hospitals;
(b) Community-based organizations;
(c) Coordinated care organizations;
(d) Local public health authorities;
(e) Offices of the  Department of Human Services serving the community where the re-
spite medical shelter is located; and
(f) Local housing authorities.
(2) An individual qualifies for the Shelter Plus program if the individual:
(a) Has been discharged from a hospital or other acute care setting; and
(b) Is homeless or lacks an appropriate clean and dry environment in which to recover.
(3) Services located on-site in a medical respite shelter shall include:
(a) Social work or case management;
(b) Security services;
(c) Laundry;
(d) Transportation; and
(e) Meals.
(4) During their stay at a medical respite shelter, individuals shall also  receive any
needed:
(a) Care coordination;
(b) Primary care services;
(c) Prescription drugs;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3451
HB 3547
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(d) Peer support;
(e) Behavioral health services;
(f) Physical and occupational therapy;
(g) Home health services;
(h) Durable medical equipment; or
(i) Housing navigation services.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which shall be used to carry out section  1 of this
2023 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[2]