Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 251.305 to
251.435.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) The Secretary of State by rule shall  adopt an electronic filing system
to allow a candidate for nomination or election to a county or city office  to file a portrait
and statement electronically using the Internet.  This paragraph applies only to nominations
or elections to a county or city  office that will be held on the date of the primary election
or the general election.
(b) A candidate described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection may file a portrait and
statement under this section only if the candidate has been  informed by the relevant county
clerk that the candidate  cannot file a portrait and statement for inclusion in a county voters’
pamphlet under ORS 251.335.
(2) A portrait and statement that is filed under this section must be:
(a) Filed no later than the date for filing a portrait and statement set forth in ORS
251.065;
(b) In a format that complies with applicable rules of the Secretary of  State under ORS
251.335; and
(c) Accompanied by the appropriate fee described in ORS 251.325.
(3) Except as provided in  ORS 251.055, the Secretary of State shall post on the secretary’s
website any portrait and statement that is filed in accordance with the requirements of  this
section. The portraits and statements:
(a) Shall be posted on the website of the Secretary of State no later than the 20th day
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 932
HB 3152
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
before the date of the election that is held on the date of  the primary election or general
election at which candidates for county or city offices will be nominated or elected; and
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 192.311 to 192.478, and in accordance with ORS 251.145, are ex-
empt from public inspection until the fourth business day  after the final date for filing the
materials.
(4) The portraits and statements that are posted on the website of the Secretary  of State
shall be organized by county and office in a manner determined by  the secretary by rule.
Below each portrait and statement filed by a candidate, the secretary shall include:
(a) A statement identifying the person who furnished the portrait and statement; and
(b) A disclaimer in boldfaced type in substantially the following form:
The above information has not been verified for accuracy by the Secretary of State.
(5) Each county voters’ pamphlet, and each state  voters’ pamphlet that is distributed in
a county for which a county voters’ pamphlet is not prepared, shall include:
(a) A list of each county  or city office whose candidates both reside in the county and
are eligible to submit a portrait and statement under this section; and
(b) If one or more offices are listed under  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the website
address where the Secretary of  State is posting candidate portraits and statements filed
under this section.
(6) As used in this section, and notwithstanding ORS 251.005,  “city office” means the of-
fice of mayor, city auditor, city councillor or municipal judge of any city in this state.
[2]