Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 3 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Allowable closing costs” means disbursements listed in a  settlement statement for
the purchase of a single family residence by a first-time home buyer.
(2) “Eligible costs” means the down payment and allowable  closing costs for the purchase
of a single family residence by a first-time home buyer.
(3) “First-time home buyer” means an individual who:
(a) Has been a resident of this state for a minimum of six consecutive months;
(b) Is a member of a low income household; and
(c) Has not owned or purchased, either individually or jointly, a single  family residence
during a period of three years immediately  prior to the date of the purchase of a single
family residence.
(4) “Grant program recipient” means a nonprofit organization, housing authority or local
government that has been awarded a grant from  the Housing and Community Services De-
partment under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(5) “Housing authority” means any housing authority established pursuant to ORS 456.055
to 456.235.
(6) “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
(7) “Low income household” means a household having an  income equal to or less than
100 percent of the  median household income for the county in which the household is located,
adjusted for family size, as determined by the Housing and Community Services  Department.
In making the determination, the department shall give  consideration to any data on area
household income published by the  United States Department of Housing and Urban Devel-
opment.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3479
HB 3192
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(8) “Nonprofit organization” means  an organization or group of organizations that is de-
scribed in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue  Code and is exempt from income tax
under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(9) “Single family residence”  means a dwelling that is intended for occupation by a single
family unit and that is owned and occupied by an individual who is a first-time home  buyer
as the individual’s principal residence. “Single family residence” includes a  manufactured
dwelling, as defined in ORS 446.003, or condominium unit.
SECTION 2. (1) The Homeownership Down Payment Assistance Program is  established
within the Housing and Community Services Department. The purpose of the program is to
provide grants to eligible nonprofit organizations,  housing authorities and local governments
to provide financial assistance to eligible first-time home  buyers for the purchase of a single
family residence. The program shall be  implemented in a geographically diverse manner
throughout this state with priority given to areas of  this state with demonstrated need for
first-time home buyer assistance.
(2) Nonprofit organizations, housing authorities and local  governments are eligible to
participate in the program upon  establishing that the organization, authority or local gov-
ernment is operating, or will be operating, a first-time home buyer homeownership program
that provides financial assistance to first-time home buyers to pay for eligible costs.
(3) In addition to  the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, the department shall
specify by rule other qualifications that an organization, authority or local government must
demonstrate to be eligible to receive  a grant under this section. At a minimum, the organ-
ization, authority  or local government must demonstrate the capacity to administer grant
funds received under this section and the ability to comply with  the requirements of all state
and federal laws, rules and regulations.
(4) The department shall specify by rule an application process  for organizations, au-
thorities and local governments to apply  to participate in the program. The application pro-
cess may include a request for proposals. Upon being awarded  a grant under this section, the
grant program recipient shall enter  into an agreement with the department that, at a mini-
mum, contains provisions that:
(a) Indicate the purposes for which the grant funds may be used;
(b) Limit the amount of financial assistance provided by the grant program recipient  to
a first-time home buyer to a maximum of $20,000;
(c) Require the grant program recipient  to require the first-time home buyer to whom
financial assistance is provided to complete a home buyer education class from a  counseling
agency that has been approved by the United States Department of Housing and Urban De-
velopment;
(d) Include the repayment provisions set forth in subsection (5) of this section;
(e) Include the provisions set forth in subsection (7) of this section;
(f) Permit the Housing  and Community Services Department to conduct audits and in-
vestigations of the organization, authority or local government regarding the  purposes for
which grant moneys have been used; and
(g) Require annual reports by the organization, authority or local government to the de-
partment as set forth in subsection (6) of this section.
(5) A grant program recipient will be required to repay to the department, in whole  or
in part, grant moneys received under this section if and to the extent that:
[2]
HB 3192
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The grant program recipient does not use the grant funds in accordance with  the
provisions of the grant agreement executed between the department  and the grant program
recipient under subsection (4) of this section; or
(b) The Director of  the Housing and Community Services Department determines that
the grant program recipient must repay all or part of the grant funds  on grounds of
defalcation, fraud or similar reasons after  auditing or investigating the grant program
recipient’s operations and  conducting an administrative proceeding under ORS 183.413 to
183.470.
(6)(a) A grant program recipient must report annually to  the department concerning the
status and use of grant funds received under this section. The  department, by rule, shall
specify the  information that the report must contain. At a minimum, the report must in-
clude:
(A) A detailed description of the grant program recipient’s  activities as they relate to the
use of awarded grant funds;
(B) A list of each grant, loan or other financial assistance  that the grant program re-
cipient has provided and, where  applicable, a full accounting of the repayment status of the
loans;
(C) A list of the  first-time home buyers that the grant program recipient has provided
financial assistance to for the purchase of single family residences;
(D) The nature and amounts of the administrative expenses the grant program recipient
incurred with respect to providing the  first-time home buyer assistance under this section;
and
(E) Aggregated data concerning the income, racial or ethnic  background, family size and
related demographic information of first-time  home buyers who received assistance with el-
igible costs for the purchase of single family residences under  the program, excluding any
personal information about an individual.
(b) The grant  program recipient must provide the report described in this subsection to
the department not later than December 31 of each year.
(7)(a) Amounts of loans purchased, leveraged or made by a grant program recipient under
this section shall not constitute a debt of the state  or a lending of the credit of the state
within the meaning of any constitutional or  statutory limitation, although nothing in this
subsection or in the terms of an  agreement between the department and a grant program
recipient is intended to impair the rights  of the grant program recipient to exercise any
rights granted to the grant program recipient against the security for the loan.
(b) The department may not  pay amounts for financial assistance under this section from
any source other than available  funds in the Homeownership Down Payment Assistance
Program Fund established in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the  Homeownership Down Payment Assistance Program Fund. Interest
earned by the Homeownership Down Payment Assistance Program Fund shall be credited  to
the fund. All moneys in the Homeownership Down Payment Assistance  Program Fund are
continuously appropriated to the Housing and  Community Services Department to award
grants to eligible nonprofit organizations, housing authorities and local governments  under
section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Moneys in the Homeownership Down Payment Assistance Program Fund may be used
[3]
HB 3192
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
by the department to pay for the administrative expenses of the department in  establishing,
implementing and administering the Homeownership Down Payment Assistance Program.
(3) The Homeownership Down Payment Assistance Program Fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Grant funds repaid under section 2 (5) of this 2017 Act;
(c) Moneys transferred to the fund from the federal or state government;
(d) Application fees, if any;
(e) Interest and other earnings on moneys in the fund; and
(f) Gifts, grants and donations received from any source.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, which may be expended to estab-
lish and implement  the Homeownership Down Payment Assistance Program under sections
1 to 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) Sections 1 to 3 of this 2017 Act become operative on January 1, 2018.
(2) The Director of  the Housing and Community Services Department may take any
action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section that is necessary
to enable the director to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section, all of the duties,  functions and powers conferred on the director by sections
1 to 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[4]