Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Electric Micromobility is established.
(2) The task force consists of 19 members appointed by  the Director of Transportation.
The members of the task force shall include:
(a) Two members who represent the Department of Transportation.
(b) One member who represents the State Parks and Recreation Department.
(c) Three members who represent electric micromobility device operators, manufacturers
or businesses.
(d) Two members who represent law enforcement and emergency medical services.
(e) One member who represents a city transportation department.
(f) One member who represents a county government.
(g) One member who represents a metropolitan planning organization.
(h) One member who represents a public university.
(i) One member who represents the insurance industry.
(j) One member who represents  a nonprofit organization with statewide experience on
transportation electrification and micromobility.
(k) One member who represents roadway users with disabilities.
(L) One member who represents roadway users.
(m) Two members who represent active transportation organizations.
(n) One member who represents off-road vehicle and trail users.
(3) The director  shall appoint members to the task force so that there is at least one
member from each congressional district in this state.
(4) The task force shall:
(a) Review the existing Oregon laws relating to micromobility  and personal mobility de-
vices;
(b) Examine whether safety and education requirements should be required for motor
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 164
HB 4067
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
vehicle users, electric micromobility device manufacturers, retailers and user groups;
(c) Examine how electric  micromobility devices can be best utilized to promote equity,
safety and climate goals in the transportation sector;
(d) Examine best practices for the use  of electric micromobility devices, including but
not limited to use on highways, bicycle  paths, bicycle lanes, public lands, public spaces and
mixed-use trails;
(e) Examine statutory definitions of electric micromobility devices;
(f) Address electric micromobility devices for commercial use;
(g) Examine provided education  and certification programs relating to electric micromo-
bility devices; and
(h) Seek  input from a broad range of community partners, including but not limited to
community partners from institutions of higher education, consumer advocacy groups  and
small, medium and large businesses.
(5) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a  vacancy for any cause, the director shall make an appointment to become
immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to the  Joint Committee on Transportation no later
than December 1, 2024.
(12) The Department of Transportation shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of the task force are not entitled to  compensation or reimbursement for
expenses and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on December 31, 2024.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]