Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 468A.795 is amended to read:
468A.795. As used in ORS 468A.795 to 468A.807:
(1) “Alternative fuel” means biofuels, biogas,  natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas, hydrogen and
electricity.
(2) “Best available exhaust control technology” means the  most effective exhaust controls to
reduce diesel particulate that rely on  passively regenerated diesel particulate control technology
supported in a vehicle’s normal duty cycle.
(3) “Combined weight” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(4) “Cost-effectiveness threshold” means the cost,  in dollars, per ton of diesel particulate matter
reduced, as established by rule of the Environmental Quality Commission.
(5) “Diesel engine” means a compression ignition engine.
(6) “Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement” means the  fully executed  Environmental Mit-
igation Trust Agreement  for State Beneficiaries effective October 2, 2017, and issued  pursuant
to Paragraph 17 of [required by ] the  Volkswagen “Clean Diesel” Marketing, Sales Practices and
Products Liability Litigation partial consent decree dated October 25, 2016.
(7) “Equivalent equipment” means a piece of equipment that performs the  same function and has
the equivalent horsepower to a piece of equipment subject to a replacement.
(8) “Equivalent motor vehicle” means a  motor vehicle that performs the same function and is in
the same weight class as a motor vehicle subject to a replacement.
(9) “Heavy-duty truck” means a motor vehicle or  combination of vehicles operated as a unit that
has a combined weight that is greater than 26,000 pounds.
(10) “Incremental cost” means the cost of a qualifying  repower or retrofit less a baseline cost
that would otherwise be incurred in the normal course of business.
(11) “Medium-duty truck” means a motor  vehicle or combination of vehicles operated as a unit
that has a combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds but less than or equal  to 26,000
pounds.
(12) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 463
HB 2063
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(13) “Nonroad diesel engine” means a diesel engine of  25 horsepower or more that is not de-
signed primarily to propel a motor vehicle on public highways.
(14) “Oregon diesel  engine” means an engine at least 50 percent of the use of which, as meas-
ured by miles driven or hours operated, will occur in Oregon for the three years  following the re-
powering or retrofitting of the engine.
(15) “Oregon diesel truck engine” means a diesel engine in a truck at least 50 percent of  the
use of which, as measured by miles driven or hours operated,  has occurred in Oregon for the two
years preceding the scrapping of the engine.
(16) “Public highway” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(17)(a) “Replacement” means:
(A) To scrap a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine  and replace the motor vehicle with an
equivalent motor vehicle; or
(B) To scrap a piece of equipment powered by a nonroad diesel engine  and replace the equip-
ment with equivalent equipment.
(b) “Replacement” does not mean ordinary maintenance, repair or replacement  of a diesel en-
gine.
(18) “Repower” means to scrap an old diesel engine and substitute it  with a new engine, a used
engine or a remanufactured engine, or with electric motors, drives or  fuel cells, with a minimum
useful life of seven years.
(19) “Retrofit” means to equip a diesel engine with  new emissions-reducing parts or technology
after the manufacture of the original engine. A retrofit must use the greatest degree of  emissions
reduction available for the particular  application of the equipment retrofitted that meets the cost-
effectiveness threshold.
(20) “Scrap” means to destroy, render inoperable and recycle.
(21) “Truck” means a motor vehicle  or combination of vehicles operated as a unit that has a
combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 468A.805 is amended to read:
468A.805. (1) Subject to and consistent with ORS 468A.803 (8) and  with the terms of the Envi-
ronmental Mitigation Trust Agreement, any moneys received by the State  of Oregon pursuant to the
agreement that are deposited in the Clean Diesel  Engine Fund under ORS 468A.801 must [ be used
by the Department of Environmental Quality to award grants for the purpose of reducing nitrogen
oxides emissions from diesel engines. ]
[(2)(a) To  the extent authorized by the agreement, the department shall allocate moneys awarded
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section first to ] be expended by the Department  of Environ-
mental Quality as follows:
(a) The department shall  award grants to owners and operators of school buses  to reduce
emissions from at least 450 school buses powered by diesel engines operating in this state.
(b) As  provided for in Appendix D-2 to the Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement,
the department may  use up to 15 percent of the total moneys received by the State of Oregon
as the state’s allocation of  trust funds on the costs necessary for, and directly connected to,
the purchase, installation and maintenance of light-duty electric vehicle supply equipment.
(c)(A) Moneys not expended under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection must be:
(i) Awarded as grants for the purpose of reducing nitrogen oxides emissions  from diesel
engines; or
(ii) Utilized by the department as the State of Oregon’s  voluntary matching funds under
[2]
HB 2063
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Diesel Emissions Reduction Act Program in  the Energy Policy Act of 2005, 42 U.S.C.
16133, and for the purpose of  awarding grants for reducing diesel particulate matter emis-
sions from diesel engines.
(B) The department shall develop a competitive  grant program for awarding grants under
this paragraph. The competitive grant program shall  apply the preferences set forth in sub-
section (3) of this section.
[(b)] (2)(a)  In awarding grants under [ this subsection ] subsection (1)(a) of this section , the
department shall begin by awarding grants to owners and operators of  school buses powered by
diesel engines that are of the median model year of school buses powered by  diesel engines operat-
ing in this state, and shall proceed to award grants for school buses powered by diesel  engines
through the adjoining model years until the requirements of [ paragraph (a) of this  subsection ] sub-
section (1)(a) of this section  are met. A grant may be awarded under [ this subsection ] subsection
(1)(a) of this section  for any school bus powered by a diesel engine within the control of an owner
or operator that meets the following conditions:
(A) The school bus has at least three years of remaining useful life;
(B) Use of the school bus has occurred in Oregon during the year preceding the date of the
grant; and
(C) For the three years following receipt of a grant award, use of the school bus to which  the
owner or operator applies the grant will occur in Oregon.
[(c)] (b) The grant  amount per school bus awarded under [ this paragraph ] subsection (1)(a) of
this section  shall be for:
(A) $50,000 or 30 percent of the cost to purchase a school bus that meets  minimum standards
adopted by the State Board of Education under ORS 820.100 for the applicable class  or type of
school bus, whichever is less; or
(B) Up to 100 percent of the cost to retrofit a school bus with  emissions-reducing parts or
technology that results in a  reduction of diesel particulate matter emissions by at least 85 percent
when compared with the baseline emissions for the relevant engine year and application.
[(3) Except for awarding grants  pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the department may not
award grants from the moneys described  under subsection (1) of this section without prior approval
by the Legislative Assembly by law. ]
(3) In awarding grants pursuant to the grant program developed under subsection  (1)(c)
of this section, the department shall give preferences for projects that will:
(a) Benefit sensitive populations or  areas with elevated concentrations of diesel
particulate matter;
(b) Be carried out by a grant applicant that is a disadvantaged  business enterprise, as
defined in ORS 200.005;
(c) Be designed and perform in a manner that reflects engagement with and the support
of the community where the project is located;
(d) Involve the replacement, repower or retrofit of one or more motor vehicles  or pieces
of equipment that have at least  three years of remaining useful life at the time that the
grant agreement is executed;
(e) Support the utilization of fuels for which regulated parties may generate credits  un-
der the clean fuels program adopted by  rule by the Environmental Quality Commission under
ORS 468A.266 (1)(b);
(f) Involve small fleets;
[3]
HB 2063
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
(g) Maximize cost effectiveness of emissions reductions in Oregon; or
(h) Meet the criteria of any  other preferences that the commission may establish by rule,
if the department determines that the additional  preferences are necessary to ensure that
grant awards result in the reduction of nitrogen oxides emissions from diesel engines.
(4) The commission may adopt rules necessary to  implement the provisions of this sec-
tion.
[4]