Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Consumer and  Business Services shall study the im-
pact of wildfire damages on:
(a) The cost of, and access to, capital and insurance for electric utilities;
(b) The affordability of electricity for electric utility customers;
(c) The long-term solvency of electric utilities in Oregon; and
(d) The long-term capacity of electric utilities to deliver electricity in Oregon.
(2) The department shall submit a report on the study in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 772