Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 401.913 is amended to read:
401.913. (1) The office of State Resilience  Officer is created in the office of the Governor. The
office of State Resilience Officer shall direct, implement and coordinate [ seismic] hazard safety and
resilience goal setting and state agency planning and preparation to  improve [ seismic] hazard safety
and resilience , including but not limited to planning and preparation for safety and  resilience
during and after earthquake, tsunami, wildfire,  flooding and other natural or manmade
events.
(2) The State Resilience Officer shall lead statewide efforts to implement the  Oregon
Resilience Plan, the Natural  Hazard Mitigation Plan and other resilience plans adopted by the
state.
(3) The State Resilience Officer shall lead  executive branch agencies in continuity of op-
erations planning and continuity of government planning.
[(2)] (4) The Governor shall appoint  an individual to serve as the State Resilience Officer, sub-
ject to confirmation by the Senate pursuant to Article III, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution.
[(3)] (5)  The  legislative branch of government and the judicial branch of government shall each
select an individual to monitor the effectiveness of [ seismic] hazard safety and resilience planning
in their branch.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2737