Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  be-
ginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000 for  the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall award grants to  address and support
workforce development needs and activities to each of the following  recipients in amounts
to be disbursed, as follows:
(a) To the Oregon Community Health Workers Association, $1,500,000.
(b) To the Oregon Mobile Integrated Healthcare Coalition, $1,500,000.
(c) To the Oregon Coalition of Local Health Officials, $2,000,000.
(2) Before issuing a grant to a recipient under subsection (1) of this section, the authority
shall enter into an agreement with each recipient that requires the recipient to apply the
grant toward the activities specified under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Grants awarded under this section may be used only for the purposes of:
(a) Developing, facilitating or sponsoring workforce training programs;
(b) Advertising and administering scholarships to trainees participating in a workforce
training program;
(c) Providing for wraparound supports, based on demonstrated need,  for trainees who
participate in a workforce training program, including but not limited to:
(A) Child care;
(B) Travel expenses;
(C) Technology resources;
(D) Wage replacement stipends;
(E) Licensing or certification fees;
(F) Course materials; and
(G) Student loan  repayment assistance options for trainees participating in a workforce
training program;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4701
HB 3916
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(d) Providing professional development support to trainees following completion of  a
workforce training program;
(e) Providing workforce development, retention and sustainability support to employer
organizations; and
(f) Collecting data and reporting measurable outcomes for the activities  supported
through awarded grants.
(4) The authority shall prescribe the form and process by  which a recipient may apply for
and be awarded grants under this section.
(5) The authority shall require  recipients of grants under this section to report
biannually to the authority on the progress of the workforce development activities.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]