Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $9,000,000 for  ground water studies and investigations or the
gathering and analysis of other ground water data that is  needed to assess and manage
Oregon’s ground water resources in the priority basins as determined by the department.
SECTION 2. Not later  than September 15, 2020, and September 15, 2021, the Water Re-
sources Department shall submit to the  Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided in
ORS 192.245, a  report detailing how the moneys appropriated under section 1 of this 2019 Act
have been spent.
SECTION 3. Not later than January 1, 2020, the Water Resources Department shall sub-
mit to the Legislative Assembly a 10-year plan that prioritizes ground water studies
throughout this state and details any additional legislative investment necessary to imple-
ment the studies.
SECTION 4.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3140