Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Legislative Assembly  shall provide the translator and interpreter
services described in subsections (2) and (4) of this section to interested members  of the
public that request those services.
(2) Translator  and interpreter services that are provided under this section shall include:
(a) Language translation and interpretation to facilitate witness testimony in legislative
committee or subcommittee hearings;
(b) Language translation  and interpretation to facilitate dialogue in informal meetings
with one or more legislators;
(c) Sign language or other translator and interpreter services  to comply with the federal
Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq.; or
(d) Language translation  and interpretation to initiate and enhance effectiveness in con-
stituent outreach activities.
(3) A member of the public or  a member of the Legislative Assembly seeking to have
translation and interpretation  services provided shall make a written or verbal request to
the Legislative Administrator:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1615
HB 2944
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
(a) In interim periods when the Legislative Assembly is not in session, at least  three
business days before the scheduled time of the  hearing or other meeting at which translator
and interpreter services  are to be provided or the constituent outreach activities are to take
place;
(b) During a legislative session, at least one business  day before the scheduled time of
the hearing or other meeting  at which translator and interpreter services are to be provided
or the constituent outreach activities are to take place; and
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs  (a) and (b) of this subsection, if the translator and in-
terpreter services consist of sign language or other  translator and interpreter services
needed to comply with the Americans  with Disabilities Act, at least three business days be-
fore the scheduled time of the hearing or other meeting at which translator and interpreter
services are to be provided.
(4) In addition to the translator and interpreter services described in subsection  (2) of
this section, upon the request of a  member of the Legislative Assembly, the Legislative Ad-
ministrator shall cause public service posters, flyers,  letters, brochures and other publicity
materials describing public services, or official  communications from agencies, to be trans-
lated to languages accessible to communities within the member’s district.
(5) A translator or interpreter performing services under this section is  expected to be
true to the original  message being translated and shall strive to phrase the materials being
translated or interpreted in a way that is accessible to the community being served.
(6) The Legislative Administrator shall provide the translator and  interpreter services
described in this section free of charge.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Legislative Administration Committee, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for the purpose  of
providing the translator and interpreter services described in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
[2]