Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Human Services,  in consultation with the Office of
Immigrant and Refugee Advancement, shall establish the Welcome and Reception Program
for the purpose of providing immigrants and refugees the following:
(a) Short-term wraparound  support services, including shelter, food, clothing, health
care, legal services and transportation.
(b) Long-term support services related to integration, education, employment  and lead-
ership development.
(2)(a) In administering the program, the department  shall enter into contracts and co-
ordinate with organizations in order to provide the support services.
(b) The department may enter  into contracts concurrently with no more than 12 organ-
izations.
(c) An amount awarded under a single contract may not exceed $_______ per biennium.
(3) The  department shall contract with the Oregon State Bar to provide, through the
Legal Services Program established under ORS 9.572, regulatory and fiscal  oversight of any
organization with which the  department enters into a contract to provide immigration-
related legal services.
(4) An  organization that has been awarded a contract under this section shall provide a
report on performance  outcomes for the support services provided pursuant to the contract
to the department no later than September 15 of each even-numbered year.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 185.650, as amended by section 8, chapter 118, Oregon Laws 2022,  is amended
to read:
185.650. (1) There is established within the Department  of Human Services the Office of Immi-
grant and Refugee Advancement for  the purpose of operating a statewide immigrant and refugee
integration strategy.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2760
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
(2) The Office of Immigrant and Refugee Advancement is  under the supervision and control of
a director, who is  responsible for the performance of the duties, functions and powers of the office.
The director shall be chosen through an open hiring  process. In addition to the director, the office
shall include at least the following full-time staff members:
(a) One staff member who focuses on community partnerships;
(b) One staff member who focuses on data collection and research; and
(c) One staff member who focuses on administrative support for the office.
(3) The office shall:
(a) Advocate for and partner with  statewide immigrant and refugee programs and services that
coordinate with long-term support services to meet the needs of  immigrant and refugee populations
in this state;
(b) Convene representatives from state agencies, community-based organizations and
other stakeholders to coordinate and implement policy  recommendations on behalf and for
the benefit of immigrant and refugee communities;
[(b)] (c) Collect data on  immigrant and refugee populations in this state for the purposes of de-
termining the needs of the  populations and tracking progress in reducing social, economic and
health disparities for the populations;
[(c)] (d) Monitor and protect data collected under this subsection and ensure that any data col-
lected and maintained by  the office is not disclosed to any person or entity not affiliated with the
office;
[(d)] (e) Track state legislation that impacts immigrant and refugee populations in this state;
[(e)] (f) Ensure that any racial and ethnic  impact statements for legislation accurately include
the impact to immigrants and refugees in this state who  are individuals who are Black, indigenous
or other people of color;
[(f)] (g) Advocate for resources from the federal government to support the immigrant  and ref-
ugee populations;
[(g)] (h) Monitor and, unless prohibited by federal or state law or  rule, publish any investments
made by the state for the benefit and support of the immigrant and refugee populations;
[(h)] (i) Partner with other state agencies as needed to meet the objectives of the office;
[(i)] (j) Partner with community-based organizations as needed to meet  the objectives of the of-
fice; and
[(j)] (k) Adopt rules as necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $_______, for providing support services  under the Welcome
and Reception Program established pursuant to section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]