Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Grants awarded  to school-based health centers by the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 413.225  (4)(a) must be for a minimum of annual amount of $66,000, ad-
justed under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) To account for effects  of inflation, the authority shall, by rule, annually adjust the
dollar amount specified in subsection (1) of this section based on the  Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as  published by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $936,000 to carry out the provisions of section  1 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “School-based health center” has the meaning given that term in ORS 413.225.
(b) “School nurse model”  means a model for providing school-based health services that
is in accord with guidance from the division of the Oregon Health Authority  that addresses
adolescent health.
(2) The authority, in consultation with the Department  of Education, shall select 10
school districts or education  service districts to receive planning grants for district planning
and technical assistance. Each district receiving a grant, beginning on or  after July 1, 2023,
and concluding before July 1, 2025, shall:
(a) Evaluate the need for school-based health services in the community of the district;
and
(b) Develop a  school-based health services plan that addresses the need identified in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1000
SB 549
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) The authority shall contract with a nonprofit organization with experience in  facili-
tating school  health planning initiatives and supporting school-based health centers in order
to facilitate and oversee the planning process and to provide technical assistance  to grantees
to reduce costs and ensure better coordination  and continuity statewide. To the greatest
extent practicable, the nonprofit organization shall engage with  culturally specific organiza-
tions, in the grantees’ communities, that have experience providing culturally and linguis-
tically specific services in schools or after-school programs.
(4) Each grantee shall solicit community  participation in the planning process, including
the participation of the local public health authority, any federally  qualified health centers
located in the district, a regional health equity coalition, if any, serving the district and every
coordinated care organization with members residing in the district.
(5) At the conclusion of  the two-year planning process, each grantee shall receive funding
to operate a school-based health center or school nurse model  in each respective grantee
school district or education service district.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of  $950,000 to carry out the provisions of section 3 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 5.
The Oregon Health  Authority shall develop and implement a grant program
to issue grants to school districts and education service  districts, to be used to increase and
improve school-based mental health services. The  authority shall ensure that grants are
made for the benefit of schools both with  and without school-based health centers, as defined
in ORS 413.225.
SECTION 6. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $5,980,000 to carry out the provisions of section 5 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Department of Education shall select 10  school districts or education
service districts  to receive grants to implement programs that use trauma-informed ap-
proaches to improve educational outcomes.
(2) A school district  or education service district may apply for a grant under this section
by submitting an application to the  department that describes the district’s needs for a grant
under this section and the district’s plans for the use of the grant moneys.
(3) In selecting grant recipients, the department shall seek to distribute  grant funding
to maximize improvement of  educational outcomes, with reference to factors including,
without limitation, academic  performance, graduation rates, absenteeism, failure rates and
disciplinary incidents.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the  provisions
of this section,  including prescribing the timelines for submitting an application under this
section and the form and contents of the application.
(5) As used in  this section, “trauma-informed approach” has the meaning given that term
in section 5, chapter 68, Oregon Laws 2016.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
[2]
SB 549
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
General Fund, the  amount of $5,000,000 to carry out the provisions of section 7 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 9.
(1) The Department of Education shall select 10  school districts or education
service districts to receive grants to develop wraparound service delivery hubs in schools.
(2) A school district  or education service district may apply for a grant under this section
by submitting an application to the  department that describes the district’s needs for a grant
under this section and the district’s plans for the use of the grant moneys.
(3) In selecting  grant recipients, the department shall seek to distribute grant funding
to maximize improvement of educational outcomes, with reference  to factors including,
without limitation, academic performance, graduation rates, absenteeism, failure  rates and
disciplinary incidents.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the  provisions
of this section, including prescribing the timelines for submitting an application  under this
section and the form and contents of the application.
(5) As used in this section, “wraparound service delivery hub”  means a central location
for the delivery  of comprehensive, holistic, child-centered and family-centered services for
children experiencing serious mental health or behavioral challenges.
SECTION 10. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of  Education, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $2,500,000 to carry out the provisions of section 9 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 11. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[3]