Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 329.007 is amended to read:
329.007. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Academic content standards”  means expectations of student knowledge and skills adopted
by the State Board of Education under ORS 329.045.
(2) “Administrator” includes all persons whose duties require an administrative license.
[(3) “Board” or “state board” means the State Board of Education. ]
[(4)] (3) “Community learning center” means a school-based  or school-linked program providing
informal meeting places  and coordination for community activities, adult education, child care, in-
formation and referral and other services as described in  ORS 329.157. “Community  learning
center” includes, but is not limited to, a  community school program as defined in ORS 336.505,
family resource centers as described in ORS 417.725, full service schools, lighted  schools and 21st
century community learning centers.
[(5) “Department” means the Department of Education. ]
(4) “Essential Learning Skills” means process skills,  as identified by the State Board of
Education by rule, that:
(a) Cross academic disciplines;
(b) Can be applied in a variety of courses, subjects and settings; and
(c) Are embedded in academic content standards.
[(6)] (5) “Higher education and career path skills” means  instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Applying for  jobs, including preparing a resume or filling out a job application and develop-
ing job interview skills;
(b) Applying for admission to a post-secondary institution  of education, including applying for
financial aid and scholarships;
(c) Applying for post-secondary learning and  job training opportunities and programs that do not
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3941
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
require a four-year degree, including apprenticeships and how  to meet the prerequisites for those
opportunities and programs;
(d) Developing career-related skills, including improving employability skills, taking  advantage
of community-based experiential learning and gaining knowledge of career opportunities; and
(e) Seeking assistance, including accessing  community resources and acting as a self-advocate
for mental, physical and financial well-being.
[(7)] (6) “History,  geography, economics and civics” includes, but is not limited to, Oregon
Studies.
[(8)] (7) “Language arts” includes reading,  writing and other communications in any language,
including English.
[(9)] (8) “Oregon  Studies” means history, geography, economics and civics specific to the State
of Oregon. Oregon Studies instruction in Oregon government shall include municipal, county, tribal
and state government, as well as the electoral and legislative processes.
[(10)] (9) “Parents” means parents or guardians of students who are covered by this chapter.
[(11)] (10) “Personal financial education” means instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Credit scores, including how to build credit, the costs  and benefits of borrowing money on
credit and the long-term impacts of high or low credit scores;
(b) Investments, asset building and debt,  including how to open a bank account, different types
of bank accounts, compound  interest, the total cost of loan repayment, comparing investment options
and types of investments and understanding different types of retirement accounts;
(c) Strategies for creating  a budget, tracking and modifying spending patterns and understanding
insurance products, including exploring common costs associated with rentals and home ownership;
(d) Taxes, including accessing tax credits, understanding tax cycles, being familiar  with state
and federal tax forms and being familiar with federal, state, regional and local taxes; and
(e) Building financial well-being, including  evaluating the impact of behavioral economics and
the psychology of money,  explaining trends in financial health and evaluating consumer skills, in-
cluding fraud and identity theft prevention.
[(12)] (11) “Public charter school” has the meaning given that term in ORS 338.005.
[(13)] (12) “School  district” means a school district as defined in ORS 332.002, a state-operated
school or any legally constituted combination of such entities.
[(14)] (13) “Teacher” means any licensed  employee of a school district who has direct responsi-
bility for instruction, coordination of  educational programs or supervision of students and who is
compensated for such services from public funds. “Teacher” does not include a school  nurse, as
defined in ORS 342.455, or a person whose duties require an administrative license.
[(15)] (14) “The  arts” includes, but is not limited to, literary arts, performing arts and visual
arts.
[(16)] (15) “World languages” includes sign language, heritage languages and languages  other
than a student’s primary language.
[(17)] (16) “21st  Century Schools Council” means a council established pursuant to ORS 329.704.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 329.007, as amended by section 6, chapter  253, Oregon Laws 2019, section 3,
chapter 178, Oregon Laws 2021, and section 4, chapter 564, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
329.007. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Academic content standards” means expectations of student knowledge  and skills adopted
by the State Board of Education under ORS 329.045.
(2) “Administrator” includes all persons whose duties require an administrative license.
[2]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(3) “Board” or “state board” means the State Board of Education. ]
[(4)] (3) “Community learning center”  means a school-based or school-linked program providing
informal meeting places and coordination for community activities, adult education, child  care, in-
formation and referral and other  services as described in ORS 329.157. “Community  learning
center” includes, but is not limited to, a community  school program as defined in ORS 336.505,
family resource centers as  described in ORS 417.725, full service schools, lighted schools and 21st
century community learning centers.
[(5) “Department” means the Department of Education. ]
(4) “Essential Learning Skills” means process skills, as  identified by the State Board of
Education by rule, that:
(a) Cross academic disciplines;
(b) Can be applied in a variety of courses, subjects and settings; and
(c) Are embedded in academic content standards.
[(6)] (5) “Higher education and career path skills” means  instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Applying for  jobs, including preparing a resume or filling out a job application and develop-
ing job interview skills;
(b) Applying for admission to a post-secondary institution  of education, including applying for
financial aid and scholarships;
(c) Applying for post-secondary learning and  job training opportunities and programs that do not
require a four-year degree, including apprenticeships and how  to meet the prerequisites for those
opportunities and programs;
(d) Developing career-related skills, including improving employability skills, taking  advantage
of community-based experiential learning and gaining knowledge of career opportunities; and
(e) Seeking assistance, including accessing  community resources and acting as a self-advocate
for mental, physical and financial well-being.
[(7)] (6) “History, geography,  economics and civics” includes, but is not limited to, Holocaust
and genocide studies and Oregon Studies.
[(8)] (7) “Holocaust  and genocide studies” means studies on the Holocaust, genocide and other
acts of mass violence that comply with the requirements described in ORS 329.494.
[(9)] (8) “Language arts” includes reading, writing and  other communications in any language,
including English.
[(10)] (9) “Oregon Studies” means history, geography, economics and  civics specific to the State
of Oregon. Oregon Studies instruction in Oregon government shall include municipal, county, tribal
and state government, as well as the electoral and legislative processes.
[(11)] (10) “Parents” means parents or guardians of students who are covered by this chapter.
[(12)] (11) “Personal financial education” means instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Credit scores, including how to build credit, the costs  and benefits of borrowing money on
credit and the long-term impacts of high or low credit scores;
(b) Investments, asset building and debt,  including how to open a bank account, different types
of bank accounts, compound  interest, the total cost of loan repayment, comparing investment options
and types of investments and understanding different types of retirement accounts;
(c) Strategies for creating  a budget, tracking and modifying spending patterns and understanding
insurance products, including exploring common costs associated with rentals and home ownership;
(d) Taxes, including accessing tax credits, understanding tax cycles, being familiar  with state
and federal tax forms and being familiar with federal, state, regional and local taxes; and
[3]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Building financial well-being, including  evaluating the impact of behavioral economics and
the psychology of money,  explaining trends in financial health and evaluating consumer skills, in-
cluding fraud and identity theft prevention.
[(13)] (12) “Public charter school” has the meaning given that term in ORS 338.005.
[(14)] (13) “School  district” means a school district as defined in ORS 332.002, a state-operated
school or any legally constituted combination of such entities.
[(15)] (14) “Teacher” means any licensed  employee of a school district who has direct responsi-
bility for instruction, coordination of  educational programs or supervision of students and who is
compensated for such services from public funds. “Teacher” does not include a school  nurse, as
defined in ORS 342.455, or a person whose duties require an administrative license.
[(16)] (15) “The  arts” includes, but is not limited to, literary arts, performing arts and visual
arts.
[(17)] (16) “World languages” includes sign language, heritage languages and languages  other
than a student’s primary language.
[(18)] (17) “21st  Century Schools Council” means a council established pursuant to ORS 329.704.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 329.451, as amended by section 1, chapter 4, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended
to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a school district or public charter school shall award a high
school diploma to a student who completes the requirements established by [ subsection (2) ] sub-
sections (2) and (3)  of this section.
(b) A school district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to a  student who
satisfies the requirements established by [ subsection (7) ] subsections (3) and (7)  of this section, an
extended diploma to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of  this
section or a certificate of  attendance to a student who satisfies the requirements established by
subsection (9) of this section.
(c) A school district or public charter school may not deny a student who  has the documented
history described in subsection (7)(b) or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity  to pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) A school district or public charter  school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a high  school diploma from a school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State Board  of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades 9 through 12, must complete at least:
(A) Twenty-four total credits;
(B) Three credits of mathematics; and
(C) Four credits of language arts.
(b) If a school district  or public charter school requires a student to complete more than 24 total
credits, as provided by paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection,  the school district or public charter
school may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has established  academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses  that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
(c)(A) A school district or  public charter school that requires students to satisfy any require-
ments not specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of Education
[4]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
must grant to a student a  waiver of the requirements established by the school district or public
charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under rules adopted by the State  Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board  of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a migrant worker, as determined under rules adopted by  the State Board of Edu-
cation;
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education
Program; or
(vii) Enrolled in an approved recovery school under ORS 336.680.
(B)(i) For any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must accept any credits earned by the student in  an educational program in
this state and apply those credits toward requirements specified by paragraph (a) of  this subsection
or by rule of the State Board of Education if the credits satisfied  those requirements in that edu-
cational program in this state.
(ii) As used in this subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means  an educational
program that is:
(I) Provided by a school district, a public charter school, an approved recovery school, the
Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as  provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care or treatment facility
described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
(d)(A) The State Board of  Education shall adopt rules by which a student who has completed
an International Baccalaureate program may satisfy  the credit requirements prescribed by para-
graph (a) of this subsection and any  or all of the requirements established by rule of the State Board
of Education under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The rules:
(i) Must provide that the student has satisfied those requirements if the student has satisfied:
(I) All of the requirements for an  International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme or an Inter-
national Baccalaureate Career-related Programme; and
(II) Any other requirements prescribed by the board by rule for a student who has  completed
an International Baccalaureate program.
(ii) May provide that, only for the purpose of satisfying requirements as  provided by this para-
graph, a person  who is not an external International Baccalaureate examiner may grade assessments
or examinations for either program.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph  prohibits a school district or public charter school from estab-
lishing requirements that are in addition to the credit requirements prescribed by paragraph  (a) of
this subsection or any requirements established by rule under  paragraph (a) of this subsection or
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) When establishing  requirements under this paragraph, the board or a school district or
public charter school shall attempt  not to establish requirements that may discourage access to or
participation in the International Baccalaureate program.
(3)(a) In addition to the credit requirements described in subsection (2) of this  section
[5]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and any other requirements established by the State Board  of Education or by a school dis-
trict or public charter school, the board shall adopt proficiency standards  for Essential
Learning Skills that must be  demonstrated before a student is awarded a high school diploma
or a modified diploma. The proficiency standards must be demonstrated for, at a minimum,
the following:
(A) Reading and comprehending a variety of text;
(B) Writing clearly and accurately; and
(C) Applying mathematics in a variety of settings.
(b) The board shall adopt by rule assessment options for students to demonstrate  profi-
ciency in Essential Learning Skills, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(3)] (c) A student providing work samples to  demonstrate proficiency in Essential Learning
Skills [as may be required under subsection (2) of this section ] must be allowed to use accommodations
described in the  student’s individualized education program or the student’s plan developed in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29  U.S.C. 794. As used in this
[subsection] paragraph, the term “accommodations”:
[(a)] (A) Includes, but is not limited to:
[(A)] (i) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
[(B)] (ii) The ability to  demonstrate proficiency in an alternative location that is secure and
proctored.
[(C)] (iii) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
[(b)] (B) Does not include modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used
solely to earn modified credit.
(4) A student may satisfy the requirements of [ subsection (2) ] subsections (2) and  (3)  of this
section in less than four years. If a student satisfies the requirements  of [ subsection (2) ] subsections
(2) and (3)  of this section and a school district  or public charter school has received consent as
provided by subsection (6) of this section, the school district or public charter  school shall award
a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district  or public charter school has received consent as provided by subsection
(6) of this  section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For  the purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to have  the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years of age  or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4) of
this section, consent must be received  during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school  district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only to students
who have demonstrated  the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for  a modified di-
ploma, a student must:
[6]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Satisfy the  requirements for a modified diploma established by this section and  the State
Board of Education; and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability  to maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning and  instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district  or public charter school shall award an extended diploma only to students
who have demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for  a high
school diploma with  reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for an extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine  through completion of high school, complete 12 credits, which may not
include more than six credits  earned in a self-contained special education classroom and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to maintain grade level achievement due to  significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in  grade level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public charter  school shall award a certificate of attendance to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for a  high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if the student has maintained regular full-time attendance for at least four  years beginning
in grade nine  and meets requirements established by the board of the school district or public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to satisfy  the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the age  of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may satisfy the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or  (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent is  provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided  under this subsection must be written and must clearly state that the
parent, guardian or student  is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10) of this section. A
consent may not be used to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7),  (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under  this subsection for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each school  district must provide to the Superintendent of Public Instruction information
[7]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A student who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an  extended diploma
or a certificate of attendance shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a high  school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to  instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours of other services
that are designed to:
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide a total number of hours of  instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of  instructional hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b) A school district may not unilaterally decrease the total number of hours of  instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of the
age of the student.
(c) For purposes  of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services and other services
designed to meet the unique needs of  the student may be provided to the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered into by the school district if the individualized  education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the services may be  provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into an interagency agreement as allowed under this  paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to  the number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An  agency is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency agreement  as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that all students have on-site access to the appropriate resources and  courses to
achieve high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended diplomas at each high school  in the
school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c)(A) Provide to the parents or guardians of a student who has the documented  history de-
scribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section:
(i) Information about the availability of high school diplomas, modified diplomas  and extended
diplomas and the requirements for the diplomas; and
(ii) A disclosure that a student awarded a  certificate of attendance will not be counted as a high
school graduate in any reporting for the state or school district  and that a student awarded a cer-
tificate of attendance may not indicate that the  student received a high school diploma on applica-
tions for employment, military service,  financial aid, admittance to an institution of higher education
or any other purpose.
(B) The information and disclosure required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph  must be
provided annually:
(i) Beginning in grade five; or
(ii) Beginning after a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section  has been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter school shall allow a  student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
[8]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student by  a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high  school diploma, a modified diploma, an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance under this section; and
(B) Has completed basic  training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 329.451, as amended by  section 1, chapter 175, Oregon Laws 2021, section 6,
chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2022,  section 3, chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2023, section 9, chapter 513,
Oregon Laws 2023, and section 2, chapter 4, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a school district or public charter school shall award a high
school  diploma  to a student who completes the requirements established by [ subsection (2) ] sub-
sections (2) and (3)  of this section.
(b) A school  district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to a student who
satisfies the requirements established by  [ subsection (7) ] subsections (3) and (7)  of this section, an
extended diploma  to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this
section or a certificate of attendance to a student who satisfies  the requirements established by
subsection (9) of this section.
(c) A school district  or public charter school may not deny a student who has the documented
history described in subsection (7)(b)  or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) A school district or public charter  school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a high school diploma from a  school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State Board  of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades 9  through 12, must complete at least 24 total
credits, which must include at least:
(A) Three credits of mathematics;
(B) Four credits of language arts; and
(C) One half-credit of civics.
(b) If a school district  or public charter school requires a student to complete more than 24 total
credits, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school district or public charter  school
may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has established  academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses  that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
(c)(A) A school district or  public charter school that requires students to satisfy any require-
ments not specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of Education
must grant to a student a  waiver of the requirements established by the school district or public
charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under rules adopted by the State  Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board  of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
[9]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a migrant worker, as determined under rules adopted by  the State Board of Edu-
cation;
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education
Program; or
(vii) Enrolled in an approved recovery school under ORS 336.680.
(B)(i) For any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must accept any credits earned by the student in  an educational program in
this state and apply those credits toward requirements specified by paragraph (a) of  this subsection
or by rule of the State Board of Education if the credits satisfied  those requirements in that edu-
cational program in this state.
(ii) As used in this subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means  an educational
program that is:
(I) Provided by a school district, a public charter school, an approved recovery school, the
Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as  provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care or treatment facility
described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
(d)(A) The State Board of  Education shall adopt rules by which a student who has completed
an International Baccalaureate program may satisfy  the credit requirements prescribed by para-
graph (a) of this subsection and any  or all of the requirements established by rule of the State Board
of Education under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The rules:
(i) Must provide that the student has satisfied those requirements if the student has satisfied:
(I) All of the requirements for an  International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme or an Inter-
national Baccalaureate Career-related Programme; and
(II) Any other requirements prescribed by the board by rule for a student who has  completed
an International Baccalaureate program.
(ii) May provide that, only for the purpose of satisfying requirements as  provided by this para-
graph, a person  who is not an external International Baccalaureate examiner may grade assessments
or examinations for either program.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph  prohibits a school district or public charter school from estab-
lishing requirements that are in addition to the credit requirements prescribed by paragraph  (a) of
this subsection or any requirements established by rule under  paragraph (a) of this subsection or
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) When establishing  requirements under this paragraph, the board or a school district or
public charter school shall attempt  not to establish requirements that may discourage access to or
participation in the International Baccalaureate program.
(3)(a) In addition to the credit requirements described in subsection (2) of this  section
and any other requirements established by the State Board  of Education or by a school dis-
trict or public charter school, the board shall adopt proficiency standards  for Essential
Learning Skills that must be  demonstrated before a student is awarded a high school diploma
or a modified diploma. The proficiency standards must be demonstrated for, at a minimum,
the following:
(A) Reading and comprehending a variety of text;
(B) Writing clearly and accurately; and
[10]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Applying mathematics in a variety of settings.
(b) The board shall adopt by rule assessment options for students to demonstrate  profi-
ciency in Essential Learning Skills, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(3)] (c) A student providing work  samples to demonstrate proficiency in Essential Learning
Skills [as may be required under subsection (2) of this section ] must be allowed to use accommodations
described in the student’s individualized education program or the student’s plan developed  in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation  Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794. As used in this
[subsection] paragraph, the term “accommodations”:
[(a)] (A) Includes, but is not limited to:
[(A)] (i) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
[(B)] (ii) The ability to demonstrate proficiency in an alternative location  that is secure and
proctored.
[(C)] (iii) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
[(b)] (B) Does not include modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used
solely to earn modified credit.
(4) A student may  satisfy the requirements of [ subsection (2) ] subsections (2) and (3)  of this
section in less than four years. If a student satisfies the requirements  of [ subsection (2) ] subsections
(2) and (3)  of this section and a school  district or public charter school has received consent as
provided by subsection (6)  of this section, the school district or public charter school shall award
a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district or public charter school has received consent  as provided by subsection
(6) of this section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to  the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For the purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of  this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to have  the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years  of age or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4) of
this section, consent must be received  during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only  to students
who have demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for  a high
school diploma with reasonable  modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for a modified di-
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the requirements for a modified diploma established by this section and  the State
Board of Education; and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability to  maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning and  instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district or public charter school shall award an extended diploma  only to students
who have demonstrated  the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
[11]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for  an extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine through completion of high school, complete 12  credits, which may not
include more than six credits earned in a self-contained special education  classroom and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to maintain  grade level achievement due to significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in  grade level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public charter  school shall award a certificate of attendance to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for a  high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if the student has maintained regular full-time attendance for at least four  years beginning
in grade nine  and meets requirements established by the board of the school district or public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to satisfy  the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the age  of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may satisfy the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or  (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent is  provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided  under this subsection must be written and must clearly state that the
parent, guardian or student  is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10) of this section. A
consent may not be used to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7),  (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under  this subsection for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each school  district must provide to the Superintendent of Public Instruction information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A student who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an  extended diploma
or a certificate of attendance shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a high  school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to  instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours of other services
that are designed to:
[12]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide a total number of hours of  instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of  instructional hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b) A school district may not unilaterally decrease the total number of hours of  instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of the
age of the student.
(c) For purposes  of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services and other services
designed to meet the unique needs of  the student may be provided to the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered into by the school district if the individualized  education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the services may be  provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into an interagency agreement as allowed under this  paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to  the number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An  agency is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency agreement  as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that all students have on-site access to the appropriate resources and  courses to
achieve high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended diplomas at each high school  in the
school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c)(A) Provide to the parents or guardians of a student who has the documented  history de-
scribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section:
(i) Information about the availability of high school diplomas, modified diplomas  and extended
diplomas and the requirements for the diplomas; and
(ii) A disclosure that a student awarded a  certificate of attendance will not be counted as a high
school graduate in any reporting for the state or school district  and that a student awarded a cer-
tificate of attendance may not indicate that the  student received a high school diploma on applica-
tions for employment, military service,  financial aid, admittance to an institution of higher education
or any other purpose.
(B) The information and disclosure required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph  must be
provided annually:
(i) Beginning in grade five; or
(ii) Beginning after a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section  has been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter school shall allow a  student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student by  a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high  school diploma, a modified diploma, an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance under this section; and
(B) Has completed basic  training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 329.451, as amended by  section 1, chapter 175, Oregon Laws 2021, section 6,
[13]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2022,  section 3, chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2023, section 9, chapter 513,
Oregon Laws 2023, section 1, chapter 564, Oregon Laws  2023, and section 3, chapter 4, Oregon Laws
2024, is amended to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a school district or public charter school shall award a high
school  diploma  to a student who completes the requirements established by [ subsection (2) ] sub-
sections (2) and (3)  of this section.
(b) A school  district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to a student who
satisfies the requirements established by  [ subsection (7) ] subsections (3) and (7)  of this section, an
extended diploma  to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this
section or a certificate of attendance to a student who satisfies  the requirements established by
subsection (9) of this section.
(c) A school district  or public charter school may not deny a student who has the documented
history described in subsection (7)(b)  or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) A school district or public charter  school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a high  school diploma from a school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State Board  of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades  9 through 12, must complete at least 24 total
credits, which must include at least:
(A) Three credits of mathematics;
(B) Four credits of language arts;
(C) One half-credit of civics;
(D) One half-credit of higher education and career path skills; and
(E) One half-credit of personal financial education.
(b) If a school district  or public charter school requires a student to complete more than 24 total
credits,  as  provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school district or public charter school
may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has established  academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses  that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
(c)(A) A school district or public charter school that requires students  to satisfy any require-
ments not specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of Education
must grant to a student a waiver of the requirements established by  the school district or public
charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under rules  adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined  under rules adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a migrant  worker, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Edu-
cation;
[14]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education
Program; or
(vii) Enrolled in an approved recovery school under ORS 336.680.
(B)(i) For any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must accept  any credits earned by the student in an educational program in
this state and apply those credits toward requirements specified by paragraph (a) of  this subsection
or by rule of the State  Board of Education if the credits satisfied those requirements in that edu-
cational program in this state.
(ii) As used  in this subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means an educational
program that is:
(I) Provided by a school district, a public charter school, an approved recovery school, the
Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as  provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care or treatment facility
described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
(d) The State  Board of Education may adopt by rule requirements for courses, including teachers
of courses, related to  higher education and career path skills and personal financial education that
allow the courses to satisfy multiple credit requirements for a high school diploma, including  math-
ematics.
(e)(A) The State Board of Education  shall adopt rules by which a student who has completed
an International Baccalaureate program may satisfy  the credit requirements prescribed by para-
graph (a) of this subsection and any  or all of the requirements established by rule of the State Board
of Education under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The rules:
(i) Must provide that the student has satisfied those requirements if the student has satisfied:
(I) All of the requirements for an  International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme or an Inter-
national Baccalaureate Career-related Programme; and
(II) Any other requirements prescribed by the board by rule for a student who has  completed
an International Baccalaureate program.
(ii) May provide that, only for the purpose of satisfying requirements as  provided by this para-
graph, a person  who is not an external International Baccalaureate examiner may grade assessments
or examinations for either program.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph  prohibits a school district or public charter school from estab-
lishing requirements that are in addition to the credit requirements prescribed by paragraph  (a) of
this subsection or any requirements established by rule under  paragraph (a) of this subsection or
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) When establishing  requirements under this paragraph, the board or a school district or
public charter school shall attempt  not to establish requirements that may discourage access to or
participation in the International Baccalaureate program.
(3)(a) In addition to the credit requirements described in subsection (2) of this  section
and any other requirements established by the State Board  of Education or by a school dis-
trict or public charter school, the board shall adopt proficiency standards  for Essential
Learning Skills that must be  demonstrated before a student is awarded a high school diploma
or a modified diploma. The proficiency standards must be demonstrated for, at a minimum,
the following:
(A) Reading and comprehending a variety of text;
(B) Writing clearly and accurately; and
[15]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Applying mathematics in a variety of settings.
(b) The board shall adopt by rule assessment options for students to demonstrate  profi-
ciency in Essential Learning Skills, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(3)] (c) A student providing work samples to  demonstrate proficiency in Essential Learning
Skills [as may be required under subsection (2) of this section ] must be allowed to use accommodations
described in the  student’s individualized education program or the student’s plan developed in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29  U.S.C. 794. As used in this
[subsection] paragraph, the term “accommodations”:
[(a)] (A) Includes, but is not limited to:
[(A)] (i) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
[(B)] (ii) The ability to  demonstrate proficiency in an alternative location that is secure and
proctored.
[(C)] (iii) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
[(b)] (B) Does not include modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used
solely to earn modified credit.
(4) A student may satisfy the requirements of [ subsection (2) ] subsections (2) and  (3)  of this
section in less than four years. If a student satisfies the requirements  of [ subsection (2) ] subsections
(2) and (3)  of this section and a school district  or public charter school has received consent as
provided by subsection (6) of this section, the school district or public charter  school shall award
a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district or public charter school has received consent  as provided by subsection
(6) of this section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to  the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For the purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of  this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to have  the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years  of age or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4) of
this section, consent must be received  during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only  to students
who have demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for  a high
school diploma with reasonable  modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for a modified di-
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the requirements for a modified diploma established by this section and  the State
Board of Education; and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability to  maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning and  instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district or public charter school shall award an extended diploma  only to students
who have demonstrated  the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
[16]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for  an extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine through completion of high school, complete 12  credits, which may not
include more than six credits earned in a self-contained special education  classroom and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to maintain  grade level achievement due to significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in  grade level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public charter  school shall award a certificate of attendance to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for a  high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if the  student has maintained regular full-time attendance for at least four years beginning
in grade nine and meets requirements established by the board of the school district  or public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to satisfy  the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the age  of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may satisfy  the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent is  provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided under this subsection must be written and must clearly  state that the
parent, guardian or student is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10) of  this section. A
consent may not be  used to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under this subsection  for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each school district must provide to the Superintendent of Public  Instruction information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A student  who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an extended diploma
or a certificate of attendance shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a high  school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours  of other services
that are designed to:
[17]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide a  total number of hours of instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of  instructional hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b) A school district may not unilaterally decrease the total number of hours of  instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of the
age of the student.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services and  other services
designed to meet the unique needs of the student may be provided  to the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered into  by the school district if the individualized education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the  services may be provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into an  interagency agreement as allowed under this paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to  the number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An agency  is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency agreement  as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that  all students have on-site access to the appropriate resources and courses to
achieve high school  diplomas, modified diplomas and extended diplomas at each high school in the
school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c)(A) Provide to  the parents or guardians of a student who has the documented history de-
scribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section:
(i) Information about  the availability of high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended
diplomas and the requirements for the diplomas; and
(ii) A disclosure that a student awarded a  certificate of attendance will not be counted as a high
school graduate in any reporting for the state  or school district and that a student awarded a cer-
tificate of attendance may not indicate that the student  received a high school diploma on applica-
tions for employment, military service,  financial aid, admittance to an institution of higher education
or any other purpose.
(B) The information  and disclosure required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph must be
provided  annually:
(i) Beginning in grade five; or
(ii) Beginning after  a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section has been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter  school shall allow a student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student by  a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high school diploma, a modified diploma,  an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance under this section; and
(B) Has completed basic  training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 327.190 is amended to read:
[18]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
327.190. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Disaggregated”  means separated based on the student groups identified in ORS 327.180
(2)(b).
(b) “Five-year completion rate” means the percentage of students  who received a high school
diploma, a modified  diploma or an extended diploma or who received a certificate for passing an
approved high school equivalency test such as the General Educational Development test  (GED)
within five years of the student beginning the ninth grade.
(c) “High school diploma” means a diploma that is awarded to a student upon  satisfaction of the
requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)  and (3) .
(d) “Ninth-grade on-track rates” means the percentage of students who, at the end of the summer
following the year the students began ninth grade, completed one quarter of the credits required for
high school graduation.
(e) “On-time graduation rate” means  the percentage of students who received a high school di-
ploma or a modified diploma within four years of the students beginning the ninth grade.
(f) “Regular attendance rates” means the percentage of students who are absent, as determined
by Department of Education policy, for less than 10 percent of the school  days for which the stu-
dents are enrolled.
(g) “Third-grade reading  proficiency rate” means the percentage of students in the third grade
who are determined to be proficient or above in  English language arts, as determined under rules
adopted by the State Board of Education.
(2) The Department  of Education shall review all applications for grants from the Student In-
vestment Account that comply with the requirements prescribed by ORS 327.185.
(3) If an  application complies with the requirements of ORS 327.185, the department shall col-
laborate with the grant recipient  to develop applicable longitudinal performance growth targets. The
longitudinal performance growth targets must:
(a) Be based on data available for longitudinal analysis;
(b) Be developed based on guidance established by the department; and
(c) Use the following applicable metrics:
(A) On-time graduation rates and five-year completion rates, including:
(i) The overall on-time graduation rate and five-year completion rate.
(ii) Gaps in disaggregated on-time graduation rates and five-year completion rates.
(B) Ninth-grade on-track rates, including:
(i) The overall ninth-grade on-track rate.
(ii) Gaps in disaggregated ninth-grade on-track rates.
(C) Third-grade reading proficiency rates, including:
(i) The overall third-grade reading proficiency rate.
(ii) Gaps in disaggregated third-grade reading proficiency rates.
(D) Regular attendance rates, including:
(i) The overall regular attendance rate.
(ii) Gaps in disaggregated regular attendance rates.
(4) In addition to the metrics identified in subsection (3) of this section, the following may  be
used to develop applicable performance growth targets:
(a) Local metrics; and
(b) Targets related to student mental and  behavioral health needs, as established by the State
Board of Education by rule.
[19]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) When developing performance growth targets, the department and grant recipient shall:
(a) Review disaggregated student data;
(b) Apply  a process adopted by the department for the purpose of strategically developing equi-
table policies and programs; and
(c) Identify which student groups identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b) are most at risk  of not meeting
performance growth targets.
(6)(a) After  developing performance growth targets, the department and grant recipient shall
enter into a grant agreement. The grant agreement must include applicable  performance growth
targets for measuring the academic growth of the students of the grant recipient.
(b) A grant agreement is not valid until approved  by the governing body of the grant recipient
at an open meeting following:
(A) Provision of the plan at the main office of the grant recipient and on the grant recipient’s
website;
(B) Oral presentation of the plan by an  administrator of the grant recipient to the governing
body of the grant recipient; and
(C) Opportunity for the public to comment on the plan at an open meeting.
(7) Any agreements between a  public charter school and a grant recipient that is a school dis-
trict shall become part of the grant agreement.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 336.585 is amended to read:
336.585. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Juvenile Detention Education Program” means the program defined in ORS 326.695.
(b) “Resident district” means the school district in which  the parents or legal guardian, if any,
of a child resided at the time of  the child’s enrollment in the Juvenile Detention Education Program.
If the child has no parents or legal guardian, or none can  be located, the resident district is the
school district in which the child is physically located.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall provide  or cause to be provided appropriate education
for children enrolled in an educational program under the Juvenile  Detention Education Program.
The Superintendent of Public  Instruction may contract with a school district or education service
district to provide or cause to be provided appropriate education to children enrolled in an  educa-
tional program under the Juvenile Detention Education Program. For  the purpose of this section,
an appropriate education includes transition services from the Juvenile Detention Education  Pro-
gram into school settings and workforce preparation  programs and any necessary ongoing support
for a transition.
(b) An education service district that provides education as provided  by this subsection and that
awards high school diplomas:
(A) May not  impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) or (3) or by rule of the State Board of Education; and
(B) Must accept any credits previously earned by  children in another school or educational
program in this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451
(2)(a) or (3) or by rule of the State Board of Education.
(3) The superintendent shall pay the costs of providing education to children  enrolled in an ed-
ucational program under the Juvenile Detention Education Program from the State School  Fund
grant allocated for that purpose under ORS 327.026.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt  by rule standards to be applied to the operation
of the Juvenile Detention Education  Program, including standards that allow a school district or an
[20]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
education service district under contract with the superintendent to:
(a) Implement an assessment system as provided by ORS 329.485.
(b) Administer a nationally normed assessment as provided by ORS 329.488.
(c) Participate in the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship  program established by
ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(d) Receive funds under ORS chapter 329.
(5) The superintendent shall ensure that the resident district of  each child enrolled in an edu-
cational program under the Juvenile  Detention Education Program is notified, if the resident district
can be reasonably identified. The purposes of the notification include, but are not limited to:
(a) Removing the child from the resident district’s census;
(b) Facilitating transfers of the child’s educational records; and
(c) Facilitating planning for the child’s possible return to the resident district.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 336.590 is amended to read:
336.590. (1) As used in this section, “Youth Corrections Education Program” means the program
defined in ORS 326.695.
(2) The Department of Education  shall provide or cause to be provided appropriate education
for children enrolled in an  educational program under the Youth Corrections Education
Program. The Superintendent of Public  Instruction may contract with a school district or education
service district to provide  or cause to be provided appropriate education to children enrolled in an
educational program under the  Youth Corrections Education Program. For the purpose of this sec-
tion, an appropriate education includes transition services from the Youth Corrections  Education
Program into school settings and workforce  preparation programs and any necessary ongoing sup-
port for a transition.
(3) The superintendent shall pay  the costs of providing education to children enrolled in an ed-
ucational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program  from the State School Fund
grant allocated for that purpose under ORS 327.026.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule  standards to be applied to the operation
of the Youth Corrections Education Program, including standards that allow a  school district or an
education service district under contract with the superintendent to:
(a) Award high school diplomas, modified diplomas, extended diplomas and certificates of  at-
tendance as provided  by ORS 329.451 and 339.877. An education service district that awards high
school diplomas as provided by this paragraph:
(A) May not impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to  the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) or (3) or by rule of the State Board of Education; and
(B) Must accept any credits previously earned  by children in another school or educational
program in this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451
(2)(a) or (3) or by rule of the State Board of Education.
(b) Implement an assessment system as provided by ORS 329.485.
(c) Administer a nationally normed assessment as provided by ORS 329.488.
(d) Participate in the beginning teacher and administrator  mentorship program established by
ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(e) Receive funds under ORS chapter 329.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 336.680, as amended by section 45, chapter 95, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
336.680. (1) As used in this section, “approved recovery school” means a school  that is under
[21]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
an agreement with the Department of Education  to provide students enrolled in the school with a
holistic approach to:
(a) Educational services for grades 9 through 12; and
(b) Health care services related to recovery from substance use disorders.
(2) The department shall  provide or cause to be provided appropriate education for students
enrolled in an approved  recovery school. For the purpose of paying the costs of providing education
to students enrolled in an approved recovery school,  the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
make the following:
(a) Payments from amounts available from the State School Fund under ORS 327.029.
(b) Payments from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account, as provided by rule  adopted by
the State Board of Education in collaboration  with the advisory committee convened under ORS
336.685. The rules adopted as provided by this paragraph may include  a minimum amount, a maxi-
mum amount or both for approved recovery schools.
(3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction  may contract with a school district, an education
service district or a public charter school to provide or cause to be  provided appropriate education
to students enrolled in an approved recovery school. Unless otherwise specified,  any educational
services provided under a contract entered into under  this subsection shall be paid as described in
this section and not by any other state moneys distributed based on average daily membership  that
are available to the school district, education service district or public charter school for the  pur-
pose of providing educational services.
(4) The State Board of  Education shall adopt by rule the standards for a recovery school to
become and operate as an approved recovery school. The standards must provide that:
(a) The recovery school must align, to the extent identified by the board,  with standards for
accreditation established by  a nonprofit accrediting organization composed of representatives of re-
covery schools and individuals who support the growth of recovery schools. The standards must  in-
clude requirements that:
(A) The  recovery school, in compliance with timelines established by the department, be ac-
credited by a nonprofit  accrediting organization that establishes standards for recovery schools.
Nothing in this subparagraph requires the recovery  school to be accredited at the time the super-
intendent first enters into a contract with the recovery school.
(B) Student enrollment in the recovery school is voluntary. No school district or  state or local
agency may compel or otherwise require a student to enroll in a recovery school. Students enrolled
in an approved recovery school may not be counted in determining the  number of pupils in average
daily membership for purposes of ORS 334.175 (5).
(C) All students who reside in this state and who meet the eligibility criteria established  under
subsection (8) of this section may enroll in an approved  recovery school if space is available. If
space is not available, the approved recovery school may prioritize  for enrollment student groups
identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b).
(D) The school  district, education service district or public charter school with which the de-
partment has entered into a contract for a  recovery school must agree to award high school diplo-
mas, modified diplomas, extended  diplomas and alternative certificates as provided by ORS 329.451
and 339.877. An entity that awards high school diplomas as provided by this subparagraph:
(i) May not impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) or (3) or by rule of the State Board of Education; and
(ii) Must accept any credits previously earned  by students in another school or educational
[22]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
program in this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451
(2)(a) or (3) or by rule of the State Board of Education.
(E) Except as provided by subparagraphs  (F) and (G) of this paragraph, the recovery school must
satisfy the same laws that apply to public charter schools under ORS 338.115.
(F) All  administrators and teachers at the recovery school must be licensed by the Teacher
Standards and Practices Commission.
(G) An approved recovery school is  not required to comply with the enrollment requirements
prescribed by ORS 338.115 (1)(bb) or (5).
(H) An approved recovery school must comply with the requirements  of the uniform budget and
accounting system adopted by rule of the State Board of Education under ORS 327.511.
(b) Recovery schools will be approved, to the greatest extent practicable, in a manner that:
(A) Represents a geographic distribution across this state; and
(B) Takes into consideration the needs  for services by the community in which the recovery
school would be located.
(5) Any school that provides the services of a recovery  school may enter into a contract with
the superintendent  to become an approved recovery school, including schools already providing the
services of a recovery school and schools that are proposing to provide the services of a recovery
school.
(6) An approved recovery  school may enter into agreements with other entities, including
community-based organizations and federally recognized tribes of this state,  for the purposes of
providing educational and health care services to students enrolled  in the approved recovery school.
(7)(a) The department shall be responsible for:
(A) Identifying, locating and evaluating students enrolled in an approved recovery  school who
may be in need of special education and related services; and
(B) Ensuring that eligible students receive special education and related services.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection,  the department may enter into a contract with a school
district or an education service district.
(8) The  department shall establish eligibility criteria for students to enroll in an approved re-
covery school, based on input from the advisory  committee convened under ORS 336.685 and based
on research from a nonprofit  organization composed of representatives of recovery schools and in-
dividuals who support the growth of recovery schools and other relevant organizations.
(9) For the purposes of administering this section:
(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt any necessary rules.
(b) The  department shall collaborate with the Oregon Health Authority, the Youth Development
Division,  the  Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission, the Oregon Youth Authority, the Department
of Human Services and local public  health and mental health authorities or providers and shall co-
ordinate, to the greatest extent  practicable, funding of services provided in relation to approved
recovery schools.
(10) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall prepare a report on the progress,  suc-
cesses and challenges of approved recovery schools and submit that report to:
(a) The interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education; and
(b) The advisory committee convened under ORS 336.685.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 343.331, as amended by section 1, chapter 59, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
343.331. ORS 343.322, 343.324, 343.326 and 343.328 do not apply to any of the following:
[23]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) Any abbreviated school days that are a component of discipline imposed in  compliance with
ORS 339.250, 339.252 or 343.155 (5) or that are  the result of a placement made as provided by ORS
343.177.
(2) A student’s exclusion from schools due to the student’s immunization  status or due to the
student’s exposure to a restrictable disease, as provided by ORS 433.235 to 433.284.
(3) The exclusion of a student from schools or the closure or  restriction of access to schools due
to actions taken under a public health emergency authorized under ORS 433.441 to 433.452.
(4) A  student who has fulfilled all state requirements for graduation with a high school diploma,
as described in ORS 329.451 (2)  and (3) , when  the parent or foster parent has agreed to the abbre-
viated school day program.
(5) A student enrolled in a program described in  ORS 336.585, 336.590, 339.129, 343.261, 343.961
(1)(c)(A)(i) or 346.010, if the student has meaningful access to  the same number of hours of instruc-
tion and educational services as the majority of other  students enrolled in the same program as the
student.
(6) A student whose parent or foster parent has notified an education  service district that the
student is being taught by a parent, legal guardian or private teacher under ORS 339.035.
(7) A student who is excluded from, or limited access to, school due to a court order.
(8) A  high school student who is voluntarily enrolled in an alternative education program in
compliance with ORS 336.635, the Expanded  Options Program under ORS 340.005 to 340.090 or an
accelerated college credit program as defined in ORS 340.300, when:
(a) The majority of the students of the program are not students with disabilities;
(b) The student is not restricted  to attending fewer hours of instruction and educational services
than the number of hours of instruction and educational services attended by the majority of  stu-
dents without disabilities who are in the same grade and who attend the same program; and
(c) For  an alternative education program in which the student is enrolled under ORS 336.635,
the school district informs the  parent or foster parent, in writing and in a language and format ac-
cessible to the parent or foster parent, that  upon written request of the parent or foster parent, the
student will be immediately restored to a school that allows  the student to access the same number
of hours of instruction and educational services that are provided to the majority of other  students
who are in the same grade within the student’s resident school district.
(9) A student who, when registering for classes for a term  or semester of a school year, volun-
tarily does not schedule a class for one or more class periods.  The provisions of this subsection
apply only if the student is:
(a) In grade 11 or 12 and is on track to fulfill all state requirements  for graduation with a high
school diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (2)  and (3), or a modified diploma, as described in ORS
329.451 (3) and (7), within four years of starting grade 9; or
(b) On track to fulfill all state requirements for  graduation with a high school diploma, as de-
scribed in ORS 329.451 (2)  and (3) , or  a modified diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (3) and (7),
by the end of the school year in which the student voluntarily does not schedule a class for one  or
more class periods.
(10) Asynchronous instruction if the instruction:
(a) Is for only one class per term or semester;
(b) Satisfies a  credit requirement for a high school diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (2)  and
(3), or a modified diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (3) and (7);
(c) Is a credit recovery class or is a class not otherwise available to the student;
[24]
SB 919
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
(d) Is offered to  students on a voluntary basis and is not restricted to only students with a dis-
ability; and
(e) Is accessible to a student while the student is at  school and while staff of the school are
immediately available to the student.
SECTION 11.
(1) The amendments to ORS 327.190, 329.451,  336.585, 336.590, 336.680 and
343.331 by sections 3 to 10 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The amendments to ORS 327.190, 329.451, 336.585, 336.590, 336.680 and 343.331 by
sections 3 to 10 of this 2025 Act apply to diplomas awarded on or after January 1, 2026.
(3) Notwithstanding the operative date set forth in subsection (1)  of this section, the
State Board of Education, the Department of Education and any  entity that awards high
school diplomas and modified diplomas may take any action before the operative  date set
forth in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the board, department or  entity
to exercise, on and after the operative date set forth in subsection  (1) of this section, all of
the duties, functions and powers necessary to award diplomas as provided by ORS 329.451.
SECTION 12. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[25]