Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, which  shall be expended for the purposes of
implementing section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Human Services shall contract with an organization
to implement and  administer a program to assist recipients who are eligible to receive sup-
plemental nutrition  assistance provided by the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
under ORS 411.806 to 411.845 in purchasing locally grown fruits and vegetables from farmers’
markets, farm share sites and retail food outlets that participate in the program.
(2) The entity that contracts with the department under subsection (1)  of this section
must be a nonprofit organization that has experience  in assisting low-income populations in
accessing fresh, locally grown foods and that  has established relationships with farmers’
markets, farm share sites and retail food outlets that participate in the program.
(3) The department shall distribute to the nonprofit organization that has contracted
with the department under this  section the funds appropriated under section 1 of this 2023
Act to:
(a) Implement and administer the program; and
(b) Match the amounts that a recipient spends on foods  that are eligible for supplemental
nutrition assistance, and that are locally grown fruits and vegetables purchased  from
farmers’ markets, farm share sites and retail food outlets that participate in the program.
(4)(a) The nonprofit organization  that has contracted with the department under this
section shall review the outcomes of the program,  including the program’s impact on the
purchase of locally grown fruits and vegetables by recipients of assistance under the Sup-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1025
SB 555
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
plemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(b) The  nonprofit organization shall prepare and submit to the department a report con-
taining the organization’s findings no  later than December 31, 2025. The department shall
make the report available to the public on the department’s website.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]