Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community court program”  means an evidence-informed program that utilizes con-
tingency management to address addiction  with incentives and swift, certain and fair sanc-
tions for noncompliance.
(b) “Community harm reduction”  means evidence-informed policies and practices that
reduce harm to the community caused by drug-dependent persons and  persons unlawfully
distributing controlled substances.
(c) “Detoxification  facility” means a facility approved by the Oregon Health Authority
that provides emergency care or treatment for drug-dependent persons.
(d) “Drug-dependency related offense” means an offense that is motivated  by a depend-
ence on a controlled substance.
(e) “Drug-dependent person” means  an individual who has lost the ability to control the
personal use of controlled substances with abuse potential, or who  uses controlled sub-
stances to the extent that the health of  the individual, or the health of other individuals, is
substantially impaired or endangered, or  the social or economic function of the individual is
substantially disrupted. A drug-dependent person may  or may not be physically dependent,
a condition in which the body requires a continuing supply of a controlled substance to avoid
characteristic withdrawal symptoms, or psychologically  dependent, a condition characterized
by an overwhelming mental desire for continued use of a controlled substance.
(f) “Individual harm reduction” means evidence-informed policies  and practices that re-
duce harm to drug-dependent persons, with or without the use of law enforcement.
(g) “Local planning committee” means a local planning committee for alcohol and drug
prevention and treatment services appointed by  or designated by the county governing body
under ORS 430.342.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2380
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) “Police officer” means a member of a law enforcement unit  who is employed on a
part-time or full-time  basis as a peace officer, commissioned by a city, a county or the De-
partment of State Police and responsible for enforcing the criminal laws  of this state, and
any person formally deputized by a law enforcement unit to take custody of a person  who is
intoxicated or under the influence of one or more controlled substances.
(i) “Prevention” means evidence-informed policies, procedures and  practices that reduce
the rate of persons that  become drug-dependent persons among the population that is the
target for the policies, procedures and practices.
(j) “Recovery” means the state of a person who was a drug-dependent person but who  is
no longer drug-dependent.
(k) “Sobering center” means a facility that meets all of the following criteria:
(A) The facility operates for the purpose of providing to individuals who  are acutely
intoxicated a safe, clean and supervised environment until the individuals are  no longer
acutely intoxicated.
(B) The facility contracts with or is affiliated with a treatment program or  a provider
approved by the Oregon Health  Authority to provide addiction treatment and the contract
or affiliation agreement includes, but is not limited to, case consultation, training and  advice
and a plan for making referrals to addiction treatment.
(C) The facility, in consultation with  the addiction treatment program or provider, has
adopted comprehensive written policies and  procedures incorporating best practices for the
safety of intoxicated individuals, employees of the facility and volunteers at the facility.
(D) The facility is registered with the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 430.262.
(L) “Treatment” means a  program that utilizes evidence-based methods to assist a
drug-dependent person to become a person in recovery, and that:
(A) Is based on published research in at  least two peer-reviewed journals that cite the
methods used in the program  as effective in treating drug-dependent persons by assisting the
persons to become persons in recovery;
(B) Is standardized so that the program can be replicated with  the same or similar effi-
cacy;
(C) Has been studied in more than  one environment and has provided consistent and ef-
fective results; and
(D) Is subject to ongoing evaluation to determine if implementation is adhering to  the
protocol for the method and delivering the desired results of assisting drug-dependent  per-
sons to become persons in recovery.
(m) “Treatment facility”  includes outpatient facilities, inpatient facilities and other fa-
cilities that provide treatment  services that also meet the minimum standards established
under ORS 430.357, any of  which may also provide diagnosis and evaluation, medical care,
detoxification, social services or rehabilitation for drug-dependent persons  and which operate
in the form of a general hospital, state hospital, foster home, hostel, clinic or  other suitable
form approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) Using funds from the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund  established under
ORS 430.384 or from any  other available source, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
shall provide grants and funding to counties, federally recognized Indian  tribes in this state
and Behavioral Health Resource Networks to support the provision of the following
evidence-informed and evidence-based services:
[2]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Prevention;
(b) Treatment;
(c) Recovery support; and
(d) Individual harm reduction.
(3) Using funds from the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund  established under
ORS 430.384 or from any other available source, the commission shall provide grants  and
funding to cities and counties to support enforcement related to community harm  reduction
services as described in subsection (6) of this section.
(4)(a) Grants and funding provided by the commission under this  section shall ensure
that each region of this  state receives funding in equitable proportion to the region’s need,
as determined by the rules of the commission.
(b) A maximum of 15 percent of any grants or funding provided by the commission under
this section may be spent on administrative costs or costs related to law enforcement.
(5) The commission shall prioritize  the funding of detoxification facilities, sobering cen-
ters, treatment facilities  and peer recovery support services, including culturally specific
programs, to all regions of the state on a formula grant basis as determined by the com-
mission by rule.
(6) The commission shall also prioritize the funding  of community harm reduction on a
competitive grant basis, including:
(a) Programs for diversion in lieu of arrest by a police officer;
(b) Community court programs to divert and assist drug-dependent persons that have
been charged with drug possession or other drug-dependency related offenses; and
(c) Focused deterrence to eliminate overt drug markets.
(7) The commission shall by rule  specify the manner of applying for grants and funding
under this section. All grant and funding applications must be approved by  the local planning
committee for each county in which the program will operate.
(8) The chairperson of the commission shall request that the Legislative Assembly ap-
propriate an amount of moneys each biennium to ensure that the funds available  to the
commission for  grants and funding under this section is not less than the total amount de-
posited and transferred into the Drug Treatment and  Recovery Services Fund pursuant to
ORS 430.384 for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, adjusted for inflation each subsequent
biennium based on changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West
Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States  De-
partment of Labor.
(9) The commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 430.384, as amended by section 67, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
430.384. (1) The Drug Treatment and Recovery  Services Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Drug Treatment and Re-
covery Services Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys allocated from the Oregon  Marijuana Account, pursuant to ORS 475C.726 (3)(b); and
(c) All other moneys deposited into the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the [ Oregon Health Authority ]
[3]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  for the purposes set forth in ORS 430.389  and section 1
of this 2025 Act .
(4)(a) Pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, the Legislative Assembly  shall appropriate
or transfer to the fund  an amount sufficient to fully fund the grants program required by ORS
430.389 and section 1 of this 2025 Act .
(b) The total amount deposited and transferred into the fund shall not be less  than $57 million
for the first year ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 are in effect.
(c) In each subsequent year, the minimum transfer amount set  forth in paragraph (b) of this
subsection shall be increased by not less than the sum of:
(A) $57 million multiplied  by the percentage, if any, by which the monthly averaged U.S. City
Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31 of the prior calendar
year exceeds the monthly index for the fourth quarter of the calendar year 2020; and
(B) The annual increase, if any, in moneys distributed pursuant to ORS 475C.726 (3)(b).
SECTION 3.
 ORS 430.387 is amended to read:
430.387. The [ Oregon Health Authority ] Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  shall cause the
moneys in the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund to be distributed as follows:
(1) An amount necessary for the administration of ORS [ 430.388 to ] 430.389 and 430.390, ex-
cluding amounts necessary to establish and maintain the telephone hotline described in ORS  430.391
(1).
(2) After the distribution set forth in subsection (1)  of this section, the remaining moneys in the
fund shall be distributed to  the grants program as set forth in ORS 430.389  and section 1 of this
2025 Act .
SECTION 4.  ORS 430.389, as amended by section 68, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
430.389. (1) The [ Oversight and Accountability Council ] Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission
shall approve grants and funding [ provided by the Oregon  Health Authority in accordance with this
section] to accomplish the following:
(a) Implement Behavioral  Health Resource Networks and increase access to community care.
A Behavioral Health Resource Network  is an entity or collection of entities that individually or
jointly provide some or all of the services described in subsection (2)(e) of this section[ .]; and
(b) Provide grants and funding as described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(2)(a) The [ authority] commission shall establish an equitable:
(A) Process for applying for  grants and funding by agencies or organizations, whether govern-
ment or community based, to establish Behavioral Health Resource Networks  for the purposes of
immediately screening the acute needs of individuals with substance use, including  those who also
have a mental illness,  and assessing and addressing any ongoing needs through ongoing case man-
agement, harm reduction, treatment, housing and linkage to other care and services.
(B) Evaluation process to assess  the effectiveness of Behavioral Health Resource Networks that
receive grants or funding.
(b) Recipients of grants or  funding must be licensed, certified or credentialed by the state, in-
cluding certification under ORS 743A.168 (9), or meet criteria prescribed by rule by the [ authority]
commission under ORS 430.390. A recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection  may not
use the grant or funding to supplant the recipient’s existing funding.
(c) The [ council and  the authority ] commission shall ensure that residents of each county have
access to all of the services described in paragraph (e) of this subsection.
[4]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Applicants for grants and funding may apply individually or jointly  with other network par-
ticipants to provide services in one or more counties.
(e) A network must have the capacity to provide the following  services and any other services
specified by the [ authority] commission  by rule but no individual participant in a network is re-
quired to provide all of the services:
(A) Screening by certified addiction peer support or wellness specialists or other qualified  per-
sons designated by the [ council] commission  to determine a client’s need  for immediate medical or
other treatment to determine what acute care is needed and where it  can be best provided, identify
other needs and link the  client to other appropriate local or statewide services, including treatment
for substance use and coexisting health problems,  housing, employment, training and child care.
Networks shall provide this service 24 hours a day, seven days a week,  every calendar day of the
year through a telephone line or other means. Networks may rely on the statewide telephone
hotline established by the [ authority] commission under  ORS 430.391 for telephone screenings dur-
ing nonbusiness hours such as evenings, weekends and holidays. Notwithstanding paragraph  (c) of
this subsection, only one grantee in each network within each county is required  to provide the
screenings described in this subparagraph.
(B) Comprehensive behavioral health needs assessment, including a substance  use screening by
a certified  alcohol and drug counselor or other credentialed addiction treatment professional. The
assessment shall prioritize the self-identified needs of a client.
(C) Individual intervention planning, case management and connection to services. If, after the
completion of a screening, a client indicates a desire to address some or all of the identified  needs,
a case manager shall work with the client to design an individual intervention plan. The plan must
address the client’s need for substance use treatment, coexisting health problems, housing,  employ-
ment and training, child care and other services.
(D) Ongoing peer  counseling and support from screening and assessment through implementation
of individual intervention plans as well as  peer outreach workers to engage directly with
marginalized community members who could potentially benefit from the network’s services.
(E) Assessment of the need for, and provision of, mobile or virtual outreach services to:
(i) Reach clients who are unable to access the network; and
(ii) Increase public awareness of network services.
(F) Harm reduction services and information and education about harm reduction services.
(G) Low-barrier substance use treatment.
(H) Transitional and supportive housing for individuals with substance use.
(f) If an applicant for a grant or funding under this subsection is unable to provide all  of the
services described in paragraph (e) of this subsection, the applicant may identify  how the applicant
intends to partner with other entities to provide the services, and the [ authority and the  council ]
commission may facilitate collaboration among applicants.
(g) All services provided  through the networks must be evidence-informed, trauma-informed,
culturally  specific,  linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental. The goal shall be
to address effectively the client’s substance use and any other social determinants of health.
(h) The networks must be adequately staffed to address the needs  of people with substance use
within their regions as prescribed by the [ authority] commission by rule, including, at a minimum,
at least one person in each of the following categories:
(A) Alcohol and  drug counselor certified by the Oregon Health Authority or other credentialed
addiction treatment professional;
[5]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Case manager;
(C) Addiction peer support specialist certified by the authority;
(D) Addiction peer wellness specialist certified by the authority;
(E) Recovery mentor, certified by the Mental Health and Addiction Certification Board of
Oregon or its successor organization; and
(F) Youth support specialist certified by the authority.
(i) Verification of a screening by a certified addiction peer support  specialist, wellness specialist
or other person in accordance with paragraph (e)(A)  of this subsection shall promptly be provided
to the client  by the entity conducting the screening. If the client executes a valid release of infor-
mation, the entity shall provide verification of the screening to  the [ authority] commission  or a
contractor of the [ authority] commission and the [ authority] commission or the [ authority’s]
commission’s contractor shall forward the verification to any entity the client has authorized  to
receive the verification.
[(3)(a) If moneys remain in the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund after the council has
committed grants and funding to establish behavioral  health resource networks serving every county
in this state, the council shall authorize grants  and funding to other agencies or organizations, whether
government or community based, and to  the nine federally recognized tribes in this state and service
providers that are affiliated with the nine federally recognized tribes in this state to  increase access to
one or more of the following: ]
[(A) Low-barrier substance use treatment  that is evidence-informed, trauma-informed, culturally
specific, linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental; ]
[(B) Peer support and recovery services; ]
[(C) Transitional, supportive and permanent housing for persons with substance use; ]
[(D) Harm reduction interventions including, but not limited to, overdose prevention  education, ac-
cess to short-acting opioid antagonists,  as defined in ORS 689.800, and sterile syringes and stimulant-
specific drug education and outreach; or ]
[(E) Incentives and supports to expand the behavioral health workforce to support  the services de-
livered by behavioral health resource networks and  entities receiving grants or funding under this
subsection.]
[(b) A recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection may  not use the grant or funding to
supplant the recipient’s existing funding. ]
[(4)] (3) In awarding grants and funding under [ subsections (1)  and (3) ] subsection (1)  of this
section  and section 1 of this 2025 Act , the [ council] commission shall:
(a) Distribute grants and funding to ensure access to:
(A) Historically underserved populations; and
(B) Culturally specific and linguistically responsive services.
(b) Consider any inventories or surveys of currently available behavioral health services.
(c) Consider available regional data related to the substance  use treatment needs and the access
to culturally specific and linguistically responsive services in communities in this state.
(d) Consider the needs of residents  of this state for services, supports and treatment at all ages.
(e) Consider data regarding the geographic location  and rates of overdose incidents and
deaths and the rates of crime committed by drug-dependent persons as defined in section 1
of this 2025 Act.
[(5)] (4) The [ council] commission shall require any government entity  that applies for a grant
to specify in the application details regarding subgrantees and how the  government entity will fund
[6]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
culturally specific organizations and culturally specific services. A government entity receiving a
grant must make an explicit commitment not to supplant or decrease any  existing funding used to
provide services funded by the grant.
[(6)] (5) In determining grants and funding to be  awarded, the [ council] commission may consult
the comprehensive addiction, prevention,  treatment and recovery plan established by the Alcohol
and Drug Policy Commission under ORS 430.223  and the advice of any other group, agency, organ-
ization or individual that desires to provide advice to the [ council] Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission that is consistent with the terms of this section.
[(7)] (6) Services provided by grantees, including services provided by a Behavioral Health  Re-
source Network, shall be free  of charge to the clients receiving the services. Grantees in each net-
work shall seek  reimbursement from insurance issuers, the medical assistance program or any other
third party responsible for the cost  of services provided to a client and grants and funding provided
by the  [ council or the authority ] Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  under this section may be
used for copayments,  deductibles or other out-of-pocket costs incurred by the client for the services.
[(8)] (7) Subsection [ (7)] (6) of this section  does not require the medical assistance program to
reimburse the cost of services for which another third party is responsible in violation of 42  U.S.C.
1396a(25).
SECTION 5.
 ORS 430.390 is amended to read:
430.390. (1)(a) The [ Oregon Health  Authority ] Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall adopt
rules that establish a grant application process, a process to appeal the denial of  a grant and gen-
eral criteria and requirements for the Behavioral Health  Resource Networks and the grants and
funding required by  ORS 430.389, including rules requiring recipients of grants and funding to col-
lect and report  information necessary for the Secretary of State to conduct the financial and per-
formance audits required by ORS 430.392.
[(b) When adopting or amending rules under this subsection, the authority  shall convene an advi-
sory committee in accordance with ORS 183.333 in which members of the Oversight  and Accountability
Council compose a majority of the membership. ]
(2) The [ council] commission shall have and retain the authority to  oversee the Behavioral
Health Resource Networks established under ORS 430.389  and approve the grants and funding under
ORS 430.389.
(3) The [ authority] commission shall administer and provide all necessary support to  ensure the
implementation of  ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, and that recipients of grants or funding
comply with all applicable rules regulating the provision of behavioral health services.
(4)(a) The [ authority, in consultation  with the council, ] commission  may enter into interagency
agreements to ensure proper distribution of funds for the grants required by ORS 430.389.
(b) The [ authority] commission shall encourage and take  all reasonable measures to ensure that
grant recipients cooperate, coordinate and act jointly with one another to offer the services  de-
scribed in ORS 430.389.
(c) The [ authority] commission shall post to the [ authority’s] commission’s website,  at the time
a grant or funding is awarded:
(A) The name of the recipient of the grant or funding;
(B) The names of any subgrantees or  subcontractors of the recipient of the grant or funding; and
(C) The amount of the grant or funding awarded.
[(5) The authority shall provide requested technical, logistical and other support to the  council to
assist the council with the council’s duties and obligations. ]
[7]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(6)] (5) The Department of Justice shall provide legal  services to the [ council] commission if
requested to assist the [ council] commission in carrying out the [ council’s] commission’s duties
and obligations.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 430.391 is amended to read:
430.391. (1) The [ Oregon Health  Authority ] Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  shall estab-
lish a Behavioral Health Resource Network statewide  telephone hotline to provide screenings de-
scribed in ORS 430.389 (2)(e)(A) to any caller who is a resident of this state.
(2) The telephone hotline shall be staffed 24 hours a day, seven days a  week, every calendar day
of the year.  Following a screening, at the request of a caller, the telephone hotline shall promptly
provide the verification set forth in ORS 430.389 (2)(i).
SECTION 7.  ORS 430.393 is amended to read:
430.393. No later than January 1,  2022, and at the beginning of each calendar quarter thereafter,
the [ Oregon Health  Authority ] Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall report to the Legislative
Assembly, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, how funds from the Drug Treatment and Recovery
Services Fund were spent in the preceding calendar quarter.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 430.394 is amended to read:
430.394. If approved by the [ Oversight and Accountability Council ] Oregon  Criminal Justice
Commission, the Oregon Health Authority may implement an education  campaign to inform the
public about the availability of Behavioral  Health Resource Networks, the statewide hotline de-
scribed in ORS 430.391 and any other information  the authority believes would benefit the public in
accessing behavioral health services.
SECTION 9. (1) The Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission shall conduct an analysis of the
most effective  ways to address substance abuse within this state. The analysis must include
an assessment of the  availability and funding of substance abuse treatment programs, the
identification of any gaps in current practices and identification of the best practices to fund
and support treatment services and other methods of addressing substance abuse.
(2) No later than September 15, 2026, the commission shall provide a report to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to health and the judiciary, in the manner
described in ORS 192.245, containing the findings of the commission.
(3) The commission shall provide a  copy of the report described in subsection (2) of this
section to each county.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 244.050 is amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or  before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission a verified statement of economic interest as required  under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner  of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal judges,  except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
Legislative Policy and Research Director, the  Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the House
of Representatives and the Legislative Equity Officer.
[8]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) The president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public  uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) State Fire Marshal.
(EE) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) Executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
[9]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs  the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan service  district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial  officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards, commissions and councils:
(A) Governing board of the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
[10]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
[(FF) The Oversight and Accountability Council. ]
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to 777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of the  board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the district school board of a common school district or union  high school
district.
(w) Every member of the board of directors of an authority  created under ORS 465.600 to
465.621.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a board or commission  listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file with the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060,  244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By  April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate described
in subsection (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest  as
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Not later than the 40th day before the date of the statewide general election,  each candidate
described in subsection (1) of this section who will appear on the statewide  general election ballot
and who was not required to file a statement  of economic interest under subsections (1) to (3) of this
section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as required under  ORS
244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (3) of this section apply only to persons who  are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April 15.
(6) If a  statement required to be filed under this section has not been received by the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement  is due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply with  the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set by  the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 413.017 is amended to read:
413.017. (1) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall establish the committees described in sub-
sections (2) to (5) of this section.
(2)(a) The Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee shall include  individuals who purchase
health care for the following:
(A) The Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(B) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board.
(C) Trustees of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(D) A city government.
(E) A county government.
[11]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(F) A special district.
(G) Any private nonprofit organization that receives the majority of its  funding from the state
and requests to participate on the committee.
(b) The Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee shall:
(A) Identify and make specific recommendations to achieve uniformity across  all public health
benefit plan  designs based on the best available clinical evidence, recognized best practices for
health promotion and disease management, demonstrated  cost-effectiveness and shared demographics
among the enrollees within the pools covered by the benefit plans.
(B) Develop an action plan for ongoing collaboration to implement the benefit design alignment
described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and shall leverage  purchasing to achieve benefit
uniformity if practicable.
(C) Continuously review and report to the  Oregon Health Policy Board on the committee’s
progress in aligning benefits while minimizing the cost shift to individual purchasers of  insurance
without shifting costs to the private sector or the health insurance exchange.
(c) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall work with  the Public Health Benefit Purchasers
Committee to identify uniform provisions for state and  local public contracts for health benefit plans
that achieve maximum quality and  cost outcomes. The board shall collaborate with the committee
to develop steps to implement joint contract provisions. The committee shall identify  a schedule for
the implementation of contract  changes. The process for implementation of joint contract provisions
must include a review process to protect against unintended cost shifts to enrollees or agencies.
(3)(a) The Health Care Workforce Committee  shall include individuals who have the collective
expertise, knowledge and experience in a broad range  of health professions, health care education
and health care workforce development initiatives.
(b) The Health Care Workforce Committee shall coordinate efforts to recruit and  educate health
care professionals and retain a quality workforce to meet the demand that will be created  by the
expansion in health care coverage, system transformations and an increasingly diverse population.
(c) The Health Care Workforce Committee shall conduct an inventory of all  grants and other
state resources available for addressing the need to expand the health care workforce to meet the
needs of Oregonians for health care.
(4)(a) The  Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee shall include the following members appointed
by the Oregon Health Policy Board:
(A) An individual representing the Oregon Health Authority;
(B) An individual representing the Oregon Educators Benefit Board;
(C) An individual representing the Public Employees’ Benefit Board;
(D) An individual representing the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(E) Two health care providers;
(F) One individual representing hospitals;
(G) One  individual representing insurers, large employers or multiple employer welfare ar-
rangements;
(H) Two individuals representing health care consumers;
(I) Two individuals representing coordinated care organizations;
(J) One individual with expertise in health care research;
(K) One individual with expertise in health care quality measures; and
(L) One individual with expertise in mental health and addiction services.
(b) The committee shall work collaboratively with the Oregon  Educators Benefit Board, the
[12]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Public Employees’ Benefit Board, the authority and the department to  adopt health outcome and
quality measures that are focused on specific goals and provide value to the state, employers,
insurers, health care providers and consumers. The  committee shall be the single body to align
health outcome and quality measures used in this state with  the requirements of health care data
reporting to ensure that the measures and  requirements are coordinated, evidence-based and focused
on a long term statewide vision.
(c) The committee shall use a public process that includes an opportunity for public comment
to identify  health outcome and quality measures. The health outcome and quality measures identified
by the committee,  as updated by the authority under paragraph (g) of this subsection, may be applied
to services provided by  coordinated care organizations or paid for by health benefit plans sold
through the health insurance  exchange or offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board or the
Public Employees’ Benefit Board. The authority, the department, the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board and the Public Employees’ Benefit Board are not required to adopt all  of the health outcome
and quality measures identified by the committee but may not adopt any health outcome  and quality
measures that are different from the measures identified by the  committee. The measures must take
into account the health outcome and quality measures selected by  the metrics and scoring subcom-
mittee created in ORS  413.022 and the differences in the populations served by coordinated care
organizations and by commercial insurers.
(d) In identifying health  outcome and quality measures, the committee shall prioritize measures
that:
(A) Utilize existing state and  national health outcome and quality measures, including measures
adopted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid  Services, that have been adopted or endorsed
by other state or national organizations and have a relevant state or national benchmark;
(B) Given the context  in which each measure is applied, are not prone to random variations
based on the size of the denominator;
(C) Utilize existing data systems,  to the extent practicable, for reporting the measures to mini-
mize redundant reporting and undue burden on the state, health benefit plans  and health care pro-
viders;
(D) Can be meaningfully adopted for a minimum of three years;
(E) Use a common format in the collection of the data and facilitate the  public reporting of the
data; and
(F) Can be reported in  a timely manner and without significant delay so that the most current
and actionable data is available.
(e) The  committee shall evaluate on a regular and ongoing basis the health outcome and quality
measures identified under this section.
(f) The committee may convene subcommittees to focus on gaining expertise in particular  areas
such as data collection, health  care research and mental health and substance use disorders in order
to aid the committee in the  development of health outcome and quality measures. A subcommittee
may include stakeholders and  staff from the authority, the Department of Human Services, the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services, the Early Learning Council or any  other agency staff
with the appropriate expertise in the issues addressed by the subcommittee.
(g) The authority shall update annually, if necessary, the health outcome  and quality measures
identified by the committee to utilize the latest sets of core quality measures published by  the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1320b-9a and 1320b-9b.
(h) This subsection does not prevent the authority, the Department  of Consumer and Business
[13]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Services, commercial insurers, the  Public Employees’ Benefit Board or the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board from establishing programs that provide financial  incentives to providers for meeting specific
health outcome and quality measures adopted by the committee.
(5)(a) The Behavioral Health Committee shall include the following members appointed by the
Director of the Oregon Health Authority:
(A) The chairperson of the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee;
(B) The chairperson of the committee appointed by the board to address health equity, if any;
(C) A behavioral health director for a coordinated care organization;
(D) A representative of a community mental health program;
(E) An individual with expertise in data analysis;
(F) A member of the  Consumer Advisory Council, established under ORS 430.073, that represents
adults with mental illness;
(G) A representative of the System of Care Advisory Council established in ORS 418.978;
(H) A member [ of the Oversight  and Accountability Council, described in ORS 430.389, ] who re-
presents adults with addictions or co-occurring conditions;
(I) One member representing a system of care, as defined in ORS 418.976;
(J) One consumer representative;
(K) One representative of a tribal government;
(L) One representative of  an organization that advocates on behalf of individuals with intellec-
tual or developmental disabilities;
(M) One representative of providers of behavioral health services;
(N) The director of the division of the authority responsible for  behavioral health services, as
a nonvoting member;
(O) The  Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission appointed under ORS 430.220, as
a nonvoting member;
(P) The authority’s Medicaid director, as a nonvoting member;
(Q) A representative of the Department of Human Services, as a nonvoting member; and
(R) Any other member that the director deems appropriate.
(b) The board may modify the membership of the committee as needed.
(c) The division of the authority responsible  for behavioral health services and the director of
the division shall staff the committee.
(d) The committee, in collaboration with the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee, as needed,
shall:
(A) Establish quality metrics for  behavioral health services provided by coordinated care or-
ganizations, health care providers, counties and other government entities; and
(B) Establish incentives to improve the quality of behavioral health services.
(e) The quality metrics and incentives shall be designed to:
(A) Improve timely access to behavioral health care;
(B) Reduce hospitalizations;
(C) Reduce overdoses;
(D) Improve the integration of physical and behavioral health care; and
(E) Ensure individuals are supported in the  least restrictive environment that meets their be-
havioral health needs.
(6) Members of the committees described in subsections (2) to  (5) of this section who are not
members of the Oregon Health  Policy Board may receive compensation in accordance with criteria
[14]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
prescribed by the authority by rule  and shall be reimbursed from funds available to the board for
actual and necessary  travel and other expenses incurred by them by their attendance at committee
meetings, in the manner and amount provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 12.
 Section 6, chapter 63, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The Opioid Settlement Prevention, Treatment and Recovery Board  is created in the
Oregon Health Authority for the purpose of determining the  allocation of funding from the Opioid
Settlement Prevention, Treatment and Recovery Fund established in section 5 of this 2022  Act. The
board consists of:
(a) The following members appointed by the Governor:
(A) A policy advisor to the Governor;
(B) A representative of the Department of Justice;
(C) A representative of the Oregon Health Authority; and
(D) A representative of the Department of Human Services;
(b) The Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission or the director’s designee;
[(c) The chairperson of the  Oversight and Accountability Council established in ORS 430.388 or
the chairperson’s designee; ]
[(d)] (c) The following members appointed by the Governor from a list  of candidates provided
by the Association of Oregon Counties and the League  of Oregon Cities or the successor organiza-
tions to the Association of Oregon Counties and the League of Oregon Cities:
(A) An individual representing Clackamas, Washington or Multnomah County;
(B) An individual representing Clatsop, Columbia, Coos, Curry, Jackson, Josephine, Lane  or
Yamhill County;
(C) An individual representing the City of Portland;
(D) An individual representing a city with a population above 10,000 residents as of July  21,
2021;
(E) An individual representing  a city with a population at or below 10,000 residents as of July
21, 2021; and
(F) A  representative of the Oregon Coalition of Local Health Officials or its successor organ-
ization;
[(e)] (d) The following members appointed by the Governor  from a list of candidates provided
by the members described in paragraphs (a) to [ (d)] (c) of this subsection:
(A) A representative of a community mental health program;
(B) An individual  who has experienced a substance use disorder or a representative of an or-
ganization that advocates on behalf of individuals with substance use disorders; and
(C) An individual representing law enforcement, first responders or  jail commanders or wardens;
[(f)] (e) A member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker  of the House of
Representatives, who shall be a nonvoting member of the board;
[(g)] (f) A member of the Senate appointed by the President of  the Senate, who shall be a non-
voting member of the board; and
[(h)] (g) The State Court Administrator or  the administrator’s designee, who shall be a nonvot-
ing member of the board.
(2) The Governor shall select  from the members described in subsection (1)(a)[ ,] and (b) [ and
(c)] of this section one cochairperson to represent state entities, and the members described  in sub-
section [ (1)(d)] (1)(c) of this section shall select from one of their  members a cochairperson to rep-
resent cities or counties.
[15]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The term of each member of the board who is not an ex officio  member is four years, but a
member serves at  the pleasure of the appointing authority. Before the expiration of a member’s term,
the appointing authority shall appoint a successor whose term begins on  January 1 next following.
A member is eligible for reappointment. If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority
shall make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) Decision-making by the board shall be based on consensus and supported by  at least a ma-
jority of the members. The board shall document all objections to board decisions.
(5) The board shall conduct at least four public meetings in accordance with ORS  192.610 to
192.690 [series became  192.610 to 192.705], which shall be publicized to facilitate attendance at the
meetings and during which the board shall receive  testimony and input from the community. The
board shall  also establish a process for the public to provide written comments and proposals at
each meeting of the board.
(6) In determining the allocation of moneys from the Opioid Settlement  Prevention, Treatment
and Recovery Fund:
(a) No more than five  percent of the moneys may be spent on administering the board and the
fund.
(b) A portion of the moneys shall be  allocated toward a unified and evidence-based state system
for collecting, analyzing and publishing data about the  availability and efficacy of substance use
prevention, treatment and recovery services statewide.
(c) Moneys remaining after allocations in accordance  with paragraphs (a) and (b) of this sub-
section shall be allocated for funding statewide and regional programs  identified in the Distributor
Settlement Agreement, the Janssen Settlement Agreement and any other  judgment or settlement
described in section 5 (1)(c) [ of this  2022 Act ], chapter 63, Oregon Laws 2022, including but not
limited to:
(A) Programs that  use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to treat opioid use disor-
ders and any co-occurring substance use disorders or mental health conditions;
(B) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed  strategies to support individuals in
recovery from opioid use disorders and  any co-occurring substance use disorders or mental health
conditions;
(C) Programs that use  evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to provide connections to
care for individuals who have or are at risk of developing opioid use disorders and any co-occurring
substance use disorders or mental health conditions;
(D) Programs that  use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to address the needs of
individuals with opioid use disorders and  any co-occurring substance use disorders or mental health
conditions and who are involved in, at risk of becoming involved in, or in transition from, the
criminal justice system;
(E) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to address the needs of
pregnant or parenting women with opioid use disorders and any co-occurring substance  use disor-
ders or mental health conditions, and the  needs of their families, including babies with neonatal
abstinence syndrome;
(F) Programs that use  evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to support efforts to pre-
vent over-prescribing of opioids and ensure appropriate prescribing and dispensing of opioids;
(G) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies  to support efforts to dis-
courage or prevent misuse of opioids;
(H) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to support efforts  to pre-
[16]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vent or reduce overdose deaths or other opioid-related harms;
(I) Programs to educate law enforcement  or other first responders regarding appropriate prac-
tices and precautions when dealing with users of fentanyl or other opioids;
(J) Programs to provide wellness and support services for first responders and  others who ex-
perience secondary trauma associated with opioid-related emergency events;
(K) Programs  to support efforts to provide leadership, planning, coordination, facilitation,
training and technical assistance to abate the opioid epidemic through activities, programs or
strategies; or
(L) Funding to support opioid abatement research.
(d) The board shall be guided and informed by:
(A) The comprehensive addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan developed  by the
Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission in accordance with ORS 430.223;
(B) The board’s ongoing evaluation of the efficacy of the funding allocations;
(C) Evidence-based and evidence-informed strategies and best practices;
(D) Input the board receives from the public;
(E) Equity considerations for underserved populations; and
(F) The terms of the settlement agreements.
(7) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff support to the board.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 430.383 is amended to read:
430.383. (1)(a) The people of  Oregon find that drug addiction and overdoses are a serious prob-
lem in Oregon and that Oregon needs to expand access to drug treatment.
(b) The people of Oregon further find that a health-based  approach to addiction and overdose is
[more] effective, humane and cost-effective [ than criminal punishments. Making people  criminals be-
cause they suffer from addiction is expensive, ruins lives and can make access to treatment  and recov-
ery more difficult ].
(2)(a) The purpose of the Drug Addiction Treatment and Recovery Act of 2020 , as amended,  is
to make screening, health  assessment, treatment and recovery services for drug addiction available
to all those who need and want access to  those services and to [ adopt a health approach ] enhance
assessment, treatment and recovery services  to address drug addiction [ by removing criminal
penalties for low-level drug possession ].
(b) It is the policy of the State of Oregon:
(A) That screening, health assessment,  treatment and recovery services for drug addiction are
available to all those who need and want access to those services; and
(B) To encourage treatment and recovery for people struggling with substance use.
(3) The provisions of ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 shall be interpreted consistently  with
the findings, purposes and policy objectives stated in this section and shall not be limited by  any
policy set forth in Oregon law that could conflict with or be interpreted to conflict with the  pur-
poses and policy objectives stated in this section.
(4) As used in ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, “recovery” means a process of change
through which individuals improve their health and wellness, live a self-directed life  and strive to
reach their full potential.
SECTION 14.
ORS 430.388 and section 6, chapter 248, Oregon Laws 2023, are repealed.
SECTION 15.  Section 76, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024 is amended to read:
Sec. 76.  (1) As used in this section, “deflection program” means  a collaborative program be-
tween law enforcement agencies  and behavioral health entities that assists individuals who may
[17]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
have substance use disorder,  another behavioral health disorder or co-occurring disorders, to create
community-based pathways to treatment, recovery support services, housing, case  management or
other services.
(2) The Oregon Behavioral Health  Deflection Program is established within the Improving
People’s Access to Community-based Treatment,  Supports and Services Grant Review Committee
established under ORS 430.234. The  program consists of grants awarded by the committee , after
review by the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission,  to counties and federally recognized tribal
governments to fund deflection programs.
(3)(a) The purpose of the program described in this section is to:
(A) Address the need for more deflection programs to assist individuals whose behavioral health
conditions, including substance use disorder, lead to interactions with  law enforcement,
incarceration, conviction and other engagement with the criminal justice system.
(B) Track and report data  concerning deflection program outcomes in order to determine the
best practices for deflection programs within this state.
(b) ORS 430.230 to 430.236 do not apply to the program described in this section.
(4)(a) The  committee shall develop a grant application process for awarding grants under this
section.
(b) An application for a grant under this section may be submitted by a county or the designee
of a county, or by a tribal government or designee  of a tribal government. Only one application per
county may be submitted, but the application may request funding  multiple programs within a
county.
(c) Prior to submitting an  application for a grant under this section, the applicant shall coordi-
nate with all partners of the development and administration of the proposed deflection program  to
ensure that the partners have  the resources necessary to implement the deflection program. The
partners shall include at least a  district attorney, a law enforcement agency, a community mental
health program established under ORS 430.620 and a provider from a Behavioral  Health Resource
Network established under ORS 430.389. Partners may also include a treatment  provider, a local
mental health authority, a tribal government, a peer support organization, a court or a local  gov-
ernment body.
(d) An application for a grant under this section must contain:
(A) A description of  the coordination with program partners required by paragraph (c) of this
subsection that has occurred;
(B) A description of the individuals who would be eligible for the program and what qualifies
as a successful outcome, formulated in cooperation with the program partners  described in para-
graph (c) of this subsection;
(C) A  description of how the program for which the applicant is seeking funding is culturally
and linguistically responsive, trauma-informed and evidence-based;
(D) A description of  a plan to address language access barriers when communicating program
referral options and program procedures to non-English speaking individuals; and
(E) A description of how  the program coordinator will communicate with program partners
concerning persons participating in the program  and any other matter necessary for the adminis-
tration of the program.
(5) To be eligible for funding under this section, a deflection program:
(a) Must be coordinated by or in consultation with a  community mental health program, a local
mental health authority or a federally recognized tribal government;
[18]
SB 881
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
(b) Must have a coordinator with the following program coordinator duties:
(A) Convening deflection program partners as needed for the operation of the program;
(B) Managing grant program funds awarded under this section; and
(C) Tracking  and reporting data required by the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission under
section 37 , chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024  [ of this 2024 Act ];
(c) Must involve the partners described in subsection (4)(c) of this section; and
(d) May involve a partnership with one or more of the following entities:
(A) A first responder agency other than a law enforcement agency;
(B) A community provider;
(C) A treatment provider;
(D) A community-based organization;
(E) A case management provider;
(F) A recovery support services provider; or
(G) Any other individual  or entity deemed necessary by the program coordinator to carry out
the purposes of the deflection program, including individuals  with lived experience with substance
use disorder, a behavioral health disorder or co-occurring disorders.
(6) During a grant application period established by the committee[ ,]:
(a) The committee shall make recommendations to the  commission about which grant
applications should be approved;
(b) The commission shall review the committee’s recommendations  and make the final
determination of which grant applications to approve; and
(c) The maximum proportion of grant funds available to an  applicant shall be determined as
follows:
[(a)] (A) The proportion of grant funds  available to an applicant other than a tribal government
shall be determined [ based on  the county formula share employed by the Oversight and Accountability
Council established under ORS 430.388 ] by the commission by rule in a manner that ensures
that each region of the state receives funding in equitable proportion to the region’s  need ,
but an applicant may not receive less than $150,000.
[(b)] (B) The [ committee] commission shall determine the proportion of funds available  to an
applicant that is a federally recognized tribal government.
(7)(a) Grant funds awarded under this section may be used for:
(A) Deflection program expenses including but not limited  to law enforcement employees, deputy
district attorneys and behavioral health treatment workers, including peer navigators  and mobile
crisis and support services workers.
(B) Behavioral health workforce development.
(C) Capital construction of behavioral health treatment infrastructure.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the committee may award planning grants
for the development of deflection programs.
(c) The committee may allocate up to three percent of program funds  to support grantee data
collection and analysis or evaluation of outcome measures.
(8) The [ Oregon Criminal Justice ] commission shall provide staff support to the grant program.
(9) The committee  and the commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this sec-
tion.
[19]