Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 197.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “County with  no population growth” means a county with a population of less than
50,000 that did not experience population growth between the 2000 and  2010 federal decennial
censuses.
(b) “Exception” has the meaning given that term in ORS 197.732.
(c) “High-value farmland” means a lot or parcel in an exclusive farm use zone that is:
(A) Composed predominantly of Class I, Class  II, prime or unique soil, as determined by
the United States Department of Agriculture Natural Resources Conservation Service; or
(B) Used for the commercial production of seed crops,  berries, fruits or nuts intended for
human consumption, as demonstrated by the  most recent aerial photography taken prior to
December 31, 2018, by the United States Department of Agriculture Aerial  Photography Field
Office.
(2) Except as provided in this section, a county with no population growth or a city within
a county with no population growth may adopt an exception to  any statewide land use plan-
ning goal under ORS 197.732 to:
(a) Create opportunities for business development in urban or rural areas;
(b) Retain and facilitate expansion of existing urban or rural businesses; or
(c) Provide increased urban or rural housing opportunities.
(3) A county with no population  growth or a city within a county with no population
growth that adopts an exception under this section shall submit written notice to the Land
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2244
SB 350
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Conservation and  Development Commission within 30 days after the exception is adopted.
The notice must:
(a) State that the county or the city has adopted  an exception to a statewide land use
planning goal under ORS 197.732 for a purpose described in subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Identify the statewide land use planning goal to which the exception was adopted; and
(c) Identify the land to which the exception applies.
(4)(a) The commission shall review and approve a proposed exception  described in sub-
section (2)  of this section within 60 days of receiving a complete notice described in sub-
section (3) of this section.
(b) If the commission determines that the notice is not complete,  the commission shall,
within 60 days of receiving the notice, approve the proposed  exception on the condition that
the approval takes effect on the date the commission  receives the information necessary to
complete the notice.
(5) The commission may adopt  or enforce rules necessary to fulfill the requirements of
this section, provided the rules do not have the effect, either in  themselves or cumulatively,
of:
(a) Limiting the statewide land use planning goals to which  a county with no population
growth or a city within a county with no population growth may adopt an exception.
(b) Limiting the purposes for which a county with no population growth  or a city within
a county with no population growth may adopt an exception.
(c) Establishing or implementing additional requirements or discretionary  standards or
criteria for the approval of a proposed exception adopted by a  county with no population
growth or a city within a county with no population growth.
(6) A county with no population  growth or a city within a county with no population
growth may not adopt an exception to a statewide land use planning goal:
(a) Relating to natural resources that was adopted for the purpose  of implementing the
Oregon Sage-Grouse Action Plan and Executive Order adopted on September 16, 2015.
(b) Relating to agriculture, for land that is high-value farmland.
(7)(a) A person that is  adversely affected by the adoption of an exception by a county
with no population growth or a city within a county with  no population growth under this
section may obtain judicial review of the exception under ORS 34.010 to 34.100. A judicial
review described in this subsection is final and not subject to further appeal.
(b) A person is  adversely affected under paragraph (a) of this subsection if the adoption
of the exception impinges on the person’s use or enjoyment of land owned by the person.
(8)(a) If a county with no population growth  or a city within a county with no population
growth adopts an exception to a statewide land use planning goal under subsection  (2) of this
section, and the county or the city subsequently experiences population growth  of four per-
cent or  more or of 1,000 or more residents, whichever is greater, between two consecutive
federal decennial censuses, the county or the city:
(A) May continue to operate under an exception  adopted and approved under this section.
(B) May not adopt further exceptions under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) A county or a city described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection requalifies to adopt
an exception under subsection (2) of this  section if the county or the city subsequently ex-
periences no population growth between two consecutive federal decennial censuses.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall monitor the adoption
[2]
SB 350
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of exceptions to statewide land use planning goals under section 2 of this  2019 Act and shall
submit a report on the implementation and effects of section 2 of this 2019 Act to an appro-
priate interim committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 197.610 is amended to read:
197.610. (1) Before a local government adopts a change, including additions and  deletions, to an
acknowledged comprehensive plan or a land use regulation,  the local government shall submit the
proposed change to the Director of the Department of Land  Conservation and Development. The
Land Conservation and Development Commission shall specify, by rule, the  deadline for submitting
proposed changes, but in all cases the proposed  change must be submitted at least 20 days before
the local  government holds the first evidentiary hearing on adoption of the proposed change. The
commission may not require a local government to submit the proposed change more than 35 days
before the first evidentiary hearing.
(2) If a local government determines that emergency  circumstances beyond the control of the
local government require expedited review, the local  government shall submit the proposed changes
as soon as practicable, but may submit the proposed changes after the applicable deadline.
(3) Submission of the proposed change must include all of the following materials:
(a) The text of the proposed change to the comprehensive plan or land use regulation imple-
menting the plan;
(b) If a comprehensive  plan map or zoning map is created or altered by the proposed change, a
copy of the map that is created or altered;
(c) A brief narrative  summary of the proposed change and any supplemental information that the
local government believes  may be useful to inform the director or members of the public of the effect
of the proposed change;
(d) The date set for the first evidentiary hearing;
(e) The form of notice or a  draft of the notice to be provided under ORS 197.763, if applicable;
and
(f) Any staff report on the proposed change or information  describing when the staff report will
be available, and how a copy of the staff report can be obtained.
(4) The director shall cause notice of the proposed change  to the acknowledged comprehensive
plan or the land use regulation to be provided to:
(a) Persons that have requested notice  of changes to the acknowledged comprehensive plan of
the particular local government, using electronic mail, electronic bulletin  board, electronic mailing
list server or similar electronic method; and
(b) Persons that are generally  interested in changes to acknowledged comprehensive plans, by
posting notices periodically on a public website using the Internet or a similar electronic method.
[(5) When  a local government determines that the land use statutes, statewide land use planning
goals and administrative rules of the commission that  implement either the statutes or the goals do not
apply to a proposed  change to the acknowledged comprehensive plan and the land use regulations,
submission of the proposed change under this section is not required. ]
(5) A local government is  not required to submit the proposed change to an acknowledged
comprehensive plan or land use regulation under this section if:
(a) The local government determines that the land use statutes, statewide land use
planning goals and administrative rules of the commission  that implement either the stat-
utes or the goals do not apply to a proposed change to the acknowledged comprehensive plan
and the land use regulations; or
[3]
SB 350
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The proposed change is the result  of an exception to a statewide land use planning
goal adopted by a city or a county under section 2 of this 2019 Act.
(6) If, after submitting the materials described in  subsection (3) of this section, the proposed
change is altered to such an  extent that the materials submitted no longer reasonably describe the
proposed change, the  local government must notify the Department of Land Conservation and De-
velopment of the alterations to the proposed change and provide a summary of the alterations along
with any alterations to the proposed text or map to the director at least 10 days before the  final
evidentiary hearing on the proposal. The director shall cause notice of the  alterations to be given
in the manner described in subsection (4) of this section. Circumstances requiring  resubmission of
a proposed change may include, but are not limited to, a change in the principal uses allowed under
the proposed  change or a significant change in the location at which the principal uses would be
allowed, limited or prohibited.
(7) When the  director determines that a proposed change to an acknowledged comprehensive
plan or a land use regulation may not be in compliance with land use statutes or the statewide land
use planning goals, including administrative rules implementing  either the statutes or the goals, the
department shall notify the local government of  the concerns at least 15 days before the final
evidentiary hearing, unless there is only one hearing or the proposed change has been modified to
the extent that resubmission is required under subsection (6) of this section.
(8) Notwithstanding  subsection (7) of this section, the department may provide advisory recom-
mendations to the local government concerning  the proposed change to the acknowledged compre-
hensive plan or land use regulation.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 197.650 is amended to read:
197.650. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) A Land Conservation and  Development Commission final order issued pursuant to ORS
197.180, 197.251, 197.626, 197.628 to 197.651, 197.652 to 197.658, 197.659, 215.780 or 215.788 to 215.794
may be appealed to the Court of Appeals by persons who participated in  proceedings, if any, that
led to issuance of the final order being appealed.
[(2)] (b)  Jurisdiction for judicial  review of a final order [ of the commission issued pursuant to
ORS 197.180, 197.251, 197.626, 197.628 to 197.651,  197.652 to 197.658, 197.659, 215.780 or 215.788 to
215.794] described in paragraph (a) of this subsection  is conferred upon the Court of Appeals.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, any portion of a  final order by the
commission that pertains to an exception to a statewide land use  planning goal adopted un-
der section 2 of this 2019 Act may not be appealed to the Court of Appeals.
(b) This section does not confer jurisdiction for  judicial review of any portion of a final
order described in paragraph (a) of this subsection on the Court of Appeals.
SECTION 6.  ORS 197.732 is amended to read:
197.732. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Compatible” is not intended as an absolute term meaning no interference or adverse impacts
of any type with adjacent uses.
(b) “Exception” means a comprehensive plan provision, including an amendment to an acknowl-
edged comprehensive plan, that:
(A) Is applicable to specific properties or situations  and does not establish a planning or zoning
policy of general applicability;
(B) Does not comply with some  or all goal requirements applicable to the subject properties or
situations; and
[4]
SB 350
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Complies with standards under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A local government may adopt an exception to a goal if:
(a) The land subject to the exception is physically developed to the extent that it is no longer
available for uses allowed by the applicable goal;
(b) The land subject to the exception is irrevocably committed as  described by Land Conserva-
tion and Development Commission rule to uses not allowed  by the applicable goal because existing
adjacent uses and other relevant factors make uses allowed by  the applicable goal impracticable;
[or]
(c) The following standards are met:
(A) Reasons justify why the state policy embodied in the applicable goals should not apply;
(B) Areas that do not require a new exception cannot reasonably accommodate the use;
(C) The long term environmental, economic, social and energy  consequences resulting from the
use at the proposed site with measures  designed to reduce adverse impacts are not significantly
more adverse than would typically result from the same proposal being  located in areas requiring
a goal exception other than the proposed site; and
(D) The  proposed uses are compatible with other adjacent uses or will be so rendered through
measures designed to reduce adverse impacts[ .]; or
(d) The requirements of section 2 of this 2019 Act are met.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules establishing:
(a) That an exception may be adopted to allow a use authorized by  a statewide planning goal
that cannot comply with the approval standards for that type of use;
(b) Under what circumstances particular reasons may or may  not be used to justify an exception
under subsection (2)(c)(A) of this section; and
(c) Which uses allowed by the applicable goal must be found impracticable under subsection  (2)
of this section.
(4) A local government approving  or denying a proposed exception shall set forth findings of fact
and a statement of reasons that demonstrate that  the standards of subsection (2) of this section have
or have not been met.
(5) Each notice of a public hearing on a proposed exception shall specifically  note that a goal
exception is proposed and shall summarize the issues in an understandable manner.
(6) Upon review of a decision approving or denying an exception:
(a) The Land Use Board of Appeals or the commission shall be bound by any  finding of fact for
which there is substantial  evidence in the record of the local government proceedings resulting in
approval or denial of the exception;
(b) The board upon petition, or the commission, shall determine whether  the local government’s
findings and reasons demonstrate that the standards of subsection (2) of  this section have or have
not been met; and
(c) The board or commission  shall adopt a clear statement of reasons that sets forth the basis
for the  determination that the standards of subsection (2) of this section have or have not been met.
(7) The commission shall by rule establish the standards required to justify an exception  to the
definition of “needed housing” authorized by ORS 197.303.
(8) An exception acknowledged  under ORS 197.251, 197.625 or 197.630 (1) (1981 Replacement
Part) on or before August 9, 1983, continues to be valid and is not subject to this section.
(9) Subsections (3) to (8) of this section do not apply to an exception adopted by  a city
or a county under section 2 of this 2019 Act.
[5]
SB 350
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 7.  ORS 197.736 is amended to read:
197.736. The Land Conservation and Development Commission shall  amend goals, in accordance
with ORS 197.240 and 197.245, and  amend and adopt rules and guidelines, as necessary, to implement
the provisions of this section and ORS 197.340 and 197.732  and section 2 of this 2019 Act .
SECTION 8.  ORS 34.020 is amended to read:
34.020. (1) [ Except for a  proceeding resulting in a land use decision or limited land use decision
as defined in ORS 197.015, for which review is provided in ORS 197.830 to 197.845,  or an expedited
land division as described in ORS 197.360, for which  review is provided in ORS 197.375 (8) ] Except
as provided in subsection (3) of this section , any party to any process or proceeding before or
by any inferior court, officer, or tribunal may have the decision or determination thereof  reviewed
for errors, as provided in ORS 34.010 to 34.100, and not otherwise.
(2) Upon a  review, the court may review any intermediate order involving the merits and nec-
essarily affecting the decision or determination sought to be reviewed.
(3) A writ of review provided in ORS 34.010 to 34.100 is not available for:
(a) Except as provided in section 2 of this 2019  Act, a proceeding resulting in a land use
decision or limited land use decision  as defined in ORS 197.015, for which review is provided
in ORS 197.830 to 197.845; or
(b) An expedited land division as described in ORS  197.360, for which review is provided
in ORS 197.375 (8).
SECTION 9.
(1) The Business and  Housing Opportunities Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the Business and
Housing Opportunities Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Business and Housing Opportunities Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys deposited pursuant to this section;
(b) Amounts donated to the fund;
(c) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by  the Legislative As-
sembly;
(d) Investment earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(e) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department for the purposes described in section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(4) The  department may establish accounts and subaccounts within the fund when the
department determines that accounts or subaccounts are necessary or desirable and may
credit any interest or income derived from moneys in the fund to any account  or subaccount
in the fund.
(5) The department may use moneys in the fund to pay the staffing expenses of  the de-
partment and the administrative costs associated with the  fund and with making grants,
loans and other distributions of moneys from the fund.
SECTION 10.
In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $______, to be deposited in the Business  and
Housing Opportunities Fund established in section 9 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 11. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[6]
SB 350
1
[7]