Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 456.548
to 456.725.
SECTION 2. (1) The emergency veterans housing program is established within the
Housing and Community Services Department.
(2) Under the program, the department, in  coordination with the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs and  the advisory board described in section 3 of this 2025 Act, shall award
grants to a qualified housing sponsor to pay for the project costs of developing  and operating
a residential housing development for persons of lower income, and their families, who:
(a) Are veterans;
(b) Have a United States Department of Veterans Affairs disability rating of at  least zero
percent as a result of an injury or illness that was incurred  or aggravated during active
military service; and
(c) Received a discharge or release under other than dishonorable conditions.
(3) Grants awarded under this section:
(a) May be used to develop housing only within a city with  a population of at least 5,000
and not more than 55,000.
(b) Must be in amounts of at least $2 million and not more than $10 million.
(c) Must be approved by the advisory board.
SECTION 3.
(1) In developing the grant application for the  emergency veterans housing
program described in section 2 of this 2025 Act and in scoring and awarding  grants, the
Housing and Community Services Department shall consult with an advisory board.
(2) The advisory board consists of five individuals, appointed as follows:
(a) The Director of Veterans’ Affairs shall appoint:
(A) One person to represent the Department of Veterans’ Affairs; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3299
HB 2654
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
(B) One person to represent the disabled veterans community.
(b) The Director of the Housing and Community Services Department shall appoint:
(A) One member to represent the Housing and Community Services Department;
(B) One member to represent the housing construction industry; and
(C) One person to represent the housing rental industry.
(3) The Housing and Community Services Department shall staff the meetings of the
advisory board. The advisory board shall meet at times established by the department.
(4) Members of the  advisory board are not entitled to compensation for service as a
member.
(5) If there is a vacancy on the advisory board for any cause,  the appointing authority
shall appoint a replacement.
(6) A majority of the members of the advisory board constitutes a quorum.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $75,000,000, for the purposes of carrying out
sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2030.
[2]