Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used  in this section, “rural’ means any area in this state that is
outside:
(a) The acknowledged urban growth boundaries of  all cities with a population greater
than 50,000; and
(b) Any urbanized area contiguous to a city described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) The Oregon Tourism  Commission shall establish and administer a grant program to
promote, develop and sustain opportunities for agricultural tourism in rural communities.
(3) In implementing the  grant program, the commission shall use the moneys distributed
to it under section 2 of this 2023 Act:
(a) To fund grants to qualifying individuals or  entities providing or seeking to provide
agricultural tourism in rural communities in this state;
(b) To educate, train and support individuals or  entities providing or seeking to provide
opportunities for agricultural tourism in rural communities in this state; and
(c) To foster, develop and publicize opportunities for  agricultural tourism in rural com-
munities in this state.
(4) The commission shall adopt rules  necessary to administer the grant program estab-
lished under this section, including rules establishing:
(a) The forms, timelines and procedures for submitting a grant application;
(b) The eligibility requirements for receiving a grant; and
(c) The standard for determining the monetary amount to be  awarded to a grant recipi-
ent.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for  distribution to the Oregon
Tourism Commission for the purpose of  carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2023
Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3618