Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Water Resources Department,  for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,300,000 for water  resources
data collection and monitoring, which may be expended as follows:
(1) $800,000 for ground water investigations;
(2) $450,000 for ground water monitoring;
(3) $300,000 for gaging stations;
(4) $300,000 for water use management cost share funds;
(5) $100,000 for evapotranspiration monitoring and studies;
(6) $100,000 for AgriMet; and
(7) $250,000 for contract funding for facilitation and public engagement  in water-related
monitoring, studies,  investigations and efforts related to the development of ground water
budgets described in section 1, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4113