Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of  Justice may not enter into an agreement on behalf of
the state settling any civil or criminal action that provides for settlement payments  owing
to the state to be paid to any third party that is not a party to the action.  All settlement
payments paid to the state must be deposited in the General Fund.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2017  Act applies only to agreements entered into on or after
the effective date of this 2017 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1827