Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “education governing body” means:
(a) The board of directors of a school district;
(b) The board of directors of an education service district; or
(c) The governing body of a public charter school.
(2) A person  who is a member of an education governing body must comply with training
standards prescribed by the State Board of Education as provided by this section.
(3) The State Board of  Education shall establish and maintain training standards for
persons who are members of education governing bodies. The  standards must comply with
the provisions of this section and must include:
(a) Qualifications for providers of training;
(b) Any exceptions of or modifications  to the frequency of the training, as prescribed by
subsection (5) of this section,  for a person who is a member of more than one education
governing body; and
(c) Reporting requirements for indicating compliance with the provisions of this section.
(4) Training required under this section must include the following topics:
(a) Oregon government ethics laws, including filing requirements under ORS 244.050;
(b) Restrictions on political activity that apply to public officials;
(c) Oregon public records laws;
(d) Oregon public meetings laws;
(e) Applicable budgeting laws and requirements, including the Local Budget  Law of ORS
294.305 to 294.565;
(f) Roles and responsibilities related to  being a mandatory reporter of child abuse under
ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050;
(g) Prohibitions against discrimination, including requirements  for compliance with ORS
659.850; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2136
HB 2518
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
(h) Federal education law, including:
(A) The Individuals with Disabilities Education Act;
(B) Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965;
(C) Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964;
(D) Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972; and
(E) Section 504 of the  Rehabilitation Act of 1973 and relevant parts of the Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990.
(5) Training required under this section for a person elected or appointed  to a position
as a member of an education governing body must be completed as follows:
(a) A person’s initial training:
(A) May occur before the beginning of the person’s term of office; and
(B) Must occur no later than 90 days after the beginning of the person’s term of office.
(b) A  member who has completed the initial training must complete subsequent training
at least once every four calendar years.
(6) Training required under this section may be provided in person or online.
(7) To assist persons who are members of education governing bodies to  comply with this
section, the Department of Education shall:
(a) Identify or create training materials, maintain the materials and make the materials
available for training; and
(b) Establish and maintain a list of training providers approved by the department as
complying with the qualifications established by the State Board of Education.
SECTION 2.
(1) The training requirements of section 1  of this 2025 Act apply to persons
who are elected or appointed to an education governing body on or after May 1, 2026.
(2) Persons who were elected or appointed to an education governing body prior to  May
1, 2026:
(a) May choose to receive training described  in section 1 of this 2025 Act at any time
during the remainder of the person’s term; and
(b) Must comply with the training requirements of section  1 of this 2025 Act if the person
is elected or appointed on or after May 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. No later than May 1, 2026:
(1) The State Board of Education shall establish the standards prescribed by  section 1
of this 2025 Act.
(2) The Department of Education shall comply with the requirements prescribed  by sec-
tion 1 (7) of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]