Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The Forestland  Fire Compensation Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Forestland Fire
Compensation Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously ap-
propriated to the State Forestry Department for the  purpose of carrying out section 2 of this
2017 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Commercial forestland” and “landowner” have the  meanings given those terms in
ORS 526.455.
(b) “Salvage value” means the monetary amount, after deduction of sales costs, realizable
from selling harvested trees killed or damaged from a fire.
(c) “State forestland” means lands acquired under ORS 530.010 to 530.040.
(2) If a fire originates  on state forestland, with or without fault on the part of the state
or officers, employees or agents of the state, and the fire spreads  to commercial forestland,
the landowner may apply to the State  Forestry Department for the payment of compensation
for any resulting fire damage to timber on  the commercial forestland. An application filed
by a landowner under this section must be in a form approved  by the department and con-
tain:
(a) Information identifying the landowner and means for contacting the landowner;
(b) Information identifying the commercial forestland;
(c) Information regarding the fire, including but not limited to the date  the fire spread
to the commercial forestland;
(d) Information regarding the timber killed or damaged by  the fire, including but not
limited to volume, species, fair market value in undamaged condition and salvage value; and
(e) Any other information required by the department by rule.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, if  a claim qualifies for payment
under this section, the  department shall pay the landowner an amount from the Forestland
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2989
SB 698
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
Fire Compensation Fund equal to  percent of the difference between the fair market
value of the timber in undamaged condition and the salvage  value for the timber and 
percent of the estimated cost of reforestation as determined by the department.
(4) If payment in full  of pending claims under this section would exceed the amount
available for payment from the Forestland Fire Compensation  Fund, the department may
make an appropriate pro  rata reduction in the amount paid under this section for the pend-
ing claims.
(5) If a landowner accepts a payment by the  department under this section, the payment
constitutes liquidated damages for any claim that the landowner  might assert against the
state or officers, employees or agents of the state for injury or  loss to forest resources, and
for reforestation costs, on the commercial forestland  arising out of the fire. Payment by the
department under this section does not entitle the state to any  proceeds that the landowner
may recover in an action against a third party.
(6) A claim by a landowner does not qualify for payment under this section if the  fire
spreading from state forestland originated due to an unlawful act by the landowner  or an
employee or agent of the landowner acting within the scope of the employment or agency.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2017 Act applies to damage from fires that first spread to
commercial forestland on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[2]