Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Justice shall study  squatting and shall submit a report
in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations  for legislation,
to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to housing no later than
September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1761