Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall  study and make recommen-
dations regarding improvements to the operations of the department.
(2) The department shall submit a report on its  findings to an appropriate committee of
the Legislative Assembly no later than January 1, 2023.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2396