Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 7, chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  Sections 2 and 4 [ of this 2022 Act ], chapter 43, Oregon Laws  2022, are repealed on
[July 1, 2025 ] September 30, 2025 .
SECTION 2.  Section 8, chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) On [ July 1, 2025 ] September 30, 2025 , the School  Stabilization Subaccount for
Wildfire-impacted School Districts established under section 4 [ of this 2022 Act ], chapter 43, Oregon
Laws 2022, is abolished.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the School Stabilization Subaccount  for Wildfire-impacted School
Districts on [ July 1, 2025 ] September 30, 2025 , shall  be transferred to the Statewide Education In-
itiatives  Account.
SECTION 3. From the amounts retained in the  Fund for Student Success as described in
ORS 327.001 (4)(b), the Department of Education shall transfer $6,100,000 to the School Sta-
bilization Subaccount for Wildfire-impacted School Districts established  under section 4,
chapter 43, Oregon Laws  2022, for the purpose of awarding grants as provided by section 2,
chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2022.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  limitation on
expenditures established by section 7 (4), chapter 449,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limits  for payment of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds and federal funds, collected  or re-
ceived by the Department of Education for programs other  than those specified in sections
6 and 15, chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023, for all other grants, is increased by $6,100,000,  for
expenditures from the School Stabilization  Subaccount for Wildfire-impacted School Districts
established in section 4, chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2022.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 978
HB 3165
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding ORS 327.001, the amount transferred as provided by  section
3 of this  2025 Act does not apply to the percentage-based transfers of moneys requirement
described in ORS 327.001 (4)(c).
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]