Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section and ORS 805.200:
(a) “Rideshare vehicle” means a motor vehicle that is operated in affiliation  with a
transportation network company.
(b) “Transportation network company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 742.518.
(2) A person commits the offense of failure to display rideshare plates issued under  ORS
805.200 if the person operates a  taxi or a rideshare vehicle and rideshare plates are not dis-
played in the manner provided in ORS 803.540 for the display of registration plates.
(3) The requirement to display a rideshare  plate under this section begins 30 days after
the date a vehicle is first used as a taxi or rideshare vehicle.
(4) The offense described in this  section, failure to display rideshare plates, is a Class D
traffic violation.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 805.200 is amended to read:
805.200. (1) The Department of Transportation by rule:
(a) Shall design plates,  stickers, plate and sticker combinations or other devices or indicia that
distinguish government-owned vehicles  registered under the provisions of ORS 805.040 from other
vehicles.
(b) Shall provide for issuance of rideshare plates upon the request of vehicle  owners of
taxis and rideshare vehicles. The rideshare plates shall meet the requirements for registra-
tion plates described in ORS 803.535, except that the lettering and numbering  must be cherry
red in  color to distinguish taxis and rideshare vehicles from other vehicles. The fee for is-
suance of rideshare plates is provided in ORS 805.250.  When the motor vehicle is no longer
used a taxi or rideshare vehicle, the owner  shall return the plates issued under this para-
graph to the department and instead receive other registration plates.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4223
HB 3345
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
[(b)] (c)  May design plates,  stickers, plate and sticker combinations or other devices or indicia
for distinguishing vehicles registered  under specific provisions of the Oregon Vehicle Code other
than ORS 805.040, 805.105 or 805.205. Plates designed under this paragraph shall comply  with the
requirements of  ORS 803.535. The fees for plates or indicia described in this paragraph are provided
under ORS 805.250.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by statute or by rule of the department, indicia  of registration
that distinguish one kind of registration from another may not  be transferred unless the new owner
of the vehicle qualifies for that specific kind of registration.
(3) The department may adopt  rules concerning the disposition of plates, stickers, devices or
other indicia of registration upon  transfer of ownership of the vehicle or when the owner or the
vehicle is no longer eligible for the particular indicia.  The department may cancel or revoke regis-
tration for failure to comply with rules adopted under this section.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 805.250 is amended to read:
805.250. This section establishes fees for issuance of registration plates authorized under ORS
805.200. If a fee for plates authorized in ORS 805.200 is not established in this section, the fee is the
same fee as established  under ORS 803.570. Where a fee is established under this section, the fee
is in addition to the fee established under ORS 803.570 unless otherwise provided in the following:
(1) Amateur radio operator registration plates issued under ORS 805.230, $5.
(2) Customized registration plates issued under ORS 805.240:
(a) For original issuance or renewal, $50 annual fee.
(b) For issuance of a duplicate or replacement plate, $12.
(3) Special  interest registration plates approved under ORS 805.210 are approved without cost
except as provided  in this subsection, including without payment of the fee established under ORS
803.570. If identifying stickers are required, $1 per sticker or pair of stickers.
(4) Dealer plates issued under ORS 822.040 are as follows:
(a) For the original dealer plate, no fee except the fee established under ORS 803.570.
(b) For replacement dealer plates, $10 for each plate except that  persons dealing exclusively in
motorcycles, mopeds, snowmobiles or  any combination of those vehicles shall pay only $3 for each
replacement  plate.
(c) For additional plates, or  for renewal of registration, $42, except that persons dealing exclu-
sively in motorcycles, mopeds or snowmobiles or any combination  of those vehicles shall pay only
$9 for each additional plate, or for renewal of registration.
(5) Special vehicle transporter plates or devices issued under ORS 822.310, $5 for  each plate or
device.
(6) Rideshare plates issued under ORS 805.200:
(a) For original issuance or renewal, $50 annual fee.
(b) For issuance of a duplicate or replacement plate, $12.
[2]