Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Court Administrator shall study civil law and report on the results
of the study to an appropriate committee or  interim committee of the Legislative Assembly
no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1644