Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
If the Oregon Health Authority  enters into a contract with a provider of
services pursuant to ORS 161.365 and 161.370, the contract  must require the provider to
maintain professional and commercial liability insurance.
SECTION 2. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $_______, for the purpose of providing
reimbursement to local governments, community mental health  programs established under
ORS 430.620 and providers for payment of awards, settlements and expenses that:
(a) Are incurred in civil actions arising out of the provision of services pursuant  to ORS
161.365 and 161.370;
(b) Become payable on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act; and
(c) Exceed insurance coverage available to the local government,  community mental
health program or provider.
(2) The department may not pay more than $3,000,000 under this section  for the awards,
settlements or expenses incurred by any single  local government, community mental health
program or provider.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services shall collaborate with
county governments and  community mental health programs established under ORS 430.620
to study:
(a) Barriers  that prevent local governments, community mental health programs and
providers from obtaining insurance coverage  for liability arising out of the provision of ser-
vices pursuant to ORS 161.365 and 161.370.
(b) Barriers preventing the state from obtaining insurance  coverage for the liability of
local governments, community mental health programs and  providers arising out of the
provision of services pursuant to ORS 161.365 and 161.370.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4517
SB 1097
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(2)(a) No later than February 1, 2024, the department shall report to an  appropriate
committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) The report must include recommended solutions and a  timeline for how to insure
against liability arising out of the provision of services pursuant to ORS 161.365 and  161.370
for the purposes of community restoration or  to restore fitness to proceed, or other behav-
ioral health services required under a court order.
(c) The recommended solutions may include establishing an insurance  pool for counties,
community mental health programs and providers.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]