Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000 for distribution to Harney County for a  ground water
study and installation of water conservation measures.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1344