Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Human Services shall conduct a study about children and
youth with specialized needs and present the results of the study  in a report to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to human services  in the manner provided
under ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2020.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 363