Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section and section 2 of this 2025 Act:
(a) “Grant” means an agreement under which a state agency provides money, property,
a loan, a loan guarantee, a credit enhancement or other  monetary assistance or another
asset to a recipient for the purpose of initiating or supporting a program or activity on behalf
of the  state agency that the recipient carries out and in which the state agency does not
anticipate involvement other than monitoring compliance  with the conditions upon which the
state agency made the agreement.
(b) “Program year” means a calendar year  during which a program or activity that a
grant funds is active and the grant recipient is performing functions in compliance with
conditions specified for the grant.
(c) “State agency” means a  state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission
or other agency that awards a grant to a nonprofit organization to carry  out functions that
the agency specifies in a grant agreement.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services by rule shall establish  guidelines
for state agencies to follow  in designing programs and establishing budgets for ongoing or
multiyear activities that state agencies intend to fund  with grant moneys. The rules must
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2195
SB 603
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
require state agencies to:
(a) Use a request for information, market survey or other available means to obtain  an
estimate of the costs of implementing a program of services that the state agency intends
to carry out by awarding a grant to  a recipient that is capable of carrying out the program
in accordance with the state agency’s specifications;
(b) Use the estimate described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection to establish a budget
for the program the state agency intends to fund with the grant, taking into  account labor
costs that are based on a prevailing wage  standard that the Commissioner of the Bureau of
Labor and Industries establishes under section 2 of this 2025 Act for  the category and type
of work that the state agency anticipates that the program will require;
(c) Consider how best to specify the scope of work for the program based on the goals
the state agency has for the program and the  budget the state agency develops under para-
graph (b) of this subsection,  designing the specifications to effectively implement the pro-
gram within the established budget; and
(d) Assume for the purposes of specifying and budgeting  for a program in which the state
agency intends to require a grant recipient to demonstrate certain  outcomes for participants
in a program that the program:
(A) Must run for three to five years, unless  the state agency specifically denominates the
program as a pilot or demonstration program; and
(B) Will require annual adjustments for  inflation and cost-of-living allowances for em-
ployees of the grant recipient.
SECTION 2.
(1) The  Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall establish
an advisory committee for the purpose of assisting the commissioner in:
(a) Determining a prevailing rate of wage and minimum  benefits for employees of
nonprofit organizations to which state agencies award grants to implement programs on be-
half of the state agencies;
(b) Providing guidance to state agencies in calculating labor costs and wage allocations
the state agencies  can use in establishing budgets for programs and activities the state
agencies fund with grants;
(c) Delineating for the purpose of enabling the commissioner to determine an  applicable
prevailing rate of wage and minimum benefits:
(A) Categories of work based on a delineation of the skills, expertise,  education, training
or other  qualifications necessary to carry out the functions of a program or activity that a
state agency funds with a grant; and
(B) Regions or locations of the state within which different prevailing rates of wage  or
minimum benefits apply; and
(d) Calculating and publishing data that state agencies can use in making adjustments
to program and activity costs to account for inflation and cost-of-living allowances.
(2)(a) The advisory committee described in subsection (1) of  this section must be com-
posed of representatives of:
(A) Nonprofit workers;
(B) Nonprofit employers;
(C) State agencies that award grants to nonprofit organizations; and
(D) The public.
(b) The advisory committee shall  give priority to advising the commissioner concerning
[2]
SB 603
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
prevailing wage and benefit standards and work categorization that apply  to work in pro-
grams that provide human services.
(3) The  commissioner at least once each program year shall determine in consultation
with the advisory committee described in subsection (1) of this section  the prevailing rate
of wage and minimum benefits for workers  in each category of work and region that the
advisory committee establishes under subsection (1)(c) of this section and shall make  the
information available to state agencies that award grants  in each category of work and each
region and to the public. The commissioner may amend the rate at any time.
(4)(a) A  person that the commissioner or advisory committee contacts or consults for the
purpose of determining a prevailing rate of wage and  minimum benefits under subsection (3)
of this section shall cooperate with and provide to  the commissioner and the committee, on
forms the commissioner provides, the  data the commissioner or the committee requests and
shall certify the accuracy of the data.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS  192.311 to 192.478, information that a person provides to the
commissioner or the committee under paragraph (a) of this subsection  is confidential and
not available for inspection by the public.
(c) The commissioner may enter  into a contract with a public or private party to obtain
data and information the commissioner needs to determine the  prevailing rate of wage and
minimum benefits. The contract may provide for the manner and extent  of the review of
affected categories of work and for other requirements the commissioner prescribes.
SECTION 3.
(1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Commissioner of  the Bureau of Labor and Industries may adopt rules and take
any other action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section neces-
sary to  enable the commissioner, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section, to undertake and exercise all of  the duties, functions and powers conferred
on the commissioner by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]