Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for the purposes of:
(1) Not later  than September 1, 2019, awarding a grant under ORS 454.779 in an amount
of not less than $1,950,000; and
(2) Covering administrative costs necessary to implement ORS 454.779.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3555