Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 292.406 is amended to read:
292.406. (1)(a) The annual salary of the Chief Judge of the Court  of Appeals shall be $154,040 for
the period beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2020.
(b) On July 1, 2020, the annual  salary of the Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals, as adjusted
under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(c) On July 1, 2025, the  annual salary of the Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals, as ad-
justed under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $_______.
(2)(a) The annual salary of each other judge of the Court of  Appeals shall be $150,980 for the
period beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2020.
(b) On July 1, 2020, the annual salary of each  other judge of the Court of Appeals, as adjusted
under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(c) On July 1, 2025, the annual  salary of each other judge of the Court of Appeals, as
adjusted under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $_______.
SECTION 2.  ORS 292.411 is amended to read:
292.411. (1)(a) The annual salary of the  Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall be $157,076 for
the period beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2020.
(b) On July 1, 2020, the annual salary of the Chief Justice of the Supreme  Court, as adjusted
under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(c) On July  1, 2025, the annual salary of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, as ad-
justed under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $_______.
(2)(a) The annual salary of each other judge of the Supreme Court shall  be $154,040 for the pe-
riod beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2020.
(b) On July 1, 2020, the annual  salary of each other judge of the Supreme Court, as adjusted
under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(c) On July 1, 2025, the annual salary of each other judge  of the Supreme Court, as ad-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 459
SB 96
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
justed under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $_______.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 292.416 is amended to read:
292.416. (1) The annual  salary of each judge of a circuit court shall be $142,136 for the period
beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2020.
(2) On July 1, 2020, the annual salary of each judge of a circuit court, as  adjusted under ORS
292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(3) On July 1, 2025, the annual salary  of each judge of a circuit court, as adjusted under
ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $_______.
SECTION 4.  ORS 292.426 is amended to read:
292.426. (1) The annual salary of the judge of the Oregon Tax Court shall be $146,048  for the
period beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2020.
(2) On July 1, 2020, the annual salary of the judge of the  Oregon Tax Court, as adjusted under
ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(3) On July 1, 2025, the annual salary of the judge of the Oregon  Tax Court, as adjusted
under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $_______.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]