Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 289.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Facilities Authority shall provide  financing or refinancing to
local governments or housing developers  for the development of infrastructure and other
predevelopment costs, including site acquisition, planning,  reports, surveys and consultants,
to be used only for housing that will be  subject to an affordability restriction for no less than
30 years for moderate income households as described in ORS 456.270 to 456.295.
(2) The authority may not provide financing of more than $500,000 per  eligible project
under this section.
(3) Notwithstanding the definitions of “housing institution” and “project”  under ORS
289.005, the activity of the authority under this section is an eligible project, as  that term is
used in this chapter.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Facilities Authority, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $3,000,000, for deposit into the Oregon Facilities Authority Ac-
count to be used for the purposes of section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2778