Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall  implement policies and procedures
that increase the access to healthy and culturally-relevant foods for children in child care.
(2) Policies and procedures required under this section include:
(a) Increasing by 10 cents the reimbursement rate, as compared to the  federal re-
imbursement rate, for eligible meals and snacks served under the  federal Child and Adult
Care Food Program.
(b) Equalizing  the reimbursement rate for eligible meals and snacks served in family
child care homes regardless of tier  classification under the federal Child and Adult Care Food
Program.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Child and Adult Care Food Program Supplemental Fund is estab-
lished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Child and Adult Care Food Program Supplemental Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative  Assem-
bly.
(b) Amounts donated to the fund; and
(c) Other amounts deposited into the fund from any source.
(3) The Department of Education, on behalf of  the State of Oregon, may solicit and ac-
cept gifts,  grants and donations and other moneys from public and private sources for the
Child and Adult Care Food Program Supplemental  Fund. Moneys received as provided in this
subsection shall be deposited into  the Child and Adult Care Food Program Supplemental
Fund.
(4) Moneys in the Child and Adult Care Food  Program Supplemental Fund are contin-
uously appropriated to the Department of  Education for the purposes of section 1 of this 2025
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1898
HB 3201
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
Act.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $250,000, for distribution to the Oregon State
University Extension Service  for the purpose of creating culturally-specific menus for food
based on nutritional guidelines for the  Child and Adult Care Food Program and created in
collaboration with the Department of Education and local communities where the food  will
be served.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]