Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 244.060 is amended to read:
244.060. The statement of economic interest filed under ORS  244.050 shall be on a form pre-
scribed by the  Oregon Government Ethics Commission. The public official or candidate filing the
statement shall supply the information required by this section and ORS 244.090, as follows:
(1) The names of all positions as officer of a business and business directorships held  by the
public official or candidate or a member of the  household of the public official or candidate during
the preceding calendar year, and the principal address and a brief description of each business.
(2) All names under which the public official or candidate and members of the household  of the
public official or candidate do business and the principal address and a brief description of  each
business.
(3) The names, principal addresses and brief descriptions of the sources of  income received
during the preceding calendar year by the public official or candidate or a member of the household
of the public official or candidate that  produce 10 percent or more of the total annual household
income.
(4)(a) A list of all real property in which the  public official or candidate or a member of the
household of the public official or  candidate has or has had any personal, beneficial ownership in-
terest during the preceding calendar year, any options to purchase or sell real  property, including
a land sales contract, and any other rights of any kind  in real property located within the ge-
ographic boundaries of the governmental agency of which the public  official holds, or the candidate
if elected would  hold, an official position or over which the public official exercises, or the candidate
if elected would exercise, any authority.
(b) This subsection does not require the listing of the principal  residence of the public official
or candidate.
(5) All expenses with an aggregate value  exceeding $50 received by the public official during the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 36
HB 4123
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
preceding calendar year when participating  in a convention, mission, trip or other meeting described
in ORS 244.020 (7)(b)(F), including the name and address of the organization,  unit of government,
tribe or corporation paying the expenses, the nature  of the event and the date and amount of the
expense.
(6) All expenses with an aggregate value  exceeding $50 received by the public official during the
preceding calendar year when participating  in a mission, negotiations or economic development ac-
tivities described in ORS 244.020 (7)(b)(H), including the name and address of the  person paying the
expenses, the nature of the event and the date and amount of the expenditure.
(7) All honoraria and other  items allowed under ORS 244.042 with a value exceeding $15 that
are received  by the public official, candidate or member of the household of the public official or
candidate during the preceding calendar year, the provider of each honorarium or item and  the date
and time of the event for which the honorarium or item was received.
(8) The name, principal address and brief description  of each source of income exceeding an
aggregate amount of  $1,000, whether or not taxable, received by the public official or candidate, or
a member of the household of the public official or candidate, during  the preceding calendar year,
if the source of that  income is derived from an individual or business that has a legislative or ad-
ministrative interest or that has been doing business, does business or could reasonably be expected
to do business with the  governmental agency of which the public official holds, or the candidate if
elected would hold, an  official position or over which the public official exercises, or the candidate
if elected would exercise, any authority.
(9)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, the name, principal address
and brief description of each source of income received during the  preceding calendar year
by a business identified under subsection (1) of this section if:
(A) The source of income has  a legislative or administrative interest or has been doing
business, does business or could  reasonably be expected to do business with the govern-
mental agency of which the public official holds, or the candidate if elected would hold,  an
official position or over which the public official exercises, or  the candidate if elected would
exercise, any authority; and
(B) Ten percent or more of the  total gross annual income of the business identified under
subsection (1) of this section comes from the source of income.
(b)(A) This subsection does not require  the public official or candidate filing the state-
ment to supply information that the public  official or candidate has a statutory duty to keep
privileged or confidential if the public official or candidate complies with the  procedure set
forth in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.
(B) If the public official or candidate has a statutory duty to keep privileged  or confi-
dential information otherwise required to  be disclosed under this subsection, the public offi-
cial or candidate shall:
(i) Make a formal request to each source  of income for which the statutory duty exists,
asking if the public official or candidate has the permission  of the source of income to make
the disclosure required under this subsection;
(ii) File a signed statement with the commission stating that the public  official or can-
didate has made the formal request described in sub-subparagraph (i) of  this subparagraph;
and
(iii) Report each source of income that responds in the affirmative to the request made
under sub-subparagraph (i) of  this subparagraph within 10 business days of receiving the
[2]
HB 4123
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
request.
(c) A public official or candidate shall be deemed to  be in compliance with supplying the
information required under this subsection if the public official or candidate:
(A) Accurately submits the information required under this subsection; or
(B)(i) Makes a  formal request to each source of income that provided 10 percent or more
of the total gross annual income of the business identified under subsection  (1) of this sec-
tion, asking if that source of income has a legislative or administrative interest or has been
doing business, does business or could reasonably be expected to do business  with the gov-
ernmental agency of which the public official holds, or the candidate if elected would  hold,
an official position or over which the  public official exercises, or the candidate if elected
would exercise, any authority; and
(ii) Reports each source of income that responds in  the affirmative to the request made
under sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 260.409 is amended to read:
260.409. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,  a candidate or principal
campaign committee  of a candidate may not use amounts received as contributions by the candidate
or committee to make an expenditure to or on behalf of :
(a) The candidate in consideration for the rendering of professional services  by the
candidate[ .]; or
(b) A business identified on the candidate’s statement of economic interest  that is re-
quired to  be listed under ORS 244.060 (1) or (2), in consideration for the rendering of profes-
sional services by the business.
(2) The prohibition set forth in subsection (1)(b) of this section does not apply to an ex-
penditure made by the candidate or committee to:
(a) A public body;
(b) A federal agency;
(c) A public utility;
(d) A  broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine or other regularly published news pub-
lication;
(e) A telecommunications service provider; or
(f) An Internet service provider that has a market share of greater than 50 percent  in
the area in which the Internet service is purchased.
(3) The Secretary of State may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 244.060 and 260.409 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2020
Act apply to expenditures made by a candidate or principal campaign  committee of a candi-
date, and to statements of economic interest filed, on or after the effective date of  this 2020
Act.
[3]