Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Unsung Legislative Heroes Recognition Program is established.
(2) The Legislative  Assembly finds that many Oregonians volunteer behind the scenes in
numerous ways to bring meaningful  and positive change to their communities, while con-
sistently demonstrating excellence, enthusiasm, creativity, persistence  and problem-solving
skills. The Legislative  Assembly further finds that these Oregonians serve as positive role
models in their communities, promoting the spirit of community involvement  by helping
others without any intention of obtaining  personal gain, while their efforts elicit respect and
admiration. The Legislative Assembly declares that the purpose  of the Unsung Legislative
Heroes Recognition Program is to establish  an annual process to recognize these outstanding
members of their communities and their efforts, which all Oregonians benefit from.
(3) Each major-party caucus office in the Senate and in  the House of Representatives
may select up to three Oregonians that reflect the attributes  described in subsection (2) of
this section and that meet the following other requirements:
(a) The nominee may not  be paid for any of the work that is the basis for the nomination;
(b) The  nominee may not be an elected or appointed official in state government, a local
government, a local service district or a special government  body, as those terms are defined
in ORS 174.111, 174.116 and 174.117;
(c) The nominee has not been widely recognized for  performing the work that is the basis
for the nomination;
(d) The nominee must not be a lobbyist, as defined in ORS 171.725, or be employed  by a
political party that is either  a major political party under ORS 248.006 or a minor political
party under ORS 248.008, or be employed by a  political committee, as defined in ORS 260.005;
and
(e) The nominee performs the work that  is the basis for the nomination primarily within
the Senate or  House district whose member is affiliated with the caucus office that is making
the nomination.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 123
SB 1524
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(4) The President of the Senate and  the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
jointly select  up to 12 nominees made under subsection (3) of this section to be Unsung
Legislative Heroes for the year.
(5)(a) Each major-party caucus office shall make the nominations described  in subsection
(3) of this section:
(A) On or before February 1 of each even-numbered year; and
(B) On or before April 15 of each odd-numbered year.
(b) The presiding officers shall select  Unsung Legislative Heroes for the year on or before
the earlier of:
(A) In  the case of an even-numbered year, March 1 or the adjournment sine die of the
even-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly; and
(B) In the case of an odd-numbered year, June 30 or the adjournment  sine die of the
odd-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) As used in  this section, “major-party caucus office” means a caucus office whose
members are affiliated with a major political party under ORS 248.006.
[2]