Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 181A.250 is amended to read:
181A.250. (1) [No law enforcement agency, as defined in  ORS 181A.010, may ] Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, a  public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, may not  collect or
maintain information about the political, religious or social views, associations or activities of  any
individual, group, association, organization, corporation, business or  partnership [ unless such ]
without the consent of the subject of the information.
(2) A law enforcement agency, as defined in ORS 181A.010, may  collect or maintain the
information described in subsection (1)  of this section without the consent of the subject of
the information if the  information directly relates to an investigation of criminal activities, and
there are reasonable grounds to suspect the subject of the  information is or may be involved in
criminal conduct.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 892