Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department  of Environmental Quality shall provide loans, out of the
Electric Bus Bond Fund established under section 4 of  this 2021 Act, to qualified recipients
for the payment of costs related to:
(a) Purchase of electric buses; or
(b) Installation of electric charging infrastructure for electric bus fleets.
(2) A loan provided under this section may not carry interest.
(3) The department shall determine the amount of a loan under this section. The amount
of a loan for the purchase of an electric bus may not exceed the difference  in cost between
the purchase of an electric bus and the purchase of a diesel-powered bus.
(4) Before issuing a loan under this section, the  department shall enter into a loan
agreement with the qualified recipient that meets the following requirements:
(a) The agreement must provide that the qualified recipient may use loan amounts  only
for purposes specified in the  agreement and permissible under this section, and will refund
any excess amounts to the department.
(b) The  agreement must specify the amount of the payments due under subsection (5)
of this section and must obligate the qualified recipient to make such payments.
(5) On an annual basis, each  qualified recipient shall remit to the department, for each
electric bus purchased with loans provided  under this section, an amount equal to the dif-
ference of the annual cost of operating a diesel-powered bus and  the annual cost of operating
an electric bus, as determined  by the department. Payments under this section are due until
the full loan amount is repaid.
(6) The department shall  deposit amounts received under subsection (5) of this section
into the Electric Bus Bond Debt Service Fund established under section 5 of this 2021 Act.
(7) The department shall  adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this sec-
tion.
(8) As used in this section, “qualified recipient” means:
(a) A school district, as defined in ORS 330.005;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1167
HB 2184
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) An education service district, as defined in ORS 334.003;
(c) A mass transit district established under ORS 267.010 to 267.394; or
(d) A transportation district established under ORS 267.510 to 267.650.
SECTION 2.
As used in section 2 to 6 of this 2021 Act, “bond-related costs” means:
(1) The costs and expenses  of issuing and administering bonds under sections 2 to 6 of
this 2021 Act, including but not limited to:
(a) Paying or redeeming the bonds, including principal, interest and premium, if any;
(b) Paying amounts due in connection with credit enhancement devices or reserve in-
struments;
(c) Paying the administrative costs and expenses of the  State Treasurer or the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality, including the cost of  consultants, attorneys and advisers
retained by the State Treasurer or the department for the bonds; and
(d) Any other costs or expenses that the  State Treasurer or the department determines
are necessary or desirable in connection with issuing or administering the bonds;
(2) The cost of funding bond reserves;
(3) Capitalized interest for the bonds; and
(4) Rebates or penalties due to the United States in connection with the bonds.
SECTION 3.
(1) The State  Treasurer may issue revenue bonds subject to the budget au-
thorization for bond issuance established under ORS 286A.035  for the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality for the purpose of financing  or refinancing, in whole or part, loans made
under section 1  of this 2021 Act, plus an additional amount to be estimated by the State
Treasurer for payment of bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of the revenue bonds issued pursuant to  this section must be deposited
in the Electric Bus Bond Fund established under section 4 of this 2021 Act  for disbursement
to the department to finance loans under section 1 of this 2021 Act.
(3) Bond-related costs must be paid from the gross proceeds  of the revenue bonds issued
under this section and from moneys deposited in the Electric  Bus Bond Debt Service Fund
established under section 5 of this 2021 Act.
(4) The department, with the  approval of the State Treasurer, may irrevocably pledge and
assign all or a portion of the moneys  deposited in the Electric Bus Bond Debt Service Fund
for the purpose of securing revenue bonds issued under this section or credit enhancements
obtained for the revenue bonds issued under this section.
(5) Revenue bonds issued under this section:
(a) Are payable from the  moneys deposited in the Electric Bus Bond Debt Service Fund;
and
(b) Do not constitute  a debt or general obligation of the state, the Legislative Assembly
or a political subdivision of this state but are secured solely by:
(A) The moneys deposited in the Electric Bus Bond Debt Service Fund;
(B) Amounts  in a debt service reserve account established with respect to revenue bonds
issued under this section; or
(C) A credit enhancement obtained for the revenue bonds issued under this section.
(6) The State Treasurer and the department have  no obligation to pay bond-related costs
except as provided in this section. A holder of  revenue bonds or other similar obligations
issued under this section does not have the right to compel the  exercise of the taxing power
of the state to pay bond-related costs.
[2]
HB 2184
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) The holders of revenue bonds issued  under this section, upon the issuance of the re-
venue bonds, have a perfected lien on the moneys deposited in  the Electric Bus Bond Debt
Service Fund that are pledged and assigned to the payment of the revenue bonds. The lien
and pledge are valid and binding from the date of issuance of the revenue bonds  and are
automatically perfected without physical delivery, filing or other act. The lien and pledge are
superior to subsequent claims or liens on the moneys deposited in the fund.
(8) As long as any revenue bonds  issued under this section are outstanding, the pro-
visions of this section and the provisions of a security document related to the revenue bonds
are deemed to be contracts between the state and holders of the revenue bonds. The state:
(a) May not create a lien, encumbrance  or any other obligation that is superior to the
liens authorized by subsection (7) of this section on the moneys in the Electric  Bus Bond
Debt Service Fund that are pledged and assigned to the payment of the revenue bonds; and
(b) May not  give force or effect to a statute or initiative or referendum measure ap-
proved by the electors of this state if doing so  would unconstitutionally impair existing
covenants made with the holders  of existing revenue bonds or would unconstitutionally im-
pair other obligations or agreements regarding the security of revenue bonds to which  the
moneys deposited in the Electric Bus Bond Debt Service Fund are pledged and assigned.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Electric  Bus Bond Fund is established in the State Treasury, sepa-
rate and distinct from the  General Fund. The net proceeds from the sale of revenue bonds
issued under section 3 of this 2021 Act  must be credited to the Electric Bus Bond Fund. In-
vestment earnings received on moneys in the fund must be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Department of Environ-
mental Quality for the purpose of making loans under section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) The Electric Bus Bond Debt  Service Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The Electric  Bus Bond Debt Service
Fund consists of:
(a) Moneys deposited in the fund under section 1 of this 2021 Act;
(b) Any moneys appropriated or allocated to the fund; and
(c) Investment earnings received on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Department of Environ-
mental Quality to pay, when due, the bond-related costs on  outstanding revenue bonds, to
fund revenue bond reserves and to pay amounts due in connection with credit enhancements.
(3) The department, in consultation with the  State Treasurer, shall use amounts in the
fund to pay, when due, the bond-related costs on outstanding  revenue bonds, to fund revenue
bond reserves and to pay amounts due in connection with credit enhancements.
(4) If the moneys deposited in the fund are not sufficient to pay  the bond-related costs
due to be paid in a fiscal year, the department, in  consultation with the State Treasurer,
shall make payments in that fiscal year  according to the relative priority of revenue bonds
secured by the moneys deposited in the fund.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Electric Bus Bond Administration Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The Electric  Bus Bond Adminis-
tration Fund consists of:
(a) The amount of revenue bond proceeds remaining after depositing the net proceeds in
the Electric Bus Bond Fund;
(b) The proceeds of revenue bonds issued to pay bond-related costs;
[3]
HB 2184
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
(c) Any moneys appropriated  or allocated to the Electric Bus Bond Administration Fund;
and
(d) Investment earnings received on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Department of Environ-
mental Quality to pay bond-related costs during the term of  revenue bonds issued under
section 3 of this 2021 Act.
(3) The department, in consultation with the State Treasurer, may use amounts  in the
Electric Bus Bond Administration Fund to  pay bond-related costs during the term of revenue
bonds issued under section 3 of this 2021 Act. Amounts in the fund  must be disbursed upon
the written request of the department.
[4]