Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 338.125 is amended to read:
338.125. (1) Student enrollment in a public charter school is voluntary.
(2)(a) All students who reside in the school district in which the public charter  school is located
are eligible for enrollment in the public charter school if space is available.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 339.133, students who  do not reside in the school district in which
the public charter school is  located are eligible for enrollment in the public charter school  as res-
idents if space is available and , for a virtual public  charter school,  subject to subsection (4) of
this section.
(c) A public charter  school may not limit student enrollment based on race, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, ethnicity, national origin, disability, the  terms of an individualized education program,
income level, proficiency in the English language or athletic ability.
(3)(a) Except as provided by paragraphs (b) and (c)  of this subsection, if the number of applica-
tions from students who reside in the school district exceeds the capacity of a program, class, grade
level or building, the public charter school  shall select students through an equitable lottery se-
lection process.
(b)(A) A  public charter school may give priority for admission to students who reside within the
attendance boundaries that were in effect at  the time a school district closed a nonchartered public
school  if:
(i) The public charter school began to operate not  more than two years after the nonchartered
public school was closed;
(ii) The school district that closed the nonchartered public  school is the sponsor of the public
charter  school;
(iii) The public charter school is physically located within the  attendance boundaries of the
closed nonchartered public school; and
(iv) The  school district board, through board action, approved the public charter school giving
priority as described in this paragraph.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph requires an amendment to a charter.  A school district board may
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1099
HB 2195
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
take an action described in subparagraph (A)(iv) of this  paragraph at any time during the term of
a charter.
(c) After a public charter school has been in operation for one or more  years, the public charter
school may give priority for admission to students who:
(A) Were enrolled in the school in the prior year;
(B) Have siblings who are presently enrolled in the school and who were  enrolled in the school
in the prior year; or
(C) If the public charter school is  a party to a cooperative agreement described in ORS 338.080,
reside in the school district that is the sponsor of the public charter school or in  a school district
that is a party to the cooperative agreement.
[(4)(a) A student who wishes to enroll in a virtual public charter school  does not need the approval
of the school district where the student is a resident before the student  enrolls in the virtual public
charter school. If a student wishes to enroll in a virtual public charter school,  the parent, legal
guardian or person in parental relationship  with the student must provide the following notices to the
school district where the student is a resident: ]
[(A) Intent to enroll the student in a virtual public charter school; and ]
[(B) Enrollment of the student in a virtual public charter school. ]
(4)(a) A student may not enroll  in a virtual public charter school that is not located in
the school district in which the student is a  resident if the school district in which the stu-
dent is a resident, or the  education service district that serves that school district, offers
appropriate online instruction and space is available for the student in that instruction. For
purposes of this paragraph, online instruction is appropriate if the instruction is provided:
(A) Primarily online, with no more than 10 hours of instruction per five-day  week pro-
vided to students at a common physical location; and
(B) For the grade in which the student is enrolled.
(b) If a student is not prohibited from enrolling in a virtual public charter  school under
paragraph (a) of this  subsection, the student may enroll in a virtual public charter school
that is not located in the school district in which the student  is a resident only if the re-
quirements of paragraph (c) or (d) of this subsection are satisfied.
[(b)(A) ] (c)(A) [ Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection and ORS  339.133,] If more than
three percent of the  students who reside in a school district are enrolled in virtual public charter
schools that are not sponsored by the school district, a student who is a resident of  the school dis-
trict [ must receive approval from  the school district before enrolling ] may enroll in a virtual public
charter school  that is not sponsored by the school district only  if the student receives ap-
proval to enroll from the school district . A school district is not required to give approval if more
than three percent of the students who reside in the school district are enrolled in virtual public
charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district.
(B) For the purpose of determining whether more than  three percent of the students who reside
in the school district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by the
school district, the school district board shall include any students who:
(i) Reside in the school district, regardless of whether the students are considered residents  of
different school districts as provided by ORS 339.133 (5); and
(ii) Are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district.
(C) Students who reside in the school district, regardless of whether the  students are considered
residents of different school districts as provided by ORS 339.133  (5), must receive approval from the
[2]
HB 2195
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school district before enrolling in a virtual public charter school that is not sponsored by the
school district if the limit described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph has been met.
[(c)] (d) If the school district does not give approval under paragraph [ (b)] (c) of this subsection,
the school district must provide information to the parent,  legal guardian or person in parental re-
lationship with the student about the right to appeal the decision to the State Board of Education
and other online options available to  the student. If an appeal is made to the State Board of Edu-
cation, the board must issue a decision within 30 days of the submission of the appeal.
(e) Prior to  enrolling a student in a virtual public charter school, the parent, legal
guardian or person in parental relationship with the student must provide  the following no-
tices to the school district in which the student is a resident:
(A) Intent to enroll the student in a virtual public charter school; and
(B) Enrollment of the student in a virtual public charter school.
(5) Within 10 days of a student’s enrollment in a public charter  school, the public charter school
shall provide written notice of the  student’s enrollment to the school district in which the public
charter school is located if the student does not reside in the school district [ where] in which the
public charter school is located.
(6) Within 10  days of receiving the notice described in subsection (5) of this section, the school
district in which the public charter school is located shall  provide to the student’s parent, legal
guardian or person in parental relationship written information about:
(a) The school district’s responsibility to identify, locate and  evaluate students enrolled in the
public charter school to determine which students  may be in need of special education and related
services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(b) The methods by which the school district may be contacted to  answer questions or provide
information related to special education and related services.
(7) When a student described in subsection (5) of this section withdraws from  a public charter
school for a reason other than graduation from  high school, the school district in which the public
charter school is located shall:
(a) Provide to the school district in which the student resides written notice that the student
has withdrawn.
(b) Provide to the student’s parent,  legal guardian or person in parental relationship written
information about:
(A) The responsibility of the school district in which the student  resides to identify, locate and
evaluate students  who reside in the school district to determine which students may be in need of
special education and related services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(B) The methods by which the school district in which the student resides may  be contacted to
answer questions or provide information related to special education and related services.
(8)(a) If a student described in subsection (5) of this  section enrolls in a public charter school
and has an individualized education program, the school district in which the public charter  school
is located must implement the individualized education program and follow the terms  of the indi-
vidualized education program until a new individualized education program is developed.
(b) If a student described  in subsection (5) of this section withdraws from a public charter school
and has an individualized  education program, the school district in which the student resides must
implement the individualized education program and follow the terms  of the individualized education
program until a new individualized education program is developed.
(9) When a virtual public  charter school enrolls a student or a student no longer is enrolled in
[3]
HB 2195
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
a virtual public charter  school, the virtual public charter school shall provide the written notices
described in ORS 338.120 (1)(m) and (n) to the school district [ where] in which the student is a
resident.
(10) A  public charter school may conduct fund-raising activities but may not require a student
to participate in fund-raising activities as a condition of admission to the public charter school.
SECTION 2.
(1) The amendments to ORS 338.125 by section 1 of this  2021 Act first apply
to enrollment by students for the 2022-2023 school year.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection  (1) of this section, the provisions of ORS 338.125 (4)(a),
as amended by section 1 of this 2021 Act, do not apply to enrollment by  students who were
enrolled in virtual public charter schools on  the effective date of this 2021 Act and who would
be enrolled in grade 12 for the 2022-2023 school year.
SECTION 3.  ORS 338.005 is amended to read:
338.005. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Applicant” means any person or group that develops and submits a written proposal for a
public charter school to a sponsor.
(2) “Public charter school” means  an elementary or secondary school offering a comprehensive
instructional program operating under a written agreement entered into between  a sponsor and an
applicant and operating pursuant to this chapter.
(3) “Remote and necessary school district” means  a school district that offers kindergarten
through grade 12 and has:
(a) An  average daily membership (ADM), as defined in ORS 327.006, in the prior fiscal year of
less than 110; and
(b) A school that is located, by the nearest traveled  road, more than 20 miles from the nearest
school or from a city with a population of more than 5,000.
(4) “Sponsor” means:
(a) The board of the common  school district or the union high school district in which the public
charter school is located that has  developed a written charter with an applicant to create a public
charter school.
(b) The State Board of Education pursuant to ORS 338.075.
(5)(a) “Virtual public charter school” means a public  charter school that [ provides] primarily
serves students through  online courses.
(b) “Virtual  public charter school” does not include a public charter school that primarily serves
students in a common physical location.
[4]