Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department  of Fish and Wildlife shall conduct a study on the
health of shellfish populations in this state.
(2) The department shall submit a  report on the results of the study to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the environment and  natural resources
no later than September 15, 2017.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this  2017 Act is repealed on the date of the convening of the 2018
regular session of the Legislative Assembly as specified in ORS 171.010.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1924