Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Human Services shall distribute to the Center for  the
Prevention of Abuse  and Neglect $600,000 between July 1, 2019, and June 30, 2020, and $400,000
between July 1, 2020, and June 30, 2021, for the Oregon Child Abuse Prevalence Study.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall require  the Center for the Prevention of
Abuse and Neglect to spend not more than 10 percent of the funds distributed  under sub-
section (1) of this section to pay the University  of Oregon for facilities and administrative
costs.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated to the Department of  Human Services, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019,  out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000 for dis-
tribution as specified in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3788