Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall conduct a study to
determine how best to make public higher education affordable for Oregonians. The  com-
mission shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include rec-
ommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related
to higher education no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3574