Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 321.257 is amended to read:
321.257. As used in ORS 321.257 to 321.390, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Department” means the Department of Revenue.
(2) “Forestland”  means land in western Oregon that is being held or used for the predominant
purpose of growing and harvesting trees of a marketable species and  has been designated as
forestland or land in western Oregon, the highest and best use of which  is the growing and har-
vesting of such trees. Trees of a marketable species may vary in different  areas in western Oregon
and may change as the utilization of forest trees changes. The size, age, location, quality and con-
dition of trees do not necessarily determine  marketable species. Forestland often contains isolated
openings [ which] that, because of rock outcrops, river wash, swamps, chemical conditions of the soil,
brush and other like conditions , prevent adequate stocking of such  openings for the production of
trees of a marketable species. If the openings in their natural state are necessary to  hold the sur-
rounding forestland in forest use through sound management practices, the  openings are deemed
forestland. Forestland does not include buildings, structures, machinery, equipment or  fixtures
erected upon, under or above the soil. Forestland includes roads described in ORS 308.236.
(3) “Land class” or “land classes” means one of the  eight classifications of forestland, used for
assessment purposes by the department,  based upon State Tax Commission Valuation Division Sup-
plements published in 1967, and identified in ORS 321.210.
(4) “Natural forest” means forestland that has not been modified by human uses.
(5) “Nonforested land”  means forestland that is covered by recent clear-cuts, logging
roads, infrastructure or other openings.
(6) “Seminatural forest” means forestland that has been  modified by human uses but still
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 980
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
supports a diversity of tree and understory species, tree sizes and  tree ages consistent with
natural forest conditions.
[(4)] (7) “State Forester” means the  State Forester or the authorized representative of the State
Forester.
[(5)] (8) “Sustained yield management” means the growing and harvesting of  timber crops on a
continuous basis on land that is primarily dedicated to timber production.
[(6)] (9) “Taxing district” or “district” means each county, city, school district and  other cor-
poration vested with the power to levy property taxes in western Oregon.
[(7)] (10) “Timber” means all logs [ which] that can be measured in board feet  and other forest
products as determined by department rule.
(11) “Timber plantation” means forestland that has been intensively logged and replanted
and is now covered by  trees at least five meters in height with a canopy closure of at least
40 percent.
[(8)] (12) “Western Oregon” means that portion of the state lying west of a  line beginning at the
intersection of the northern boundary of the State of Oregon and the western boundary  of Wasco
County, thence southerly along the western boundaries of the counties of Wasco, Jefferson,
Deschutes and Klamath to the southern boundary of the State of Oregon.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 321.358 is amended to read:
321.358. (1) An owner of land [ desiring that it be ] seeking to have the land  designated as
forestland shall make application to the county assessor :
(a) On or before April 1 of the assessment year for which special assessment as forestland is
first [ desired, and the owner may also do so ] sought; or
(b) Within 30 days of receipt of  notice of [ its assessment ] the land being assessed  as omitted
property.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, an owner of land may apply to the county
assessor [ by] on or before December 15 to have the land designated as forestland for the assessment
year if:
(a) For the prior  assessment year the land had been forestland by reason of the land being
highest and best use forestland; and
(b) For the current assessment year the land is being assessed at a value  reflecting a use other
than highest and best use forestland.
(3) The application shall be made upon forms  prepared by the Department of Revenue and sup-
plied by the county assessor[ ,] and shall include the following:
(a) A description of all land the applicant [ desires to be ] seeks to  have designated as forestland.
(b) Date of acquisition.
(c) Whether the land  is being held or used for the predominant purpose of growing and har-
vesting trees of marketable species.
(d) Whether there is a forest management plan for [ it] the land.
(e) If [ so] there is a forest management plan for the land , whether the plan is being imple-
mented, and the nature and extent of implementation.
(f) Whether the land is used for grazing.
(g) Whether the land has been platted under ORS chapter 92.
(h) Whether the  land is timberland subject to ORS chapter 477, and if [ it] the land  is not, the
reasons [ therefor] why not.
(i) Whether the land, or any portion of [ it] the land , is subject to a  lease or option [ which] that
[2]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
permits [ it] the land to be used for any purpose other than the growing and harvesting of trees.
(j) A summary of past experience and activity of the applicant in growing and  harvesting trees.
(k) A summary of current and  continuing activity of the applicant in growing and harvesting
trees.
(L) A statement that the applicant is aware of the  potential tax liability involved [ when] if the
land ceases to be designated as forestland.
(m) An affirmation that the statements contained in the application are true.
(4)(a) The county assessor shall approve an application for  forestland designation if the assessor
finds that the land is properly classifiable as forestland.
(b) The county assessor [ shall] may not find land properly classifiable as forestland if:
[(a)] (A) The application states the land is not being held  or used for the predominant purpose
of growing and harvesting trees of marketable species; or
[(b)] (B) Subject to the provisions of ORS 321.257, the land does not  substantially meet minimum
stocking or acreage requirements under rules adopted by the department.
(c) [Otherwise,] The determination of whether the land is properly classifiable as forestland shall
be made with due regard  to all relevant evidence and without any one or more items of evidence
necessarily being determinative.
(5) The application shall be deemed to have been approved unless,  within three months of the
date [ such] on which the  application was delivered to the assessor or [ prior to ] before August 15,
whichever is later, the assessor shall notify the applicant in writing  of the extent to which the ap-
plication is denied.
(6) The State  Forester shall collaborate with county assessors to develop a system for
forestland owners to estimate the area  of the forestland owned by them that is natural for-
est, seminatural forest, timber plantations and nonforested lands for purposes related  to
forest taxation. The system shall make use of the  best scientific information available from
satellite and ground-based measurements.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 321.267 is amended to read:
321.267. The following forestland may not be assessed under ORS 321.257 to 321.390:
(1) Forestland assessed by the Department of Revenue  pursuant to ORS 308.505 to 308.681,
308.805 to 308.820 and 308.990.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 321.347, land that is prepared  using intensive cultivation and
tilling and on which all unwanted plant growth is controlled  continuously for the exclusive purpose
of growing Christmas trees.
(3) Land  used for the purpose of growing hardwood timber, including but not limited to hybrid
cottonwood,  if:
(a) The land is  prepared using intensive cultivation methods and is cleared of competing vege-
tation for at least three years after tree planting;
(b) The timber is of a species marketable as fiber for inclusion in  the furnish for manufacturing
paper products;
(c) The timber is harvested on a rotation cycle within 12 years after planting; and
(d) The land  and timber are subject to intensive agricultural practices such as fertilization, in-
sect and disease control, cultivation and irrigation.
(4) Small tract forestland qualified under  ORS 321.700 to 321.754 and timber harvested from
small tract forestland qualified under ORS 321.700 to 321.754.
(5) Any forestland that is not natural or seminatural forest.
[3]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 4.  ORS 321.805 is amended to read:
321.805. As used in ORS 321.805 to 321.855, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Cultured Christmas trees” means trees:
(a) Grown on lands used exclusively for that purpose, capable of preparation by intensive  culti-
vation methods such as plowing or turning over the soil;
(b) Of a marketable species;
(c) Managed to produce trees meeting U.S. No. 2 or  better standards for Christmas trees as
specified by the  Agriculture Marketing Services of the United States Department of Agriculture; and
(d) Evidencing periodic maintenance practices of shearing for  Douglas fir and pine species, weed
and brush control, and basal pruning, fertilizing, insect and disease control, stump culture,  soil cul-
tivation or irrigation.
(2) “Department” means the Department of Revenue.
(3) “Eastern Oregon”  means that portion of the state lying east of a line beginning at the
intersection of the  northern boundary of the State of Oregon and the western boundary of Wasco
County, thence south along  the western boundaries of the counties of Wasco, Jefferson, Deschutes
and Klamath to the southern boundary of the State of Oregon.
(4) “Forestland” means land in eastern Oregon that  is being held or used for the predominant
purpose of growing and harvesting trees of a marketable species and that has been designated as
forestland under ORS 321.805 to 321.855 or land in eastern Oregon, the highest and best use of
which is the growing  and harvesting of such trees. Forestland is the land alone. Forestland often
contains isolated openings that , because of rock  outcrops, river wash, swamps, chemical conditions
of the  soil, brush and other like conditions , prevent adequate stocking of such openings for the
production of trees of a marketable species. If such  openings in their natural state are necessary to
hold the surrounding forestland in forest use through sound management practices, the  openings are
deemed forestland.
(5) “Natural forest” means forestland that has not been modified by human uses.
(6) “Nonforested land”  means forestland that is covered by recent clear-cuts, logging
roads, infrastructure or other openings.
(7) “Seminatural forest” means forestland that has been  modified by human uses but still
supports a diversity of tree and understory species, tree sizes and  tree ages consistent with
natural forest conditions.
[(5)] (8) “State Forester” means the  State Forester or the authorized representative of the State
Forester.
[(6)] (9) “Summit of the Cascade  Mountains” means a line beginning at the intersection of the
northern boundary of the State of  Oregon and the western boundary of Wasco County, thence
southerly along the western boundaries  of the counties of Wasco, Jefferson, Deschutes and Klamath
to the southern boundary of the State of Oregon.
[(7)] (10) “Timber” means all logs [ which] that can be measured in board feet  and other forest
products as determined by department rule, but does not include western juniper or products  from
harvested western juniper.
(11) “Timber plantation” means forestland that has been intensively logged and replanted
and is now covered by trees at least five meters in height with a canopy  closure of at least
30 percent.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 321.839 is amended to read:
321.839. (1) An  owner of land [ desiring that it be ] seeking to have the land  designated as
[4]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
forestland for purposes of ORS 321.805 to 321.855 shall make application to the county assessor :
(a) On or before April 1 of the assessment year for which special assessment as forestland is
first [ desired, and the owner may also do so ] sought; or
(b) Within 30 days of receipt of notice of [ its assessment ] the land being assessed  as omitted
property.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, an owner of land may apply to the county
assessor [ by] on or before December 15 to have the land designated as forestland for the assessment
year if:
(a) For the prior assessment year the land had been forestland by reason of  the land being
highest and best use forestland; and
(b) For the current assessment year the land is being assessed at a value  reflecting a use other
than highest and best use forestland.
(3) The application shall be made upon forms prepared  by the Department of Revenue and sup-
plied by the county assessor[ ,] and shall include the following:
(a) A description of all land the applicant [ desires to be ] seeks to  have designated as forestland.
(b) Date of acquisition.
(c) Whether the land  is being held or used for the predominant purpose of growing and har-
vesting trees of marketable species.
(d) Whether there is a forest management plan for [ it] the land.
(e) If [ so] there is a forest management plan for the land , whether the plan is being imple-
mented, and the nature and extent of implementation.
(f) Whether the land is being  held or used for the predominant purpose of grazing or raising of
livestock.
(g) Whether the land has been platted under ORS chapter 92.
(h) Whether a permit has been granted for harvesting for excepted purposes under the Oregon
Forest Practices Act.
(i) Whether the land is timberland subject to ORS chapter 477,  and if [ it] the land is not, the
reasons [ therefor] why not.
(j) Whether the land, or any portion of [ it] the land, is subject to a  lease or option [ which] that
permits [ it] the land to be used for any purpose other than the growing and harvesting of trees.
(k) A summary of past experience  and activity of the applicant in growing and harvesting trees.
(L) A summary of current and continuing activity of  the applicant in growing and harvesting
trees.
(m) A statement that the applicant  is aware of the potential tax liability involved [ when] if the
land ceases to be designated as forestland.
(n) An affirmation that the statements contained in the application are true.
(4)(a) The county assessor shall approve an application for  forestland designation if the assessor
finds that the land is properly classifiable as forestland.
(b) The county assessor [ shall] may not  find land properly classifiable as forestland if the ap-
plication states the land is not  being held or used for the predominant purpose of growing and
harvesting trees of marketable species.
(c) [Otherwise,] The determination of whether the land is properly classifiable as forestland shall
be made with due regard  to all relevant evidence and without any one or more items of evidence
necessarily being determinative.
(5) The application shall be considered to have  been approved unless, within three months of the
[5]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
date [ such] on which the  application was delivered to the assessor or [ prior to ] before August 15,
whichever is later, the assessor shall notify the  applicant in writing of the extent to which the ap-
plication is denied.
(6) The State Forester shall collaborate with county assessors to develop a  system for
forestland owners to estimate the area of the forestland owned by  them that is natural for-
est, seminatural  forest, timber plantations and nonforested lands for purposes related to
forest taxation. The system shall make  use of the best scientific information available from
satellite and ground-based measurements.
SECTION 6.  ORS 321.824 is amended to read:
321.824. [(1) Lands assessed by the Department of Revenue pursuant  to ORS 308.505 to 308.681 or
308.805 to 308.820] The following forestland may not be assessed under ORS 321.805 to 321.855[ .]:
(1) Lands assessed by the Department of Revenue pursuant to ORS  308.505 to 308.681 or
308.805 to 308.820.
(2) Land used exclusively for growing cultured Christmas trees  [may not be assessed under ORS
321.805 to 321.855].
(3) Land that is used to grow hardwood timber, including but not limited to hybrid  cottonwood,
[may not be assessed under ORS 321.805 to 321.855 ] if:
(a) The land is prepared using intensive cultivation methods and is cleared  of competing vege-
tation for at least three years after tree planting;
(b) The timber is of a species marketable as fiber for inclusion in  the furnish for manufacturing
paper products;
(c) The timber is harvested on a rotation cycle within 12 years after planting; and
(d) The land and timber are subject to intensive agricultural practices such as  fertilization, in-
sect and disease control, cultivation and irrigation.
(4) Any forestland that is not natural or seminatural forest.
[(4) Nothing contained in ORS 321.805 to 321.855 shall prevent: ]
[(a) The collection of ad valorem property taxes that became a lien against timber prior to  July 1,
1962.]
[(b) The collection of taxes, charges or assessments made pursuant to law for protection. ]
[(c) The collection of taxes levied under  the provisions of ORS 321.005 to 321.185 and 321.560 to
321.600.]
SECTION 7.
Section 8 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 321.805 to
321.855.
SECTION 8. Nothing contained in ORS 321.805 to 321.855 shall prevent:
(1) The collection of ad valorem property taxes that  became a lien against timber prior
to July 1, 1962.
(2) The collection of taxes, charges or assessments made pursuant to law  for protection.
(3) The collection of taxes levied under the provisions of ORS 321.005 to 321.185 and
321.560 to 321.600.
SECTION 9.  ORS 308.236 is amended to read:
308.236. (1) The availability,  usefulness and cost of using roads, including all roads of the owner
of land or timber and all roads that the  owner has the right to use, shall be taken into consideration
in determining the real market value of land.
(2) Farm or grazing land roads  [ and forest roads themselves, except principal exterior timber ac-
cess roads, ] [ shall] may not be appraised, valued or assessed and [ they shall ] may not be classed as
[6]
HB 2659
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
improvements under  ORS 308.215. The underlying land upon which roads are constructed shall be
assessed if [ it] the underlying land is otherwise subject to assessment.
(3) As used in this section[ :],
[(a)] “road” includes fills, ballast, bridges, culverts,  drains, surfacing and other appurtenances
of a like kind commonly associated with roads but excludes railroads.
[(b) “Principal exterior timber access roads”  means those portions of high standard main-line pri-
vate roads that provide access from a conversion center  or public way to the exterior boundary of the
principal forest area served by the road. A high standard  main-line private road is a permanent road
of two lanes or more that is paved or macadamized or that has a fine-gravel surface that is permanently
and continuously maintained. ]
SECTION 10.
 ORS 321.272 is amended to read:
321.272. All timber in western Oregon on forestland that is natural or seminatural forest
shall be exempt from ad valorem property taxation.
SECTION 11.  ORS 321.829 is amended to read:
321.829. All timber in eastern Oregon on forestland that is natural or seminatural forest
shall be exempt from ad valorem property taxation.
SECTION 12. ORS 307.827 and 307.831 are repealed.
SECTION 13. The amendments to ORS  308.236, 321.257, 321.267, 321.272, 321.358, 321.805,
321.824, 321.829 and 321.839 by sections 1 to 6 and 9 to  11 of this 2019 Act and the repeal of
ORS 307.827 and 307.831 by section 12 of this 2019 Act  apply to property tax years beginning
on or after July 1, 2020.
SECTION 14. (1) Counties shall allocate no less  than 30 percent of the moneys received
as a result of the amendments to ORS 308.236, 321.257, 321.267,  321.272, 321.358, 321.805,
321.824, 321.829 and 321.839 by sections 1 to 6 and 9 to  11 of this 2019 Act and the repeal of
ORS 307.827 and 307.831 by section 12 of this 2019 Act for the purposes  of climate adaptation
and climate smart forest practices, including  afforestation, reforestation, restoration of tree
plantations to seminatural forests and alternatives to clear-cut harvesting.
(2) Moneys described in subsection  (1) of this section shall be deposited in a separate fund
of the county and used solely for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 15. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[7]