Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 137.090 is amended to read:
137.090. (1) In determining aggravation or mitigation, the court shall consider:
(a) Any evidence received during the proceeding;
(b) The presentence report, where one is available; and
(c) Any other evidence  relevant to aggravation or mitigation that the court finds trustworthy
and reliable.
(2) In determining mitigation, the court may consider:
(a) Evidence regarding the defendant’s status as a servicemember as defined in ORS 135.881.
(b) Whether the  defendant committed the crime while under duress, compulsion, direction or
pressure from another person who has:
(A) Committed acts of domestic violence, as defined in ORS 135.230, against the defendant;
(B) Committed acts of abuse as a family or household  member of the defendant, as those terms
are defined in ORS 107.705, against the defendant; or
(C) Used force, intimidation, fraud or coercion  to cause the defendant to engage, or attempt to
engage, in a commercial sex act.
(3) In determining aggravation, the court  shall consider whether the person was wearing body
armor in the course of and in furtherance of the crime, or to facilitate the  immediate flight there-
from.
(4)(a) In determining aggravation and in addition to  subsection (3) of this section, the
court shall consider evidence that the crime was committed:
(A) During an emergency, and the defendant took advantage of circumstances  related to
the emergency;
(B) During a mandatory evacuation while an emergency was in effect,  and the defendant
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2085
HB 2868
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
took advantage of circumstances related to the evacuation; or
(C) Within one year after an emergency ceased to be in effect, and the  defendant took
advantage of circumstances related to the recovery from the emergency.
(b) The Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission, in the rules of the commission concerning
sentencing departure factors,  shall include as an aggravating factor circumstances described
in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Emergency” means:
(i) A state of emergency declared by the Governor under ORS 401.165  due to a natural
disaster, and any extension of the state of emergency;
(ii) A state of emergency declared by a city or county by ordinance or resolution as  de-
scribed in ORS 401.309 due to a natural disaster; or
(iii) A catastrophic disaster  declared by the Governor, pursuant to Article X-A, section
1, of the Oregon Constitution, due to a natural disaster.
(B) “Natural disaster” includes, but is not  limited to, a fire, earthquake, flood, volcanic
eruption or tsunami.
[(4)] (5) When a witness is so sick or infirm as to be unable to  attend a sentencing proceeding,
the deposition  of the witness may be taken out of court at such time and place, and upon such notice
to the adverse party, and before such person authorized to take depositions, as the court directs.
[2]