Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 (1) The Ocean Beach Fund is established in  the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Ocean Beach  Fund shall be credited
to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts deposited in the fund pursuant to ORS 320.335;
(b) Amounts donated to the fund;
(c) Amounts appropriated or  otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(d) Investment earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(e) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the State Parks and Recreation
Department for administrative, personnel and other expenses incurred by the  department in
managing state recreation areas along the ocean shore.
(4) For  purposes of subsection (3) of this section, “managing state recreation areas along
the ocean shore” includes, but is not limited to, activities relating to:
(a) Visitor safety, including developing and erecting signage  warning of the natural dan-
gers of ocean beaches;
(b) Emergency responses;
(c) Beachfront armoring and sand management;
(d) Marine debris response and removal;
(e) Increased and expanding recreational use;
(f) Increased tourism;
(g) Growing demand for beachfront development; and
(h) Responses to increasingly severe storm and erosion events.
(5) The  department may establish accounts and subaccounts within the fund when the
department determines  that accounts or subaccounts are necessary or desirable, and may
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2383
HB 2672
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
credit any interest or income derived from moneys in the fund to any account  or subaccount
in the fund.
(6) The department may use moneys in the fund to pay the administrative costs associ-
ated with the fund.
(7) As used in  this section, “ocean shore” and “state recreation area” have the meanings
given those terms in ORS 390.605.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 320.335 is amended to read:
320.335. All moneys received by the Department of Revenue pursuant to ORS 320.305 to 320.340,
and interest thereon, shall be paid to the State Treasurer  to be held in a suspense account estab-
lished under ORS 293.445. After the payment of refunds:
(1) Moneys necessary to reimburse the Department of Revenue for the actual costs incurred  by
the department in administering the state transient lodging  tax, not to exceed two percent of state
transient lodging tax collections, are continuously appropriated to the department[ ; and ].
(2) Moneys received from the State Parks and Recreation  Department from the furnish-
ing of transient lodging at state recreation  areas that are located along the ocean shore shall
be transferred to the Oregon Beach Fund established under section 1 of this 2021  Act. As
used in this subsection, “ocean shore” and “state  recreation area” have the meanings given
those terms in ORS 390.605.
[(2)] (3)  The balance of the moneys received shall be transferred to the account of the Oregon
Tourism Commission established under ORS 284.131. The moneys transferred under  this subsection
are continuously appropriated to the  Oregon Tourism Commission for the purposes set forth in ORS
284.131.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]