Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Treasurer shall study the operations of the office  of the State
Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall submit a report on the findings in  the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to ways and means no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 259