Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 418.190 is amended to read:
418.190. (1) As used in  this section, “abuse reporting hotline” means a statewide toll-free tele-
phone number operated by the Department of Human Services for reporting suspected abuse.
(2) The department shall develop and maintain a centralized child abuse reporting system.  The
system must include [ the] an  abuse reporting  hotline for oral reports of suspected abuse and [ a]
may include a website for electronic reports of suspected child abuse.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3612