Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Purpose. It is  the purpose of sections 1 to 7 of this 2020 Act to establish a
loan loss account program under which the State of  Oregon will provide public fiscal re-
sources to assist Oregon lenders to overcome obstacles  and constraints in meeting the full
range of economically sound financing needs of Oregon businesses.
SECTION 2. Definitions. As used in sections 1 to 7 of this 2020 Act, unless the context
requires otherwise:
(1) “Community lender loan loss account program” or  “program” means the program
established under sections 1 to 7 of this 2020 Act.
(2) “Loan loss account” or “account” means an account in the State Treasury  or any fi-
nancial institution, as defined by ORS 706.008,  that is established and maintained by the
Oregon Business Development Department  for the benefit of a lender participating in the
program.
(3) “Qualified business” or “borrower” means any person that, at the time  of filing an
application pursuant to section 5 of this 2020 Act:
(a) Is authorized to conduct business in the State of Oregon;
(b) Is conducting business in Oregon for profit; and
(c) Has not more than 20 employees.
(4)(a) “Qualified loan” means a loan  or portion of a loan made by a lender to a qualified
business for any business activity that has its primary economic effect in Oregon.
(b) “Qualified loan” does not mean a loan:
(A) For the purchase of owner-occupied residential housing or for the construction, im-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 241
HB 4033
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
provement or purchase of residential housing owned or to be owned by the borrower.
(B) For purchase of real property that is not used for the business operations  of the
borrower.
(C) That includes, in whole or in  part, the refinancing of an existing loan made by the
lender to the borrower.
(D) That includes, in whole or in part, the refinancing of an existing  personal loan not
used for business purposes or that provides cash out to the borrower.
(E) For working capital for a term exceeding five years.
(F) For fixed  assets that exceeds the useful life of the assets as determined by the de-
partment.
(G) With a variable interest rate.
(H) With an annual interest rate that exceeds the prime rate plus five percent.
(I) That fails to meet criteria established by the department by rule.
SECTION 3.
Contracts with lenders to  participate in program; required contents; disclo-
sure of information.  (1)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department may enter into a
contract with a lender for the purpose of allowing  the lender to participate in the community
lender loan loss account program, if the lender:
(A) Is a government agency or a nonprofit corporation as defined in ORS 307.130;
(B) Is mission-driven;
(C) Has at least five years of physical presence and operations in Oregon; and
(D) Provides financial and technical  assistance to small businesses, microenterprises and
start-up businesses.
(b) The department shall adopt a definition of “mission-driven”  for purposes of this sub-
section.
(2) A contract between the department and a  lender entered into pursuant to this section
must:
(a) Provide for the creation of a  loan loss account by the department for the benefit of
the lender;
(b) Require the qualified business and the department to deposit moneys to the credit  of
the lender’s loan loss account when the lender makes a qualified loan to a qualified business;
(c) Require the department,  in accordance with section 6 of this 2020 Act, to reimburse
the lender, from moneys in the lender’s loan  loss account, in an amount not greater than
the total amount credited to the account, for any principal financial loss incurred  by the
lender as a result of a qualified loan made in accordance with section 5 of this 2020 Act;
(d) Provide that the liability of the State  of Oregon and the department under the con-
tract is limited to the amount of money credited to the lender’s loan loss account;
(e) Require the lender to provide such information as  the department may require, in-
cluding financial information that is  identifiable with, or identifiable from, the financial re-
cords of a particular borrower in a qualified loan transaction;
(f) Require the lender to provide annual reports to the department, in a form prescribed
by the department, setting forth:
(A) Data relating to the lender’s loan activity in Oregon;
(B) Voluntarily reported demographic  data for all approved, declined and withdrawn
loans;
(C) The lender’s financial statements and tax filings; and
[2]
HB 4033
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) Other information that the department may require;
(g) Authorize the department, at its sole discretion, to terminate and bar any lender from
future participation in the program if the department finds that  the lender has made mate-
rial misrepresentations regarding the lender’s enrolled loans, claims or reports; and
(h) Include such other terms as the department may require.
SECTION 4.
Loan loss accounts; policies; rules; moneys as property of state.  (1)  The
Oregon Business Development Department shall establish  a loan loss account for each lender
with which the department enters into a contract pursuant to section 3 of this 2020 Act.
(2) A lender’s loan loss account shall consist of moneys paid  as fees by borrowers under
the community lender loan loss  account program and moneys transferred to the account
from the Community Lender Loan  Loss Account Fund established under section 7 of this
2020 Act.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS chapter 293 or 295, the department may establish and maintain
loan loss accounts with any financial institution, as defined under ORS  706.008, according to
such policies as the department may adopt.
(4) All moneys in a loan loss account established under sections 1 to 7  of this 2020 Act
are the property of the State of Oregon.
(5) The cumulative balance of the loan loss account for any  lender, or an affiliate of the
lender, may not exceed the lesser of $1 million or:
(a) If the account has more than  $100,000, 50 percent of the current net receivables of
the lender’s loans enrolled in the program.
(b) If the account has less than $100,000, 100 percent of  the current net receivables of the
lender’s loans enrolled in  the program, unless the lender has a plan, approved by the de-
partment, to improve program utilization.
(6) Any balance due to the department as a result of subsection (5) of this  section shall
be paid in full and shall accompany the annual report required under section 3 (2)(f) of this
2020 Act.
(7) Loan loss accounts that remain  dormant for more than 12 months shall be terminated
unless termination is waived in writing by the department.
(8)(a) Loan loss accounts may not be sold, transferred or assigned.
(b) If a lender or the lender’s loan loss reserve portfolio is sold, transferred or assigned,
in whole or part, the contract entered into under section  3 of this 2020 Act shall be termi-
nated and all moneys remaining in the lender’s loan loss account  shall be repaid in full to
the Community Lender Loan Loss Account Fund.
SECTION 5.
Enrollment of qualified  loan in program; notice to department; fees; trans-
fers to  loan loss accounts; rules and limits for loans. (1)(a) A lender intending to enroll a
qualified loan in the community lender loan loss account program must apply to the Oregon
Business Development Department no  less than seven business days before making the
qualified loan. The department, in its sole discretion, may waive the seven-day period.
(b) The application required under  this section shall be in writing on a form prescribed
and approved by the department.
(2)(a) A qualified loan may not be enrolled in the program unless the lender has collected
from the borrower to which the loan is  made a fee in an amount equal to three percent of
the principal amount of the loan. The borrower may pay the fee out of the loan proceeds.
(b) Upon receipt of the fee, the lender shall deposit the fee in the  lender’s loan loss ac-
[3]
HB 4033
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
count.
(c) The lender shall deliver receipt  of fees collected and deposited in the lender’s loan loss
account to the department.
(3)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department  may adopt rules providing for a
double match for qualified loans to qualified businesses that are:
(A) Located in distressed areas;
(B) Located in rural areas; or
(C) Owned 51 percent or more by one or more individuals who are:
(i) Socially and economically disadvantaged, as defined under 49 C.F.R. 26.5;
(ii) Veterans of  the Armed Forces of the United States, or the National Guard or other
reserve component, who have been discharged other than dishonorably; or
(iii) Individuals with disabilities, as certified by the Commission  for the Blind or the De-
partment of Human Services.
(b) The Oregon Business  Development Department shall adopt definitions of “distressed
areas” and “rural areas” for purposes of this subsection.
(4)(a) As soon  as practicable after delivery of the receipt and deposit of fees required
under subsection (2)  of this section, the Oregon Business Development Department shall
transfer a matching amount not less than the total fees paid by  the borrower from the
Community Lender Loan Loss Account Fund established under section 7 of  this 2020 Act to
the lender’s loan loss account.
(b) The Oregon Business Development Department may not transfer a  matching amount
under this subsection that is greater than  $7,500 per enrolled loan or $15,000 if the qualified
loan is eligible for a double match under subsection (3) of this section.
(c) The maximum matching amount paid  with respect to any single loan made to a
qualified business, and an associated concurrent loan made  to a related business interest,
may not exceed $15,000.
SECTION 6.
Claims for reimbursement of losses; reimbursable costs; repayment to  loan
loss account.  (1) The Oregon Business  Development Department shall establish procedures
pursuant to which lenders  participating in the community lender loan loss account program
may submit claims for reimbursement for losses incurred as a result of qualified loan de-
faults.
(2) A lender may submit a  claim under this section for reimbursement of qualified loan
losses if the lender demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that:
(a) The lender has made all reasonable efforts to collect the outstanding amounts; and
(b) The outstanding amounts and any interest and penalties on the  amounts are un-
collectible.
(3) A lender may not be reimbursed from the lender’s loan loss account  in an amount
that exceeds the qualified loan principal outstanding at the  time of a borrower’s default on
a qualified loan.
(4) If a lender that has been reimbursed under this  section recovers any moneys from
the borrower that defaulted on a qualified loan, or from the liquidation of other assets  of the
borrower, the lender shall  repay the lender’s loan loss account for any moneys the lender
received as reimbursement with respect to the qualified loan.
SECTION 7.
Community Lender Loan Loss Account Fund; investment; retrieval  of in-
terest; administrative expenses.  (1) There is established in the State  Treasury, separate and
[4]
HB 4033
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
distinct from the General Fund, the Community Lender Loan Loss Account Fund. All moneys
in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Business Development Department
for the purpose of making payments to loan loss accounts in accordance  with sections 1 to
7 of this 2020 Act.
(2) With the approval of the State Treasurer, moneys in the  fund may be invested as
provided by ORS 293.701 to 293.857 and the earnings from such investment shall be credited
to the fund.
(3) The Community Lender Loan Loss Account Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(c) Moneys returned to the fund from loan loss accounts or other sources.
(d) Moneys from any grant or award made to the fund by any federal agency.
(4) If the department deems the transfer of  interest earned on loan loss accounts ap-
propriate, the department may deposit the interest in the fund.
(5) The department may charge  administrative costs to the fund to pay for necessary
administrative expenses actually incurred by the department  in administering the fund and
establishing and maintaining loan loss accounts.
SECTION 8.
(1) Sections 1 to 7 of this 2020 Act become operative on January 1, 2021.
(2) The  Oregon Business Development Department may take any action before the oper-
ative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section that is necessary for the department to
exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,  all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by sections 1 to 7 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 9. There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $5 million, for
deposit in the Community Lender Loan Loss Account Fund established  under section 7 of
this 2020 Act, to be used for any purpose for which moneys in the fund may be used.
SECTION 10. The section captions used in sections 1 to 7 of this 2020  Act are provided
only for the convenience of the reader and do not become part  of the statutory law of this
state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 11. (1) There is allocated for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the Ad-
ministrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the Oregon Department of  Adminis-
trative Services, the amount of $250,000 for distribution to the  Oregon Entrepreneurs
Network in accordance with this section.
(2) Distributions made pursuant to  this section may be used by the Oregon Entrepre-
neurs Network solely for the following purposes:
(a) Qualitative one-on-one interviews  with 75 entrepreneur ecosystem participants, in-
cluding regulated and nonregulated  lenders, located in all regions of this state, to better
understand the ecosystem and funding needs and gaps.
(b) Two group meetings of diverse Oregon entrepreneurial stakeholders, convened during
the twelve-month period beginning July 1,  2020, to study stakeholder needs. Moneys in the
fund may also be used to  make travel and time reimbursements to underrepresented entre-
preneurs.
(c) To bring  together a research team that will synthesize existing analyses, and conduct
a new  analysis, of the economic needs of Oregon small businesses and the impact of small
businesses on the Oregon economy.
[5]
HB 4033
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
(d) Collaboration and information sharing with the Oregon Capital Scan.
(e) To fund technological infrastructure and the  position of a project manager charged
with creating a statewide, connected and engaged entrepreneurial ecosystem community.
(f) To make recommendations for legislation to the  interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to economic development no later than November 30, 2020.
(3) The department may  not make a distribution to the Oregon Entrepreneurs Network
under this section until the amount of lottery funds allocated  to the department under sub-
section (1) of this section has been matched by  at least $150,000 received from private,
nonprofit or philanthropic sources to be used solely for the purposes set  forth in subsection
(2) of this section.
SECTION 12.
(1) There is allocated for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, from the Ad-
ministrative Services Economic Development  Fund, to the Oregon Business Development
Department, the amount of $3 million for deposit in  the Oregon Growth Fund established
under ORS 284.890.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 284.890 (3), moneys deposited in the Oregon Growth Fund under
this section are continuously appropriated to the department for the use of the Oregon
Growth Board for the following purposes:
(a) To target entrepreneurs and emerging capital innovators;
(b) To support economic  growth through investments in loan funds, venture capital
funds, angel conferences and associated technical assistance;
(c) To leverage private  and other institutional dollars for investment in Oregon compa-
nies;
(d) To make investments in early stage, small and first-time  capital sources to support
economic development; and
(e) To help  funds fill the capital gaps encountered by Oregon businesses, especially in
underserved communities, rural areas and undersupported industry sectors.
(3) Moneys deposited in the Oregon Growth Fund under this  section may not be used for
any other purpose for which moneys in the fund may be used  under ORS 284.890, other than
administrative costs described in ORS 284.890 (5) that are directly related to this section.
SECTION 13.
This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[6]