Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “child care facility”  has the meaning given that
term in ORS 329A.250.
(2) The Department of Early Learning and Care may acquire ownership of, or  enter into
a contract with a public  or private entity to use, up to three approximately one-quarter-acre
parcels in Deschutes County for the development of up to three child care facilities.
(3) For every parcel  acquired or contracted for under subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall:
(a) Enter into a contract with a developer for  a maximum of $3,000,000 to construct up
to a 6,000 square foot, commercial-grade  building that is suitable to function as a child care
facility.
(b) Lease the building to a person qualified to operate a  certified child care facility, as
described in ORS 329A.280, at an annual rate not to exceed 10 percent of the market rate for
comparable buildings in the county.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Early Learning  and Care, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $9,000,000, which shall be expended for the  purpose
of implementing section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4373