Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4305
SB 1022
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this  2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 327.006 to
327.133.
SECTION 2. (1) Each even-numbered  year, the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services shall prepare a tentative budget for funding the State  School Fund for the next
biennium.
(2)(a) For the purpose of preparing the tentative budget, the department  shall form a
committee. The committee must include:
(A) Representatives from the Department  of Education, the Legislative Fiscal Office, the
Legislative Revenue Officer and the Governor’s office;
(B) Representatives of school  districts, school budget committees, school business offi-
cials and education labor unions; and
(C) The cochairs of the Joint Committee on Ways and Means.
(b) The representatives from the Legislative Fiscal  Office and the Legislative Revenue
Officer and the cochairs of the  Joint Committee on Ways and Means shall serve as nonvoting
members on the committee formed under this subsection.
(3) In preparing the tentative  budget, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
shall review with the committee formed under subsection (2) of this section  the components
of the methodology  that will be used to prepare the tentative budget and the calculations for
the tentative budget. The department shall collaborate with  the committee to refine the
methodology by considering alternative approaches to the calculations and other factors the
committee believes may be pertinent to the preparation of the tentative budget. The  de-
partment shall collaborate with  the committee prior to finalizing the tentative budget re-
quired under this section. The tentative budget shall include:
(a) Projected changes in the cost of  personal services, other services, supplies and capital
expenditures, based on anticipated expenses;
(b) Forecasted local revenues, as described in ORS 327.011 and as calculated by  the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the Legislative  Fiscal Officer, the Legislative
Revenue Officer and the Department of Revenue; and
(c) Projected cost factors that may arise from new laws and administrative rules.
(4) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall present the tentative  budget
prepared under this section to the Governor and  to the Legislative Assembly in conjunction
with submittal of the agency request budget of the Department of Education.
[2]