Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 13, chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  (1) Section 2 , chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2023, [of this 2023 Act ] and the amendments
to ORS 419B.005 by sections 3 and 4 , chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2023,  [ of this 2023 Act ] apply  to
incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2023.
(2) The amendments to ORS 419B.005 by sections 5 and 6 , chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2023,
[of this 2023 Act ] apply to incidents occurring on or after  [ July 1, 2028 ] the effective date of this
2025 Act.
[(3) The quarterly report described  in the amendments to ORS 419B.019 by section 7 of this 2023
Act is first due on January 1, 2024. ]
SECTION 2. Sections 8, 12 and 14, chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2023, are repealed.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4071