Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) There is appropriated to the Bureau of Labor and  Industries, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $10 million for dis-
tribution to the Apprenticeship and Training Division of the bureau for  the purpose of pro-
moting registered apprenticeship programs  that provide training in apprenticeable
occupations, including construction, mechanic, plumbing and electrical  occupations, in rural
areas with above-average concentrations of high unemployment, high rent burden  or lack
of affordable housing, or that are prone to wildfires.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Rural area” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285A.010.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1914