Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Transportation, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for distribution  to the City of Portland for the pur-
pose of designing a bridge over Columbia Boulevard.
SECTION 2. (1) The City of Portland is encouraged to seek and apply for federal  funding
to aid in the design and construction of a bridge across Columbia Boulevard.
(2) No later than September 15, 2026, the City of Portland shall provide a  report to the
Joint Committee on Transportation, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the  progress
of obtaining federal funds for the bridge across Columbia Boulevard.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2268