Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Judicial Department shall study options for making the administration
of decedents’ estates  more efficient. The department shall submit a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to the judiciary no later than September 15,
2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4366