Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 803.422 is amended to read:
803.422. (1) As used in  this section, “miles per gallon” or “MPG” means the distance traveled
in a vehicle powered by one gallon of fuel.
(2) The Department of Transportation shall determine  the combined MPG ratings for each motor
vehicle pursuant to a method determined by the department.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 319.890 (3), in addition to the  registration fees prescribed under
ORS 803.420 (6)(a), there shall be paid for each year of the registration period, an  additional amount
as follows:
(a) For vehicles that have a rating of 0-19 MPG, $20.
(b) For vehicles that have a rating of 20-39 MPG, $25.
(c) For vehicles that have a rating of 40 MPG or greater, $35.
(d) For electric vehicles, [ $115] $200.
SECTION 2.
(1) The amounts attributable to the increase in vehicle registration sur-
charge fees by  the amendments to ORS 803.422 by section 1 of this 2025 Act shall be deposited
in the State Highway Fund and allocated for distribution as follows:
(a) 50 percent to the Department of Transportation.
(b) 30 percent  shall be appropriated for distribution among the several counties for de-
posit in the highway funds of the counties.
(c) 20 percent shall be appropriated for distribution among the several cities for deposit
in the highway funds of the cities.
(2) Distributions among the counties and cities under subsection (1)(b) and (c) of  this
section shall be made in the proportion that the number  of electric vehicles registered to an
address in each county or city bears  to the total number of electric vehicles registered in
this state to an address in all counties and cities, respectively.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 366.766 is amended to read:
366.766. The [ appropriation] appropriations made by ORS 366.762 and section 2 of this 2025
Act shall be remitted to the counties on a monthly basis within 35 days after the end of  the month
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1874
HB 2430
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
for which a distribution is made in an  amount determined in ORS 366.739 and 366.762 and section
2 of this 2025 Act  and credited to the highway fund for such remittance.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 366.810 is amended to read:
366.810. Funds accrued and  payable to cities under ORS 366.785 to 366.820 and section 2 of this
2025 Act  shall be  remitted on a monthly basis within 35 days after the end of the month for which
a distribution  is made by the Department of Transportation to the financial officer of each city. The
funds appropriated shall be apportioned on or before the last day  of each month by the department,
which shall certify to the apportionment. Upon such  certification, warrants shall be drawn payable
to the cities in the amounts set out.
SECTION 5. The amendments to ORS 803.422 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to reg-
istration periods for electric vehicles  occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[2]