Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Respite care” means planned or emergency short-term  care for a child or youth with
behavioral health needs to provide  short-term relief to the parent or guardian of the child
or youth.
(2) Respite care services shall be provided through the state medical assistance  program
to provide relief to unpaid caregivers of individuals  under the age of 26 who have complex
mental health or substance use-related needs.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority shall support  the development and maintenance of re-
spite care services by coordinated care organizations using any available funding mechanisms
and other resources.
(4) The authority shall ensure that sufficient agency staff resources are allocated to:
(a) Develop an application for a waiver or a demonstration project or to seek other fed-
eral approval that is necessary to secure federal funding to implement subsection (2) of this
section; and
(b) Provide adequate access to respite care services  throughout this state in coordination
with community partners.
SECTION 2.
(1) No later than January 1, 2026,  the Oregon Health Authority shall seek
any waiver or other necessary authority from  the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Ser-
vices to secure federal financial participation in the costs of carrying out section  1 of this
2025 Act.
(2) The  authority shall notify the Legislative Counsel immediately upon receipt of the
approval or denial of the request under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3. (1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on the  date on which the
Legislative Counsel receives notice of the federal approval as provided under  section 2 of this
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4667
SB 1197
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
2025 Act.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection  (1) of this section that is necessary for the authority to exercise, on and after
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the  powers, duties and
functions conferred on the authority by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]