Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Public Employees Retirement Board shall study age qualifications  for
retirement. The board shall submit a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to general government no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2909