Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 6 of this 2019 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
459A.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 6 of this 2019 Act:
(1)(a) “Retail establishment” means any store in this  state that sells or offers for sale
raw or processed food or alcohol at retail.
(b) “Retail establishment” does not mean an establishment where  the primary business
is the preparation of food or drink:
(A) For consumption by the public;
(B) In a form or quantity that is consumable immediately, whether or not it is  consumed
within the confines of the place where prepared; or
(C) In consumable form for consumption outside the place where prepared.
(2)(a) “Single-use plastic  checkout bag” means a bag made of plastic that is provided by
a retail establishment to a customer at the time of checkout.
(b) “Single-use plastic checkout bag” does not mean a bag made of plastic that is provided
by a retail establishment to a customer at a time other than the time of checkout.
SECTION 3.
(1) An excise tax of five cents per bag is imposed on the provision of
single-use plastic checkout bags.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of  this section, the excise tax does not apply to the
provision of single-use plastic checkout bags to:
(a) Customers who  use a voucher issued under the Women, Infants and Children Pro-
gram established in the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 413.500.
(b) Customers who use an electronic benefits transfer card  issued by the Department of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 795
HB 2766
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Human Services.
(3) The retail establishment that  provides the single-use plastic checkout bag shall add
the amount of the tax due to the customer’s  bill at the time of checkout and the amount
shall be separately identified on the receipt given to the customer.
(4) Retail establishments shall make  single-use paper checkout bags available to cus-
tomers at the time of checkout.
(5) Each retail establishment must have at least one conveniently located receptacle
where customers may return single-use plastic checkout bags for  recycling, reuse or other
form of disposal.
SECTION 4. (1)(a) A retail establishment shall remit to the Department of Environmental
Quality all moneys collected pursuant to the excise tax on the  provision of single-use plastic
checkout bags imposed under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(b) All moneys received by the department  under this section shall be deposited in the
Plastic Clean-Up and Recycling Fund established under section 5 of this 2019 Act.
(2)(a) The Environmental Quality  Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement
sections 2 to 6 of  this 2019 Act, including rules prescribing the method by which retail es-
tablishments shall remit all moneys collected pursuant to the  excise tax on the provision of
single-use plastic checkout bags.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the commission  may not require a
retail establishment to remit moneys collected pursuant to the excise tax more often than
once each month.
(3) The department  may require a retail establishment to provide, within a reasonable
time, information necessary to ensure compliance with this section and section 3 of  this 2019
Act.
SECTION 5.
The Plastic Clean-Up and Recycling Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.  All moneys in the Plastic Clean-Up and
Recycling Fund are continuously appropriated  to the Department of Environmental Quality
to be used for programs or activities that clean up  plastic waste and promote plastic recy-
cling.
SECTION 6. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality  may impose a civil penalty on
a retail establishment for a violation of any provision of  section 3 of this 2019 Act or rules
adopted pursuant to section 4 of this 2019 Act.
(2) A civil penalty imposed under this section for a violation of section 3  of this 2019 Act
may not exceed $500.
(3) Civil penalties described in this section shall be imposed in  the manner provided in
ORS 183.745.
(4) All penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and
credited to the Plastic Clean-Up and  Recycling Fund established under section 5 of this 2019
Act.
SECTION 7. (1) Sections 2 to 6 of this 2019 Act become operative on July 1, 2020.
(2) Notwithstanding the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, a  retail
establishment with  fewer than 50 employees may not be subject to a civil penalty under
section 6 of this 2019 Act for a violation that occurs on or before January 1, 2021.
(3) The Environmental Quality Commission may  adopt rules and take any other action
before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to im-
[2]
HB 2766
1
2
3
4
5
plement, on or after the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this section, sections 2
to 6 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]