Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 496.
SECTION 2. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that barred  owls are known to prey on
spotted owls.
(2) The State Fish and Wildlife Commission shall:
(a) Issue an order authorizing the taking of barred owls; and
(b) Establish programs that award $5 for each taking of a barred owl.
SECTION 3.
There is appropriated to the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the
biennium beginning July 1,  2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $100,000 for the
purpose specified in section 2 (2)(b) of this 2021 Act. This appropriation is  available contin-
uously until expended for the purpose specified in section 2 (2)(b) of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1999