Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 137.765 is amended to read:
137.765. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “History  of sexual assault” means that a person has engaged in unlawful sexual conduct that:
(A) Was not committed as part of the  same criminal episode as the crime for which the person
is currently being sentenced; and
(B) Seriously endangered the life or  safety of another person or involved a victim under 12 years
of age.
(b) “Sexually violent dangerous offender” means a person who has  psychopathic personality
features, sexually deviant arousal patterns or interests and a history of sexual assault  and presents
a substantial probability of committing a crime listed in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 161.605, when a person is convicted of a crime listed in subsection (3)
of this section, in addition to any sentence of imprisonment required by  law, a court shall impose
a period of post-prison supervision that extends for the life of the person if:
(a) The person was 18 years of age or older at the time the person committed the crime; and
(b) The person is a sexually violent dangerous offender.
(3) The crimes to which subsection (2) of this section applies are:
(a) Rape in the first degree and sodomy in the first degree if the victim was:
(A) Subjected to forcible compulsion by the person;
(B) Under 12 years of age; [ or]
(C) Under 14 years of age and is the person’s sibling, of the  whole or half blood, the
person’s child or the person’s spouse’s child; or
[(C)] (D) Incapable of  consent by reason of mental incapacitation, physical helplessness or in-
capability of appraising the nature of the victim’s conduct;
(b) Unlawful sexual penetration in the first degree; [ and]
(c) An attempt to commit a crime listed in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection[ .];
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3948
SB 1083
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
(d) Rape in the second degree;
(e) Sodomy in the second degree;
(f) Unlawful sexual penetration in the second degree;
(g) Purchasing sex with a minor;
(h) Sexual abuse in the first degree; and
(i) Online sexual corruption of a child in the first degree.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]