Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall administer a pilot program to provide
low-barrier emergency  housing for houseless or unsafely housed individuals on waiting lists
for residential substance use disorder  treatment or withdrawal management programs. In
implementing the pilot program, the authority shall award grants to fund no fewer  than four
and no more than eight emergency housing programs statewide.
(2) The authority may award grants under this section to:
(a) Behavioral health organizations with substance use disorder experience; or
(b) Residential substance use disorder treatment providers.
(3) To qualify for a grant under this section, an applicant must:
(a) Demonstrate that proposed emergency housing units are in an approved  zoning dis-
trict;
(b) Provide a plan  for ensuring that participants have daily case management or peer
support services;
(c) Provide an operational plan that addresses security and oversight;
(d) Demonstrate that services will be provided with a trauma-informed lens; and
(e) Provide relevant financial and organizational information.
(4) To participate in the program, an individual must:
(a) Want treatment for problematic substance use;
(b) Be houseless or unsafely housed;
(c) Be assessed  as needing residential substance use disorder treatment or withdrawal
management;
(d) Be entered on  a waiting list for a residential substance use disorder treatment or
withdrawal management program;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1104
HB 3146
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
(e) Be able  to safely reside in a single occupancy unit without 24-hour supervision, sup-
port or monitoring;
(f) Be determined to not be at high risk of violence to self or others; and
(g) Agree to, when a bed becomes available  at a residential substance use disorder
treatment or withdrawal management program:
(A) Attend the program; or
(B) Leave emergency housing.
(5) The authority shall adopt rules to design  and implement the pilot program under this
section, including requirements  that emergency housing programs funded by grants under
this section:
(a) Not require participants to remain abstinent from substances; and
(b) When possible, give priority for emergency housing to pregnant women.
(6) No later than September 15, 2026, and every two years thereafter,  the authority shall
submit a report to the interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly related to health, in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the outcomes of the pilot program, including:
(a) The  number of emergency housing beds made available and the percentage of beds
filled;
(b) The length of participants’ stays; and
(c) Transition outcomes for participants leaving emergency housing.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, which may be  expended to carry out the pilot pro-
gram described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2033.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]