Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Available”  includes being accessible for use or other enjoyment on or off the prem-
ises of a subject library.
(2) “Library materials” means resources published  in any medium and accessible on any
platform, whether print or nonprint, visual or auditory, physical or electronic.
(3) “Public library” means a library that  is subject to the provisions of ORS 357.400 to
357.621.
(4) “Subject library” means public libraries, school libraries and any other  library that
receives financial assistance from the state and makes library materials available  to people
17 years of age and younger.
(5) “Unaccompanied” means not accompanied by a parent or adult guardian.
SECTION 2.
(1) The following rating system for library materials is established for sub-
ject libraries:
(a) G: General audiences - appropriate for all ages.
(b) PG: Parental guidance suggested - some library materials may not  be suitable for
children.
(c) PG-13: Parents strongly cautioned - some library materials may be inappropriate  for
children under 13.
(d) R: Restricted - under 17 requires accompanying parent or adult guardian.
(e) NC-17: Adults only - no one 17 or under.
(2)(a) Library materials shall be available to unaccompanied individuals as follows:
(A) For individuals who are 10 years of age or younger, only library materials rated G.
(B) For individuals who are 11 or 12 years of age, only library materials rated G or PG.
(C) For individuals who are 13 through 16 years of age, only  library materials rated G,
PG or PG-13.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1387
SB 212
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
(D) For individuals who are 17 years of age, only library materials  rated G, PG, PG-13
or R.
(E) For individuals who are 18 years of age or older, library materials with any rating.
(b) Library materials rated  PG, PG-13 or R shall be available to individuals under 17 years
of age who are accompanied by a parent or adult guardian.
(3) Separate rooms and sections in subject libraries for  specified age groups may not
contain or display library materials that may not be made available to that age group under
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Nothing in sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act may be construed  as constituting a ban on
any library materials in, or being considered for, the collection of a subject library.
SECTION 3.
(1) The State Librarian shall develop and maintain a central list of the
ratings of all library materials that is accessible to all subject libraries and the public.
(2)(a) The State Librarian  shall solicit ratings of library materials from all subject li-
braries.
(b) If the State Librarian receives conflicting ratings for any library materials, the  most
restrictive rating shall apply.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection,  the State Librarian may organize
a board to resolve ratings conflicts. The board shall have members selected by and serving
at the pleasure of the State Librarian.
(d) The resolution shall apply in all subject libraries.
(3) The  State Librarian may consult with the Oregon Library Association with respect
to any duty or authority established under this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) Library materials made available in accordance with section 2 (2)(a)(A)
of this 2025 Act  shall be rated not later than the date that is one year following the effective
date of this 2025 Act.
(2) All library materials shall  be rated not later than the date that is five years following
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(3) After subsection (2) of this section has been complied with, new library materials shall
be rated, and the ratings made accessible to all subject libraries, before the  new library
materials may be made available to subject library patrons.
[2]