Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2019 Act:
(1) “Public assistance” means:
(a) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits as defined in ORS 411.806.
(b) Oregon Supplemental Income Program benefits described in ORS 411.706.
(c) State Family Pre-SSI/SSDI program benefits under ORS 412.014.
(d) General assistance  as described in ORS 411.710 or benefits provided in the general
assistance project established in ORS 411.752.
(e) Health Care for All Oregon Children program benefits under ORS 414.231.
(f) Medical assistance, as defined in ORS 414.025, provided to  individuals described in ORS
414.706.
(2) “Subsidized business” means a business that:
(a) Employs directly, through its subsidiaries or through its franchisees, on business days
during the preceding calendar year, at  least 100 full-time or part-time employees in this
state; and
(b) Is primarily engaged in retail distribution or services, food service, hospitality ser-
vices or call center services.
(3) “Subsidized employee” means  an employee of a subsidized business who receives
public assistance or who receives public assistance on behalf of the employee’s minor child.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Taxpayer Reimbursement Fund is  created in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct  from the General Fund, and consists of moneys collected under section
3 of this 2019 Act.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department  of Revenue to
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2758
HB 3262
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be transferred as follows:
(a) The department shall transfer the following amounts to be deposited  in the Oregon
Rainy Day Fund established in ORS 293.144:
(A) Moneys attributable to state expenditures  in providing Supplemental Nutrition As-
sistance Program benefits to subsidized employees, after deducting and remitting  to the
United States Department of Agriculture the expenditures  reimbursed by the department,
which moneys shall be used to support the program;
(B) Moneys attributable to state  expenditures in providing Oregon Supplemental Income
Program benefits to subsidized employees,  after deducting and remitting to the United States
Department of Health and Human Services  the expenditures reimbursed by the department,
which moneys shall be used to support the program;
(C) Moneys attributable to  state expenditures in providing State Family Pre-SSI/SSDI
program benefits to subsidized employees, which moneys shall  be used to support the pro-
gram; and
(D) Moneys attributable to  state expenditures in providing general assistance cash pay-
ments to subsidized employees and in  providing assistance to subsidized employees through
the general assistance project,  which moneys shall be used to support the general assistance
program and the general assistance project.
(b) The department shall  transfer the following amounts to be deposited in the Oregon
Health Authority Fund established in ORS 413.101:
(A) Moneys attributable to state expenditures in providing Health Care  for All Oregon
Children program benefits to  children of subsidized employees, after deducting and remitting
to the United States Department of Health and Human Services  the expenditures reimbursed
by the department, which moneys shall be used to support the program; and
(B) Moneys attributable to state expenditures in providing  medical assistance to subsi-
dized employees described in ORS 414.706, after remitting to the United States Department
of Health and Human Services the expenditures reimbursed by the  department, which mon-
eys shall be used to support the program.
(c) The Department of Revenue shall retain a portion of the  funds and allocate a portion
of the funds to the Department of Human Services, the Oregon Health Authority  and the
Employment Department  to reimburse the costs of carrying out each agency’s responsibil-
ities under section 4 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) An assessment is imposed on a subsidized business for each tax year in
which the subsidized business employs a subsidized employee residing in this  state. The De-
partment of Revenue shall deposit assessments collected under this  section to the Taxpayer
Reimbursement Fund established in section 2 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The assessment imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall  be equal to the amount
the state paid in public assistance to the subsidized employees.
(3) The department  has all powers necessary to administer the collection and enforce-
ment of the assessment imposed by subsection (1) of this  section, including but not limited
to the power to:
(a) Adopt rules to administer and enforce this section;
(b) Subpoena documents and subpoena witnesses to testify under oath; and
(c) Institute or prosecute actions for the enforcement of this section.
(4) The department  shall annually send to each subsidized business subject to an assess-
[2]
HB 3262
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment under this section a notice of the amount of the assessment and the date that  the as-
sessment is due. The amount of the assessment shall  become conclusive and binding upon
the subsidized business  unless, within 20 days after the mailing of the notice to the last-
known address of the business as shown on the records of the department, or in the absence
of mailing, within 20 days after  the delivery of the notice, the subsidized business files a re-
quest for hearing. Hearings shall be conducted in accordance with ORS chapter 183.
(5) Interest of 10 percent per annum shall  be assessed on assessments not paid on or
before payment is  due. Interest shall begin to accrue the day after the date the payment is
due and shall be deposited into the Taxpayer Reimbursement Fund.
(6) If an assessment is more than 60 days overdue, a penalty equal to  the interest
charged as described in subsection (5)  of this section shall be assessed and due for each
month, or part thereof, that the assessment is not received.
(7) All penalties shall be paid to and collected by  the department at such times and in
such manner as the  department may prescribe and upon collection shall be deposited into the
Taxpayer Reimbursement Fund.
SECTION 4. (1) The Oregon Health Authority, the  Department of Human Services, the
Employment Department and the Department of Revenue shall enter  into interagency
agreements and take any steps necessary, including requesting  from a federal agency a
waiver of federal requirements, to share the data required to carry out the  provisions of this
section.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority, the Department of  Human Services and the Employ-
ment Department shall collaborate and share data as necessary to:
(a) Determine the employers in this state that are subsidized businesses; and
(b) Calculate the amount of public assistance in each category listed in  section 1 (1)(a)
of this 2019 Act paid to employees of subsidized businesses.
(3) The information shared under subsection 2  of this section shall be provided to the
Department of Revenue to permit the Department of Revenue to collect the assessment  un-
der section 3 of  this 2019 Act and to transfer moneys collected from the assessment to the
Oregon Rainy Day Fund and the  Oregon Health Authority Fund as provided in section 2 of
this 2019 Act.
(4) Any and all shared data  identifying employers and recipients of public assistance may
not be further disclosed for purposes other than the administration of this  section and sec-
tion 3 of this 2019 Act, and are:
(a) Subject to the confidentiality requirements in ORS 314.845,  411.300, 411.320, 413.171,
413.175 and 657.665; and
(b) Not subject to disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.378.
(5) The authority and the  Department of Human Services shall notify applicants for
public assistance that their Social Security numbers may  be used to determine employers
who are subject to the assessment under this section.
SECTION 5.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Employer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.001.
(b) “Public assistance” and “subsidized business” have the meaning given those terms  in
section 1 of this 2019 Act.
(2) It is an unlawful employment practice under ORS chapter 659A for  an employer to
discharge, demote, suspend, retaliate, refuse to hire or otherwise discriminate  against an
[3]
HB 3262
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
employee who applies for or receives public assistance for the employee or for a minor child.
(3) An employee who alleges a violation  of subsection (2) of this section may bring a civil
action under ORS 659A.885 or may file  a complaint with the Commissioner of the Bureau of
Labor and Industries in the manner provided by ORS 659A.820.
SECTION 6.  ORS 411.320 is amended to read:
411.320. (1) For the protection of applicants for and recipients  of public assistance, except as
otherwise provided in  this section, the Department of Human Services may not disclose or use the
contents of any public assistance records, files, papers  or communications for purposes other than
those directly connected with the  administration of the public assistance programs or necessary to
assist public assistance applicants and recipients in accessing  and receiving other governmental or
private nonprofit services,  and these records, files, papers and communications are considered con-
fidential subject to the rules of the department.  In any judicial or administrative proceeding, except
proceedings directly connected  with the administration of public assistance or child support
enforcement laws, their contents are considered privileged communications.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits the disclosure or use of contents of records, files,  papers
or communications for purposes directly connected with the establishment and enforcement of :
(a) Support obligations pursuant to the Title IV-D program ; or
(b) The assessment imposed under section 3 of this 2019 Act .
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits the  disclosure of the address, Social Security number and
photograph of any applicant or recipient  to a law enforcement officer at the request of the officer.
To receive information pursuant  to this section, the officer must furnish the agency the name of the
applicant or recipient and advise that the applicant or recipient:
(a) Is fleeing to avoid prosecution, custody or confinement after conviction for a felony;
(b) Is violating a condition of probation or parole; or
(c) Has information that is necessary  for the officer to conduct the official duties of the officer
and the location or apprehension of the applicant or recipient is within such official duties.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits disclosure of information between the  department and the
Oregon Health Authority for the purpose of administering public assistance programs.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 413.175 is amended to read:
413.175. (1) For the protection of applicants for  and recipients of public assistance and medical
assistance, as defined in  ORS 414.025, except as otherwise provided in this section, the Oregon
Health Authority may  not disclose or use the contents of any public assistance or medical assistance
records, files, papers or communications for purposes other than those directly connected with the
administration of the public assistance and medical assistance programs or necessary to assist public
assistance or medical assistance applicants and  recipients in accessing and receiving other govern-
mental or private nonprofit services, and these records, files, papers and  communications are con-
sidered confidential subject to  the rules of the authority. In any judicial or administrative
proceeding, except proceedings directly connected with the administration of  public assistance,
medical assistance or child support enforcement, their  contents are considered privileged communi-
cations.
(2) Nothing  in this section prohibits the disclosure or use of contents of records, files, papers
or communications for purposes directly connected with the establishment and enforcement of :
(a) Support obligations pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act ; or
(b) The assessment imposed under section 3 of this 2019 Act .
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits the disclosure of  the address, Social Security number and
[4]
HB 3262
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
photograph of any applicant or recipient to a law enforcement officer at  the request of the officer.
To receive information pursuant  to this section, the officer must furnish the agency the name of the
applicant or recipient and advise that the applicant or recipient:
(a) Is fleeing to avoid prosecution, custody or confinement after conviction for a felony;
(b) Is violating a condition of probation or parole; or
(c) Has information that is necessary for the officer to conduct the  official duties of the officer
and the location or apprehension of the applicant or recipient is within such official duties.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits disclosure  of information between the authority and the
Department of Human Services for the purpose of administering public assistance and medical as-
sistance programs that the authority and the department are responsible for administering.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 411.708 is amended to read:
411.708. (1)  The amount of any assistance paid under ORS 411.706 , other than assistance re-
imbursed by the assessment under section  3 of this 2019 Act,  is a claim against the property
or interest in the property belonging to and a part of the estate of any deceased recipient.  If the
deceased recipient has no estate, the estate of the surviving spouse of  the deceased recipient, if any,
shall be charged  for assistance granted under ORS 411.706 to the deceased recipient or the surviving
spouse. There shall be no adjustment or recovery of assistance correctly paid on behalf of  any de-
ceased recipient under ORS 411.706 except after the death of the surviving spouse of the  deceased
recipient, if any, and only at a  time when the deceased recipient has no surviving child who is under
21 years of age or  who is blind or has a disability. Transfers of real or personal property by re-
cipients of assistance without adequate consideration are voidable and may be set aside  under ORS
411.620 (2).
(2) Except when there is a surviving spouse, or a surviving child  who is under 21 years of age
or who is blind or has a disability, the amount of any assistance paid under ORS 411.706  is a claim
against the estate in any conservatorship proceedings and may be paid pursuant to ORS 125.495.
(3) Nothing in this section authorizes the recovery of the amount of any assistance from the
estate or surviving spouse of a recipient to the extent that  the need for assistance resulted from a
crime committed against the recipient.
SECTION 9.  ORS 416.310 is amended to read:
416.310. (1) Except as  otherwise provided by ORS 411.708  and 416.350 , the estate of every de-
ceased person who received aid from the  state or any county or whose burial expenses have been
paid by the state or  any county, other than aid received pursuant to ORS 412.006, 444.120 or 444.220,
is liable for the actual cost of such aid so rendered or the actual expenses  of such burial  minus
any amounts reimbursed by the assessment under section 3 of this 2019  Act . The state or the
county shall have a just and valid claim against such estate therefor.
(2) Nothing in this section relieves the parents, children, brothers  or sisters of any needy person
from their obligation to support such person, or  prevents the county court from recovering for such
support.
(3) Nothing in this section authorizes  the recovery of the amount of any aid from the estate or
surviving spouse of a recipient to the extent that the need for aid resulted from a crime  committed
against the recipient.
SECTION 10.  ORS 416.350 is amended to read:
416.350. (1) The Department of Human Services or the  Oregon Health Authority may recover
from any person  the amounts of medical assistance the department or the authority incorrectly paid
to or on behalf of the person.
[5]
HB 3262
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Except as prohibited by ORS 178.380, medical assistance pursuant to ORS chapter 414 paid
to or on behalf of  an individual who was 55 years of age or older when the individual received the
assistance, or paid to or  on behalf of a person of any age who was a permanently institutionalized
inpatient in  a nursing facility, intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities or
other medical institution, may be recovered from  the estate of the individual or from any recipient
of property or other assets held by the individual at the time of  death including the estate of the
surviving spouse. Claim for such medical assistance correctly paid to or on behalf  of the individual
may be established against the estate, but the claim may not be adjusted or recovered until  after
the death of the surviving spouse, if any, and only at a time when the individual has  no surviving
child who is under 21 years of age or who is  blind or permanently and totally disabled. Transfers
of real or personal property by recipients of such aid without adequate  consideration are voidable
and may be set aside under ORS 411.620 (2).
(3) Nothing in this section authorizes  the recovery of the amount of any aid from the estate or
surviving spouse of a recipient to the extent that the need for aid resulted from a crime  committed
against the recipient.
(4) In any action or proceeding under this section to recover medical assistance paid, it is the
legal burden of the person who receives  the property or other assets from a medical assistance re-
cipient to establish the extent and value of the recipient’s legal  title or interest in the property or
assets in accordance with rules established by the authority.
(5) Amounts recovered under this section do not include the value of benefits  paid to or on be-
half of a beneficiary under a policy or certificate of  qualified long term care insurance as defined
in ORS 743.652, that were  disregarded in determining eligibility for or the amount of medical as-
sistance provided to the beneficiary.
(6) A claim for medical  assistance under this section shall be reduced by any amount that
is reimbursed by the assessment under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
[(6)] (7) As used in this section:
(a) “Estate” includes all real and personal property and other assets  in which the deceased in-
dividual had any legal title or interest at the  time of death including assets conveyed to a survivor,
heir or assign of the deceased individual through joint tenancy, tenancy in common,  survivorship,
life estate, living trust or other similar arrangement.
(b) “Medical assistance” includes  the state’s monthly contribution to the federal government to
defray the costs of outpatient prescription drug coverage provided to a person who is eligible  for
Medicare Part D prescription drug coverage and who receives medical assistance.
SECTION 11.  ORS 475B.755 is amended to read:
475B.755. Except as otherwise provided in ORS 475B.700 to 475B.760  or where the context re-
quires otherwise, the provisions of ORS chapters 305  and 314 as to the audit and examination of
returns, periods of limitation, determination of and notices of  deficiencies, assessments, collections,
liens, delinquencies, claims  for refund and refunds, conferences, appeals to the Oregon Tax Court,
stays of collection pending appeal, confidentiality  of returns and the penalties relative thereto, and
the procedures relating thereto, apply  to the determinations of taxes, penalties and interest under
ORS 475B.700 to  475B.760 and to assessments, penalties and interest under section 3 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 12.  ORS 657.665 is amended to read:
657.665. (1) Except as provided in subsections  (2) to (5) of this section, all information in the
records of the Employment Department  pertaining to the administration of the unemployment in-
[6]
HB 3262
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
surance, employment service and workforce and labor market information programs:
(a) Is confidential and for the exclusive use and information of the Director of  the Employment
Department in administering the  unemployment insurance, employment service and workforce and
labor market information programs in Oregon.
(b) May not be used in any court action or in any proceeding  pending in the court unless the
director or the state is a party  to the action or proceeding or unless the proceeding concerns the
establishment, enforcement or modification of a support obligation and  support services are being
provided by the Division of Child Support or the district attorney pursuant to ORS 25.080.
(c) Is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(2) The Employment Department shall disclose information:
(a) To any claimant or legal representative, at a hearing before an administrative law judge,  to
the extent necessary for the proper presentation of an unemployment insurance claim.
(b) Upon request to the United States Secretary  of Labor. The Employment Department shall
disclose the information in a form and  containing the information that the United States Secretary
of Labor may require. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be  used for any other
purpose.
(c) Pursuant to  section 303(a)(7) of the Social Security Act, upon request to any agency of the
United States charged with the administration of public works or  assistance through public em-
ployment. Under this paragraph, the Employment Department shall  disclose the name, address, or-
dinary occupation and employment status of each recipient of  unemployment insurance benefits and
a statement of the recipient’s right  to further benefits under this chapter. The information disclosed
is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose.
(d) Pursuant to section 303(c)(1) of the Social  Security Act, to the Railroad Retirement Board.
Under this paragraph, the Employment Department  shall disclose unemployment insurance records.
The information disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any  other purpose. The costs of
disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by the board.
(e) Pursuant  to section 303(d) of the Social Security Act, upon request to officers and employees
of the United States Department of Agriculture and  to officers or employees of any state Supple-
mental Nutrition Assistance Program agency for the purpose of determining an individual’s  eligibil-
ity for or the amount of supplemental nutrition assistance. The  information disclosed is confidential
and may not be used for any  other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph
shall be paid by the United States Department of Agriculture.
(f) Pursuant to section 303(e)(1) and (2)(A)(ii) of the Social Security Act, to state  or local child
support enforcement agencies enforcing child support obligations under Title IV-D of the  Social Se-
curity Act for the purposes of  establishing child support obligations, locating individuals owing child
support obligations and collecting child  support obligations from those individuals. The information
disclosed is confidential and may not be used for  any other purpose. The costs of disclosing infor-
mation under this paragraph shall be paid by the child support enforcement agency.
(g) Pursuant to sections 303(f) and 1137 of  the Social Security Act, to agencies participating in
the income and  eligibility verification system for the purpose of verifying an individual’s eligibility
for benefits, or the  amount of benefits, under unemployment insurance, temporary assistance for
needy families, Medicaid, the Supplemental Nutrition  Assistance Program, Supplemental Security
Income, child support  enforcement or Social Security programs. The information disclosed is confi-
dential and may not be used for any other purpose. The  costs of disclosing information under this
paragraph shall be paid by the requesting agency.
[7]
HB 3262
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) Pursuant to section 303(h) of the Social Security Act and section 3304(a)(16)(B) of the Federal
Unemployment Tax Act, to the United States Department  of Health and Human Services National
Directory of New Hires. The information disclosed is confidential and may  not be used for any other
purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by the  United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
(i) Pursuant to section 303(i) of the Social Security  Act, to officers and employees of the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development and to representatives of a public housing
agency for the purpose  of determining an individual’s eligibility for benefits, or the amount of ben-
efits, under a housing assistance program of the United States Department of Housing and  Urban
Development. The information disclosed is confidential and may not  be used for any other purpose.
The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by  the United States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development or the public housing agency.
(j) Pursuant to regulations of the United States Secretary of  Health and Human Services issued
under section 3304(a)(16)(A) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, and except as required by sec-
tion 303 of the Social Security Act, to the state, a political  subdivision or a federally recognized
Indian tribe that has signed an  agreement with the Department of Human Services to administer
Part A of Title IV of the Social Security Act for the purpose of determining an individual’s eligibility
for assistance, or the amount of assistance, under a  program funded under Part A of Title IV of the
Social Security Act. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be  used for any other
purpose.
(k) Upon request, to  the United States Attorney’s Office. Under this paragraph, the Employment
Department may disclose an individual’s employment and wage information in response to a  federal
grand jury subpoena or for the purpose  of collecting civil and criminal judgments, including
restitution and special assessment  fees. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be
used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid
by the United States Attorney’s Office.
(3) The Employment Department may disclose information secured from employing units:
(a) To state agencies, federal agencies, local  government agencies, public universities listed in
ORS 352.002 and the Oregon Health and Science University established under  ORS 353.020, to the
extent necessary  to properly carry out governmental planning, performance measurement, program
analysis, socioeconomic analysis or policy analysis  functions performed under applicable law. The
information disclosed is confidential and may not be disclosed by the agencies or universities in any
manner that would identify individuals, claimants, employees  or employing units. If the information
disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs
of disclosing the information shall be paid by the agency or university requesting the information.
(b) As part of a geographic information system. Points on a map may  be used to represent eco-
nomic data, including the  location, employment size class and industrial classification of businesses
in Oregon. Information presented  as part of a geographic information system may not give specific
details regarding a business’s address, actual employment or  proprietary information. If the infor-
mation disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use  of the Employment Department,
the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the party requesting the information.
(c) In accordance with ORS 657.673.
(4) The Employment Department may:
(a) Disclose information to public employees in the performance of their  duties under state or
federal laws relating to the payment of  unemployment insurance benefits, the provision of employ-
[8]
HB 3262
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment services and the provision of workforce and labor market information.
(b) At the discretion of the Director of the Employment Department and subject to an  intera-
gency agreement, disclose information to public officials in the performance  of their official duties
administering or enforcing laws within their authority and to the  agents or contractors of public
officials. The public official shall agree to assume responsibility for misuse of the information by
the official’s agent or contractor.
(c) Disclose information pursuant  to an informed consent, received from an employer or claim-
ant, to disclose the information.
(d) Disclose information to partners under the federal Workforce Innovation  and Opportunity
Act for the purpose of administering state workforce programs  under the Act. The information dis-
closed is confidential and may not be  used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information
under this paragraph shall be paid by the requesting partner.
(e) Disclose the names and addresses of employing units to the  Bureau of Labor and Industries
for the purpose of disseminating information to employing units.  The names and addresses disclosed
are confidential and may  not be used for any other purpose. If the information disclosed under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of the  Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the bureau.
(f) Disclose information to the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and  Industries for the
purpose of performing duties under ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870,  658.005 to 658.245 or 658.405 to
658.503 or ORS chapter 652, 653 or 659A. The information disclosed may include the names and ad-
dresses of employers and employees and payroll data of employers and employees. The  information
disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose. If the information disclosed
under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment  Department, the costs of dis-
closing the information shall be paid by the bureau.
(g) Disclose information required under ORS 657.660 (3)  and (4) to the Public Employees Re-
tirement System for the purpose of determining the eligibility of members  of the retirement system
for disability under  ORS chapters 238 and 238A. The information disclosed is confidential and may
not be used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph  shall
be paid by the Public Employees Retirement System.
(h) Disclose to the Oregon Business Development Commission  and the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department information required by the commission  and the department in performing their
duties under  ORS 285A.050 and 285B.630 to verify changes in employment levels following direct
employer participation in department programs or indirect participation through  municipalities un-
der ORS 285B.410 to 285B.482. The information disclosed to the commission  and the department may
include an employer’s employment level, total subject  wages payroll and whole hours worked. The
information disclosed is confidential and may not  be used for any other purpose. The commission
and the  department may not disclose the information in any manner that would identify an employ-
ing unit or employee except to the  extent necessary to carry out the commission’s and the
department’s duties under ORS 285A.050 and 285B.630. If the information disclosed under this para-
graph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs  of disclosing the infor-
mation shall be paid by the commission or the Oregon Business Development Department.
(i) Disclose information to the Department of Revenue for the purpose of performing its  duties
under ORS 293.250  or section 3 of this 2019 Act  or under the  revenue and tax laws of this state.
The information disclosed may include the names and addresses of employers and  employees and
payroll data of employers and employees. The information disclosed is confidential and may  not be
[9]
HB 3262
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
disclosed by the Department of Revenue in  any manner that would identify an employing unit or
employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the  department’s duties under ORS 293.250 or
in auditing or reviewing any report or return required or permitted  to be filed under the revenue
and tax laws administered by the department. The Department of Revenue may not disclose any in-
formation received to any private collection  agency or for any other purpose. If the information
disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs
of disclosing the information shall be paid by the Department of Revenue.
(j) Disclose information to  the Department of Consumer and Business Services for the purpose
of performing  its duties under ORS chapters 654 and 656. The information disclosed may include the
name, address, number of employees and industrial classification code of  an employer and payroll
data of employers and employees. The information disclosed is confidential and may  not be disclosed
by the Department of Consumer and Business Services  in any manner that would identify an em-
ploying unit or employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the department’s  duties under
ORS chapters 654 and 656, including administrative hearings and court proceedings in which the
Department of Consumer and Business Services is a party. If the information disclosed under  this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of the  Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(k) Disclose information to the Construction  Contractors Board for the purpose of performing
its duties under ORS chapter 701.  The information disclosed to the board may include the names and
addresses of employers and status of their compliance with this chapter. If the information  disclosed
under this paragraph is not prepared  for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of dis-
closing the information shall be paid by the board.
(L) Disclose information to  the State Fire Marshal to assist the State Fire Marshal in carrying
out duties under ORS 453.307 to 453.414. The  information disclosed may include the name, address,
telephone number and industrial classification code of an employer. The information disclosed  is
confidential and may not be disclosed by the State Fire Marshal in any manner that would  identify
an employing unit except to the extent necessary to carry out duties under ORS  453.307 to 453.414.
If the information  disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment
Department, the costs of disclosing  the information shall be paid by the office of the State Fire
Marshal.
(m) Disclose information to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  for the purpose of
performing the commission’s duties under ORS  chapter 348 and Title IV of the Higher Education
Act of 1965. The information disclosed may include the names and addresses of employers and em-
ployees and payroll data of employers and employees. The  information disclosed is confidential and
may not be disclosed by the commission in any manner that  would identify an employing unit or
employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duties under  ORS chapter
348 or Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965.  If the information disclosed under this para-
graph is not prepared for  the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the infor-
mation shall be paid by the commission.
(n) Disclose information to the Department of Transportation to  assist the Department of
Transportation  in  carrying out the duties of the Department of Transportation relating to collection
of delinquent and liquidated debts, including taxes,  under ORS 184.610 to 184.665, 184.670 to 184.733
and 805.263, ORS chapter 319 and the Oregon Vehicle Code. The information disclosed may include
the names and addresses of employers and employees and payroll data of employers and employees.
The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be disclosed by the Department of Transpor-
[10]
HB 3262
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tation in any manner that  would identify an employing unit or employee except to the extent nec-
essary to carry out the Department of Transportation’s duties relating  to collection of delinquent
and liquidated debts or in auditing or reviewing any report or return required or permitted  to be
filed under the revenue and tax laws administered  by the Department of Transportation. The De-
partment of Transportation may not disclose any information received to any private collection
agency or for any other  purpose. If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared
for the use of the Employment Department,  the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by
the Department of Transportation.
(o) Disclose information to the Department of Human Services and the  Oregon Health Authority
to assist the Department of Human Services and the Oregon Health  Authority  in the performance
of their duties under section  4 of this 2019 Act or  in the collection of debts that the Department
of Human Services and the Oregon Health  Authority are authorized by law to collect. The infor-
mation disclosed may include the names, addresses and payroll data of  employers and employees.
The information disclosed is confidential and may not be disclosed by  the Department of Human
Services or the Oregon Health Authority in a manner that would identify an employing unit or em-
ployee except to the extent necessary for the performance of their duties under section 4 of this
2019 Act or for  the collection of debts as described in this paragraph. The Department of Human
Services and the Oregon Health Authority may not disclose information received under this para-
graph to a private  collection agency or use the information for a purpose other than the collection
of debts as described in this paragraph. If the  information disclosed under this paragraph is not
prepared for the use of  the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall
be paid by the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority.
(p) Disclose to the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission information  required by the commission
in evaluating and measuring the performance of alcohol and drug prevention  and treatment pro-
grams under ORS 430.242 or the impact  of the programs on employment. The information disclosed
to the commission may include total  subject wages payroll and whole hours worked. The information
disclosed under this paragraph is confidential and may not be used for any  other purpose. The
commission may not disclose the information in any manner that would identify an employing  unit
or employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duties under ORS  430.242.
If the information  disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment
Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the commission.
(q) Disclose to any person establishment level information secured  pursuant to this chapter from
federal, state and local government agencies, public universities listed  in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon
Health and Science University established under ORS 353.020. If the information disclosed under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of the  Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the person requesting the information.
(r) Disclose to any person the industrial classification code assigned to an employing  unit. If the
information disclosed under this paragraph is not  prepared for the use of the Employment Depart-
ment, the costs of disclosing the  information shall be paid by the person requesting the information.
(5) The Employment Department may make public all decisions  of the Employment Appeals
Board.
(6) Any officer appointed by or any employee of the Director of  the Employment Department
who discloses  confidential information, except with the authority of the director, pursuant to rules
or as otherwise required by law, may be disqualified from holding any appointment or employment
with the Employment Department.
[11]
HB 3262
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) Any person or any officer or employee of an entity to whom information  is disclosed by the
Employment Department under this section  who divulges or uses the information for any purpose
other than that specified in the provision of law or agreement authorizing the use or  disclosure may
be disqualified  from performing any service under contract or disqualified from holding any ap-
pointment or employment with the state agency that engaged or  employed that person, officer or
employee. The Employment Department  may immediately cancel or modify any information sharing
agreement with an entity when a person or an officer or employee of that entity  discloses confi-
dential information, other than as specified in law or agreement.
SECTION 13.  ORS 659A.885, as amended by sections 9 and 10,  chapter 197, Oregon Laws 2017,
and section 13, chapter 691, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
659A.885. (1) Any person claiming to be  aggrieved by an unlawful practice specified in sub-
section (2) of this section may file  a civil action in circuit court. In any action under this subsection,
the court may order injunctive relief and any other equitable  relief that may be appropriate, in-
cluding but not limited to reinstatement or the hiring of employees with or without back pay.  A
court may order back pay in an action under this subsection only for the two-year period imme-
diately preceding the filing  of a complaint under ORS 659A.820 with the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries, or  if a complaint was not filed before the action was commenced, the two-
year period immediately preceding the filing of the action.  In any action under this subsection, the
court  may  allow the prevailing party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal. Ex-
cept as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The judge shall determine the facts in an action under this subsection; and
(b) Upon any appeal of a judgment in an action under this subsection, the appellate court  shall
review the judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (3).
(2) An action may be brought under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of:
(a) ORS  10.090, 10.092, 25.337, 25.424, 171.120, 408.230, 408.237 (2), 475B.281, 476.574, 652.020,
652.220, 652.355, 653.060, 653.263, 653.265, 653.547, 653.549,  653.601 to 653.661, 659.852, 659A.030,
659A.040, 659A.043,  659A.046, 659A.063, 659A.069, 659A.082, 659A.088, 659A.103 to 659A.145,
659A.150 to 659A.186, 659A.194, 659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.218, 659A.228, 659A.230,  659A.233,
659A.236, 659A.250  to 659A.262, 659A.277, 659A.290, 659A.300, 659A.306, 659A.309, 659A.315,
659A.318, 659A.320, 659A.355, 659A.357 or 659A.421  or section 5 of this 2019 Act ; or
(b) ORS 653.470, except an action may not be brought for a claim relating to ORS 653.450.
(3) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging  a violation of ORS 25.337, 25.424,
652.220, 652.355, 653.547, 653.549, 659.852, 659A.030, 659A.040,  659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.069,
659A.082, 659A.103 to 659A.145, 659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.228,  659A.230, 659A.250 to 659A.262,
659A.290, 659A.318, 659A.355, 659A.357 or 659A.421  or section 5 of this 2019 Act :
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater, and punitive damages;
(b) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(c) Upon  appeal of any judgment finding a violation, the appellate court shall review the judg-
ment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1); and
(d) Any attorney fee agreement shall be subject to approval by the court.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS  31.730, in an action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a vi-
olation of ORS 652.220, the court may award punitive damages if:
(a) It is proved by  clear and convincing evidence that an employer has engaged in fraud, acted
with malice or acted with willful and wanton misconduct; or
[12]
HB 3262
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) An employer was previously adjudicated in a proceeding  under this section or under ORS
659A.850 for a violation of ORS 652.220.
(5) In any action under subsection (1) of this  section alleging a violation of ORS 653.060, the
court may award,  in addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater.
(6) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS  171.120, 476.574
or 659A.218, the court may award, in addition to  the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this
section, compensatory damages or $250, whichever is greater.
(7) In any action under  subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 10.090 or 10.092,
the court may award, in  addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section, a civil
penalty in the amount of $720.
(8) Any individual against whom any distinction,  discrimination or restriction on account of
race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, marital status  or age, if the individual
is 18 years of age or older, has been made by any place of public accommodation, as defined in ORS
659A.400, by any employee or person acting on behalf of the place or by  any person aiding or
abetting the place or person in violation of ORS 659A.406 may  bring an action against the operator
or manager of the  place, the employee or person acting on behalf of the place or the aider or abettor
of the place or person. Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, in an  action under this sub-
section:
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory and punitive damages;
(b) The operator or manager of the place of  public accommodation, the employee or person
acting on behalf of the place, and any aider or abettor shall  be jointly and severally liable for all
damages awarded in the action;
(c) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(d) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing plaintiff;
(e) The court may award reasonable attorney  fees and expert witness fees incurred by a de-
fendant who prevails only if the court determines that the  plaintiff had no objectively reasonable
basis for asserting a claim or no  reasonable basis for appealing an adverse decision of a trial court;
and
(f) Upon  any appeal of a judgment under this subsection, the appellate court shall review the
judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1).
(9) When the commissioner or the Attorney General  has reasonable cause to believe that a
person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of resistance to the rights  protected
by ORS  659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, or that a group of persons has been denied
any of the rights protected by ORS  659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, the commissioner
or the  Attorney General may file a civil action on behalf of the aggrieved persons in the same
manner as a person or group of persons may file a civil action  under this section. In a civil action
filed under this subsection, the court may assess against the  respondent, in addition to the relief
authorized under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a civil penalty:
(a) In an amount not exceeding $50,000 for a first violation; and
(b) In an amount not exceeding $100,000 for any subsequent violation.
(10) In any action under subsection (1) of this section  alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145 or
659A.421 or alleging discrimination under federal housing law, when  the commissioner is pursuing
the action on behalf of an aggrieved complainant, the  court shall award reasonable attorney fees to
[13]
HB 3262
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
the commissioner if the commissioner prevails in the action.  The court may award reasonable at-
torney fees and expert witness fees  incurred by a defendant that prevails in the action if the court
determines that the commissioner had no objectively reasonable basis for asserting the  claim or for
appealing an adverse decision of the trial court.
(11) In an action under subsection (1) or (9)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145
or 659A.421 or discrimination under federal housing law:
(a) “Aggrieved person” includes a person who believes that the person:
(A) Has been injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory housing practice; or
(B) Will be injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory housing  practice that is about to
occur.
(b) An aggrieved  person in regard to issues to be determined in an action may intervene as of
right in the action. The  Attorney General may intervene in the action if the Attorney General cer-
tifies that the case is  of general public importance. The court may allow an intervenor prevailing
party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal.
SECTION 14.
Section 3 of this 2019  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2022.
[14]