Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of  Education for the Educator Advancement Council, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $2,500,000, which
shall be used by the council to provide professional learning opportunities related to the
ethnic studies standards  adopted by the department, with priority given to opportunities for
school districts that have demonstrated a commitment to  implementing the standards before
implementation of the standards is required.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1271