Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2025, out  of the General Fund, to provide grants under section 1, chapter 103, Oregon Laws
2024, the following amounts:
(1) $14,000,000 to the City of  Coos Bay for infrastructure, including access road, culvert
replacement, pump station and force main and downstream sanitary system.
(2) $953,100 to the City of North  Bend for essential infrastructure, including water, road
construction, utility connections, storm drainage and sanitary sewer systems.
(3) $5,520,000 to the City of Florence for infrastructure, including street development and
systems for water, wastewater, stormwater and electrical.
(4) $11,858,300  to the City of Reedsport for infrastructure, including street crossing,
sanitary sewer system, water main and storm main.
SECTION 2.  Section 3, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Section 1 , chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2024,  [ of this 2024 Act ] is repealed on January
2, [2026] 2027.
SECTION 3.  Section 4, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  Section 2 , chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2024,  [ of this 2024 Act ] is repealed on  January
2, [2030] 2031.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4000