Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 427.191 is amended to read:
427.191. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Agency” means an agency that hires, trains and supervises direct support professionals us-
ing state funds received from the Department of Human Services.
(b) “Attendant care  services” means services provided directly to an individual with a disability
to assist with activities of daily living, instrumental activities of daily living and  health-related
tasks.
(c) “Average utilization” means  the average monthly hours of attendant care services
utilized in a month by a service group.
[(c)] (d) “Child” means an individual under 18 years of age who:
(A) Has a developmental or intellectual disability; or
(B) Meets the eligibility criteria to receive services under the Medically Fragile  (Hospital)
Model Waiver or the Medically Involved  Children’s Waiver approved by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services under 42 U.S.C. 1396n(c).
[(d)] (e)  “Client” means an individual who receives attendant care services.
[(e)] (f)  “Client child” means a child who receives  attendant care services from the child’s par-
ent.
(g) “Deficit number of hours” means the difference between the  average utilization for
a service group in a month and the number of hours of attendant  care services that are
utilized by a child in that service group in a month.
[(f)] (h)  “Developmental disability services” has the meaning given that term in ORS 427.101.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 13
SB 1565
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(g)] (i) “Direct support professional” means an individual who is hired, employed,  trained, paid
and supervised by an agency to provide attendant care services to a client of the agency.
[(h)] (j)  “Nonparent caregiver” means a direct support professional, personal support worker or
similar provider who is paid to provide attendant care services to clients who are not  the provider’s
children.
[(i)] (k)  “Parent” includes a:
(A) Natural or adoptive parent of a child;
(B) Stepparent of a child; and
(C) Legal guardian of a child.
[(j)(A) ] (L)(A)  “Parent provider” means a parent who is paid to  provide attendant care services
to the parent’s minor child.
(B) “Parent provider” does not include  a parent who is paid to provide attendant care services
to [ a child ] an individual, related to the parent,  who is 18 years of age or older.
[(k)(A) ] (m)(A)  “Personal  support worker” means an individual who is employed by a client or
the client’s representative and paid to provide attendant care services to the client.
(B) “Personal support worker” does not include a direct support professional.
(n) “Service group” means the cohort of children receiving attendant care  services under
this section as either children with very high behavioral needs or as children with  very high
medical needs.
[(L)] (o)  “State plan” means Oregon’s state plan for  medical assistance, described in 42 U.S.C.
1396a, approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
[(m)] (p)  “Very high behavioral needs” means a minor child’s extraordinary  needs for support
due to the child’s behavioral condition as indicated by a  federally approved functional needs as-
sessment adopted by the department that assigns the child to the highest service level.
[(n)] (q)  “Very high medical needs” means a minor child’s extraordinary needs for support due
to the child’s medical condition as indicated by a federally approved  functional needs assessment
adopted by the department that assigns the child to the highest service level.
(2) Subject to rules adopted under subsection (8)  of this section, to section 2, chapter 367,
Oregon Laws 2023, and to available funding, the department shall administer a program to compen-
sate parents to  provide attendant care services to the parents’ children who have been assessed by
the department to have very high medical or very high behavioral needs.
(3) To be eligible for the program described in this section:
(a) A parent provider must be employed by an agency and not by the child  or the other parent
of the child;
(b) The parent provider may  not be paid to provide attendant care services to the client child
by an agency that is owned by the parent, the child or any family  member or for which the parent
or other family member  serves in any administrative or leadership capacity, including as a member
of a board of directors; and
(c) The agency employing the  parent provider to provide attendant care services to the client
child:
(A) May not employ a parent provider as an independent contractor;
(B) Shall pay parent providers overtime at  the same rate and under the same circumstances as
direct support professionals who are not parent providers;
(C) Except as authorized by the department by rule, may not pay providers  of attendant care
services, including parent providers,  to provide services to a minor child during school hours unless
[2]
SB 1565
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the minor  child is temporarily at home recovering from surgery or illness and the temporary absence
from school is recommended by the child’s health care provider; and
(D) May not pay providers of attendant care  services, including parent providers, to provide
services to a minor child during school hours due to the determination  of a school district or due
to the choice of a parent of the client child to:
(i) Have the child regularly attend school less than the  number of school hours attended by
students without disabilities who are in the same grade  and the same school district as the client
child;
(ii) Homeschool the client child; or
(iii) Enroll the client child  in a private school that offers fewer school hours than the school
hours offered by the local public school to the majority of students in the same  grade as the client
child.
(4) Subsection (3)(c)(D) of this  section does not prohibit a school district or other entity from
compensating parents of students with disabilities for providing support for educational activities
that would otherwise be the responsibility of the school district.
(5) A parent provider, during the hours that the parent  provider is paid to provide one-on-one
attendant care services to the client child:
(a) May not be responsible for a vulnerable adult who requires physical care and monitoring;
(b) May not be responsible for the care of a child,  other than the client child, who is under 10
years of age  and shall have another caregiver immediately available at all times to attend to the
needs of the child; and
(c) Unless they are included as a goal or service in the child’s individual support plan  and re-
lated to the child’s disability-related support needs, may  not perform tasks that are not for the pri-
mary benefit of the client child, including but not limited to:
(A) Grocery shopping for the household;
(B) Housekeeping not required for the disability-related support needs of the client child;
(C) Remote work or operation of a home business; or
(D) Transporting individuals other than the client child to or from activities or appointments.
(6) If required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the department may  require
a parent provider to assign an alternative legal representative for the client child to  make decisions
about or manage the  development and implementation of the client child’s individual support plan.
The assignment:
(a) Must be on a form prescribed by the department; and
(b) Must clearly state that the assignment is limited to decisions regarding the development and
implementation of the child’s individual support plan and does not limit the authority  of the parent
provider to make decisions for the client child with respect to health care, education  or religious
training.
(7) A parent provider is subject to the requirements of mandatory reporting of abuse under ORS
124.060 and 419B.010, 24 hours per day, seven days per week.
(8) The department shall adopt rules for the program described in this section using an  advisory
committee appointed under ORS 183.333 that  represents the interests of parents, children with de-
velopmental or intellectual disabilities, adults with disabilities, agencies, organizations  of direct
support professionals and personal support workers and organizations that advocate for persons with
disabilities. The rules must include all of the following:
(a) Strategies to safeguard nonparent caregivers and avoid the displacement of  nonparent
[3]
SB 1565
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
caregivers by parent providers;
(b) Requirements for agencies to demonstrate consistent efforts to recruit, train  and retain
nonparent caregivers;
(c) Training requirements for:
(A) Parent  providers regarding federal and state administrative rules regulating home-based and
community-based services, including the  impact of the rules on parent-child relationships with re-
spect to discipline, supervision, physical intervention  and self-determination of client children during
the hours that the parent provider is being paid to provide attendant care services;
(B) Client children to learn to advocate for themselves with respect to choosing  and managing
direct support professionals before and after reaching 18 years of age; and
(C) Community developmental disability programs related to the employment of parent providers,
including on how to support families to manage issues concerning  conflicts of interest, provider
recruitment and retention and the empowerment of the client child to have a meaningful  voice in
the selection of the client child’s direct support professionals;
(d) A process for a client child to object  to the hiring of any caregiver, including the child’s
parent, or to raise concerns about a provider’s caregiving;
(e) Procedures to ensure that the program described in this section is implemented consistently
and equitably throughout this state;
(f) A requirement  that any appeal related to the requirements of or benefits under the program
is the sole responsibility of the central office staff of the department; and
(g) Other requirements that the department deems necessary to carry out the provisions of  this
section.
(9) Subject to subsection (10) of this section,  the department may adopt rules necessary to
manage the cost,  size and growth rate of the program described in this section that are necessary
to protect the eligibility for and levels of services under programs serving  individuals receiving de-
velopmental disability services provided for in the state plan, [ including the  development of ] except
by developing criteria to limit the number of children eligible to participate in the program.
(10)(a) Each biennium, the total number of hours of attendant care services paid  for by
the department under this section for each service group may not be less than  the average
utilization paid for the service group in the previous biennium.
(b) The department shall ensure that every child  in a service group is able to receive
attendant care services for the number  of hours of average utilization for the child’s service
group by compensating parent providers to provide  attendant care services for the deficit
number of hours.
[(10)] (11)  Annually, the department shall report to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related  to human services or, if the Legislative Assembly is in session, to the committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to human  services, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, up-
dates on the program described in this section, including:
(a) The number of client children receiving attendant care services, the number  of children re-
ceiving the services from parent providers and the number  of children receiving the services from
nonparent caregivers;
(b) The number of hours of attendant care  services provided by parent providers and number
of hours of attendant care services provided by nonparent caregivers;
(c) A comparison of the cost per child of providing attendant care services  by parent providers
under the program with the cost per child of providing attendant care services by  nonparent
[4]
SB 1565
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
caregivers; and
(d) A report on the adequacy  of the direct care workforce in this state to provide services to
all children with developmental disability services who are eligible for attendant care services.
(12) Any moneys appropriated to the department by the Legislative Assembly  for the
purpose of compensating parent providers or  for the staffing necessary for compensating
parent providers under this section may not be used by the department  for any other pur-
pose.
SECTION 2.
 Section 2, chapter 367, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) Except as  provided in section 4 [ of this 2023 Act ], chapter 367, Oregon Laws 2023,
the Department of Human Services  may not administer the program described in [ section 1 of this
2023 Act ] ORS 427.191  without the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ approval of a
[new] waiver or amendments to an existing waiver  or without other arrangements with  the Cen-
ters for Medicare and Medicaid Services to receive federal financial  participation in the costs of the
program during a state of emergency or a public health emergency.  No later  than April 1, 2024,
the department shall pursue federal financial participation by means of any  available federal
authority, including but not limited to a waiver or an amendment to  a waiver under section
1915(c) of the Social Security Act or a waiver under section 1115 of the Social Security Act.
(2) The department may not administer a program that pays a parent to provide attendant  care
or personal care services  to the parent’s minor child, including but not limited to the program de-
scribed in [ section 1 of this 2023 Act ] ORS 427.191, using General Fund moneys that are not matched
by federal Medicaid funds.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[5]