Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,500,000, for deposit  in the Universal
Representation Fund established under ORS 9.865 and disbursement  to Oregon Worker Relief
as the fiscal agent under ORS 9.865.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  out of the General Fund, the
amount of $4,500,000, for the purposes of implementing ORS 9.860 (4).
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 893