Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 496.
SECTION 2. The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall develop a game fish carcass
recovery project to encourage the use of game fish carcasses for commercial bait.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1407