Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that the Oregon Business
Development Department’s having an attractive and informative website will play a  key role
in attracting investment by:
(a) Showcasing the state’s economic potential and business-friendly environment;
(b) Highlighting success stories, available incentives and  the benefits of operating in the
state;
(c) Fostering a positive perception among potential investors and encouraging them  to
explore opportunities to contribute to the local economy; and
(d) Positioning the state  as a desirable destination for domestic and international inves-
tors.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department shall update and  redesign its website
in accordance with this section.
(3) The updated, redesigned website:
(a) Must be:
(A) Modern-looking;
(B) Visually engaging;
(C) Dynamic and interactive; and
(D) Easily accessible and navigable; and
(b) Must balance marketing this state as a  compelling business location with providing
ready access to program resources and data.
(4) The website project shall:
(a) Be conducted by a firm with expertise in  guiding a public website project through a
robust user experience analysis;
(b) Consider best practices by comparable agencies in other states;
(c) Address both the visual and  operational weaknesses identified in analysis of the cur-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2325
HB 3315
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
rent website;
(d) Keep the website on the Oregon.gov platform; and
(e) Pair external web improvements with specific web-based tools for community  organ-
izations, local governments and businesses, including, but not limited to:
(A) Interactive project and program maps;
(B) Dynamic data displays; and
(C) Integrated artificial intelligence help tools.
SECTION 2.
There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the  Oregon Business Development De-
partment, the  amount of $275,000 for the purpose of carrying out the project to update and
redesign the department’s website set forth in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]