Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 458.670 to
458.700.
SECTION 2. (1) There is established the Individual Development Account Fund, separate
and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Individual Development Account Fund consists of moneys credited to  the fund
from moneys appropriated or transferred to  the fund by the Legislative Assembly or received
from the  federal government or other grants, gifts or donations from any source. Interest
earned by the fund must be credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Housing and Community
Services Department  to administer the individual development account program under ORS
458.670 to 458.700 and to  provide grants to fiduciary organizations to establish individual de-
velopment accounts,  to provide matching funds and to fulfill the responsibilities under ORS
458.670 to 458.700.
SECTION 3.  ORS 458.670 is amended to read:
458.670. As used in this section and ORS 458.675 to 458.700, unless the context requires  other-
wise:
(1) “Account holder” means a resident of this state who:
(a) Is 12 years of age or older;
(b) Is a member of a lower income household; and
(c) Has established an individual development account with a fiduciary organization.
(2) “Fiduciary organization” means an organization selected under ORS 458.695 to administer
state moneys directed to individual development accounts and that is:
(a) A nonprofit, fund raising organization that is exempt from taxation under section  501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 2018; or
(b) A federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe that is located,  to a significant degree, within the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 688
SB 82
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
boundaries of this state.
(3) “Financial institution” means:
(a) An organization regulated under ORS chapters 706 to 716 or 723; or
(b) In the case of individual development  accounts established for the purpose described in ORS
458.685 (1)(c), a financial institution as defined in ORS 178.300.
(4) “Individual  development account” means a contract between an account holder and a
fiduciary organization, for the deposit of funds into  a financial institution by the account holder[ ,]
and the  deposit of matching funds into [ the financial institution ] a designated account  by the
fiduciary organization, to  allow the account holder to accumulate assets for use toward achieving
a specific purpose approved by the fiduciary organization.
(5) “Lower income household” means a household having an income equal to or less than  the
greater of the following:
(a) 80 percent of the median household income for the area as determined by the Housing  and
Community Services Department.  In making the determination, the department shall give consider-
ation to any data on area household income published by the United States Department of Housing
and Urban Development.
(b) 200 percent of the poverty guidelines as determined by the Housing and Community Services
Department. In making the determination, the department  shall give consideration to poverty
guidelines published by the United States Department  of Health and Human Services and may con-
sider other income data periodically published by other federal or Oregon agencies.
(6)(a) “Net worth” means  a calculation based on the net value of assets of a household
established by rule by the Housing and Community Services Department.
(b) “Net worth” does not include:
(A) Equity in one residence and in one vehicle.
(B) Holdings in pension accounts valued at less than $120,000.
[(6)] (7) “Resident of this state” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.027.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 458.675 is amended to read:
458.675. The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(1) The problem of poverty will not be  solved solely by government programs and income sub-
sidies.
(2) Family economic well-being does not come solely from  income, spending or consumption, but
instead requires savings, investment and the accumulation of assets.
(3) It is appropriate for the state to institute an asset-based antipoverty strategy.
(4) The state has an opportunity  to take advantage of private and federal resources by making
the transition to an asset-based antipoverty strategy.  Those resources may include, but are not
limited to, the Assets for Independence Act (42 U.S.C.  604) and the Workforce Innovation and Op-
portunity Act (29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq.).
(5) Investment through an individual development account system will help  lower income
households obtain the assets they need  to succeed. Communities and this state will experience re-
sultant economic  and social benefits accruing from the promotion of [ job training and higher educa-
tion, home ownership and small business development ] the financial  stability and resilience of
lower income households.
[(6) It is desirable for this state to enact legislation  that enables an authorized fiduciary organ-
ization sufficient flexibility to  receive private, state and federal moneys for individual development ac-
counts. The Legislative Assembly should periodically  review the provisions of ORS 458.675 to 458.700
[2]
SB 82
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to ensure that this state maximizes the receipt of available federal moneys for individual development
accounts.]
SECTION 5.
 ORS 458.680 is amended to read:
458.680. (1) A person who qualifies to  become an account holder may enter into an agreement
with a fiduciary organization for the establishment of an individual development account.
(2) To become an account holder a  person must, in addition to meeting any other qualifications,
be a member of a lower income household that has a net worth of less than $20,000. [ As used  in this
subsection, “net worth” means the value of all assets owned in whole or  part by household members,
excluding equity in a residence and in  one vehicle, and excluding holdings in pension accounts, as
defined by the Housing and Community Services Department by rule, that  are valued at less than
$60,000, minus the total debts and  obligations of household members, all as measured at the time that
the person applies to establish the account. ]
(3) Every account holder, with support from  the fiduciary organization, shall develop a personal
development plan to advance account holder  self-reliance. The personal development plan must in-
clude appropriate coaching, mentorship, social support, financial adequacy training  and asset-
specific training designed to increase the independence of the person and the person’s  household
through achievement of the account’s approved purpose.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a fiduciary organization may refuse to allow
a qualified person to establish an account if establishment of the account would  result in the mem-
bers of a  lower income household having more than one account. Notwithstanding subsection (1) of
this section, a fiduciary organization shall refuse to allow a qualified person to establish an account
if establishment of the account would result  in the members of a lower income household having
more than two accounts.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 458.685, as amended by section 36, chapter 12, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special
session) (Enrolled House Bill 4212), is amended to read:
458.685. (1) A person may establish an  individual development account only for a purpose ap-
proved by a fiduciary organization. Purposes that the fiduciary organization may approve are:
(a) The acquisition of post-secondary education or job training.
(b) If the account holder has established the account for the benefit of a household member who
is under the age of 18 years,  the payment of extracurricular nontuition expenses designed to prepare
the member for post-secondary education or job training.
(c) If the account holder has established a savings network account for  higher education under
ORS 178.300 to 178.360  on behalf of a designated beneficiary, the funding of qualified higher educa-
tion expenses as defined in ORS 178.300 by one or more deposits into a savings network account for
higher education on behalf of the same designated beneficiary.
(d) The  purchase of a primary residence. In addition to payment on the purchase price of the
residence, account moneys may be used to pay any usual or reasonable settlement, financing  or
other closing costs. The account holder must not have owned or held  any interest in a residence
during the three years prior to making the  purchase. However, this three-year period shall not apply
to displaced homemakers,  individuals who have lost home ownership as a result of divorce or owners
of manufactured homes.
(e) The rental of a primary residence when housing stability is essential to  achieve state policy
goals. Account moneys  may be used for security deposits, first and last months’ rent, application fees
and other expenses necessary to  move into the primary residence, as specified in the account
holder’s personal development plan for increasing the independence of the person.
[3]
SB 82
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) The capitalization of a small business.  Account moneys may be used for capital, plant,
equipment and inventory expenses and to hire employees upon capitalization of the  small business,
or for working capital pursuant to a business plan. The business plan must have been  developed
[by] with a financial  institution, nonprofit microenterprise program or other qualified agent demon-
strating business expertise  and have been approved by the fiduciary organization. The business plan
must include a description of the services or goods to be sold, a marketing plan and projected  fi-
nancial statements.
(g) Improvements, repairs or modifications necessary to make or keep  the account holder’s pri-
mary dwelling habitable, accessible or visitable  for the account holder or a household member. This
paragraph does not apply to improvements, repairs or modifications made  to a rented primary
dwelling to achieve or maintain a habitable  condition for which ORS 90.320 (1) places responsibility
on the landlord. As used in this paragraph, “accessible”  and “visitable” have the meanings given
those terms in ORS 456.508.
(h) The purchase of equipment, technology or specialized training [ required], as specified in the
account holder’s personal development plan, that allows  the person to become competitive in
obtaining or maintaining  employment , [or] to start or maintain a business, [ as specified in the account
holder’s personal development plan for increasing ] or to increase  the independence of  [ the person ]
an account holder .
(i) The purchase or  repair of a vehicle, as specified in the account holder’s personal development
plan for increasing the independence of the person.
(j) The saving of funds for  retirement, as specified in the account holder’s personal development
plan for increasing the independence of the person.
(k) The payment of debts [ owed for educational or medical  purposes when the account holder is
saving for another  allowable purpose, as specified in ] to support the account holder’s personal de-
velopment plan for increasing the independence of the person.
(L) The creation or improvement of a  credit score by obtaining a secured loan or a financial
product that is designed to improve credit,  as specified in the account holder’s personal development
plan for increasing the independence of the person.
(m) The replacement of a  primary residence when replacement offers significant opportunity to
improve habitability or energy efficiency.
(n) The establishment  of savings for emergency expenses to promote financial stability and to
protect existing assets  as specified in the account holder’s personal development plan . As used
in this paragraph, “emergency  expenses” includes expenses for extraordinary medical costs or other
unexpected and substantial personal expenses that  would significantly impact the account holder’s
noncash assets, health, housing or standard of living if not promptly addressed.
(2)(a) An account holder may withdraw all or  part of the account holder’s deposits to an indi-
vidual development account for  [emergency expenses as defined in subsection (1)(n) of this section ] any
financial hardship as determined by the account holder , without regard to whether  the account
was established for emergency savings.
(b) [ The account holder  must reimburse an account established for a purpose listed under sub-
section (1)(a)  to (m) of this section for the amount withdrawn under this subsection. Until the re-
imbursement has  been made in full, an account holder may not withdraw any matching deposits or
accrued interest  on matching deposits from the account except under this subsection. ] The fiduciary
organization shall  remove from an account holder’s account any moneys deposited as
matching funds to deposits withdrawn under this section, unless  the withdrawn deposits
[4]
SB 82
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
were deposited and withdrawn for emergency expenses under subsection (1)(n) of this sec-
tion.
[(3) If an account holder withdraws moneys from an individual development account for other  than
an approved purpose, the fiduciary organization may remove the account holder from the program. ]
[(4)(a)] (3)(a) If the account holder of an account established for the purpose  set forth in sub-
section (1)(c) or (j) of this section has achieved the  account’s approved purpose in accordance with
the personal development plan developed by the account holder under ORS 458.680, the  account
holder may withdraw, or authorize the withdrawal  of, the remaining amount of all deposits, includ-
ing matching deposits, and interest in the account as follows:
(A) For an account established for the purpose set forth in subsection (1)(c) of this section, by
rolling over the entire withdrawal amount, not to exceed the limit established  pursuant to ORS
178.335, into one or more of the savings network accounts  for higher education under ORS 178.300
to 178.360, the establishment of which is the purpose of the individual development account; or
(B) For an account established for the purpose set  forth in subsection (1)(j) of this section, by
rolling over the entire withdrawal amount into  an individual retirement account, a retirement plan
or a similar account or plan established under the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) Upon withdrawal of all moneys in the individual  development account as provided in para-
graph (a) of this subsection, the account relationship shall terminate.
(c) The rollover  of moneys into a savings network account for higher education under this sub-
section may not cause the  amount in the savings network account for higher education to exceed
the limit on total contributions established pursuant to ORS 178.335.
(d) Any amount of the rollover that has been subtracted on the taxpayer’s  federal return pur-
suant to section 219 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be added back in  the determination of tax-
able income.
[(5)] (4)  If an account holder moves from the area  where the program is conducted or is other-
wise unable to continue in the  program, the fiduciary organization may remove the account holder
from the program.
[(6)] (5) If an account holder is  removed from the program under subsection [ (3) or (5) ] (4) of this
section, all matching deposits in the account and all  interest earned on matching deposits shall re-
vert to the fiduciary organization. The fiduciary organization shall use the reverted funds as  a
source of matching deposits for other accounts.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 458.690 is amended to read:
458.690. (1) [ Notwithstanding ORS 315.271, A fiduciary organization selected under ORS 458.695
may qualify as the recipient of  account contributions that qualify the contributor for a tax credit under
ORS 315.271 only if the fiduciary organization structures the accounts to have the following features: ]
[(a) The ] A fiduciary organization [ matches] shall match  amounts deposited by  the account
holder according to a formula  established by the fiduciary organization[ . The fiduciary organization
shall maintain on deposit in the account ] of  not less than $1 nor more than $5 for  each $1 deposited
by the account holder.
[(b) The matching deposits  by the fiduciary organization to the individual development account are
placed in: ]
[(A) A savings account jointly held by the account holder and  the fiduciary organization and re-
quiring the signatures of both for withdrawals; ]
[(B) A savings ] The matching funds  must be deposited into a designated  account that is
controlled by the fiduciary organization and is separate from the savings account of the account
[5]
SB 82
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
holder[ ; or].
[(C) In the case  of an account established for the purpose described in ORS 458.685 (1)(c), a
savings network account for higher education under ORS 178.300 to  178.360, in which the fiduciary
organization is the account owner as defined in ORS 178.300. ]
(2) Account holders may not  accrue more than [ $3,000] $6,000 of matching funds under sub-
section (1) of this section from [ state-directed] Individual Development Account Fund  moneys in
any 12-month period. A fiduciary organization may  designate a lower amount as a limit on annual
matching funds. A fiduciary organization shall maintain  on deposit sufficient funds to cover the
matching deposit agreements for all individual development accounts managed by the organization.
(3) The  Housing and Community Services Department shall adopt rules to establish a maximum
total amount  of [ state-directed] Individual Development Account Fund  moneys that may be de-
posited as matching funds into an individual development account.
[(4) The Housing and Community Services Department shall  provide information to the Department
of Revenue about all individual development account contributors that are qualified for  a tax credit
under ORS 315.271, if required by ORS 315.058. ]
SECTION 8.
 ORS 458.695 is amended to read:
458.695. The  Housing and Community Services Department may select fiduciary organizations
to administer Individual Development Account Fund  moneys [ directed by the state to individual
development account purposes ]. In making the selections, the department shall consider factors in-
cluding, but not limited to:
(1) The  ability of the fiduciary organization to implement and administer the individual devel-
opment account  program, including the ability to verify account holder eligibility, certify that
matching deposits are used only for approved purposes and exercise general fiscal accountability;
(2) The capacity of the fiduciary organization to provide or raise additional matching  funds for
the deposits of account holders;
(3) The capacity of the fiduciary organization to provide appropriate support services and gen-
eral assistance to advance account holder self-reliance; and
(4) The links that the fiduciary organization has to other activities  and programs designed to
increase the independence of this state’s lower income households , including through  education and
training, home ownership and small business development.
SECTION 9.  ORS 458.700 is amended to read:
458.700. (1) Subject to Housing and Community Services Department rules, a fiduciary organ-
ization has sole authority over, and  responsibility for, the administration of individual development
accounts. The responsibility of  the fiduciary organization extends to all aspects of the account pro-
gram, including marketing to participants,  soliciting additional matching contributions, counseling
account holders, providing financial literacy education, and  conducting required verification and
compliances activities. The fiduciary  organization may establish program provisions as the organ-
ization believes necessary to ensure account holder compliance with the  provisions of ORS 458.680
and 458.685. [ Notwithstanding ORS 458.670 (5) and 458.680  (2), ] A fiduciary organization may estab-
lish income and net worth limitations  for account holders that are lower than the income and net
worth limitations established by ORS 458.670 (5) and 458.680 (2).
(2) A fiduciary organization  may act in partnership with other entities, including businesses,
government agencies, nonprofit organizations, community development corporations, community
action  programs,  housing authorities and congregations to assist in the fulfillment of fiduciary or-
ganization responsibilities under [ this section and ORS 458.685, 458.690 and 458.695 ] ORS  458.670
[6]
SB 82
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to 458.700.
(3) A fiduciary organization may use a reasonable portion of moneys allocated to  the individual
development account program for administration, operation and evaluation purposes.
(4) A fiduciary organization [ selected to administer  moneys directed by the state to individual de-
velopment account purposes or receiving tax deductible contributions ] shall  provide the Housing and
Community Services Department with an annual report of the fiduciary organization’s  individual
development account program activity. The report  [ shall] must  be filed no later than 90 days after
the end of the fiscal year  of the fiduciary organization. The report [ shall] must  include, but is not
limited to:
(a) The number of individual development accounts administered by the fiduciary organization;
(b) The amount of deposits and matching deposits for each account;
(c) The purpose of each account;
(d) The number of withdrawals made; and
(e) Any other information the department  may require for the purpose of making a return on
investment analysis.
[(5) A fiduciary organization that is the account owner of a savings  network account for higher
education under ORS 178.300 to 178.360: ]
[(a) May  make a qualified withdrawal only at the direction of the designated beneficiary and only
after the savings network account of the account holder that was established for  the designated bene-
ficiary has  been reduced to a balance of zero exclusively through qualified withdrawals by the desig-
nated beneficiary; and ]
[(b) May make nonqualified withdrawals  only if the savings network account of the account holder
that was established for the designated beneficiary has a balance of less than $100  or if the account
holder or  designated beneficiary has granted permission to make the withdrawal. Moneys received by
a fiduciary organization from a nonqualified withdrawal made under this paragraph must  be used for
individual development account purposes. ]
[(6)] (5) The department may make all reasonable and  necessary rules to ensure fiduciary or-
ganization compliance with [ this section and ORS 458.685 and 458.695 ] ORS 458.670 to 458.700 .
SECTION 10.
 ORS 315.650 is amended to read:
315.650. (1) A credit  against taxes otherwise imposed under ORS chapter 316 shall be allowed
for amounts contributed by the taxpayer during the tax year to a savings  network account for
higher education established under ORS 178.300 to 178.360  or an ABLE account established under
ORS 178.380. A taxpayer who makes contributions to both types of account may claim the credit for
the amounts listed in subsection (2) of this section for each type of account.
(2) The amount of the credit allowed under this  section shall be limited based on the taxpayer’s
adjusted gross income and shall be the lesser of $300,  if reported on a joint return, or $150, if re-
ported on any other type of return, or the following:
(a) The amount contributed, if the taxpayer’s adjusted gross income does not exceed $30,000;
(b) 50 percent of  the amount contributed, if the taxpayer’s adjusted gross income exceeds $30,000
but does not exceed $70,000;
(c) 25 percent of the  amount contributed, if the taxpayer’s adjusted gross income exceeds $70,000
but does not exceed $100,000;
(d) 10 percent of the amount contributed, if the taxpayer’s adjusted gross income  exceeds
$100,000 but does not exceed $250,000; or
(e) 5 percent of the amount  contributed, if the taxpayer’s adjusted gross income exceeds
[7]
SB 82
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
$250,000.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall annually  adjust the maximum credit amounts allowable
under this section according to the cost-of-living adjustment for  the calendar year. The department
shall first make this adjustment for a joint return by multiplying the  maximum credit amount in
subsection (2) of this  section by the percentage (if any) by which the monthly averaged U.S. City
Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31 of the prior calendar
year exceeds the monthly averaged U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for the  12 consecutive
months ending August 31, 2018.
(b) As  used in this subsection, “U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index” means the U.S. City
Average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers  (All Items) as published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(c) If any adjustment to the maximum credit amount  for a joint return, as determined under
paragraph (a) of this subsection, is  not a multiple of $20, the adjustment shall be rounded to the next
lower multiple of $20.  The department shall then adjust the maximum credit amount for all other
types of returns so that it is half the maximum credit amount for a joint return.
(4) A credit under this section is allowed  for a preceding tax year for amounts contributed to
a savings network account for higher education or to an ABLE account if the contribution  is made
before the taxpayer files a return or before the 15th day of the fourth month  following the closing
of the taxpayer’s tax year, whichever is earlier.
(5) A credit is not  allowed under this section for any amount that has been transferred into a
savings network account for higher education from  an individual development account, through a
rollover, as provided in ORS 458.685 [ (4)(a)(A)] (3)(a)(A) .
(6) If the amount allowable as a  credit under this section, when added to the sum of the amounts
allowable as payment of tax under ORS 316.187 (withholding),  ORS 316.583 (estimated tax), other tax
prepayment amounts  and other refundable credit amounts, exceeds the taxes imposed by ORS chap-
ters 314 and 316 for the tax year (reduced by  any nonrefundable credits allowable for purposes of
ORS chapter 316 for the tax year), the amount of the excess  shall be refunded to the taxpayer as
provided in ORS 316.502.
(7) The credit shall be  claimed on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue that contains
the information required by the department.
(8) Spouses in a marriage who  file separate returns for a taxable year may each claim a share
of the tax credit that would  have been allowed on a joint return in proportion to the adjusted gross
income of each.
(9) In the case of a credit allowed under this section:
(a) A nonresident shall be allowed the credit in the proportion provided in ORS 316.117.
(b) If a change in the status of the  taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from nonresident
to resident occurs, the credit shall be determined in a manner consistent with ORS 316.117.
(c) If a change in the taxable year  of the taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085, or if the
department terminates  the taxpayer’s taxable year under ORS 314.440, the credit shall be prorated
or computed in a manner consistent with ORS 314.085.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 316.699 is amended to read:
316.699. (1) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income the amount contributed to:
(a) A savings network account for higher education established under  ORS 178.300 to 178.360;
or
(b) An ABLE account established under ORS 178.380 and rules adopted by  the Oregon 529
[8]
SB 82
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
Savings Board, when the  contribution is made before the designated beneficiary of the account at-
tains 21 years of age.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection  (1) of this section, a subtraction under this section may not ex-
ceed the lesser of:
(a) $4,000 for the tax year if the taxpayer files a joint return, or $2,000 for the tax year if  the
taxpayer files a return other than a joint return; and
(b) If an amount is carried forward to a succeeding tax year under subsection (4)  of this section,
the balance in the savings network account for higher education or ABLE account at the close  of
the tax year for which the subtraction is being made.
(3)(a) The Department of  Revenue shall annually adjust the maximum subtraction allowable un-
der this section according to the cost-of-living adjustment for  the calendar year. The department
shall make this adjustment by multiplying the amount in subsection (2) of this  section by the per-
centage (if any) by which the monthly averaged U.S. City Average  Consumer Price Index for the 12
consecutive months ending August 31 of the prior calendar  year exceeds the monthly averaged U.S.
City Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31, 2007.
(b) As used in this subsection, “U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index” means the U.S.  City
Average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (All  Items) as published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(4) Any amounts contributed to a savings network account for higher education  or an ABLE
account that are not subtracted from federal taxable income because of the monetary limitations
imposed by subsection (2) of this section may  be carried forward for four succeeding tax years and
subtracted from federal  taxable income in any of those succeeding tax years in an amount that does
not exceed the monetary limitations imposed by subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The amount contributed to a savings network account for higher education or  an ABLE ac-
count may be subtracted from a  preceding tax year if the contribution is made before the taxpayer
files a return or before the 15th day of the fourth month following the closing  of the taxpayer’s tax
year, whichever is earlier.
(6) A subtraction is  not allowed under this section for any amount that has been transferred into
a savings network account for higher education from an individual development account, through a
rollover, as provided in ORS 458.685 [ (4)(a)(A)] (3)(a)(A) .
[9]