Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 634.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 634.116 (13) and (15)(b), an employee  of the agen-
cies, instrumentalities, subdivisions, counties,  cities, towns, municipal corporations, dis-
tricts, governmental bodies, Indian tribes or utilities  described in ORS 634.116 (12) is not
required to  hold a license as a public applicator or a certificate as a public trainee when ap-
plying a pesticide using a machine-powered device if:
(a) The pesticide is not a restricted-use pesticide;
(b) The machine-powered device is powered by an electric battery and holds no more than
five gallons of pesticide; and
(c) The employee has completed training as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) The State Department of Agriculture shall develop standards and materials  for
training individuals to safely apply  pesticides using machine-powered devices as described in
subsection (1) of this section.
(b) An employer shall provide the training developed under  this subsection to an em-
ployee described in subsection (1) of this section before the employee uses a machine-powered
device as described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 634.116 is amended to read:
634.116. (1) A pesticide operator’s license, or supplements thereto, shall authorize  the licensee
to engage in one or more of the classes of pest control or  pesticide application business prescribed
by the State Department of Agriculture under ORS 634.306 (2).  The department may not issue a
pesticide operator license to the United States, the  State of Oregon or federal, state or local agen-
cies, instrumentalities,  political subdivisions, counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, irri-
gation, drainage or other districts, other federal, state  or local governmental bodies or an Indian
tribe.
(2) During a license period, and after a person has been issued a  license to engage in certain
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1945
HB 3461
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
classes of pest control or  pesticide application business during a license period, the department upon
receiving an additional application and applicable fees, may authorize the licensee to  engage in ad-
ditional classes of pest control or pesticide  application business for the remainder of the license
period as prescribed in ORS 634.306 (2).
(3)(a) The department shall establish a pesticide operator license fee not to exceed $90 for  the
first class of pest control or pesticide application business as prescribed in ORS 634.306  (2) and not
to exceed $15 for each additional class.
(b) After a person makes first application for a  specific license period, if later during the same
license period the person desires to engage in additional classes of pest  control or pesticide appli-
cation businesses, such person shall pay the fee for each additional class established by the depart-
ment not to exceed $20.
(4) At least one owner or  part owner of the pest control or pesticide application business shall
also obtain and maintain a pesticide applicator’s license if the pesticide operator is a sole
proprietorship or a partnership. At least one officer or  employee shall obtain and maintain a pesti-
cide applicator’s license if the  pesticide operator is a corporation. If a pesticide operator is found
to be in violation  of this subsection, the pesticide operator’s license, notwithstanding ORS chapter
183, is automatically suspended until the pesticide operator is in compliance. If the  business is
owned by one individual, the department  shall make no charge for the pesticide applicator license
issued to the individual under ORS 634.122.
(5) The department shall not issue  or renew a pesticide operator’s license until the applicant
or licensee has furnished evidence to the department,  in the form of a public liability policy issued
by an insurance company qualified to do business in  Oregon, protecting the applicant or licensee
against liability for injury or death to persons and loss of or damage  to property resulting from the
application of pesticides,  or in lieu of a policy, has furnished a deposit of cash, surety bond or other
evidence of financial responsibility acceptable to the department that may be applied by  the de-
partment to the payment of damages resulting from operator liability. However:
(a) Except as required under paragraph (b)  of this subsection, the financial responsibility re-
quired by this section shall not  apply to damages or injury to crops or real or personal property
being worked upon by the applicant.
(b) If the  applicant or licensee is to be engaged in the business of controlling or eradicating
structural pests, or pests  within a public or private place, or pests within private or public places
where food is served, prepared or processed or where  persons are regularly housed, the financial
responsibility required by this section shall apply to damages or injury  to real or personal property
being worked upon, as well as all the other real and personal property set forth in this section.
(6) The  financial responsibility required by subsection (5) of this section must be not less than
$25,000 for bodily injury to one or more persons and not less than $25,000 for property damage.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS chapter 183, if the licensed pesticide operator  fails
to maintain the financial responsibility required by subsections  (5) and (6) of this section, the license
is automatically suspended until the department again verifies the pesticide operator is in  compli-
ance with subsections (5) and (6) of this section.  The liability insurance company shall notify the
department in writing at least  30 days prior to any cancellation of an insurance policy required by
this section.
(8) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 105.810  and 105.815 or other laws to the contrary, the
amount of damages for which a pesticide  operator or pesticide applicator is liable as a result of use
of pesticides, or financial responsibility for the same is limited to actual damages only.
[2]
HB 3461
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9) The department shall  return the deposit required by subsection (5) of this section to the
pesticide operator if  the pesticide operator at any time establishes exemption from the financial re-
sponsibility requirements under this chapter. After  the expiration of two years from the date of an
injury, death, loss or damage, the department shall return any deposit  remaining to the pesticide
operator or to the personal representative of the  pesticide operator except that the department shall
not make a  return if the department has received notice that an action for damages arising out of
the provisions of this section has been filed against the pesticide operator for whom the deposit  was
made, and the department has determined that the action is  pending or that any judgment resulting
from the action remains unpaid.
(10) If the  pesticide operator is or employs a pesticide applicator to spray or otherwise apply
pesticides by aircraft, in addition to  other provisions of this section relating to financial responsi-
bility, the department may by rule allow the pesticide operator to reduce, suspend or terminate  the
liability insurance, applicable to spraying or otherwise applying pesticides by aircraft, and  required
by subsections (5) and (6) of this section during certain periods of the year.
(11) The department may  by rule allow liability insurance policies required by subsections (5)
and (6) of this section to  include deductible clauses of amounts to be determined by the department.
(12)(a) The United States, the State of Oregon or federal,  state or local agencies, instrument-
alities, political subdivisions, counties, cities,  towns, municipal corporations, irrigation, drainage or
other districts, other federal, state or local governmental bodies or Indian tribes are not  required
to obtain a license as a pesticide operator or to  furnish evidence of financial responsibility to the
department when:
(A) Applying pesticides to property under their ownership, possession, control or jurisdiction;
(B) Applying pesticides pursuant to an order issued by the department for purposes of control-
ling or eradicating noxious weeds or pests; or
(C) Applying pesticides to property under the ownership, possession, control or jurisdiction  of
another federal, state or local  agency, instrumentality, political subdivision, county, city, town, mu-
nicipal corporation, irrigation, drainage or other district, of another federal, state  or local govern-
mental body, of an Indian tribe or of a homeowners association as defined under ORS 94.550 if:
(i) The land is in a jurisdiction adjacent to  property under their ownership, possession, control
or jurisdiction;
(ii) The application is done in conjunction with, or  as an extension of, an application of pesti-
cides to property under their ownership, possession, control or jurisdiction; and
(iii) The pesticide application is done on a cost  recovery, cooperative trade of services or no
cost basis, and not as a source for profit.
(b) A public utility or  telecommunications utility is not required to obtain a license as a pesti-
cide operator  or to furnish evidence of financial responsibility to the department when applying
pesticides to property under the ownership, possession or control of the utility.
(c) In addition to any  application allowed under paragraph (a) of this subsection, a vector con-
trol district is not required to obtain a license as a pesticide operator or to furnish  evidence of fi-
nancial responsibility to the  department when applying pesticides for the prevention, control or
eradication of a public health vector as defined  in ORS 452.010 to property under the ownership,
possession, control or jurisdiction of another federal, state or local agency,  instrumentality, political
subdivision, county, city, town, municipal corporation, irrigation,  drainage or other district or other
federal, state  or local governmental body or of a homeowners association as defined under ORS
94.550 if the pesticide application  is done on a cost recovery, cooperative trade of services or no
[3]
HB 3461
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cost basis, and not as a source of profit.
(13) Subject to subsection (15) of this section, the employees of the agencies,  instrumentalities,
subdivisions, counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, districts,  governmental bodies, Indian
tribes or utilities described in subsection (12) of this section who  perform or carry out the work,
duties or  responsibilities of a pesticide applicator are subject to the provisions of this chapter, ex-
cept they  shall be issued “public applicator” licenses or, if they carry out the work, duties or re-
sponsibilities of a pesticide trainee,  shall be issued “public trainee” certificates, if they otherwise
comply or qualify with the provisions of this chapter relating thereto.
(14) The public applicator license or public trainee certificate shall be:
(a) Issued by the department upon payment of the  fee for the pesticide applicator license or
pesticide trainee certificate.
(b) Valid and used by the licensee or certificate holder only  when applying pesticides as de-
scribed in subsection (12) of this section.
(c) Renewed, suspended  or revoked each year in the same manner, under the same provisions
and at the same time as other pesticide applicator licenses and trainee  certificates are renewed,
suspended or revoked.
(15) The provisions of subsection (13) of this section apply only to:
(a) The application of restricted-use pesticides;
(b) The  application of any pesticide by using a machine-powered device , except as provided in
section 2 of this 2025 Act ; or
(c) The application of any pesticide at the campus of a school,  as defined in ORS 634.700, by an
employee of the school.
(16) Prior  to applying pesticides to land described in subsection (12)(a)(C) of this section, a
public applicator shall inform  the person requesting pesticide application of the possible availability
of alternative sources of assistance, including sources in the private  sector that are registered with
the department or with industry trade or professional organizations.
(17) A federal, state or local agency, instrumentality,  political subdivision, county, city, town,
municipal corporation,  irrigation, drainage or other district or other federal, state or local govern-
mental body may not solicit or advertise for pesticide application business in areas  outside its ju-
risdiction.
(18) Before issuing any pesticide license or certificate,  or the renewal thereof, to an employee
of an Indian tribe, to a business entity of  an Indian tribe or to an employee of a business entity of
an Indian tribe, the department shall enter into a mutually acceptable agreement  with the Indian
tribe or business entity to enable the department to administer and enforce the provisions of this
chapter and rules adopted under this chapter with respect to the Indian tribe or business entity.
SECTION 4.
(1) Section 2 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 634.116 by section
3 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture may take any action  before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary to enable the department to ex-
ercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by section 2 of this 2025 Act and
the amendments to ORS 634.116 by section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]