Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Transportation shall  study issues related to improving
transportation infrastructure  resilience and present the results of the study in a report to
an appropriate committee or interim committee  of the Legislative Assembly in the manner
provided under ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1823