Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall administer a fund-
ing match program for the purposes of supporting research at  Oregon Health and Science
University.
(2) To receive funding under subsection (1)  of this section, the university shall provide
confirmation to the commission that the university has  secured not less than $10 million in
private funding for research grants.
(3) The commission  may not provide funding to the university under subsection (1) of this
section unless the university has first  provided confirmation to the commission in accord-
ance with subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The commission shall submit a report in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, to the
interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to higher education, no later than
December 15, 2026. The report required under this subsection must include:
(a) The amount of funding provided to  the university through the program described in
subsection (1) of this section;
(b) The nature of research projects funded by the program; and
(c) Any impact on research outcomes resulting from the funding.
(5) The commission shall adopt rules for the implementation of  this section. Rules
adopted under this subsection  must include the process by which the university must verify
private funding to the commission and eligibility criteria for research projects to be funded.
SECTION 2.
(1) The OHSU Research Fund is established in the  State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General  Fund.  Interest  earned by the OHSU Research Fund shall be
credited to the fund.  All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission to administer  the program described in section 1 of this
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4806
HB 3955
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
2025 Act.
(2) The OHSU Research Fund shall consist of all moneys credited to the fund, including
moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 3.
There is appropriated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000 for
deposit into the OHSU Research Fund established in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2028.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the OHSU Research Fund  that are unexpended and unobli-
gated on July 1, 2027, shall revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]