Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 327.006 to
327.133.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Elementary  school” means a public school that includes any grade from kindergarten
through grade 5.
(b) “Large school district” means a school district with 15 or more elementary schools.
(c) “School performance” means the performance of students who were enrolled  in the
elementary school for a full school year and  who were students in a grade that participated
in the statewide summative assessment for English.
(d)(A) “Statewide summative  assessment for English” means the statewide summative
assessment for English developed by the Department of Education  as provided by ORS
329.485.
(B) “Statewide summative assessment  for English” does not include an assessment that
is administered for English language learners, as defined in ORS 336.079.
(2)(a) In addition to moneys distributed through the  State School Fund, the Department
of Education shall distribute to a large school district a grant  if the school performance for
an elementary school in the large school district indicates that 50 percent or more of  the
students of the elementary school received one of the two lowest levels on the  statewide
summative assessment for English.
(b) Grants must be used by a large school district in a manner to ensure  that an ele-
mentary school described in paragraph (a) of this subsection is able to provide one additional
hour of English instruction each school day of  the following school year to all students in
the tested grades.
(3) The department shall prescribe  the form and timeline for submitting applications for
a grant under this section.
(4) The State Board of Education may adopt  by rule priorities for distributing grants
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1993
HB 3316
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
under this section if the amounts requested exceed the amounts available.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2017 Act first applies to the 2017-2018  school year, based
on results from the statewide summative assessments administered during the  2016-2017
school year.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, which may be expended for the  purpose of awarding
grants as described in section 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[2]