Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Agency” and  “attendant care services” have the meanings given those terms in ORS
427.191.
(b) “Exceptional service rate” means a higher payment rate based on the assessed service
needs of an individual.
(c) “Residential training facility” and “residential training  home” have the meanings
given those terms in ORS 443.400.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules to require an agency  to imple-
ment enhanced staffing ratios when  an individual resides in a residential training home or
residential training facility and:
(a) The agency is receiving an  exceptional service rate for the provision of attendant care
services to the  individual at a staff-to-individual ratio of one to one, two to one or three to
one; or
(b) The individual requires a specific staffing ratio or  pattern according to criteria pre-
scribed by the department.
SECTION 2. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 443.400 to
443.455.
SECTION 3. A residential training home  or residential training facility that serves a
high-needs resident, as defined by the Department of Human Services, shall provide to  the
department a staff safety plan that addresses emergency protocols, staff-to-supervisor  ratios
and other staff safety issues as determined by the department.
SECTION 4. (1) Sections 1 and 3 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Department of Human Services may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the department to ex-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3522
HB 3168
1
2
3
4
5
6
ercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the  department by sections 1 and 3 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]