Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated  to the Department of Human Services, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $8,162,104 for the
purpose of providing transition services to current foster  children and former foster children
as defined in ORS 350.300.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2890