Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Food Bank Audit Committee is established as a joint  com-
mittee of the Legislative Assembly.
(2) The  committee shall cause an audit of the Oregon Food Bank to be performed that
is to examine all financial transactions conducted  or engaged in by the Oregon Food Bank,
a subsidiary or subdivision  of the Oregon Food Bank or a person acting on behalf of or at
the direction of the Oregon Food Bank. The audit is  to examine all financial transactions
occurring during the period beginning on December 1, 2021, and ending on  January 1, 2025.
Persons conducting the audit shall  identify and report to the committee on all financial
transactions that are directly or indirectly related to political campaign activity or political
issue activity.
(3) The committee  may arrange for one or more persons with expertise and experience
performing financial audits to perform the audit described  in subsection (2) of this section.
To facilitate performance  of the audit, the contracted auditors may request the committee
to exercise its authority to compel the production of records under ORS 171.510.
(4) The contracted auditors shall report findings to the committee at the dates  and times
prescribed by the committee. The  committee shall prepare a written report to the Legislative
Assembly of the results of the audit on or before November 15, 2025.
(5) At the direction of the committee, the Legislative Administrator shall execute  those
contracts and agreements necessary for persons selected by the committee under subsection
(3) of this section to perform the auditing functions described in this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Food Bank  Audit Committee established in section 1 of this
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2965
SB 644
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
2025 Act shall consist of:
(a) Those members of the Senate who  are appointed by the President of the Senate so
that there is an equal number of majority party and minority party members of  the Senate;
and
(b) Those members of the House of Representatives who are  appointed by the Speaker
of the House so that there is an  equal number of majority party and minority party members
of the House.
(2) The appointing authorities shall appoint members of a new committee  within 30 days
after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(3) Vacancies occurring in the  membership of the committee shall be filled by the ap-
pointing authority so as to ensure an  equal number of majority party and minority party
members from the appropriate house.
(4) The committee may not transact business unless a quorum  is present. A quorum
consists of a majority of committee  members from the House of Representatives and a ma-
jority of committee members from the Senate.
(5) Action by the committee requires the affirmative vote of a majority of  committee
members from the House of Representatives and a majority of committee members from  the
Senate.
(6) The committee has  a continuing existence and may meet, act and conduct its business
during the sessions of the Legislative Assembly or any  recess thereof, and in the interim
period between sessions, but the committee has  no authority to affect the rules of either
house.
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]