Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Transportation shall conduct a study of U.S.  Highway
30 and shall make a report on the department’s findings.
(2) The report must include:
(a) An assessment of the condition of U.S. Highway 30, beginning at milepost 49 and
ending at milepost 94;
(b) Information regarding deficiencies in the condition of U.S.  Highway 30, beginning at
milepost 49 and ending at milepost 94;
(c) Recommendations for  improving the condition of U.S. Highway 30, beginning at
milepost 49 and ending at milepost 94, to a state of good repair;
(d) A cost estimate for the recommended improvements; and
(e) Any other information that the department deems  pertinent and useful to share with
the Joint Committee on Transportation.
(3) The department  shall submit the report required by this section, and may include
recommendations for legislation, to the Joint  Committee on Transportation in the manner
provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2025.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 27