Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 166.412 is amended to read:
166.412. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Antique firearm” has the meaning given that term in 18 U.S.C. 921;
(b) “Department” means the Department of State Police;
(c) “Firearm” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210, except that it  does not include
an antique firearm;
(d) “Firearms transaction record” means the firearms transaction record required by  18 U.S.C.
921 to 929;
[(e) “Firearms transaction thumbprint  form” means a form provided by the department under sub-
section (11) of this section; ]
[(f)] (e)  “Gun dealer” means a person engaged in the business, as defined in 18 U.S.C. 921,  of
selling, leasing or otherwise transferring a firearm, whether the  person is a retail dealer,
pawnbroker or otherwise;
[(g)] (f)  “Purchaser” means a person who buys, leases or otherwise receives a  firearm or unfin-
ished frame or receiver from a gun dealer; [ and]
(g) “System” means the National Instant Criminal Background Check  System established
under 34 U.S.C. 40901; and
(h) “Unfinished frame or receiver” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
(2) Except as provided in subsection [ (12)] (7) of this section, a gun dealer shall comply with  the
following before a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver is delivered to a purchaser:
(a) The purchaser shall present to the gun dealer  current identification meeting the require-
ments of subsection (4) of this section and a valid permit issued under ORS 166.505.
(b) The gun dealer shall complete the firearms transaction record and obtain the signature of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4161
HB 3836
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the purchaser on the record.
[(c) The gun dealer shall obtain the thumbprints of the purchaser on the firearms transaction
thumbprint form and attach the form to the gun dealer’s copy of  the firearms transaction record to be
filed with that copy. ]
[(d)] (c)  The gun dealer shall, by telephone or computer, verify  with the  department that the
purchaser has a valid permit-to-purchase a firearm issued under ORS 166.505[ , and].
(d) The gun dealer shall  request that the [ department] system  conduct  a criminal history re-
cord check on the purchaser and shall  provide the following information to the [ department]
system:
(A) The federal firearms license number of the gun dealer;
(B) The business name of the gun dealer;
(C) The place of transfer;
(D) The name of the person making the transfer;
(E) The make, model, caliber and manufacturer’s number of  the firearm being transferred or a
description of the unfinished frame or receiver being transferred;
(F) The name and date of birth of the purchaser;
(G) The Social Security number of the purchaser  if the purchaser voluntarily provides this
number to the gun dealer; and
(H) The type, issuer and identification number of the identification presented by the purchaser.
(e) The gun dealer  shall receive a [ unique approval ] transaction  number for the transfer from
the [ department] system  and  record the [ approval] number on the firearms transaction record [ and
on the firearms transaction thumbprint form ].
[(f) The gun  dealer may destroy the firearms transaction thumbprint form five years after the
completion of the firearms transaction thumbprint form. ]
[(3)(a) Upon receipt of a request of the gun dealer for  a criminal history record check, the depart-
ment shall immediately, during the gun dealer’s telephone call or by return call: ]
[(A) Determine, from criminal records and  other information available to it, whether the purchaser
is disqualified under ORS 166.470 from completing the purchase; and ]
[(B) Notify the gun dealer when a purchaser  is disqualified from completing the transfer or provide
the gun dealer with a unique approval number indicating that the purchaser  is qualified to complete
the transfer. ]
[(b) If the department is unable to determine if the purchaser is qualified  or disqualified from
completing the transfer within 30 minutes, the department shall notify the gun dealer  and provide the
gun dealer with an estimate of the time when the department will provide the requested information. ]
[(c)] (3)  The dealer may not transfer the firearm or unfinished  frame or receiver unless the
dealer receives a [ unique approval number ] proceed response  from the [ department] system  and,
within 48 hours of completing the transfer, the dealer shall notify the state that the transfer to  the
permit holder was completed.
(4)(a) Identification required of the purchaser under subsection (2) of this section  shall include
one piece of  current identification bearing a photograph and the date of birth of the purchaser that:
(A) Is issued under the authority of the United States Government, a state, a political  subdivi-
sion of a state, a foreign government, a political subdivision  of a foreign government, an interna-
tional governmental organization or an international quasi-governmental organization; and
(B) Is intended to be used for identification  of an individual or is commonly accepted for the
purpose of identification of an individual.
[2]
HB 3836
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) If the identification  presented by the purchaser under paragraph (a) of this subsection does
not include the  current address of the purchaser, the purchaser shall present a second piece of
current identification that contains the current address of the purchaser.  [ The Superintendent of
State Police may specify by rule the  type of identification that may be presented under this
paragraph.]
[(c) The department may  require that the gun dealer verify the identification of the purchaser if that
identity is in question by sending the thumbprints of the purchaser to the department. ]
[(5) The department shall establish a telephone number that shall be  operational seven days a week
between the hours of 8 a.m. and 10 p.m. for the purpose of  responding to inquiries from gun dealers
for a criminal history record check under this section. ]
[(6) No public employee, official or agency shall be held criminally or civilly liable  for performing
the investigations required by this section provided the employee, official or agency acts  in good faith
and without malice. ]
[(7)(a) The department may retain a record of the information obtained during a request for  a
criminal history record check for no more than five years, except for  the information provided to the
dealer under subsection (2)(d) of this section, sufficient to reflect each  firearm or unfinished frame or
receiver purchased by a permit holder, which must be attached to the electronic record of  the permit
stored by the department. The department may develop a system for removal of  the information in
subsection (2)(d)(E) of this  section, upon proof of sale or transfer of the firearm or unfinished frame
or receiver to another permit holder and for recording of the information to  reflect the transfer of
ownership to the permit of the new owner. ]
[(b) The record of the information obtained during a request for a criminal history record  check
by a gun dealer is exempt from disclosure under public records law. ]
[(c) If the department determines  that a purchaser is prohibited from possessing a firearm under
ORS 166.250 (1)(c),  the department shall report the attempted transfer, the purchaser’s name and any
other personally identifiable information to all federal, state and local law  enforcement agencies and
district attorneys that have jurisdiction over the  location or locations where the attempted transfer was
made and where the purchaser resides. ]
[(d) If the  department determines that, based on the judgment of conviction, the purchaser is pro-
hibited from possessing a firearm as a condition of probation or that the purchaser is currently  on
post-prison supervision or parole, the department shall report the attempted transfer to  the purchaser’s
supervising officer and the district attorney of the county in which the conviction occurred. ]
[(e) If the department determines that the purchaser  is prohibited from possessing a firearm due to
a court order described in ORS 166.255 (1)(a), the department shall report the attempted transfer to the
court that issued the order. ]
[(f) If the department determines that the purchaser is  under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric
Security Review Board, the department shall report the attempted transfer to the board. ]
[(g) Reports required by paragraphs (c) to (f) of this  subsection shall be made within 24 hours after
the determination is made, unless a  report would compromise an ongoing investigation, in which case
the report may be delayed as long as necessary to avoid compromising the investigation. ]
[(h) On or before January 31  of each year, a law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney’s
office that received a report pursuant to paragraph (c) of this  subsection during the previous calendar
year shall inform the department of any action that was taken concerning the report and  the outcome
of the action. ]
[(i) The department  shall annually publish a written report, based on any information received
[3]
HB 3836
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under paragraph (h) of this subsection, detailing the following information for the previous year: ]
[(A) The number of purchasers whom the department determined were  prohibited from possessing
a firearm under ORS 166.250 (1)(c), arranged by category of prohibition; ]
[(B) The number of reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection; ]
[(C) The number of investigations arising from the reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of  this
subsection, the number of investigations concluded and the number  of investigations referred for pros-
ecution, all arranged by category of prohibition; and ]
[(D) The number of criminal charges arising from the reports made pursuant to  paragraph (c) of
this subsection and the disposition of the charges, both arranged by category of prohibition. ]
[(8)] (5) A law  enforcement agency may inspect the records of a gun dealer relating to transfers
of firearms and unfinished frames or receivers with the consent of a gun dealer in the course of  a
reasonable inquiry during a criminal investigation or under the  authority of a properly authorized
subpoena or search warrant.
[(9)] (6) When a firearm is delivered, it shall be unloaded.
[(10) In accordance with applicable provisions of  ORS chapter 183, the Superintendent of State
Police may adopt rules necessary for: ]
[(a) The design of the firearms transaction thumbprint form; ]
[(b) The maintenance of a procedure to correct errors in the criminal records of the department; ]
[(c) The provision of a  security system to identify gun dealers that request a criminal history record
check under subsection (2) of this section; and ]
[(d) The creation and maintenance of a database of the business hours of gun dealers. ]
[(11) The department shall publish the firearms transaction thumbprint form and shall furnish  the
form to gun dealers on application at cost. ]
[(12)] (7) This section does not apply to transactions between persons licensed as dealers  under
18 U.S.C. 923.
[(13)(a)] (8)(a)  If requested by a transferor who is not  a gun dealer, a gun dealer may request
a criminal background check pursuant to ORS 166.435 or 166.438 and may  charge a reasonable fee
for providing the service.
(b) A gun dealer  that requests a criminal background check under this subsection is immune
from civil liability for any use of the firearm or unfinished frame  or receiver by the recipient or
transferee, provided that the gun dealer requests the criminal  background check as described in this
section , and also provided that the dealer  verifies that the recipient has a valid permit-to-purchase
the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver and the dealer has received a [ unique approval number ]
proceed response from the [ department] system  indicating successful completion of  the background
check.
[(14)] (9)  Knowingly selling  or delivering a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver to a pur-
chaser or transferee who does not have  a valid permit-to-purchase a firearm in violation of sub-
section [ (2)(d)] (2)(c)  of this section, or prior to receiving  a [ unique approval number ] proceed
response from the [ department] system  based on the criminal background check  in violation of
subsection [ (3)(c)] (3) of this section, is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 166.435 is amended to read:
166.435. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “System” means the National Instant Criminal Background Check  System established
under 34 U.S.C. 40901.
[(a)] (b) “Transfer” means the delivery of a firearm from a  transferor to a transferee, including,
[4]
HB 3836
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
but not limited to, the sale, gift, loan or lease of the firearm. “Transfer” does not  include the tem-
porary provision of a firearm  to a transferee if the transferor has no reason to believe the transferee
is prohibited from possessing a firearm or intends to  use the firearm in the commission of a crime,
and the provision occurs:
(A) At a shooting range,  shooting gallery or other area designed for the purpose of target
shooting, for use during  target practice, a firearms safety or training course or class or a similar
lawful activity;
(B) For the  purpose of hunting, trapping or target shooting, during the time in which the
transferee is engaged in activities related to hunting, trapping or target shooting;
(C) Under circumstances in which the  transferee and the firearm are in the presence of the
transferor;
(D) To a transferee who is in the business of repairing firearms,  for the time during which the
firearm is being repaired;
(E) To a transferee who is  in the business of making or repairing custom accessories for
firearms, for the time during which the accessories are being made or repaired; or
(F) For the purpose of preventing imminent death or serious physical injury, and  the provision
lasts only as long as is necessary to prevent the death or serious physical injury.
[(b)] (c)  “Transferee” means a person who is not a gun dealer or licensed as a  manufacturer or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923 and who intends to receive a firearm from a transferor.
[(c)] (d) “Transferor” means a person who is not a gun dealer or licensed as a manufacturer  or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923 and who intends to deliver a firearm to a transferee.
(2) Except as provided in ORS  166.436 and 166.438 and subsection (4) of this section, a transferor
may not transfer a firearm to a transferee unless the transfer is completed through  a gun dealer as
described in subsection (3) of this section.
(3)(a) A transferor may transfer a firearm to a transferee only as provided in this section. Except
as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, prior to the transfer both the transferor  and the
transferee must appear in person before a gun dealer, with the firearm  and a valid permit-to-
purchase issued to the  transferee under ORS 166.505, and request that the gun dealer perform a
criminal background check on the transferee.
(b) If the transferor and the  transferee reside over 40 miles from each other, the transferor may
ship or deliver the firearm to a gun dealer located near the transferee or a  gun dealer designated
by the transferee, and the transferor need not appear before the gun dealer in person.
(c) A gun dealer who  agrees to complete a transfer of a firearm under this section shall request
a criminal history record check on the transferee as  described in ORS 166.412 and shall comply with
all requirements of federal law.
(d) If, upon completion of a criminal background check, the gun dealer:
(A) Receives a  [ unique approval number ] proceed response  from the [ Department of State
Police ] system  indicating that the transferee is qualified to complete the transfer, the gun  dealer
shall notify the transferor, enter the firearm into the  gun dealer’s inventory and transfer the firearm
to the transferee.
(B) Receives notification  that the transferee is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing
or receiving  the firearm or that the [ department] system  is unable to determine if the transferee is
qualified or disqualified from completing the transfer, the gun dealer shall notify  the transferor and
neither the transferor nor  the gun dealer shall transfer the firearm to the transferee. If the
transferor shipped or delivered  the firearm to the gun dealer pursuant to paragraph (b) of this sub-
[5]
HB 3836
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section, the gun dealer shall comply with federal law when returning the firearm to the transferor.
(e) A gun dealer may  charge a reasonable fee for facilitating a firearm transfer pursuant to this
section.
(4) The requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not apply to:
(a) The transfer of a firearm by or to a law enforcement agency, or by or  to a law enforcement
officer, private security professional or member  of the Armed Forces of the United States, while that
person is acting within the scope of official duties.
(b) The transfer of a firearm as part of a firearm turn-in or buyback event, in which  a law
enforcement agency receives or purchases firearms from members of the public.
(c) The transfer of a firearm to:
(A) A transferor’s spouse or domestic partner;
(B) A transferor’s parent or stepparent;
(C) A transferor’s child or stepchild;
(D) A transferor’s sibling;
(E) A transferor’s grandparent;
(F) A transferor’s grandchild;
(G) A transferor’s aunt or uncle;
(H) A transferor’s first cousin;
(I) A transferor’s niece or nephew; or
(J) The spouse or domestic partner of a person specified in subparagraphs (B) to (I) of this par-
agraph.
(d) The transfer of a firearm that occurs because of the death of the firearm owner,  provided
that:
(A) The  transfer is conducted or facilitated by a personal representative, as defined in ORS
111.005, or a trustee of a trust created in a will; and
(B) The transferee is related to the deceased firearm owner in a manner specified in  paragraph
(c) of this subsection.
(5)(a) A transferor who fails  to comply with the requirements of this section commits a Class
A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, a transferor who fails to comply with the
requirements of this section commits a Class  B felony if the transferor has a previous conviction
under this section at the time of the offense.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 166.436 is amended to read:
166.436. [(1) The Department of State Police  shall make the telephone number established under
ORS 166.412 (5) available for  requests for criminal background checks under this section from persons
who are not gun dealers and who are transferring firearms at gun shows. ]
(1) The Department of State Police shall establish a telephone number  that is operational
seven days a week between the hours of 8 a.m. and 10 p.m. for the purpose of responding  to
inquiries from persons other than  gun dealers for a criminal background check under this
section. The department is not required to  operate the telephone number on Thanksgiving
Day and Christmas Day.
(2) Prior to transferring a firearm at a gun show, a transferor who is not a gun dealer shall by
telephone verify that the transferee has a valid permit-to-purchase a firearm  under ORS 166.505, and
request that  the department conduct a criminal background check on the recipient upon providing
the following information to the department:
[6]
HB 3836
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The name, address and telephone number of the transferor;
(b) The make, model, caliber and manufacturer’s number of the firearm being transferred;
(c) The name, date of birth, race, sex and address of the recipient;
(d) The Social Security  number of the recipient if the recipient voluntarily provides that number;
(e) The address of the place where the transfer is occurring; and
(f) The type, issuer and identification  number of a current piece of identification bearing a re-
cent photograph of the recipient presented by the  recipient. The identification presented by the re-
cipient must meet the requirements of ORS 166.412 (4)(a).
(3)(a) Upon receipt of a request for a criminal background check under this  section, the de-
partment shall immediately, during the telephone call or by return call:
(A) Determine from criminal  records and other information available to it whether the recipient
is disqualified under ORS 166.470 from  completing the transfer or is otherwise prohibited by state
or federal law from possessing a firearm; and
(B) Notify the transferor when a  recipient is disqualified from completing the transfer or provide
the transferor with a unique approval number indicating that  the recipient is qualified to complete
the transfer. The unique approval number is a permit valid  for 24 hours for the requested transfer.
If the firearm is not transferred from the transferor to the recipient within  24 hours after receipt
of the unique approval number, a new request must be made by the transferor.
(b) If the department is unable to determine whether the recipient is qualified for  or disqualified
from completing the transfer within 30  minutes of receiving the request, the department shall notify
the transferor  and provide the transferor with an estimate of the time when the department will
provide the requested information.
(c) The  transferor may not transfer the firearm unless the transferor receives a unique approval
number from the department and,  within 48 hours of the completed transfer, the transferor shall
notify the state that the transfer to the permit holder was completed.
(4) A public employee or  public agency incurs no criminal or civil liability for performing the
criminal background checks required by this section, provided the employee or agency acts  in good
faith and without malice.
(5)(a) The department may retain a  record of the information obtained during a request for a
criminal background check under this section for [ the period of time  provided in ORS 166.412 (7), as
amended by section 6, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2023 ] no more than five years .
(b) The record of the  information obtained during a request for a criminal background check
under this section is exempt from disclosure under public records law.
(c) If the department determines that a recipient is prohibited from possessing a  firearm under
ORS 166.250 (1)(c), the department shall  report the attempted transfer, the recipient’s name and any
other personally identifiable information to all federal, state  and local law enforcement agencies and
district attorneys that have jurisdiction over the location  or locations where the attempted transfer
was made and where the recipient resides.
(d) If the department determines that, based  on the judgment of conviction, the recipient is
prohibited from possessing a firearm as a condition of probation  or that the recipient is currently
on post-prison supervision or parole,  the department shall report the attempted transfer to the
recipient’s supervising officer and the district attorney of the county in which the  conviction oc-
curred.
(e) If the department determines that the recipient is prohibited from possessing a firearm  due
to a court order described in ORS 166.255 (1)(a), the department shall  report the attempted transfer
[7]
HB 3836
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to the court that issued the order.
(f) If the department determines that the recipient is under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric
Security Review Board, the department shall report the attempted transfer to the board.
(g) Reports required by paragraphs (c) to (f) of this subsection shall be made  within 24 hours
after the determination is made, unless a report would  compromise an ongoing investigation, in
which case the report may be delayed as long as necessary to avoid compromising  the investigation.
(h) On or  before January 31 of each year, a law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney’s
office that received a report pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection during the previous cal-
endar year shall inform the department of any action that was taken  concerning the report and the
outcome of the action.
(i) The department shall annually publish a written report, based on any information  received
under paragraph (h) of this subsection, detailing the following information for the previous year:
(A) The number of recipients whom the department determined were  prohibited from possessing
a firearm under ORS 166.250 (1)(c), arranged by category of prohibition;
(B) The number of reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(C) The number of investigations arising from the reports  made pursuant to paragraph (c) of this
subsection, the number of investigations concluded  and the number of investigations referred for
prosecution, all arranged by category of prohibition; and
(D) The number of criminal charges arising from the reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of
this subsection and the disposition of the charges, both arranged by category of prohibition.
(6) The recipient of the firearm must be present when the transferor requests a criminal back-
ground check under this section.
(7)(a) Except  as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a transferor who receives
notification under this section that the recipient is qualified to complete the transfer  of a firearm,
has the recipient fill out  the form required by ORS 166.438 (1)(a) and retains the form as required
by ORS 166.438 (2) is immune from civil liability  for any use of the firearm from the time of the
transfer unless the transferor knows, or reasonably should know, that the recipient  is likely to
commit an unlawful act involving the firearm.
(b) The immunity provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply:
(A) If the transferor knows, or reasonably should know, that the recipient of the  firearm intends
to deliver the firearm to a third person who the transferor knows, or reasonably should  know, may
not lawfully possess the firearm; or
(B) In any product liability civil action under ORS 30.900 to 30.920.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 166.414 is amended to read:
166.414. (1) The Department of State Police may adopt a fee  schedule for criminal history record
checks [ required under ORS 166.412 ] described in ORS 166.436 and collect a fee for each criminal
history record check  requested. The fee schedule shall be calculated to recover the cost of per-
forming criminal history record checks [ required under ORS 166.412 ], but may not exceed  $10 per
record  check.
(2) The department shall establish a reduced  fee for subsequent criminal background
checks on the same  recipient that are performed during the same day between the hours of
8 a.m. and 10 p.m.
[(2)] (3) Fees collected under this section shall be  paid into the State Treasury and deposited in
the General Fund to the credit of the State Police Account.
SECTION 5.  ORS 166.256 is amended to read:
[8]
HB 3836
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
166.256. (1)(a) When a respondent becomes  subject to an order described in ORS 166.255 (1)(a)
prohibiting the respondent from possessing firearms or ammunition, the court shall:
(A) Indicate in the order that the  respondent is prohibited from possessing firearms and ammu-
nition under ORS 166.250 and 166.255 while the order is in effect.
(B) Ensure that the respondent is subject to an additional order:
(i) Requiring the respondent to transfer all firearms and ammunition in the respondent’s  pos-
session in accordance with subsection (2) of this section; and
(ii) Requiring the respondent to file a declaration as described in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) If the respondent becomes subject to the order while the respondent is present in  court, the
court  shall:
(A) Inform the respondent, orally and in writing,  that the respondent is prohibited from pos-
sessing firearms and ammunition;
(B) Order in writing that the respondent transfer all firearms and  ammunition in the
respondent’s possession in accordance with subsection (2) of this section; and
(C) Order that the respondent file a declaration as described in subsection (4) of this section.
(2)(a) Within 24 hours of becoming subject to the court order under subsection (1)(a)(B) of  this
section  or  receiving the court order under subsection (1)(b)(B) of this section, the respondent shall
transfer all  firearms and ammunition in the respondent’s possession to a local law enforcement
agency, to a gun dealer as defined in ORS 166.412 or to a third party who does not reside with  the
respondent, and shall obtain a proof of  transfer under paragraph (b) of this subsection. A transfer
to a third party under this subsection must be  in accordance with ORS 166.435, except that the
criminal background check exceptions in ORS 166.435 (4) do not apply.
(b) A law enforcement  agency, gun dealer or third party receiving a firearm or ammunition
pursuant to this subsection  shall issue to the respondent a written proof of transfer. The proof of
transfer must include the respondent’s name, the date of transfer and the serial  number, make and
model of each transferred firearm. A proof of transfer issued by a third party must  also include the
[unique approval number from the Department of State Police ] transaction  number and documen-
tation of the proceed response from the criminal background check conducted  through the Na-
tional Instant Criminal Background Check System  under ORS 166.435.
(c) A respondent transferring a  firearm or ammunition to a third party under this subsection
shall additionally obtain from the third party a declaration under  penalty of perjury confirming re-
ceipt of the firearm or ammunition and attesting that:
(A) The third party understands that the respondent is prohibited  from possessing firearms and
ammunition; and
(B) The third party is subject to criminal penalties if  the third party allows the respondent ac-
cess to the firearm or ammunition during the prohibition.
(3)(a) A law enforcement agency  may accept a firearm or ammunition transferred under this
section.
(b) A gun dealer may purchase or may accept for storage a firearm or ammunition  transferred
under this section.
(4)(a) Within two judicial days of becoming subject to the  court order under subsection (1)(a)(B)
of this section or  receiving the court order under subsection (1)(b)(B) of this section, the respondent
shall file with the court a declaration under penalty of perjury attesting that:
(A) All firearms and ammunition in the respondent’s possession have been transferred under
subsection (2) of this section to:
[9]
HB 3836
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) A law enforcement agency;
(ii) A gun dealer; or
(iii) A third party;
(B) The respondent was not in possession  of any firearms at the time of the court’s order and
continues to not possess any firearms; or
(C) The respondent is asserting the respondent’s constitutional right against self-incrimination.
(b) The  respondent shall file with the declaration a copy of the proof of transfer, if applicable,
and a copy of the third party declaration, if applicable.
(5) The  respondent shall concurrently file with the district attorney copies of the declaration,
proof of transfer and third party declaration filed with the court  under subsection (4) of this section.
(6) A respondent in possession of a firearm or ammunition in violation of  ORS 166.255 (1)(a) may
not be prosecuted under ORS 166.250 if:
(a) The respondent is in possession of a court order  described in subsection (1)(a)(B) or (1)(b)(B)
of this section that went into effect or was issued within the previous 24 hours;
(b) The firearm is unloaded; and
(c) The respondent is transporting the firearm or ammunition  to a law enforcement agency, gun
dealer or third party for transfer in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.
(7) Upon the expiration or termination of the order described in ORS  166.255 (1)(a), at the re-
quest of the respondent:
(a) A law enforcement agency shall return any stored  firearms and ammunition to the respond-
ent in accordance with ORS 166.257.
(b) A gun dealer  shall return any stored firearms and ammunition to the respondent after per-
forming a criminal background check  as defined in ORS 166.432 to confirm that the respondent is
not prohibited from possessing a firearm or ammunition under state or federal law.
(c) A third party shall return any stored  firearms and ammunition to the respondent only after
requesting a criminal background check in accordance with ORS  166.435, except that the criminal
background check exceptions in ORS 166.435 (4) do not apply.
(8) If the respondent does  not file a declaration described in subsection (4) of this section, the
district attorney may commence contempt proceedings under ORS 33.015 to 33.155.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 166.259 is amended to read:
166.259. (1) When a person is convicted of an offense described in ORS 166.255 (1)(b)  or (c), the
court shall, at the time of conviction:
(a) Indicate in  the judgment of conviction that the person is prohibited from possessing firearms
and ammunition under ORS 166.250 and 166.255;
(b) Inform the person,  orally and in writing, that the person is prohibited from possessing
firearms and ammunition;
(c) Order in  writing that the person transfer all firearms and ammunition in the person’s pos-
session in accordance with subsection (2) of this section; and
(d) Order that the person file a declaration as described in subsection (4) of this section.
(2)(a) Within 24 hours of  the court’s order under subsection (1) of this section, the person shall
transfer all firearms and ammunition in the person’s  possession to a local law enforcement agency,
to a gun dealer as  defined in ORS 166.412 or to a third party who does not reside with the person,
and shall obtain a  proof of transfer under paragraph (b) of this subsection. A transfer to a third
party under this subsection must be in accordance with ORS  166.435, except that the criminal
background check exceptions in ORS 166.435 (4) do not apply.
[10]
HB 3836
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A law enforcement agency, gun dealer or third party receiving a  firearm or ammunition
pursuant to this subsection shall issue to the person a written proof of  transfer. The proof of
transfer must include the person’s name, the date of transfer  and the serial number, make and model
of each transferred firearm. A proof of transfer issued by a third party must also include the [ unique
approval number from the Department  of State Police ] transaction number and documentation of
the proceed response  from the criminal background check conducted  through the National In-
stant Criminal Background Check System  under ORS 166.435.
(c) A person transferring a  firearm or ammunition to a third party under this subsection shall
additionally obtain from the third party a declaration under penalty of perjury  confirming receipt
of the firearm or ammunition and attesting that:
(A) The third party understands  that the person is prohibited from possessing firearms and am-
munition; and
(B) The third party is subject to criminal penalties if the third party  allows the person access
to the firearm or ammunition during the prohibition.
(3)(a) A law enforcement agency may accept a firearm or  ammunition transferred under this
section.
(b) A  gun dealer may purchase or may accept for storage a firearm or ammunition transferred
under this section.
(4)(a) Within  two judicial days of the court’s order under subsection (1) of this section, the per-
son shall file with the court a declaration under penalty of perjury attesting that:
(A) All firearms and ammunition in the person’s possession have been transferred  under sub-
section (2) of this section to:
(i) A law enforcement agency;
(ii) A gun dealer; or
(iii) A third party;
(B) The person was not in possession of any firearms at the time of the  court’s order and con-
tinues to not possess any firearms; or
(C) The person is asserting the person’s constitutional right against self-incrimination.
(b) The person shall file  with the declaration a copy of the proof of transfer, if applicable, and
a copy of the third party declaration, if applicable.
(5) The person  shall concurrently file with the district attorney copies of the declaration, proof
of transfer and third party declaration filed with the court under subsection (4) of this section.
(6) A person in possession of a firearm or ammunition in violation of  ORS 166.255 (1)(b) or (c)
may not be prosecuted under ORS 166.250 if:
(a) The person is in possession of a court order described in subsection (1) of this section issued
within the previous 24 hours;
(b) The firearm is unloaded; and
(c) The  person is transporting the firearm or ammunition to a law enforcement agency, gun
dealer or third party for transfer in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.
(7) If the  person does not file the declaration required under subsection (4) of this section, the
district attorney may commence contempt proceedings under ORS 33.015 to 33.155.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 166.422 is amended to read:
166.422. Where  appropriate, a person may enforce the legal duties imposed by ORS [ 166.412 (7)(a)
or (b), ] 166.436 (5) by the provisions of ORS 30.260 to 30.300 and ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 8.  ORS 166.432 is amended to read:
[11]
HB 3836
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
166.432. (1) As used in ORS [ 166.412,] 166.414, 166.433, [ 166.434, 166.435,] 166.436 and 166.438,
“criminal  background  check” or “criminal history record check” means determining the eligibility
of a person to purchase or possess a firearm by reviewing state and federal databases including, but
not limited to, the:
(a) Oregon computerized criminal history system;
(b) Oregon mental health data system;
(c) Law Enforcement Data System;
(d) National Instant Criminal Background Check System; and
(e) Stolen guns system.
(2) As used in ORS 166.433, 166.435, 166.436, 166.438 and 166.441:
(a) “Gun dealer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.412.
(b) “Gun show” means an event at which more than 25 firearms are on site  and available for
transfer.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 166.460 is amended to read:
166.460. (1) ORS 166.250, 166.260, 166.291 to 166.295, 166.410, 166.412, 166.425, [ 166.434,] 166.438
and 166.450 do not apply to antique firearms.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, possession of an antique
firearm by a person described in ORS 166.250 (1)(c)(B) to (D) or (G) constitutes a violation of  ORS
166.250.
SECTION 10.  ORS 166.503 is amended to read:
166.503. As used in this section and ORS [ 166.412, 166.435, 166.436, 166.438,] 166.505 and 166.508:
(1) “Criminal background check” has the [ same] meaning given [ to this ] that  term in ORS
166.432 (1)(a) to (e).
(2) “Department” means the Department of State Police.
(3) “Gun dealer” means a  person engaged in the business, as defined in 18 U.S.C. 921, of selling,
leasing or otherwise transferring a firearm, whether the person is a  retail dealer, pawnbroker or
otherwise.
(4) “Permit” or “permit-to-purchase” means an authorization issued to a person to purchase  or
acquire a firearm, provided all other requirements at the time of purchase or acquisition are met.
(5) “Permit agent” means a  county sheriff or police chief with jurisdiction over the residence
of the person making an application for a permit-to-purchase, or their designees.
(6) “Transfer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.435 [ (1)(a)].
(7) “Transferor” means a person who is  not a gun dealer or licensed as a manufacturer or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923 and who intends to deliver a firearm to a transferee.
SECTION 11.
 Section 1, chapter 50, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  [ Section 2 of this 2015 Act ] ORS 166.435  and the amendments to ORS 166.250, 166.291,
166.412, 166.422, 166.432, 166.433, [ 166.434,] 166.436, 166.438, 166.460, 166.470, 181.150, 181.740 and
426.133 by sections 3 to 19 , chapter 50, Oregon Laws 2015,  [ of this 2015  Act ] shall be known and
may be cited as the “Oregon Firearms Safety Act.”
SECTION 12. ORS 166.434 is repealed.
SECTION 13. (1) The amendments to ORS 166.256,  166.259, 166.412, 166.414, 166.422,
166.432, 166.435, 166.436, 166.460 and 166.503 and section  1, chapter 50, Oregon Laws 2015, by
sections 1 to 11 of this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS 166.434 by section 12  of this 2025 Act
become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The amendments to ORS 166.256, 166.259, 166.412, 166.414, 166.422, 166.432,  166.435,
[12]
HB 3836
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
166.436, 166.460 and 166.503 and section 1, chapter 50, Oregon Laws 2015, by sections  1 to 11
of this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS 166.434 by section  12 of this 2025 Act apply to firearm
transfers occurring on or after January 1, 2026.
(3) The Department  of State Police and any gun dealer as defined in ORS 166.412 may
take any action before the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section that is
necessary to enable those entities, on and  after the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section, to undertake and exercise all of  the duties, functions and powers conferred
on those entities by the amendments to ORS 166.256, 166.259, 166.412, 166.414, 166.422,  166.432,
166.435, 166.436, 166.460 and 166.503 and section 1, chapter 50, Oregon Laws 2015, by sections
1 to 11 of this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS 166.434 by section 12 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 14.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[13]