Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.010 is amended to read:
336.010. (1) The common school  year consists of 175 days and the  common school month
consists of 20 days.
(2) No  pupil shall be required to attend school on any Saturday or on any legal school holiday.
Except as otherwise specifically provided in this  section, a legal school holiday is any holiday
specified in ORS 187.010.
(3) Days on which an election is held throughout  the state shall be school holidays only for such
schools in which the sole schoolroom is used for election purposes.
(4) The following days  are not school holidays, but a portion of the days shall be set apart and
observed in the public schools by appropriate activities:
(a) Lincoln’s Birthday on February 12.
(b) Admission of Oregon into the Union on February 14.
(c) Washington’s Birthday on February 22.
(d) Columbus Day on October 12.
(5) On January 15, Martin Luther King, Jr.’s actual date of birth, a portion  of the day shall be
set apart and observed in the public schools by appropriate activities.
(6) Martin Luther King, Jr.’s Birthday, designated in ORS 187.010 as the third Monday  in Jan-
uary, shall be a legal school holiday. However, notwithstanding subsection (8) of this section,
whether or not there shall be compensation of school  employees shall be at the discretion of the
school board or covered by a collective bargaining agreement.
(7) Presidents Day, designated in ORS 187.010 as the third Monday in February, is not  a legal
school holiday.
(8) No teacher shall be required to  teach on any Saturday, except as provided in the terms of
the teacher’s employment, or on  any legal school holiday. When a holiday occurs on what would
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3764
HB 3448
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
otherwise be a school day, teachers shall be allowed full pay for the holiday.
(9) No subject required for graduation shall be taught on Saturday only.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 336.012 is amended to read:
336.012. A district school board [ may] must adopt a class schedule that  operates throughout the
year for all [ or any ] schools in the school district.
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments to ORS 336.010 and  336.012 by sections 1 and 2 of this
2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2027.
(2) The amendments to ORS 336.010 and 336.012 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act  first
apply to the 2027-2028 school year.
SECTION 4. (1) The Department of Education shall convene an advisory group for  the
purposes of:
(a) Developing model class schedules that:
(A) Assist school  districts to comply with the requirements of ORS 336.010 and 336.012,
as amended by sections 1 and 2  of this 2025 Act, and any rule adopted by the State Board
of Education related to required instructional hours; and
(B) Take advantage of summer learning opportunities and funding.
(b) Identifying any changes to statutes or administrative rules necessary for school dis-
tricts to implement a class schedule that operates throughout the year.
(c) Identifying any technical assistance  that school districts may require for implement-
ing a class schedule that operates through the year.
(2) No later than September 1, 2026, the advisory group convened under this section shall
submit a report  to the State Board of Education that summarizes the work of the advisory
group.
(3) No later than January 1, 2026, the department shall submit a report on the  advisory
group’s work in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations  for
legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]