Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any contrary provision  of law, a person may not remove a
dam, as defined in ORS 540.443.
SECTION 2. ORS 540.452 is repealed.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 540.443 to
540.491.
SECTION 4. The Water  Resources Department shall encourage persons to construct 10
new dams in this state on or before December 31, 2030.
SECTION 5. Section 4 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2031.
SECTION 6. (1) As used in this section,  “dam” has the meaning given that term in ORS
540.443.
(2) The Water Resources Department shall compile lists of:
(a) All dams that have been proposed since the year 1900 but  have not been constructed.
(b) Potential new dams.
(3) The department shall submit a report on the lists in  the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 7.
Section 6 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 8.  ORS 540.995 is amended to read:
540.995. (1) The Water Resources Director may impose a civil penalty of  not more than $2,000
per occurrence for a violation of ORS 540.449[ , 540.452] or 540.482.
(2) The Water Resources Director  may impose a civil penalty, not to exceed $500, by order as
provided under ORS 540.467. If a violation of an  order under ORS 540.467 is a continuing condition,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4327
HB 3739
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
each month that the condition continues is a  separate violation subject to imposition of a civil
penalty.
(3) Moneys recovered from civil penalties imposed  under this section shall be deposited in the
State Treasury and credited to an account  of the Water Resources Department. Moneys described
in this section are continuously appropriated  to the department for the administration and enforce-
ment of ORS 540.443 to 540.491.
SECTION 9.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]