Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Fire department”  means a regularly organized fire department as that term is de-
fined in ORS 652.050.
(b) “Firefighter” has the meaning given that term in ORS 652.050.
(c) “Fire protection district” means a rural fire protection  district organized under or
subject to ORS chapter 478.
(d) “Volunteer services” means services performed by a  firefighter during work hours
and work shifts  that are voluntary and that are not a condition of employment, or voluntary
services provided by individuals registered under the statewide emergency registry system
required ORS 401.256 or under other rural community response programs.
(2) A resident or nonresident individual shall be allowed a credit  against taxes that are
otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 if the individual provides 100 hours of volunteer ser-
vices, including training hours, for a fire protection district or a fire department  in the tax
year.
(3) The amount of the credit allowed under this section shall equal $250.
(4) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules relating  to the administration and
enforcement of this section. The department shall prescribe a form that requires  the chief
of the fire protection district or fire department to certify that  the individual qualifies for
the credit allowed under this section.
(5) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax  liability of the taxpayer
and may not be carried forward to another tax year.
(6) A nonresident shall be  allowed the credit under this section in the proportion provided
in ORS 316.117. If a change in the status of a taxpayer  from resident to nonresident or from
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1628
HB 2526
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
nonresident to resident occurs, the credit allowed by this section  shall be determined in a
manner consistent with ORS 316.117.
(7) A credit may not be allowed under this section for any tax year for which a  credit is
claimed under ORS 315.622.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]