Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 8,  chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section 6, chapter 121,
Oregon Laws 2014, and section 2, chapter 118, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) Out of  the amount specified in section 1 (6), chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, the State
Treasurer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to exceed $19 million of net proceeds for
the purposes specified in subsection [ (3)] (6) of this section, plus  an amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(2)[(a)] Bonds may not be  issued pursuant to this section or section 10, chapter 685, Oregon
Laws 2015, unless[ :] a courthouse project meets the requirements of subsection (3) or (4) of
this section.
(3) Bonds may be issued pursuant to this section or section 10, chapter 685, Oregon  Laws
2015, if:
[(A)] (a) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court has determined that:
[(i)] (A) The courthouse with respect to  which the bonds will be issued has significant structural
defects, including seismic defects, that present actual or potential threats to human  health and
safety;
[(ii)] (B) Replacing the courthouse, whether by acquiring and remodeling  or repairing an exist-
ing building or by constructing a new building, is more cost-effective than remodeling or repairing
the courthouse; and
[(iii)] (C) Replacing the courthouse creates an opportunity for colocation of  the court with other
state offices; and
[(B)] (b) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services has approved the project for which
the bonds will be issued.
(4) Bonds may be issued pursuant to this section or section 10, chapter 685, Oregon  Laws
2015, if:
(a) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court has determined that:
(A) Expanding the courthouse, whether by acquiring and remodeling or repairing space
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 292
HB 4094
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in an existing building or by  constructing new space, is a cost-effective alternative to re-
placing the courthouse; and
(B) The project includes the remediation of  any significant structural defects, including
seismic defects, that present actual or potential threats  to human health and safety in the
existing courthouse; and
(b) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services has approved  the project for
which the bonds will be issued.
[(b)] (5) The  Oregon Department of Administrative Services, after consultation with the Judicial
Department, shall determine when net proceeds  are needed for the purposes described in subsection
[(3)] (6) of this section and shall consult with the Judicial Department regarding the sale of  bonds
to be issued pursuant to this section.
[(3)] (6) The State Treasurer shall deposit the net proceeds  of bonds issued pursuant to this
section and section 10, chapter 685, Oregon  Laws 2015, in the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund. The net proceeds and any interest  earnings may be used solely to
finance costs related to acquiring, constructing, expanding, remodeling, repairing, equipping  or
furnishing land, improvements, courthouses or portions of  courthouses that are, or that upon com-
pletion of a project funded under this section will be, owned or operated by the State of Oregon.
[(4)] (7) As used in ORS 286A.816 to 286A.826 with respect to this section:
(a) “Project agency” means the Judicial Department.
(b) “Project fund” means the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement Fund.
SECTION 2.
 Section 9, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section  7, chapter 121,
Oregon Laws 2014, and section 3, chapter 118, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  (1)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 1.185, a county and the state, acting  by and through the
Oregon  Department  of Administrative Services on behalf of the Judicial Department, may enter into
interim agreements that provide for the funding, acquisition, development and construction  of a
courthouse and require the parties to negotiate in good faith and execute a long-term  lease agree-
ment or a long-term intergovernmental agreement  with respect to the ownership or operation of a
courthouse or portions  of a courthouse that the county is required to provide under ORS 1.185,
pursuant to which the state agrees to provide the property  and services described in ORS 1.185
(1)(a).
(b)(A) An agreement entered into pursuant to this  subsection may include a requirement that
the county transfer to the  Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement Fund an
amount not less than  50 percent of the total estimated costs of a project funded with bonds issued
pursuant to section 8, chapter 705, Oregon  Laws 2013, or section 10, chapter 685, Oregon Laws 2015,
with respect to the courthouse or portions of a courthouse that are the subject of the agreement.
(B) The amount transferred by a county pursuant to this paragraph  may comprise, singly or in
any combination and proportion:
(i) Property tax revenues, bond proceeds or any other county moneys; [ and]
(ii) A credit equal to the higher of the appraised value or the actual  purchase price of land
purchased by the county  for the courthouse if the state approves of the land as the site for the
courthouse[ .];
(iii) A credit equal  to the higher of the appraised value or the actual purchase price of
any space in existing buildings being converted to courthouse  and state office use if the state
approves of the conversion of the space for such purposes; and
(iv) A credit for the anticipated costs to the county of relocating county offices  to vacate
[2]
HB 4094
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
space being converted to courthouse and state office use.
(C) The amount  required to be transferred by the county under this subsection may not be less
than 75 percent of the total estimated costs unless the project includes colocation in the courthouse
of state offices in addition to the state circuit court facilities.
(2) For purposes of section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 10, chapter  685,
Oregon Laws 2015, the state shall be considered  to operate a courthouse or portions of a courthouse
that are the subject  of an agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if, as
applicable:
(a) The lease  agreement conveys to the state a full leasehold interest, including exclusive rights
to control and use the  courthouse or portions of the courthouse that are typical of a long-term lease,
for a term that is at least equal to the term during which the  bonds issued pursuant to section 8,
chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 10, chapter 685, Oregon Laws  2015, will remain out-
standing.
(b) The intergovernmental agreement  grants the state the exclusive right to control and use the
courthouse or portions of the courthouse for a term that is at least equal to the  term during which
the bonds issued pursuant to section  8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 10, chapter 685,
Oregon Laws 2015, will remain outstanding.
SECTION 3.
 Section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by  section 4, chapter 118,
Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 64.  (1) The  Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement Fund is established
in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned on moneys in
the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund pursuant to section  8, chapter 705, Oregon
Laws 2013, and section 10, chapter 685, Oregon Laws 2015, and moneys transferred to the fund by
a county pursuant to  section 9 (1)(b), chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, and may include fees, revenues
and other moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly for deposit in the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Judicial Department for:
(a) The purposes described in section 8 [ (3)] (6), chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013;
(b) Payment of the costs incurred by the department to administer the fund; and
(c) Payment of bond-related costs, as defined in ORS 286A.816.
[3]