Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Any person who receives  a certificate of election as a member of the
Legislative Assembly  may recruit for legislative assistants to serve in the legislative office
of the  member-elect, each legislative assistant hired under this section to continue in that
office upon the member-elect taking the  oath of office and becoming a member of the Leg-
islative Assembly.
(2) The recruitment and hiring shall  be in compliance with the rules of the chamber in
which the member-elect is to serve, the legislative branch personnel rules and  the human
resources policies of the legislative branch.
(3) The appointment may be effective as of the  first day of the month in which the
member-elect takes the oath of office.
(4) A legislative assistant hired under this section is an at-will  employee of the legislative
branch.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3974