Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Water Resources Department shall study the  feasibility, costs and
environmental impacts of:
(a) Turning the Winchester Dam into an operating dam  that would provide
hydroelectricity for the region.
(b) Installing a state-of-the-art fish screen or by-pass device in  or around the Winchester
Dam.
(2) The department shall submit a report on the study in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4655