Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Transportation, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $12 million, to  be deposited in the Safe Routes to Schools Fund
established under ORS 184.740.
SECTION 2.  ORS 184.741 is amended to read:
184.741. (1) The Department  of Transportation, in consultation with the Transportation Safety
Committee, shall establish a safe routes  to schools program to assist communities in identifying and
reducing barriers and hazards to children walking or bicycling to and from school.
(2) The department [ may] shall provide the following kinds of assistance:
(a) Grants;
(b) Technical services and advice;
(c) Public information and education; [ and]
(d) Evaluation and measurement of community programs[ .]; and
(e) A preapplication meeting  with a school applicant that is considered high poverty un-
der Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C.  6301 et
seq.) to:
(A) Inform the applicant of the procedural  and substantive requirements of a grant ap-
plication; and
(B) Identify known issues that may affect the eligibility of a  project to be awarded a
grant from the Safe Routes to Schools Fund.
(3) If the department awards grants under this section:
(a) The department shall award grants for all of the following:
(A) Education;
(B) Engineering; [ and]
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1877
HB 3230
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
(C) Enforcement;  and
(D) Developing education and outreach materials to provide communities  and eligible
grant applicants with information about safety projects that are eligible for federal funding;
(b) No one grant is required to include moneys for all the components specified in paragraph (a)
of this subsection; and
(c) The department shall adopt rules specifying criteria that will be used in awarding  grants[ .]
and establish a methodology for  distributing a proportionate share of moneys received under
section 1 of this 2017 Act to school  applicants that are considered high poverty under Title
I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 6301 et seq.).
(4) A city, county or school district  that has developed or is preparing to develop a plan de-
scribed in ORS 195.115 to reduce barriers and hazards to children walking or  bicycling to and from
school may apply to the department for assistance in developing or carrying out the plan.
SECTION 3. (1) Out of the funds received  by the Department of Transportation from the
State Highway Fund, at least $20 million shall be expended for the planning, design and con-
struction of safe routes to schools  infrastructure projects that will reduce barriers and
hazards to children walking or bicycling to and from school.
(2) The department shall prioritize the expenditure of funds as authorized under this
section for safe routes to schools infrastructure projects that are located  within a one-mile
radius of a school that is considered  high poverty under Title I of the federal Elementary and
Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 6301 et seq.).
(3) As used in this section, “safe routes to schools infrastructure project” includes but
is not limited to:
(a) Sidewalk improvements;
(b) Speed reduction improvements;
(c) Pedestrian and bicycle crossing improvements;
(d) New or improved bicycle lanes;
(e) Traffic diversion improvements; and
(f) Access to transit improvements.
SECTION 4.
The Department of Transportation  shall submit a biennial report to the
Legislative Assembly concerning the department’s actions  related to the safe routes to
schools program established under ORS 184.741 and safe routes to schools infrastructure
projects described under section 3 of this 2017 Act. The report shall contain:
(1) An accounting of all funds appropriated, awarded and  obligated to the department
under sections 1 and 3 of this 2017 Act.
(2) A  summary of all grants awarded for projects located within a one-mile radius of a
school that is considered high poverty under Title I of the federal Elementary  and Secondary
Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 6301 et seq.).
(3) An evaluation of the costs, benefits and future objectives  of the safe routes to schools
program in this state.
SECTION 5.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[2]