Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the Department of Education  shall
allocate at least $10,000,000, from  the Fund for Student Success established under ORS
327.001, to  the scholarship program for culturally and linguistically diverse teacher candi-
dates described in ORS 348.295.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1579