Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on the Perinatal Workforce is established.
(2) The task force consists of  at least 12 members appointed by the Oregon Health Au-
thority in collaboration with the Higher Education Coordinating Commission as follows:
(a) At least five members who are representatives of the perinatal workforce  in Oregon
and who represent the diversity of this state;
(b) At least five members who are professionally familiar with perinatal workforce  path-
ways in this state and outside of this state; and
(c) At least two members who are representatives of advocacy  organizations that work
on maternal-child health issues.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Evaluate the perinatal workforce in this state in both the health care and behavioral
health contexts, and focus on at least the following perinatal care providers:
(A) Physicians;
(B) Nurse practitioner nurse midwives;
(C) Direct entry midwives;
(D) Clinical social workers;
(E) Perinatal psychology and psychiatry providers;
(F) Doulas;
(G) Community health workers;
(H) Lactation consultants; and
(I) Peer support specialists;
(b) Identify barriers and challenges related  to accessing existing perinatal workforce
pathways;
(c) Review programs in this state,  other states and other countries that have success-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2869
SB 693
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
fully increased the access to and diversity of the perinatal workforce; and
(d) Develop recommendations for the Legislative Assembly and relevant state  agencies
for strengthening the perinatal workforce in this state, including recommendations for  im-
proving the availability of providers, support  for providers and increasing the racial, ethnic,
linguistic and geographic diversity of providers.
(4) The task  force may, through the authority, contract with third parties for facilitation,
research and report development.
(5) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
shall include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to health care no later than December 1, 2026.
(12) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]