Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 759.425 is amended to read:
759.425. (1) For purposes  of this section, “retail telecommunications service” [ does not include
radio communications service, radio paging service, commercial mobile radio service,  personal commu-
nications service or cellular  communications service ] includes both wireless and wireline services,
including but not  limited to radio common carrier services and interconnected voice over
Internet protocol service .
(2)(a) The Public Utility Commission shall establish and implement a competitively  neutral and
nondiscriminatory universal service fund. Except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, the
Public Utility Commission shall use  the universal service fund to ensure basic telephone service is
available at a reasonable and affordable  rate. The Public Utility Commission may adopt rules to
conform the universal service fund to section 254 of the federal Telecommunications Act of  1996
(Public Law 104-104), and to related regulations  adopted by the Federal Communications Commis-
sion, to the extent that the Public  Utility Commission determines conforming the rules is appropri-
ate.
(b) In  addition to using the universal service fund to ensure basic telephone service, the Public
Utility Commission [ may] shall use the universal  service fund to encourage broadband service
availability and to provide support to telecommunications carriers that provide both  basic telephone
service and broadband service.  The commission shall determine the amount of moneys  depos-
ited in the universal service fund to be used to encourage broadband service availability and
shall, in  accordance with a schedule adopted by the commission, transfer the moneys for
encouraging broadband service availability to the State  Treasurer for deposit in the
Broadband Fund established under section 2 of this 2019 Act.
(3)(a) The Public Utility  Commission shall establish the price a telecommunications utility may
charge its customers for basic telephone service. The commission  shall periodically review and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3225
HB 2184
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
evaluate the status of telecommunications services in the state  and designate the services included
in basic telephone  service. The commission shall periodically review and adjust as necessary the
price a telecommunications utility may charge for basic telephone service.
(b) The provisions of this  subsection do not apply to the basic telephone service provided by a
telecommunications utility described in ORS 759.040.
(4)(a) The commission shall establish a benchmark for basic telephone service as necessary  for
the administration and distribution of the universal service fund. The universal service  fund shall
provide explicit support to an eligible telecommunications carrier that is equal  to the difference
between the cost of providing basic telephone service and  the benchmark, less any explicit com-
pensation received  by the telecommunications carrier from federal sources specifically used to re-
cover local loop costs and less any explicit support received by the  telecommunications carrier from
a federal universal service program.
(b) The commission shall periodically  review the benchmark established under paragraph (a) of
this subsection and adjust the benchmark as necessary to reflect:
(A) Changes in competition in the telecommunications industry;
(B) Changes in federal universal service support; and
(C) Other relevant factors as determined by the commission.
(c) Except for a telecommunications utility described in ORS  759.040, the commission shall seek
to limit the difference between the price  a telecommunications utility may charge for basic tele-
phone service and the benchmark.
(5) There is imposed on the  sale of all retail telecommunications services sold in this state , and
on the sale of such other communications and broadband services as the  commission in its
discretion may determine,  a universal  service surcharge. Unless otherwise provided by the com-
mission by rule, the universal service surcharge must be a uniform percentage  of the sale of [ retail
telecommunications] services  subject to the surcharge  in an amount sufficient to support the pur-
poses of the universal service fund established under subsection (2) of  this section, provided that the
percentage does not exceed 8.5 percent of the sale of  [retail telecommunications] services  subject to
the surcharge . The universal service surcharge may be listed as  a separate line item by all [ tele-
communications carriers ] carriers required to  collect the surcharge , as prescribed by the com-
mission by rule or order. A [ telecommunications carrier ] carrier required to collect the surcharge
shall transmit amounts collected pursuant to this section to the commission in accordance with a
schedule adopted by the commission. The commission shall deposit moneys transmitted to  the com-
mission pursuant to this subsection in  the universal service fund established under subsection (2)
of this section.
(6) The universal service fund  established under subsection (2) of this section is separate and
distinct from  the General Fund. The universal service fund shall consist of all universal service
surcharge moneys collected by [ telecommunications carriers ] carriers required to collect the  sur-
charge and transmitted to the commission for deposit in the universal service  fund. The universal
service fund may  be used only for the purposes described in this section and for payment of expenses
incurred  by  the commission or a third party appointed by the commission to administer this section.
All moneys in the universal service fund are continuously  appropriated to the commission to carry
out the provisions of this section. Interest on moneys deposited in the universal service  fund shall
accrue to the universal service fund.
[(7) A person that  primarily provides radio communications service, radio paging service, com-
mercial mobile radio service, personal communications service  or cellular communications service may
[2]
HB 2184
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
request designation as an eligible telecommunications  carrier by the commission for purposes of this
section if the person imposes the universal service surcharge described in subsection (5) of this  section
and transmits the moneys collected to  the commission for deposit in the universal service fund estab-
lished under subsection (2) of this section for at  least one year immediately prior to requesting the
designation.]
[(8)] (7)  A pay telephone provider may apply to the commission, on a  form developed by the
commission, for a refund of the universal service surcharge imposed  on the pay telephone provider
under subsection (5) of this section for the provision of pay telephone service.
SECTION 2. The Broadband Fund is established, separate and distinct from  the General
Fund. Moneys in the Broadband Fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon  Business
Development Department to be used only for  providing grants or loans through the program
adopted by rule under section 3 of this 2019 Act. The fund shall  consist of moneys deposited
in the fund pursuant to ORS 759.425.
SECTION 3. (1) The Oregon  Business Development Department shall adopt by rule a
program for  providing grants or loans to assist qualified entities with projects for develop-
ment of open access broadband service infrastructure. Rules adopted under  this section shall
include, but not be limited to:
(a) Rules for establishing eligibility for a grant or loan under the program;
(b) Rules for the evaluation of project proposals and distribution of grants or loans  to
qualified entities; and
(c) An appeals process for applicants for grants or loans under the program.
(2) To be funded by a grant or  loan under the program, a proposed project for develop-
ment of open  access broadband service infrastructure must be designed to serve areas of this
state that, prior  to the project, are unserved or underserved by broadband service, with
broadband service at download speeds of at least 25 megabits  per second and upload speeds
of at least three megabits per second.
(3) Grants or loans awarded under the program may  be used for technical assistance,
planning or implementation of open access broadband service infrastructure projects.
(4) Entities that may qualify for  grants or loans under the program shall include for-
profit or nonprofit business  entities, utilities, philanthropic organizations, governments and
governmental subdivisions, agencies or instrumentalities.
(5) When  making grant or loan awards under the program, the department shall give
preference to project proposals that are  part of a comprehensive economic development
strategy.
[3]