Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Grants awarded  to school-based health centers by the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 413.225 (4)(a)  must be for a minimum annual amount of $70,000, ad-
justed under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) To account for effects  of inflation, the authority shall, by rule, annually adjust the
dollar amount specified in subsection (1) of this section based on the  Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as  published by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $_______, which may be expended to carry out the provisions
of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1990