Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Federal immigration authority” means  the United States Department of Homeland
Security, the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, the  United States Citi-
zenship and Immigration Services,  the United States Customs and Border Protection or a
successor agency, any other federal  immigration agency or official or any other entity to
which a  federal immigration agency delegates or assigns the authority to detect, investigate
or enforce violations of immigration law.
(b) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(A) County sheriffs, municipal police departments  and police departments established by
a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125;
(B) The Oregon State Police; and
(C) Corrections officers.
(c) “Officer” means an individual employed or contracted as an officer  of a law enforce-
ment agency whether or not the individual is on duty.
(d) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(e) “Violent felony” means a felony  offense in which there was an actual or threatened
serious physical injury to the victim.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS  181A.820 and 181A.822 to 181A.829, a public body or law
enforcement agency shall, with respect to an individual who is convicted of a violent felony
or Class A misdemeanor or felony sexual offense:
(a) Enforce federal immigration laws against the individual; and
(b) Cooperate with federal immigration authorities to  enforce federal immigration laws
against the individual.
(3) In carrying  out subsection (2) of this section, a public body or law enforcement agency
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4315
HB 3551
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
may:
(a) Enter  into a formal or informal agreement with federal immigration authorities re-
lating to the detention of individuals described in  subsection (2) of this section who are in
violation of federal immigration laws;
(b) Exchange  information with federal immigration authorities in order to request and
share criminal investigation information with reference to individuals described in subsection
(2) of this section who are named in records of a federal immigration authority; and
(c) Arrest any individual described in subsection (2) of this section who:
(A) Is charged by the  United States with a criminal violation of federal immigration laws
under Title II of the Immigration and Nationality Act or 18 U.S.C. 1015, 1422  to 1429 or 1505;
and
(B) Is subject to arrest for  the crime pursuant to a warrant of arrest issued by a federal
magistrate.
[2]