Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 215.788 is amended to read:
215.788. (1) For the purposes of correcting mapping  errors made in the acknowledgment process
and updating the designation of farmlands and forestlands for land use planning, a county may
conduct a legislative review of lands  in the county to determine whether the lands planned and
zoned for  farm use, forest use or mixed farm and forest use are consistent with the definitions of
“agricultural lands” or “forest lands” in goals relating to agricultural lands or forestlands.
(2) A county may undertake the reacknowledgment  process authorized by this section only if the
Department of Land Conservation and Development  approves a work plan, from the county, de-
scribing the expected scope of reacknowledgment. The  department may condition approval of a work
plan for reacknowledgment under  this section to reflect the resources needed to complete the review
required by ORS 197.659 and  215.794. The work plan of the county and the approval of the de-
partment are not final orders for purposes of review.
(3) A county that undertakes the reacknowledgment process authorized by this section  shall
provide an opportunity for all  lands planned for farm use, forest use or mixed farm and forest use
and all lands subject to an exception under ORS 197.732 to  a goal relating to agricultural lands or
forestlands to be included in the review.
(4) A county must plan and zone land reviewed under this section:
(a) For farm use if  the land meets the definition of “agricultural land” in a goal relating to ag-
ricultural lands;
(b) For forest use if  the land meets the definition of “forest land” used for comprehensive plan
amendments in the goal relating to forestlands;
(c) For mixed farm and forest use if the land meets both definitions;
(d) For nonresource use, consistent with ORS  215.794, if the land does not meet either definition;
or
(e) For a use other than  farm use or forest use as provided in a goal relating to land use plan-
ning process and policy framework and subject to an exception to the appropriate  goals under ORS
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1251
SB 73
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
197.732 (2).
(5) A county may consider the current land use pattern  on adjacent and nearby lands in deter-
mining whether land meets the appropriate definition.
(6) Notwithstanding any other  provision of this chapter, a county may not approve an
amendment to a  comprehensive plan that redesignates lands from farm use, forest use or
mixed farm and forest use to a nonresource use, except:
(a) As provided in this section;
(b) As a goal exception under ORS 197.732; or
(c) For lands that have been added to an urban growth boundary.
[2]