Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall study nurse faculty
compensation in this state.
(2) The study under subsection (1) of this section must include:
(a) Comparisons of nurse faculty  compensation in other states to compensation in this
state; and
(b) The effects of compensation on recruitment and retention of nurse faculty.
(3) The commission shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,  and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to higher education no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1126