Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In each biennium, the Legislative Assembly shall  appropriate to the De-
partment of Veterans’ Affairs an amount that is not less than the product of:
(a) The total amount appropriated to the department in the 2015-2017 biennium; and
(b) The ratio of the cost of living  for the calendar year immediately preceding the
biennium for which the appropriation is being made  to the cost of living for the 2016 calendar
year, based on changes in  the Consumer Price Index as defined in ORS 327.006 or a similar
indicator of inflation.
(2) During each  odd-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly, the
Legislative Fiscal Officer shall calculate the minimum amount  to be appropriated to the de-
partment.
(3) The Legislative Assembly may appropriate to the department less than the  minimum
amount specified by subsection (1) of this section if three-fifths of the members serving  in
each house of the Legislative Assembly vote to do so.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following are appropriations:
(a) An authorization that is given by law to expend moneys in a biennium.
(b) A limitation that is imposed by law on the expenditure in a biennium of moneys  that
are continuously appropriated.
(c) Estimated amounts of moneys that are continuously appropriated  to be spent in a
biennium without limitation.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, the following  are not appropriations
for purposes of this section:
(a) An authorization to expend moneys from the veterans’ services fund described  in
Article XV, section 4f, of the Oregon Constitution.
(b) A limitation on the expenditure in a  biennium of moneys that are continuously ap-
propriated from the veterans’ services fund described in Article XV, section 4f, of the Oregon
Constitution.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3679