Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Marine Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, which may be expended for the salvage,  towing, storage and
disposal of abandoned vessels and derelict vessels.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of State Lands, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund,  the amount of $5,000,000, which may be expended for the salvage, towing,
storage and disposal of abandoned vessels and derelict vessels.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3615