Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 420A.005 to
420A.155.
SECTION 2. The Oregon Youth Authority shall adopt  rules providing guidance and di-
rection on the use of staff interventions,  including physical interventions, isolation, re-
straints and time-outs, consistent with state and federal law.
SECTION 3.  ORS 419B.005, as amended by section  8, chapter 90, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended
to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any assault,  as defined in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a child
which has  been caused by other than accidental means, including any injury which appears to be
at variance with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any mental injury  to a child, which shall include only observable and substantial impairment
of the child’s mental or  psychological ability to function caused by cruelty to the child, with due
regard to the culture of the child.
(C) Rape of a child,  which includes but is not limited to rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a minor,  as defined in ORS chapter 163, and any
other conduct which allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child  to engage
in the performing for people to observe or the photographing, filming, tape recording  or other ex-
hibition which, in whole or in part, depicts sexual conduct or contact, as defined  in ORS 167.002 or
described in ORS 163.665 and 163.670, sexual abuse involving a child or rape of  a child, but not in-
cluding any conduct which is part of any investigation  conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or
which is designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1005
SB 805
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring a  child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex  act as defined in ORS 163.266, to purchase sex with a minor as
described in ORS 163.413 or to engage in commercial sexual solicitation as described in ORS 167.008.
(F) Negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child, including but not limited to  the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care  that is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm to a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial risk  of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful exposure to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to the  unlawful
manufacturing of a cannabinoid extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child  to a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
(K) The use of  restraint or involuntary seclusion of a youth in custody in violation of
ORS 169.740, 169.750, 169.760, 419A.240 or 419A.245 or the use of interventions on  a youth in
custody in violation of the rules adopted under section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(b) “Abuse” does not include  reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is under 21 years of age and residing  in or receiving care or services at a child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment of  the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the receipt  of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or physician assistant licensed under ORS  chapter 677 or naturopathic physician,
including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed practical  nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the Department  of Human Services, Oregon Health Authority, Early Learning
[2]
SB 805
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Division, Department of Education, Youth Development Division, Office  of Child Care, the Oregon
Youth Authority, a local health department, a community mental health program, a community de-
velopmental disabilities program, a  county juvenile department, a child-caring agency as that term
is defined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) A court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) A child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) An elected official of a branch of government of  this state or a state agency, board, com-
mission or department of a branch  of government of this state or of a city, county or other political
subdivision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards  and Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) An operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) An operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or organization  facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents pursuant  to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056.
(bb) An employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services  or activ-
ities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or camp  that is operated under the guidance, supervision or auspices of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined in  ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or hu-
man trafficking.
(cc) A coach, assistant coach or trainer of an amateur, semiprofessional  or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
[3]
SB 805
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of  a school district board, an education service district board or a public charter
school governing body.
(hh) An individual who is paid by a public body, in accordance with  ORS 430.215, to provide a
service identified in an individualized written service  plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
(7) “Youth in custody”  means a child in the physical custody of a county juvenile de-
partment or the Oregon Youth Authority.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 419B.005, as amended  by section 58, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, section
16, chapter 27, Oregon Laws 2022, and section 7, chapter 90, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended  to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any assault, as defined in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to  a child
which has been caused by other than accidental means, including any injury which appears to  be
at variance with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any mental injury  to a child, which shall include only observable and substantial impairment
of the child’s mental or psychological ability to function caused by cruelty to  the child, with due
regard to the culture of the child.
(C) Rape of a child, which includes but is not limited to rape,  sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a minor,  as defined in ORS chapter 163, and any
other conduct which  allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child to engage
in the performing for  people to observe or the photographing, filming, tape recording or other ex-
hibition which, in whole or in part, depicts sexual conduct or contact, as defined  in ORS 167.002 or
described in ORS 163.665 and 163.670,  sexual abuse involving a child or rape of a child, but not in-
cluding any conduct which is part of  any investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or
which is designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes; and
(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring a  child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act as defined in ORS 163.266, to purchase  sex with a minor as
described in ORS 163.413 or to engage in commercial sexual solicitation as described in ORS 167.008.
(F) Negligent treatment or  maltreatment of a child, including but not limited to the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care that  is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm  to a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial risk of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful  exposure to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to the unlawful
manufacturing of a cannabinoid  extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child to a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
[4]
SB 805
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(K) The use of restraint or involuntary seclusion of a youth in custody  in violation of
ORS 169.740, 169.750, 169.760,  419A.240 or 419A.245 or the use of interventions on a youth in
custody in violation of the rules adopted under section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(b) “Abuse” does not include  reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is under 21 years of age and residing  in or receiving care or services at a child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment of  the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the receipt  of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or physician assistant licensed under ORS  chapter 677 or naturopathic physician,
including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed practical  nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the  Department of Human Services, Oregon Health Authority, Department of
Early Learning and Care, Department of Education, Youth Development Division, Office of Child
Care, the Oregon Youth Authority, a local health department, a community mental health program,
a community developmental disabilities program, a county juvenile department, a  child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
[5]
SB 805
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) A court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) A child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) An elected official of a branch of government of  this state or a state agency, board, com-
mission or department of a branch  of government of this state or of a city, county or other political
subdivision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards  and Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) An operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) An operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or organization  facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents pursuant  to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056.
(bb) An employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services  or activ-
ities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or camp  that is operated under the guidance, supervision or auspices of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined in  ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or hu-
man trafficking.
(cc) A coach, assistant coach or trainer of an amateur, semiprofessional  or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of  a school district board, an education service district board or a public charter
school governing body.
(hh) An individual who is paid by a public body, in accordance with  ORS 430.215, to provide a
service identified in an individualized written service  plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
(7) “Youth in custody”  means a child in the physical custody of a county juvenile de-
partment or the Oregon Youth Authority.
SECTION 5.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act and the amendments to ORS 419B.005 by sections
3 and 4 of this 2023 Act apply to  incidents involving intervention or the use of restraint or
seclusion occurring on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
[6]
SB 805
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[7]