Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 458.480 is amended to read:
458.480. As used in ORS 458.480 to 458.490:
(1) “Affordable  housing” means residential housing that may be purchased or rented, with or
without government assistance, by persons who meet  the applicable income limits of local, state or
federally funded programs or developments.
(2) “Area median income” means the median income for the county  in which the subject housing
is located, adjusted  for family size, as determined by the Housing and Community Services Depart-
ment using United States Department of Housing and Urban Development information.
(3) “Development costs” has the meaning given that term in ORS 456.548.
(4) “Frontier communities” means communities within counties with populations of  less
than 10,000.
[(4)] (5) “Low income households” means:
(a) For affordable  housing that may be rented, households of one or more individuals whose
combined incomes are at or below 60 percent of the area median income; or
(b) For affordable housing that may be purchased, households of one or more individuals whose
combined incomes are at or below 80 percent of the area median income.
[(5)] (6)  “Operate” means to have  sufficient direct or indirect control of qualified property that
reasonably enables the Housing  and Community Services Department, in its determination, to ensure
the qualified property’s use for the purpose of providing affordable housing under the Local  Inno-
vation and Fast Track Housing Program established in ORS 458.485.
[(6)] (7)  “Own” means to  possess one or more interests as described in ORS 458.485 (3) in a
qualified property that reasonably enables the Housing  and Community Services Department, in its
determination, to ensure the  qualified property’s use for the purpose of providing affordable housing
under the Local Innovation and Fast Track Housing Program established in ORS 458.485.
[(7)] (8)  “Qualified property” means real  or personal property, including infrastructure and
indebtedness related to the real or personal property.
(9) “Rural communities” means communities within counties with  populations of 10,000
or more and less than 40,000.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1398
SB 512
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 2.  ORS 458.485 is amended to read:
458.485. (1) The Housing and  Community Services Department shall, with the advice and consent
of the Oregon Housing Stability Council, develop and implement the Local  Innovation and Fast
Track Housing Program for the  purpose of expanding the state’s supply of affordable housing for low
income households.
(2) The department may use funds available pursuant to Article XI-Q of the  Oregon Constitution
and deposited in  the Local Innovation and Fast Track Housing Program Fund established under ORS
458.490 to:
(a) Acquire, construct, remodel,  repair, equip or furnish qualified property that is or will be
owned or operated by the State of Oregon for the purpose of providing affordable housing in this
state for low income households; and
(b) Pay development costs to develop qualified property that may  be considered part of the cost
of a capital asset under generally accepted accounting principles.
(3) Interests in real property acquired by the State of Oregon or the department under  this
section are limited to the following:
(a) A fee simple interest in land or improvements;
(b) A leased fee interest, meaning an ownership  interest with the rights of use and occupancy
conveyed by lease to others;
(c) A tenancy  in common for which the state’s or department’s interest in the property is
proportionate to the contribution of the state or department to the property’s purchase price;
(d) A fee simple interest in a condominium; or
(e) An easement, right of way, license or similar interest functionally related to and  necessary
for the use of qualified property acquired by the state or department.
(4) In funding the acquisition, construction, remodeling, repairing, equipping or  furnishing of
qualified property under the program, the department, with  the advice and consent of the council,
may:
(a) Adopt criteria that:
(A) Provide the greatest number of affordable housing  units for the amount of funding provided;
(B) Ensure the longest possible use of the qualified property as affordable housing units;
(C) Optimize the function and duration of the affordable housing project; and
(D) Take into account the means to reduce the cost of the affordable housing project  while
considering factors such as the quality of construction, durability, location and local design  re-
quirements;
(b) Create restrictive covenants  and other encumbrances or lien interests, create entities, co-
operate or participate with persons or entities and contract with persons and entities; and
(c) Operate qualified property.
(5) Moneys made available through the program  must be distributed or used statewide and
concentrated in areas of this  state with the greatest need for affordable housing, as determined by
the department with the advice and consent of the council . Of the moneys made available
through this program:
(a) No less than 10 percent may be used for rural communities; and
(b) No less than 10 percent may be used for frontier communities .
(6) For purposes of implementing the program, the council shall develop strategies to:
(a) Reach historically underserved communities, including communities of color and rural  and
frontier communities;
[2]
SB 512
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
(b) Reduce the cost of acquiring, constructing, remodeling, repairing,  equipping or furnishing
qualified property  that is owned or operated by the state for the purpose of providing affordable
housing; and
(c) Involve Department of Human Services child welfare and self-sufficiency programs.
(7) The Director of  the Housing and Community Services Department shall report regularly to
the council regarding the status and progress of the program and of the Housing  and Community
Services Department’s responsibilities for implementing and administering the program.
(8) The department, with the advice and consent of the council, shall  adopt rules to implement
the provisions of this section, including but not limited to prescribing  requirements for acquiring,
constructing, remodeling, repairing, equipping or furnishing qualified property that is owned  or op-
erated by the state for the purpose of providing affordable housing under the program.
[3]