Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The provisions of the Social Work Licensure Compact are as follows:
SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE COMPACT
SECTION 1: PURPOSE
The purpose of the Compact is to facilitate interstate practice of regulated social workers
by improving public access to competent social work services. The Compact preserves the
regulatory authority of  states to protect public health and safety through the current system
of state licensure.
The Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
A. Increase public access to social work services;
B. Reduce overly  burdensome and duplicative requirements associated with holding mul-
tiple licenses;
C. Enhance the member states’ ability to protect the public’s health and safety;
D. Encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating multistate practice;
E. Promote mobility and address workforce shortages  by eliminating the necessity for
licenses in multiple states by  providing for the mutual recognition of other member state
licenses;
F. Support military families;
G. Facilitate the exchange of licensure and disciplinary information among  member
states;
H. Authorize all  member states to hold a regulated social worker accountable for abiding
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 664
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by a member state’s laws, regulations and applicable  professional standards in the member
state in which the client is located at the time care is rendered; and
I. Allow for the use of telehealth to facilitate increased  access to regulated social work
services.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in the Compact, and except  as otherwise provided, the following definitions shall
apply:
A. “Active military member” means any  individual with full-time duty status in the ac-
tive armed forces of  the United States including members of the National Guard and Re-
serve.
B. “Adverse action” means  any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal action per-
mitted by a state’s  laws which is imposed by a licensing authority or other authority against
a regulated social worker, including actions  against an individual’s license or multistate au-
thorization to practice  such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee,
limitation on the licensee’s practice or any  other encumbrance on licensure affecting a reg-
ulated social worker’s authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease  and desist
action.
C. “Alternative program” means a  non-disciplinary monitoring or practice remediation
process approved by a licensing authority to address practitioners with an impairment.
D. “Charter  member states” means member states who have enacted legislation to adopt
the Compact where such legislation  predates the effective date of the Compact as described
in Section 14 of the Compact.
E. “Compact Commission” or “Commission” means the government agency known as  the
Social Work Licensure Compact Commission,  as described in Section 10 of the Compact,
whose membership consists of all states that have enacted the Compact, and which  shall
operate as an instrumentality of the member states.
F. “Current significant investigative information” means:
1. Investigative information that  a licensing authority, after a preliminary inquiry that
includes notification and an opportunity for the regulated social worker to respond, has
reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a  minor
infraction as may be defined by the Commission; or
2. Investigative information that indicates that  the regulated social worker represents
an immediate threat to public health  and safety, as may be defined by the Commission, re-
gardless of whether the regulated social  worker has been notified and has had an opportunity
to respond.
G. “Data system” means a repository of information about licensees, including continuing
education, examination, licensure, current significant investigative information,  disqualifying
event, multistate license and  adverse action information or other information as required
by the Commission.
H. “Disqualifying event” means any adverse  action or incident which results in an
encumbrance that disqualifies or makes the licensee ineligible to obtain, retain or  renew a
multistate license.
I. “Domicile” means the jurisdiction  in which the licensee resides and intends to remain
indefinitely.
J. “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension  of, or any limitation on, the full and
[2]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
unrestricted practice of social work licensed and regulated by a licensing authority.
K. “Executive Committee” means a group of delegates elected  or appointed to act on
behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the Compact and Commission.
L. “Home state” means the member state that is the licensee’s primary domicile.
M. “Impairment” means a condition that  may impair a practitioner’s ability to engage in
full and unrestricted practice as a regulated social worker without some type of intervention
and may include alcohol  and drug dependence, mental health impairment and neurological
or physical impairments.
N. “Licensee” means an individual who currently  holds a license from a state to practice
as a regulated social worker.
O. “Licensing authority” means the board or agency of a member state or equivalent that
is responsible for the licensing and regulation of regulated social workers.
P. “Member state” means  a state, commonwealth, district or territory of the United
States that has enacted the Compact.
Q. “Multistate authorization to practice” means a  legally authorized privilege to practice,
which is equivalent to a license, associated with a multistate license permitting the practice
of social work in a remote state.
R. “Multistate license” means a license to practice as a  regulated social worker issued
by a home state licensing  authority that authorizes the regulated social worker to practice
in all member states under multistate authorization to practice.
S. “Qualifying national exam” means a national licensing examination approved  by the
Commission.
T. “Regulated social worker” means any clinical, master’s or bachelor’s social  worker
licensed by a member state regardless of the title used by that member state.
U. “Remote state” means a member state other than the licensee’s home state.
V. “Rule” or “rule  of the Commission” means a regulation or regulations duly
promulgated by the Commission, as authorized by the Compact, that has the force of law.
W. “Single state license” means a social work license issued by any state that authorizes
practice only within the issuing state and does not include multistate authorization to prac-
tice in any member state.
X. “Social work” or “social work services” means the application of social work theory,
knowledge, methods, ethics and the professional use of  self to restore or enhance social,
psychosocial or biopsychosocial functioning of individuals, couples, families, groups, organ-
izations and communities through the care and services provided  by a regulated social
worker as set forth in the member state’s statutes and regulations in the state where the
services are being provided.
Y. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district or territory of the United States
that regulates the practice of social work.
Z. “Unencumbered license” means a license that authorizes a regulated social  worker to
engage in the full and unrestricted practice of social work.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To be eligible to participate in the Compact, a potential  member state must currently
meet all of the following criteria:
1. License and regulate the practice  of social work at either the clinical, master’s or
bachelor’s category.
[3]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
2. Require applicants for licensure to graduate from a program that is:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the licensing authority;
b. Accredited, or in candidacy that  subsequently becomes accredited, by an accrediting
agency recognized by either:
i. The Council for Higher Education Accreditation, or its successor; or
ii. The United States Department of Education; and
c. Corresponds to the licensure sought as outlined in Section 4 of the Compact.
3. Require applicants for clinical licensure to complete a period of supervised practice.
4. Have a mechanism  in place for receiving, investigating and adjudicating complaints
about licensees.
B. To maintain membership in the Compact a member state shall:
1. Require that applicants for a multistate license pass a qualifying national  exam for the
corresponding category of multistate license sought as outlined in Section  4 of the Compact.
2. Participate fully in the Commission’s data  system, including using the Commission’s
unique identifier as defined in the rules of the Commission.
3. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of the Compact and rules, of  any
adverse action or the availability  of current significant investigative information regarding
a licensee.
4. Implement procedures for considering  the criminal history records of applicants for a
multistate license. Such procedures shall include the  submission of fingerprints or other
biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an  applicant’s crimi-
nal history record information from the Federal Bureau  of Investigation and the agency re-
sponsible for retaining that state’s criminal records.
5. Comply with the rules of the Commission.
6. Require an applicant to obtain  or retain a license in the home state and meet the home
state’s qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure,  as well as all other applicable
home state laws.
7. Authorize a licensee holding a multistate license in any member state to  practice in
accordance with the terms of the Compact and rules of the Commission.
8. Designate a delegate to participate in the Commission meetings.
C. A member state meeting the requirements of Section  3.A and 3.B of the Compact shall
designate the categories of social work licensure that  are eligible for issuance of a multistate
license for applicants in such member state. To the extent that any member  state does not
meet the requirements for participation in the Compact  at any particular category of social
work licensure, such member  state may choose, but is not obligated to, issue a multistate
license to applicants that otherwise meet the requirements of Section 4 of the Compact  for
issuance of a multistate license in such category or categories of licensure.
D. The home state may charge a fee for granting the multistate license.
SECTION 4. SOCIAL WORKER PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To be eligible for a multistate license  under the terms and provisions of the Compact,
an applicant, regardless of category must:
1. Hold or be eligible for an active, unencumbered license in the home state;
2. Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the multistate license;
3. Submit, in connection with an application for a multistate license, fingerprints or other
biometric data for the purpose  of obtaining criminal history record information from the
[4]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Federal Bureau of Investigation and  the agency responsible for retaining that state’s crimi-
nal records;
4. Notify the home  state of any adverse action, encumbrance or restriction on any pro-
fessional license taken by any member state or non-member state within 30 days from the
date the action is taken;
5. Meet any continuing competence requirements established by the home state; and
6. Abide by the laws, regulations and applicable standards in the member  state where the
client is located at the time care is rendered.
B. An applicant for a  clinical-category multistate license must meet all of the following
requirements:
1. Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be satisfied by either:
a. Passage of a clinical-category qualifying national exam;
b. Licensure of the applicant  in their home state at the clinical category, beginning prior
to such time as a qualifying national exam was  required by the home state and accompanied
by a period of continuous social work licensure thereafter,  all of which may be further gov-
erned by the rules of the Commission; or
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency requirements which  the
Commission may determine by rule.
2. Attain at least a master’s degree in social work from a program that is:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the licensing authority; and
b. Accredited, or in candidacy that  subsequently becomes accredited, by an accrediting
agency recognized by either:
i. The Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its successor; or
ii. The United States Department of Education.
3. Fulfill a practice requirement, which  shall be satisfied by demonstrating completion
of either:
a. A period of postgraduate  supervised clinical practice equal to a minimum of 3,000
hours;
b. A minimum of two years of full-time postgraduate supervised clinical practice; or
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing practice requirements which the  Com-
mission may determine by rule.
C. An applicant for a master’s-category multistate license  must meet all of the following
requirements:
1. Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be satisfied by either:
a. Passage of a masters-category qualifying national exam;
b. Licensure of the applicant in their home state at  the master’s category, beginning
prior to such time as a qualifying national exam was required by the  home state at the
master’s category and accompanied  by a continuous period of social work licensure there-
after, all of which may be further governed by the rules of the Commission; or
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency requirements which  the
Commission may determine by rule.
2. Attain at least a master’s degree in social work from a program that is:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the licensing authority; and
b. Accredited, or in candidacy that  subsequently becomes accredited, by an accrediting
agency recognized by either:
[5]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
i. The Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its successor; or
ii. The United States Department of Education.
D. An applicant for a  bachelor’s-category multistate license must meet all of the follow-
ing requirements:
1. Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be satisfied by either:
a. Passage of a bachelor’s-category qualifying national exam;
b. Licensure of the applicant in their  home state at the bachelor’s category, beginning
prior to such time as a qualifying national exam  was required by the home state and ac-
companied by a period of continuous social work  licensure thereafter, all of which may be
further governed by the rules of the Commission; or
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency requirements which  the
Commission may determine by rule.
2. Attain at least a bachelor’s degree in social work from a program that is:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the licensing authority; and
b. Accredited, or in candidacy that  subsequently becomes accredited, by an accrediting
agency recognized by either:
i. The Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its successor; or
ii. The United States Department of Education.
E. The multistate license  for a regulated social worker is subject to the renewal re-
quirements of the home state. The  regulated social worker must maintain compliance with
the requirements of Section 4.A of the Compact to be eligible to renew a multistate license.
F. The regulated social  worker’s services in a remote state are subject to that member
state’s regulatory authority. A remote state  may, in accordance with due process and that
member state’s laws, remove a  regulated social worker’s multistate authorization to practice
in the remote state for a specific  period of time, impose fines and take any other necessary
actions to protect the health and safety of its citizens.
G. If a multistate license is encumbered, the regulated social worker’s  multistate au-
thorization to practice shall be deactivated in all  remote states until the multistate license
is no longer encumbered.
H. If a  multistate authorization to practice is encumbered in a remote state, the regu-
lated social worker’s multistate authorization to practice may  be deactivated in that state
until the multistate authorization to practice is no longer encumbered.
SECTION 5: ISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE
A. Upon receipt of an application for multistate  license, the home state licensing au-
thority shall determine the applicant’s eligibility for a  multistate license in accordance with
Section 4 of the Compact.
B. If such applicant is eligible pursuant to Section 4 of the Compact, the  home state li-
censing authority shall issue a multistate license that authorizes the applicant  or regulated
social worker to practice in all member states under a multistate authorization to practice.
C. Upon issuance of  a multistate license, the home state licensing authority shall desig-
nate whether the regulated  social worker holds a multistate license in the clinical, master’s
or bachelor’s category of social work.
D. A multistate license issued  by a home state to a resident in that state shall be re-
cognized by all member states as authorizing social work practice under  a multistate au-
thorization to practice  corresponding to each category of licensure regulated in each member
[6]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
state.
SECTION 6:  AUTHORITY OF INTERSTATE COMPACT COMMISSION AND MEMBER
STATE LICENSING AUTHORITIES
A. Nothing in  the Compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
restrict or  in any way reduce the ability of a member state to enact and enforce laws, reg-
ulations or other  rules related to the practice of social work in that state, where those laws,
regulations or other rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of the Compact.
B. Nothing in the Compact shall affect the requirements established by a member state
for the issuance of a single state license.
C. Nothing in the Compact, nor any rule of the Commission,  shall be construed to limit,
restrict or in any way reduce the ability of a member state to take adverse  action against
a licensee’s single state license to practice social work in that state.
D. Nothing in  the Compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
restrict or in  any way reduce the ability of a remote state to take adverse action against a
licensee’s multistate authorization to practice in that state.
E. Nothing in the  Compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
restrict or in any way reduce the ability of a licensee’s home  state to take adverse action
against a licensee’s multistate license based upon information provided by a remote state.
SECTION 7: REISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE BY A NEW HOME STATE
A. A licensee can hold a  multistate license issued by their home state in only one mem-
ber state at any given time.
B. If a licensee changes their home state by moving between two member states:
1. The licensee shall  immediately apply for the reissuance of their multistate license in
their new home state. The licensee shall pay all applicable fees and notify the prior home
state in accordance with the rules of the Commission.
2. Upon receipt of an application to reissue  a multistate license, the new home state shall
verify that the multistate license is active, unencumbered and  eligible for reissuance under
the terms of the Compact and the rules of the  Commission. The multistate license issued by
the prior home state will be deactivated and all member states notified  in accordance with
the applicable rules adopted by the Commission.
3. Prior to the reissuance of the multistate license, the new home state  shall conduct
procedures for considering the criminal history records  of the licensee. Such procedures
shall include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by appli-
cants for the purpose of obtaining  an applicant’s criminal history record information from
the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible  for retaining that state’s
criminal records.
4. If required for initial licensure, the new home state may require completion of
jurisprudence requirements in the new home state.
5. Notwithstanding any other  provision of the Compact, if a licensee does not meet the
requirements set forth in the Compact for the reissuance of a multistate license by  the new
home state, then the licensee shall be subject to the new home state  requirements for the
issuance of a single state license in that state.
C. If a licensee  changes their primary state of residence by moving from a member state
to a non-member state or from a non-member state  to a member state, the licensee shall
be subject to the state requirements  for the issuance of a single state license in the new
[7]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
home state.
D. Nothing in  the Compact shall interfere with a licensee’s ability to hold a single state
license in multiple states. However, for the purposes of the Compact, a licensee shall have
only one home state and only one multistate license.
E. Nothing in the Compact shall interfere with the requirements established by a member
state for the issuance of a single state license.
SECTION 8. MILITARY FAMILIES
An active military member or their spouse shall designate a  home state where the indi-
vidual has a multistate license. The individual  may retain their home state designation dur-
ing the period the service member is on active duty.
SECTION 9. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. In addition to  the other powers conferred by state law, a remote state shall have the
authority, in accordance with existing state due process law, to:
1. Take  adverse action against a regulated social worker’s multistate authorization to
practice only within that  member state, and issue subpoenas for both hearings and investi-
gations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses  as well as the production of
evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing authority in a member state for the attendance
and testimony of witnesses or the production of  evidence from another member state shall
be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to  the
practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending
before it.  The issuing licensing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage
and other fees required  by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evi-
dence are located.
2. Only the home state shall have the power to  take adverse action against a regulated
social worker’s multistate license.
B. For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state  shall give the same priority and
effect to reported conduct received from a member state as it would if the  conduct had oc-
curred within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state laws to
determine appropriate action.
C. The home state shall complete any pending investigations of a regulated social worker
who changes their home state  during the course of the investigations. The home state shall
also have the authority to take appropriate action  and shall promptly report the conclusions
of the investigations to the administrator of the data system. The administrator of the  data
system shall promptly notify the new home state of any adverse actions.
D. A member state,  if otherwise permitted by state law, may recover from the affected
regulated social  worker the costs of investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from
any adverse action taken against that regulated social worker.
E. A member  state may take adverse action based on the factual findings of another
member state, provided that the member state follows its own procedures  for taking the
adverse action.
F. Joint investigations.
1. In addition to the authority granted to a member state by  its respective social work
practice act or other applicable state law, any member state may participate  with other
member states in joint investigations of licensees.
2. Member states shall share any  investigative, litigation or compliance materials in
[8]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under the Compact.
G. If adverse action is taken by the home state against the multistate license of  a regu-
lated social worker, the regulated social worker’s multistate authorization  to practice in all
other member  states shall be deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from
the multistate license. All home state disciplinary orders that  impose adverse action against
the license of a regulated social worker shall include a statement that  the regulated social
worker’s multistate authorization to practice  is deactivated in all member states until all
conditions of the decision, order or agreement are satisfied.
H. If a member state takes adverse action, it shall  promptly notify the administrator of
the data system. The administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the  home state
and all other member states of any adverse actions by remote states.
I. Nothing in the Compact shall override a  member state’s decision that participation in
an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action.
J. Nothing in the Compact shall authorize a member state  to demand the issuance of
subpoenas for attendance and testimony  of witnesses or the production of evidence from
another member state for lawful actions within that member state.
K. Nothing in the Compact shall authorize a member state to impose  discipline against
a regulated social worker who holds a  multistate authorization to practice for lawful actions
within another member state.
SECTION 10. ESTABLISHMENT OF  SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE COMPACT COMMIS-
SION
A. The Compact member states hereby create and establish a joint government agency
whose membership consists of all member states that have enacted the Compact,  to be
known as the Social Work Licensure Compact Commission. The Commission  is an
instrumentality of the Compact member states acting jointly and  not an instrumentality of
any one state. The Commission shall come into existence on  or after the effective date of the
Compact as set forth in Section 14 of the Compact.
B. Membership, Voting and Meetings
1. Each member state shall have and be limited to  one delegate selected by that member
state’s licensing authority.
2. The delegate shall be either:
a. A current member of the licensing authority at the time of appointment, who is  a
regulated social worker or public member of the licensing authority; or
b. An administrator of the licensing authority or their designee.
3. The Commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term  of office for delegates and may
by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The Commission  may recommend the removal or suspension of any delegate from of-
fice.
5. A member state’s licensing authority shall  fill any vacancy of its delegate occurring
on the Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one  vote on all matters before the Commission re-
quiring a vote by Commission delegates.
7. A delegate shall vote in person or by such  other means as provided in the bylaws. The
bylaws may provide for delegates to meet by telecommunication, videoconference or other
means of communication.
[9]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
8. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar  year. Additional
meetings may be held as set forth  in the bylaws. The Commission may meet by telecommu-
nication, video conference or other similar electronic means.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
3. Establish and amend rules and bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions  of the Compact, the
Commission’s rules and the bylaws;
6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of  the Commission,
provided that the standing of any licensing authority to sue  or be sued under applicable law
shall not be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member state as  the
authenticated business records of the Commission, and designate an agent to do so on  the
Commission’s behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept or contract  for services of personnel, including, but not limited to,
employees of a member state;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire  employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant to
employees and officers appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact and
establish the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating  to conflicts of interest,
qualifications of personnel and other related personnel matters;
12. Assess and collect fees;
13. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of  money, other sources of
revenue, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and receive, utilize and dispose of  the
same, provided that at all times the  Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety
or conflict of interest;
14. Lease, purchase,  retain, own, hold, improve or use any property, real, personal or
mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of  any
property real, personal or mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money;
18. Appoint committees, including  standing committees, composed of members, state
regulators, state legislators or their representatives and consumer  representatives and such
other interested persons as may be designated in the Compact and the bylaws;
19. Provide and receive information from,  and cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;
20. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair and a vice chair;
21. Determine  whether a state’s adopted language is materially different from the model
compact language such that the state would  not qualify for participation in the Compact; and
22. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate  to achieve the
purposes of the Compact.
D. The Executive Committee
[10]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
1. The Executive Committee shall have the power  to act on behalf of the Commission
according to the terms  of the Compact. The powers, duties and responsibilities of the
Executive Committee shall include:
a. Oversee the  day-to-day activities of the administration of the Compact including
enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the Compact, its rules and bylaws and
other such duties as deemed necessary;
b. Recommend to the Commission  changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to the Com-
pact legislation, fees charged to Compact member states, fees charged to licensees and  other
fees;
c. Ensure Compact administration services are  appropriately provided, including by con-
tract;
d. Prepare and recommend the budget;
e. Maintain financial records on behalf of the Commission;
f. Monitor Compact compliance of member states and  provide compliance reports to the
Commission;
g. Establish additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercise the powers  and duties of the Commission during the interim between Com-
mission meetings, except for adopting or  amending rules, adopting or amending bylaws and
exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the Commission by rule  or by-
law; and
i. Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the Commission.
2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of up to 11 members:
a. The chair and vice chair of the Commission shall be voting members of the Executive
Committee.
b. The Commission shall elect five voting  members from the current membership of the
Commission.
c. Up to four ex-officio, non-voting members from four recognized national social  work
organizations.
d. The ex-officio members will be selected by their respective organizations.
3. The Commission may remove any  member of the Executive Committee as provided in
the Commission’s bylaws.
4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the Executive
Committee may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in Section 10.F.2 of  the
Compact.
b. The Executive Committee shall give seven  days’ notice of its meetings, posted on its
website and as determined to provide notice to persons with an interest in the business of
the Commission.
c. The Executive Committee may hold a  special meeting in accordance with Section
10.F.1.b of the Compact.
E. The Commission shall adopt and provide to the member states an annual report.
F. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the Commission may meet in  a
closed, non-public meeting as provided in Section 10.F.2 of the Compact.
a. Public notice for all meetings of the full  Commission shall be given in the same man-
[11]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ner as required under the rulemaking provisions in Section 12 of the  Compact, except that
the Commission may hold a special meeting as provided in Section 10.F.1.b of the Compact.
b. The Commission may  hold a special meeting when it must meet to conduct emergency
business by  giving 48 hours’ notice to all commissioners on the Commission’s website and
other means as provided in the Commission’s rules. The Commission’s  legal counsel shall
certify that the Commission’s need to meet qualifies as an emergency.
2. The Commission or the Executive Committee or other  committees of the Commission
may convene in a closed,  non-public meeting for the Commission or Executive Committee
or other committees of the Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a member state with its obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or  other matters, practices or procedures
related to specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the Commission or by a member
state’s licensing authority;
d. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease or sale of goods,  services or real es-
tate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure  would constitute a clearly unwar-
ranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or  for use
of the Commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation  or deter-
mination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state law; or
l. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by rule.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the  presiding officer shall state that
the meeting will be closed and reference each  relevant exempting provision, and such refer-
ence shall be recorded in the minutes.
4. The Commission shall keep minutes  that fully and clearly describe all matters dis-
cussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken and  the
reasons therefor, including a description  of the views expressed. All documents considered
in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents
of a closed  meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the
Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission  shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of
its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may  accept any and all appropriate revenue sources as provided in
Section 10.C.13 of the Compact.
3.a. The Commission may levy and collect an  annual assessment from each member state
and impose fees on licensees of member states to whom it grants  a multistate license to
cover the cost of the operations and activities of the Commission and its staff, which  must
be in a total amount sufficient to cover its  annual budget as approved each year for which
[12]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for
member states shall be allocated based upon a formula that the Commission shall promulgate
by rule.
b. An assessment levied, or any other financial  obligation imposed, under the Compact
is effective against the State of Oregon only to the extent  that moneys necessary to pay the
assessment or meet the financial obligation have been deposited in the State Board of  Li-
censed Social Workers Account established under ORS 675.597.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of  any kind prior to securing the funds
adequate to meet the same, nor shall the  Commission pledge the credit of any of the member
states, except by and with the authority of the member state.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all  receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall  be subject to the financial review and
accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements
of funds handled by the Commission shall be  subject to an annual financial review by a cer-
tified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be  included
in and become part of the annual report of the Commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification
1. The members,  officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the Com-
mission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally  and in their official capacity,
for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other  civil liability
caused by or arising  out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that
the person against whom the claim is made had a  reasonable basis for believing occurred,
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or  responsibilities, provided that nothing
in this paragraph shall  be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any
damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional or willful  or wanton misconduct
of that person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission  shall not in
any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director,  employee or
representative of  the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out
of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission  that the person
against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing  occurred within the
scope of Commission  employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that nothing herein
shall be  construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel at their own
expense, and provided further that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result
from that person’s intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive  di-
rector, employee or representative of the Commission  for the amount of any settlement or
judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act,  error or
omission that occurred within the  scope of Commission employment, duties or responsibil-
ities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for  believing occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act,
error or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed  as a limitation on the liability of any licensee for
[13]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed  solely by any other appli-
cable state laws.
5. Nothing in the Compact shall be interpreted  to waive or otherwise abrogate a member
state’s state action immunity or state  action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust
claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act or any other state or federal antitrust  or anti-
competitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in the Compact shall be construed to be a waiver  of sovereign immunity by
the member states or by the Commission.
SECTION 11. DATA SYSTEM
A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,  operation and utili-
zation of a coordinated data system.
B. The Commission shall  assign each applicant for a multistate license a unique identi-
fier, as determined by the rules of the Commission.
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of  state law to the contrary, a member state
shall submit a uniform data  set to the data system on all individuals to whom the Compact
is applicable as required by the rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a license and information related thereto;
4. Non-confidential information related to alternative program participation, the begin-
ning and ending  dates of such participation and other information related to such partic-
ipation not made confidential under member state law;
5. Any denial of application for licensure and the reason for such denial;
6. The presence of current significant investigative information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of the Compact or the  pro-
tection of the public, as determined by the rules of the Commission.
D. The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to the  Compact or
through the data system, when certified by the Commission or an  agent thereof, shall con-
stitute the authenticated business records of the Commission,  and shall be entitled to any
associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial  or administrative pro-
ceedings in a member state.
E. Current significant investigative information pertaining to a  licensee in any member
state will only be available to other member states.
1. It is  the responsibility of the member states to report any adverse action against a
licensee and to monitor the database to determine  whether adverse action has been taken
against a licensee. Adverse action information pertaining  to a licensee in any member state
will be available to any other member state.
F. Member states contributing information to the data system may designate information
that may not be shared with the public without the express  permission of the contributing
state.
G. Any  information submitted to the data system that is subsequently expunged pursuant
to federal law or the laws  of the member state contributing the information shall be removed
from the data system.
SECTION 12. RULEMAKING
A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order  to effectively and effi-
[14]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ciently implement and administer the purposes  and provisions of the Compact. A rule shall
be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the
rule is invalid because the Commission exercised its  rulemaking authority in a manner that
is beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted  hereunder, or based
upon another applicable standard of review.
B.1. The  rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each member state,
provided however that where the rules of the Commission conflict with the laws of the
member state that establish the member state’s laws, regulations and applicable  standards
that govern the practice  of social work as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the rules
of the Commission shall be ineffective in that state to the extent of the conflict.
2. Notwithstanding Section 12.B.1 of the Compact,  the State Board of Licensed Social
Workers shall review  the rules of the Commission. The board may approve and adopt the
rules of the Commission as rules of the board. The State of Oregon is subject to a rule  of
the Commission only if the rule of the Commission is adopted by the board.
C. The Commission  shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set
forth in this section and the rules  adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding on the day
following adoption or the date specified in the rule or amendment, whichever is later.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule or portion of  a
rule by enactment of a statute or resolution in  the same manner used to adopt the Compact
within four years  of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further
force and effect in any member state.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall hold a  public hearing and
allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions and arguments.
G. Prior to  adoption of a proposed rule by the Commission, and at least 30 days in ad-
vance of  the meeting at which the Commission will hold a public hearing on the proposed
rule, the Commission shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice  of the Commission’s notices of proposed
rulemaking; and
3. In such other ways as the Commission may by rule specify.
H. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date  and location of the public hearing at which the Commission will hear
public comments on the proposed rule and, if different, the time, date and location of  the
meeting where the Commission will consider and vote on the proposed rule;
2. If the hearing is  held via telecommunication, video conference or other electronic
means, the Commission shall include the  mechanism for access to the hearing in the notice
of proposed rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
I. All  hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments and
documents received by the Commission in response to the proposed  rule shall be available
to the public.
J. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule.
[15]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings  required by this
section.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members,  take final action on the pro-
posed rule based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
1. The Commission  may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided the changes do not
enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
2. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for  substantive changes
made to the proposed rule as well as  reasons for substantive changes not made that were
recommended by commenters.
3. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective  date for the rule. Except for
an emergency as provided in Section  12.L of the Compact, the effective date of the rule shall
be no sooner than 30 days after issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists,  the Commission may consider and
adopt an emergency rule with 48 hours’  notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that
the usual rulemaking  procedures provided in the Compact and in this section shall be
retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days
after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency  rule is
one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by federal law  or
rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct  revisions
to a previously adopted rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors,  errors in for-
mat, errors in consistency or  grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be
posted on the website of the Commission. The revision shall  be subject to challenge by any
person for a period of 30 days after posting. The  revision may be challenged only on grounds
that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing
and delivered to the Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is
made, the revision will take effect without further action. If  the revision is challenged, the
revision may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.
N. No member state’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under the Compact.
SECTION 13. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
1. The  executive and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall
enforce the Compact and take all actions  necessary and appropriate to implement the Com-
pact.
2. Except as otherwise provided in the Compact,  venue is proper and judicial proceedings
by or against the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court  of competent
jurisdiction where the principal offices of the Commission are located. The Commission may
waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to  the extent it adopts or consents to participate in
alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection
or propriety of venue in any action against a  licensee for professional malpractice, miscon-
duct or any such similar matter.
[16]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
3. The Commission shall  be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding re-
garding the  enforcement or interpretation of the Compact and shall have standing to inter-
vene in such a proceeding for  all purposes. Failure to provide the Commission service of
process shall render a judgment or order void as to the Commission,  the Compact or
promulgated rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination
1. If  the Commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance
of its obligations or responsibilities under the Compact or  the promulgated rules, the Com-
mission shall provide written notice  to the defaulting state. The notice of default shall de-
scribe the default,  the proposed means of curing the default and any other action that the
Commission may take and shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the
default.
2. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other member
states.
C. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may  be terminated
from the Compact upon  an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the member
states,  and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred on that state by the Compact may
be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the
offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
D. Termination  of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend  or terminate
shall be given by  the Commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the
defaulting state’s legislature, the  defaulting state’s licensing authority and each of the
member states’ licensing authority.
E. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all  assessments, obligations and
liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination,  including obligations that ex-
tend beyond the effective date of termination.
F. Upon the termination  of a state’s membership from the Compact, that state shall
immediately provide notice to all licensees within that state of such  termination. The ter-
minated state shall  continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to the Compact for
a minimum of six months after the date of said notice of termination.
G. The Commission shall not bear any costs  related to a state that is found to be in de-
fault or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between
the Commission and the defaulting state.
H. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by  petitioning the U.S.
District Court for the District of Columbia or  the federal district where the Commission has
its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, in-
cluding reasonable attorney fees.
I. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall attempt  to resolve disputes
related to the Compact that arise among member states  and between member and non-
member states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate  a rule providing for both mediation and binding
dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
J. Enforcement
[17]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
1. By majority vote  as provided by rule, the Commission may initiate legal action against
a member state in default in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia
or the federal district  where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance
with the provisions of the Compact and its  promulgated rules. The relief sought may include
both injunctive relief  and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the pre-
vailing party shall be awarded all  costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees.
The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission.  The Commission
may pursue any other remedies available under federal or  the defaulting member state’s law.
2. A member state may initiate legal  action against the Commission in the U.S. District
Court for the District of Columbia  or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices  to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated rules. The relief sought may include  both injunctive relief and damages. In the
event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party  shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees.
3. No person other than a member state shall enforce the Compact against the Commis-
sion.
SECTION 14. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL AND AMENDMENT
A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the  Compact statute is en-
acted into law in the seventh member state.
1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the  Commission shall convene and re-
view the enactment of  each of the first seven member states (“charter member states”) to
determine if the statute enacted by each such charter member state  is materially different
than the model Compact statute.
a. A charter member state whose enactment  is found to be materially different from the
model Compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth  in Section 13 of this
Compact.
b. If any member state is  later found to be in default, or is terminated or withdraws from
the Compact, the Commission shall remain in existence and the Compact shall remain in
effect even if the number of member states should be less than seven.
2. Member states enacting the  Compact subsequent to the seven initial charter member
states shall be subject to the process set forth in Section 10.C.21 of the Compact to deter-
mine if their enactments are materially  different from the model Compact statute and
whether they qualify for participation in the Compact.
3. All actions taken for the  benefit of the Commission or in furtherance of the purposes
of the  administration of the Compact prior to the effective date of the Compact or the
Commission coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the Commission unless
specifically repudiated by the Commission.
4.a. Any state that  joins the Compact subsequent to the Commission’s initial adoption
of the rules and bylaws shall be subject to the rules and bylaws as they exist  on the date on
which the Compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously  adopted by
the Commission shall have the full force and  effect of law on the day the Compact becomes
law in that state.
b. Notwithstanding Section 14.A.4.a of the Compact, the State Board of Licensed  Social
Workers shall review the rules of the Commission. The board may approve and  adopt the
rules of  the Commission as rules of the board. The State of Oregon is subject to a rule of
[18]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Commission only if the rule of the Commission is adopted by the board.
B. Any member state may withdraw from the Compact by enacting a statute repealing
the same.
1. A member  state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days after enactment of
the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing  state’s li-
censing authority to comply with the investigative and  adverse action reporting require-
ments of the Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a  statute withdrawing from the compact, a state shall imme-
diately provide notice of such withdrawal  to all licensees within that state. Notwithstanding
any subsequent statutory enactment to  the contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue
to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to the Compact for  a minimum of 180 days after
the date of such notice of withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in the Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent  any
licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a  non-
member state that does not conflict with the provisions of the Compact.
D. The  Compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to the Compact
shall become effective and binding upon any  member state until it is enacted into the laws
of all member states.
SECTION 15. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. The Compact and the  Commission’s rulemaking authority shall be liberally construed
so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and administration of, the Compact.
Provisions of the Compact expressly authorizing  or requiring the promulgation of rules shall
not be construed to limit the Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of the Compact shall be severable and if any phrase,  clause, sentence
or provision of the Compact  is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to
the constitution of any member state, a  state seeking participation in the Compact or of the
United States, or  the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circum-
stance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent  jurisdiction, the validity of the
remainder of the Compact and the applicability thereof to any  other government, agency,
person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding  Section 15.B of the Compact, the Commission may deny a state’s
participation in the Compact or, in  accordance with the requirements of Section 13.B of the
Compact, terminate a member state’s participation  in the Compact, if the Commission de-
termines that a constitutional requirement of a member state is a material  departure from
the Compact. Otherwise, if the Compact  shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of
any member state, the Compact shall remain in full force and effect  as to the remaining
member states and in full force and effect  as to the member state affected as to all severable
matters.
SECTION 16. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. A licensee providing services in a remote state under a multistate authorization to
practice shall  adhere to the laws and regulations, including laws, regulations and applicable
standards, of the remote state where the client is located at the time care is rendered.
B. Nothing herein  shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a member
state that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
[19]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
C. Any laws, statutes, regulations or  other legal requirements in a member state in
conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
D. All permissible agreements between the Commission and the member  states are
binding in accordance with their terms.
SECTION 2. The Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon hereby  ratifies the Social
Work Licensure Compact set forth in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 675.520 is amended to read:
675.520. (1) A person may not use any title,  words or abbreviations, including the title “social
worker,” that indicate that the person has an authorization to practice regulated social work unless
the person is a regulated social worker.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit:
(a) The use of the educational designations  “Bachelor of Social Work” or “Master’s of Social
Work” by a person who is not a regulated social worker; or
(b) The use of the title “school social worker” by a person who:
(A) Is not a regulated social worker;
(B) Holds a master’s degree in social work from an accredited college or university; and
(C) Is licensed as a school social worker by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to an individual who is authorized to
practice social work by a multistate authorization to practice or a  multistate license, as
those terms are defined in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 675.523 is amended to read:
675.523. A person may not  practice clinical social work unless the person is a clinical social
worker licensed under  ORS 675.530 or a clinical social work associate certified under ORS 675.537,
except if the person is:
(1) Licensed  or certified by the State of Oregon to provide mental health services, provided that
the person is acting within the lawful scope of practice for the person’s license or  certification and
does not represent that the person is a regulated social worker;
(2) Certified to provide alcohol  and drug abuse prevention services, intervention services and
treatment in compliance with rules  adopted under ORS 430.256 and 430.357, provided that the person
is acting within the lawful scope of  practice for the person’s certification and does not represent
that the person is a regulated social worker;
(3) Employed by or contracting with an entity that is certified or licensed by the State of Oregon
under ORS 430.610 to 430.695 to provide mental health treatment or addiction services, provided that
the person is practicing within the lawful scope of the person’s employment or contract;
(4) A recognized member of the clergy, provided that the person is  acting in the person’s
ministerial capacity and does not represent that the person is a regulated social worker; [ or]
(5) A student in a social work graduate degree program that meets the requirements  established
by the State Board of Licensed Social Workers by rule[ .]; or
(6) Authorized to practice pursuant  to a multistate authorization to practice or a multi-
state license, as those terms are defined in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 675.597 is amended to read:
675.597. The State Board  of Licensed Social Workers Account is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the State Board of Li-
[20]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
censed Social Workers Account shall be credited to the account. Moneys in the  account are con-
tinuously appropriated to the board for  the administration and enforcement of ORS 675.510 to
675.600, 676.850 and 676.866 and for the purpose of meeting the financial obligations of  the
State of Oregon as  a result of this state’s participation in the Social Work Licensure Com-
pact described in section 1 of this 2025 Act .
SECTION 6.
 ORS 676.177 is amended to read:
676.177. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 676.165 to 676.180 and  except as pro-
vided in subsection (5) of this section, a health professional regulatory board, upon a determination
by the board that  it possesses otherwise confidential information that reasonably relates to the
regulatory or enforcement function of another public entity, may disclose that  information to the
other public entity.
(2) Any public  entity that receives information pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall
agree to take  all reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of the information, except that the
public entity may use or disclose  the information to the extent necessary to carry out the regulatory
or enforcement functions of the public entity.
(3) For purposes of this section, “public entity” means:
(a) A board or agency of this state, or a board or agency of another  state with regulatory or
enforcement functions similar to the  functions of a health professional regulatory board of this state;
(b) A district attorney;
(c) The Department of Justice;
(d) A state or local public body of this state that licenses, franchises  or provides emergency
medical services; or
(e) A law enforcement agency of this state, another state or the federal government.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section[ ,]:
(a) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may disclose information described in  subsection (1)
of this section to the Physical Therapy Compact Commission established in ORS 688.240.
(b) The State  Board of Licensed Social Workers may disclose information described in
subsection (1)  of this section to the Social Work Licensure Compact Commission described
in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(5) A health professional regulatory board may not disclose the information  described in sub-
section (1) of this section to another public entity if the information relates  to the provision of or
referral for reproductive or gender-affirming health care services.
SECTION 7.
(1) The amendments to ORS 675.520 and  675.523 by sections 3 and 4 of this
2025 Act apply to individuals authorized to practice by  a multistate authorization to practice
or a multistate license on or after the operative date specified in section 8 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 675.597 by section 5 of this 2025 Act apply to moneys received
by the State Board of Licensed Social Workers on or after the operative date specified  in
section 8 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 676.177 by section 6 of this 2025 Act apply to information
disclosed on or after the operative date specified in section 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 675.520,
675.523, 675.597 and 676.177 by sections  3 to 6 of this 2025 Act become operative on January
1, 2026.
(2) The State Board of Licensed Social Workers may take any  action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the board  to exer-
[21]
HB 2554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
cise, on and  after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the du-
ties, functions  and powers conferred on the board by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act and
the amendments to ORS 675.520, 675.523, 675.597  and 676.177 by sections 3 to 6 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 9.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[22]