Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 654.090 is amended to read:
654.090. In order to carry out the purposes of  ORS 654.001 to 654.295, 654.412 to 654.423 and
654.750 to 654.780 and  encourage voluntary compliance with occupational safety and health laws,
regulations and standards and to promote more effective workplace  health and safety programs, the
Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall:
(1) Develop  greater knowledge and interest in the causes and prevention of industrial accidents,
occupational diseases and related subjects through:
(a) Research, conferences, lectures and the use of public communications media;
(b) The collection and dissemination of accident statistics; and
(c) The publication and distribution of training and accident prevention materials,  including
audio and visual aids.
(2) Appoint advisers who shall, without compensation, assist  the director in establishing stan-
dards of safety and health. The director may adopt  and incorporate in its regulations, rules and
standards such safety and health recommendations as it may receive from such advisers.
(3) Provide consultative services for employers on  safety and health matters and prescribe pro-
cedures which will permit any employer to request a special inspection or investigation,  focused on
specific problems or hazards in the place of employment of  the employer or to request assistance in
developing a plan  to correct such problems or hazards, which will not directly result in a citation
and civil penalty. For purposes of this subsection, “provide consultative services” includes:
(a) Providing incentive to small employers to participate in consultative services.
(b) Providing maximum allowable protection from fines and penalties to small employers
that participate in consultative services.
(c) Promoting consultative services to the small business community.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1940
HB 2889
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
(4) Place emphasis, in the research, education and consultation program, on  development of a
model for providing services to groups of small employers in particular industries and their em-
ployees.
(5) Separately administer the voluntary compliance and research, education  and consultation
activities described in this section and  the enforcement activities described in ORS 654.025 to
654.086.
[2]