Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 653.035 is amended to read:
653.035. (1) Employers may deduct from the minimum wage  to be paid employees under ORS
653.025, 653.030 or 653.261[ ,] the fair market value of lodging, meals  or other facilities or services
furnished by the employer for the private benefit of the employee.
(2) Employers may include commission  payments to employees as part of the applicable minimum
wage for any pay period in which  the combined wage and commission earnings of the employee will
comply with ORS 653.010 to 653.261. In  any pay period where the combined wage and commission
payments to the employee do not  add up to the applicable minimum wage under ORS 653.010 to
653.261, the employer shall pay the minimum rate as prescribed in ORS 653.010 to 653.261.
(3) Employers, including employers regulated under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act, may
not include any amount received by employees as tips in determining the amount of  the minimum
wage required to be paid by ORS 653.010 to 653.261.
(4) Whenever an employee in the  food service industry receives a tip from a credit card
transaction, the employer shall distribute the tip amount to the employee  within 24 hours
after the credit card transaction is processed.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3773