Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 677.417 is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 677.
SECTION 2.  ORS 677.417 is amended to read:
677.417. The Oregon Medical Board shall determine by rule what  constitutes medical incompe-
tence, unprofessional conduct, physical  incapacity or impairment for the purposes of ORS chapter
677. When determining what constitutes unprofessional conduct, the board shall consider a
reasonable person standard.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2973