Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this  2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 441.015 to
441.087.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Health  Authority shall adopt rules for the licensing of ex-
tended stay centers. The rules must ensure that each licensed extended stay center:
(a) Is sponsored by a medical facility that  has demonstrated safe operating procedures
in an outpatient surgery setting and  has been in compliance with rules applicable to the fa-
cility for no less than 24 consecutive months;
(b) Has an emergency transfer agreement with  a local hospital or has emergency proce-
dures in place for transferring patients in need of hospitalization to a local hospital;
(c) Is located in close proximity to the facility where the extended stay patients are  re-
ceiving surgical services;
(d) Conforms to  all requirements applicable to hospitals in this state with regard to op-
erations, environmental sanitation, physical plant maintenance, safety, food service and  pa-
tient care;
(e) Orally and in writing, clearly notifies patients with Medicare coverage that  services
provided in an extended stay center are not covered by Medicare;
(f) Requires certification by a  patient’s physician prior to the patient’s admission to the
extended stay  center that the patient requires services provided in the extended care center;
and
(g) Admits patients for no more than 48 hours from  the time of admission to the ex-
tended stay center except as medically necessary.
(2) The authority shall license no more than 15 extended stay centers.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall submit a  request to the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services  to waive provisions of the Medicaid Act (Title XIX of the
Social Security Act) that prevent  federal financial participation in the costs of extended stay
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1076
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
center services provided to medical assistance recipients.
(2) No later than September 10, 2022,  the authority shall report to the interim commit-
tees of the Legislative Assembly  related to health, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245,
the following information regarding extended stay centers:
(a) The number of facilities that have applied for an extended stay center license;
(b) The number of extended stay center licenses granted;
(c) With respect to patients served by licensed extended stay centers in this state:
(A) The number of patients served;
(B) The average duration of patient stays;
(C) The range of and average acuity of patients served;
(D) The types of surgeries performed that resulted in care in an extended stay center;
(E) The cost of care provided in extended stay centers compared to the cost  of post-
surgical care provided in a  hospital and any differences in efficiencies between extended stay
centers and hospitals;
(F) The rate of infection; and
(G) Patient satisfaction;
(d) The frequency of transfers from extended  stay centers to hospitals and the patients’
health outcomes; and
(e) National trends in the  extended stay center industry and in insurance coverage of
extended stay center services.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority and the Department of Consumer and
Business Services  shall convene and provide staff support to an extended stay center advi-
sory group consisting of:
(a) One member  of the Senate appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the President
of the Senate;
(b) One member  of the House of Representatives appointed by and serving at the pleasure
of the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and
(c) The following members appointed by the authority in collaboration with the  depart-
ment:
(A) One member representing a hospital or health system;
(B) One member representing the insurance industry;
(C) One member from a statewide organization that represents physicians in this state;
(D) One member  of an organization that advocates on behalf of health care consumers
in this state;
(E) One member representing long term care facilities in this state;
(F) One member from an organization that represents ambulatory surgery centers in this
state; and
(G) One member from  a statewide organization representing orthopedic physicians in this
state.
(2) The advisory group shall meet at least two times  each calendar year for the purpose
of advising the authority  and the department regarding the implementation of section 2 of
this 2017 Act and other matters related to the regulation of extended stay centers.
(3) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(4) Members of the  advisory group who are not members of the Legislative Assembly are
[2]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
not entitled to compensation, but may be reimbursed for  actual and necessary travel and
other expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official  duties in the manner
and amounts  provided for in ORS 292.495. Claims for expenses incurred in performing func-
tions of the advisory group shall be paid out  of funds appropriated to the authority for pur-
poses of the advisory group.
SECTION 5.  Section 2 of this 2017 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules for the licensing of extended stay
centers. The rules must ensure that each licensed extended stay center:
(a) Is sponsored by a medical facility that has demonstrated  safe operating procedures in an
outpatient surgery setting and  has been in compliance with rules applicable to the facility for no
less than 24 consecutive months;
(b) Has an emergency transfer agreement with a local hospital or has emergency procedures  in
place for transferring patients in need of hospitalization to a local hospital;
(c) Is located in close proximity to  the facility where the extended stay patients are receiving
surgical  services;
(d) Conforms to all requirements applicable to hospitals in this state with regard  to operations,
environmental sanitation, physical plant maintenance, safety, food service and patient care;
(e) Orally and  in writing, clearly notifies patients with Medicare coverage that services provided
in an extended stay center are not covered by Medicare;
(f) Requires certification  by a patient’s physician prior to the patient’s admission to the extended
stay center that the patient requires services provided in the extended care center; and
(g) Admits patients for no more than 48 hours  from  the time of admission to the extended
stay center except as medically necessary .
(2) The authority [ shall license no more than 15 extended stay centers ] shall issue the number
of extended stay center licenses that the authority deems necessary to address the need for
such services in this state .
SECTION 6.  ORS 441.020 is amended to read:
441.020. (1) Licenses for health care facilities, except long  term facilities as defined in ORS
442.015, must be obtained from the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) Licenses for long term care facilities must be obtained from the  Department of Human Ser-
vices.
(3) Applications  shall be upon such forms and shall contain such information as the authority
or the department may reasonably require, which  may include affirmative evidence of ability to
comply with such reasonable standards and rules as may lawfully be prescribed  under ORS 441.025.
(4) Each application shall be accompanied  by the license fee. If the license is denied, the fee
shall be refunded to the applicant. Except as provided in  subsection [ (15)] (16) of this section, if the
license is issued, the fee shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of:
(a) The Oregon Health Authority Fund  for the purpose of carrying out the functions of the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087 and 441.196; or
(b) The  Department of Human Services Account for the purpose of carrying out the functions
of the Department of Human  Services under ORS 431A.050 to 431A.080, 441.015 to 441.063 and
441.196.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (8) of this section, for hospitals with:
(a) Fewer than 26 beds, the annual license fee shall be $1,250.
(b) Twenty-six beds or more but fewer than 50 beds, the annual license fee shall be $1,850.
[3]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Fifty or more beds but fewer than 100 beds, the annual license fee shall be $3,800.
(d) One hundred beds or more but fewer than 200 beds, the annual license fee shall be $6,525.
(e) Two hundred or more beds, but fewer than 500 beds, the annual license fee shall be $8,500.
(f) Five hundred or more beds, the annual license fee shall be $12,070.
(6) A hospital shall pay an annual  fee of $750 for each hospital satellite indorsed under its li-
cense.
(7) The authority may  charge a reduced hospital fee or hospital satellite fee if the authority
determines that charging the standard fee constitutes a significant financial burden to the facility.
(8) For long term care facilities with:
(a) One to 15 beds, the annual license fee shall be $180.
(b) Sixteen to 49 beds, the annual license fee shall be $260.
(c) Fifty to 99 beds, the annual license fee shall be $520.
(d) One hundred to 150 beds, the annual license fee shall be $670.
(e) More than 150 beds, the annual license fee shall be $750.
(9) For ambulatory surgical centers, the annual license fee shall be:
(a) $1,750 for certified and high complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical  centers with more
than two procedure rooms.
(b) $1,250 for  certified and high complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical centers with no
more than two procedure rooms.
(c) $1,000 for moderate complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical centers.
(10) For birthing centers, the annual license fee shall be $750.
(11) For outpatient renal dialysis facilities, the annual license fee shall be $2,000.
(12) For extended stay centers, the annual license fee shall be $
.
[(12)] (13)  During the  time the licenses remain in force, holders are not required to pay in-
spection fees to any county, city or other municipality.
[(13)] (14) Any health care facility license may be  indorsed to permit operation at more than one
location. If so,  the applicable license fee shall be the sum of the license fees that would be applicable
if each location were separately licensed. The authority  may include hospital satellites on a
hospital’s license in accordance with rules adopted by the authority.
[(14)] (15) Licenses for health maintenance organizations shall be obtained from the Director of
the Department of Consumer and Business Services pursuant to ORS 731.072.
[(15)] (16)  All moneys received pursuant to subsection (8) of this section shall be deposited  in
the Quality Care Fund established in ORS 443.001.
[(16)] (17) As used in this section:
(a) “Hospital satellite” has the meaning prescribed by the authority by rule.
(b) “Procedure room” means a room where surgery or invasive procedures are performed.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 442.015 is amended to read:
442.015. As used in ORS chapter 441 and this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Acquire” or “acquisition” means obtaining equipment,  supplies, components or facilities by
any means, including purchase, capital or operating  lease, rental or donation, for the purpose of
using such equipment, supplies, components or  facilities to provide health services in Oregon. When
equipment or other materials are obtained  outside of this state, acquisition is considered to occur
when the equipment or other materials begin to be used in Oregon for the provision of  health ser-
vices or when such services are offered for use in Oregon.
(2) “Affected persons” has the same meaning as given to “party” in ORS 183.310.
[4]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3)(a) “Ambulatory surgical  center” means a facility or portion of a facility that operates ex-
clusively  for  the purpose of providing surgical services to patients who do not require
hospitalization  and  for whom the expected duration of services does not exceed 24 hours following
admission.
(b) “Ambulatory surgical center” does not mean:
(A) Individual or group practice offices  of private physicians or dentists that do not contain a
distinct area used for outpatient surgical treatment on a regular and organized basis, or  that only
provide surgery routinely provided in a physician’s  or dentist’s office using local anesthesia or
conscious sedation; or
(B) A portion of a licensed hospital designated for outpatient surgical treatment.
(4) “Delegated credentialing agreement” means a written agreement  between an originating-site
hospital and a  distant-site hospital that provides that the medical staff of the originating-site hospi-
tal will rely upon the credentialing and privileging decisions  of the distant-site hospital in making
recommendations to the governing body of the originating-site hospital as to whether  to credential
a telemedicine  provider, practicing at the distant-site hospital either as an employee or under con-
tract, to provide telemedicine services to patients in the originating-site hospital.
(5) “Develop”  means to undertake those activities that on their completion will result in the
offer of a new institutional health service or the incurring of  a financial obligation, as defined under
applicable state law, in relation to the offering of such a health service.
(6) “Distant-site hospital” means  the hospital where a telemedicine provider, at the time the
telemedicine provider is providing telemedicine services, is practicing  as an employee or under
contract.
(7) “Essential long term care facility” means an individual long term care facility  that serves
predominantly rural and frontier communities, as designated by the Office  of Rural Health, and
meets other criteria established by the Department of Human Services by rule.
(8) “Expenditure” or “capital expenditure” means the actual expenditure, an obligation to  an
expenditure, lease or similar arrangement  in lieu of an expenditure, and the reasonable value of a
donation or grant in lieu of an expenditure but not including any interest thereon.
(9) “Extended stay center” means a facility licensed in accordance  with section 2 of this
2017 Act.
[(9)] (10)  “Freestanding birthing center”  means a facility licensed for the primary purpose of
performing low risk deliveries.
[(10)] (11) “Governmental unit” means the state, or any  county, municipality or other political
subdivision, or any related department, division, board or other agency.
[(11)] (12) “Gross revenue” means the sum of daily hospital service  charges, ambulatory service
charges, ancillary service charges and other operating revenue. “Gross revenue” does not include
contributions, donations, legacies or bequests made to a hospital without restriction by the donors.
[(12)(a)] (13)(a) “Health care facility” means:
(A) A hospital;
(B) A long term care facility;
(C) An ambulatory surgical center;
(D) A freestanding birthing center; [ or]
(E) An outpatient renal dialysis center[ .]; or
(F) An extended stay center.
(b) “Health care facility” does not mean:
[5]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) A residential facility licensed by the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 443.415;
(B) An establishment furnishing primarily domiciliary care as described in ORS 443.205;
(C) A residential facility licensed or approved under the rules of the Department of Corrections;
(D) Facilities established by ORS 430.335 for treatment of substance abuse disorders; or
(E) Community mental health  programs or community developmental disabilities programs es-
tablished under ORS 430.620.
[(13)] (14) “Health maintenance organization” or “HMO” means a public organization or a  pri-
vate organization organized under the laws of any state that:
(a) Is a qualified HMO under section 1310 (d) of the U.S. Public Health Services Act; or
(b)(A) Provides or otherwise makes available  to enrolled participants health care services, in-
cluding at least the following basic health care services:
(i) Usual physician services;
(ii) Hospitalization;
(iii) Laboratory;
(iv) X-ray;
(v) Emergency and preventive services; and
(vi) Out-of-area coverage;
(B) Is compensated, except for copayments, for the provision of the basic health  care services
listed in subparagraph (A)  of this paragraph to enrolled participants on a predetermined periodic
rate basis; and
(C) Provides physicians’ services primarily directly  through physicians who are either employees
or partners of such organization,  or through arrangements with individual physicians or one or more
groups of physicians organized on a group practice or individual practice basis.
[(14)] (15)  “Health services” means  clinically related diagnostic, treatment or rehabilitative
services, and includes alcohol, drug or controlled substance abuse and  mental health services that
may be provided either directly or indirectly on an inpatient or ambulatory patient basis.
[(15)] (16) “Hospital” means:
(a) A facility with an organized  medical staff and a permanent building that is capable of pro-
viding 24-hour inpatient care to two or more  individuals who have an illness or injury and that
provides at least the following health services:
(A) Medical;
(B) Nursing;
(C) Laboratory;
(D) Pharmacy; and
(E) Dietary; or
(b) A special inpatient care facility as that term is defined by the authority by rule.
[(16)] (17)  “Institutional health services” means  health services provided in or through health
care facilities and [ includes] the entities in or through which such services are provided.
[(17)] (18)  “Intermediate care facility” means a facility that provides, on a regular  basis,
health-related care and services to individuals who do not require  the degree of care and treatment
that a hospital or  skilled nursing facility is designed to provide, but who because of their mental
or physical condition require  care and services above the level of room and board that can be made
available to them only through institutional facilities.
[(18)(a)] (19)(a)  “Long term  care facility” means a permanent facility with inpatient beds, pro-
[6]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
viding:
(A) Medical services,  including nursing services but excluding surgical procedures except as
may be permitted by the rules of the Director of Human Services; and
(B) Treatment for two or more unrelated patients.
(b) “Long term care facility” includes  skilled nursing facilities and intermediate care facilities
but does not include facilities licensed and operated pursuant to ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
[(19)] (20) “New hospital” means:
(a) A facility that did  not offer hospital services on a regular basis within its service area within
the prior 12-month period and is initiating or proposing to initiate such services; or
(b) Any replacement of an existing hospital that involves a  substantial increase or change in the
services offered.
[(20)] (21) “New skilled nursing or intermediate care  service or facility” means a service or fa-
cility that did not offer long term care services on a regular basis by or  through the facility within
the prior 12-month period and is initiating or proposing  to initiate such services. “New skilled
nursing or intermediate care service or facility” also includes the rebuilding of  a long term care
facility, the relocation of buildings that are a part of a  long term care facility, the relocation of long
term care beds from one facility to another or an increase in the number of beds  of more than 10
or 10 percent of the bed capacity, whichever is the lesser, within a two-year period in  a facility that
applied for a certificate of need between August 1, 2011,  and December 1, 2012, or submitted a letter
of intent under ORS 442.315 (7) between January 15, 2013, and January 31, 2013.
[(21)] (22)  “Offer”  means that the health care facility holds itself out as capable of providing,
or as having the means for the provision of, specified health services.
[(22)] (23)  “Originating-site hospital” means a hospital  in which a patient is located while re-
ceiving telemedicine services.
[(23)] (24)  “Outpatient renal dialysis facility” means a facility that provides  renal dialysis ser-
vices directly to outpatients.
[(24)] (25) “Person” means an individual, a trust or estate, a  partnership, a corporation (includ-
ing associations, joint  stock companies and insurance companies), a state, or a political subdivision
or instrumentality, including a municipal corporation, of a state.
[(25)] (26) “Skilled nursing facility” means a facility or a distinct part of a facility, that is pri-
marily engaged in providing to inpatients skilled nursing care and  related services for patients who
require medical or nursing care, or  an institution that provides rehabilitation services for the re-
habilitation of individuals who are injured or sick or who have disabilities.
[(26)] (27) “Telemedicine” means the provision of health services to patients by physicians and
health care practitioners from a distance using electronic communications.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 442.015, as amended by section 22,  chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, is
amended to read:
442.015. As used in ORS chapter 441 and this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Acquire” or “acquisition” means obtaining equipment,  supplies, components or facilities by
any means, including purchase, capital or operating  lease, rental or donation, for the purpose of
using such equipment, supplies, components or  facilities to provide health services in Oregon. When
equipment or other materials are obtained  outside of this state, acquisition is considered to occur
when the equipment or other materials begin to be used in Oregon for the provision of  health ser-
vices or when such services are offered for use in Oregon.
(2) “Affected persons” has the same meaning as given to “party” in ORS 183.310.
[7]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3)(a) “Ambulatory surgical  center” means a facility or portion of a facility that operates ex-
clusively  for  the purpose of providing surgical services to patients who do not require
hospitalization  and  for whom the expected duration of services does not exceed 24 hours following
admission.
(b) “Ambulatory surgical center” does not mean:
(A) Individual or group practice offices  of private physicians or dentists that do not contain a
distinct area used for outpatient surgical treatment on a regular and organized basis, or  that only
provide surgery routinely provided in a physician’s  or dentist’s office using local anesthesia or
conscious sedation; or
(B) A portion of a licensed hospital designated for outpatient surgical treatment.
(4) “Delegated credentialing agreement” means a written agreement  between an originating-site
hospital and a  distant-site hospital that provides that the medical staff of the originating-site hospi-
tal will rely upon the credentialing and privileging decisions  of the distant-site hospital in making
recommendations to the governing body of the originating-site hospital as to whether  to credential
a telemedicine  provider, practicing at the distant-site hospital either as an employee or under con-
tract, to provide telemedicine services to patients in the originating-site hospital.
(5) “Develop”  means to undertake those activities that on their completion will result in the
offer of a new institutional health service or the incurring of  a financial obligation, as defined under
applicable state law, in relation to the offering of such a health service.
(6) “Distant-site hospital” means  the hospital where a telemedicine provider, at the time the
telemedicine provider is providing telemedicine services, is practicing  as an employee or under
contract.
(7) “Expenditure” or “capital expenditure” means the actual expenditure, an obligation to  an
expenditure, lease or similar arrangement  in lieu of an expenditure, and the reasonable value of a
donation or grant in lieu of an expenditure but not including any interest thereon.
(8) “Extended stay center” means a facility licensed in accordance  with section 2 of this
2017 Act.
[(8)] (9)  “Freestanding birthing center” means a facility  licensed for the primary purpose of
performing low risk deliveries.
[(9)] (10)  “Governmental unit” means the  state, or any county, municipality or other political
subdivision, or any related department, division, board or other agency.
[(10)] (11) “Gross revenue” means the sum of daily hospital service  charges, ambulatory service
charges, ancillary service charges and other operating revenue. “Gross revenue” does not include
contributions, donations, legacies or bequests made to a hospital without restriction by the donors.
[(11)(a)] (12)(a) “Health care facility” means:
(A) A hospital;
(B) A long term care facility;
(C) An ambulatory surgical center;
(D) A freestanding birthing center; [ or]
(E) An outpatient renal dialysis center[ .]; or
(F) An extended stay center.
(b) “Health care facility” does not mean:
(A) A residential facility licensed by the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 443.415;
(B) An establishment furnishing primarily domiciliary care as described in ORS 443.205;
[8]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) A residential facility licensed or approved under the rules of the Department of Corrections;
(D) Facilities established by ORS 430.335 for treatment of substance abuse disorders; or
(E) Community mental health  programs or community developmental disabilities programs es-
tablished under ORS 430.620.
[(12)] (13) “Health maintenance organization” or “HMO” means a public organization or a  pri-
vate organization organized under the laws of any state that:
(a) Is a qualified HMO under section 1310 (d) of the U.S. Public Health Services Act; or
(b)(A) Provides or otherwise makes available  to enrolled participants health care services, in-
cluding at least the following basic health care services:
(i) Usual physician services;
(ii) Hospitalization;
(iii) Laboratory;
(iv) X-ray;
(v) Emergency and preventive services; and
(vi) Out-of-area coverage;
(B) Is compensated,  except for copayments, for the provision of the basic health care services
listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph to enrolled participants on  a predetermined periodic
rate basis; and
(C) Provides physicians’ services primarily directly  through physicians who are either employees
or partners of such organization,  or through arrangements with individual physicians or one or more
groups of physicians organized on a group practice or individual practice basis.
[(13)] (14)  “Health services” means  clinically related diagnostic, treatment or rehabilitative
services, and includes alcohol, drug or controlled substance abuse and  mental health services that
may be provided either directly or indirectly on an inpatient or ambulatory patient basis.
[(14)] (15) “Hospital” means:
(a) A facility with an organized  medical staff and a permanent building that is capable of pro-
viding 24-hour inpatient care to two or more  individuals who have an illness or injury and that
provides at least the following health services:
(A) Medical;
(B) Nursing;
(C) Laboratory;
(D) Pharmacy; and
(E) Dietary; or
(b) A special inpatient care facility as that term is defined by the authority by rule.
[(15)] (16)  “Institutional health services” means  health services provided in or through health
care facilities and [ includes] the entities in or through which such services are provided.
[(16)] (17)  “Intermediate care facility” means a facility that provides, on a regular  basis,
health-related care and services to individuals who do not require  the degree of care and treatment
that a hospital or  skilled nursing facility is designed to provide, but who because of their mental
or physical condition require  care and services above the level of room and board that can be made
available to them only through institutional facilities.
[(17)(a)] (18)(a)  “Long term  care facility” means a permanent facility with inpatient beds, pro-
viding:
(A) Medical services,  including nursing services but excluding surgical procedures except as
may be permitted by the rules of the Director of Human Services; and
[9]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Treatment for two or more unrelated patients.
(b) “Long term care facility” includes  skilled nursing facilities and intermediate care facilities
but does not include facilities licensed and operated pursuant to ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
[(18)] (19) “New hospital” means:
(a) A facility that did  not offer hospital services on a regular basis within its service area within
the prior 12-month period and is initiating or proposing to initiate such services; or
(b) Any replacement of an existing hospital that involves a  substantial increase or change in the
services offered.
[(19)] (20) “New skilled nursing or intermediate care  service or facility” means a service or fa-
cility that did not offer long term care services on a regular basis by or  through the facility within
the prior 12-month period and is initiating or proposing  to initiate such services. “New skilled
nursing or intermediate care service or facility” also includes the rebuilding of  a long term care
facility, the relocation of buildings that are a part of a  long term care facility, the relocation of long
term care beds from one facility to another or an increase in the number of beds  of more than 10
or 10 percent of the bed capacity, whichever is the lesser, within a two-year period.
[(20)] (21)  “Offer”  means that the health care facility holds itself out as capable of providing,
or as having the means for the provision of, specified health services.
[(21)] (22)  “Originating-site hospital” means a hospital  in which a patient is located while re-
ceiving telemedicine services.
[(22)] (23)  “Outpatient renal dialysis facility” means a facility that provides  renal dialysis ser-
vices directly to outpatients.
[(23)] (24) “Person” means an individual, a trust or estate, a  partnership, a corporation (includ-
ing associations, joint  stock companies and insurance companies), a state, or a political subdivision
or instrumentality, including a municipal corporation, of a state.
[(24)] (25) “Skilled nursing facility” means a facility or a distinct part of a facility, that is pri-
marily engaged in providing to inpatients skilled nursing care and  related services for patients who
require medical or nursing care, or  an institution that provides rehabilitation services for the re-
habilitation of individuals who are injured or sick or who have disabilities.
[(25)] (26) “Telemedicine” means the provision of health services to patients by physicians and
health care practitioners from a distance using electronic communications.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 192.660 is amended to read:
192.660. (1) ORS 192.610 to 192.690 do not prevent the governing body of a public body from
holding executive session  during a regular, special or emergency meeting, after the presiding officer
has identified the authorization under ORS 192.610 to 192.690 for holding the executive session.
(2) The governing body of a public body may hold an executive session:
(a) To consider the employment of a public officer, employee, staff member or individual agent.
(b) To consider the dismissal  or disciplining of, or to hear complaints or charges brought
against, a public officer, employee, staff member or individual agent who does not request  an open
hearing.
(c) To consider matters pertaining to the function  of the medical staff of a public hospital li-
censed pursuant to ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087 and  441.196 including, but not limited to, all
clinical committees, executive, credentials, utilization review, peer review committees  and all other
matters relating to medical competency in the hospital.
(d) To conduct deliberations with persons designated by the governing body  to carry on labor
negotiations.
[10]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) To conduct deliberations with persons  designated by the governing body to negotiate real
property transactions.
(f) To consider information or records that are exempt by law from public inspection.
(g) To consider preliminary negotiations involving matters of trade or commerce in which  the
governing body is in competition with governing bodies in other states or nations.
(h) To consult with counsel concerning the legal rights and duties of a public body with  regard
to current litigation or litigation likely to be filed.
(i) To review and evaluate the employment-related performance of the chief executive officer  of
any public body, a public officer, employee or staff member who does not request an open hearing.
(j) To carry on  negotiations under ORS chapter 293 with private persons or businesses regarding
proposed acquisition, exchange or liquidation of public investments.
(k) To consider matters relating to school safety or a plan  that responds to safety threats made
toward a school.
(L) If the governing body is a health professional  regulatory board, to consider information ob-
tained as part of an investigation of licensee or applicant conduct.
(m) If the governing body is the State Landscape Architect Board, or an advisory  committee to
the board, to consider information obtained as part of an investigation of registrant or applicant
conduct.
(n) To discuss information about review or approval of programs relating to  the security of any
of the following:
(A) A nuclear-powered thermal power plant or nuclear installation.
(B) Transportation of radioactive material derived from or  destined for a nuclear-fueled thermal
power plant or nuclear installation.
(C) Generation, storage or conveyance of:
(i) Electricity;
(ii) Gas in liquefied or gaseous form;
(iii) Hazardous substances as defined in ORS 453.005 (7)(a), (b) and (d);
(iv) Petroleum products;
(v) Sewage; or
(vi) Water.
(D) Telecommunication systems, including cellular, wireless or radio systems.
(E) Data transmissions by whatever means provided.
(3) Labor negotiations shall be conducted in open meetings unless  negotiators for both sides
request that  negotiations be conducted in executive session. Labor negotiations conducted in exec-
utive session are not subject to the notification requirements of ORS 192.640.
(4) Representatives of the news media shall be allowed to attend  executive sessions other than
those held under subsection (2)(d) of this section relating to labor negotiations or executive session
held pursuant to ORS 332.061 (2) but the  governing body may require that specified information be
undisclosed.
(5) When a governing body  convenes an executive session under subsection (2)(h) of this section
relating to conferring with counsel on  current litigation or litigation likely to be filed, the governing
body shall bar any member of the news  media from attending the executive session if the member
of the news media is a party to  the litigation or is an employee, agent or contractor of a news media
organization that is a party to the litigation.
(6) No executive session may  be held for the purpose of taking any final action or making any
[11]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
final decision.
(7) The exception granted by subsection (2)(a) of this section does not apply to:
(a) The filling of a vacancy in an elective office.
(b) The filling of a vacancy on any public committee, commission or other advisory group.
(c) The consideration of general employment policies.
(d) The employment of the chief executive officer, other public  officers, employees and staff
members of a public body unless:
(A) The public body has advertised the vacancy;
(B) The public body has adopted regular hiring procedures;
(C) In the case of an officer, the public has had  the opportunity to comment on the employment
of the officer; and
(D) In the case of a chief executive officer, the governing body  has adopted hiring standards,
criteria and policy directives in meetings open to the public in which  the public has had the op-
portunity to comment on the standards, criteria and policy directives.
(8) A governing body  may not use an executive session for purposes of evaluating a chief exec-
utive officer or other officer, employee  or staff member to conduct a general evaluation of an agency
goal, objective or operation  or any directive to personnel concerning agency goals, objectives, op-
erations or programs.
(9) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (6) of this section and ORS 192.650:
(a) ORS 676.175 governs the public disclosure of  minutes, transcripts or recordings relating to
the substance and disposition of licensee or applicant conduct investigated by a health  professional
regulatory  board.
(b) ORS 671.338 governs the public disclosure of  minutes, transcripts or recordings relating to
the substance and disposition of registrant or applicant  conduct investigated by the State Landscape
Architect Board or an advisory committee to the board.
(10) Notwithstanding ORS 244.290, the  Oregon Government Ethics Commission may not adopt
rules that establish  what entities are considered representatives of the news media that are entitled
to attend executive sessions under subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 441.025 is amended to read:
441.025. (1)(a) Upon receipt of  a license fee and an application to operate a health care facility
other than a long term care facility, the Oregon  Health Authority shall review the application and
conduct an on-site inspection of the  health care facility. The authority shall issue a license if it finds
that the applicant and health  care facility comply with ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087 and 441.196
and the rules  of the authority provided that the authority does not receive within the time specified
a certificate of noncompliance  issued by the State Fire Marshal, deputy, or approved authority
pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(b) The authority shall, following payment of the fee, annually renew  each license issued under
this subsection unless:
(A) The health care facility’s license has been suspended or revoked; or
(B) The State Fire Marshal, a deputy or an approved authority has issued a  certificate of non-
compliance pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(2)(a) Upon receipt of a license fee  and an application to operate a long term care facility, the
Department of Human Services shall review the application and conduct an on-site inspection of the
long term care facility. The department shall issue a license if  the department finds that the appli-
cant and long term care facility comply  with ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063,] 441.087 and 441.196 and the
[12]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rules of the department provided that  it does not receive within the time specified a certificate of
noncompliance issued by the State Fire Marshal, deputy, or approved authority pursuant to  ORS
479.215.
(b) The department shall, following an on-site inspection and payment of the fee,  annually renew
each license issued under this subsection unless:
(A) The long term care facility’s license has been suspended or revoked;
(B) The  long term care facility is found not to be in substantial compliance following the on-site
inspection;  or
(C) The State Fire Marshal, a deputy or an approved authority has issued a  certificate of non-
compliance pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(3) Each license shall be issued only for the premises and  persons or governmental units named
in the application and shall not be transferable or assignable.
(4) Licenses shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises  as prescribed by
rule of the authority or the department.
(5) No license shall be issued  or renewed for any health care facility or health maintenance
organization that is required to obtain a certificate of need under ORS  442.315 until a certificate
of need has been granted. An  ambulatory surgical center is not subject to the certificate of need
requirements in ORS 442.315.
(6) No license  shall be issued or renewed for any skilled nursing facility or intermediate care
facility, unless the applicant has included in the application the name and such other  information
as may be necessary to establish the  identity and financial interests of any person who has incidents
of ownership in  the facility representing an interest of 10 percent or more thereof. If the person
having such interest is a corporation, the  name of any stockholder holding stock representing an
interest in the facility of 10 percent or more shall also be included in the application. If  the person
having such interest is any  other entity, the name of any member thereof having incidents of own-
ership representing an interest of  10 percent or more in the facility shall also be included in the
application.
(7) A license may be denied to any applicant for a license or renewal  thereof or any stockholder
of any such applicant who has incidents of ownership in the health care facility representing an
interest of 10 percent or more thereof, or an interest of 10 percent or more of a lease agreement for
the facility, if during the five years prior to the application the applicant or any stockholder of  the
applicant had an  interest of 10 percent or more in the facility or of a lease for the facility and has
divested that interest after receiving from the authority or the department written  notice that the
authority or the department  intends to suspend or revoke the license or to decertify the facility from
eligibility to receive payments for services provided under this section.
(8) The Department of Human Services  may not issue or renew a license for a long term care
facility, unless the applicant has included in the  application the identity of any person who has in-
cident of ownership in the long term care facility who also has  a financial interest in any pharmacy,
as defined in ORS 689.005.
(9) The authority  shall adopt rules for each type of health care facility, except long term care
facilities, to carry out the purposes of ORS 441.015 to 441.087 including, but not limited to:
(a) Establishing classifications and descriptions for the different types of health care facilities
that are licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.087; and
(b) Standards for patient care and safety,  adequate professional staff organizations, training of
staff for whom no other state regulation exists, suitable  delineation of professional privileges and
[13]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
adequate staff analyses of clinical records.
(10) The department shall adopt rules for each type of long term care facility to carry out  the
purposes of ORS 441.015 to 441.087 including, but not limited to:
(a) Establishing classifications and descriptions for the different types of  long term care facili-
ties that are licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.087; and
(b) Standards for patient care and safety,  adequate professional staff organizations, training of
staff for whom no other state regulation exists, suitable  delineation of professional privileges and
adequate staff analyses of clinical records.
(11) The  authority or department may not adopt a rule requiring a health care facility to serve
a specific food as long as the necessary  nutritional food elements are present in the food that is
served.
(12) A health care facility licensed by the authority or department may not:
(a) Offer or provide services beyond  the scope of the license classification assigned by the au-
thority or department; or
(b) Assume a descriptive title or  represent itself under a descriptive title other than the classi-
fication assigned by the authority or department.
(13) A health care facility must  reapply for licensure to change the classification assigned or the
type of license issued by the authority or department.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 441.030 is amended to read:
441.030. (1) The Oregon  Health Authority or the Department of Human Services may assess a
civil penalty and, pursuant to ORS  479.215, shall deny, suspend or revoke a license, in any case
where the State  Fire Marshal, or the representative of the State Fire Marshal, certifies that there
is a failure to  comply with all applicable laws, lawful ordinances and rules relating to safety from
fire.
(2) The authority may:
(a) Assess a civil penalty or deny, suspend or revoke a license of a health care facility  other
than a long term care facility in any case  where it finds that there has been a substantial failure
to comply with ORS 441.015  to [ 441.063] 441.087 and 441.196 or the rules or minimum standards
adopted under ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087 and 441.196.
(b) Assess a civil penalty or suspend or revoke a  license issued under ORS 441.025 for failure
to comply with  an authority order arising from a health care facility’s substantial lack of compliance
with the  provisions of ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087, 441.152 to 441.177 or 441.196 or the rules
adopted under ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087, 441.152 to 441.177 or 441.196.
(c) Suspend or revoke a license issued under ORS 441.025 for failure to pay  a civil penalty im-
posed under ORS 441.175.
(3) The department may:
(a) Assess  a civil penalty or deny, suspend or revoke a long term care facility’s license in any
case where it finds that there has  been a substantial failure to comply with ORS 441.015 to
[441.063,] 441.087  or 441.196 or the rules or minimum standards adopted under ORS 441.015 to
[441.063,] 441.087 or 441.196.
(b) Assess a civil penalty or suspend or revoke a long term care facility’s  license issued under
ORS 441.025 for failure to comply with a department order arising from a long term care facility’s
substantial lack of compliance with the provisions of ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063, 441.084,] 441.087 or
441.196 or the rules adopted under ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063, 441.084,] 441.087 or 441.196.
(c) Suspend or revoke a  license issued under ORS 441.025 for failure to pay a civil penalty im-
[14]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
posed under ORS 441.710.
(d) Order  a long term care facility licensed under ORS 441.025 to restrict the admission of pa-
tients when the department finds an immediate threat  to patient health and safety arising from
failure of the long term care  facility to be in compliance with ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063, 441.084,]
441.087 or 441.196 and the rules adopted under  ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063, 441.084,] 441.087 or 441.196.
(4) Any long term care  facility that has been ordered to restrict the admission of patients pur-
suant to subsection (3)(d) of this section shall post a notice  of the restriction, provided by the de-
partment, on all doors providing ingress to and egress from the facility, for the duration of  the
restriction.
SECTION 12.  ORS 441.065 is amended to read:
441.065. (1) ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087 and 441.196 or the rules adopted  pursuant thereto
do not authorize the  supervision, regulation or control of the remedial care or treatment of residents
or patients in any home or institution that is described under subsection  (2) of this section and is
conducted for those who rely upon treatment solely by prayer or spiritual means, except as to  the
sanitary and safe conditions of the premises, cleanliness of operation and its physical equipment.
This section does not exempt such a home or institution from the licensing  requirements of ORS
441.015 to 441.087, 441.525 to 441.595, 441.815, 441.820, 441.990, 442.342[ ,] and 442.344 [ and 442.400
to 442.463].
(2) To qualify under subsection (1) of this section, a home or institution must:
(a) Be owned by an entity that is registered with the  Secretary of State as a nonprofit corpo-
ration and that does not own, hold a financial interest in, control or operate any facility,  wherever
located, of a type providing medical health care and services; and
(b) Provide 24 hour a day availability of nonmedical care and services.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Medical health care and services” means medical  screening, examination, diagnosis,
prognosis, treatment and drug administration. “Medical health care and services” does not include
counseling or the provision of social services or dietary services.
(b) “Nonmedical care and services”  means assistance or services, other than medical health care
and services, provided by attendants for  the physical, mental, emotional or spiritual comfort and
well being of residents or patients.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 441.077 is amended to read:
441.077. (1) If the governing  body of a health care facility or health maintenance organization
excludes or expels a person licensed under ORS  chapter 677 from staff membership, or limits in any
way the professional privilege of the person in  the health care facility or health maintenance or-
ganization solely because of the school  of medicine to which the person belongs, the license of the
health care facility shall be subject to revocation in the manner  provided in ORS [ 441.015 to
441.065] 441.030. A health maintenance organization which violates this section shall be subject  to
penalties provided in ORS 731.988 and 731.992.
(2) Nothing in this section is intended to limit the authority of the governing body of a  health
care facility or health maintenance  organization with respect to a person who has violated the
reasonable rules and regulations of the health care facility or  health maintenance organization or
who has violated the provisions of ORS chapter 677 if the governing body has  reported the violation
of ORS chapter 677 to the Oregon Medical Board in writing.
SECTION 14.  ORS 442.700 is amended to read:
442.700. As used in ORS 442.700 to 442.760:
[15]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) “Board of governors” means  the governors of a cooperative program as described in ORS
442.720.
(2) “Cooperative program” means a program  among two or more health care providers for the
purpose of providing heart and kidney transplant services including, but  not limited to, the sharing,
allocation and referral of physicians, patients, personnel, instructional programs,  support services,
facilities, medical, diagnostic, laboratory or therapeutic services, equipment,  devices or supplies, and
other services traditionally offered by health care providers.
(3) “Health care provider” means a hospital, physician or entity,  a significant part of whose
activities consist of providing hospital or physician services in this state. For purposes of the  im-
munities provided by ORS  442.700 to 442.760 and 646.740, “health care provider” includes any offi-
cer, director, trustee, employee, or agent of, or  any entity under common ownership and control
with, a health care provider.
(4) “Hospital” means  a hospital, a long term care facility or an ambulatory surgical center, as
those terms are defined in ORS 442.015,  that is licensed under ORS 441.015 to [ 441.089] 441.087.
“Hospital” includes community health programs established under ORS 430.610 to 430.695.
(5) “Order” means a decision  issued by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority under ORS
442.710 either approving or denying an application for a  cooperative program and includes modifi-
cations of an original order under ORS 442.730 (3)(b) and ORS 442.740 (1) and (4).
(6) “Party to a  cooperative program agreement” or “party” means an entity that enters into the
principal agreement to establish a cooperative program and applies for  approval under ORS 442.700
to 442.760  and 646.740 and any other entity that, with the approval of the director, becomes a
member of a cooperative program.
(7) “Physician” means a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 677.515 is amended to read:
677.515. (1) A physician assistant licensed  under ORS 677.512 may provide any medical service,
including prescribing and administering controlled substances in schedules II  through V under the
federal Controlled Substances Act:
(a) That is delegated by the physician assistant’s  supervising physician or supervising physician
organization;
(b) That is within the scope of practice of the physician assistant;
(c) That is within the scope of practice of the supervising physician  or supervising physician
organization;
(d) That is provided under the supervision of the  supervising physician or supervising physician
organization;
(e) That is generally described in and in compliance with the practice agreement; and
(f) For which the  physician assistant has obtained informed consent as provided in ORS 677.097,
if informed consent is required.
(2) This chapter does not prohibit a  student enrolled in a program for educating physician as-
sistants approved by the board from rendering medical services if the services are rendered in  the
course of the program.
(3) The degree  of independent judgment that a physician assistant may exercise shall be deter-
mined by the  supervising physician, or supervising physician organization, and the physician assist-
ant in accordance with the practice agreement.
(4) A supervising physician, upon the approval of the board and in accordance with  the rules
established by the board, may  delegate to the physician assistant the authority to administer and
[16]
HB 2664
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
prescribe medications pursuant to this section and ORS 677.535. The board  may not limit the privi-
lege of administering, dispensing and prescribing to population groups federally designated as
underserved, or to geographic areas of the  state that are federally designated health professional
shortage areas, federally designated medically underserved areas or areas designated  as medically
disadvantaged and in need of primary health care providers by  the Director of the Oregon Health
Authority or the Office of Rural Health. All prescriptions  written pursuant to this subsection must
bear the name, office address and telephone number of the supervising physician.
(5) This chapter does not require or prohibit a physician assistant from practicing in a  hospital
licensed pursuant to ORS 441.015 to [ 441.089] 441.087.
(6) Prescriptions for  medications prescribed by a physician assistant in accordance with this
section and ORS 475.005, 677.010, 677.500, 677.510 and  677.535 and dispensed by a licensed
pharmacist may be  filled by the pharmacist according to the terms of the prescription, and the filling
of such a  prescription does not constitute evidence of negligence on the part of the pharmacist if
the prescription was dispensed within the reasonable and prudent practice of pharmacy.
SECTION 16.
The amendments to section 2 of this 2017 Act by section 5 of this 2017 Act
become operative on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 17. Section 3 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 18. In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which  may be expended for carrying out the pro-
visions of sections 2 to 4 of this 2017 Act.
[17]