Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 338.155 is amended to read:
338.155. (1)(a) Students of a public charter school shall be considered to be residents of  the
school district in which  the public charter school is located for purposes of distribution of the State
School  Fund.
(b) All amounts to be distributed from the  State School Fund for public charter schools shall
first be distributed to the school district in which the public charter school is located.
(c) For the purpose of determining the amounts  to be distributed to a school district from the
State School Fund for  a public charter school, the district extended ADMw described in ORS 327.013
shall be calculated:
(A) Except as provided by subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, as though the  students enrolled
at a public charter school  are students enrolled at the public schools of the school district in which
the public charter school is located.
(B) By  not including any portion of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year if  the public charter school ceased to operate because of dissolution or closure or because of
termination or nonrenewal of a charter.
(2) A school district shall contractually establish, with any  public charter school that is spon-
sored by the board of the school district, payment for provision of educational services to  the public
charter  school’s  students. The payment shall equal an amount per weighted average daily member-
ship (ADMw) of the public charter school that is at least equal to:
(a) Eighty percent of the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 for students  who are enrolled in kindergarten through grade eight;
and
(b) Ninety-five percent of the amount of the school district’s General  Purpose Grant per ADMw
as calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
(3) A school district shall contractually establish, with any  public charter school that is spon-
sored by the State  Board of Education or an institution of higher education and that is within the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2020
HB 2422
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
boundaries of the school district, payment for provision of educational services to  the public charter
school’s students. The payment shall equal an amount per weighted  average daily membership
(ADMw) of the public charter school that is at least equal to:
(a) Ninety percent  of the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled  in kindergarten through grade eight;
and
(b) Ninety-five percent of the amount of the school district’s General  Purpose Grant per ADMw
as calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
(4) The estimated amount of each school district’s  General Purpose Grant per ADMw shall be
determined each year by the Department of Education and made available to all school districts.
(5) The school district in which  the public charter school is located shall transfer an amount
per weighted average daily membership (ADMw) of the public charter school that is equal  to 50
percent of the amount of the school  district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as calculated under
ORS 327.013 that is not paid to the public charter school through a contract created pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section to:
(a) For a public charter school sponsored by the State  Board of Education, the Department of
Education; or
(b) For a  public charter school sponsored by an institution of higher education, the institution
of higher education.
(6) The department may use any moneys received  under this section for activities related to
public charter schools.
(7) A school district and a public  charter school may negotiate to establish a payment for the
provision of educational services to the public charter school’s  students that is more than the min-
imum amounts specified in subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(8) A school district shall send payment to a public charter school based on  a contract negoti-
ated under  this section within 10 days after receiving payments from the State School Fund pursuant
to ORS 327.095.
(9)(a) A public charter school may apply for any  grant or other distribution of moneys  that
is available to school districts or nonchartered public  schools from the Department of Education.
The department shall consider the application of the  public charter school in the same manner as
an application from a school district or nonchartered public school.
[(b) The department shall award any grant that is available to school districts based  solely on the
weighted average daily  membership (ADMw) of the school district directly to the public charter school.
This paragraph does not apply to any grant from the State School Fund. ]
(b) Any grant or other distribution of moneys that is made available under state law to
a school district based on the weighted average daily membership (ADMw) of  the school
district shall be awarded directly to a public charter school.  This paragraph does not apply
to:
(A) Grants distributed from the State School Fund;
(B) Grants distributed from the School Capital  Construction, Maintenance and Technol-
ogy Fund;
(C) Grants awarded under the School District Collaboration Grant Program; or
(D) Funds distributed as provided by ORS 757.612.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.297 is amended to read:
327.297. (1) In addition to those moneys  distributed through the State School Fund, the Depart-
[2]
HB 2422
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment of Education shall  award grants to school districts, education service districts, the Youth
Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention  Education Program for activities that
relate to increases in student achievement, including:
(a) Early childhood support including establishing, maintaining or expanding quality
prekindergarten programs;
(b) Class size reduction with an emphasis on the reduction of kindergarten through  grade three
class sizes;
(c) Increases in instructional time including summer  programs and before- and after-school pro-
grams;
(d) Mentoring, teacher retention and professional development;
(e) Remediation, alternative learning and student retention;
(f) Services to at-risk youth;
(g) Programs to improve a student achievement gap between student  groups identified by cul-
ture, poverty, language and race and other student groups;
(h) Vocational education programs;
(i) Literacy programs;
(j) School library programs; and
(k) Other research-based  student improvement strategies approved by the State Board of Edu-
cation.
(2)(a) Each school district, each education service  district, the Youth Corrections Education
Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program may apply to  the Department of Education
for a grant.
(b) The department shall review and  approve applications based on criteria established by the
State Board  of Education. In establishing the criteria, the State Board of Education shall consider
the recommendations of the Quality Education Commission established under ORS 327.500.
(c) The applications shall include the activities to be funded and the goals  of the district or
program for increases in student performance. The  applications shall become part of the local dis-
trict continuous improvement plan described in ORS 329.095.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 338.155 (9), the Department of Education  may not award a grant
under this section directly to a public charter school.
(b) A school district  that receives a grant under this section [ may] must transfer a portion of
the grant to a public charter school [ based on ] equal to the percentage for the distribution of
the general purpose grant  as identified in  the charter of the school or based on  any other
agreement between the school district and the public charter school.
(c) A public charter school  that receives grant funds under this subsection [ shall] must use
those funds for the activities specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(4)(a) The amount of each grant for a  program or school district = the program’s or school
district’s ADMw 
×  (the total amount available for distribution to programs  and school districts as
grants in each fiscal  year ÷  the total ADMw of all programs and school districts that receive a
grant).
(b) The amount of each grant for an education service district =  the education service district’s
ADMw ×  (the total amount available for distribution to education service  districts as grants in
each fiscal year ÷  the total ADMw of all education service districts that receive a grant).
(c) As used in this subsection, “ADMw” means:
(A) For a school district, the extended weighted average daily  membership as calculated under
[3]
HB 2422
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 327.013, 338.155 (1) and 338.165 (2);
(B) For  the Youth Corrections Education Program, the extended weighted average daily mem-
bership as calculated under ORS 327.026;
(C) For the Juvenile Detention Education  Program, the extended weighted average daily mem-
bership as calculated under ORS 327.026; and
(D) For an education service  district, the sum of the ADMw of the school districts located
within the territory of the education service district.
(5) Each district or  program shall deposit the grant amounts it receives under this section in a
separate account, and shall apply amounts in that  account to pay for activities described in the
district’s or program’s application.
(6) The State Board of Education may adopt  any rules necessary for the administration of the
grant program.
SECTION 3.  ORS 327.731 is amended to read:
327.731. (1) Subject to rules of the State Board of Education, the Superintendent of Public In-
struction shall distribute a share  of moneys in the School Capital Construction, Maintenance and
Technology Fund to school districts as education project grants. The education project  grants shall
be distributed in one  payment each distribution year. The education project grants shall be used for
any state education project, as defined in ORS 327.700.
(2) Each school district’s education project grant = the district’s extended  ADMw for the dis-
tribution year ×  (the total amount available for  the grants in each distribution year ÷ the total
statewide extended ADMw in the distribution year).
(3)(a) Each school district shall deposit  the amounts it receives as an education project grant
in a separate account[ , and shall ].
(b) For each  public charter school located in the school district, the school district shall
transfer a portion of the grant to the public charter school and the public  charter school
shall deposit the amounts it receives in a separate account. The amount of the portion
transferred does not need to be based on the percentage for the  distribution of the general
purpose grant but may be based on an agreement between the school district and the public
charter school. The agreement may specify that the  moneys received by the public charter
school under this paragraph may be used only for state education projects that involve in-
structional training.
(c) A school district or public charter school that receives  and deposits moneys as de-
scribed in this subsection shall:
(A) Apply amounts in that account to pay for costs of state education projects [ or shall ]; or
(B) Hold amounts in that account in reserve and  apply them to pay costs of future state edu-
cation projects.
(4) School districts and public charter schools  receiving education project grants from the
School Capital Construction, Maintenance and Technology Fund shall, if so directed by  the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, take  any action specified by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services that is necessary to maintain the excludability of lottery  bond interest from
gross income under the United States Internal Revenue Code.
SECTION 4.
The amendments to  ORS 327.297, 327.731 and 338.155 by sections 1 to 3 of this
2017 Act apply to grants or distributions made on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
[4]
HB 2422
1
2
on its passage.
[5]