Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Transportation shall study options for restoring  passen-
ger rail service between Portland and Ontario, as was  previously provided by the Amtrak
Pioneer. The department shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS  192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to transportation no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1391