Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund:
(1) $36,000,000 to provide rental assistance and homelessness prevention services through
distribution of the following amounts:
(a) $18,000,000 to Oregon Worker Relief.
(b) $15,000,000 to The Urban League of Portland, Inc.
(c) $3,000,000 to the Immigrant and Refugee Community Organization.
(2) $9,500,000 to provide rehousing and housing  placement services through distribution
of the following amounts:
(a) $5,000,000 to The Urban League of Portland, Inc.
(b) $4,500,000 to Oregon Worker Relief.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4147