Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue Officer shall conduct a  study of the property tax
system in this state. The officer shall submit a report of findings to the  interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to revenue in the manner provided  under ORS 192.245
no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2147