Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “entertainment event” means an event  attended
by at least 10,000 people that is a  performance, spectacle, show or similar event intended for
amusement, diversion or recreation, such as a theatrical or musical performance, concert,
film, game or sporting event.
(2) The Department of Transportation shall conduct  a study of vehicular accident rates
near entertainment events compared to vehicular accident rates in the  same locations when
the entertainment events are not occurring.
(3) The department shall submit a  report on the results of the study and shall provide
recommendations for preventing future vehicular accidents at  entertainment events. The
report must be made in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommen-
dations for legislation, to the Joint Committee  on Transportation no later than September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1569