Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 181A.640 is amended to read:
181A.640. (1) The Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training may deny the application
for training, or deny, suspend or revoke the  certification, of any public safety officer or instructor,
except a youth correction officer or fire service professional, after written notice  and hearing con-
sistent with the provisions of ORS 181A.630, based upon a finding that:
(a) The public safety officer or instructor falsified any information submitted on the  application
for certification or on any documents  submitted to the Board on Public Safety Standards and
Training or the department.
(b) The public safety officer or instructor  has been convicted of a crime or violation in this state
or any other jurisdiction.
(c) The public safety officer or instructor does not meet the applicable minimum standards,
minimum training or the terms and conditions established under ORS 181A.410 (1)(a) to (d).
(d) The public safety officer failed to comply with ORS 181A.790 (3)(b).
(2) The department shall deny the application for training or deny, suspend  or revoke the cer-
tification of a police officer, after written notice and hearing consistent with the provisions of ORS
181A.630, based upon a finding that:
(a) The officer has a conviction for any offense designated under the  law of the jurisdiction
where the conviction occurred as being punishable as a felony or as a  crime for which a maximum
term of imprisonment of more than one year may be imposed;
(b) The officer has a conviction in any  jurisdiction for any offense involving the unlawful use,
possession, delivery or manufacture of a controlled substance, narcotic  or dangerous drug, except
for offenses involving the use or possession of marijuana;
(c) The officer has a conviction in any jurisdiction  for any offense involving domestic violence,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 432
HB 2926
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
as defined in ORS 135.230;
(d) The officer has a conviction in  any jurisdiction for any offense involving abuse, as defined
in ORS 107.705, of a child who is under 18 years of age and is a  natural child, adopted child,
stepchild, a child under the guardianship of, or a child who regularly resides or  formerly resided in
the same household as, the officer;
(e) The officer is a sex offender as defined in ORS 163A.005; or
(f) The officer has been discharged for cause from employment as a police officer as a  result of
intentional conduct performed under the color of office to:
(A) Obtain false confessions;
(B) Make false arrests;
(C) Create or use falsified evidence, including false testimony, or  to destroy evidence to create
a false impression;
(D) Compel a person to  abstain from doing, or to do, any act that the person has a legal right
to do or abstain from doing;
(E) Deprive, or attempt to deprive, another person or persons of their legal rights;
(F) Gain advantage for a public or private safety agency or for personal gain;
(G) Use force that was determined to be excessive or without justification;
(H) Engage in the abuse of lawful authority; or
(I) Engage in policing indicative of bias or discriminatory intent against an individual based on
the individual’s real or perceived age, race, ethnicity,  color, national origin, language, sex, gender
identity, sexual orientation, political affiliation, religion, homelessness or disability.
(3) The department shall deny, suspend or  revoke the certification of a fire service professional,
after written notice and hearing consistent with the provisions of ORS 181A.630, based  upon a
finding that the fire service professional has  been convicted in this state of a crime listed in ORS
137.700 or in any other  jurisdiction of a crime that, if committed in this state, would constitute a
crime listed in ORS 137.700.
(4) The department may  deny, suspend or revoke the certification of any fire service professional
after written notice  and hearing consistent with the provisions of ORS 181A.630, based upon a
finding:
(a) That the fire service professional falsified any information submitted on the  application for
certification or on any documents submitted to the board or the department; or
(b) Consistent with ORS 670.280,  that the fire service professional is not fit to receive or hold
the certification as a result of  conviction of a crime in this state, or in any other jurisdiction, other
than a crime described in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The department shall  deny, suspend or revoke the certification of any public safety officer
or instructor,  except a youth correction officer, after written notice and hearing consistent with the
provisions of ORS 181A.630, based upon a finding that the public safety officer or instructor has
been discharged for cause from employment as a public safety officer.
(6) The department, in consultation with the  board, shall adopt rules specifying those crimes and
violations for which a conviction requires  the denial, suspension or revocation of the certification
of a public safety officer or instructor.
(7) Notwithstanding  the lapse, suspension, revocation or surrender of the certification of a pub-
lic safety officer or instructor, the department may:
(a) Proceed with any investigation of, or any action or disciplinary proceedings  against, the
public safety officer or instructor; or
[2]
HB 2926
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
(b) Revise or render void an order suspending or revoking the certification.
(8) The department shall deny, suspend or revoke the accreditation of a training  or educational
program or any  course, subject, facility or instruction thereof if the program, course, subject, facility
or instruction is not in compliance with  rules adopted or conditions prescribed under ORS 181A.410
(1)(g) or 181A.590 (3).
(9) When the department completes an investigation relating  to a person’s qualifications for
employment, training or certification under this section, the department shall issue a report.
[(10) In cases involving a proposed denial of training or certification of a public  safety officer or
instructor by the department, the department has  jurisdiction to proceed with any action against the
public safety officer or instructor notwithstanding a  subsequent change in the employment status of the
officer or instructor, if: ]
[(a) The department has issued a notice of intent to deny training or certification; and ]
[(b) The officer or instructor has requested a hearing. ]
(10) The department has jurisdiction and  may proceed with any investigation of, or action
to deny the application for training or deny  the certification of, a public safety officer or
instructor notwithstanding a subsequent change  in the employment status of the officer or
instructor. The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection.
SECTION 2.
(1) The amendments to  ORS 181A.640 by section 1 of this 2025 Act become
operative January 1, 2026.
(2) The Department of  Public Safety Standards and Training may take any action before
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section to enable  the department to ex-
ercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by the amendments to ORS
181A.640 by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]