Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,800,000, for deposit in  the Oregon Agricultural
Heritage Fund established under ORS 541.978, for the purposes described in ORS 541.979.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$10,800,000 is established for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the  Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board from the Oregon Agri-
cultural Heritage Fund established under ORS 541.978, for the  purposes described in ORS
541.979.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 56