Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In the exercise of administrative authority and supervision over  the courts
of this state, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court has the authority to take actions  and
establish rules that promote judicial accountability and fair and accessible justice services,
consistent with the mission  of the state courts, including the ability to impound funds and
eliminate benefits available to a  judge that are not compensation to which a judge is entitled
under Article VII (Amended), section 8, of the Oregon Constitution.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4730