Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Vacant” means:
(A) Unoccupied, other than by reason of health,  active military service or a first
responder’s duties in an officially declared emergency;
(B) Empty of personal property; or
(C) Occupied without the knowledge or consent of the owner.
(b) “Vacant home” means a noncommercial residence that is vacant for more than 180
consecutive or cumulative days in a calendar year.
(2)(a) The governing body of a city or county may adopt an  ordinance or resolution under
which a fee is imposed on a vacant home per year of vacancy.
(b) The fee may give rise to a lien against the vacant home.
(c) The ordinance or resolution  may include additional exemptions and exclusions from
the fee.
(3) The city or county may use fee revenues only for:
(a) Administration of the vacant home fee program; and
(b) Development and construction of housing units affordable to households with an an-
nual income between 80 and 130 percent  of the annual area median income in the city or
county.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4305