Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 271.600 is amended to read:
271.600. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Highway” has the meaning given that term in ORS 366.005.
[(a)] (b) “Indian tribe” has the meaning given that term in ORS 97.740.
[(b)] (c)  “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
[(c)] (d) “Public property” has the meaning given that term in ORS 131.705.
(2) A public body may not use the term “squaw” in the name of a public property  or highway.
(3) When a public body changes a name that contains the term “squaw,” the public body  shall
consider as the replacement name a term or phrase in the language of an Indian tribe.
(4) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply if:
(a) Federal law requires the use of the term “squaw”; or
(b) The highway or public property is a geographic feature that an agency of the United States
names using the term “squaw.”
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3466