Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 315.622 is amended to read:
315.622. (1) A  resident or nonresident individual who is certified as eligible under ORS 442.561
to 442.570 and who is licensed as an emergency medical  services provider under ORS chapter 682
shall be allowed a  credit against the taxes that are otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 if the
Office of Rural Health certifies that the individual provides volunteer emergency  medical services
in a rural  area that comprise at least 20 percent of the total emergency medical services provided
by the individual in the tax year.
(2) The amount of the credit shall equal [ $250] $1,000.
(3) A  nonresident shall be allowed the credit under this section in the proportion provided in
ORS 316.117. If a change in the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from nonresi-
dent to resident  occurs, the credit allowed by this section shall be determined in a manner consist-
ent with ORS 316.117.
(4) As  used in this section, “rural area” means a geographic area that is located at least 25
miles from any city with a population of 30,000 or more.
(5) The Office of Rural Health  shall provide information to the Department of Revenue about
all taxpayers that are eligible for a tax credit under this section, if required by ORS 315.058.
(6) Not later than September 15 of each year, the office shall, in the manner  provided in
ORS 192.245, submit a report on the number of taxpayers eligible for the tax credit described
under this section to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to health
care and to the Emergency Medical  Services Program established in section 2, chapter 32,
Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 2.  Section 66, chapter 832, Oregon Laws 2005, as amended  by section 26, chapter 913,
Oregon Laws 2009, section 16, chapter 750, Oregon  Laws 2013, section 28, chapter 579, Oregon Laws
2019, and section 10, chapter 490, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4254
HB 3380
1
2
3
4
5
Sec. 66.  ORS 315.622 applies to tax credit  certifications issued by the Office of Rural Health
on or after January 1, 2006, and before January 1, [ 2028] 2030.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 315.622 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply  to tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
[2]