Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2020 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 660.002 to
660.210.
SECTION 2. The State of Oregon  or any public body in this state, as defined in ORS
174.109, may not spend public moneys on or for the benefit of  an industry-recognized ap-
prenticeship program described in 84 Federal Register 29970.
SECTION 3. This 2020 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2020
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 246