Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of State Police, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $2,600,000, for  the purpose of funding the Firearms Instant
Check System unit of the department.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 223