Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 329.451, as amended by  section 1, chapter 175, Oregon Laws 2021, section 6,
chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2022,  section 3, chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2023, section 9, chapter 513,
Oregon Laws 2023, and section 2, chapter 4, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a school district or public charter school shall award a high
school diploma to a student who completes the requirements established by  subsection (2) of this
section.
(b) A school  district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to a student who
satisfies the requirements established by subsection  (7) of this section, an extended diploma to a
student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this section or a  certificate
of attendance  to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (9) of this sec-
tion.
(c) A school district  or public charter school may not deny a student who has the documented
history described in subsection (7)(b)  or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) A school district or public charter  school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a high school diploma from a  school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State Board  of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades 9  through 12, must complete at least 24 total
credits, which must include at least:
(A) Three credits of mathematics;
(B) Four credits of language arts; and
(C) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection,  one half-credit of civics.
(b) In lieu of the  credit requirement for civics prescribed by paragraph (a)(C) of this
subsection, a school district or public charter school may require a student to  demonstrate
proficiency in civics by an alternative method identified by  the school district or public
charter school, including:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1659
HB 2908
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) A passing grade on a civics test  selected or developed by the school district or public
charter school; or
(B) The successful completion of academic work that  is equivalent to one-half credit,
regardless of whether the academic work complies with the academic content standards
adopted for civics by the State Board of Education.
[(b)] (c) If a school district or  public charter school requires a student to complete more than
24 total credits, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school  district or public charter
school may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has established  academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses  that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
[(c)(A) ] (d)(A) A school district or public charter  school that requires students to satisfy any
requirements not specified by paragraph (a)  of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of Ed-
ucation  must  grant to a student a waiver of the requirements established by the school district or
public charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under rules adopted by the State  Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board  of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a migrant worker, as determined under rules adopted by  the State Board of Edu-
cation;
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education
Program; or
(vii) Enrolled in an approved recovery school under ORS 336.680.
(B)(i) For any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must accept any credits earned by the student in  an educational program in
this state and apply those credits toward requirements specified by paragraph (a) of  this subsection
or by rule of the State Board of Education if the credits satisfied  those requirements in that edu-
cational program in this state.
(ii) As used in this subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means  an educational
program that is:
(I) Provided by a school district, a public charter school, an approved recovery school, the
Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as  provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care or treatment facility
described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
[(d)(A)] (e)(A) The State Board of Education shall adopt  rules by which a student who has
completed an International Baccalaureate program may satisfy  the credit requirements prescribed
by paragraph (a) of this subsection and any or all of the requirements  established by rule of the
State Board of Education under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The rules:
(i) Must provide that the student has satisfied those requirements if the student has satisfied:
(I) All of the requirements for an International  Baccalaureate Diploma Programme or an Inter-
[2]
HB 2908
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
national Baccalaureate Career-related Programme; and
(II) Any  other requirements prescribed by the board by rule for a student who has completed
an International Baccalaureate program.
(ii) May provide that, only  for the purpose of satisfying requirements as provided by this para-
graph, a person  who is not an external International Baccalaureate examiner may grade assessments
or examinations for either program.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph prohibits a school district or public  charter school from estab-
lishing requirements that  are in addition to the credit requirements prescribed by paragraph (a) of
this subsection or any requirements established by  rule under paragraph (a) of this subsection or
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) When establishing requirements under this paragraph, the board or a school  district or
public charter school shall attempt not to establish requirements that may  discourage access to or
participation in the International Baccalaureate program.
(3) A student  providing work samples to demonstrate proficiency in Essential Learning Skills
as may be required  under subsection (2) of this section must be allowed to use accommodations de-
scribed in the student’s individualized  education program or the student’s plan developed in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation  Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794. As used in this
subsection, the term “accommodations”:
(a) Includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
(B) The ability to demonstrate proficiency in an alternative  location that is secure and
proctored.
(C) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
(b) Does not  include modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used solely
to earn modified credit.
(4) A student may  satisfy the requirements of subsection (2) of this section in less than four
years. If a student satisfies the requirements of subsection (2) of  this section and a school district
or public charter school has received consent as provided by  subsection (6) of this section, the
school district or public charter school shall award a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district  or public charter school has received consent as provided by subsection
(6) of this  section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For  the purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to have  the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years of age  or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4) of
this section, consent must be received  during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school  district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only to students
who have demonstrated  the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
[3]
HB 2908
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for  a modified di-
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the requirements  for a modified diploma established by the State Board of Education;
and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability to  maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning and  instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district or public charter school shall award an extended diploma  only to students
who have demonstrated  the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for  an extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine through completion of high school, complete 12  credits, which may not
include more than six credits earned in a self-contained special education  classroom and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to maintain  grade level achievement due to significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in  grade level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public charter  school shall award a certificate of attendance to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for a  high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if the  student has maintained regular full-time attendance for at least four years beginning
in grade nine and meets requirements established by the board of the school district  or public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to satisfy  the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the age  of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may satisfy  the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent is  provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided under this subsection must be written and must clearly  state that the
parent, guardian or student is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10) of  this section. A
consent may not be  used to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under this subsection  for students in a school district must
[4]
HB 2908
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each school district must provide to the Superintendent of Public  Instruction information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A student  who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an extended diploma
or a certificate of attendance shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a high  school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to  instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours of other services
that are designed to:
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide a total number of hours of  instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of  instructional hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b) A school district may not unilaterally decrease the total number of hours of  instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of the
age of the student.
(c) For purposes  of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services and other services
designed to meet the unique needs of  the student may be provided to the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered into by the school district if the individualized  education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the services may be  provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into an interagency agreement as allowed under this  paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to  the number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An  agency is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency agreement  as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that all students have on-site access to the appropriate resources and  courses to
achieve high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended diplomas at each high school  in the
school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c)(A) Provide to the parents or guardians of a student who has the documented  history de-
scribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section:
(i) Information about the availability of high school diplomas, modified diplomas  and extended
diplomas and the requirements for the diplomas; and
(ii) A disclosure that a student awarded a  certificate of attendance will not be counted as a high
school graduate in any reporting for the state or school district  and that a student awarded a cer-
tificate of attendance may not indicate that the  student received a high school diploma on applica-
tions for employment, military service,  financial aid, admittance to an institution of higher education
or any other purpose.
(B) The information and disclosure required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph  must be
provided annually:
(i) Beginning in grade five; or
(ii) Beginning after a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section  has been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter school shall allow a  student to participate in the high
[5]
HB 2908
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student by  a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high  school diploma, a modified diploma, an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance under this section; and
(B) Has completed basic  training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 329.451, as amended by  section 1, chapter 175, Oregon Laws 2021, section 6,
chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2022,  section 3, chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2023, section 9, chapter 513,
Oregon Laws 2023, section 1, chapter 564, Oregon Laws  2023, and section 3, chapter 4, Oregon Laws
2024, is amended to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a school district or public charter school shall award a high
school diploma to a student who completes the requirements established by  subsection (2) of this
section.
(b) A school  district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to a student who
satisfies the requirements established by subsection  (7) of this section, an extended diploma to a
student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this section or a  certificate
of attendance  to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (9) of this sec-
tion.
(c) A school district  or public charter school may not deny a student who has the documented
history described in subsection (7)(b)  or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) A school district or public charter  school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a high school diploma from a  school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State Board  of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades 9  through 12, must complete at least 24 total
credits, which must include at least:
(A) Three credits of mathematics;
(B) Four credits of language arts;
(C) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection,  one half-credit of civics;
(D) One half-credit of higher education and career path skills; and
(E) One half-credit of personal financial education.
(b) In lieu of the  credit requirement for civics prescribed by paragraph (a)(C) of this
subsection, a school district or public charter school may require a student to  demonstrate
proficiency in civics by an alternative method identified by  the school district or public
charter school, including:
(A) A passing grade on a civics test  selected or developed by the school district or public
charter school; or
(B) The successful completion of academic work that  is equivalent to one-half credit,
regardless of whether the academic work complies with the academic content standards
adopted for civics by the State Board of Education.
[(b)] (c) If a school district or  public charter school requires a student to complete more than
24 total credits, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school  district or public charter
[6]
HB 2908
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has established  academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses  that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
[(c)(A) ] (d)(A) A school district or public charter  school that requires students to satisfy any
requirements not specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of  the State Board of Ed-
ucation must grant to a student a waiver of the requirements established by the school district  or
public charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under rules  adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined  under rules adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a migrant  worker, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Edu-
cation;
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education
Program; or
(vii) Enrolled in an approved recovery school under ORS 336.680.
(B)(i) For any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must accept  any credits earned by the student in an educational program in
this state and apply those credits toward requirements specified by paragraph (a) of  this subsection
or by rule of the State  Board of Education if the credits satisfied those requirements in that edu-
cational program in this state.
(ii) As used  in this subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means an educational
program that is:
(I) Provided by a school district, a public charter school, an approved recovery school, the
Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care or  treatment facility
described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
[(d)] (e) The State Board of Education may  adopt by rule requirements for courses, including
teachers of courses, related to higher education and  career path skills and personal financial edu-
cation that allow the courses to satisfy multiple credit requirements for a high school  diploma, in-
cluding mathematics.
[(e)(A) ] (f)(A) The  State Board of Education shall adopt rules by which a student who has
completed an International Baccalaureate program may satisfy  the credit requirements prescribed
by paragraph (a) of this subsection and any or all of the requirements  established by rule of the
State Board of Education under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The rules:
(i) Must provide that the student has satisfied those requirements if the student has satisfied:
(I) All of the requirements for an International  Baccalaureate Diploma Programme or an Inter-
national Baccalaureate Career-related Programme; and
(II) Any  other requirements prescribed by the board by rule for a student who has completed
an International Baccalaureate program.
[7]
HB 2908
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) May provide that, only  for the purpose of satisfying requirements as provided by this para-
graph, a person  who is not an external International Baccalaureate examiner may grade assessments
or examinations for either program.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph prohibits a school district or public  charter school from estab-
lishing requirements that  are in addition to the credit requirements prescribed by paragraph (a) of
this subsection or any requirements established by  rule under paragraph (a) of this subsection or
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) When establishing  requirements under this paragraph, the board or a school district or
public charter school shall attempt  not to establish requirements that may discourage access to or
participation in the International Baccalaureate program.
(3) A student providing work samples to demonstrate proficiency in Essential  Learning Skills
as may be required under subsection (2) of this section must be allowed to  use accommodations de-
scribed in the student’s individualized education program or the student’s  plan developed in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29  U.S.C. 794. As used in this
subsection, the term “accommodations”:
(a) Includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
(B) The ability to demonstrate proficiency in an alternative  location that is secure and
proctored.
(C) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
(b) Does not  include modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used solely
to earn modified credit.
(4) A student may  satisfy the requirements of subsection (2) of this section in less than four
years. If a student satisfies the requirements of subsection (2) of  this section and a school district
or public charter school has received consent as provided by  subsection (6) of this section, the
school district or public charter school shall award a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district  or public charter school has received consent as provided by subsection
(6) of this  section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For  the purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to have  the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years of age  or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4) of
this section, consent must be received  during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school  district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only to students
who have demonstrated  the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for  a modified di-
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the requirements  for a modified diploma established by the State Board of Education;
[8]
HB 2908
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability to  maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning and  instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district or public charter school shall award an extended diploma  only to students
who have demonstrated  the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for  an extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine through completion of high school, complete 12  credits, which may not
include more than six credits earned in a self-contained special education  classroom and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to maintain  grade level achievement due to significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in  grade level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public charter  school shall award a certificate of attendance to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for a  high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if the  student has maintained regular full-time attendance for at least four years beginning
in grade nine and meets requirements established by the board of the school district  or public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to satisfy  the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the age  of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may satisfy  the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent is  provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided under this subsection must be written and must clearly  state that the
parent, guardian or student is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10) of  this section. A
consent may not be  used to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under this subsection  for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each school district must provide to the Superintendent of Public  Instruction information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
[9]
HB 2908
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(12)(a) A student  who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an extended diploma
or a certificate of attendance shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a high  school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours  of other services
that are designed to:
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide a  total number of hours of instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of  instructional hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b) A school district may not unilaterally decrease the total number of hours of  instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of the
age of the student.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services and  other services
designed to meet the unique needs of the student may be provided  to the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered into  by the school district if the individualized education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the  services may be provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into an  interagency agreement as allowed under this paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to  the number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An agency  is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency agreement  as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that  all students have on-site access to the appropriate resources and courses to
achieve high school  diplomas, modified diplomas and extended diplomas at each high school in the
school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c)(A) Provide to  the parents or guardians of a student who has the documented history de-
scribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section:
(i) Information about  the availability of high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended
diplomas and the requirements for the diplomas; and
(ii) A disclosure that a student awarded a  certificate of attendance will not be counted as a high
school graduate in any reporting for the state  or school district and that a student awarded a cer-
tificate of attendance may not indicate that the student  received a high school diploma on applica-
tions for employment, military service,  financial aid, admittance to an institution of higher education
or any other purpose.
(B) The information  and disclosure required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph must be
provided  annually:
(i) Beginning in grade five; or
(ii) Beginning after  a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section has been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter  school shall allow a student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student by  a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
[10]
HB 2908
1
2
3
4
5
6
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high school diploma, a modified diploma,  an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance under this section; and
(B) Has completed basic  training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
[11]