Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 10, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by  section 1, chapter 399,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  Sections 3 and 8, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021, apply to  tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, [ 2026] 2028.
SECTION 2.  Section 12, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by  section 2, chapter 399,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 12.  The repeal of sections  3 and 8, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021, by section 11, chapter
589, Oregon Laws 2021, applies to any tax year that begins on or after January 1, 2022,  and before
January 1, [ 2026] 2028, and to which section 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code is not applicable.
SECTION 3.  Section 16, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2022, as amended by section 5,  chapter 52,
Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 16.  (1) The amendments to ORS 284.368 by section 1, chapter 82, Oregon  Laws 2022, apply
to fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2022.
(2) The amendments to sections 3  and 5, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021, by sections 3 and 4,
chapter 82, Oregon Laws  2022, apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, [ and before
January 1, 2026, ] and to estimated payments due on and after June 15, 2022.
(3) The amendments to section 2, chapter 527, Oregon Laws  2021, by section 8, chapter 82,
Oregon Laws 2022, apply to applications for precertification under section 4, chapter 527,  Oregon
Laws 2021, and applications for exemption under section  5, chapter 527, Oregon Laws 2021, without
precertification, filed on or after June 3, 2022.
(4) Section 10, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2022, applies to  tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2022, and before January 1, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3637
SB 111
1
2
3
4
5
6
(5) Sections 13 and 15, chapter 82, Oregon  Laws 2022, apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2029, and to any  tax year to which a net operating loss
arising in those tax years is carried back.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]