Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
RECRIMINALIZING DRUG POSSESSION
(Restoring Misdemeanor and Felony Penalties)
SECTION 1.
 ORS 475.752 is amended to read:
475.752. (1) Except as authorized by ORS 475.005 to 475.285  and 475.752 to 475.980, it is unlawful
for any person to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance. Any person who  violates this sub-
section with respect to:
(a) A  controlled substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class A felony, except as otherwise pro-
vided in ORS 475.886 and 475.890.
(b) A controlled substance in  Schedule II, is guilty of a Class B felony, except as otherwise
provided in ORS 475.878, 475.880, 475.882, 475.904 and 475.906.
(c) A  controlled substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class C felony, except as otherwise
provided in ORS 475.904 and 475.906.
(d) A controlled substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 204
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) A controlled substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(2) Except as authorized in ORS 475.005  to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, it is unlawful for any
person to create or deliver a counterfeit substance. Any person who violates this subsection with
respect to:
(a) A counterfeit substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class A felony.
(b) A counterfeit substance in Schedule II, is guilty of a Class B felony.
(c) A counterfeit substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class C felony.
(d) A counterfeit substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(e) A counterfeit substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(3) It is unlawful for any person  knowingly or intentionally to possess a controlled substance
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of,  a
practitioner while acting in the course of professional practice, or except as  otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980. Any person who  violates this subsection with re-
spect to:
(a) A controlled substance in Schedule  I, is guilty of a [Class E violation] Class A
misdemeanor, except as otherwise provided in  ORS 475.854, 475.874 and 475.894 [and] or subsection
(7) of this section.
(b) A controlled substance in Schedule II, is guilty of a  [ Class E violation ] Class A
misdemeanor, except as otherwise provided in ORS 475.814,  475.824, 475.834 or 475.884 or sub-
section (8) of this section.
(c) A controlled substance in Schedule III,  is guilty of a [ Class E violation ] Class A
misdemeanor.
(d) A controlled substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a [ Class E violation ] Class C
misdemeanor.
(e) A controlled substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a violation.
(4) It is an affirmative defense in any prosecution under this section for  manufacture, possession
or delivery  of the plant of the genus Lophophora commonly known as peyote that the peyote is being
used or is intended for use:
(a) In connection with the good faith practice of a religious belief;
(b) As directly associated with a religious practice; and
(c) In a manner that is  not dangerous to the health of the user or others who are in the prox-
imity of the user.
(5) The  affirmative defense created in subsection (4) of this section is not available to any person
who has possessed  or delivered the peyote while incarcerated in a correctional facility in this state.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a person  who unlawfully manufactures or
delivers a controlled substance in Schedule IV and who thereby causes death to another person is
guilty of a Class C felony.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, causation is established when the controlled  substance plays
a substantial role in the death of the other person.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section[ :],
[(a)] unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule I is a [ Class A  misdemeanor ]
Class B felony  if :
(a) The person possesses  a usuable quantity of the controlled substance and:
(A) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(B) At the time of the  possession, the person has two or more prior convictions for un-
[2]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(C) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(b) The person possesses :
(A) Forty or more user units of a  mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
lysergic acid diethylamide; or
(B) Twelve grams or more of a  mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
psilocybin or psilocin.
[(b) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule I is a Class B felony if: ]
[(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or ]
[(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b). ]
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(b) of this section[ :],
[(a)] unlawful  possession of a controlled substance in Schedule II is a [ Class A misdemeanor ]
Class C felony  if :
(a) The person possesses a usuable quantity of the controlled substance and:
(A) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(B) At the time of the  possession, the person has two or more prior convictions for un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(C) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(b) The person  possesses  one gram or more or five or more user units of a mixture or sub-
stance containing a detectable amount of fentanyl, or any  substituted derivative of fentanyl as de-
fined by the rules of the State Board of Pharmacy.
[(b) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule II is a Class C felony if: ]
[(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or ]
[(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b). ]
SECTION 2.
 ORS 475.814 is amended to read:
475.814. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess hydrocodone un-
less the hydrocodone was obtained directly from, or pursuant to a valid  prescription or order of, a
practitioner while acting  in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)[(a)] Unlawful possession of hydrocodone is a [ Class E violation ] Class A misdemeanor .
[(b) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of hydrocodone is a
Class A misdemeanor if: ]
[(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or ]
[(B) The person possesses 40 or more  pills, tablets, capsules or user units of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of hydrocodone. ]
SECTION 3.  ORS 475.824 is amended to read:
475.824. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally  to possess methadone unless
the methadone was obtained directly from, or pursuant to a valid prescription  or order of, a prac-
titioner while acting in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized  by
ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of methadone is a [ Class E violation ] Class A misdemeanor .
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of methadone is a Class
A misdemeanor if the person possesses 40 or more user units of a mixture or  substance containing a
detectable amount of methadone. ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b)  of this subsection, unlawful possession of methadone
[3]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
is a Class C felony if the possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b). ]
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of methadone
is a Class C felony if:
(A) The person possesses a usable quantity of methadone and:
(i) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(ii) At the time of the possession, the person has two or more prior convictions for  un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(iii) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses 40 or more  user units of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of methadone.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 475.834 is amended to read:
475.834. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess oxycodone unless
the oxycodone was obtained directly from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order  of, a practi-
tioner  while  acting in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by ORS
475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of oxycodone is a [ Class E violation ] Class A misdemeanor .
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this  subsection, unlawful possession of oxycodone is a Class
A misdemeanor if the person possesses 40 or more pills, tablets, capsules or user units of a mixture
or substance containing a detectable amount of oxycodone. ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs  (a) and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession of oxycodone
is a Class C felony if the possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b). ]
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession  of oxycodone
is a Class C felony if:
(A) The person possesses a usable quantity of oxycodone and:
(i) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(ii) At  the time of the possession, the person has two or more prior convictions for un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(iii) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses 40 or more pills,  tablets, capsules or user units of a mixture
or substance containing a detectable amount of oxycodone.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 475.854 is amended to read:
475.854. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess heroin.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of heroin is a [ Class E violation ] Class A misdemeanor .
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this  subsection, unlawful possession of heroin is a Class A
misdemeanor if the person possesses one gram or more of a mixture  or substance containing a detect-
able amount of heroin. ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and  (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession of heroin is a
Class B felony if: ]
[(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or ]
[(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b). ]
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful  possession of heroin is a
Class B felony if:
(A) The person possesses a usable quantity of heroin and:
(i) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(ii) At  the time of the possession, the person has two or more prior convictions for un-
[4]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(iii) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses  one gram or more of a mixture or substance containing a de-
tectable amount of heroin.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 475.874 is amended to read:
475.874. (1) It  is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine  is a [ Class E violation ] Class
A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession  of
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a [ Class A misdemeanor ] Class B felony  if :
(A) The person possesses a usable quantity of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine and:
(i) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(ii) At  the time of the possession, the person has two or more prior convictions for un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(iii) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses one gram or more or five or more pills, tablets  or capsules of a mix-
ture or substance containing a detectable amount of:
[(A)] (i) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
[(B)] (ii) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
[(C)] (iii) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this  subsection, unlawful possession of
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a Class B felony if: ]
[(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or ]
[(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b). ]
SECTION 7.
 ORS 475.884 is amended to read:
475.884. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess cocaine unless
the substance was obtained  directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practi-
tioner  while  acting in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by ORS
475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of cocaine is a [ Class E violation ] Class A misdemeanor .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  unlawful possession of cocaine is a [ Class
A misdemeanor ] Class C felony  if :
(A) The person possesses a usable quantity of cocaine and:
(i) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(ii) At  the time of the possession, the person has two or more prior convictions for un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(iii) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses two grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a  detectable
amount of cocaine.
[(c) Notwithstanding  paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession of cocaine is
a Class C felony if: ]
[(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or ]
[(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b). ]
SECTION 8.
 ORS 475.894 is amended to read:
[5]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
475.894. (1) It is unlawful for  any person knowingly or intentionally to possess methamphetamine
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of  a
practitioner while acting in the course of professional practice, or except as  otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine is a [ Class E violation ] Class A misdemeanor .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of  methamphetamine
is a [ Class A misdemeanor ] Class C felony  if :
(A) The person possesses a usable quantity of methamphetamine and:
(i) At the time of the possession, the person has a prior felony conviction;
(ii) At the time of the possession, the person has two or more prior convictions for  un-
lawful possession of a usable quantity of a controlled substance; or
(iii) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses two grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a  detectable
amount of methamphetamine.
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession  of metham-
phetamine is a Class C felony if: ]
[(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or ]
[(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b). ]
SECTION 9.
 ORS 475.900 is amended to read:
475.900. (1) A  violation of ORS 475.752, 475.806 to 475.894, 475.904 or 475.906 shall be classified
as crime category 8 of the sentencing  guidelines grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission if:
(a) The violation constitutes delivery or manufacture of a  controlled substance and involves
substantial quantities of  a controlled substance. For purposes of this paragraph, the following
amounts constitute substantial quantities of the following controlled substances:
(A) Five grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;
(B) Five grams or  more or 25 or more user units of a mixture or substance containing a de-
tectable amount of  fentanyl, or any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules of the
State Board of Pharmacy;
(C) Ten grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;
(D) Ten grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable  amount of metham-
phetamine, its salts, isomers or salts of its isomers;
(E) Two hundred or more user units of a mixture or substance  containing a detectable amount
of lysergic acid diethylamide;
(F) Sixty grams or more of a mixture or  substance containing a detectable amount of psilocybin
or psilocin; or
(G) Five grams or  more or 25 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or substance con-
taining a detectable amount of:
(i) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
(ii) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(iii) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
(b) The violation constitutes possession, delivery or manufacture of a controlled substance and
the possession,  delivery or manufacture is a commercial drug offense. A possession, delivery or
manufacture is  a commercial drug offense for purposes of this subsection if it is accompanied by at
least three of the following factors:
(A) The delivery was of heroin, fentanyl, cocaine, methamphetamine,  lysergic acid diethylamide,
[6]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
psilocybin or psilocin and was for consideration;
(B) The offender was in possession of $300 or more in cash;
(C) The offender was unlawfully in possession of a firearm or other weapon as described in ORS
166.270 (2), or the offender used, attempted to use or threatened to use a deadly or  dangerous
weapon as defined in ORS 161.015, or the offender was in possession of a  firearm or other deadly
or dangerous weapon as defined  in ORS 161.015 for the purpose of using it in connection with a
controlled substance offense;
(D) The offender was in  possession of materials being used for the packaging of controlled sub-
stances such as scales, wrapping or foil, other than  the material being used to contain the substance
that is the subject of the offense;
(E) The offender was in possession of drug transaction records or customer lists;
(F) The offender was in possession of stolen property;
(G) Modification  of structures by painting, wiring, plumbing or lighting to facilitate a controlled
substance  offense;
(H) The offender was in  possession of manufacturing paraphernalia, including recipes, precursor
chemicals, laboratory equipment, lighting, ventilating or power generating equipment;
(I) The offender was using public lands for the manufacture of controlled substances;
(J) The offender had constructed  fortifications or had taken security measures with the potential
of injuring persons; or
(K) The offender was in possession of controlled substances in an amount greater than:
(i) Three grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;
(ii) Three grams or more or 15 or more user units of a mixture  or substance containing a de-
tectable amount of fentanyl, or any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules  of the
State Board of Pharmacy;
(iii) Eight grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;
(iv) Eight grams or more of a  mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of metham-
phetamine;
(v) Twenty or more user units of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount  of
lysergic acid diethylamide;
(vi) Ten grams or more of  a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of psilocybin
or psilocin; or
(vii) Four grams or more or 20 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of:
(I) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
(II) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(III) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
(c) The violation constitutes a violation of  ORS 475.848, 475.852, 475.868, 475.872, 475.878,
475.882, 475.888, 475.892 or 475.904.
(d) The violation constitutes manufacturing methamphetamine and the  manufacturing consists
of:
(A) A chemical reaction involving one or more precursor substances for the  purpose of manu-
facturing methamphetamine; or
(B) Grinding, soaking or otherwise  breaking down a precursor substance for the purpose of
manufacturing methamphetamine.
(e) The violation  constitutes a violation of ORS 475.906 (1) or (2) that is not described in ORS
[7]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
475.907.
(2) A violation of  ORS 475.752 or 475.806 to 475.894 shall be classified as crime category 6 of
the sentencing guidelines grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission if:
(a) The violation constitutes delivery of heroin, cocaine, fentanyl, methamphetamine  or
3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine, 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine or
3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine and is for consideration.
(b) The violation constitutes possession of substantial quantities of a controlled substance. For
purposes of this paragraph, the following amounts  constitute substantial quantities of the following
controlled  substances:
(A) Five grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;
(B) Five grams or more or 25 or more user units of a mixture or substance  containing a de-
tectable amount of fentanyl, or any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules  of the
State Board of Pharmacy;
(C) Ten grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;
(D) Ten grams or  more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of metham-
phetamine;
(E) Two hundred or more  user units of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount
of lysergic acid diethylamide;
(F) Sixty grams or more of a mixture or  substance containing a detectable amount of psilocybin
or psilocin; or
(G) Five grams or more or 25 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture  or substance con-
taining a detectable amount of:
(i) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
(ii) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(iii) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
(3) Any felony violation of ORS 475.752 or 475.806 to 475.894 not contained in  subsection (1) or
(2) of this section shall be classified as :
(a) Crime category 4 of the sentencing  guidelines grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commis-
sion if the violation involves delivery or manufacture of a controlled substance ; or
(b) Crime  category 1 of the sentencing guidelines grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission if the violation involves possession of a controlled substance .
(4) In order to prove a commercial drug offense, the state shall  plead in the accusatory instru-
ment sufficient factors of a commercial drug offense  under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
The state has the burden of proving each factor beyond a reasonable doubt.
(5) As used in this section, “mixture or substance”  means any mixture or substance, whether
or not the mixture or substance is in an ingestible or marketable form at the time of the offense.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 161.570 is amended to read:
161.570. (1) As used in this section, “nonperson felony” has the meaning  given that term in the
rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(2) A district attorney may elect to treat a Class C nonperson  felony or a violation of ORS
475.752 [(7)(b)] (7) , 475.854 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b)  or 475.874 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b)  as a Class A misdemeanor. The
election must be  made by the district attorney orally or in writing at the time of the first appear-
ance of the defendant. If a district attorney elects to treat a Class C felony or a  violation of ORS
475.752 [(7)(b)] (7), 475.854 [(2)(c)] (2)(b) or 475.874 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b) as a Class A misdemeanor under this
subsection, the court shall  amend the accusatory instrument to reflect the charged offense as a
[8]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Class A misdemeanor.
(3) If, at some time after the first appearance of a defendant charged with a Class C nonperson
felony or a violation of ORS 475.752 [ (7)(b)] (7) , 475.854 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b)  or 475.874  [ (2)(c)] (2)(b) , the
district attorney and the defendant agree to treat the charged offense as a Class A misdemeanor,
the court  may allow the offense to be treated as a Class A misdemeanor by stipulation of the parties.
(4) If a Class C felony or a violation of ORS 475.752 [ (7)(b)] (7), 475.854 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b) or  475.874
[(2)(c)] (2)(b)  is treated as a  Class A misdemeanor under this section, the court shall clearly de-
nominate the offense as a Class A misdemeanor in any judgment entered in the matter.
(5) If no election or stipulation is made under this section, the case proceeds as a felony.
(6) Before a district attorney may make an election under subsection  (2) of this section, the
district attorney shall adopt written guidelines  for determining when and under what circumstances
the election may be made. The district attorney shall apply the guidelines uniformly.
(7) Notwithstanding ORS 161.635,  the fine that a court may impose upon conviction of a
misdemeanor under this section may not:
(a) Be less than the minimum fine established by ORS 137.286 for a felony; or
(b) Exceed the amount provided in ORS 161.625 for the class of felony  receiving Class A
misdemeanor treatment.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 423.478 is amended to read:
423.478. (1) The Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Operate prisons for offenders sentenced to terms of incarceration for more than 12 months;
(b) Provide central information and data services sufficient to:
(A) Allow tracking of offenders; and
(B) Permit analysis of  correlations between sanctions, supervision, services and programs, and
future criminal conduct; and
(c) Provide interstate compact administration and jail inspections.
(2) Subject  to ORS 423.483, each county, in partnership with the department, shall assume re-
sponsibility for community-based supervision, sanctions and services  for offenders convicted of felo-
nies, designated drug-related misdemeanors or designated person misdemeanors who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after January  1, 1997, by a court or the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision to 12 months or less incarceration for violation of a condition  of parole, pro-
bation or post-prison supervision; or
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(3) Notwithstanding the  fact that the court has sentenced a person to a term of incarceration,
when an offender is committed to the custody of the supervisory authority of a county  under ORS
137.124 (2) or (4),  the supervisory authority may execute the sentence by imposing sanctions other
than incarceration if deemed appropriate by  the supervisory authority. If the supervisory authority
releases a person from custody under this subsection and the  person is required to report as a sex
offender under ORS  163A.010, the supervisory authority, as a condition of release, shall order the
person to report to the Department of State Police, a city police department or a  county sheriff’s
office or to the supervising agency, if any:
(a) When the person is released;
[9]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Within 10 days of a change of residence;
(c) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s birth date;
(d) Within 10 days of the first  day the person works at, carries on a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(e) Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or attendance  status at an institution of higher
education.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Attends,” “institution  of higher education,” “works” and “carries on a vocation” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” means:
(A) Unlawful possession of [ fentanyl under ] a controlled substance constituting a Class  A
misdemeanor under ORS 475.752 [ (8)(a)];
(B) Unlawful possession of methadone under ORS 475.824 [ (2)(b)] (2)(a);
(C) Unlawful possession of oxycodone under ORS 475.834 [ (2)(b)] (2)(a);
(D) Unlawful possession of heroin under ORS 475.854 [ (2)(b)] (2)(a);
(E) Unlawful possession  of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine under ORS 475.874 [(2)(b)]
(2)(a);
(F) Unlawful possession of cocaine under ORS 475.884 [ (2)(b)] (2)(a) ; or
(G) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine under ORS 475.894 [ (2)(b)] (2)(a).
(c) “Designated person misdemeanor” means:
(A) Assault in the fourth degree constituting domestic violence if the judgment document  is as
described in ORS 163.160 (4);
(B) Menacing constituting  domestic violence if the judgment document is as described in ORS
163.190 (3); or
(C) Sexual abuse in the third degree under ORS 163.415.
(Repealing Class E Violation Provisions)
SECTION 12.
 ORS 51.050 is amended to read:
51.050. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, in  addition to the criminal jurisdiction
of justice courts already conferred upon and exercised by them,  justice courts have jurisdiction of
all offenses committed or triable in their respective counties. The jurisdiction conveyed by  this
section is concurrent with any jurisdiction that may be exercised by a  circuit court or municipal
court.
(2) In any justice court that has not become a court of record under  ORS 51.025, a defendant
charged with a misdemeanor shall be notified immediately after entering a plea of not guilty  of the
right of the defendant to have the  matter transferred to the circuit court for the county where the
justice court is located. The election shall be made within 10 days  after the plea of not guilty is
entered, and the justice shall immediately transfer the case to the appropriate court.
(3) A justice court does not  have jurisdiction over the trial of any felony or a designated drug-
related misdemeanor as defined  in ORS 423.478. [ A justice court does not have jurisdiction over Class
E violations. ] Except as provided in ORS 51.037, a justice court does not have jurisdiction over  of-
fenses created by the charter or ordinance of any city.
SECTION 13.  ORS 137.300 is amended to read:
137.300. (1) The Criminal Fine Account is established in the General Fund.  Except as otherwise
[10]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
provided by law, all amounts collected in state courts as monetary  obligations in criminal actions
shall be deposited by the courts in the account. All moneys  in the account are continuously appro-
priated to the Department of Revenue to be distributed by the  Department of Revenue as provided
in this section. The Department of Revenue shall keep a record of moneys  transferred into and out
of the account.
(2) The Legislative Assembly  shall first allocate moneys from the Criminal Fine Account for the
following purposes, in the following order of priority:
(a) Allocations for public safety standards, training and facilities.
(b) Allocations for criminal injuries compensation and assistance to victims of crime and chil-
dren reasonably suspected of being victims of crime.
(c) Allocations for the forensic services provided by the Oregon State Police, including, but  not
limited to, services of the Chief Medical Examiner.
(d) Allocations for the maintenance and operation of the Law Enforcement Data System.
(3) After making allocations under subsection (2) of this section, the Legislative Assembly  shall
allocate moneys from the Criminal Fine Account for the following purposes:
(a) Allocations to the Law Enforcement Medical Liability Account  established under ORS
414.815.
(b) Allocations to the State Court Facilities and Security Account established under ORS  1.178.
(c) Allocations to the Department of Corrections for the  purpose of planning, operating and
maintaining county juvenile  and adult corrections programs and facilities and drug and alcohol
programs.
(d) Allocations to the Oregon Health Authority  for the purpose of grants under ORS 430.345 for
the establishment, operation and maintenance of alcohol and drug abuse  prevention, early inter-
vention and treatment services provided through a county.
(e) Allocations to the Oregon State Police for the purpose of the enforcement of the laws relat-
ing to driving under the influence of intoxicants.
(f) Allocations to the Arrest and Return Account established under ORS 133.865.
(g) Allocations to the Intoxicated Driver Program Fund established under ORS 813.270.
(h) Allocations to the State Court Technology Fund established under ORS 1.012.
[(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the Legislative Assembly  shall allocate
all moneys deposited into the Criminal Fine Account as payment  of fines on Class E violations to the
Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund established under ORS 430.384. ]
[(5)] (4)  It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that allocations from the Criminal Fine
Account  under  subsection (3) of this section be consistent with historical funding of the entities,
programs and accounts listed in subsection (3) of this section from monetary obligations imposed  in
criminal proceedings. Amounts that  are allocated under subsection (3)(c) of this section shall be
distributed to counties based on  the amounts that were transferred to counties by circuit courts
during the 2009-2011 biennium under the provisions of ORS 137.308, as in effect January 1, 2011.
[(6)] (5)  Moneys in the Criminal Fine Account may not be allocated for the payment  of debt
service obligations.
[(7)] (6)  The  Department of Revenue shall deposit in the General Fund all moneys remaining in
the Criminal Fine Account after the distributions listed in subsections (2)[ ,] and (3) [ and (4)] of this
section have been made.
[(8)] (7) The Department of Revenue shall establish by rule  a process for distributing moneys in
the Criminal Fine  Account. The department may not distribute more than one-eighth of the total
[11]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
biennial allocation to an entity during a calendar quarter.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 153.012 is amended to read:
153.012. Violations are classified for the purpose of sentencing into the following categories:
(1) Class A violations.
(2) Class B violations.
(3) Class C violations.
(4) Class D violations.
[(5) Class E violations. ]
[(6)] (5) Unclassified violations as described in ORS 153.015.
[(7)] (6) Specific fine violations as described in ORS 153.015.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 153.018 is amended to read:
153.018. (1) The penalty for committing  a violation is a fine. The law creating a violation may
impose other penalties in addition to a fine but may not impose a term of imprisonment.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, the maximum  fine for a violation committed by an in-
dividual is:
(a) $2,000 for a Class A violation.
(b) $1,000 for a Class B violation.
(c) $500 for a Class C violation.
(d) $250 for a Class D violation.
[(e) $100 for a Class E violation. ]
[(f)] (e) $2,000 for a specific fine violation, or the maximum amount  otherwise established by law
for the specific fine violation.
(3) If  a special corporate fine is specified in the law creating the violation, the sentence to pay
a fine shall be governed by the  law creating the violation. Except as otherwise provided by law, if
a special corporate fine is not specified in the law creating the violation,  the maximum fine for a
violation committed by a corporation is:
(a) $4,000 for a Class A violation.
(b) $2,000 for a Class B violation.
(c) $1,000 for a Class C violation.
(d) $500 for a Class D violation.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 153.019 is amended to read:
153.019. (1) Except as provided  in ORS 153.020, [ 153.062 and 430.391,] the presumptive fines for
violations  are:
(a) $440 for a Class A violation.
(b) $265 for a Class B violation.
(c) $165 for a Class C violation.
(d) $115 for a Class D violation.
[(e) $100 for a Class E violation. ]
(2) The presumptive fine for a specific fine violation is:
(a) The amount specified by statute as the presumptive fine for the violation; or
(b) An amount equal to the greater of 20 percent of the maximum fine prescribed for  the vio-
lation, or the minimum fine prescribed by statute for the violation.
(3) Any surcharge imposed under ORS 1.188 shall be added to and made a part  of the
presumptive fine.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 153.021 is amended to read:
[12]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
153.021. (1) Unless a specific minimum fine is prescribed for a violation, and  except as otherwise
provided by law, the minimum fine a court shall impose for a violation that is subject to  the
presumptive fines established by ORS 153.019 (1) or 153.020 are as follows:
(a) $225 for a Class A violation.
(b) $135 for a Class B violation.
(c) $85 for a Class C violation.
(d) $65 for a Class D violation.
[(e) $45 for a Class E violation. ]
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a court may waive  payment of the minimum
fine described in this section, in whole or in part, if the court determines that requiring payment
of the minimum fine would be  inconsistent with justice in the case. In making its determination
under this subsection, the court shall consider:
(a) The financial  resources of the defendant and the burden that payment of the minimum fine
would impose, with due regard to the other obligations of the defendant; and
(b) The extent to which that burden could be alleviated by allowing the defendant to pay the
fine in installments or subject to other conditions set by the court.
(3) This section does  not affect the manner in which a court imposes or reduces monetary obli-
gations other than fines.
(4) The Department  of Revenue or Secretary of State may audit any court to determine whether
the court is complying with the requirements  of this section. In addition, the Department of Revenue
or Secretary of State may audit any court to determine whether  the court is complying with the
requirements of ORS 137.145 to 137.159 and 153.640 to 153.680. The  Department of Revenue or Sec-
retary of State may file an action under ORS 34.105 to 34.240 to enforce the requirements  of this
section and of ORS 137.145 to 137.159 and 153.640 to 153.680.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 153.064 is amended to read:
153.064. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a warrant for arrest may  be is-
sued against a person who  fails to make a first appearance on a citation for a violation, or fails to
appear at any other subsequent time set for  trial or other appearance, only if the person is charged
with failure to appear in a violation proceeding under ORS 153.992.
(2) If a person fails to make a first appearance on a citation for a  violation [ other than a Class
E violation ], or fails to appear at any other subsequent time set for  trial or other appearance on a
violation [ other than a Class E violation ], the court may issue an order that requires the defendant
to appear and show cause why the defendant should not be held in  contempt. The show cause order
may be mailed to the defendant by  certified mail, return receipt requested. If service cannot be ac-
complished by mail, the defendant must be personally served. If the defendant is served and  fails to
appear at the time specified in the show cause order,  the court may issue an arrest warrant for the
defendant for the purpose of bringing the defendant before the court.
SECTION 19.  ORS 153.992 is amended to read:
153.992. (1) A person commits the offense of failure to appear in a violation proceeding if the
person has been served with a citation issued under this chapter for a violation [ other than a  Class
E violation ] and the person knowingly fails to do any of the following:
(a) Make a first appearance in the manner required by ORS 153.061 within the time allowed.
(b) Make appearance at the time set for trial in the violation proceeding.
(c) Appear at any other time required by the court or by law.
(2) Failure to appear on a violation citation is a Class A misdemeanor.
[13]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 20.
 ORS 221.339 is amended to read:
221.339. (1) A municipal court has concurrent jurisdiction with circuit courts  and justice courts
over all violations committed or triable in the city where the court is located.
(2) Except  as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, municipal courts have concur-
rent jurisdiction with circuit  courts and justice courts over misdemeanors committed or triable in
the city. Municipal  courts may exercise the jurisdiction conveyed by this section without a charter
provision or ordinance authorizing that exercise.
(3) Municipal courts have no jurisdiction over felonies[ ,] or  designated  drug-related
misdemeanors as defined in ORS 423.478 [ or Class E violations ].
(4) A city may limit the exercise of  jurisdiction over misdemeanors by a municipal court under
this section by the adoption of a charter provision or ordinance, except that municipal  courts must
retain concurrent jurisdiction with circuit courts over:
(a) Misdemeanors created by the city’s own charter or by ordinances  adopted by the city, as
provided in ORS 3.132; and
(b) Traffic crimes as defined by ORS 801.545.
(5) Subject to the powers and duties of the Attorney General  under ORS 180.060, the city at-
torney has authority to prosecute a violation of any offense created by statute that is subject to the
jurisdiction of a municipal court, including any  appeal, if the offense is committed or triable in the
city. The prosecution shall be in the name of the state. The city attorney shall have all powers  of
a district attorney in prosecutions under this subsection.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 419C.370 is amended to read:
419C.370. (1) The juvenile court may enter an order directing that all cases involving:
(a) Violation of a law  or ordinance relating to the use or operation of a motor vehicle, boating
laws or game laws be waived to criminal or municipal court;
(b) An offense classified as a violation [ other than a Class E  violation ] under the laws of this
state or a political subdivision of this state be waived to  municipal court if the municipal court has
agreed to accept jurisdiction; and
(c) A misdemeanor  that entails theft, destruction, tampering with or vandalism of property be
waived to municipal court if the municipal court has agreed to accept jurisdiction.
(2) Cases waived under subsection (1) of this section are subject to the following:
(a) That the criminal or municipal court prior to hearing a  case, other than a case involving a
parking violation, in which the defendant is or appears to be under 18 years of age notify the juve-
nile court of that fact; and
(b) That the juvenile court may direct that any such case be waived to  the juvenile court for
further proceedings.
(3)(a) When a person  who has been waived under subsection (1)(c) of this section is convicted
of a property offense, the municipal court may  impose any sanction authorized for the offense except
for incarceration. The municipal court shall notify the juvenile court of the disposition of the case.
(b) When a person has been waived under  subsection (1) of this section and fails to appear as
summoned or is placed on probation and is alleged to have violated  a condition of the probation, the
juvenile court may recall the case to the juvenile court for further  proceedings. When a person has
been returned to juvenile court under this paragraph,  the juvenile court may proceed as though the
person had failed to  appear as summoned to the juvenile court or had violated a juvenile court
probation order under ORS 419C.446.
(4) Records of cases waived under subsection (1)(c) of this  section are juvenile records for pur-
[14]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
poses of expunction under ORS 419A.260 to 419A.271.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 475.235 is amended to read:
475.235. (1) It is not necessary for the state to negate any exemption or exception  in ORS
475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980 in any complaint, information,  indictment or other pleading
or in  any trial, hearing or other proceeding under ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
The burden of proof of any exemption or exception is upon the person claiming it.
(2) In the absence of  proof that a person is the duly authorized holder of an appropriate regis-
tration or order form issued under ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980,  the person is
presumed not to be the holder of the registration or form. The burden of proof is upon  the person
to rebut the presumption.
(3)(a) When  a controlled substance is at issue in a criminal proceeding before a grand jury, at
a preliminary hearing, in a proceeding on a district  attorney’s information[ , during a proceeding on
a Class E violation ] or for purposes of an early disposition program, it is prima facie evidence  of the
identity of the controlled substance if:
(A) A  sample of the controlled substance is tested using a presumptive test for controlled sub-
stances;
(B) The test is conducted by  a law enforcement officer trained to use the test or by a forensic
scientist;  and
(C) The test is positive for the particular controlled substance.
(b) When the identity of a controlled substance is  established using a presumptive test for pur-
poses of a criminal proceeding before a grand jury, a preliminary hearing, a  proceeding on a district
attorney’s information or an early disposition program, the defendant, upon notice to the district
attorney, may request that the controlled  substance be sent to a state police forensic laboratory for
analysis. [ The defendant  may not make a request under this paragraph concerning a controlled sub-
stance at issue in a proceeding on a Class E violation. ]
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, in all prosecutions in which an analysis of a
controlled substance or sample  was conducted, a certified copy of the analytical report signed by
the director of a state police forensic laboratory or the analyst or forensic scientist conducting the
analysis shall be admitted as prima facie evidence of the results of the  analytical findings unless the
defendant has provided notice of an objection in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.
(5) If the defendant intends to object at trial  to the admission of a certified copy of an analytical
report as provided in subsection (4) of this section, not less than 15 days prior  to trial the defendant
shall file written notice of the objection with the court and serve a copy on the district attorney.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) “Analyst” means a person employed by the Department of State Police  to conduct analysis
in forensic laboratories established by the department under ORS 181A.150.
(b) “Presumptive test” includes, but  is not limited to, chemical tests using Marquis reagent,
Duquenois-Levine reagent, Scott reagent system or modified Chen’s reagent.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 670.280 is amended to read:
670.280. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “License” includes a registration, certification or permit.
(b) “Licensee” includes a registrant or a holder of a certification or permit.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 342.143 (3)  or 342.175 (3), a licensing board, commission or agency
may not deny, suspend or revoke an  occupational or professional license solely for the reason that
the applicant or  licensee has been convicted of a crime, but it may consider the relationship of the
[15]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
facts which support the  conviction and all intervening circumstances to the specific occupational
or professional standards in determining  the fitness of the person to receive or hold the license.
[There is a rebuttable presumption as to each  individual applicant or licensee that an existing or prior
conviction for conduct that has been classified or reclassified as a Class E violation does not  make an
applicant for an occupational or professional license or  a licensee with an occupational or professional
license unfit to receive or hold the license. ]
(3) Except as provided in ORS 342.143 (3)  and 342.175 (3), a licensing board, commission or
agency may deny an occupational or professional license or impose discipline on a licensee based
on conduct that is not undertaken directly in the course of the licensed  activity, but that is sub-
stantially related to the fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to engage  in the activity for
which the license  is required. In determining whether the conduct is substantially related to the
fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to engage in the activity for which the  license is re-
quired, the licensing board, commission or  agency shall consider the relationship of the facts with
respect to the conduct and all intervening circumstances to  the specific occupational or professional
standards. [ There is  a rebuttable presumption as to each individual applicant or licensee that an ex-
isting or prior conviction for conduct that has been  classified or reclassified as a Class E violation is
not related to the fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to  engage in the activity for which the
license is required. ]
SECTION 24.
ORS 153.043, 153.062, 419C.460 and 475.237 are repealed.
RESTORATION OF STATE V. BOYD DELIVERY DEFINITION
SECTION 25.  ORS 475.005 is amended to read:
475.005. As used in ORS 475.005 to  475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Abuse” means the repetitive excessive use  of a drug short of dependence, without legal or
medical supervision, which may have a detrimental effect on the individual or society.
(2) “Administer” means  the direct application of a controlled substance, whether by injection,
inhalation, ingestion or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or an authorized agent thereof; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.
(3) “Administration” means the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States  Depart-
ment of Justice, or its successor agency.
(4) “Agent” means an  authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a man-
ufacturer, distributor or dispenser. It  does not include a common or contract carrier, public
warehouseman or employee of the carrier or warehouseman.
(5) “Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.
(6) “Controlled substance”:
(a) Means a drug or its immediate precursor  classified in Schedules I through V under the fed-
eral Controlled Substances Act, 21  U.S.C. 811 to 812, as modified under ORS 475.035. The use of the
term “precursor” in this paragraph does not control and is not controlled by the use  of the term
“precursor” in ORS 475.752 to 475.980.
(b) Does not include:
(A) The plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(B) Any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae, whether growing or not;
[16]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(D) The seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(E) Any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of a  plant, part of a
plant, resin or seed described in this paragraph; or
(F) Psilocybin or psilocin, but only if and to the extent that a person  manufactures, delivers, or
possesses  psilocybin,  psilocin, or psilocybin products in accordance with the provisions of ORS
475A.210 to 475A.722 and rules adopted under ORS 475A.210 to 475A.722.
(7) “Counterfeit substance” means a  controlled substance or its container or labeling, which,
without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark,  imprint, number
or device, or any likeness thereof, of  a manufacturer, distributor or dispenser other than the person
who in fact manufactured, delivered or dispensed the substance.
(8) “Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual  transfer , constructive  transfer  or attempted
transfer, or possession  with intent to transfer,  other than by administering or dispensing, from
one person to another of a controlled substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.
(9) “Device”  means instruments, apparatus or contrivances, including their components, parts
or accessories, intended:
(a) For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in  humans or
animals; or
(b) To affect the structure of any function of the body of humans or animals.
(10) “Dispense” means to deliver a controlled substance to an  ultimate user or research subject
by or pursuant  to the lawful order of a practitioner, and includes the prescribing, administering,
packaging, labeling or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery.
(11) “Dispenser” means a practitioner who dispenses.
(12) “Distributor” means a person who delivers.
(13) “Drug” means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United  States Pharmacopoeia, official
Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of  the United States or official National Formulary, or any supplement
to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for  use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of
disease in humans or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect  the structure or any function of the body of
humans or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any  article specified in paragraph (a), (b) or
(c) of this subsection; however, the term does not include devices or  their components, parts or ac-
cessories.
(14) “Electronically transmitted” or “electronic transmission” means  a communication sent or
received through technological apparatuses, including  computer terminals or other equipment or
mechanisms linked  by telephone or microwave relays, or any similar apparatus having electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
(15) “Manufacture” means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding,  conversion
or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from  substances
of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction
and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or  repackaging of the substance or labeling or
relabeling of its container, except  that this term does not include the preparation or compounding
of a controlled substance:
[17]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) By a practitioner as an incident to administering or  dispensing of a controlled substance in
the course of professional practice; or
(b) By a practitioner, or by  an authorized agent under the practitioner’s supervision, for the
purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(16) “Person” includes a government subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust or any
other legal entity.
(17) “Practitioner” means physician,  dentist, veterinarian, scientific investigator, licensed nurse
practitioner, physician assistant or other person  licensed, registered or otherwise permitted by law
to dispense,  conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course
of professional practice or research in this state but does not include a pharmacist or a pharmacy.
(18) “Prescription” means a written, oral or electronically transmitted direction, given by  a
practitioner for the preparation and use  of a drug. When the context requires, “prescription” also
means the drug prepared under such written, oral or electronically  transmitted direction. Any label
affixed to a drug prepared under written,  oral or electronically transmitted direction shall promi-
nently display a warning that the removal thereof is prohibited by law.
(19) “Production”  includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing or harvesting of a
controlled substance.
(20) “Research” means an activity conducted by the  person registered with the federal Drug
Enforcement Administration pursuant to a protocol approved  by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(21) “Ultimate user” means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled  substance for the use
of the person or for the use of a member of the household of  the person or for administering to an
animal owned by the person or by a member of the household of the person.
(22) “Usable quantity” means:
(a) An amount of a controlled substance  that is sufficient to physically weigh independent of its
packaging and that does not fall below the uncertainty of the measuring scale; or
(b) An amount of a controlled substance that has not  been deemed unweighable, as determined
by a Department of State Police forensic laboratory, due to the circumstances of  the controlled
substance.
(23) “Within 1,000 feet” means a straight line measurement  in a radius extending for 1,000 feet
or less in every direction from a specified location or from any point  on the boundary line of a
specified unit of property.
TREATMENT FUNDING
SECTION 26.
 ORS 430.384 is amended to read:
430.384. (1) The Drug Treatment and Recovery  Services Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Drug Treatment and Re-
covery Services Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund shall consist of:
[(a) Moneys deposited into the fund pursuant to ORS 305.231; ]
[(b)] (a)  Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative Assembly;
[(c)] (b) Moneys allocated from the Oregon Marijuana Account, pursuant to ORS  475C.726 (3)(b);
and
[(d) Moneys allocated from the Criminal Fine Account pursuant to ORS 137.300 (4); and ]
[18]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(e)] (c)  All other moneys deposited into the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund shall  be continuously appropriated to the [ Oregon Health Authority ] Al-
cohol and Drug Policy Commission  for the purposes set forth in ORS 430.389.
(4)(a) Pursuant to subsection [ (2)(b)] (2)(a)  of this  section, the Legislative Assembly shall ap-
propriate or transfer to the fund an  amount sufficient to fully fund the grants program required by
ORS 430.389.
(b) The total amount  deposited and transferred into the fund shall not be less than $57 million
for the first year ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 are in effect.
(c) In each subsequent year, the minimum transfer amount set  forth in paragraph (b) of this
subsection shall be increased by not less than the sum of:
(A) $57 million multiplied  by the percentage, if any, by which the monthly averaged U.S. City
Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31 of the prior calendar
year exceeds the monthly index for the fourth quarter of the calendar year 2020; and
(B) The annual increase, if any, in moneys distributed pursuant to ORS 475C.726 (3)(b).
SECTION 27.
 ORS 430.387 is amended to read:
430.387. The [ Oregon Health Authority ] Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission  shall cause the
moneys in the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund to be distributed as follows:
(1) An amount necessary for the administration of ORS [ 430.388 to ] 430.389 and  430.390, ex-
cluding amounts necessary to establish and maintain the telephone hotline described in ORS  430.391
(1).
(2) After the distribution set forth in subsection (1)  of this section, the remaining moneys in the
fund shall be distributed to the grants program as set forth in ORS 430.389.
SECTION 28.  ORS 430.389 is amended to read:
430.389. (1) The  [ Oversight and Accountability Council ] Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission
shall approve grants and funding [ provided by  the Oregon Health Authority in accordance with this
section] to counties to  implement Behavioral Health Resource Networks , fund treatment pro-
grams and increase access to community care. A  Behavioral Health Resource Network is an entity
or collection of entities that individually or jointly provide some or  all of the services described in
subsection (2)(e) of this section.
(2)(a) The [ authority] commission  shall establish an equitable:
(A) Process for applying for grants and  funding [ by agencies or organizations, whether govern-
ment or community  based, ] by counties  to  fund treatment programs and  establish Behavioral
Health Resource Networks for the purposes of immediately  screening the acute needs of individuals
with substance use, including those who  also have a mental illness, and assessing and addressing
any ongoing  needs through ongoing case management, harm reduction, treatment, housing and
linkage to other care and services.
(B) Process for  distributing grants and funding to counties based on the population and
need of each county.
[(B)] (C)  Evaluation process  to assess the effectiveness of  the treatment programs and  Be-
havioral Health Resource Networks that receive grants or funding.
(b) [ Recipients of grants  or funding ] Treatment programs receiving funding under this sec-
tion must be licensed, certified or  credentialed by the state, including certification under ORS
743A.168 (9),  or meet criteria prescribed by rule by the [ authority] commission  under ORS 430.390.
[A recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection may not use the grant or funding to  supplant
the recipient’s existing funding. ]
[19]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The [ council and  the authority ] commission  shall ensure that residents of each county have
access to all of the services described in paragraph (e) of this subsection.
(d) County applicants for grants and funding may apply individually or jointly with other [ net-
work participants ] counties  to provide services in one or more counties.
(e) A network must have the capacity to provide the following  services and any other services
specified by the [ authority] commission  by rule but no individual participant in a network is re-
quired to provide all of the services:
(A) Screening by certified addiction peer support or wellness specialists or other qualified  per-
sons designated by the [ council] commission  to determine a client’s need  for immediate medical or
other treatment to determine what acute care is needed and where it  can be best provided, identify
other needs and link the  client to other appropriate local or statewide services, including treatment
for substance use and coexisting health problems,  housing, employment, training and child care.
Networks shall provide this service 24 hours a day, seven days a week,  every calendar day of the
year through a telephone line or other means. Networks may rely on the statewide telephone
hotline established by the authority under ORS  430.391 for telephone screenings during nonbusiness
hours such as evenings, weekends and holidays. Notwithstanding paragraph (c) of this  subsection,
only one grantee  in each network within each county is required to provide the screenings described
in this subparagraph.
(B) Comprehensive behavioral health needs assessment, including a substance  use screening by
a certified  alcohol and drug counselor or other credentialed addiction treatment professional. The
assessment shall prioritize the self-identified needs of a client.
(C) Individual intervention planning, case management and connection to services. If, after the
completion of a screening, a client indicates a desire to address some or all of the identified  needs,
a case manager shall work with the client to design an individual intervention plan. The plan must
address the client’s need for substance use treatment, coexisting health problems, housing,  employ-
ment and training, child care and other services.
(D) Ongoing peer  counseling and support from screening and assessment through implementation
of individual intervention plans as well as  peer outreach workers to engage directly with
marginalized community members who could potentially benefit from the network’s services.
(E) Assessment of the need for, and provision of, mobile or virtual outreach services to:
(i) Reach clients who are unable to access the network; and
(ii) Increase public awareness of network services.
(F) Harm reduction services and information and education about harm reduction services.
(G) Low-barrier substance use treatment.
(H) Transitional and supportive housing for individuals with substance use.
(f) If [ an] a  county  applicant  applying for a grant or funding for a Behavioral Health Re-
source Network  under this subsection is unable to provide all of  the services described in para-
graph (e)  of this subsection, the applicant may identify how the applicant intends to partner with
other [ entities] counties to  provide the services, and the [ authority and the council ] commission may
facilitate collaboration among applicants.
(g) All services provided  through the networks must be evidence-informed, trauma-informed,
culturally  specific,  linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental. The goal shall be
to address effectively the client’s substance use and any other social determinants of health.
(h) The networks must be adequately staffed to address the needs  of people with substance use
within their regions as prescribed by the authority by rule, including, at a minimum, at least  one
[20]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
person in each of the following categories:
(A) Alcohol and drug counselor certified by the authority or other credentialed addiction  treat-
ment professional;
(B) Case manager;
(C) Addiction peer support specialist certified by the [ authority] Oregon Health Authority ;
(D) Addiction peer wellness specialist certified by the authority;
(E) Recovery mentor, certified by the Mental Health and Addiction Certification Board of
Oregon or its successor organization; and
(F) Youth support specialist certified by the authority.
(i) Verification of a screening by a certified addiction peer support  specialist, wellness specialist
or other person in accordance with paragraph (e)(A)  of this subsection shall promptly be provided
to the client  by the entity conducting the screening. If the client executes a valid release of infor-
mation, the entity shall provide verification of the screening to the  authority or a contractor of the
authority  and  the authority or the authority’s contractor shall forward the verification to [ the court,
in the manner prescribed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, to satisfy the conditions  for dis-
missal under ORS 153.062 or 475.237 ] any entity the client has authorized to receive the ver-
ification.
(3)(a) If moneys remain in the  Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund after the council
has committed grants and funding  to establish behavioral health resource networks serving every
county in this state, the council  shall authorize grants and funding to other agencies or organiza-
tions, whether government or  community based, and to the nine federally recognized tribes in this
state and service providers that are affiliated with the nine federally recognized tribes in  this state
to increase access to one or more of the following:
(A) Low-barrier substance use  treatment that is evidence-informed, trauma-informed, culturally
specific, linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental;
(B) Peer support and recovery services;
(C) Transitional, supportive and permanent housing for persons with substance use;
(D) Harm reduction interventions including, but not  limited to, overdose prevention education,
access to short-acting opioid antagonists, as  defined in ORS 689.800, and sterile syringes and
stimulant-specific drug education and outreach; or
(E) Incentives and supports to  expand the behavioral health workforce to support the services
delivered by behavioral health resource networks and  entities receiving grants or funding under this
subsection.
(b) A recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection may not use the grant or funding to
supplant the recipient’s existing funding.
(4) In awarding grants  and funding under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, the [ council]
commission shall:
(a) Distribute grants and funding to ensure access to:
(A) Historically underserved populations; and
(B) Culturally specific and linguistically responsive services.
(b) Consider any inventories or surveys of currently available behavioral health services.
(c) Consider available regional data related to the substance  use treatment needs and the access
to culturally specific and linguistically responsive services in communities in this state.
(d) Consider the needs of residents  of this state for services, supports and treatment at all ages.
(5) The [ council] commission  shall require  any [ government entity ] county  that applies for a
[21]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
grant to specify in the application details regarding subgrantees and  how the government entity will
fund culturally specific  organizations and culturally specific services. A [ government entity ] county
receiving a grant must make an explicit commitment not to supplant or decrease any  existing
funding used to provide services funded by the grant.
(6) In determining grants and funding to be awarded,  the [ council] commission  may consult the
comprehensive addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan established by the [ Alcohol and
Drug Policy  Commission] commission under ORS 430.223 and the advice of any other group, agency,
organization or individual  that desires to provide advice to the [ council] commission  that is con-
sistent with the terms of this section.
(7) Services provided by grantees, including services provided by a Behavioral Health Resource
Network, shall be free of charge to the clients receiving the services. Grantees in  each network
shall seek reimbursement from insurance  issuers, the medical assistance program or any other third
party responsible for the cost of services provided to a client  and grants and funding provided by
the [ council or the authority ] commission  under this section may be used for copayments, deduct-
ibles or other out-of-pocket costs incurred by the client for the services.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not require the medical assistance  program to reimburse
the cost of services for which another third party  is responsible in violation of 42 U.S.C. 1396a(25).
SECTION 29.
 ORS 430.390 is amended to read:
430.390. (1)[(a) The Oregon Health Authority ] The Alcohol  and Drug Policy Commission  shall
adopt rules that establish a grant application process, a process  to appeal the denial of a grant and
general criteria and requirements for the Behavioral Health  Resource Networks , other treatment
programs and the grants and funding required by ORS 430.389,  including rules requiring recipients
of grants and funding to collect  and report information necessary for the Secretary of State to
conduct the financial and performance audits required by ORS 430.392.
[(b) When adopting or amending rules under this subsection, the authority  shall convene an advi-
sory committee in accordance with ORS 183.333 in which members of the Oversight  and Accountability
Council compose a majority of the membership. ]
(2) The [ council] commission  shall have and retain the authority to  oversee the Behavioral
Health Resource Networks established under ORS 430.389  and approve the grants and funding under
ORS 430.389.
(3) The [ authority] commission  shall administer and provide all necessary support to  ensure the
implementation of  ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, and that recipients of grants or funding
comply with all applicable rules regulating the provision of behavioral health services.
(4)(a) The [ authority, in consultation  with the council, ] commission  may enter into interagency
agreements to ensure proper distribution of funds for the grants required by ORS 430.389.
(b) The [ authority] commission  shall encourage and take  all reasonable measures to ensure that
county grant recipients cooperate,  coordinate and act jointly with one another to offer the services
described in ORS 430.389.
(c) The [ authority] commission  shall post to the [ authority’s] commission’s  website,  at the time
a grant or funding is awarded:
(A) The name of the county recipient of the grant or funding;
(B) The names of any subgrantees or  subcontractors of the recipient of the grant or funding; and
(C) The amount of the grant or funding awarded.
[(5) The authority  shall provide requested technical, logistical and other support to the council to
assist the council with the council’s duties and obligations. ]
[22]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(6)] (5) The Department of Justice shall  provide legal services to the [ council] commission  if
requested to assist  the [ council] commission  in carrying out the [ council’s] commission’s  duties
and obligations.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 430.391 is amended to read:
430.391. (1) The [ Oregon Health  Authority ] Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission  shall estab-
lish a Behavioral Health Resource Network statewide  telephone hotline to provide screenings de-
scribed in ORS 430.389 (2)(e)(A) to any caller who is a resident of this state.
(2) The telephone hotline shall be staffed 24 hours a day, seven days a  week, every calendar day
of the year.  Following a screening, at the request of a caller, the telephone hotline shall promptly
provide the verification set forth in ORS 430.389 (2)(i).
SECTION 31.  ORS 430.392 is amended to read:
430.392. (1) The  Division of Audits of the office of the Secretary of State shall conduct per-
formance audits and  financial reviews as provided in this section, regarding the uses of the Drug
Treatment and Recovery Services Fund and the effectiveness  of the fund in achieving the purposes
of the fund and the policy objectives of ORS 430.383. Recipients of grants or funds  under ORS
430.389 shall keep accurate books, records and accounts that are  subject to inspection and audit by
the division.
(2) The division shall monitor and report  on the progress in implementing any recommendations
made in the audit or financial review. The division shall follow  up on recommendations as part of
recurring audit work or as  an activity separate from other audit activity. When following up on
recommendations, the division may request from the appropriate agency evidence  of implementation.
(3) The audits set forth  in this section shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of ORS
chapter 297, except to the extent any provision of ORS chapter 297  conflicts with any provision of
ORS [ 293.665 and 305.231 and] 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, in which case the provisions of ORS
[293.665 and 305.231 and] 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 shall control.
(4) No later than December 31, 2023, the division shall perform a:
(a) Real-time audit,  as prescribed by the division, which shall include an assessment of [ the re-
lationship between  the Oversight and Accountability Council and the Oregon Health Authority, ] the
relationship between the [ council] Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission  and  county  recipients  of
grants or funding and the structural integrity of ORS  [ 293.665 and 305.231 and ] 430.383 to 430.390
and 430.394, including but not limited to assessing:
(A) Whether the organizational structure of the [ council] commission  contains conflicts  or
problems.
(B) Whether the rules adopted by the [ council] commission  are clear and functioning properly.
(C) Whether the [ council] commission  has sufficient authority and independence  to achieve the
[council’s] commission’s  mission.
(D) Whether the [ authority] commission  is  fulfilling the [ authority’s] commission’s  duties under
ORS 430.384, 430.387, 430.390 and 430.391.
(E) Whether there are conflicts of interest in the process of awarding grants or funding.
(F) Whether there are opportunities to  expand collaboration between the [ council] commission
and state agencies.
(G) Whether barriers exist in data collection and evaluation mechanisms.
(H) Who is providing the data.
(I) Other areas identified by the division.
(b) Financial review, which shall include an assessment of the following:
[23]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Whether grants and funding are [ going] being distributed by counties to organizations that
are culturally responsive and linguistically specific, including an assessment of:
(i) The barriers that  exist for grant and funding applicants who are Black, Indigenous or People
of Color.
(ii) The applicants that were denied and why.
(iii) Whether grants and other funding are being disbursed based  on the priorities specified in
ORS 430.389.
(iv) For [ government entities ] counties  receiving grants or funding under ORS 430.389,  the [ gov-
ernment entities’ ] county’s  subgrantees and whether the [ governmental entity ] county  supplanted or
decreased any local funding dedicated to  the same services after receiving grants or funds under
ORS 430.389.
(v) What proportion of grants  or funds received by [ grantees and others ] counties  under ORS
430.389, was devoted to administrative costs.
(B) The organizations and agencies receiving grants or funding  from counties  under ORS
430.389 and:
(i) Which of the organizations and agencies are Behavioral Health Resource Network entities.
(ii) The amount each organization and agency received.
(iii) The total number of organizations and agencies that applied for grants or funding.
(iv) The amount of  moneys from the fund that were used to administer the programs selected
by the [ council] commission .
(v) The moneys that remained in the Drug  Treatment and Recovery Services Fund after grants
and funding were disbursed.
(5) No later than December 31, 2025, the division shall conduct a  performance audit, which must
include an assessment of the following:
(a) All relevant  data regarding the implementation of ORS [ 153.062 and] 430.391[, including de-
mographic information on individuals who receive citations subject to ORS 153.062 and  430.391 and
whether the citations resulted in connecting the individuals with treatment ].
(b) The functioning of:
[(A) Law enforcement and the courts in relation to Class E violation citations; ]
[(B)] (A)  The telephone hotline operated by the [ authority] commission ;
[(C)] (B)  Entities providing verification of screenings under ORS 430.389; and
[(D)] (C)  The grants and funding systems between  the [ council, the authority ] commission  and
county recipients of grants or funding, including by gathering information about which  entities are
receiving grants or funding and what  the grants or funding are used for, the process of applying for
grants or funding and whether the process is conducive to obtaining qualified  applicants for grants
or funding who are from communities of color.
(c) Disparities shown  by demographic data and whether the citation data reveals a dispropor-
tionate use of citations in communities most impacted by the war on drugs.
(d) Whether  ORS [ 153.062,] 430.389 and 430.391 reduce the involvement in the criminal justice
system of individuals with substance use.
(e) Training opportunities provided to law enforcement officials regarding services  that are
available and how to connect individuals to the services.
(f) The efficacy of issuing citations as a method of connecting individuals to services.
(g) The  role of the implementation of ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 in reducing overdose
rates.
[24]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) Outcomes for individuals receiving treatment and other social  services under ORS 430.389,
including, but not limited to, the following:
(A) Whether access to  care increased since December 3, 2020, and, if data is available, whether,
since December 3, 2020:
(i) The number of drug and alcohol treatment service providers increased.
(ii) The number of culturally specific providers increased.
(iii) Access to harm reduction services has increased.
(iv) More individuals are accessing treatment than they were before December 3, 2020.
(v) Access to housing for individuals with substance use has increased.
(B) Data on Behavioral Health Resource Networks and recipients  of grants and funding under
ORS 430.389, including:
(i) The outcomes of each network or recipient, including but  not limited to the number of clients
with substance use receiving services from each network or recipient,  the average duration of client
participation and client outcomes.
(ii) The number  of individuals seeking assistance from the network or recipients who are denied
or not connected to substance use treatment and other services, and the reasons for the denials.
(iii) The  average time it takes for clients to access services and fulfill their individual inter-
vention plan and the reason for any delays, such as waiting lists at referred services.
(iv) Whether average times to access services to which clients are referred, such as housing  or
medically assisted treatment, have decreased over time since December 3, 2020.
(v) Demographic  data on clients served by Behavioral Health Resource Networks, including
self-reported demographic data on race, ethnicity, gender and age.
(i) Each recipient of a grant or funding.
(j) Other areas identified by the division for ascertaining best practices for overdose prevention.
(6) The division shall conduct periodic performance audits and financial reviews pursuant to the
division’s annual audit plan and taking into consideration the risks of the program.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 430.392, as amended by section 11,  chapter 248, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
430.392. (1) The Division of Audits of the office of the Secretary of State shall  conduct per-
formance audits and financial reviews as provided in this section, regarding the uses of  the Drug
Treatment and Recovery Services Fund and the effectiveness  of the fund in achieving the purposes
of the fund  and the policy objectives of ORS 430.383. Recipients of grants or funds under ORS
430.389 shall keep accurate books, records and accounts that are  subject to inspection and audit by
the division.
(2) The division shall monitor and report  on the progress in implementing any recommendations
made in the audit or financial review.  The division shall follow up on recommendations as part of
recurring audit work or as an activity separate from other audit activity.  When following up on
recommendations, the division may request from the appropriate agency evidence  of implementation.
(3) The audits set forth in this section shall be conducted pursuant to  the provisions of ORS
chapter 297, except to the extent  any provision of ORS chapter 297 conflicts with any provision of
ORS [ 293.665 and 305.231 and ] 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, in which  case the provisions of ORS
[293.665 and 305.231 and] 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 shall control.
(4) The division shall conduct periodic performance audits and financial reviews pursuant to the
division’s annual audit plan and taking into consideration the risks of the program.
SECTION 33.  ORS 430.393 is amended to read:
[25]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
430.393. No later than January 1,  2022, and at the beginning of each calendar quarter thereafter,
the [ Oregon Health Authority ] Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission shall report to the Legislative
Assembly, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, how funds from the Drug Treatment and Recovery
Services Fund were spent in the preceding calendar quarter.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 430.394 is amended to read:
430.394. If approved by the [ Oversight and Accountability Council ] Alcohol and Drug  Policy
Commission, the Oregon Health Authority  may implement an education campaign to inform the
public about the availability of Behavioral Health Resource  Networks, the statewide hotline de-
scribed in ORS 430.391 and any other information  the authority believes would benefit the public in
accessing behavioral health services.
SECTION 35.  ORS 244.050 is amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file  with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission  a verified statement of economic interest as required under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor,  Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal judges,  except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
Legislative Policy and Research Director, the  Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the House
of Representatives and the Legislative Equity Officer.
(g) The  president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
[26]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) State Fire Marshal.
(EE) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) Executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs  the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan service  district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial  officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards, commissions and councils:
(A) Governing board of the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
[27]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
[(FF) The Oversight and Accountability Council. ]
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to 777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of the  board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the district school board of a common school district or union  high school
district.
(w) Every member of the board  of directors of an authority created under ORS 465.600 to
465.621.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a board or commission listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file  with the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics  Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate  described
[28]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in subsection  (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Not later than the 40th day before the date of the statewide general election,  each candidate
described in subsection (1)  of this section who will appear on the statewide general election ballot
and who was not required to file a statement  of economic interest under subsections (1) to (3) of this
section  shall  file with the commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS
244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (3)  of this section apply only to persons who are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April 15.
(6) If a statement required to be filed under this section has not been received by  the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement is  due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply with  the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set by  the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 36.
 ORS 244.050, as amended by  section 12, chapter 220, Oregon Laws 2023, and
section 48, chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file  with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission  a verified statement of economic interest as required under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor,  Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal judges,  except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
Legislative Policy and Research Director, the  Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the House
of Representatives and the Legislative Equity Officer.
(g) The  president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
[29]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(N) Administrator of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) State Fire Marshal.
(EE) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) Executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs  the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan service  district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial  officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
[30]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(q) Every member of the following state boards, commissions and councils:
(A) Governing board of the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
[(FF) The Oversight and Accountability Council. ]
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to 777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of the  board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the district school board of a common school district or union  high school
district.
(w) Every member of the board  of directors of an authority created under ORS 465.600 to
465.621.
[31]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a board or commission listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file  with the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics  Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate  described
in subsection (1) of this section who will appear  on a primary election ballot shall file with the
commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Not later than the 40th day before the date of the statewide general election,  each candidate
described in subsection (1)  of this section who will appear on the statewide general election ballot
and who was not required to file a statement  of economic interest under subsections (1) to (3) of this
section  shall  file with the commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS
244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (3)  of this section apply only to persons who are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April 15.
(6) If a statement required to be filed under this section has not been received by  the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement is  due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply with  the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set by  the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 37.
 ORS 316.502 is amended to read:
316.502. (1) The net revenue from the tax imposed by this chapter, after  deducting refunds and
amounts described in ORS 285B.630[ ,] and 285C.635 [ and 305.231], shall be paid over to the State
Treasurer and held  in the General Fund as miscellaneous receipts available generally to meet any
expense or obligation of the State of Oregon lawfully incurred.
(2) A working balance of unreceipted revenue from  the tax imposed by this chapter may be re-
tained for the payment of refunds, but such working balance shall not at the close of  any fiscal year
exceed the sum of $1 million.
(3) Moneys are continuously appropriated to the Department of Revenue to make:
(a) The refunds authorized under subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) The refund  payments in excess of tax liability authorized under ORS 315.133, 315.174, 315.262,
315.264, 315.266, 315.273, 315.519 and 316.090 and section 3, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 413.017 is amended to read:
413.017. (1) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall establish the committees described in sub-
sections (2) to (5) of this section.
(2)(a) The Public Health  Benefit Purchasers Committee shall include individuals who purchase
health care for the following:
(A) The Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(B) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board.
(C) Trustees of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(D) A city government.
(E) A county government.
(F) A special district.
(G) Any private nonprofit organization  that receives the majority of its funding from the state
and requests to participate on the committee.
(b) The Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee shall:
[32]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Identify and make  specific recommendations to achieve uniformity across all public health
benefit plan designs based on the best available clinical evidence, recognized best practices  for
health promotion and disease management, demonstrated  cost-effectiveness and shared demographics
among the enrollees within the pools covered by the benefit plans.
(B) Develop an action plan for ongoing collaboration to implement the benefit design alignment
described in subparagraph (A) of  this paragraph and shall leverage purchasing to achieve benefit
uniformity if practicable.
(C) Continuously review and report to the  Oregon Health Policy Board on the committee’s
progress in aligning benefits while minimizing the cost shift to individual purchasers of  insurance
without shifting costs to the private sector or the health insurance exchange.
(c) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall work with  the Public Health Benefit Purchasers
Committee to identify uniform provisions for state and  local public contracts for health benefit plans
that achieve maximum quality and  cost outcomes. The board shall collaborate with the committee
to develop steps to implement joint contract provisions. The committee shall identify  a schedule for
the implementation of contract  changes. The process for implementation of joint contract provisions
must include a review process to protect against unintended cost shifts to enrollees or agencies.
(3)(a) The Health Care Workforce Committee  shall include individuals who have the collective
expertise, knowledge and experience in a broad range  of health professions, health care education
and health care workforce development initiatives.
(b) The Health Care Workforce Committee shall coordinate efforts to recruit and  educate health
care professionals and retain a quality workforce to meet the demand that will be created  by the
expansion in health care coverage, system transformations and an increasingly diverse population.
(c) The Health Care Workforce Committee shall conduct an inventory of all  grants and other
state resources available for addressing the need to expand the health care workforce to meet the
needs of Oregonians for health care.
(4)(a) The  Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee shall include the following members appointed
by the Oregon Health Policy Board:
(A) An individual representing the Oregon Health Authority;
(B) An individual representing the Oregon Educators Benefit Board;
(C) An individual representing the Public Employees’ Benefit Board;
(D) An individual representing the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(E) Two health care providers;
(F) One individual representing hospitals;
(G) One  individual representing insurers, large employers or multiple employer welfare ar-
rangements;
(H) Two individuals representing health care consumers;
(I) Two individuals representing coordinated care organizations;
(J) One individual with expertise in health care research;
(K) One individual with expertise in health care quality measures; and
(L) One individual with expertise in mental health and addiction services.
(b) The committee shall work collaboratively with the Oregon  Educators Benefit Board, the
Public Employees’ Benefit Board, the authority and the department to  adopt health outcome and
quality measures that are focused on specific goals and provide value to the state, employers,
insurers, health care providers and consumers. The  committee shall be the single body to align
health outcome and quality measures used in this state with  the requirements of health care data
[33]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
reporting to ensure that the measures and  requirements are coordinated, evidence-based and focused
on a long term statewide vision.
(c) The committee shall use a public process that includes an opportunity for public comment
to identify  health outcome and quality measures. The health outcome and quality measures identified
by the committee,  as updated by the authority under paragraph (g) of this subsection, may be applied
to services provided by  coordinated care organizations or paid for by health benefit plans sold
through the health insurance  exchange or offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board or the
Public Employees’ Benefit Board. The authority, the department, the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board and the Public Employees’ Benefit Board are not required to adopt all  of the health outcome
and quality measures identified by the committee but may not adopt any health outcome  and quality
measures that are different from the measures identified by the  committee. The measures must take
into account the health outcome and quality measures selected by  the metrics and scoring subcom-
mittee created in ORS  413.022 and the differences in the populations served by coordinated care
organizations and by commercial insurers.
(d) In identifying health  outcome and quality measures, the committee shall prioritize measures
that:
(A) Utilize existing state and  national health outcome and quality measures, including measures
adopted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid  Services, that have been adopted or endorsed
by other state or national organizations and have a relevant state or national benchmark;
(B) Given the context  in which each measure is applied, are not prone to random variations
based on the size of the denominator;
(C) Utilize existing data systems,  to the extent practicable, for reporting the measures to mini-
mize redundant reporting and undue burden on the state, health benefit plans  and health care pro-
viders;
(D) Can be meaningfully adopted for a minimum of three years;
(E) Use a common format in the collection of the data and facilitate the  public reporting of the
data; and
(F) Can be reported in  a timely manner and without significant delay so that the most current
and actionable data is available.
(e) The  committee shall evaluate on a regular and ongoing basis the health outcome and quality
measures identified under this section.
(f) The committee may convene subcommittees to focus on gaining expertise in particular  areas
such as data collection, health  care research and mental health and substance use disorders in order
to aid the committee in the  development of health outcome and quality measures. A subcommittee
may include stakeholders and  staff from the authority, the Department of Human Services, the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services, the Early Learning Council or any  other agency staff
with the appropriate expertise in the issues addressed by the subcommittee.
(g) The authority shall update annually, if necessary, the health outcome  and quality measures
identified by the committee to utilize the latest sets of core quality measures published by  the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1320b-9a and 1320b-9b.
(h) This subsection does not prevent the authority, the Department  of Consumer and Business
Services, commercial insurers, the  Public Employees’ Benefit Board or the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board from establishing programs that provide financial  incentives to providers for meeting specific
health outcome and quality measures adopted by the committee.
(5)(a) The Behavioral Health Committee shall include the following members appointed by the
[34]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Director of the Oregon Health Authority:
(A) The chairperson of the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee;
(B) The chairperson of the committee appointed by the board to address health equity, if any;
(C) A behavioral health director for a coordinated care organization;
(D) A representative of a community mental health program;
(E) An individual with expertise in data analysis;
(F) A member of the  Consumer Advisory Council, established under ORS 430.073, that represents
adults with mental illness;
(G) A representative of the System of Care Advisory Council established in ORS 418.978;
(H) A member [ of the Oversight  and Accountability Council, described in ORS 430.389, ] who re-
presents adults with addictions or co-occurring conditions;
(I) One member representing a system of care, as defined in ORS 418.976;
(J) One consumer representative;
(K) One representative of a tribal government;
(L) One representative of  an organization that advocates on behalf of individuals with intellec-
tual or developmental disabilities;
(M) One representative of providers of behavioral health services;
(N) The director of the division of the authority responsible for  behavioral health services, as
a nonvoting member;
(O) The  Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission appointed under ORS 430.220, as
a nonvoting member;
(P) The authority’s Medicaid director, as a nonvoting member;
(Q) A representative of the Department of Human Services, as a nonvoting member; and
(R) Any other member that the director deems appropriate.
(b) The board may modify the membership of the committee as needed.
(c) The division of the authority responsible  for behavioral health services and the director of
the division shall staff the committee.
(d) The committee, in collaboration with the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee, as needed,
shall:
(A) Establish quality metrics for  behavioral health services provided by coordinated care or-
ganizations, health care providers, counties and other government entities; and
(B) Establish incentives to improve the quality of behavioral health services.
(e) The quality metrics and incentives shall be designed to:
(A) Improve timely access to behavioral health care;
(B) Reduce hospitalizations;
(C) Reduce overdoses;
(D) Improve the integration of physical and behavioral health care; and
(E) Ensure individuals are supported in the  least restrictive environment that meets their be-
havioral health needs.
(6) Members of the committees described in subsections (2) to  (5) of this section who are not
members of the Oregon Health  Policy Board may receive compensation in accordance with criteria
prescribed by the authority by rule  and shall be reimbursed from funds available to the board for
actual and necessary  travel and other expenses incurred by them by their attendance at committee
meetings, in the manner and amount provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 39.
 Section 6, chapter 63, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
[35]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Sec. 6.  Opioid Settlement Prevention, Treatment and Recovery Board.  (1) The Opioid Settlement
Prevention, Treatment and Recovery  Board is created in the Oregon Health Authority for the pur-
pose of determining the allocation  of funding from the Opioid Settlement Prevention, Treatment and
Recovery Fund established in section 5 of this 2022 Act. The board consists of:
(a) The following members appointed by the Governor:
(A) A policy advisor to the Governor;
(B) A representative of the Department of Justice;
(C) A representative of the Oregon Health Authority; and
(D) A representative of the Department of Human Services;
(b) The Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission or the director’s designee;
[(c) The chairperson of the  Oversight and Accountability Council established in ORS 430.388 or
the chairperson’s designee; ]
[(d)] (c)  The following members appointed by the Governor from a list  of candidates provided
by the Association of Oregon Counties and the League  of Oregon Cities or the successor organiza-
tions to the Association of Oregon Counties and the League of Oregon Cities:
(A) An individual representing Clackamas, Washington or Multnomah County;
(B) An  individual representing Clatsop, Columbia, Coos, Curry, Jackson, Josephine, Lane or
Yamhill County;
(C) An individual representing the City of Portland;
(D) An  individual representing a city with a population above 10,000 residents as of July 21,
2021;
(E) An individual representing a city with a population at or below 10,000 residents  as of July
21, 2021; and
(F) A representative of the Oregon Coalition of Local Health Officials or its successor  organ-
ization;
[(e)] (d)  The following members appointed by  the Governor from a list of candidates provided
by the members described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection:
(A) A representative of a community mental health program;
(B) An individual who has experienced a substance use disorder or a representative of  an or-
ganization that advocates on behalf of individuals with substance use disorders; and
(C) An individual representing law enforcement, first responders or  jail commanders or wardens;
[(f)] (e)  A member of  the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, who shall be a nonvoting member of the board;
[(g)] (f)  A member of the Senate appointed  by the President of the Senate, who shall be a non-
voting member of the board; and
[(h)] (g)  The State Court Administrator or the administrator’s  designee, who shall be a nonvot-
ing member of the board.
(2) The Governor shall select from the members described in subsection  (1)(a)[ ,] and  (b) [ and
(c)] of this  section one cochairperson to represent state entities, and the members described in sub-
section [ (1)(d)] (1)(c)  of this section  shall select from one of their members a cochairperson to rep-
resent cities or counties.
(3) The term of each member of  the board who is not an ex officio member is four years, but a
member serves at  the pleasure of the appointing authority. Before the expiration of a member’s term,
the appointing authority shall appoint  a successor whose term begins on January 1 next following.
A member is eligible for reappointment. If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority
[36]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
shall make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) Decision-making by the board  shall be based on consensus and supported by at least a ma-
jority of the members. The board shall document all objections to board decisions.
(5) The board  shall conduct at least four public meetings in accordance with ORS 192.610 to
192.690 [series became 192.610 to 192.705], which shall be publicized to facilitate attendance  at the
meetings and during which the board shall receive  testimony and input from the community. The
board shall also establish a process for the public to provide written comments and proposals  at
each meeting of the board.
(6) In determining the allocation of moneys from the Opioid Settlement  Prevention, Treatment
and Recovery Fund:
(a) No more than five  percent of the moneys may be spent on administering the board and the
fund.
(b) A portion of the moneys shall be  allocated toward a unified and evidence-based state system
for collecting, analyzing and publishing data about the  availability and efficacy of substance use
prevention, treatment and recovery services statewide.
(c) Moneys remaining after allocations in accordance  with paragraphs (a) and (b) of this sub-
section shall be allocated for funding statewide and regional programs  identified in the Distributor
Settlement Agreement, the Janssen Settlement Agreement and any other  judgment or settlement
described in section 5  (1)(c),  [ of this 2022 Act ] chapter 63, Oregon Laws 2022 , including but not
limited to:
(A) Programs that  use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to treat opioid use disor-
ders and any co-occurring substance use disorders or mental health conditions;
(B) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed  strategies to support individuals in
recovery from opioid use disorders and  any co-occurring substance use disorders or mental health
conditions;
(C) Programs that use  evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to provide connections to
care for individuals who have or are at risk of developing opioid use disorders and any co-occurring
substance use disorders or mental health conditions;
(D) Programs that  use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to address the needs of
individuals with opioid use disorders and  any co-occurring substance use disorders or mental health
conditions and who are involved in, at risk of becoming involved in, or in transition from, the
criminal justice system;
(E) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to address the needs of
pregnant or parenting women with opioid use disorders and any co-occurring substance  use disor-
ders or mental health conditions, and the  needs of their families, including babies with neonatal
abstinence syndrome;
(F) Programs that use  evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to support efforts to pre-
vent over-prescribing of opioids and ensure appropriate prescribing and dispensing of opioids;
(G) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies  to support efforts to dis-
courage or prevent misuse of opioids;
(H) Programs that use evidence-based or evidence-informed strategies to support efforts  to pre-
vent or reduce overdose deaths or other opioid-related harms;
(I) Programs to educate law enforcement  or other first responders regarding appropriate prac-
tices and precautions when dealing with users of fentanyl or other opioids;
(J) Programs to provide wellness and support services for first responders and  others who ex-
[37]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
perience secondary trauma associated with opioid-related emergency events;
(K) Programs to support efforts to provide leadership, planning, coordination,  facilitation,
training and technical assistance to abate the opioid epidemic through activities, programs or
strategies; or
(L) Funding to support opioid abatement research.
(d) The board shall be guided and informed by:
(A) The comprehensive  addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan developed by the
Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission in accordance with ORS 430.223;
(B) The board’s ongoing evaluation of the efficacy of the funding allocations;
(C) Evidence-based and evidence-informed strategies and best practices;
(D) Input the board receives from the public;
(E) Equity considerations for underserved populations; and
(F) The terms of the settlement agreements.
(7) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff support to the board.
SECTION 40.
 ORS 430.383 is amended to read:
430.383. (1)(a) The people of Oregon find that drug addiction and overdoses  are a serious prob-
lem in Oregon and that Oregon needs to expand access to drug treatment.
(b) The people of Oregon further find that a health-based  approach to addiction and overdose is
[more] effective, humane  and cost-effective [ than criminal punishments. Making people criminals be-
cause they suffer  from addiction is expensive, ruins lives and can make access to treatment and recov-
ery more difficult ].
(2)(a) The purpose of the Drug Addiction Treatment and Recovery Act of 2020 , as further
amended, is to  make screening, health assessment, treatment and recovery services for drug ad-
diction available to all those  who need and want access to those services and to [ adopt a health
approach] enhance assessment, treatment and recovery services  to  address drug addiction [ by
removing criminal penalties for low-level drug possession ].
(b) It is the policy of the State of Oregon:
(A) That screening, health assessment,  treatment and recovery services for drug addiction are
available to all those who need and want access to those services; and
(B) To encourage treatment and recovery for people struggling with substance use.
(3) The provisions of ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 shall be interpreted consistently  with
the findings, purposes and policy objectives stated in this section and shall not be limited by  any
policy set forth in Oregon law that could conflict with or be interpreted to conflict with the  pur-
poses and policy objectives stated in this section.
(4) As used in ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, “recovery” means a process of change
through which individuals improve their health and wellness, live a self-directed life  and strive to
reach their full potential.
SECTION 41.
ORS 293.665, 305.231, 430.388 and section 6, chapter 248, Oregon Laws 2023,
are repealed.
APPROPRIATION
SECTION 42. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $ , for deposit into the Drug Treatment
[38]
SB 1588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
and Recovery Services  Fund for the purposes of funding grants to counties under ORS
430.389.
APPLICABILITY
SECTION 43.
The amendments to ORS 51.050, 137.300, 153.012, 153.018, 153.019,  153.021,
153.064, 153.992, 161.570, 221.339, 419C.370, 423.478, 475.005, 475.235, 475.752,  475.814, 475.824,
475.834, 475.854, 475.874, 475.884, 475.894 and 475.900 by sections 1 to 22 and 25 of this 2024 Act,
and the repeal of ORS 153.043, 153.062, 419C.460 and 475.237 by section 24 of this 2024 Act,
apply to conduct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 44.
The unit and section captions used in this 2024 Act are provided  only for
the convenience of the reader and  do not become part of the statutory law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
[39]