Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health Authority shall study and make  recommendations re-
garding options to maximize federal  funding for the ground emergency medical transport
program. The authority shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to health care no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3328