Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “fertilizer” has the meaning given that  term in
ORS 633.311.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture shall establish a  process and system for re-
porting the application of fertilizer  to irrigated land that is used for agriculture, pursuant
to subsection (3) of this section.
(3) On or before March 15 of each  year, a person that has an ownership interest in at
least 200 acres of land that was irrigated  and used for agriculture in the previous calendar
year shall report to the department:
(a) The rate of fertilizer applied to each field of the land, measured in pounds per acre.
(b) The type of fertilizer applied to each field of the land.
(c) The crop grown in each field of the land.
(4) The department may use information reported under this section:
(a) To identify persons who are overapplying fertilizer in a manner  that can lead to
runoff and the contamination of surface water or leaching  and the contamination of ground
water.
(b) To take steps to prevent the persons from overapplying  fertilizer in the future, in-
cluding steps to provide targeted education or technical assistance.
(c) As part of an enforcement process under any law, rule or order that  the department
may lawfully enforce.
(5) The Department of Environmental Quality may use information  reported under this
section to identify opportunities to reduce air pollution  from the agricultural sector through
targeted education, technical assistance or other measures.
(6) On or before  September 15 of each odd-numbered year, the State Department of Ag-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1782
SB 747
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
riculture shall  report, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to committees or interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to agriculture on:
(a) Information reported to  the department under subsection (3) of this section since the
department’s last report under this subsection.
(b) Any department activities  described in subsection (4) of this section since the
department’s last report under this subsection.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 561.995 is amended to read:
561.995. (1) In addition to any fine  under ORS 561.990 or other penalty, a person who violates
section 1 of this 2025  Act or  an order, rule or regulation described under ORS 561.590 is subject
to a civil penalty  imposed by the State Department of Agriculture. The civil penalty shall not exceed
$10,000.
(2) Every violation of an order, rule or  regulation described under ORS 561.590 is a separate
offense subject to a separate civil penalty.
(3) The department shall  develop one or more schedules setting the amounts of civil penalties
that may be imposed for particular types of violations.
(4) The imposition of a civil penalty under this section is subject to ORS 183.745.
(5) The State Treasurer shall  deposit all moneys from penalties recovered under this section into
the Department of Agriculture Account.  Moneys deposited under this subsection are continuously
appropriated to the department for the administration and enforcement of quarantine laws.
[2]