Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,400,000, for distribution to Umpqua Fishery
Enhancement Derby to conduct restoration projects,  and associated educational components,
at the following locations to mitigate  the impacts of sediment on fish habitat in the Rogue
River:
(1) The Patterson Riparian Corridor;
(2) Mailboat Slough; and
(3) Williams Ranch.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1982