Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Ireland Trade Commission is established.
(2) The commission consists of at least seven but no more than  nine members appointed
as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one  member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
members of the House.
(c) The Governor shall appoint at least five but no more than seven  members, including:
(A) At least one member representing an institution of higher education; and
(B) At least one member representing a statewide trade organization.
(3) The commission shall:
(a) Advance bilateral trade and investment between Oregon and Ireland;
(b) Initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual interest to Oregon and Ireland;
(c) Promote business and academic exchanges between Oregon and Ireland;
(d) Encourage mutual economic support between Oregon and Ireland;
(e) Encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure of Oregon and Ireland; and
(f) Address other issues as determined by the commission.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the commission  constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by  the commission requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the commission.
(6) The commission shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) The  term of a member appointed by the Governor is four years. The term of a mem-
ber appointed by the President of the Senate or the Speaker  of the House of Representative
is two years. If there is a  vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 174
SB 1516
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
appointment to become immediately effective.
(8) The commission shall meet  at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the commission.
(9) The commission may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the commission.
(10) No later than September 15 of each year, the commission shall  submit a report in
the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to
an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to trade, and to the Governor.
(11) Members of the Legislative Assembly  appointed to the commission are nonvoting
members of the commission and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(12)(a) Members of  the commission who are not legislators shall be paid compensation
and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495.
(b) Members of the commission who are legislators shall be  paid compensation and ex-
pense reimbursement as provided in ORS 171.072.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the commission in the performance of the duties of the commission and, to the extent per-
mitted by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of
the commission consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]