Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 5, chapter 913, Oregon Laws 2009, as amended by section  1, chapter 115,
Oregon Laws 2014, and section 38, chapter 579, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  Except as provided in ORS 315.156  (4), a credit may not be claimed under ORS 315.156
for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2012, and before January 1, 2014, or  on or after
January 1, [ 2026] 2032.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3573