Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall  create a pilot program to
fund the creation of nonpolice responses  to minor instances of crime. The program shall
consist of grants awarded to three coalitions, each consisting  of a county government and
one or more community-based nonprofit organizations.
(2) The commission shall by rule develop eligibility criteria and an application process  for
awarding the grants. In developing the program eligibility criteria  and application process,
and when selecting coalitions to receive grants, the commission shall consult with:
(a) Culturally specific nonprofit organizations and service providers that provide outreach
services, services for houseless persons and services as part of or associated  with the crim-
inal justice system; and
(b) Individuals directly impacted by the criminal justice system.
(3) The commission shall select to receive a grant one coalition in the Portland  metro-
politan area, one coalition in the mid-Willamette Valley  area and one coalition in central or
eastern Oregon.
(4) A coalition selected  to receive a grant shall dedicate 12 to 18 months as a planning
period for creating the nonpolice response system.  During the planning period, the coalition
shall work with the county district  attorney, law enforcement agencies and any other rele-
vant stakeholders to ensure that the system is operational at  the conclusion of the planning
period and relevant stakeholders are cooperating to make the system functional.
(5) A coalition may use grant funds for the following purposes:
(a) The planning period described in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) Responding to 9-1-1  or nonemergency police calls concerning the commission of any
of the following crimes:
(A) Theft in the third degree under ORS 164.043;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1703
SB 689
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Criminal trespass in the second degree by a guest under ORS 164.243;
(C) Criminal trespass in the second degree under ORS 164.245;
(D) Criminal trespass at a sports event under ORS 164.278;
(E) Offensive littering under ORS 164.805;
(F) Unlawful sound recording under ORS 164.865;
(G) Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the second degree under ORS 165.017;
(H) Interfering with public transportation under ORS 166.116;
(I) Prostitution under ORS 167.007;
(J) Unlawful possession of a controlled  substance under ORS 475.752 constituting a
misdemeanor;
(K) Unlawful possession of methadone under ORS 475.824 constituting a misdemeanor;
(L) Unlawful possession of oxycodone under ORS 475.834 constituting a misdemeanor;
(M) Unlawful possession of heroin under ORS 475.854 constituting a misdemeanor;
(N) Unlawful possession of cocaine under ORS 475.884 constituting a misdemeanor;
(O) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine under ORS 475.894  constituting a
misdemeanor; or
(P) An attempt to commit  a crime described in subparagraphs (A) to (O) of this para-
graph.
(c) Intensive case management for  persons who are contacted by the program to assist
those persons in obtaining any needed services.
(d) The provision of culturally specific  or culturally responsive services to persons con-
tacted by the program.
(e) Proactive outreach  to work with houseless and other marginalized persons who are
at risk of coming into contact with the criminal justice system.
(6) Throughout the duration of the program, the commission shall create, maintain  and
make available on the commission’s website a data dashboard detailing the following infor-
mation:
(a) The number of persons contacted  by the program in each county, using a unique
identifier for each person.
(b) The services received by persons who were contacted by the program.
(c) The race and ethnicity of each person contacted by the program.
(d) The number of misdemeanors charged  each month by the district attorney of the
county.
(e) The number of persons who  were diverted from either first-time engagement or ad-
ditional engagement with the criminal justice system as a result of the program.
(f) The number of persons who, after engaging with the program,  experienced increased
stabilization in housing, mental health or economic independence.
(7) The commission shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 1, 2029.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to  the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $ , for funding the pilot grant program
described in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4.  ORS 137.633 is amended to read:
137.633. (1) A person convicted of a felony, a designated drug-related misdemeanor  or a desig-
[2]
SB 689
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
nated person misdemeanor and sentenced to probation, to post-prison supervision or  to the legal and
physical custody of the Department  of Corrections or the supervisory authority under ORS 137.124
(2) is eligible for a reduction  in the period of probation or post-prison supervision for complying with
terms of probation or post-prison supervision, including demonstrating a  commitment to the payment
of restitution to  the extent the person is able to pay, and participation in recidivism reduction pro-
grams.
(2) The maximum  reduction under this section may not exceed 50 percent of the period of pro-
bation or post-prison supervision imposed.
(3) A reduction under this section may not be used to shorten the period of probation or post-
prison supervision to less than six months.
(4) A person serving a sentence described as  follows is not eligible for a reduction in the term
of supervision under this section:
(a) A sentence for a crime described in ORS 163.095, 163.107, 163.115,  163.118, 163.125, 163.149,
163.185, 163.225, 163.235, 163.365, 163.375, 163.395, 163.405, 163.408, 163.411, 163.427, 163.670, 164.325,
164.415 or 167.017;
(b) A sentence for attempt or conspiracy to  commit a crime described in ORS 163.095, 163.107
or 163.115;
(c) A sentence for a crime committed prior to November 1, 1989;
(d) A sentence imposed under the provisions of ORS 161.610;
(e) A sentence imposed under the provisions of ORS 161.725 and 161.735;
(f) A sentence imposed under the provisions of ORS 137.635;
(g) A sentence imposed under the provisions of ORS 137.690, 164.061, 475.907,  475.925, 475.930
or 813.011; or
(h) A term of supervision subject to ORS 144.103.
(5)(a) The Department of Corrections shall adopt rules to carry out  the provisions of this sec-
tion.
(b) The rules adopted under this subsection shall include but are not limited to:
(A) Rules creating processes for early and ongoing notification of eligibility for an  earned re-
duction in supervision under this section to persons on supervision; [ and]
(B) Rules requiring supervising  officers to provide quarterly updates on progress toward
earning a reduction in supervision under this section to  persons on supervision who are eli-
gible for the reduction; and
[(B)] (C)  Rules establishing consistent standards for determining when a person on  supervision
is in compliance with the requirements for, and has succeeded in, earning  a reduction in supervision
under this section.
(c) The supervisory authority shall comply with the rules adopted under this subsection.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
(b) “Designated person misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
SECTION 5.
 Section 2, chapter 450, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  The amendments to ORS 137.633  by section 1 , [ of this 2021 Act ] chapter 450, Oregon
Laws 2021, apply to sentences imposed before, on or after [ the effective date of this 2021 Act ] Jan-
uary 1, 2022.
[3]