Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2024 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 458.
SECTION 2. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall purchase  from
a local government the right to collect a past-due debt  from a developer, if the debt is based
on a deferred system development charge as  described in subsection (2) of this section. In
purchasing a debt under this section, the department shall pay the amount originally due.
(2) For a debt to be eligible for purchase by the department under  this section, it must
arise from an agreement between a local government and a developer,  in a form required by
the department, in which the parties agree that:
(a) The developer will construct one or more dwelling units.
(b) The local government will defer the collection  of a system development charge, as
defined in ORS 223.299, from the developer until 180 days after the date that any dwelling unit
in the development project has been certified for occupancy.
(c) The developer will not pay any interest  or fees on the system development charge
based on the charge’s deferral.
(d) If  the debt becomes owed to the department under this section, the department will
assess an additional 20 percent fee  on the past-due balance plus interest on all amounts at
the rate specified in ORS 82.010.
(3) Upon purchasing a debt under this section, the department shall assess  the fees and
interest allowed under subsection (2)(d) of this section  and make reasonable efforts to collect
the debt, including assigning the debt to the Department of Revenue for collection  under
ORS 293.250.
(4) Payments made by the Housing and Community Services  Department to purchase and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 241
HB 4099
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
collect the debt  under this section must be paid from available moneys in the Municipal De-
velopment Protection Fund established under section 3 of this 2024 Act. The  net amount of
moneys collected under this section must be credited to the fund.
(5) Moneys received by a local government under this section must be treated as pay-
ments of the system development charge and used for the purposes allowed  under ORS
223.307.
(6) As used in this section “local government” means any  local government as defined in
ORS 174.116 that is authorized to impose or collect  a system development charge under ORS
223.297 to 223.316.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Municipal Development Protection Fund is  established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Municipal Development  Protection Fund consists of moneys collected by the
Housing and Community Services Department under section 2 of this  2024 Act and moneys
appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or
otherwise. Interest earned by the fund is credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department to administer
the fund and the program  described in section 2 of this 2024 Act. In each biennium, the de-
partment may not use more than four percent of the moneys in the fund at the  beginning
of the biennium for the costs of administering the fund and of implementing section 2  of this
2024 Act.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit into the Municipal De-
velopment Protection Fund established under section 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) Section 2 of this 2024 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2025.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department may  take any action before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary to enable the de-
partment to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by  sections 2 and
3 of this 2024 Act.
(3) On or before January 1, 2025, the  department shall adopt rules and model forms of
agreements to implement section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(4) Section 2 of this 2024 Act applies  only to agreements between a local government and
a developer entered into on or after January 1, 2025.
(5) Notwithstanding section 3 (3) of this 2024 Act, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025,
the department may spend not more than $200,000 from the  Municipal Development Pro-
tection Fund under section 3  of this 2024 Act for the costs of administering the fund and the
program described in section 2 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]