Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 192.705 is amended to read:
192.705. (1) A person who believes that a governing body has acted in violation  of ORS 192.610
to 192.705 may, within 30 days of the alleged violation, file a written grievance with the public  body
whose governing body is alleged to have violated ORS 192.610 to  192.705, setting forth the specific
facts and circumstances that the person asserts amounted to a  violation of ORS 192.610 to 192.705.
The grievance must state the identity of the person filing the grievance  and any other information
required by the Oregon Government Ethics Commission by rule.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a person who believes that  a governing
body has acted in violation of a provision of ORS 192.640, 192.650, 192.660 or 192.670 that re-
lates to the rules and requirements for executive sessions may, within one year of the alleged
violation, file a  written grievance with the public body whose governing body is alleged to
have violated ORS 192.640, 192.650, 192.660 or 192.670, setting forth the specific facts and cir-
cumstances that the person asserts amounted to a violation of a provision of  ORS 192.640,
192.650, 192.660 or 192.670 that relates to executive sessions. The grievance  must state the
identity of the person filing the grievance and  any other information required by the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission by rule.
[(2)] (3) A public body receiving a written grievance filed under this section shall, within 21 days
of the receipt of the grievance, provide a written response to the person:
(a) Acknowledging receipt of the grievance; and
(b)(A) Denying that the facts and circumstances as set forth in the grievance accurately  reflect
the conduct of the governing body and setting forth the facts and  circumstances as determined by
the public body and the reasons  why those facts and circumstances do not amount to a violation
of ORS 192.610 to 192.705;
(B) Admitting  that the facts and circumstances as set forth in the grievance accurately reflect
the conduct of the governing body but denying that those facts and circumstances amount to a vi-
olation of ORS 192.610 to 192.705; or
(C) Admitting that the conduct of  the governing body amounted to a violation of ORS 192.610
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4468
HB 3638
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
to 192.705 and setting forth the steps the governing body will take to cure the  violation, including
but not limited to:
(i) Rescinding the decision taken by the governing  body in violation of ORS 192.610 to 192.705;
or
(ii) Acknowledging in a properly noticed and conducted public meeting held within  45 days of
the governing body’s original decision that:
(I) The original decision was made in violation of ORS 192.610 to 192.705;
(II) Good cause exists for the governing body to not rescind the decision; and
(III) The governing  body’s practices will be modified to ensure future violations of ORS 192.610
to 192.705 do not occur.
[(3)] (4) The public body shall send a copy of the written  grievance and the public body’s re-
sponse under this  section to the Oregon Government Ethics Commission at the time the public body
responds to the person who filed the grievance.
[2]