Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2021 Act:
(a) “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
(b) “Mobile vendor” means a sidewalk vendor who  moves from place to place, stopping
only to complete a transaction.
(c) “Sidewalk vendor” means a person who uses a pushcart,  stand, display, pedal-driven
cart, wagon, showcase, rack or other  conveyance or only the person’s body as a means to
sell food or merchandise on a public sidewalk or pedestrian path.
(d) “Temporary special use permit” means a permit that a local government  issues for
the purpose  of allowing uses of or encroachments onto sidewalks, streets or other public
areas for purposes that include, but are  not limited to, filming, parades or outdoor concerts.
(2) For the purposes of sections 1 to  5 of this 2021 Act, regulation that responds to per-
ceived community animus or economic competition  is not regulation that directly addresses
objective concerns about public health, safety or welfare.
SECTION 2.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a local  government may not
enact an ordinance, resolution, rule or other legislative measure that regulates the  oper-
ations of sidewalk vendors except in accordance with sections 1 to 5 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The prohibition described in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A local government ordinance,  resolution, rule or legislative measure that regulates
public health or safety and that applies to persons who sell food; or
(b) A restriction,  limitation or prohibition on the operations of sidewalk vendors in the
immediate vicinity of:
(A) A farmer’s market or swap meet during the hours in which the  farmer’s market or
swap meet is in operation; or
(B) An area that is subject to a temporary  special use permit for the period of time
during which the temporary special use permit is in effect, except that to the extent the local
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1589
HB 2568
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
government provides any notice,  business interruption mitigation or other rights to busi-
nesses or property owners affected by  the temporary special use permit, the local govern-
ment shall provide the same or  similar notice, business interruption mitigation or other
rights to sidewalk vendors that ordinarily operate in the area that is subject  to the tempo-
rary special use permit.
(3) Sections 1 to 5 of this 2021  Act do not require a local government to enact a new
regulatory program for sidewalk vendors if the local government  has enacted an existing
regulatory program that substantially complies with sections 1 to 5 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) Except as otherwise  provided in this section, a local government by or-
dinance, resolution, rule or other legislative measure may not, with respect to  sidewalk
vendors:
(a) Require operations within a specific part of  a public right-of-way, a specific neigh-
borhood or a designated area unless the  requirement directly addresses objective concerns
about public health, safety or welfare, except that the local government may prohibit  side-
walk vendors from  operating stationary facilities within neighborhoods that are zoned for
exclusive residential use, but may not restrict or prohibit mobile  vendors from selling food
or merchandise in residential neighborhoods.
(b) Prohibit sales of food or merchandise within a public park that the  local government
owns or operates, except that:
(A) If an  exclusive agreement between a local government and a concessionaire prohibits
other persons from operating  stationary vending facilities within the public park, the local
government may prohibit sidewalk vendors that operate a  stationary facility from operating
the stationary facility within the public park; and
(B) The local government may specify times, places and manners in which sidewalk ven-
dors sell food or merchandise if the specifications are necessary to:
(i) Directly address objective concerns about public health, safety or welfare;
(ii) Ensure public access to and use  and enjoyment of natural resources and recreational
opportunities within the boundaries of the public park; or
(iii) Prevent a concentration of commercial activity that unreasonably interferes with the
scenic and natural character of the public park.
(c) Require the consent,  permission or approval of any individual or entity, other than a
public body as defined in ORS 174.109, for the sidewalk vendor  to sell food or merchandise in
public rights-of-way.
(d) Limit or restrict the number of sidewalk vendors  within the local government’s ju-
risdiction unless the limitation or restriction  directly addresses objective concerns about
public health, safety or welfare.
(2) A local government by ordinance, resolution, rule  or other legislative measure may
regulate the following aspects of  a sidewalk vendor’s operations if the regulation directly
addresses objective concerns about public health, safety or welfare:
(a) Hours  of operation. The local government may set hours of operation that are not
unduly restrictive and, in  nonresidential areas, are not more restrictive than hours of oper-
ation permitted for businesses or uses on the same street.
(b) Sanitary conditions. The  local government may require sidewalk vendors to comply
with applicable sanitary regulations.
(c) Access for individuals with  disabilities. The local government may require compliance
[2]
HB 2568
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
with the federal Americans with  Disabilities Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-336) and otherwise appli-
cable regulations and standards for access by individuals with disabilities.
(d) Permits for operation. The local government may  require sidewalk vendors to obtain,
possess and  display upon request a permit or license from the local government. The local
government must accept from an applicant for a permit or license a  driver license,
government-issued identification or taxpayer identification number in lieu  of a Social Secu-
rity number if  the local government otherwise requires a Social Security number from an
applicant. The local government shall maintain the confidentiality of the identification the
applicant provides and may not disclose the identification except  as necessary to administer
the local government permit program or to comply  with the laws of this state or with a state
or federal court order.
(e) Taxation. The local government may  require a sidewalk vendor, as a condition of ob-
taining or retaining a permit or license, to comply with all applicable tax laws.
(f) Additional licenses.  The local government may require a sidewalk vendor to obtain and
maintain other licenses or permits from state or local  agencies to the extent required under
applicable law.
(g) Information about operations. The local government may require a sidewalk  vendor
to submit information about the sidewalk vendor’s operations and to  certify that to the best
of the sidewalk vendor’s knowledge and belief the information submitted is accurate and
true. The information may include, but is not limited to:
(A) The sidewalk vendor’s name and current address;
(B) A description of the food or merchandise the sidewalk vendor  sells or offers for sale;
(C) The numbers of any licenses or permits the sidewalk vendor currently  holds and the
names of the agencies that issued the licenses or permits; and
(D) The name and address of any principal for which the sidewalk vendor is an agent.
SECTION 4.
(1) A local government may not  punish a violation of a local government
ordinance, resolution, rule or other legislative  measure that regulates the operations of
sidewalk vendors unless the regulatory program complies  with the requirements of sections
1 to 5 of this 2021 Act.
(2) A local government may punish violations  of an ordinance, resolution, rule or other
legislative measure  that regulates the operations of sidewalk vendors in compliance with
sections 1 to 5 of this 2021 Act only by:
(a) Imposing a fine of not more than $100 for a first violation;
(b) Imposing a fine of not more than $200 for a second violation  that occurs within one
year after a first violation;
(c) Imposing a  fine of not more than $500 for each additional violation that occurs within
one year of a previous violation; or
(d) Revoking any license or permit for engaging in  business as a sidewalk vendor that the
local government issued to the violator if the violation is a forth or subsequent violation.
(3) If a local government requires a permit or license to engage in business as a sidewalk
vendor, the local government  may, in lieu of the punishments set forth in subsection (2) of
this section, punish a person who engages in business as a sidewalk vendor without the  re-
quired permit or license only by:
(a) Imposing a fine of not more than $250 for a first violation;
(b) Imposing a fine of  not more than $500 for a second violation that occurs within one
[3]
HB 2568
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
year after the first violation;
(c) Imposing a fine of not more than $1,000 for each additional  violation that occurs
within one year of the previous violation.
(4) A local government shall reduce the fines set forth in subsection (3) of this  section
to the corresponding fines set forth in subsection (2) of this section  if the person subject to
the fine provides proof of possessing a valid permit or license from the local government.
(5) In  imposing a fine under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, a local government shall
take into account a person’s ability to pay the  fine and shall provide the person with notice
of the right to request a determination of the person’s ability to pay and forms and  in-
structions necessary  to apply for the determination. The person may request a determination
as to the person’s ability to pay the fine at any time before payment is due. If the  local
government determines that paying the  fine will create an undue hardship for the person,
the local government shall accept a payment of 20 percent of the  amount of the fine as full
satisfaction of the amount due.
(6)(a) A local government may not arrest  or impose any criminal liability upon a person
that violates an ordinance, resolution, rule  or other legislative measure that regulates the
operations of sidewalk vendors or for failing to pay a fine the local  government imposes un-
der this subsection.
(b) A local government may not impose any  fines, fees, assessments or other financial
conditions for a violation of  an ordinance, resolution, rule or other legislative measure that
regulates the  operations of sidewalk vendors other than the fines set forth in subsections (2)
and (3) of this section.
(c) In lieu of the fines set  forth in subsection (2) or (3) of this section, a local government
may permit a person to complete community service. The local  government may, at the local
government’s discretion, waive  or reduce a fine or may offer an alternative disposition for
a violation.
(7) The local government shall deposit into the local  government’s treasury the proceeds
of any fine the local government imposes under this section.
SECTION 5.
(1) To the extent that a person is subject to a fine or to criminal  liability for
violating a local government ordinance, resolution, rule  or other legislative measure that
regulates the operations of sidewalk  vendors but does not comply with sections 1 to 5 of this
2021 Act, the local government  shall rescind the fine and a court shall dismiss any pending
criminal charges.
(2) If a person is subject  to a fine or is serving or has completed a sentence following a
conviction for violating an ordinance, resolution, rule  or other legislative measure that reg-
ulates the operations of sidewalk vendors but does not comply  with sections 1 to 5 of this
2021 Act, and if the person would  not have been subject to the fine or sentence had the local
government’s ordinance, resolution, rule or  other legislative measure complied with sections
1 to 5 of this 2021 Act, the person may petition the  administrative body that imposed the fine
or the court that imposed the sentence to rescind the fine,  to reverse the conviction or to
set aside or commute the sentence.
(3) An administrative body or court that receives a petition  described in subsection (2)
of this section shall presume that the petitioner qualifies for a rescission  of the fine, a re-
versal of  the conviction or a commutation or setting aside of the sentence and shall grant
the proposed relief without requiring a hearing unless a party that opposes  the petition
[4]
HB 2568
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
proves by clear and convincing evidence that the petition does not allege a proper ground  for
relief.
(4) This section does not diminish or abrogate:
(a) Any rights or remedies a petitioner might otherwise have under law; or
(b) The finality of a judgment in a case that is not subject to sections 1 to 5 of  this 2021
Act.
[5]