Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a grant program for the
purpose of making grants from the Pregnant Women’s Assistance Fund  established under
section 2 of this 2017 Act. Under the program, the authority shall make grants to entities:
(a) That are qualified as specified in subsection (2) of this section; and
(b)(A) That inform pregnant or postpartum women  about agencies or organizations that
provide services described in subsection (3) of this section;
(B) That refer pregnant or postpartum women to  agencies or organizations that provide
services described in subsection (3) of this section;
(C) That assist, in a manner not described  in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this para-
graph, pregnant or postpartum women in receiving services  from agencies or organizations
that provide services described in subsection (3) of this section; or
(D) That directly provide services described in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) To be qualified to receive a grant under this section, an entity must:
(a) Be a private nonprofit organization.
(b) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the authority that the entity:
(A) Provides for the proper supervision of activities conducted by the entity;
(B) Primarily will use grant moneys to encourage or assist  pregnant women in carrying
their pregnancies to term; and
(C) Will  not use grant moneys to encourage or assist pregnant women in having
abortions unless an abortion is necessary to avoid impairment of a pregnant  woman’s major
bodily functions.
(c) Provide each  pregnant woman who receives assistance from the entity with informa-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1614
HB 2125
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion on:
(A) Fetal development, including a week-by-week description of fetal characteristics;
(B) Adequate medical care for pregnant women and newborns; and
(C) Adequate nutrition for pregnant women and newborns.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, an entity  may assist a pregnant or
postpartum woman in  receiving services from an agency or organization that provides, or
an entity may directly provide, one or more of the following services:
(a) Medical care for pregnant or postpartum women;
(b) Nutritional support services for pregnant or postpartum women;
(c) Adoption services;
(d) Parenting education;
(e) Parenting support services;
(f) Assistance in acquiring housing; or
(g) Assistance in acquiring further education or finding employment.
(4) The authority may pay expenses incurred by  the authority in administering this sec-
tion out of moneys that are available to the authority for the purpose  of making grants un-
der this section.
(5) The authority may adopt rules necessary to administer this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Pregnant Women’s Assistance Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the Pregnant
Women’s Assistance Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority for
purposes described in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(3) The authority may accept  from any source any grant, donation or gift of moneys for
deposit in the fund.
SECTION 3. At a  minimum, the following amounts of moneys shall be appropriated to the
Oregon Health Authority for deposit in the Pregnant Women’s Assistance  Fund established
under section 2 of this 2017 Act:
(1) For the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, the average amount of moneys per biennium
expended by the Oregon Health Authority on  reimbursing abortions as part of the state’s
medical assistance  program during the biennia beginning July 1, 2003, July 1, 2005, July 1,
2007, July 1, 2009, July 1, 2011, July 1, 2013, and July 1, 2015; and
(2) For each biennium subsequent to the biennium beginning on July 1, 2017:
(a) The amount of moneys appropriated for the preceding biennium; and
(b) An amount of moneys equal to any percentage increase in the cost-of-living,  based
on the Portland-Salem,  OR-WA, Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for All
Items published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United  States Department of Labor,
that has occurred since  the beginning of the preceding biennium multiplied by the amount
of moneys appropriated for the preceding biennium.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority  may reimburse abortions as part of the
state’s medical assistance program only if the abortion is performed  for one of the following
reasons:
(a) The abortion is necessary to avoid impairment of the pregnant  woman’s major bodily
functions; or
(b) The pregnancy is the result of rape or incest.
[2]
HB 2125
1
2
3
4
5
(2) The authority shall  adopt rules necessary to verify that reimbursement of abortions
as part of the state’s medical assistance program is in compliance with this section.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act shall be submitted to the people for their  approval or rejection
at the next regular general election held throughout this state.
[3]