Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “qualifying school” means a building or  preman-
ufactured structure that is used to provide educational  services to children in any grade
from kindergarten through grade 12 and that  has received a distribution for seismic reha-
bilitation from the Education Seismic Fund pursuant to ORS 286A.768.
(2) To recognize and honor Senator Peter Courtney’s contributions  for his role in sup-
porting seismic rehabilitation funding for schools in  this state, the Department of Education
shall design a memorial plaque. Plaques must be made from durable materials.
(3) The Oregon Business  Development Department shall provide the Department of Ed-
ucation a list of schools that have received distributions from the Education Seismic Fund
under ORS 286A.768 on or after January  1, 2009. The Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment shall update the list  and provide it to the Department of Education at least once each
calendar year.
(4) After receiving a list, or updated list, of qualifying schools from  the Oregon Business
Development Department under subsection (3) of  this section, the Department of Education
shall create and provide a memorial plaque to each qualifying school.
(5) A qualifying school that receives a memorial plaque shall:
(a) Prominently display the plaque outdoors near the school’s front entrance so that it
is easily viewable by visitors to the school; and
(b) Mount the plaque for display not later than one year after the  date of receiving the
plaque.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 942