Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 536.
SECTION 2. (1) Subject to  subsection (2) of this section, an annual management fee of
$100 is imposed on each primary and each supplemental water  right held for waters of this
state under a water right  permit, water right certificate, decree or groundwater registration.
Each water right  is subject to a single management fee regardless of the number of docu-
ments setting forth the water right.
(2) If a water right holder is other than a municipality or provider of  water for municipal
purposes, the total amount of water right management fees that may be  imposed on the
water right  holder under this section may not exceed $1,000 annually regardless of the
number of water rights held. If  a water right holder is a municipality or provider of water
for municipal purposes, the total amount of water right management fees  that may be im-
posed on the water right holder under this section may not exceed $2,500  annually regardless
of the number of water rights held.
(3) The Water Resources  Commission shall adopt rules providing for the Water Re-
sources Department to assess and  collect the water right management fee imposed under
this section. Moneys collected under this section shall  be deposited into the Water Resources
Department Water Right Operating Fund.
(4) If a water right management fee imposed under this section is not paid when  due,
after providing the water right holder with notice and opportunity for hearing under ORS
chapter 183, the department may issue an order for payment of the  delinquent amount and
forward the order for enforcement through collection. The department may not regulate  or
limit water use due to nonpayment of a water right management fee.
SECTION 3.  ORS 536.009 is amended to read:
536.009. (1) There  is established in the State Treasury the Water Resources Department Water
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1925
SB 770
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
Right Operating Fund, separate and distinct from the  General Fund[ , to provide for the payment of
the program and administrative expenses of the Water Resources Commission and  the Water Resources
Department in carrying out the provisions of ORS chapters  536, 537, 540 and 541 ]. Interest earned by
the Water Resources Department Water Right Operating Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The fund shall consist of:
(a) All moneys received under ORS 536.050 and 537.747  and section 2 of this 2017 Act .
(b) All  moneys received on behalf of the fund by gift, grant or appropriation from whatever
source.
(3) [ All] Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Water Resources Department
[for payment of expenses as described in this section. ] to provide for  the payment of the program
and administrative expenses of the Water Resources Commission and  the department in
carrying out the provisions of ORS chapters  536, 537, 540 and 541. However, moneys deposited
into the fund from water right management fees  imposed under section 2 of this 2017 Act
may be used only to fund field, technical, scientific and administrative activities of the de-
partment that are directly related to water rights management, including, but not limited
to, the undertaking of groundwater investigations in coordination with the United  States
Geological Survey.
SECTION 4.
(1) Section 2 of this 2017 Act first applies to the period beginning July 1, 2017.
If this 2017 Act does  not become effective until after July 1, 2017, the Legislative Assembly
intends that the Water Resources Commission and the Water Resources Department be  au-
thorized to apply section 2 of this 2017 Act and the amendments to ORS 536.009 by section 3
of this 2017 Act  retroactively to allow assessment and collection of the water right manage-
ment fee for the period beginning July 1, 2017.
(2) Subject to the class and uniformity requirements  imposed by Article I, section 32, of
the Oregon  Constitution, notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the commission and
the department may  implement the assessment and collection of the fees described in section
2 of this 2017 Act in stages during the period beginning July 1, 2017, and ending July 1,  2019.
(3) No later than 90 days after the effective date of this  2017 Act, the commission shall
adopt temporary rules to:
(a) Subject to subsection (2) of this section,  enable the department to assess and collect
the water right management fees owed for the period beginning July 1, 2017; and
(b) Guide the geographic distribution of department  expenditures of water right man-
agement fees under ORS 536.009 (3).
SECTION 5.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]