Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 565.447 is amended to read:
565.447. (1) Subject only  to the availability of unobligated net lottery proceeds, there is allocated
from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the  County Fair Account created
under ORS 565.445 an amount equal to one percent of  the net proceeds from the Oregon State
Lottery[ , but not to exceed $1.53 million annually, adjusted biennially pursuant to an  inflation factor
determined by dividing the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All  Items),
as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor,  for January
1 immediately preceding commencement  of the biennium, by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers of the Portland, Oregon, Standard Metropolitan Statistical Area, as compiled by  the United
States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for January 1, 2001 ].
(2) The allocation of moneys from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund un-
der this section is subject to the requirements in section 4,  Article XV of the Oregon Constitution,
for deposit of specified amounts of  the net proceeds from the Oregon State Lottery into the Educa-
tion Stability Fund and into the Parks and Natural Resources Fund and shall  be made only after
satisfaction or payment of:
(a) Amounts allocated to Westside lottery bonds issued  under ORS 391.140 or to the reserves
or any refunding related to the Westside lottery bonds in  accordance with the priority for allocation
and disbursement established by ORS 391.130;
(b) All liens, pledges or other obligations relating to lottery  bonds or refunding lottery bonds
due or payable during the year for which an allocation is to be made; and
(c) Amounts required by any other pledges of, or liens on, net proceeds from  the Oregon State
Lottery.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop  a master
plan for county fairground capital construction. The master plan shall consist of  five-year
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2496
HB 2436
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
and 10-year capital construction plans for each county fairground  in this state and any
findings or recommendations of the  department regarding county fairground capital con-
struction.
(2) The department shall  retain a consultant to work with each county fair board, the
board of directors for each fair association exercising powers  under ORS 565.268 and the
board of  each fair district operating under ORS 565.275 to identify the five-year and 10-year
capital construction needs for county fairground facilities. The  department shall work with
the consultant in developing the master plan for county fairground capital construction.
(3) The department shall complete the master plan and shall report the  plan in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245 to  the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly during the 2024
regular session. The department shall provide copies of the report to each county fair  board
and to the boards for each fair association and fair district.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $250,000, which may be expended by the de-
partment for consultant services described under section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of this 2023 Act is repealed on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]