Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 58.375 is amended to read:
58.375. (1) In a professional corporation organized for the purpose of practicing medicine:
(a) Physicians who are licensed in this state to practice  medicine must hold the majority of each
class of shares that are entitled to vote.
(b) Physicians who are licensed in this state to  practice medicine must be a majority of the di-
rectors.
(c) All officers except the  secretary and treasurer, if any, must be physicians who are licensed
in this state to practice medicine. The same person may hold any two or more offices.
(d) Except as otherwise provided by law, the Oregon Medical Board may expressly  require that
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 9
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
physicians who are licensed in this state  to practice medicine hold more than a majority of each
class of shares that is entitled to vote.
(e) Except as otherwise provided by law, the Oregon Medical Board may expressly require  that
physicians who are licensed in this state to practice medicine be more  than a majority of the di-
rectors.
(f)(A) A shareholder, director or officer may not participate in managing  the professional
corporation and may not vote shares in the professional corporation on any issue  or corpo-
rate action that bears on the  ownership, management or governance of the professional
corporation if the shareholder, director or officer is simultaneously a shareholder,  director,
member, officer or employee of a management services organization with which the profes-
sional corporation has a contract.
(B) Subparagraph (A) of this paragraph does not apply if a professional corporation  or-
ganized for the purpose of practicing medicine  owns a majority of the interest in the man-
agement services organization.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, a professional corporation
organized for the purpose of practicing medicine may not provide  in the professional
corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws, or by means of  a contract or other agree-
ment or arrangement, for removing a director described in  subsection (1)(b) of this section
from the professional corporation’s board of directors, or an officer described in subsection
(1)(c) of this section from an office of the professional corporation, except by a  majority vote
of the  shareholders described in subsection (1)(a) of this section or, as appropriate, a ma-
jority vote of the directors described in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(b) A professional corporation organized  for the purpose of practicing medicine may re-
move a director or officer by means other than a  majority vote of the shareholders described
in subsection (1)(a) of this section or a majority vote of the directors described in subsection
(1)(b) of this section if the director or officer that is subject to removal:
(A) Violated a duty of care, a duty  of loyalty or another fiduciary duty to the professional
corporation;
(B) Was the subject of  a disciplinary proceeding by the Oregon Medical Board in which
the board suspended or revoked the director’s or officer’s license  to practice medicine in this
state; or
(C) Engaged in fraud, misfeasance or malfeasance  with respect to the director’s or
officer’s performance of duties for or on behalf of the professional corporation.
(3)(a) Except as provided in  paragraph (c) of this subsection, a professional corporation
organized for the purpose  of practicing medicine may not provide in the professional
corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws, by means of a contract or other agreement
or arrangement or by means of an agreement to restrict the transfer of shares of  the pro-
fessional corporation, for relinquishing  control or otherwise transferring control over the
professional corporation’s assets, business operations or clinical decisions.
(b) The prohibition described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection applies to any action in
which the professional corporation:
(A) Sells, encumbers or transfers substantially all of the  professional corporation’s as-
sets;
(B) Issues shares of stock in the professional corporation or pays dividends;
(C) Hires,  terminates, evaluates the performance of, or sets work schedules or compen-
[2]
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sation or otherwise specifies terms of employment for, employees who are licensed  to prac-
tice medicine in this state or who are licensed in this state as physician assistants  or nurse
practitioners;
(D) Establishes staffing levels for any location that serves patients;
(E) Advertises the professional corporation’s services;
(F) Controls diagnostic coding decisions, establishes  clinical standards and protocols or
makes policies for patient, client or customer billing and collection;
(G) Enters  into, performs, enforces or terminates contracts with persons that are not
employees of the professional corporation; or
(H) Undertakes any other action that directly inhibits, conditions or interferes with the
clinical decisions or decision making processes of a physician, physician assistant  or nurse
practitioner that  the professional corporation employs or with whom the professional cor-
poration has a contract for services.
(c) A professional corporation organized for the purpose  of practicing medicine may re-
linquish or  transfer control over the professional corporation’s assets or business operations
or may cede control over the professional corporation’s clinical decisions only by  means of
an executed shareholder agreement that:
(A) Is exclusively between or among and for the benefit  of a majority of shareholders
who are physicians licensed in this state to practice medicine; and
(B) Complies with the provisions of ORS 60.265.
[(2)] (4) A professional corporation may be a  shareholder of a professional corporation organized
for the purpose of practicing medicine solely for the purpose of effecting a reorganization as  defined
in the Internal Revenue Code.
[(3)(a)] (5)(a)  The provisions of subsections (1) [ and (2)] to (4)  of this section do not apply to:
(A) A nonprofit corporation that is organized under [ Oregon law ] the laws of  this state  to
provide medical services to migrant, rural,  homeless or other medically underserved populations
under 42 U.S.C. 254b or 254c, as in effect on [ January 1, 2018 ] the effective  date of this 2024
Act;
(B) A health center that is qualified under 42  U.S.C. 1396d(1)(2)(B), as in effect on [ January 1,
2018] the effective date of this 2024 Act , that operates in  compliance with other applicable state
or federal law; or
(C) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a for-profit or nonprofit business en-
tity that is incorporated or organized under the laws of this state, that provides the entirety of the
business entity’s medical services through  one or more rural health clinics, as defined in 42 U.S.C.
1395x, as in effect on [ January 1, 2018 ] the effective date of this 2024 Act , and that operates in
compliance with state and federal laws that apply to rural health clinics.
(b) A business entity  is exempt under this subsection for a period of up to one year after the
business entity establishes a rural health clinic, even though  the rural health clinic that the busi-
ness entity establishes does not  meet all of the elements of the definition set forth in 42 U.S.C.
1395x, as in effect on  [ January 1, 2018 ] the effective date of this 2024 Act , if during the one-year
period an applicable certification for the rural health clinic is pending.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 58.376 is amended to read:
58.376. (1) As used in this section, “licensee” means an individual who has a  license as a phy-
sician or a  license as a physician assistant from the Oregon Medical Board or who has a license
as a nurse practitioner from the Oregon State Board of Nursing.
[3]
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2)(a) In  a professional corporation that is organized for the purpose of allowing physicians,
physician assistants and  nurse practitioners to jointly render professional health care services,
licensees must:
[(a)] (A)  Hold a majority of each class of shares of the professional corporation  that is entitled
to vote; and
[(b)] (B)  Be a majority of the directors of the professional corporation.
(b) All officers of a professional corporation described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection,
except the secretary and treasurer, if any, must be licensees. The same person  may hold any
two or more offices.
(3) An individual whom the professional corporation  employs, or an individual who owns an in-
terest in the professional corporation,  may not direct or control the professional judgment of a
licensee  who  is practicing within the professional corporation and within the scope of practice per-
mitted under the licensee’s license.
(4) A licensee whom the professional corporation employs, or  a licensee who owns an interest
in the professional corporation, may not direct or control the services of another  licensee who is
practicing within the professional corporation unless the other licensee is also practicing within the
scope of practice permitted under the licensee’s license.
(5)(a) A shareholder, director or officer of a professional corporation described in sub-
section (2)(a)  of this section may not participate in managing the professional corporation
and may not vote  shares in the professional corporation on any issue or corporate action
that bears on the ownership, management or governance of the professional corporation if
the shareholder, director  or officer is simultaneously a shareholder, director, member, offi-
cer or employee  of a management services organization with which the professional corpo-
ration has a contract.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply if a professional  corporation described
in subsection (2)(a) of this section owns a majority of the  interest in the management ser-
vices organization.
(6)(a) Except as provided in paragraph  (b) of this subsection, a professional corporation
described in subsection  (2)(a) of this section may not provide in the professional
corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws,  or by means of a contract or other agree-
ment or arrangement, for removing a director described  in subsection (2)(a)(B) of this sec-
tion from the professional corporation’s  board of directors, or an officer described in
subsection (2)(b) of  this section from an office of the professional corporation, except by a
majority vote of  the shareholders described in subsection (2)(a)(A) of this section or, as ap-
propriate, a majority vote of the directors described in subsection (2)(a)(B) of this section.
(b) A professional corporation described  in subsection (2)(a) of this section may remove
a director or officer by means other than a majority vote of the shareholders  described in
subsection (2)(a)(A) of this section or a majority vote  of the directors described in subsection
(2)(a)(B) of this section if the director or officer that is subject to removal:
(A) Violated a duty of care, a duty  of loyalty or another fiduciary duty to the professional
corporation;
(B) Was the subject of a disciplinary proceeding by the  regulatory board that governs the
director’s or officer’s practice as a licensee in which the  board suspended or revoked the
director’s or officer’s license; or
(C) Engaged in fraud, misfeasance or malfeasance  with respect to the director’s or
[4]
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
officer’s performance of duties for or on behalf of the professional corporation.
(7)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this  subsection, a professional corporation
described in subsection (2)(a) of this section may not provide in  the professional
corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws, by means of a contract or other agreement
or arrangement or by means of  an agreement to restrict the transfer of shares of the public
corporation, for  relinquishing control or otherwise transferring control over the professional
corporation’s assets, business operations or clinical decisions.
(b) The prohibition described in paragraph (a) of this  subsection applies to any action in
which the professional corporation:
(A) Sells, encumbers or  transfers substantially all of the professional corporation’s as-
sets;
(B) Issues shares of stock in the professional corporation or pays dividends;
(C) Hires, terminates, evaluates the performance of, or sets work schedules or  compen-
sation or otherwise  specifies terms of employment for, employees who are licensed to prac-
tice medicine in  this state or who are licensed in this state as physician assistants or nurse
practitioners;
(D) Establishes staffing levels for any location that serves patients;
(E) Advertises the professional corporation’s services;
(F) Controls diagnostic coding decisions, establishes  clinical standards and protocols or
makes policies for patient, client or customer billing and collection;
(G) Enters into, performs, enforces or terminates contracts with persons that are  not
employees of the professional corporation; or
(H) Undertakes any other action that directly inhibits, conditions or interferes with the
clinical decisions or  decision making processes of a physician, physician assistant or nurse
practitioner that the professional corporation employs or with whom the professional  cor-
poration has a contract for services.
(c) A professional corporation described in subsection (2)(a) of this section may relinquish
or transfer  control over the professional corporation’s assets or business operations or may
cede control over the professional  corporation’s clinical decisions only by means of an exe-
cuted shareholder agreement that:
(A) Is exclusively between or among  and for the benefit of a majority of shareholders
described in subsection (2)(a)(B) of this section; and
(B) Complies with the provisions of ORS 60.265.
[(5)] (8)  A professional  corporation that is subject to ORS 58.375 may elect to become subject
to this section by amending the professional corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 58.381 is amended to read:
58.381. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a proxy  to vote the
shares of a professional corporation organized for the purpose  of practicing medicine may be given
under the following conditions:
[(a)] (A)  If the shareholder granting  the proxy is a physician licensed in this state to practice
medicine, the proxy may be given only to a shareholder of the same corporation who is also a  phy-
sician licensed in this state to practice  medicine, or to an attorney licensed to practice law in this
state or another person similarly licensed.
[(b)] (B)  If the shareholder granting the proxy is not  a physician licensed in this state to prac-
tice medicine, the proxy may be given only to another shareholder of the same  corporation, whether
[5]
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or not the other shareholder is a physician licensed in this state  to practice medicine, or to an at-
torney licensed to practice law in this state or another person similarly licensed.
(b) A shareholder may  not give a proxy to vote the shares of a professional corporation
organized for the purpose of practicing  medicine or a professional corporation organized for
the purpose of allowing physicians, physician assistants and nurse practitioners to  jointly
render professional health care services  if the shareholder is also a shareholder, director,
member, officer or employee of a management services organization with which the profes-
sional corporation has a contract.
(2) [ No] A  voting trust may  not  be created  to vote the shares of a professional corporation or-
ganized for the purpose of practicing medicine.
(3) Two or  more shareholders of a professional corporation organized for the purpose of prac-
ticing medicine may enter into a voting agreement provided that the voting  agreement does not
transfer voting rights from a shareholder who is a physician  licensed in this state to practice med-
icine  to  a shareholder who is not so licensed. Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection,
voting rights may be transferred  to an attorney licensed to practice law in this state or another
person similarly licensed.
SECTION 4.
Sections 5, 6 and 7 of  this 2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 58.
SECTION 5. As used in ORS 58.375, 58.376 and 58.381 and section 7 of  this 2024 Act,
“management services organization” means an entity that under a written agreement, and
in return for compensation, provides any or all of the following management  services to or
on behalf of a professional corporation:
(1) Payroll;
(2) Human resources;
(3) Employment screening;
(4) Employee relations; or
(5) Any other administrative or business  services that do not constitute the practice of
medicine.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority may refer to the Secretary of State,  and
may provide evidence concerning, a professional corporation’s, limited liability company’s or
limited liability partnership’s violation of the requirements of ORS 58.375, 58.376 or 58.381.
The Secretary of State shall investigate  any violation that the authority refers and, if the
Secretary of State finds that a violation has occurred, the Secretary of State  may commence
a proceeding to, as appropriate:
(a) Administratively dissolve the professional corporation or the  limited liability company
that engaged in the violation; or
(b) Revoke the registration of the limited liability partnership that  engaged in the vio-
lation.
(2) For the purposes of  a proceeding under ORS 60.651, 63.651 or 67.660, a reinstatement
under ORS 60.654, 63.654 or 67.665 or an appeal under ORS 60.657, 63.657 or 67.670:
(a) A violation of ORS 58.375, 58.376 or 58.381  is grounds under ORS 60.647 or 63.647 for
a proceeding to administratively dissolve:
(A) A professional corporation organized  for the purpose of practicing medicine or a
professional corporation organized for the purpose of  allowing physicians, physician assist-
ants and nurse practitioners to jointly render professional medical services; or
[6]
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) A limited liability company organized for a medical purpose, as  defined in ORS 63.074
(3).
(b) A violation of ORS 58.375, 58.376 or 58.381 is grounds under ORS 67.655 for  a pro-
ceeding to revoke the registration of a limited liability partnership organized for a  medical
purpose, as defined in section 10 of this 2024 Act.
(c) A professional corporation described in ORS 58.375  or 58.376 is a corporation that is
subject to the Secretary of State’s administrative dissolution authority.
(d) A limited  liability company organized for a medical purpose or a holding entity, as
defined in ORS 63.074  (3)(a), is a limited liability company that is subject to the Secretary
of State’s administrative dissolution authority.
(e) A limited liability partnership described in section 10 (2) of this  2024 Act is subject to
the Secretary of State’s administrative dissolution authority.
(3) Notwithstanding the 45-day period set  forth in ORS 60.651, 63.651 and 67.660 within
which a corporation,  limited liability company or limited liability partnership must take
action to remove grounds for dissolution or  a revocation of registration, the Secretary of
State may negotiate  a longer period of not more than seven years after the date on which
the Secretary of  State commenced the proceeding within which the professional corporation
or limited liability company must remove the  grounds for administrative dissolution or a
limited liability partnership must remove the grounds for revoking registration.
SECTION 7.
(1) As used in this section, “professional medical entity” means:
(a) A professional corporation described in ORS 58.375;
(b) A professional corporation described in ORS 58.376;
(c) A limited liability  company organized for a medical purpose, as defined in ORS 63.074
(3)(a); or
(d) A limited liability partnership organized for a medical  purpose, as defined in section
10 of this 2024 Act.
(2) A professional medical entity  shall disclose to the Oregon Health Authority the iden-
tity of each person that owns 10 percent or more of  the outstanding shares of the profes-
sional medical entity  or that under the articles of incorporation, articles of organization or
bylaws of the professional medical entity or under a contract, agreement or  other arrange-
ment, has the power to manage or  exercise significant control over the operations and poli-
cies of the professional medical entity.
(3) The authority by rule  shall prescribe the form, format, contents and manner of the
disclosure required under this  section and may compel compliance with the requirements of
this section as provided in ORS chapter 183.
(4) The authority shall make the information that a professional  medical entity discloses
under this section publicly available on the authority’s website.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 63.074 is amended to read:
63.074. (1) Except as otherwise provided by the laws of the state and in this section,  a limited
liability company formed under this chapter may conduct or promote any lawful business  or purpose
that a partnership, corporation  or professional corporation as defined in ORS 58.015 may conduct
or promote, unless the  articles of organization set forth a more limited purpose. A person may not
organize a limited liability company  under this chapter for any illegal purpose or with an intent to
fraudulently conceal any business activity from another person or a governmental agency.
(2)(a) Subject  to the laws of the state, the rules and regulations of a regulatory board of a
[7]
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
profession, if any, and the standards of professional conduct of the profession, if any, a limited  li-
ability company or members of the limited liability company  may render professional service in this
state.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, members of a limited liability company, including  members
who are managers, and who are also  professionals, as defined in ORS 58.015, are personally liable
as members of the limited liability  company to the same extent and in the same manner as provided
for shareholders of a professional corporation in ORS 58.185 and 58.187 and as  otherwise provided
in this chapter.
(3)(a) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Holding entity” means a business  entity that is organized for the purpose of holding
or owning a majority of the ownership interests in:
(i) A professional corporation;
(ii) A limited liability company that is organized for a medical purpose; or
(iii) A limited liability partnership that is organized for a medical purpose.
(B) “Medical purpose” means, as appropriate:
(i) The purpose of practicing medicine; or
(ii) The purpose of allowing physicians, physician assistants and nurse practitioners to
jointly render professional health care services.
(C) “Professional corporation” means, as appropriate:
(i) A professional corporation described in ORS 58.375; or
(ii) A professional corporation described in ORS 58.376.
(b) A limited liability company that is organized for a medical purpose, or as  a holding
entity, is  subject to ORS 58.375 or 58.376, as appropriate, and must comply with the require-
ments specified for, and the limitations imposed upon, a professional corporation and  the
shareholders, directors and  officers of a professional corporation, with respect to the limited
liability company’s or holding entity’s  ownership, control, governance and management and
the qualifications of the limited liability company’s members or managers or the holding
entity’s shareholders, members, directors, officers or managers.
(c) For the purposes described in paragraph (b) of this subsection and the  purposes of
determining the  management and control of a limited liability company organized for a
medical purpose, or of a holding entity:
(A) A member or manager of a limited liability company organized for  a medical purpose,
and a shareholder, member, director, officer or manager of a holding  entity, is equivalent to
a shareholder in a professional corporation; and
(B) The rights and obligations of a member or  manager of a limited liability company
organized for a medical purpose,  and the rights of a shareholder, member, director, officer
or manager in the holding entity, are equivalent to  the rights and obligations of a share-
holder, director or officer in a professional corporation.
[(3)] (4) A  business that is subject to regulation under another statute of the state may not be
organized under this chapter if the  business is required to be organized only under the other statute.
SECTION 9.
Section 10 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 67.
SECTION 10. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Holding entity”  means a limited liability partnership that is organized for the pur-
pose of holding or owning a majority of the ownership interests in:
(A) A professional corporation;
[8]
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) A limited liability company that is organized for a medical purpose; or
(C) A limited liability partnership that is organized for a medical purpose.
(b) “Medical purpose” means, as appropriate:
(A) The purpose of practicing medicine; or
(B) The purpose of allowing  physicians, physician assistants and nurse practitioners to
jointly render professional health care services.
(c) “Professional corporation” means, as appropriate:
(A) A professional corporation described in ORS 58.375; or
(B) A professional corporation described in ORS 58.376.
(2) A limited liability partnership that  is organized for a medical purpose, or as a holding
entity, is  subject to ORS 58.375 or 58.376, as appropriate, and must comply with the require-
ments specified for, and the limitations imposed upon, a professional corporation and  the
shareholders, directors and  officers of a professional corporation, with respect to the limited
liability partnership’s or holding  entity’s ownership, control, governance and management
and the qualifications of the limited liability partnership’s or  holding entity’s general part-
ners.
(3) For  the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section and the purposes of de-
termining the management and control of a limited liability partnership organized  for a
medical purpose, or of a holding entity:
(a) A general partner in a limited liability partnership organized for  a medical purpose,
or as a holding entity, is equivalent to a shareholder in a professional corporation; and
(b) A general partner’s rights and obligations in the limited liability partnership or hold-
ing entity are equivalent to the rights and obligations of a shareholder in a professional
corporation.
SECTION 11.
Sections 12 and 13 of this 2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 677.
SECTION 12. (1) As used in this section and section 13 of this 2024 Act:
(a) “Disciplinary action” means discrimination, dismissal, demotion,  transfer, reassign-
ment, supervisory reprimand, warning of possible dismissal or withholding of work, even  if
the action does not affect or will not affect a licensee’s compensation.
(b) “Management services organization” means an entity that under  a written agreement
and in return for compensation  provides to or on behalf of a licensee business management
services including, but not limited to, payroll, human resources, employment screening, em-
ployee relations and other similar or related services that do not constitute  the practice of
medicine.
(c) “Noncompetition agreement” means a written agreement between a  licensee and an-
other person under which  the licensee agrees that the licensee, either alone or as an em-
ployee, associate or affiliate of a third person, will not compete with the other person  in
providing products, processes  or services that are similar to the other person’s products,
processes or services for a period of time or within a  specified geographic area after termi-
nation of employment or termination of a contract under which the licensee supplied goods
to or performed services for the other person.
(d) “Nondisclosure agreement” means a written agreement under the terms of which  a
licensee must refrain from disclosing partially, fully, directly  or indirectly to any person,
other than another party to the written agreement or to a person specified in  the agreement
[9]
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
as a third-party beneficiary of the agreement:
(A) A policy, practice, process or technique the  licensee used, or that a party to the
agreement required the licensee to use, in patient care, other than individually  identifiable
health information that the licensee may not disclose under the Health  Insurance Portability
and Accountability  Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as in effect on the effective date of this 2024
Act;
(B) A policy, practice or other information about  or associated with the licensee’s em-
ployment, conditions of employment or rate or amount of pay or other compensation; or
(C) Any other information the licensee possesses or to which  the licensee has access by
reason of the licensee’s employment by, or provision of  services for or on behalf of, a party
to the agreement, other than information that is subject to protection under applicable  law
as a trade secret of, or as otherwise proprietary to, another party to the  agreement or to a
person specified in the agreement as a third-party beneficiary of the agreement.
(e) “Nondisparagement agreement” means a written agreement under which  a licensee
must refrain from making to a third party  a statement about another party to the agree-
ment or about another person  specified in the agreement as a third-party beneficiary of the
agreement, the effect of which causes  or threatens to cause harm to the other party’s or
person’s reputation, business relations or other economic interests.
(f) “Professional medical entity” means:
(A) A professional corporation described in ORS 58.375;
(B) A professional corporation described in ORS 58.376;
(C) A limited liability company organized for a medical purpose, as defined in  ORS 63.074
(3)(a); or
(D) A limited liability partnership organized for a medical purpose, as defined  in section
10 of this 2024 Act.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 653.295 (1) and (2), and except as provided  in paragraphs (b)
and (c) of this subsection, a noncompetition agreement  between a licensee and another per-
son is void and unenforceable.
(b) A noncompetition agreement that a licensee executes in connection  with the
licensee’s sale, as owner, of a medical  practice, or a sale of all or substantially all of the
operating assets of the medical practice, is enforceable to  the extent and under the terms
provided in ORS 653.295.
(c) A noncompetition  agreement between a licensee and another person is valid and en-
forceable to the extent and  under the terms provided in ORS 653.295 if the licensee is a
shareholder or member of the other person or otherwise owns  or controls an interest in the
other person.
(3)(a) A nondisclosure agreement or nondisparagement  agreement between a licensee and
a management services organization is void and unenforceable.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not limit  or otherwise affect any cause of action
that:
(A) A party to, or third-party beneficiary of, the agreement may have with respect  to a
statement of a licensee that constitutes libel, slander, a tortious interference with contrac-
tual relations or another tort for which the party has  a cause of action against the licensee;
and
(B) Does not depend upon or derive from a breach or violation of an  agreement described
[10]
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 13.
(1) A management services organization  or a professional medical entity
may not take disciplinary  action against a licensee as retaliation for, or as a consequence
of, the licensee’s violation of a nondisclosure  agreement or nondisparagement agreement or
because the licensee in good faith  disclosed or reported information that the licensee believes
is evidence of a violation of a federal or state law, rule or regulation.
(2) A management services organization or  professional medical entity that takes disci-
plinary action  against a licensee in the circumstances described in subsection (1) of this
section engages in an unlawful employment practice, as defined in ORS 659A.001, that is
subject to enforcement under ORS chapter 659A.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 441.025 is amended to read:
441.025. (1)(a) Upon receipt of  a license fee and an application to operate a health care facility
other than a long term care facility, the Oregon  Health Authority shall review the application and
conduct an in-person site inspection  of the health care facility. The authority shall issue a license
if it finds that the applicant and health care facility comply with ORS  441.015 to 441.119 and 441.993
and the rules  of the authority provided that the authority does not receive within the time specified
a certificate of noncompliance issued by the State Fire Marshal, deputy,  or approved authority
pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(b) The authority shall, following  payment of the fee, annually renew each license issued under
this subsection unless:
(A) The health care facility’s license has been suspended or revoked; or
(B) The State Fire  Marshal, a deputy or an approved authority has issued a certificate of non-
compliance pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(2)(a) Upon receipt of a license fee and an application to operate  a long term care facility, the
Department of Human Services shall review the application and conduct  an in-person site inspection
of the long term care facility, including an inspection of the kitchen  and other areas where food is
prepared for residents.  The department shall issue a license if the department finds that the appli-
cant and long term care  facility comply with ORS 441.015 to 441.119 and 441.993 and the rules of
the department provided that it does not receive within the time specified a certificate of  noncom-
pliance issued by the State Fire Marshal, deputy, or approved authority pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(b) The department shall, following an in-person site inspection and payment of  the fee, annually
renew each license issued under this subsection unless:
(A) The long term care facility’s license has been suspended or revoked;
(B) The long term care facility is found not to be in substantial  compliance, following the in-
person site inspection, with  ORS 441.015 to 441.119, 441.993 and 443.012 and the rules of the de-
partment;
(C) The long term care facility has failed an inspection of the kitchen or other  areas where food
is prepared for residents that was  conducted by the department in accordance with ORS 443.417,
except as provided in ORS 443.417 (2); or
(D) The State Fire Marshal, a deputy or an approved authority has  issued a certificate of non-
compliance pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(3) Each license shall be issued only for the premises and  persons or governmental units named
in the application and shall not be transferable or assignable.
(4) Licenses shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises  as prescribed by
rule of the authority or the department.
[11]
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) No license shall be issued  or renewed for any health care facility or health maintenance
organization that is required to obtain a certificate of need under ORS  442.315 until a certificate
of need has been granted. An  ambulatory surgical center is not subject to the certificate of need
requirements in ORS 442.315.
(6) No license shall be issued or renewed for any skilled nursing facility or  intermediate care
facility,  unless  the applicant has included in the application the name and such other information
as may be necessary to establish the  identity and financial interests of any person who has incidents
of ownership in the facility representing an interest of 10 percent or more thereof. If  the person
having such interest is a corporation, the name of  any stockholder holding stock representing an
interest in the facility of 10 percent or more shall also be included in the application. If  the person
having such interest is any other entity, the name of any member thereof  having incidents of own-
ership representing an interest of 10 percent or more in the facility shall also  be included in the
application.
(7) A license may be denied to any applicant for a license or renewal  thereof or any stockholder
of any such applicant who has incidents of ownership in the health care facility representing an
interest of 10 percent or more thereof, or an interest of 10 percent or more of a lease agreement for
the facility, if during the five years prior to the application the applicant or any stockholder of  the
applicant had an interest of 10 percent or more in the facility or of a lease for the facility  and has
divested that interest after  receiving from the authority or the department written notice that the
authority or the department  intends to suspend or revoke the license or to decertify the facility from
eligibility to receive payments for services provided under this section.
(8) The Department of Human Services may not issue or renew a license  for a long term care
facility, unless the applicant has included in the application the  identity of any person who has in-
cident of ownership in the long term care facility who also has  a financial interest in any pharmacy,
as defined in ORS 689.005.
(9) The authority shall adopt rules for each type of health care facility, except long  term care
facilities, to carry out the purposes of ORS 441.015  to 441.119 and 441.993 including, but not limited
to:
(a) Establishing classifications and descriptions for the different types of health care facilities
that are licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.119 and 441.993; and
(b) Standards for patient care and safety,  adequate professional staff organizations, training of
staff for whom no other state  regulation exists, suitable delineation of professional privileges and
adequate staff analyses of clinical records.
(10) The  department shall adopt rules for each type of long term care facility to carry out the
purposes of ORS 441.015 to 441.119 and 441.993 including, but not limited to:
(a) Establishing classifications and descriptions  for the different types of long term care facili-
ties that are licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.119 and 441.993;
(b) Standards for patient care and safety,  adequate professional staff organizations, training of
staff for whom no other state  regulation exists, suitable delineation of professional privileges and
adequate staff analyses of clinical records; and
(c) Rules to ensure that a long term care facility complies with ORS 443.012.
(11) The authority or department may not adopt a rule requiring a health care facility to  serve
a specific food as long as the necessary nutritional food elements  are present in the food that is
served.
(12) A health care facility licensed by the authority or department may not:
[12]
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Offer or provide services beyond the scope of the license  classification assigned by the au-
thority or department; or
(b) Assume a descriptive title or  represent itself under a descriptive title other than the classi-
fication assigned by the authority or department.
(13) A health care facility must  reapply for licensure to change the classification assigned or the
type of license issued by the authority or department.
(14) The authority shall make available to the public on the authority’s website  the in-
formation that an applicant must submit under subsection (6) of this section as  part of an
application to obtain or renew a license.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 60.754 is amended to read:
60.754. (1)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 60.074 (2), a corporation incorporated under ORS  chapter 60
is a benefit company under ORS  60.750 to 60.770 if the corporation’s articles of incorporation state
that the corporation is a benefit company subject to ORS 60.750 to 60.770.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 63.074 [ (3)] (4) , a limited liability company organized  under ORS
chapter 63 is a benefit company under  ORS 60.750 to 60.770 if the limited liability company’s articles
of organization state that the limited liability company is a benefit  company subject to ORS 60.750
to 60.770.
(2)(a) A corporation that is incorporated under ORS chapter  60 may become a benefit company
by amending the corporation’s articles of incorporation to state, in  addition to the requirements set
forth in ORS 60.047, that the corporation is a benefit company subject to  ORS 60.750 to 60.770. The
amendment to the articles of incorporation must be approved by a minimum status vote.
(b) A limited liability company that is organized under ORS chapter 63 may become a benefit
company by amending the limited liability  company’s articles of organization to state, in addition to
the requirements set forth in ORS 63.047, that the limited  liability company is a benefit company
subject  to  ORS 60.750 to 60.770. The amendment to the articles of organization must be approved
by a minimum status vote.
(3) A benefit company may be formed by means of a  conversion if articles of conversion that
state that the converted entity will be a benefit company that is subject to ORS 60.750 to 60.770  are
approved by a minimum status vote.
(4) An entity that is not a benefit company may become a benefit company by  merging or ex-
changing  equity  interests with a benefit company if the shareholders or holders of equity interests
of the entity that is not the benefit company approve, by a minimum status vote, a plan  of merger
or a plan for  exchanging equity interests with a benefit company under which the surviving entity
will be a benefit company.
(5) A benefit company may become an  entity other than a benefit company only if an action to
remove from the articles of incorporation, articles of organization or articles of conversion  the
provision  that  states that the entity is a benefit company subject to ORS 60.750 to 60.770 is approved
by a minimum status vote.
(6)(a) A plan for a benefit company must be approved by a minimum  status vote if the plan
would:
(A) Merge the benefit company with an entity that is not a  benefit company, if the surviving
entity would not be a benefit company;
(B) Provide for exchanging equity interests with an  entity that is not a benefit company, if the
exchange would create an entity that is not a benefit company  and that would hold substantially
all of the benefit company’s assets;
[13]
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
(C) Convert the benefit company to an entity that is not a benefit company; or
(D) Otherwise cause ORS 60.750 to 60.770 not to apply to the benefit company.
(b) A sale, lease, exchange or other disposition of all or substantially all  of a benefit company’s
assets must be  approved by a minimum status vote unless the benefit company conducts the sale,
lease, exchange or other disposition in the ordinary course of the benefit company’s business.
(7) A provision of  a benefit company’s articles of incorporation, articles of organization, articles
of conversion or plan described in subsection (6)  of this section may be inconsistent with or super-
sede a provision of ORS 60.750 to 60.770 only to the  extent that the provision in the articles of in-
corporation, articles of organization, articles of  conversion or plan imposes a more stringent
requirement on the  benefit company, in keeping with the purposes set forth in ORS 60.750 to 60.770,
than a provision of ORS 60.750 to 60.770 imposes.
SECTION 16.
(1) Except as provided in subsection  (2) of this section, sections 5, 6, 7, 10,
12 and 13 of this 2024 Act and the amendments  to ORS 58.375, 58.376, 58.381, 60.754, 63.074 and
441.025 by sections 1,  2, 3, 8, 14 and 15 of this 2024 Act apply to contracts that a person enters
into or renews on and after the operative date specified in section 17 of this 2024 Act.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in section 12 of this 2024 Act, a  noncompetition agree-
ment, nondisclosure agreement  or nondisparagement agreement, as those terms are defined
in section 12 of this 2024 Act, into  which a licensee, as defined in ORS 677.010, enters before,
on or after the operative date specified in section 17 of this 2024 Act may not be enforced.
SECTION 17. (1) Sections 5, 6,  7, 10, 12 and 13 of this 2024 Act and the amendments to
ORS 58.375, 58.376, 58.381, 60.754, 63.074 and 441.025 by sections 1, 2, 3, 8, 14 and 15 of this 2024
Act become operative on January 1, 2025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules and take  any other action before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the au-
thority, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section, to under-
take and exercise all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the authority by
sections 5, 6, 7, 10, 12 and  13 of this 2024 Act and the amendments to ORS 58.375, 58.376,
58.381, 60.754, 63.074 and 441.025 by sections 1, 2, 3, 8, 14 and 15 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 18.
This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[14]