Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PLASTICS STEWARDSHIP PROGRAMS
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act:
(1) “Brand” means a name,  symbols, words or marks that identify a covered product and
attribute the covered product to the manufacturer of the covered product.
(2) “Covered product” means:
(a) Plastic packaging; and
(b) Plastic food serviceware generally  intended for single use, including plates, cups,
bowls, cutlery or straws.
(3) “Environmentally sound management” includes the following  management practices,
implemented in a manner that is designed to  protect public health, safety and the environ-
ment:
(a) Adequate record keeping;
(b) Detailed documentation of the methods used to:
(A) Manage covered products collected as part of a plastics stewardship program; and
(B) Track and document the fate  of covered products from collection through final dis-
position within this state and outside this state;
(c) Performance  audits and inspections of recyclers, haulers and other parties as deter-
mined by a stewardship organization;
(d) Compliance with worker health and safety requirements; and
(e) Maintenance of adequate liability insurance for a stewardship organization and con-
tractors working for the stewardship organization.
(4) “Manufacturer” means any person,  irrespective of the selling technique used, includ-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1067
SB 14
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ing that of remote sales, that:
(a) Manufactures a covered product or sells, offers  for sale or distributes the covered
product in this state under the manufacturer’s own brand;
(b) Is  the owner or licensee of a trademark under which a covered product is sold, offered
for sale or distributed in this state, whether or not the trademark is registered in this state;
or
(c) Sells a covered product in or imports a covered product into the United  States for
use in a commercial enterprise that sells, offers for sale or distributes the covered product
in this state.
(5) “Market share” means a manufacturer’s percentage of all covered products sold  in
this state during a specified time period, as calculated in  accordance with methods estab-
lished by the Environmental Quality Commission by rule.
(6) “Person” means the United  States, the state or a public or private corporation, local
government unit,  public agency, individual, partnership, association, firm, trust, estate or
other legal entity.
(7) “Plastic” means a synthetic material chemically formed by the polymerization of  or-
ganic substances  that can be molded or extruded at high heat into various solid forms that
may be solid, porous,  flexible or rigid, including elastomers, fibers, adhesives and surface
coatings.
(8) “Plastic packaging” means:
(a) Plastics used for the containment or protection of products;
(b) Single-use bags, including but not limited to shopping bags;
(c) Take-out containers; and
(d) Other products, as determined by the Environmental Quality Commission by rule.
(9) “Plastics stewardship program” means a statewide program for  the collection and
environmentally sound management of plastics that is  funded and operated by a stewardship
organization pursuant to a plan approved by  the Department of Environmental Quality under
section 4 of this 2021 Act.
(10) “Remote sales” means sales made through remote offerings such as sales outlets,
catalogs or the Internet.
(11) “Retailer” means a person that offers  new covered products for sale at retail
through any means, including but not limited to remote sales.
(12) “Stewardship organization” means a corporation, nonprofit organization or other le-
gal entity designated by a manufacturer or a group  of manufacturers to implement a plastics
stewardship program.
SECTION 2. 
(1) A manufacturer or retailer may not sell or offer for sale, irrespective
of the selling  technique used, including that of remote sales, a covered product in this state
unless:
(a) The covered product is predominantly composed of a material that is included  on the
recyclable plastics  list established by the Environmental Quality Commission under section
9 of this 2021 Act; or
(b) The covered product is labeled with a brand that  is included in a plan for a plastics
stewardship organization that is submitted to and  approved by the Department of Environ-
mental Quality under sections 3 and 4 of this 2021 Act.
(2) A retailer is in  compliance with subsection (1) of this section if, on the date the cov-
[2]
SB 14
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ered product is ordered from the manufacturer or its agent, the website  maintained by the
manufacturer’s stewardship organization lists the manufacturer, along with  the
manufacturer’s brand associated  with the covered product, as a participant in an approved
plastics stewardship program.
SECTION 3.
(1) A stewardship organization must prepare and submit to the Department
of Environmental Quality a plan for the development and implementation of a  plastics
stewardship program. A plastics stewardship program plan  must describe how the
stewardship organization will:
(a) Manage and conduct a plastics stewardship program;
(b) Fund the plastics stewardship program,  including how the operator will fund all the
costs incurred for  the environmentally sound management of covered products during each
phase of management, from collection of the covered products from the public  through final
disposition of the covered products;
(c) Provide for the collection of covered products at locations that are conveniently lo-
cated throughout the state;
(d) Apportion the costs of the plastics stewardship program among  each of the man-
ufacturers participating in the stewardship organization;
(e) Provide for advertising and promoting collection opportunities statewide and  on a
regular basis;
(f) Manage and appropriately dispose of products received  through collection activities
that are not covered products; and
(g) Establish performance goals, including a statewide recovery rate for  covered pro-
ducts.
(2) In operating a plastics stewardship program, a stewardship organization shall:
(a) Implement the plan required under subsection (1) of  this section no later than 60 days
after the department approves the plan;
(b) Provide for the environmentally sound management of  all covered products, regard-
less of the manufacturer of  the covered product and including orphan covered products, free
of charge;
(c) Provide for the collection of covered products at locations that are conveniently lo-
cated throughout the state;
(d) Notify retailers that sell  or offer for sale covered products made or sold by man-
ufacturers participating in the stewardship organization about the plastics stewardship pro-
gram and provide the retailers  with information about available collection opportunities that
the retailers will need in order to comply with section 2 (1) of this 2021 Act; and
(e) Establish and maintain a website that provides information about  collection sites
under the plastics stewardship program, identifies manufacturers participating  in the
stewardship organization under the  plan and lists covered products that are sold or offered
for sale in this state by participating manufacturers.
(3) At least 180 days before the expiration of  a plan approved under section 4 of this 2021
Act, a stewardship organization shall submit a new plan in accordance with this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall approve a plastics
stewardship program plan submitted under section 3 of this 2021 Act if the proposed plan a
stewardship organization submits is complete, the proposed plan meets the requirements of
section 3 (1) of this 2021 Act and  the stewardship organization pays the fee established by the
[3]
SB 14
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Department of Environmental Quality under section 6 (1)(a) of this 2021 Act.
(2)(a) Not later than 60 days after receiving a plan under section 3 of this 2021 Act, the
department shall approve or reject  the plan. If the department rejects the plan, the depart-
ment shall inform the stewardship organization of the reason or reasons for the rejection.
(b) Not later than 60 days after the department rejects a plan under  paragraph (a) of this
subsection, a stewardship organization must submit to  the department a revised plan. Not
later than 90 days after receiving a revised plan under  this paragraph, the department shall
approve or reject the revised plan.
(3) A plan approved under this section is valid for four years.
SECTION 5.
(1) By April 1 of each year, or by a later date as determined by the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality, a stewardship organization shall provide  a report for review
by the department  that details how the plastics stewardship program plan approved by the
department under section 4 of this 2021 Act  was implemented during the previous calendar
year.
(2) A report under this section must include:
(a) Information about the services that were provided and  the materials collected during
the previous calendar year;
(b) The respective market shares of  the manufacturer’s participating in the plastics
stewardship program; and
(c) An  evaluation of the stewardship organization’s success in meeting the performance
goals established under section 3 (1)(g) of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Department of Environmental Quality  shall establish and collect the
following fees from a stewardship organization:
(a) A fixed, one-time fee reasonably calculated to cover  the costs of reviewing a plastics
stewardship program plan submitted under section 3 of this 2021 Act.
(b) An annual  fee, charged to each stewardship organization, reasonably calculated to
cover the costs of administering, implementing and enforcing sections 1 to 11 of this  2021
Act.
(2) The fee calculated for each  stewardship organization under subsection (1)(b) of this
section must be proportionate to the market share of all covered products sold in this  state
by the manufacturers participating in the stewardship  organization. The department may
make a reasonable estimate of the market share of a manufacturer  for any year for which
market share information for that manufacturer has not been provided to the department.
(3) Fees collected by the department under this section shall  be deposited in the State
Treasury to the credit of the Plastics Stewardship  Fund established under section 8 of this
2021 Act.
SECTION 7. (1) In accordance with the applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183  relating
to contested case  proceedings, the Department of Environmental Quality may issue an order
requiring compliance with the provisions of sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The department  may bring an action against any person that is in violation of the
provisions of sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 8. The Plastics Stewardship Fund is established, separate and distinct  from the
General Fund. Interest  earned by the Plastics Stewardship Fund shall be credited to the
fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of  Environmental
Quality and may be used only to pay the costs of  administering, implementing and enforcing
[4]
SB 14
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 9.
(1) The Environmental Quality  Commission shall by rule identify plastics
that are suitable for recycling collection in this state.
(2) In determining whether a plastic is suitable for recycling  collection in this state, the
commission shall consider:
(a) The stability, maturity, accessibility and viability of end markets for the plastic;
(b) Environmental health and safety considerations;
(c) The anticipated yield loss for the plastic during the recycling process;
(d) The plastic’s compatibility with existing recycling infrastructure;
(e) The amount of the plastic available;
(f) The practicalities of sorting and storing the plastic;
(g) Contamination;
(h) The ability for waste generators to easily identify and properly prepare the plastic;
(i) Economic factors;
(j) Environmental factors from a life-cycle perspective; and
(k) The policy expressed in ORS 459.015.
SECTION 10.
The Legislative Assembly declares that the collaboration of manufacturers
and stewardship organizations to develop and implement plastics stewardship programs  is in
the best interests of the public. Therefore, the Legislative  Assembly declares its intent that
the development, implementation and operation of plastics stewardship programs  as required
by sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act shall be exempt  from state antitrust laws. The Legislative
Assembly further declares its intent to provide immunity for the  development, implementa-
tion and operation of plastics stewardship programs as required by sections 1 to 11 of  this
2021 Act from federal antitrust laws. This section does  not authorize any person to engage
in activities or  to conspire to engage in activities that constitute per se violations of state
or federal antitrust laws that are not authorized under sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 11. The Environmental Quality Commission may adopt rules as necessary  to
implement sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 12.  ORS 459.995 is amended to read:
459.995. (1) Except as provided in  subsection (2) of this section, in addition to any other penalty
provided by law:
(a) Any person who violates ORS 459.205, 459.270, 459.272, 459.386 to 459.405, 459.705  to 459.790,
459A.005 to 459A.620, 459A.310 to 459A.335, 459A.675 to 459A.685 or 646A.080, or any  rule or order
of the Environmental Quality Commission pertaining to the disposal, collection, storage or reuse  or
recycling of solid wastes, as defined by ORS 459.005, or any rule or order pertaining to the  disposal,
storage or transportation of waste tires, as defined by ORS 459.705, or any rule  or order pertaining
to the sale of novelty items  that contain encapsulated liquid mercury, incurs a civil penalty not to
exceed $25,000 per day for each day of the violation.
(b) Any person  who violates the provisions of ORS 459.420 to 459.426 incurs a civil penalty not
to exceed $500  for each violation. Each battery that is disposed of improperly is a separate violation.
Each day an establishment fails to post the notice  required under ORS 459.426 is a separate vio-
lation.
(c) For each day a city,  county or metropolitan service district fails to provide the opportunity
to recycle as required under ORS 459A.005, the  city, county or metropolitan service district incurs
a civil penalty not to exceed $500 for each violation.
[5]
SB 14
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Any person who violates the provisions of ORS  459.247 (1)(f) incurs a civil penalty not to
exceed $500 for each violation.  Each covered electronic device that is disposed of improperly is a
separate violation.
(e) Any  retailer that violates the provisions of ORS 459A.825 (1) or (2)(b) or section 2 of this
2021 Act incurs a civil penalty not to exceed $100 per day for each day of the violation.
(f) Any producer that violates the provisions of ORS 459A.825 (1) incurs a  civil penalty not to
exceed $1,000 per day for each day of the violation.
(g) Any stewardship organization that violates the provisions of ORS 459A.825 (2)(a), 459A.827,
459A.830 to 459A.837 or 459A.842 incurs a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 per day for  each day
of the violation.
(h) Any manufacturer or stewardship organization that violates sections 1 to  11 of this
2021 Act or any rule adopted under sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act incurs a civil penalty not
to exceed $10,000 per day for each day of the violation.
(2) Any product manufacturer or package manufacturer who violates ORS 459A.650  to 459A.665
or any rule adopted under  ORS 459A.650 to 459A.665 incurs a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 per
day for each day of the violation. A violation of  ORS 459A.650 to 459A.665 is not subject to addi-
tional penalties under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Any civil penalty authorized by subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be imposed in  the
manner provided by ORS 468.135.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 13.
Sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 459.995 by
section 12 of this 2021 Act apply to all manufacturers engaging in  the activities set forth in
section 2 of this 2021 Act on or after January 1, 2022.
SECTION 14. (1) Sections 1 to 11  of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 459.995
by section 12 of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission and  the Department of Environmental Qual-
ity may take any action before the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section
that is necessary for the commission and the department to exercise, on and  after the op-
erative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the commission and the department by sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act and the
amendments to ORS 459.995 by section 12 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 15. Initial plans for plastics stewardship programs under section 3  of this 2021
Act must be submitted to the  Director of the Department of Environmental Quality no later
than October 1, 2022.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 16. The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
[6]
SB 14
1
2
3
SECTION 17.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[7]