Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
MEASURE 11 SENTENCE REDUCTIONS FOR CERTAIN OFFENDERS
SECTION 1.
 ORS 137.700 is amended to read:
137.700. (1)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 161.605, when a person is convicted of one of the offenses
listed in subsection (2)(a) of this section and the offense was committed on or after April 1,  1995,
or of one of the offenses listed in subsection (2)(b) of this section  and the offense was committed on
or after October 4, 1997, or of the offense described in subsection (2)(c) of  this section and the of-
fense was  committed on or after January 1, 2008, the court shall impose, and the person shall serve,
at least the entire term of  imprisonment listed in subsection (2) of this section. The person is not,
during the service of the term of imprisonment, eligible for release  on post-prison supervision or any
form of temporary leave from custody. The person is not eligible  for any reduction in[ , or based
on,] the minimum sentence for  any reason whatsoever under ORS 421.121 or any other statute. The
court may impose a greater sentence if otherwise permitted by law, but may not  impose a lower
sentence than the sentence specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, when a person is  convicted of one
of the offenses listed in subsection (2)(a)(C) to  (S), (b) or (c) of this section and the person
has not previously been sentenced under this section or ORS 137.707 or  137.712, the court
shall impose the sentence described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, except that the per-
son is eligible for a reduction in the minimum sentence under ORS  421.121 unless the court
orders otherwise under ORS 137.750.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1292
SB 320
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The offenses to which subsection (1) of this section applies and  the applicable mandatory
minimum sentences are:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(a)(A) Murder in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.115.......................300 months
(B) Murder in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.107 ..................360 months
(C) Attempt or conspiracy
to commit aggravated
murder, as defined
in ORS 163.095. .................120 months
(D) Attempt or conspiracy
to commit murder
in any degree. .....................90 months
(E) Manslaughter in the
first degree, as defined
in ORS 163.118. .................120 months
(F) Manslaughter in the
second degree, as defined
in ORS 163.125. ...................75 months
(G) Assault in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.185.........................90 months
(H) Assault in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.175.........................70 months
(I) Except as provided in
paragraph (b)(G) of
this subsection,
kidnapping in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.235. ...................90 months
(J) Kidnapping in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.225.........................70 months
(K) Rape in the first degree,
as defined in ORS 163.375
(1)(a), (c) or (d). .................100 months
(L) Rape in the second degree,
as defined in
ORS 163.365.........................75 months
(M) Sodomy in the first degree,
[2]
SB 320
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
as defined in ORS 163.405
(1)(a), (c) or (d). .................100 months
(N) Sodomy in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.395.........................75 months
(O) Unlawful sexual penetration
in the first degree, as
defined in ORS 163.411
(1)(a) or (c). ........................100 months
(P) Unlawful sexual penetration
in the second degree, as
defined in ORS 163.408. ....75 months
(Q) Sexual abuse in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.427.........................75 months
(R) Robbery in the first degree,
as defined in
ORS 164.415.........................90 months
(S) Robbery in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 164.405.........................70 months
(b)(A) Arson in the first degree,
as defined in ORS 164.325,
when the offense represented
a threat of serious
physical injury. ...................90 months
(B) Using a child in a display
of sexually explicit
conduct, as defined in
ORS 163.670.........................70 months
(C) Compelling prostitution,
as defined in
ORS 167.017.........................70 months
(D) Rape in the first degree,
as defined in
ORS 163.375 (1)(b). ...........300 months
(E) Sodomy in the first degree,
as defined in
ORS 163.405 (1)(b). ...........300 months
(F) Unlawful sexual penetration
in the first degree, as
defined in
ORS 163.411 (1)(b). ...........300 months
(G) Kidnapping in the first
degree, as defined in
[3]
SB 320
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 163.235, when the
offense is committed in
furtherance of the commission
or attempted commission of an
offense listed in subparagraph
(D), (E) or (F) of
this paragraph. ..................300 months
(c) Aggravated vehicular
homicide, as defined in
ORS 163.149.......................240 months
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 2.
 ORS 137.707 is amended to read:
137.707. (1)(a) When a  person waived under ORS 419C.349 (1)(a) is convicted of an offense listed
in subsection (4) of this section, the court  shall impose at least the presumptive term of
imprisonment provided for the offense in subsection (4) of this section. The court may impose  a
greater presumptive term if otherwise permitted by law, but may not impose a lesser term. The
person is not, during the service of the  term of imprisonment, eligible for release on post-prison
supervision or any form of temporary leave from custody. The person is not eligible for  any re-
duction in the minimum  sentence for any reason under ORS 421.121 or any other provision of law.
The person is eligible for a hearing and conditional release under ORS 420A.203 and 420A.206.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, when a person waived under  ORS
419C.349 (1)(a) is convicted of an offense listed in subsection  (4)(a)(C) to (S), (b) or (c) of this
section and the person has not previously been sentenced under this section  or ORS 137.712,
the court shall impose the sentence described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection, except that
the person is eligible for a reduction in the minimum  sentence under ORS 421.121 unless the
court orders otherwise under ORS 137.750.
(2) ORS 138.052, 163.105 and 163.150 apply to sentencing  a person prosecuted under this section
and convicted of aggravated murder  under ORS 163.095 except that a person who was under 18
years of  age at the time the offense was committed is not subject to a sentence of death or life
imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole.
(3) The court  shall commit the person to the legal and physical custody of the Department of
Corrections.
(4) The offenses to which this section applies and the presumptive sentences are:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(a)(A) Murder in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.115. ............................300 months
(B) Murder in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.107. .......................360 months
(C) Attempt or conspiracy
to commit aggravated
murder, as defined
[4]
SB 320
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in ORS 163.095. .......................120 months
(D) Attempt or conspiracy
to commit murder
in any degree. ............................90 months
(E) Manslaughter in the
first degree, as defined
in ORS 163.118. .......................120 months
(F) Manslaughter in the
second degree, as defined
in ORS 163.125. .........................75 months
(G) Assault in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.185. .........................90 months
(H) Assault in the second
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.175. .........................70 months
(I) Kidnapping in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.235. ..............................90 months
(J) Kidnapping in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.225. ..............................70 months
(K) Rape in the first degree,
as defined in ORS 163.375. ...100 months
(L) Rape in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.365. ..............................75 months
(M) Sodomy in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.405. ............................100 months
(N) Sodomy in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.395. ..............................75 months
(O) Unlawful sexual
penetration in the first
degree, as defined
in ORS 163.411. .......................100 months
(P) Unlawful sexual
penetration in the
second degree, as
defined in ORS 163.408. ..........75 months
(Q) Sexual abuse in the first
degree, as defined in
ORS 163.427. ..............................75 months
(R) Robbery in the first
[5]
SB 320
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
degree, as defined in
ORS 164.415. ..............................90 months
(S) Robbery in the second
degree, as defined in
ORS 164.405. ..............................70 months
(b)(A) Arson in the first degree,
as defined in ORS 164.325,
when the offense represented
a threat of serious
physical injury. .........................90 months
(B) Using a child in a display
of sexually explicit
conduct, as defined in
ORS 163.670. ..............................70 months
(C) Compelling prostitution,
as defined in ORS 167.017
(1)(a), (b) or (d). .........................70 months
(c) Aggravated vehicular
homicide, as defined in
ORS 163.149. ............................240 months
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(5) If  a person charged with an offense under this section is found guilty of a lesser included
offense and the lesser included offense is:
(a) An offense listed in subsection (4) of this section, the  court shall sentence the person as
provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(b) Not an offense listed in subsection (4) of this section:
(A) But constitutes an  offense for which waiver is authorized under ORS 419C.349 (1)(b), the
court, upon motion of the district attorney, shall hold  a hearing to determine whether to retain ju-
risdiction or to transfer the case to juvenile court for disposition. In determining whether to retain
jurisdiction,  the  court shall consider the criteria for waiver in ORS 419C.349. If the court retains
jurisdiction, the court shall sentence  the person as an adult under sentencing guidelines. If the court
does not retain jurisdiction, the court shall:
(i) Order that a presentence report be prepared;
(ii) Set forth in a  memorandum any observations and recommendations that the court deems
appropriate;
(iii) Enter  an order transferring the case to the juvenile court for disposition under ORS
419C.067 and 419C.411; and
(iv) Enter an order  providing that all court records of the case are subject to the same limita-
tions on inspection, copying and disclosure  of records, reports and materials as those set forth under
ORS 419A.255.
(B) And is not an offense for which waiver is  authorized under ORS 419C.349 (1)(b), the court
may not sentence the person. The court shall:
(i) Order that a presentence report be prepared;
(ii) Set forth in a  memorandum any observations and recommendations that the court deems
[6]
SB 320
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
appropriate;
(iii) Enter  an order transferring the case to the juvenile court for disposition under ORS
419C.067 and 419C.411; and
(iv) Enter an order  providing that all court records of the case are subject to the same limita-
tions on inspection, copying and disclosure  of records, reports and materials as those set forth under
ORS 419A.255.
(6) When a person is charged under this section, other offenses based on  the same act or
transaction shall be charged as separate counts in the same accusatory instrument and  consolidated
for trial, whether or not the other offenses are  aggravated murder or offenses listed in subsection
(4) of this section. If  it appears, upon motion, that the state or the person charged is prejudiced by
the joinder  and consolidation of offenses, the court may order an election or separate trials of
counts or provide whatever other relief justice requires.
(7)(a) If a person charged and tried as provided in subsection (6)  of this section is found guilty
of aggravated murder or an offense listed in subsection (4) of this section and  one or more other
offenses, the court shall impose the sentence  for aggravated murder or the offense listed in sub-
section (4) of this section as provided in subsections (1) and  (2) of this section and shall impose
sentences for the other offenses as otherwise provided by law.
(b) If a person charged and  tried as provided in subsection (6) of this section is not found guilty
of aggravated murder or an offense  listed in subsection (4) of this section, but is found guilty of one
of the other charges that constitutes an offense for which  waiver is authorized under ORS 419C.349
(1)(b), the court, upon motion  of the district attorney, shall hold a hearing to determine whether to
retain jurisdiction or to transfer the case to juvenile court for disposition. In determining whether
to retain jurisdiction, the  court shall consider the criteria for waiver in ORS 419C.349. If the court
retains jurisdiction, the court shall sentence  the person as an adult under sentencing guidelines. If
the court does not retain jurisdiction, the court shall:
(A) Order that a presentence report be prepared;
(B) Set forth in a memorandum any observations  and recommendations that the court deems
appropriate;
(C) Enter an order transferring the  case to the juvenile court for disposition under ORS
419C.067 and 419C.411; and
(D) Enter an order providing that all court records of the case are subject to the same limita-
tions on inspection, copying and disclosure  of records, reports and materials as those set forth under
ORS 419A.255.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 421.121 is amended to read:
421.121. (1) Except  as provided in ORS 137.635, 137.700  (1)(a), 137.707 (1)(a), 163.105, 163.107 and
163.115, each  adult in custody sentenced to the custody of the Department of Corrections for felonies
committed on or after November 1, 1989, is eligible for a  reduction in the term of incarceration for:
(a) Appropriate institutional behavior, as defined by rule of the Department of Corrections;  and
(b) Participation in the adult basic skills development program described in ORS 421.084.
(2) The maximum amount of time credits earned for  appropriate institutional behavior or for
participation in the  adult basic skills development program described in ORS 421.084 may not exceed
20 percent of the total term of incarceration in a Department of Corrections institution.
(3) The time credits may not be used to  shorten the term of actual prison confinement to less
than six months.
(4) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to the rulemaking provisions of ORS chapter  183
[7]
SB 320
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to establish a process for granting, retracting and restoring the time credits earned  by the offender
as allowed in subsections (1) to (3) of this section.
PROCEDURE FOR PERSONS CURRENTLY IN CUSTODY
SECTION 4.
(1)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, if the court
enters the supplemental judgment described in subsection (5)(b) or (7)(b) of this section,  the
amendments to ORS 137.700, 137.707  and 421.121 by sections 1, 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act apply
to persons:
(A) Sentenced before the effective date of this 2023 Act;
(B) Who, prior to the imposition of the sentence being served, had not previously been
sentenced under ORS 137.700, 137.707 or 137.712; and
(C) Who are not prohibited by any  other provision of law from obtaining a reduction in
the term of incarceration under ORS 421.121.
(b) The amendments to  ORS 137.707 and 421.121 by sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act do
not apply to persons  on conditional release under ORS 420A.206 on or before the operative
date specified in section 5 of this 2023 Act.
(2)(a) If the Department of  Corrections determines, pursuant to rules adopted by the
department, that a person in the legal custody of the department and  in the physical custody
of either the department or the Oregon Youth Authority, who was sentenced before the  ef-
fective date of this 2023 Act, is eligible for  a reduction in the term of incarceration under
ORS 421.121 pursuant to the amendments to ORS 137.700, 137.707  and 421.121 by sections 1,
2 and 3 of this 2023 Act, the department shall notify:
(A) The person in custody; and
(B) The presiding judge, trial court administrator and district attorney, in  the county in
which the person was convicted.
(b) The notice described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall indicate the sentences
and counts for which the person is eligible for a reduction in the term of incarceration.
(c) In addition to the notice described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the department
and authority shall provide the presiding judge and trial court administrator  with a supple-
mental judgment described in subsection (12) of this section for the person.
(3) Upon receipt of the notice, the trial court administrator shall file  the notice with the
court, and the district attorney shall make reasonable efforts to inform the victim:
(a) That the person may be eligible for a  reduction in the term of incarceration under
ORS 421.121;
(b) Of the victim’s rights implicated by the person’s eligibility for the reduction;
(c) That if the victim  wishes to object to the person’s eligibility for the reduction, the
victim must notify the district attorney within 20 days of the  date the notice described in
subsection (2) of this section is filed with the court by the trial court administrator; and
(d) That if the victim fails to object in accordance with paragraph (c)  of this subsection,
the sentencing court may authorize the department to  consider the person for the reduction.
(4)(a) If the district attorney receives a  timely notice of objection from a victim or if the
district attorney objects to the person’s eligibility for a  reduction in the term of
incarceration under ORS 421.121, the district attorney must  file notice of the objection with
the court no later than  21 days after the date the notice described in subsection (2) of this
[8]
SB 320
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section is filed with the court by the trial court administrator.
(b) Unless the court has entered the  judgment described in subsection (5)(b) of this sec-
tion, the court may, for good cause shown, allow the filing of a notice of  objection on a date
later than the date described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5)(a) If a notice of objection is filed with the  court within the time period described in
subsection (4) of this section or if the sentencing court, on its  own motion, determines that
a hearing is necessary, the court shall set  a hearing within 35 days of the date the notice
described in subsection (2) of this section is filed with the court by the trial court adminis-
trator, unless the court finds good cause to hold the hearing at a later date.
(b) If a notice of objection is not filed with the court within the time period described in
subsection (4) of this section and the sentencing court determines that it  is appropriate to
authorize the department to consider the person for a reduction in the  term of incarceration
under ORS 421.121, the court shall enter  a supplemental judgment using the form of judg-
ment submitted by the department under subsection (12)(a) of this section.
(6)(a) When the court sets a hearing under subsection (5)(a) of this section, the court
shall appoint counsel for the person and notify the person, the person’s counsel, the depart-
ment and the district  attorney of the hearing date. Upon receipt of the notice, the district
attorney shall make reasonable efforts to inform the victim of:
(A) The hearing date; and
(B) The victim’s rights implicated in the hearing.
(b) Pursuant to ORS 151.216 and 151.219,  the Public Defense Services Commission shall
provide for the representation of a  person for whom counsel is appointed under this sub-
section.
(7)(a) At  the hearing, the person, the district attorney and the victim may introduce ev-
idence relevant to the determination of  whether, under ORS 137.750 and based on the infor-
mation available to the parties and  the court at the time the sentence was originally
imposed, there are substantial and compelling reasons to order that the person not be con-
sidered for a reduction in the term of incarceration under ORS 421.121.
(b) Upon the conclusion of  the hearing, the court shall order on the record in open court
that the department is authorized to consider the person for a reduction  in the term of
incarceration under  ORS 421.121 unless the court finds, on the record and in open court,
substantial and compelling  reasons to order that the person not be considered for the re-
duction. If the court  orders that the person may be considered for the reduction, the court
shall enter a supplemental judgment using the form of judgment  submitted by the depart-
ment under subsection (12)(a) of this section.
(c) ORS 40.010 to 40.210 and 40.310 to 40.585 do not apply to a hearing conducted  under
this section.
(d) The sentencing  court has jurisdiction to modify its judgment and sentence to enter
the supplemental judgment described in subsection (5)(b) of this section or to reflect the re-
sults of a hearing described in this subsection.
(8) Unless the court orders otherwise, a person shall appear at  a hearing described in
subsection (7) of this section by simultaneous  electronic transmission as defined in ORS
131.045.
(9) Notwithstanding the grant of a reduction in the  term of incarceration under ORS
421.121 by the department under this  section, the department may defer the release of a
[9]
SB 320
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
person for no more than 90 days when, in the judgment of the department, the  deferral is
necessary or advisable in order for the department to provide  for transitional planning or for
the continuity of medical or mental health care or treatment to the person.
(10) The post-prison supervision term of a person who  is released from a facility of the
department or the Oregon Youth Authority after having been granted  a reduction in the
term of incarceration under ORS 421.121 commences upon the person’s physical  release from
the facility.
(11)(a) Nothing in this section or the amendments  to ORS 137.700, 137.707 and 421.121 by
sections 1, 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act:
(A) Creates any cause of action for compensation or damages;
(B) Entitles a person to a  hearing before the date set by the court under subsection (5)(a)
of this section; or
(C) Entitles a person sentenced under ORS 137.700 or 137.707 to a  reduction in the term
of incarceration, except as authorized by the sentencing court and granted by the  depart-
ment in accordance with department rules.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 30.265 or any other provision of law, the  department and its
officers, employees and agents are immune from any claim or action arising from:
(A) The failure  to identify a person who is eligible for a reduction in the term of
incarceration under the amendments to ORS 137.700, 137.707 and 421.121 by sections 1,  2 and
3 this 2023 Act or to provide the notice described in subsection (2) of this section;
(B) The failure  to grant a reduction in the term of incarceration under ORS 421.121 after
the reduction has been authorized by the sentencing court  under subsection (5)(b) or (7)(b)
of this section; or
(C) The deferral of a person’s release under subsection (9) of this section.
(12) The Department of Corrections:
(a) Shall, after consulting with the Judicial Department, prepare a form  of supplemental
judgment that specifies the sentences and counts for which a  person sentenced under ORS
137.700 or 137.707 is eligible for a reduction in the term of incarceration under ORS 421.121.
(b) May adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
(13) As used in this section:
(a) “Reasonable efforts to inform the victim” has the meaning given that phrase  in ORS
147.500.
(b) “Victim” has the meaning given that term in ORS 147.500.
SECTION 5.
(1) Section 4 of this 2023 Act becomes operative  on the date that is 60 days
after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
(2) The Department  of Corrections, the Judicial Department, the State Board of Parole
and Post-Prison Supervision and the district attorneys  of this state may take any action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the departments, board or district attorneys to exercise, on or after  the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this  section, all the duties, functions and powers conferred on
the departments, board or district attorneys by section 4 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 6. Section 4 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 1, 2026.
APPLICABILITY
[10]
SB 320
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
SECTION 7.
Except as  provided in section 4 of this 2023 Act, the amendments to ORS
137.700, 137.707 and 421.121 by sections 1 to 3 of this 2023 Act apply to sentences imposed on
or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 8. The unit captions used in this 2023 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[11]