Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Secretary of State shall appoint  an inspector general for each of the
following groups:
(a) The Commission for the Blind, the  Department of Human Services, the Long Term
Care Ombudsman and the Psychiatric Security Review Board.
(b) The Oregon Health Authority.
(c) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, the Office of Community  Colleges
and Workforce  Development, the Oregon Health and Science University, the Oregon Oppor-
tunity Grant program,  the Department of Education, the State Board of Education, the
Common School Fund and the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(d) The Department of Corrections, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, the  De-
partment of Justice, the Oregon Military  Department, the Oregon Youth Authority, the
State Board of Parole and Post-Prison  Supervision, the Department of State Police, the De-
partment of Public Safety Standards and  Training, the Judicial Department, the Commission
on Judicial Fitness and Disability and the Public Defense Services Commission.
(e) The  Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the State Fair Council, the
Oregon Historical Society, the Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office, the  Employment Re-
lations Board, the Oregon Government Ethics Commission, the  Office of the Governor, the
Oregon Liquor Control Commission, the Public Employees Retirement Board, the Oregon
Racing Commission,  the Department of Revenue, the Secretary of State, the State Library
and the State Treasurer.
(f) The Oregon  Business Development Department, the Employment Department, the
Housing and Community Services Department and the Department of Veterans’ Affairs.
(g) The Oregon Department of Aviation and the Department of Transportation.
(h) The  Oregon Board of Accountancy, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, the
State Board of Licensed Social Workers,  the Construction Contractors Board, the Oregon
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2962
SB 588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Board of Dentistry, the Department of Consumer  and Business Services, the Health Licens-
ing Office, the State  Mortuary and Cemetery Board, the Oregon Board of Naturopathic
Medicine, the Board of Medical Imaging, the State Board of  Examiners for Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology, the Oregon State  Veterinary Medical Examining Board, the Bureau
of Labor and Industries, the Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors  and Thera-
pists, the Oregon Medical Board, the Oregon State Board of Nursing,  the State Board of
Pharmacy, the  State Board of Psychologist Examiners, the Public Utility Commission, the
Real Estate Agency, the State Board of Tax Practitioners and the  Commission on Indian
Services.
(i) The  State Board of Agriculture, the Columbia River Gorge Commission, the State
Department of Energy, the Department of Environmental Quality, the State Department  of
Fish and Wildlife, the State Forestry Department,  the State Department of Geology and
Mineral Industries, the Department of Land Conservation and Development, the Land Use
Board of Appeals, the Department of State Lands, the State Marine  Board, the State Parks
and Recreation Department, the Water Resources Department and  the Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board.
(2) The Secretary of State shall select  each inspector general without regard to political
affiliation and solely on the basis of integrity  and demonstrated ability in accounting, audit-
ing, financial analysis, law, management analysis, public administration or investigations.
(3) An inspector general serves at the pleasure of the  Secretary of State. At least 30 days
before an inspector general is removed  from office, the Secretary of State shall communicate
in writing the reasons for the removal to  a committee or interim committee of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to general government.
SECTION 2.
(1) At least once  each year, each inspector general appointed under section
1 of this 2017 Act shall review the spending of each entity in the  group assigned to the in-
spector general under section 1 of this 2017 Act and identify any costs that are  inappropriate
because of:
(a) An  alleged violation of a provision of a law, regulation, contract or other agreement
or document governing the expenditure of funds;
(b) A finding that, at the time of the review, the  cost is not supported by adequate doc-
umentation; or
(c) A finding that the expenditure  of funds for the intended purpose is unnecessary or
unreasonable.
(2) An inspector general may subpoena witnesses, require the production of books  and
papers and rendering of reports in such manner as the inspector general requires and  do all
things necessary to secure a full and thorough review  under this section. An entity to which
an inspector general is assigned under section 1 of this 2017 Act shall make all information
and materials available to the entity  available to the inspector general unless a statute spe-
cifically provides that the inspector general is precluded from reviewing the information.
(3) The inspector general shall submit an accounting to the head of each  entity and to
the Secretary of State detailing  each inappropriate cost identified under subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) Within 30 days after receiving the accounting under subsection (3) of this  section, an
entity may challenge a finding of  an inappropriate cost identified in the accounting. Within
10 days after receiving the challenge, the Secretary of State shall determine whether the cost
[2]
SB 588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
was inappropriate and submit a final accounting of inappropriate costs to the entity.
(5) Within 60 days after receiving a report under subsection (3) of this section,  an entity
shall deposit:
(a) 75 percent of the full amount of inappropriate  costs identified in the accounting under
subsection (3) of this section or the final accounting  under subsection (4) of this section, as
applicable, in the General Fund available for general governmental expenses; and
(b) 25 percent of the full amount of inappropriate  costs identified in the accounting under
subsection (3) of this section or the final  accounting under subsection (4) of this section, as
applicable, in the Inspector General Fund established in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) The Inspector General Fund is established in the  State Treasury, sepa-
rate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Inspector  General Fund
shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Inspector General Fund consists of moneys deposited in the  fund under section
2 of this 2017 Act.
(3) Moneys deposited  to the credit of the Inspector General Fund are continuously ap-
propriated to the Secretary of State for the purpose of carrying out the  provisions of
sections 1 and 2 of this 2017 Act.
[3]