Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $995,000, which shall be used for:
(1) Planning and establishing new school-based health centers,  including retaining
community-based technical assistance; and
(2) The operation of new school-based health centers.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, which shall be distributed to  school districts and
education service districts, or any combination thereof, to increase student access  to
school-based mental health providers.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Chief  Education Office, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $_______, which shall be expended for the pilot program  that
decreases rates of school absenteeism  by using trauma-informed approaches to education,
health services and intervention strategies, as described in section 5,  chapter 68, Oregon
Laws 2016.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1567