Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon  Business Development Department for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,500,000  for
distribution in accordance with section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2. The Oregon Business Development Department shall distribute the moneys
appropriated under section 1 of this 2023 Act as follows:
(1) $2 million to the Center for the Outdoor Recreation Economy at  Oregon State Uni-
versity for the purpose of developing professional  and workforce development programs for
the outdoor recreation economy in order to address critical and urgent skill gaps in  special-
ized, technical and leadership roles.
(2) $1 million to  the Center for the Outdoor Recreation Economy at Oregon State Uni-
versity for the purpose of developing  a program to provide facilitation services and technical
assistance grants to communities affected by wildfire for community engagement in  the
planning and construction of outdoor recreation facilities to support  the communities’ eco-
nomic recovery. The center may work with the Oregon State University Extension Service
in developing the program under this subsection.
(3)(a) $500,000 to Oregon State University-Cascades  to outfit a fabrication and maker
space at the university  in order to support prototyping of new products by outdoor recre-
ation economy entrepreneurs in rural and central Oregon.
(b) As used in this subsection, “rural’ means any area in this state that is outside:
(A) The acknowledged urban growth boundaries of all cities with a population  greater
than 50,000; and
(B) Any  urbanized area contiguous to a city described in subparagraph (A) of this para-
graph.
SECTION 3.
There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the  Oregon Business Development De-
partment, the amount of $500,000,  for deposit in the Industry Competitiveness Fund
established under ORS 285B.290, to be used for the  purpose of awarding matching grants
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1385
HB 2910
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under sections 4 and 5 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4.
As used in this section and section 5 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “Business accelerator” means a company:
(a) Operating principally in this state;
(b) With demonstrated success in operating educational programs in which outdoor gear
and apparel industry veterans mentor cohorts of founders of emerging outdoor gear and ap-
parel industry companies located in this state; and
(c) Whose purpose is to help incubate and accelerate the  growth of emerging companies.
(2) “Membership organization” means a nonprofit organization:
(a) Operating principally in this state;
(b) Consisting of member businesses from  the outdoor gear and apparel industry whose
principal place of business is in this state; and
(c) That has the purpose of growing the outdoor gear and  apparel industry at the state
or regional level.
(3) “Outdoor gear and apparel industry” means all  traded sector businesses that manu-
facture gear and apparel for use in outdoor recreation.
(4) “Outdoor recreation” means  activities undertaken for pleasure outdoors in natural
environments.
(5) “Traded sector” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285B.280.
SECTION 5.
(1)(a) The Oregon  Business Development Department shall use the moneys
allocated under section 3 of this 2023 Act to award matching grants to membership organ-
izations and business accelerators in accordance with this section.
(b) Matching grants awarded under this section must be used by the  receiving member-
ship organizations and business  accelerators for the purposes of capacity building and tech-
nical assistance in the outdoor gear and apparel industry.
(2)(a) The department shall provide public notice whenever there are  funds available for
matching grants under this section.
(b) The notice must include information about the  requirements for eligibility and the
application process for the matching grants.
(3)(a) A membership organization or business  accelerator seeking a matching grant un-
der this section must file with the department an application in  accordance with rules
adopted by the department pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection. The information
included with the application must demonstrate that the applicant is  a membership organ-
ization or business accelerator.
(b) The department may charge an application fee in an amount that does not exceed the
actual costs incurred by the department in processing applications filed pursuant to  this
section.
(c) The department shall adopt rules that establish  the application process for matching
grants awarded under this section.
(4) The department  may not pay the amount of a matching grant to a membership or-
ganization or business  accelerator unless the recipient has entered into a grant agreement
with the department that  establishes the deliverables required from, and other goals to be
met by, the recipient.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding ORS 285B.290, moneys in the Industry Competitiveness
Fund established under ORS 285B.290 that are  deposited or otherwise credited to the fund for
[2]
HB 2910
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
the purpose of  awarding grants under sections 4 and 5 of this 2023 Act are allocated to the
department for such purpose and may not be used for any other purpose.
SECTION 7.
No later  than September 15, 2024, the Oregon Business Development De-
partment shall submit, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, a report  that sets forth the
investments made pursuant to section  5 of this 2023 Act to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to economic development.
SECTION 8. Sections 4 to 6 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 9. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]