Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 197A.
SECTION 2. (1) A local  government may not require any payment of a system develop-
ment charge, as  defined in ORS 223.299, prior to, or as a condition of, the issuance of a cer-
tificate of occupancy if  the charge is for the development of a new dwelling unit within an
urban growth boundary.
(2) A local  government may not assess any penalty or interest on a system development
charge described in this section prior to issuing a certificate of occupancy.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to system development  charges assessed
on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3670