Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 824.400 is amended to read:
824.400. (1) The Department of Transportation  shall develop and implement a passenger rail plan
for the purposes  of increasing ridership on passenger trains and increasing ticket revenue. The
passenger rail plan must include, but is not limited to, the following:
(a) A marketing strategy.
(b) Strategies for boosting ridership.
(c) Strategies for boosting tourism through the use of passenger rail.
(d) Strategies for boosting capacity.
(e) Strategies for upgrading and improving railroad track and related infrastructure.
(f) Information about  federal rail infrastructure grant applications submitted, denied and
approved, provided in summary form.
(2) The department may coordinate with other state agencies to develop the plan.
(3) Not  later than December 31 of each even-numbered year, the department shall provide
a status report, in  the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the Joint Committee on Trans-
portation on developing the passenger rail plan, actions taken to implement the plan  and any
needed legislative changes.
(4) The department shall submit a quarterly report on the  performance of passenger rail
to the Joint Committee on Transportation in the  manner provided in ORS 192.245. The report
must include a summary of the  number of passengers utilizing passenger rail and on-time
performance for the previous quarter.
SECTION 2.
ORS 824.410 is repealed.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1410
HB 3231
1
2
3
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]