Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Central table bargaining team” means a collective bargaining team that negotiates
and sets foundational terms and conditions of a collective bargaining agreement that relate
specifically to the salary and benefits of licensed educators statewide.
(b) “Labor organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 243.650.
(c) “Licensed educator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 342.621.
(d) “Local  table bargaining team” means a collective bargaining team that negotiates
terms and conditions  of employment, other than salary and benefits, for licensed educators
at the local school district level.
(2)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall develop an implementa-
tion plan for establishing a statewide collective bargaining process for  licensed educators in
this state.
(b) For  the purpose of developing the implementation plan under this section, the de-
partment shall convene an advisory group, consisting of representatives from:
(A) The Department of Education;
(B) The Coalition of Oregon School Administrators;
(C) The Oregon Education Association;
(D) The Oregon School Boards Association;
(E) The office of the Governor with expertise in the state  budget process and school
funding;
(F) The Oregon Association of School Business Officials;
(G) One or more labor organizations that represent public employees;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 943
SB 313
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
(H) The Public Employees’ Benefit Board;
(I) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board;
(J) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services with legal expertise  in public
employee collective bargaining; and
(K) The majority and minority parties of the House of Representatives and the Senate.
(c) The advisory group formed as  provided in paragraph (b) of this section shall advise
regarding:
(A) The development and implementation of the plan.
(B) Adoption of rules by the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services for the im-
plementation of the plan.
(3) The implementation plan developed under this section must:
(a) Establish a framework  for a statewide collective bargaining process for licensed edu-
cators employed in school districts and education service districts across this state.
(b) Examine salaries and benefits for licensed educators in relation to the state budget
allocation for public school funding.
(c) Contemplate a collective bargaining framework that mandates bargaining through:
(A) A central table bargaining team consisting of representatives from  the Department
of Education, school district boards and state government who have knowledge  and expertise
in education funding; and
(B) A local table bargaining team.
(d) Provide strategies for bargaining over  salary and benefits relative to the budget ap-
propriated for school funding.
(e) Consider methods for  achieving additional funding for purposes of adjusting the sala-
ries and benefits of licensed educators  in the event that the estimated budget appropriation
to cover such costs is determined to be insufficient.
(f) Provide timelines for collective bargaining that aligns with the  state budget policy and
process timelines.
(4)(a) No later than December 1, 2026, the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services
shall provide a progress report to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related
to education on the status of the implementation plan described under this section.
(b) No later than December 1, 2027, the department shall provide  a draft report and no
later than December 1, 2028, a final report, in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education on the findings and
recommendations of the department regarding the  statewide collective bargaining for li-
censed educators, including recommendations for legislative  changes necessary to require
statewide collective bargaining for licensed educators by July 1, 2029.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]