Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall issue a  grant to
Clackamas County to be  used for transportation infrastructure improvements in the Sunrise
Corridor.
SECTION 2. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the  Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, the amount of  $30,000,000 to be distributed by grant to Clackamas County pursuant
to section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4717