Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
FOOD WASTE DISPOSAL
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act:
(1)(a) “Covered entity” means a person that:
(A) Cooks, assembles, processes, serves or sells food; and
(B) Generates more than 1,000 pounds of food waste per week at a single site.
(b) “Covered entity” does not include individuals or households.
(2)(a) “Food waste” means solid waste consisting of discarded food.
(b) “Food waste” does not include:
(A) Food that is fit for human consumption and accepted for donation by  a charitable
organization;
(B) Food collected to feed animals in compliance with all applicable laws; or
(C) Liquids, oils or meats collected for rendering, fuel production or other nondisposal
applications.
(3) “Person” has the meaning given that term in ORS 459.005.
(4) “Solid waste” has the meaning given that term in ORS 459.005.
SECTION 2.
(1) A  covered entity must, for each site owned or operated by the covered
entity that generates more than 1,000 pounds of food waste per week:
(a)(A) Recover food waste that is controlled by the employees or agents of the  covered
entity;
(B) The requirements of this paragraph do not  apply to food waste discarded by the
covered entity’s customers or other individuals served by the covered entity;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 771
HB 3018
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Source separate food waste for collection;
(c) Correctly label food waste collection containers; and
(d) Arrange for food waste to be collected and transported to a facility authorized to ac-
cept food waste for composting.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(a) of this section, a covered entity may  implement a
system for the individuals that are served  by the covered entity to separate food waste from
other solid waste. The  system must be designed to ensure that food waste is not contam-
inated with other solid waste.
(3) Any person who owns or controls the premises on which a covered entity subject to
the requirements of  this section generates food waste must allow, and make reasonable ac-
commodations for, the covered entity to comply with the requirements of this section.
(4) A covered entity shall annually report to the Department of Environmental Quality:
(a) The amount of food waste the covered entity generated in the previous year;
(b) Any strategies used by the covered entity to reduce food waste; and
(c) The amount of food waste generated  by the covered entity and the method used to
dispose of the food waste.
(5) Any person that  is not subject to the requirements of this section may, and is en-
couraged to, voluntarily comply with this section.
(6) The Environmental Quality Commission may adopt rules as necessary  to implement
this section.
SECTION 3.
The Department of Environmental Quality shall establish a program  to ed-
ucate covered entities on the requirements of  section 2 of this 2025 Act. Under the program,
the department shall:
(1) Notify covered entities of the requirements of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) Provide technical  support to covered entities on the implementation of food waste
separation systems that satisfy the requirements of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(3) Provide education  to covered entities on food waste reduction and donation of food
that is fit for human consumption.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall have the  power to enter
upon and inspect, at any reasonable time, any public or private property, premises or place
for the purpose of investigating either an actual or suspected violation of section 2  of this
2025 Act or rules adopted under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) In accordance with the applicable provisions of  ORS chapter 183 relating to contested
case proceedings, and in accordance  with ORS 468.130 and rules adopted pursuant to ORS
468.130, the department may issue civil penalties for violations of section  2 of this 2025 Act
and rules adopted under section 2 of this 2025  Act. All penalties recovered for violations of
section 2 of this 2025 Act or rules adopted under section 2 of this 2025 Act shall  be paid into
the State Treasury and credited to the General Fund.
(3) The Environmental Quality Commission shall establish by rule criteria and procedures
for waivers from the requirements of section 2  of this 2025 Act for good cause. The duration
of a waiver may not exceed one year.
SECTION 5.
 Section 1 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 1. As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act:
(1)(a) “Covered entity” means a person that:
(A) Cooks, assembles, processes, serves or sells food; and
[2]
HB 3018
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Generates more than [ 1,000] 500 pounds of food waste per week at a single site.
(b) “Covered entity” does not include individuals or households.
(2)(a) “Food waste” means solid waste consisting of discarded food.
(b) “Food waste” does not include:
(A) Food that is fit for human consumption and accepted for donation by a charitable organiza-
tion;
(B) Food collected to feed animals in compliance with all applicable laws; or
(C) Liquids, oils or  meats collected for rendering, fuel production or other nondisposal applica-
tions.
(3) “Person” has the meaning given that term in ORS 459.005.
(4) “Solid waste” has the meaning given that term in ORS 459.005.
SECTION 6.
 Section 2 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 2. (1) A covered entity must, for each site owned or  operated by the covered entity that
generates more than [ 1,000] 500 pounds of food waste per week:
(a)(A) Recover food waste that is controlled by the employees or agents of the covered entity;
(B) The requirements of this paragraph do not apply to food waste discarded by the  covered
entity’s customers or other individuals served by the covered entity;
(b) Source separate food waste for collection;
(c) Correctly label food waste collection containers; and
(d) Arrange for food waste to  be collected and transported to a facility authorized to accept food
waste for composting.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(a) of this section,  a covered entity may implement a system
for the individuals that are served by  the covered entity to separate food waste from other solid
waste. The system must be designed to ensure that food waste is not contaminated with  other solid
waste.
(3) Any person who  owns or controls the premises on which a covered entity subject to the re-
quirements of this section generates food  waste must allow, and make reasonable accommodations
for, the covered entity to comply with the requirements of this section.
(4) A covered entity shall annually report to the Department of Environmental Quality:
(a) The amount of food waste the covered entity generated in the previous year;
(b) Any strategies used by the covered entity to reduce food waste; and
(c) The amount of food  waste generated by the covered entity and the method used to dispose
of the food waste.
(5) Any person  that is not subject to the requirements of this section may, and is encouraged
to, voluntarily comply with this section.
(6) The Environmental Quality  Commission may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section.
SECTION 7.
(1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Department of  Environmental Quality and the Environmental Quality Commis-
sion may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section
that is necessary to enable the department or the commission to exercise,  on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the department and the commission by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) The amendments to sections 1 and 2 of this  2025 Act by sections 5 and
6 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2028.
[3]
HB 3018
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
FOOD LABELING
SECTION 9.
 ORS 616.805 is amended to read:
616.805. As used in ORS 616.800 to 616.835 and 616.994, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Food” means any substance used or intended to be  used for human consumption as food,
drink or condiment.
(b) “Food” does not include:
(A) Any article containing cannabis; or
(B) Infant formula.
[(2) “Open date” means a date clearly visible to retail consumers showing the pull  date, packing
date or other date described in ORS 616.835 (2). ]
(2) “Food establishment” has the meaning given that term in ORS 616.205.
(3) “Packing date” means the date specifying the time a perishable food was packaged in its final
form for sale to the consumer.
(4) “Perishable food” means  any food that may spoil or otherwise become unfit for human con-
sumption because of its nature, type or physical condition. “Perishable food” includes, but is not
limited to, fresh or processed meats, poultry, seafood, dairy products, bakery  products, eggs in the
shell, and foods that have been packaged or refrigerated. ORS 616.800 to 616.835 and 616.994 shall
not apply to fresh fruits or vegetables or to foods that have been canned or frozen.
[(5) “Pull date” means, whichever is earlier, the date specifying the time: ]
[(a) The perishable  food manufacturer, processor or packager recommends that a perishable food
should be removed from retail  sale, allowing the consumer time for normal home consumption or use
under proper care and storage conditions; or ]
[(b) A perishable food should no longer be offered for sale  or sold as fresh. A perishable food shall
be considered fresh only so long as significant changes in appearance, taste,  odor, nutritional value,
or other indicia of quality or fitness for human consumption have not taken  place or are not likely to
have taken place under generally accepted food handling practices for that particular food. ]
(5) “Quality date” means a date on a label affixed to the packaging or container of food
that communicates to consumers the date after  which the food quality may begin to deteri-
orate but the food may still be acceptable for consumption.
(6) “Safety date” means a date on a label affixed to the packaging or container of food
that communicates to consumers that the food should be consumed, or frozen, if appropriate,
by the date listed on the package.
SECTION 10.
Section 11 of this 2025 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 616.800 to
616.835.
SECTION 11. (1) A food establishment responsible for  the labeling of food that is required
by any law, including ORS 616.815 or rules adopted under ORS 616.835, or  that chooses to
display a date label to communicate a quality or safety date  on food shall use one of the
following uniform terms on the date label:
(a) “BEST if Used by” or “BEST  if Used or Frozen by” to indicate the quality date of the
food.
(b) “USE by” or “USE by or Freeze by” to indicate the safety date of the food.
(c) “BB” to indicate the quality date of the food if the food is too  small to include the
uniform term described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d) “UB” to indicate the safety date of the food if the food is too small  to include the
[4]
HB 3018
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
uniform term described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(2) A person may not sell  or offer for sale in or into this state food that is not labeled
in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(3) A person may not sell or offer for sale in or into this state food that  is labeled with
the phrase “sell by.”
(4) This section does not prohibit the use or display of a label that allows consumers to
view online information about the food.
(5) This section does not apply to the extent that any law governing  the labeling of
shellfish requires the use of terms that are inconsistent with this section.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 616.815 is amended to read:
616.815. [No person shall ] A person may not  sell or offer for sale at retail  any packaged per-
ishable food unless the package bears a clearly marked, printed or stamped  label showing the [ open
date] quality date or safety date  for the perishable food in the package. Such label shall  be so
designed and placed as to be clearly visible to the consumer.
SECTION 13.  ORS 616.825 is amended to read:
616.825. (1) [ No person shall ] A person may not  sell or offer for  sale at retail any packaged
perishable food after the expiration of the [ open pull ] quality date or safety  date appearing on the
label of the package or container unless:
(a) The package has been separated from packages of perishable food with  [ open pull ] quality
date or safety  dates that have not expired;
(b) Each such package  or group of packages is clearly identified in retail display as having an
expired [ open pull ] quality date or safety  date; and
(c) The food is fit for human consumption according to applicable state and federal law.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a vendor shall be allowed  the first eight
business hours after the expiration of the [ open pull ] quality date or  safety  date within which to
remove all packages with an expired [ pull] quality date or safety  date.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 616.830 is amended to read:
616.830. [No person shall ] A person may not :
(1) Alter,  deface or remove the [ open] quality date or safety  date from any perishable food re-
tail or shipping package carton, container or wrapper.
(2) Label any perishable food retail or shipping package carton,  container or wrapper in a
manner that does not conform to the rules promulgated pursuant to ORS 616.835.
SECTION 15.  ORS 616.835 is amended to read:
616.835. In accordance with any applicable provision of ORS chapter 183, the State  Department
of Agriculture, in consultation with  the industries affected, shall promulgate rules to carry out ORS
616.800 to 616.835 and 616.994. Such rules shall include, but are not limited to:
(1) Establishing which particular foods are subject to ORS 616.800 to 616.835 and 616.994.
(2) Establishing which one  or more of the following types of [ open date ] dates is to be used for
particular groups or classes of perishable foods:
[(a) The packing date. ]
[(b) The pull date. ]
(a) The quality date.
(b) The safety date.
(c) The packing date in addition to the quality date or safety date.
[(c)] (d)  The date on which fowl, including chickens, fryers, turkeys, ducks, geese  and other
[5]
HB 3018
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
domesticated birds, are killed or slaughtered to be processed into perishable food.
(3) Specifying the size, content and form of the labeling information required  by ORS 616.800 to
616.835 and 616.994.
(4) Exempting from the operation of ORS 616.800 to 616.835 and 616.994 those perishable  foods
for which [ open] quality date or safety  date labeling would be:
(a) Impractical or not meaningful because of the size of the  package or the nature of the per-
ishable food;  or
(b) Possibly unconstitutional as interference with the free movement of goods  in interstate
commerce.
SECTION 16.
ORS 616.800 is repealed.
SECTION 17. (1) Section 11 of this 2025 Act, the amendments  to ORS 616.805, 616.815,
616.825, 616.830 and 616.835 by sections 9 and 12 to 15 of this 2025 Act  and the repeal of ORS
616.800 by section 16 of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The State Department of  Agriculture may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the department to ex-
ercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by section  11 of this 2025 Act, the
amendments to ORS 616.805, 616.815, 616.825, 616.830 and 616.835 by  sections 9 and 12 to 15
of this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS 616.800 by section 16 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 18.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 19. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[6]