Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Measurement and Reporting of Appropriated Water
Use is established.
(2) The Governor shall  appoint five members to the task force who are knowledgeable
about appropriated water use.
(3) The task force shall study the  measurement and reporting of appropriated water use.
(4) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for  legislation, to an appropriate interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2020.
(11) The Water Resources Department shall provide staff support to the task force.
(12) Members of the task force are not entitled to  compensation or reimbursement for
expenses and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on December 31, 2020.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3078
HB 2854
1
[2]