Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $450,000 for distribution to
the Rogue Siskiyou Regional Wildfire and Emergency Training Center.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1909