Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
THE PROVISION OF MENSTRUAL PRODUCTS TO STUDENTS
SECTION 1.
 ORS 326.545 is amended to read:
326.545. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Public education provider” means:
(A) A school district;
(B) A public charter school;
(C) An education service district;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3903
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) A community college; or
(E) A public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(b) “Public school  building” means a building that, as identified by a public education pro-
vider, is  used by [ a] the public education provider to regularly provide educational services to
students.
[(c) “Student bathroom” means a bathroom that  is accessible by students in kindergarten or above,
including a gender-neutral bathroom, a bathroom  designated for females and a bathroom designated for
males.]
(2) Each public education provider shall identify at least one location in each public school
building where the public education provider will ensure that both  tampons and sanitary pads
are available at no cost to students  through dispensers [ located in every student bathroom of every
public school building ].
(3) A public education provider, and any employee of a public education provider, is not  liable
in a criminal action or for civil damages as a result of a student’s use of a tampon  or sanitary pad
made available under this section.
(4) The State  Board of Education and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall
adopt any rules necessary  for the administration of this section. Rules adopted by the board and
commission shall provide for:
[(a) The number of dispensers required in each student bathroom; ]
[(b)] (a) The types  of products available in each [ student bathroom ] location identified by the
public education provider;
[(c)] (b) The provision of tampons and sanitary pads in an  alternate location when the public
education provider does not have control of  [ the student bathrooms used by ] a suitable location to
make tampons and sanitary pads accessible to  the students of the public education provider;
[(d)] (c) Modifications to or exemptions from the requirements of this  section [ for student
bathrooms that are  not located ] if there are no suitable locations  in commonly accessible areas of
the public school buildings of a community college or a public university; and
[(e)] (d) Payments to public education providers for costs  incurred under this section, including:
(A) For school  districts, public charter schools and education service districts and subject to
subparagraph (B) of  this paragraph, distributions from amounts available under ORS 327.008 (17) to
be made based on the average daily membership, as defined in  ORS 327.006, of the district or school;
(B) For education service  districts, distributions to be made as provided by subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph may not exceed 7.5  percent of the amounts available for distribution under ORS
327.008 (17);
(C) For community colleges, distributions from the Community College Support Fund to be  made
based on the full-time equivalent student enrollment of the community college; and
(D) For public universities, distributions  from a public university support fund established by the
commission by rule.
TAX CREDIT FOR RURAL TEACHERS
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Qualified metropolitan statistical area” means only those counties  of a metropolitan
statistical area that are located in Oregon if the largest  city within the metropolitan statis-
[2]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tical area is located in Oregon.
(b) “Rural area” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285C.350.
(2) A credit against the taxes otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 shall  be allowed to
a resident or nonresident individual who is:
(a) Employed, for at least 600 hours  during the tax year, as a teacher at a school located
in a rural area; and
(b) Licensed under ORS 342.125.
(3) The amount of the credit allowed  shall be based on the distance of the school at which
the taxpayer  is employed from the largest city within a qualified metropolitan statistical
area:
(a) If at least 10 miles but fewer than 20 miles, $3,000.
(b) If at least 20 miles but fewer than 50 miles, $4,000.
(c) If 50 or more miles, $5,000.
(4) A nonresident  shall be allowed the credit under this section. The credit shall be
computed in the same manner and be subject to the same limitations as the credit granted
to a resident.  However, the credit shall be prorated using the proportion provided in ORS
316.117.
(5) If a change in the  taxable year of the taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085,
or if the Department of Revenue  terminates the taxpayer’s taxable year under ORS 314.440,
the credit allowed by  this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with
ORS 314.085.
(6) If a change  in the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from nonres-
ident to resident occurs, the credit  allowed by this section shall be determined in a manner
consistent with ORS 316.117.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
POLITICALLY NEUTRAL EDUCATION
SECTION 5.  ORS 336.067 is amended to read:
336.067. (1) In public schools , special emphasis shall be given to instruction in:
(a) Honesty, morality, courtesy, obedience to law, respect for  the national flag, the Constitution
of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Oregon, respect for  parents and the home,
the dignity and necessity of honest labor and other lessons that tend to promote  and develop an
upright and desirable citizenry.
(b) Respect for all humans, regardless of race, color, creed,  national origin, religion, age, sex or
disability.
(c) Acknowledgment of the dignity and worth of individuals and groups and  their participative
roles in society.
(d) Humane treatment of animals.
(e) The effects of tobacco, alcohol, drugs and controlled substances upon the human system.
(2) In public schools, special care shall be given to ensure that instruction is provided  in
a neutral  manner that focuses on academic subject matter and does not advocate the per-
sonal views of an educator in relation to a political movement or group that is attempting
to change government policy or social values.
[3]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(2)] (3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prepare  an outline with suggestions that
will best accomplish  the purpose of this section, and shall incorporate the outline in the courses of
study for all public schools.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 326.051 is amended to read:
326.051. Subject to ORS 417.300 and 417.305:
(1) In addition to such other duties as are  prescribed by law and pursuant to the requirement
of ORS chapter 183, the State Board of Education shall:
(a) Establish state standards for public kindergartens and public elementary and secondary
schools consistent with the policies stated in ORS 326.011.
(b) Adopt rules for the general governance of public kindergartens and public elementary  and
secondary  schools.
(c) Prescribe required or minimum courses of study.
(d) Adopt rules for public kindergartens and public elementary and secondary  schools consistent
with the policy stated in ORS 342.437.
(e) Adopt rules regarding school and interscholastic activities.
(f) Adopt rules that provide that no public elementary  or secondary school shall discriminate in
determining participation in interscholastic activities. As  used in this paragraph, “discrimination”
has the meaning given that term in ORS 659.850.
(g) Adopt rules that will eliminate the use and purchase of  elemental mercury, mercury com-
pounds and mercury-added instructional materials by public elementary and secondary schools.
(2) The State Board of Education may:
(a) Consistent with the laws of this state, accept money or property  not otherwise provided for
under paragraph  (b) of this subsection, which is donated for the use or benefit of the public
kindergartens and public elementary and secondary  schools and use such money or property for the
purpose for which it was donated. Until it is used, the board shall deposit any money received  under
this paragraph in a special fund with the State Treasurer as provided in ORS 293.265 to 293.275.
(b) Apply for federal funds, accept and enter into any contracts or  agreements on behalf of the
state for the receipt of funds from the federal government or its agencies and disburse or expend
the federal funds as provided by ORS 327.128. This paragraph applies  to federal funds to be used for:
(A) Educational purposes, including but not  limited to any funds available for the school lunch
program;
(B) Career and technical education programs in public elementary and secondary schools; and
(C) Any grants available to the state or its political subdivisions for general federal aid  for
public kindergartens, public elementary  schools and public secondary schools and their auxiliary
services,  improvement  of teacher preparation, teacher salaries, construction of school buildings, ad-
ministration of the Department of Education and any other educational  activities under the juris-
diction of the State Board of Education.
(c) Adopt rules to administer the United States  Department of Agriculture’s National School
Lunch Program and School Breakfast Program for public and  private prekindergarten through grade
12 schools and residential child care facilities.
(3) The State Board  of Education may not adopt rules that promote a stance or otherwise
show support for or  against a political movement or group that is attempting to change
government policy or social values.
SECTION 7.
Section 8 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 341.
SECTION 8. Faculty and other employees at a community college who provide instruction
[4]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to students shall ensure that instruction  is provided in a neutral manner that focuses on
academic subject matter and does  not promote a stance or otherwise show support for or
against a political movement or group that is  attempting to change government policy or
social values.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 352.189 is amended to read:
352.189. (1) A political or sectarian test may not be allowed or applied in the appointment of
faculty and other employees of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(2) Faculty and other employees at a public  university listed in ORS 352.002 who provide
instruction to students shall ensure that instruction is provided in a neutral manner that
focuses on academic subject matter and does not promote a stance  or otherwise show sup-
port for or against a political movement or group that is attempting to  change government
policy or social values.
BIOLOGICAL SEX IN SCHOOL SPORTS
SECTION 10.
(1) Each  school district shall require that every athletic competition or
extracurricular sport is expressly designated by the biological  sex of the students who par-
ticipate in the competition or sport as follows:
(a) “Males,” “Men” or “Boys”;
(b) “Females,” “Women” or “Girls”; or
(c) “Coed.”
(2) Students of the  biologically male sex may not participate in any athletic competition
or extracurricular sport that is designated as “Females,” “Women”  or “Girls” under sub-
section (1) of this section.
(3) Nothing in subsection (2)  of this section restricts or prohibits any student from par-
ticipating in any  athletic competition or extracurricular sport that is designated as
“Males,” “Men,” “Boys” or “Coed.”
(4) A public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, any licensing  or accrediting organization or
any voluntary  organization that administers interscholastic activities or that facilitates the
scheduling and programming of interscholastic activities may not entertain  a complaint,
open an investigation or take any other adverse action against a school district for  main-
taining separate athletic  competitions or extracurricular sports in accordance with sub-
section (2) of this section.
(5) A student who is deprived of an opportunity or suffers a direct  or indirect harm as
a result  of a school district knowingly violating this section may bring a claim against the
school district for injunctive relief, damages and any other relief available under law.
(6) A student  who is subject to retaliation or any other adverse action by a school district
or athletic  association or organization as a result of reporting a violation of this section to
an employee of the school district or the athletic association or organization, or to any public
body with oversight  of school districts in this state, may bring a claim against the school
district or athletic association or organization for injunctive relief, damages and any other
relief available under law.
(7) A school district that suffers a direct or indirect harm as a result of a  violation of
this section may bring a claim  against the public body, licensing or accrediting organization
or athletic association or  organization for injunctive relief, damages and any other relief
[5]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
available under law.
(8) A civil action  brought under this section must be initiated not more than two years
after the alleged direct or  indirect harm or the retaliation or other adverse action
occurred. A student or school district that prevails on a claim brought under this  section is
entitled to monetary damages, including damages for any  psychological, emotional or phys-
ical harm suffered, attorney fees and costs and any other appropriate relief.
SECTION 11.
(1) Section 10 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) Section 10 of this 2025 Act first applies to the 2026-2027 school year.
SCHOOL SAFETY
SECTION 12.  ORS 339.312 is amended to read:
339.312. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Peace officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 133.005.
(b) “School resource officer” means a peace officer who is assigned to a school.
(2) Each district school board shall adopt a policy  to provide for the safety of the stu-
dents of the school  district when students are expected to be in the schools of the school
district. The policy shall prescribe:
(a) The assignment of a school  resource officer or the provision of other law enforcement
coverage for each school of the school district; and
(b) The training or other qualifications required for  any school resource officer who is
assigned to, or any law enforcement entity that provides coverage at, a school of the  school
district.
(3) As part of  the policy adopted under subsection (2) of this section, school districts are
encouraged to form a safe school alliance composed of schools, law enforcement agencies,  juvenile
justice agencies and district attorneys.  [ The purpose of a safe school alliance is to provide the safest
school environment possible. ]
SECTION 13.
 ORS 327.008 is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from  public and private sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School  Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Fund for Student Success, moneys transferred from the  Education Sta-
bility Fund and the Oregon Marijuana Account and moneys received  as provided in paragraph (b)
of this subsection.
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for  the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to  327.077, 327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 327.356 to
327.359, 336.575, 336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant,  consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a transportation
grant and a  high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as provided in ORS 327.011
and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases to  operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of  termination or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
[6]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
from the State School Fund to  each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s  general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each education  service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All  figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average  daily membership used in the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
more than $3 million for expenses incurred  by the department in providing support to school dis-
tricts, education service districts and public charter schools at any time before, during or after a
threat or hazard that may affect a school  district, an education service district or a public charter
school and for the purpose of helping to improve the safety and security of students and staff.
(8) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
more than $10 million  for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125
(1)(b) to (g).
(9) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing  Facil-
ity Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs  of educational ser-
vices provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of  $55 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(11)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from  the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the  amounts identified in this subsection shall be adjusted by the same
percentage  by  which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(12) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English  Language Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(13) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the  State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this  section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(14) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development  of talented and gifted
[7]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
education under ORS 343.404.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of a program to increase the number  of licensed speech-language
pathologists and certified speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.398.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million from  the State School
Fund for deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS  332.337.
Notwithstanding ORS 332.337, the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy  School
Facilities  Fund  under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing for elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
(17) Each biennium, the Department  of Education shall transfer an amount not to exceed
$5,595,000 for the purpose  of making tampons and sanitary pads available as provided by ORS
326.545.
(18) Each fiscal year, the  Department of Education shall transfer the amount of $2.5 million from
the State School Fund to the Small School District Supplement Fund established in ORS 327.359.
(19) Each biennium,  the Department of Education shall transfer to the Oregon Military Depart-
ment the amount necessary to pay the costs of  educational services provided to students admitted
to programs operated by the military department for at-risk youth, as described  in ORS 396.360, that
are outstanding after any General Fund appropriations  and the calculation of available federal funds
for the programs.
(20) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  may expend up to 
 from the
State School Fund to distribute to school districts the amounts necessary  to pay for the
costs of school resource  officers or other appropriate law enforcement coverage for each
school of the school district, including the costs of any related training, as  required under
ORS 339.312.
SECTION 14. (1) The amendments to ORS 327.008 and  339.312 by sections 12 and 13 of this
2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The amendments to  ORS 327.008 by section 13 of this 2025 Act first apply to the
2026-2027 school year.
CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION TEACHERS
SECTION 15.  ORS 344.062 is amended to read:
344.062. The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall advance  the policy on career
and technical education described in ORS 344.055 by:
(1) Establishing and  regularly updating the requirements for [ a teacher] an educator preparation
program for prospective career and technical education teachers with trade or industry  experience.
The requirements must:
(a) Identify a minimum number of required credit hours for a program; and
(b) Be established and regularly updated based on consultations with  relevant trade or industry
stakeholders, the Department of Education and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(2) Ensuring that nontraditional pathways to licensure are available for prospective  ca-
reer and technical education teachers with trade or industry experience.
(3) Providing accommodations or otherwise reducing licensure  requirements for licensed
career and technical education teachers, or prospective career and  technical education
teachers, who live in  rural areas, as identified by the Teacher Standards and Practices
[8]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Commission by rule.
[(2)] (4) Collaborating with the Department of Education to:
(a) Enable experts in trade or industry to become teachers of career and technical  education,
which may be accomplished through a limited license or alternative requirements for licensure;
(b) Coordinate communications  about career and technical education, as described in ORS
344.059 (3)(b); and
(c) Review statutes and rules for necessary changes  and to review and recommend alternative
methods to increase available funding options.
IMMUNIZATION REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 16.
Section 17 of this 2025 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 433.235 to
433.284.
SECTION 17. The Oregon Health Authority may not  adopt rules to require an individual
to be immunized against COVID-19, or against any other disease  if the immunization uses
messenger RNA, as a condition of the individual’s attendance in any  school, children’s facil-
ity or post-secondary institution of education, as that term is defined in ORS 433.281.
SECTION 18. Section 17 of this 2025 Act applies to individuals attending an education
facility, as described in section 17 of this 2025 Act, before, on and after  the effective date of
this 2025 Act.
PARENTAL NOTIFICATIONS
SECTION 19.  ORS 339.356 is amended to read:
339.356. (1) Each school district shall  adopt a policy prohibiting harassment, intimidation or
bullying and prohibiting cyberbullying. School districts  shall develop the policy after consultation
with parents, guardians, school employees, volunteers, students, administrators  and community rep-
resentatives.
(2) School districts must include in the policy:
(a) A statement prohibiting harassment, intimidation or bullying and prohibiting cyberbullying.
(b) Definitions of “harassment,” “intimidation” or “bullying” and of  “cyberbullying” that are
consistent with ORS 339.351.
(c) Definitions of “protected class” that are consistent with ORS 174.100 and 339.351.
(d) A statement of the  scope of the policy, including a notice that the policy applies to behavior
at school-sponsored activities, on school-provided transportation and at any official school  bus stop.
(e) A description of the type of behavior expected from each student.
(f) A  procedure that is uniform throughout the school district for reporting an act of harassment,
intimidation or bullying or  an act of cyberbullying. A procedure established under this paragraph
shall:
(A) Identify by job title the school officials responsible for receiving such a report at a school.
(B) Require a school employee to report an act of harassment, intimidation or  bullying or an act
of cyberbullying to a person identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) Require the school official identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph  to notify the
parents or guardians of  a student who was subjected to an act of harassment, intimidation or
bullying or an act of cyberbullying and the parents or guardians of a student who may  have con-
[9]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ducted an act  of harassment, intimidation or bullying or an act of cyberbullying. Notification must
occur with involvement and consideration of the needs and concerns of the student who was sub-
jected  to  an act of harassment, intimidation or bullying or an act of cyberbullying. For the purposes
of this subparagraph:
(i) Notification is  not required under this subparagraph if the school official reasonably believes
notification could endanger the student who was subjected to an act of harassment, intimidation  or
bullying or an act of cyberbullying or if all of the following occur:
(I) The student who was subjected to an act  of harassment, intimidation or bullying or an act
of cyberbullying requests that notification not be provided to the student’s parents or guardians;
(II) The school official determines that notification is not in the best interest of the  student who
was subjected to an act of harassment, intimidation or bullying or an act of cyberbullying; and
(III) The school official  informs the student that federal law may require the student’s parents
or guardians to have access to the student’s education record,  including any requests made as pro-
vided by this sub-subparagraph.
(ii) If the school official does not make the determination described  in sub-subparagraph (i)(II)
of this subparagraph, the school official must inform the student of that determination prior to pro-
viding notification.
(iii) When notification is provided under this subparagraph, the notification must occur:
(I) Within [ a reasonable period of time ] 24 hours after receiving  a report under subparagraph
(B) of this paragraph ; or
(II) Promptly, for acts that caused physical harm to the student.
(D) Identify any remedial action that may be imposed on a school employee for  failure to make
a report as required by subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.
(E) Allow a student  or volunteer to report an act of harassment, intimidation or bullying or an
act of cyberbullying voluntarily and anonymously to a person identified under subparagraph (A) of
this paragraph.  Nothing in this subparagraph may be construed to permit remedial action solely on
the basis of an anonymous report.
(g) A procedure that is uniform throughout the school  district for prompt investigation of a re-
port of an act of harassment, intimidation or bullying or an act of cyberbullying. A procedure  es-
tablished under this paragraph shall identify by job title  the school officials responsible for
investigating such a report.
(h) A procedure by which a person may request  a school district to review the actions of a
school in responding to a report of an act of  harassment, intimidation or bullying or an act of
cyberbullying or investigating such a report.
(i) A statement of the  manner in which a school and a school district will respond after an act
of harassment, intimidation or bullying or an act of cyberbullying is reported, investigated and, if
applicable, confirmed.
(j) A statement of the consequences and appropriate remedial action  for a person found to have
committed an act of harassment, intimidation or bullying or an act of cyberbullying.
(k) A statement prohibiting reprisal or retaliation against any person who reports an act  of
harassment, intimidation or bullying or an act  of cyberbullying and stating the consequences and
appropriate remedial action for a person who engages in such reprisal or retaliation.
(L) A statement of the consequences and appropriate remedial action for a person found  to have
falsely accused another of having committed an  act of harassment, intimidation or bullying or an
act of cyberbullying as a means of reprisal or retaliation, as a means  of harassment, intimidation
[10]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or bullying or as a means of cyberbullying.
(m) A statement of how the policy is to be  publicized within the district. At a minimum, a school
district shall make the policy:
(A) Annually  available to parents, guardians, school employees and students in a student or
employee handbook; and
(B) Readily available to parents, guardians, school  employees, volunteers, students, administra-
tors and community representatives at each school  office or at the school district office and, if
available, on the website for a school or the school district.
(n) The identification by job title of school officials and school district officials responsible for
ensuring that the policy is implemented.
(3) A school district  that does not comply with the requirements of this section is considered
nonstandard under ORS 327.103.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 339.250 is amended to read:
339.250. (1)  Public school students shall comply with rules for the government of such schools,
pursue the prescribed course of study, use the prescribed textbooks and submit to the teachers’  au-
thority.
(2) Each district school board shall adopt written policies for the  discipline, suspension or ex-
pulsion of any refractory student. The policies:
(a) May allow discipline, suspension or expulsion for conduct that includes, but is  not limited
to:
(A) Willful disobedience;
(B) Open defiance of the authority of a school employee;
(C) Possession or distribution of tobacco, alcohol, drugs or other controlled substances;
(D) Use or display of profane or obscene language;
(E) Willful damage or injury to school property;
(F) Use of threats, intimidation,  harassment or coercion against a student or a school employee;
(G) Assault of a school employee or another student; or
(H) Intentional attempts,  by word or conduct, to place a school employee or another student in
fear of imminent serious physical injury.
(b) Must require consideration of the age of a student and the past pattern of behavior of  a
student prior to imposing the suspension or expulsion of a student.
(c) Must limit the use of expulsion to the following circumstances:
(A) For conduct that poses a threat to the health or safety of students or school employees;
(B) When other strategies to change student conduct have been ineffective,  except that expul-
sion may not be used to address truancy; or
(C) When the expulsion is required by law.
(d) In addition to any limitations imposed by paragraph  (c) of this subsection, for a student who
is in fifth grade or lower, must limit the use of out-of-school suspension or  of expulsion to the fol-
lowing circumstances:
(A) For nonaccidental conduct causing serious physical harm to a student or school employee;
(B) When a school administrator determines, based  upon the administrator’s observation or upon
a report from a school  employee, that the student’s conduct poses a direct threat to the health or
safety of students or school employees; or
(C) When the suspension or expulsion is required by law.
(e) When an out-of-school suspension is imposed as provided under paragraph (d)  of this sub-
[11]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section, must require the school district to take steps to prevent  the recurrence of the behavior that
led to the out-of-school suspension and return the student to a classroom setting so  that the dis-
ruption of the student’s academic instruction is minimized.
(f) Must be limited so that:
(A) The duration of an expulsion may not be more than one calendar year.
(B) The duration of a suspension may not be more than 10 school days.
(g) Notwithstanding ORS  336.010, may require a student to attend school during nonschool hours
as an alternative to suspension if the total number of hours does not exceed the equivalent of 10
school days.
(3) Pursuant to the policies adopted as provided by subsection (2) of this section, each  school
district shall develop a student handbook, code of conduct or other document that:
(a) Defines and helps create a learning environment that students respect;
(b) Defines acceptable  norms of behavior for students and the types of behavior that are subject
to discipline;
(c) Establishes procedures  to address behavior or circumstances that pose a threat to the safety
of students or employees of the school;
(d) Establishes a system of consequences that are designed to correct student misconduct  and
promote behavior within acceptable norms; and
(e) Makes  the system of consequences known to the school community through the dissemination
of information to students, parents, legal guardians and school district employees.
(4) Each district school board shall  adopt written policies on managing students who threaten
violence  or  harm in public schools. The policies adopted by a district school board under this section
shall include all of the following:
(a) Staff reporting methods.
(b) Provisions that allow an administrator to  consider and implement any of the following
options:
(A) Immediately removing from the classroom setting any student who has  threatened to injure
another person or to severely damage school property.
(B) Placing the student in a setting  where the behavior will receive immediate attention, in-
cluding, but not limited to, the  office of the school principal, vice principal, assistant principal,
counselor or a school  psychologist licensed by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission or
the office of any licensed mental health professional.
(C) Requiring that a school obtain an evaluation of a student by a licensed mental  health pro-
fessional before allowing the student to return to the classroom setting.  A student who is removed
from the classroom setting for an evaluation may not be removed for more than  10 school days un-
less the administrator is able to show good  cause that an evaluation could not be completed in that
time period. The policy must describe the circumstances under which the district school board may
enter into contracts with  licensed mental health professionals to perform any evaluations required
under this subparagraph.
(c) The requirement that an administrator provide  to the parent or legal guardian of the
student:
(A) Notification that describes the student’s behavior and  that is provided  within 24 hours
of the administrator being informed of the behavior; and
(B) Notification that describes  the school’s response.
(d) A provision for the allocation of any funds necessary for the school  district to implement the
[12]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
policies described in this subsection.
(5) In establishing and enforcing discipline, suspension and expulsion policies, a  district school
board shall ensure that the policy is designed to:
(a) Protect students and school employees from harm;
(b) Provide opportunities for students to learn from their mistakes;
(c) Foster positive learning communities;
(d) Keep students in school and attending class;
(e) Impose disciplinary sanctions without bias  against students from a protected class, as defined
in ORS 339.351;
(f) Implement a graduated set of age-appropriate responses to misconduct  that are fair,
nondiscriminatory and proportionate in relation to each student’s individual conduct;
(g) Employ a range of strategies for prevention, intervention and  discipline that take into ac-
count a student’s developmental capacities and that are proportionate to the  degree and severity
of the student’s misbehavior;
(h) Propose, prior to  a student’s expulsion or leaving school, alternative programs of instruction
or instruction combined with counseling for the student that are appropriate and accessible to  the
student in the following circumstances:
(A) Following a second or subsequent occurrence within any three-year period of a severe  dis-
ciplinary problem with the student; or
(B) When a parent or legal guardian applies for the student’s exemption from compulsory  at-
tendance on a semiannual basis as provided in ORS 339.030 (2);
(i) To the extent practicable, use  approaches that are shown through research to be effective in
reducing student misbehavior and promoting safe and productive social behavior; [ and]
(j) Ensure that school conduct and discipline codes  comply with all state and federal laws con-
cerning the education of students with disabilities[ .]; and
(k) Inform parents or legal guardians, within 24 hours  of the school learning of the be-
havior, of any behavior that may lead to discipline, suspension or expulsion.
(6) Except for policies adopted under subsection (7) of this section, any  policies adopted under
this section must provide for the dissemination of  information about alternative programs of in-
struction or instruction combined with counseling, as described in subsection (5)(h) of this  section,
in writing to the student and the parent, legal guardian or person in parental relationship with the
student at least once every six months, unless the information has changed because  of the avail-
ability of new programs.
(7) Each district school board shall adopt a written policy  involving firearms, as defined in 18
U.S.C. 921. The policy shall:
(a) Require expulsion from school for a period of not less than one year of any  student who is
determined to have:
(A) Brought a firearm  to a school, to school property under the jurisdiction of the school district
or to an activity under the jurisdiction of the school district;
(B) Possessed, concealed or used a firearm in a school, on  school property under the jurisdiction
of the school district or at an activity under the jurisdiction of the school district; or
(C) Brought to or possessed, concealed or used a firearm at an interscholastic activity  adminis-
tered by a voluntary organization.
(b) Allow exceptions:
(A) For courses, programs and activities approved by the  school district that are conducted on
[13]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school property, including, but not  limited to, hunter safety courses, Reserve Officer Training Corps
programs, firearm-related sports or firearm-related vocational courses; and
(B) Identified by and adopted by the State Board of Education by rule.
(c) Allow a superintendent of a school district to:
(A) Modify the expulsion requirement for a student on a case-by-case basis.
(B) Propose  alternative programs of instruction or instruction combined with counseling for a
student that are  appropriate and accessible to the student. If alternative programs are appropriate
for a student,  the superintendent shall ensure that information about programs of instruction or in-
struction combined with counseling is provided  in writing to the student and the parent, legal
guardian or person in parental  relationship with the student at least once every six months, or at
any time the information changes because of the availability of new programs.
(d) Require  a referral to the appropriate law enforcement agency of any student who is expelled
under this subsection.
(e) Require an annual reporting to the Department of Education of the name of  each school that
had an expulsion under this subsection and the number of students expelled from each school.
(8) Each district school board shall adopt and disseminate written policies for the use of physical
force upon a student. The policies must allow an individual who  is a teacher, administrator, school
employee or school volunteer to use reasonable physical force upon a student when and to  the ex-
tent the application of force is consistent with ORS 339.285 to 339.303.
(9)(a) The authority to discipline a student  does not authorize the infliction of corporal punish-
ment. Every resolution, bylaw, rule, ordinance or other act of a district school board, a public
charter school or the Department of Education that permits or authorizes the  infliction of corporal
punishment upon a student is void and unenforceable.
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Corporal punishment”  means the willful infliction of, or willfully causing the infliction of,
physical pain on a student.
(B) “Corporal punishment” does not include:
(i) The use of physical force authorized by ORS 161.205 (2), (4) or  (5) for the reasons specified
therein; or
(ii) Physical pain or  discomfort resulting from or caused by participation in athletic competition
or other such recreational activity, voluntarily engaged in by a student.
(10) For purposes of this section, calculations of the number of school  days that a student is
removed from a classroom setting shall be as follows:
(a) As a half day  if the student is out of school for half, or less than half, of the scheduled school
day; and
(b) As a full day if the student is out of school for more than half of the scheduled school day.
SECTION 21.
Each school district board shall adopt a policy to ensure that:
(1) For any student under 18 years of age, the school district provides the parent or  legal
guardian of the student notification of:
(a) A visit by the student to the school nurse or a school-based health center;
(b) A visit by  the student to a school counselor, school nurse or school-based health
center when the student is displaying signs of mental fatigue or illness or signs of  self-harm;
(c) A discussion by the student of self-identity issues with any school staff; or
(d) Any other interactions with school staff similar  to the interactions described in par-
agraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection.
[14]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The notification  required under subsection (1) of this section is provided within 24
hours of a school employee becoming  aware of an event identified in subsection (1) of this
section.
INFORMATION ABOUT COURSES OF STUDY
SECTION 22.
 ORS 336.035 is amended to read:
336.035. (1) (a) [ The] A district school board shall [ see] ensure  that the courses of study pre-
scribed by law and by the rules of the State Board of Education are carried out.
(b) [ The] A district school board may establish supplemental courses  that are not inconsistent
with the prescribed courses  and may adopt courses of study in lieu of state courses of study upon
approval by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(c) For each course of study offered by a school  district, the district school board shall
ensure that  the curriculum of the course is made available to the public on the school
district’s website.
(2)(a) Any district school board may establish a  course of education concerning sexually trans-
mitted infections including  recognition of causes, sources and symptoms, and the availability of di-
agnostic and treatment centers. Any such course established may be taught to  adults from the
community served by the individual schools as well as to students  enrolled in the school. The board
shall cause the parents or guardians of minor students  to be notified in advance that the course is
to be taught. Any such parent or  guardian may direct in writing that the minor child in the care
of the parent  or guardian be excused from any class within the course. Any parent or guardian may
inspect the instructional materials to be used before or during the time the course is taught.
[(3)] (b) The district school board shall coordinate  the course provided in [ subsection (2) of this
section] paragraph (a) of this subsection  with the officials of the local health department and  the
Superintendent of Public Instruction. Teachers holding endorsements for health  education shall be
used [ where] when available. A teacher may not be subject to discipline or removal  for teaching or
refusing to teach courses concerning sexually transmitted infections.
(3) For each course of study taken by a student, the district school board  shall ensure
that the student’s grade is posted on a website that is accessible by the  parent or guardian
of the student and that the grade is regularly updated during a term or semester.
SECTION 23. (1) The amendments to ORS 336.035 by section 22 of this  2025 Act become
operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The amendments to  ORS 336.035 by section 22 of this 2025 Act first apply to the
2026-2027 school year.
TAX CREDIT FOR NONPUBLIC EDUCATION
SECTION 24. Section 25 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 25. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible child” means a child who  is eligible to attend the public schools of this state
as provided by ORS 339.115 (1), and who receives an education as  described in ORS 339.030
(1)(a), (d) or (e), during  any part of the tax year for which a credit is claimed under this
section.
(b) “Qualified taxpayer” means a parent or legal guardian of an eligible child.
[15]
SB 1100
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) A credit  against the taxes otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 shall be allowed for
each dependent of a qualified taxpayer who during the tax year  is an eligible child and who,
for days equaling at least 50 percent of the school days in which public schools  are in session
in the district in which the eligible child resides, is:
(a) Receiving an education as described in ORS 339.030 (1)(a), (d) or (e); and
(b) Demonstrating during the tax year completion of coursework  and class attendance
that are satisfactory, according to standards  established by rule by the State Board of Edu-
cation.
(3) The amount  of the credit under this section shall equal, based on the school district
in which the student resides, the school district’s general purpose grant per ADM, as calcu-
lated under ORS 327.013, as adjusted by any weights described in  ORS 327.013 (1)(c) that are
attributable to the student, for the school year ending during the tax year.
(4) In order  to claim the credit allowed under this section, a qualified taxpayer shall first
obtain certification of eligibility from the Department of Education.
(5) If an eligible child also attends a public school in  this state for any portion of the tax
year, the credit under this section shall be prorated based  on the number of months during
the school year that the dependent is an eligible child.
(6) The credit allowed under this section in one tax year may not exceed  the tax liability
of the taxpayer.
(7)(a) A nonresident shall be allowed the credit under this section in  the proportion pro-
vided in ORS 316.117.
(b) If  a change in the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from nonres-
ident to resident occurs, the credit  allowed by this section shall be determined in a manner
consistent with ORS 316.117.
(c) If a change in the  taxable year of a taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085, or
if the Department of Revenue  terminates the taxpayer’s taxable year under ORS 314.440, the
credit allowed under this section shall be prorated or computed in a  manner consistent with
ORS 314.085.
(8) Spouses in a marriage who file separate returns for a taxable year  may each claim a
share of the tax credit  that would have been allowed on a joint return in proportion to the
contribution of each.
(9) The State Board of Education shall  establish by rule policies and procedures for cer-
tifying taxpayers as  eligible for the credit allowed under this section, as provided in sub-
section (4)  of this section, and procedures for prorating the credit under subsection (5) of
this section.
SECTION 26.
Section 25 of this 2025 Act applies to tax years beginning on or after Jan-
uary 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 27. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 28. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[16]
SB 1100
1
[17]