Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 to 5 of this 2019 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
455.
SECTION 2. (1) If the building official for a municipality described in  ORS 455.148 or
455.150 is an independent contractor with the municipality:
(a) Except as provided in this subsection, all actions or omissions by the  building official
in the administration and enforcement of the municipal building  inspection program shall be
considered as those of an agent of the municipality  acting under a grant of authority from
the municipality on behalf of the municipality. This subsection does  not affect the ability of
a municipality or building official to assert a cause of action or to assert any available de-
fense to an action at law. This subsection does not  affect the ability of a municipality or
building official to assert any right or remedy available to  the municipality by law or con-
tract.
(b) The municipal governing body shall:
(A) Ensure that the contractor maintains  qualification as a building official as required
by the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services under OR 455.715  to
455.740;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4363
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Adopt rules and procedures  the municipality deems adequate to ensure that the
building official is in compliance with ORS 455.459; and
(C) Provide in the contract with the building official a detailed description of the  regula-
tory programs that are included  within the scope of the municipal building inspection pro-
gram. The description shall include,  but not be limited to, any standards or specific
requirements imposed by the director under ORS 455.148 or 455.150  regarding the provision
of program services by the municipality.
(c) The municipality shall designate an employee of the municipality to:
(A) Oversee the job performance by the building official in administering and enforcing
the building inspection program for the municipality, including but not limited to compliance
with the contract between the municipality  and the building official and the receipt and
processing of any complaints or appeals  regarding the administration or enforcement of the
building inspection program; and
(B) Undertake actions as necessary to ensure compliance with the  contract between the
municipality and the building official and ensure adequate job performance  by the building
official, which may include, but need not be limited to, the selection, retention or termination
of a person to be the municipal building official.
(2) Subsection (1)(c) of this section  does not limit the authority of the municipal gov-
erning body over any matters described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) A municipality  described in ORS 455.148 or 455.150 that has a building
official who is  an independent contractor shall provide a process for resolving challenges to
decisions made by the building official. If a challenge is not resolved by other means to  the
satisfaction of the challenging party, the municipality  shall convene a review board to con-
sider the merits of the challenge. The municipal review board shall  include representatives
of the municipal governing body and persons that have experience and training in the spe-
cialty code relevant to the appeal.  The municipal governing body shall establish the proce-
dures and standards for use by the review board. The  review board shall make a
recommendation to the municipal  governing body. The municipal governing body shall make
the final determination whether to uphold, modify or overturn the decision by the building
official.
(2) The municipal process described in this section is in addition to and not in lieu of any
process available under ORS  455.060 or 455.475 or any other process for review by the Di-
rector of the Department of Consumer and Business Services, a chief inspector  or an advi-
sory board and in addition to any quality control sampling under ORS 455.461.
SECTION 4.
All fees, surcharges and other amounts payable for the receipt of building
inspection program services provided by a municipality described  in ORS 455.148 or 455.150
are property of the municipality, regardless of whether the municipality provides the services
through a municipal employee or an independent contractor. If the municipality uses a
building official who is an independent contractor, and  the independent contractor is paid on
the basis of amount of work performed, the municipality  shall maintain records showing the
amounts received for the services and the amounts owed by the municipality to  the building
official for those services. The municipality is  responsible for ensuring that the amounts are
distributed as  provided by law, including but not limited to any amounts payable to the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services. The  municipality shall provide for appropriate
periodic review or auditing of financial matters relating to the municipal building inspection
[2]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
program and make the reports available upon request to the building official and  the de-
partment.
SECTION 5. The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall provide consulta-
tion services to municipal building officials, whether municipal  employees or independent
contractors, regarding code interpretations, waivers or  other matters relevant to the proper
administration and enforcement of a municipal building inspection program by a  building
official.
SECTION 6.  ORS 455.148 is amended to read:
455.148. (1)(a) A municipality that assumes the administration and enforcement of a building  in-
spection program shall administer and enforce the program for all of the following:
(A) The state building code,  as defined in ORS 455.010, except as set forth in paragraph (b) of
this subsection.
(B) Manufactured structure  installation requirements under ORS 446.155, 446.185 (1) and 446.230.
(C) Manufactured dwelling parks and mobile home parks under ORS chapter 446.
(D) Park and camp programs regulated under ORS 455.680.
(E) Tourist facilities regulated under ORS 446.310 to 446.350.
(F) Manufactured dwelling alterations regulated under ORS 446.155.
(G) Manufactured structure accessory buildings and structures under ORS 446.253.
(H) Boilers and pressure vessels described in rules adopted under ORS 480.525 (5).
(b) A building inspection program of a municipality may not include:
(A) Boiler and pressure vessel programs under ORS 480.510 to 480.670  except those described
in rules adopted under ORS 480.525 (5);
(B) Elevator programs under ORS 460.005 to 460.175;
(C) Amusement ride regulation under ORS 460.310 to 460.370;
(D) Prefabricated structure regulation under ORS chapter 455;
(E) Manufacture of manufactured structures  programs under ORS 446.155 to 446.285, including
the administration and enforcement of federal manufactured dwelling construction  and safety stan-
dards adopted under  ORS 446.155 or the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety
Standards Act of 1974;
(F) Licensing and certification, or the adoption of statewide codes and standards, under ORS
chapter 446, 447, 455, 479 or 693; or
(G) Review of plans and specifications as provided in ORS 455.685.
(2) A municipality that administers a building inspection program as allowed under this section
shall do so for periods of four years.  The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall adopt
rules to adjust  time periods for administration of a building inspection program to allow for vari-
ations in the needs of the department and participants.
(3) When a municipality administers a building inspection program, the governing body of  the
municipality shall[ , unless other  means are already provided, appoint a ] employ or contract with a
properly qualified person to administer  and enforce the building inspection program, who shall be
known as the building  official. A building official shall, in the municipality for which appointed, at-
tend to all aspects  of code enforcement, including the issuance of all building permits. The building
official shall exercise supervision  over the building inspectors used by the municipality to
provide specialty code inspection services under the building inspection program. Two or more
municipalities may combine in the appointment of  a single building official for the purpose of ad-
ministering a building inspection program within their communities.
[3]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4)(a) By January 1 of the year preceding the expiration of the four-year period  described in
subsection (2) of  this section, the governing body of the municipality shall notify the Director of the
Department of Consumer and Business Services and, if the municipality is not a county, notify  the
county whether the municipality will continue to administer and enforce  the building inspection
program after expiration of the four-year period.
(b) Notwithstanding the January 1 date set  forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director
and the municipality and, if the municipality is not a county,  the county may by agreement extend
that date to no later than March 1.
(5) If a city does not notify the director,  or notifies the director that it will not administer the
building inspection program, the county or counties in  which the city is located shall administer and
enforce the county program within the city in the same  manner as the program is administered and
enforced outside the city, except as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(6) If a county does not notify the director, or  notifies the director that it will not administer
and enforce a building inspection program, the director shall  contract with a municipality or other
person or use such state employees or state agencies  as are necessary to administer and enforce a
building inspection program, and permit or other fees  arising therefrom shall be paid into the Con-
sumer and Business Services Fund created by ORS  705.145 and credited to the account responsible
for paying the expenses thereof. A state employee may not be displaced  as a result of using contract
personnel.
(7) The governing body of a municipality may commence responsibility for the  administration
and enforcement of a building inspection program beginning July 1 of  any year by notifying the di-
rector no later than January 1 of the same  year and obtaining the director’s approval of an as-
sumption plan as described in subsection (11)(c) of this section.
(8) The department shall adopt rules to require the governing body of each municipality assum-
ing or continuing a building inspection program under this section to submit  a written plan with the
notice required under subsection (4) or (7) of  this section. If the department is the governing body,
the department shall have a plan on file. The plan must specify how cooperation with the State Fire
Marshal or a  designee of the State Fire Marshal will be achieved and how a uniform fire code will
be considered in the review process of the design  and construction phases of buildings or structures.
(9) A municipality that administers and enforces a building inspection program pursuant  to this
section shall recognize and accept the performances of state building code activities  by businesses
and persons authorized under ORS 455.457 to perform the activities as if  the activities were per-
formed by the municipality. A municipality is not required to  accept an inspection, a plan or a plan
review that does not meet the requirements of the state building code.
(10) The department or a municipality that accepts an inspection or plan review as required  by
this section by a person licensed under ORS  455.457 has no responsibility or liability for the activ-
ities of the licensee.
(11) In addition to the requirements of ORS  455.100 and 455.110, the director shall regulate
building inspection programs that municipalities assume on or after  January 1, 2002. Regulation
under this subsection shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Creating building inspection program  application and amendment requirements and proce-
dures;
(b) Granting or  denying applications for building inspection program authority and amendments;
(c) Requiring a municipality assuming a building inspection program to submit  with the notice
given under subsection (7) of this section an assumption plan that includes, at a minimum:
[4]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) A description of the intended availability of program services, including proposed  service
agreements for carrying out the program during at least the first two years;
(B) Demonstration of the  ability and intent to provide building inspection program services for
at least two years;
(C) An estimate of proposed permit revenue and program operating expenses;
(D) Proposed staffing levels; and
(E) Proposed service levels;
(d) Reviewing procedures and program operations of municipalities;
(e) Creating standards for efficient, effective,  timely and acceptable building inspection pro-
grams;
(f) Creating standards for justifying  increases in building inspection program fees adopted by a
municipality;
(g) Creating  standards for determining whether a county or department building inspection
program is economically impaired in  its ability to reasonably continue providing the program
throughout  a  county, if another municipality is allowed to provide a building inspection program
within the same county; and
(h) Enforcing the requirements of this section.
(12) The department may assume administration and enforcement of a building inspection pro-
gram:
(a) During the pendency of activities under ORS 455.770;
(b) If a municipality abandons or is no longer able to administer the building inspection program;
and
(c) If a municipality fails to substantially comply  with any provision of this section or of ORS
455.465, 455.467 and 455.469.
(13) If the department assumes the administration  and enforcement of a building inspection
program under this section, in  addition to any other power granted to the director, the director may:
(a) Enter  into agreements with local governments under ORS 455.185 regarding the adminis-
tration and enforcement of the assumed building inspection program;
(b) Take action  as described in ORS 455.192 to ensure that sufficient staff and other resources
are available for the administration and enforcement  of the assumed building inspection program;
and
(c) Charge fees described in ORS 455.195 for department services provided  in administering and
enforcing the assumed building inspection program.
(14) A municipality  that abandons or otherwise ceases to administer and enforce a building in-
spection program that the municipality assumed under this section may not resume  the adminis-
tration or enforcement of the program for at least two years. The municipality may resume  the
administration and enforcement of the abandoned program only on July 1 of an odd-numbered year.
Prior to resuming the  administration and enforcement of the program, the municipality must follow
the notification procedure set forth in subsection (7) of this section.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 455.150 is amended to read:
455.150. (1) Except as provided in subsection (15)  of this section, a municipality that assumes the
administration and enforcement of  a building inspection program prior to January 1, 2002, may ad-
minister and enforce all or part of a building inspection program. A building inspection program:
(a) Is a program that includes the following:
(A) The state building code,  as defined in ORS 455.010, except as set forth in paragraph (b) of
[5]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
this subsection.
(B) Manufactured structure  installation requirements under ORS 446.155, 446.185 (1) and 446.230.
(C) Manufactured dwelling parks and mobile home parks under ORS chapter 446.
(D) Park and camp programs regulated under ORS 455.680.
(E) Tourist facilities regulated under ORS 446.310 to 446.350.
(F) Manufactured dwelling alterations regulated under ORS 446.155.
(G) Manufactured structure accessory buildings and structures under ORS 446.253.
(H) Boilers and pressure vessels described in rules adopted under ORS 480.525 (5).
(b) Is not a program that includes:
(A) Boiler and pressure vessel programs under ORS 480.510 to 480.670  except those described
in rules adopted under ORS 480.525 (5);
(B) Elevator programs under ORS 460.005 to 460.175;
(C) Amusement ride regulation under ORS 460.310 to 460.370;
(D) Prefabricated structure regulation under ORS chapter 455;
(E) Manufacture of manufactured structures  programs under ORS 446.155 to 446.285, including
the administration and enforcement of federal manufactured dwelling construction  and safety stan-
dards adopted under  ORS 446.155 or the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety
Standards Act of 1974;
(F) Licensing and certification, or the adoption of statewide codes and standards, under ORS
chapter 446, 447, 455, 479 or 693; and
(G) Review of plans and specifications as provided in ORS 455.685.
(2) A municipality that administers a building inspection program as allowed under this section
shall do so for periods of four years.  The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall adopt
rules to adjust  time periods for administration of a building inspection program to allow for vari-
ations in the needs of the department and participants.
(3) When a municipality administers a building inspection program, the governing body of  the
municipality shall[ , unless other  means are already provided, appoint a ] employ or contract with a
properly qualified person to administer and enforce the building inspection program  or parts
thereof, who shall be known as the  building official. A building official shall, in the municipality for
which appointed, attend to all aspects of code enforcement,  including the issuance of all building
permits. The building official shall exercise supervision over the building inspectors used by
the municipality to provide specialty code inspection services under the building inspection
program. Two or more municipalities may  combine in the appointment of a single building official
for the purpose of administering a building inspection program within their communities.
(4)(a) By January  1 of the year preceding the expiration of the four-year period described in
subsection (2) of  this section, the governing body of the municipality shall notify the Director of the
Department of Consumer and Business Services and, if not a county, notify the county  whether the
municipality will continue to administer  the building inspection program, or parts thereof, after ex-
piration of the four-year period. If parts of a building inspection program are to  be administered and
enforced by a municipality, the parts shall correspond to a classification designated by the  director
as reasonable divisions of work.
(b) Notwithstanding the January 1 date set  forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director
and the municipality and, if the municipality  is not a county, the county may by agreement extend
that date to no later than March 1.
(5) If a  city does not notify the director, or notifies the director that it will not administer cer-
[6]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tain specialty codes or parts thereof under the building inspection  program, the county or counties
in which the city is located shall administer and enforce those  codes or parts thereof within the city
in the same manner as it administers and enforces them  outside the city, except as provided by
subsection (6) of this section.
(6) If a county does not notify the director,  or notifies the director that it will not administer
and enforce  certain specialty codes or parts thereof under the building inspection program, the di-
rector  shall  contract with a municipality or other person or use such state employees or state
agencies as are necessary to administer  and enforce those codes or parts thereof, and permit or
other fees arising therefrom shall be paid into the Consumer  and Business Services Fund created
by ORS 705.145 and credited to the account responsible  for paying such expenses. A state employee
may not be displaced as a result of using contract personnel.
(7) If a municipality administering a building inspection program under  this section seeks to
administer additional parts of a program, the municipality must  comply with ORS 455.148, including
the requirement that  the municipality administer and enforce all aspects of the building inspection
program. Thereafter, the municipality is subject  to ORS 455.148 and ceases to be subject to this
section.
(8) The department shall  adopt rules to require the governing body of each municipality to
submit a written plan with the notice required  under subsection (4) of this section. If the department
is the governing body,  the department shall have a plan on file. The plan shall specify how coop-
eration with the State Fire Marshal or a designee of the  State Fire Marshal will be achieved and
how a uniform fire code will be considered in the review process of the design and construction
phases of buildings or structures.
(9) A  municipality that administers a code for which persons or businesses are authorized under
ORS 455.457 to perform activities shall recognize and accept those activities as if performed by the
municipality. A municipality is not  required to accept an inspection, a plan or a plan review that
does not meet the requirements of the state building code.
(10) The department or a municipality that accepts an inspection or plan review as required  by
this section by a person licensed under ORS 455.457 has  no responsibility or liability for the activ-
ities of the licensee.
(11) In addition to the requirements of ORS  455.100 and 455.110, the director shall regulate
building inspection programs of municipalities assumed prior  to January 1, 2002. Regulation under
this subsection shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Creating building inspection program application and  amendment requirements and proce-
dures;
(b) Granting or  denying applications for building inspection program authority and amendments;
(c) Reviewing procedures and program operations of municipalities;
(d) Creating standards for efficient,  effective, timely and acceptable building inspection pro-
grams;
(e) Creating standards for justifying increases in building inspection program fees  adopted by a
municipality;
(f) Creating standards for determining whether  a county or department building inspection pro-
gram is economically impaired in its  ability to reasonably continue providing the program or part
of the program throughout a county, if another municipality  is allowed to provide a building in-
spection program or part of a program within the same county; and
(g) Enforcing the requirements of this section.
[7]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(12) The department may assume administration and enforcement of a building inspection pro-
gram:
(a) During the pendency of activities under ORS 455.770;
(b) If a municipality abandons any part of the  building inspection program or is no longer able
to administer the building inspection program; and
(c) If a municipality fails to substantially comply with any  provision of this section or of ORS
455.465, 455.467 and 455.469.
(13) If the department assumes the administration  and enforcement of a building inspection
program under this section, in  addition to any other power granted to the director, the director may:
(a) Enter into agreements with local governments under ORS 455.185 regarding the  adminis-
tration and enforcement of the assumed building inspection program;
(b) Take action as described in ORS 455.192 to ensure that sufficient staff and  other resources
are available for the administration and enforcement  of the assumed building inspection program;
and
(c) Charge fees described in ORS 455.195 for department services provided  in administering and
enforcing the assumed building inspection program.
(14) If a  municipality abandons or otherwise ceases to administer all or part of a building in-
spection program described in this section, the municipality may not  resume the administration and
enforcement of the abandoned program or part of a program  for at least two years. The municipality
may resume the administration and enforcement of the abandoned program or part of a program only
on July 1 of an odd-numbered year. To resume the administration and enforcement of  the abandoned
program or part of a program, the municipality must comply with ORS 455.148, including the re-
quirement that the municipality administer and  enforce all aspects of the building inspection pro-
gram. Thereafter, the municipality is subject to ORS 455.148 and  ceases to be subject to this
section.
(15) A municipality  that administers and enforces a building inspection program under this sec-
tion shall include in  the program the inspection of boilers and pressure vessels described in sub-
section (1)(a)(H) of this section.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 455.152 is amended to read:
455.152. (1) A municipality, 10 or more persons or an association  with 10 or more members may
file objections to a municipality’s assumption of a building inspection program. The objections  must
be filed within 30  days after the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services
gives notice of the application.
(2) The  director, by rule, shall establish a process for reviewing objections filed under subsection
(1) of this section. The review process shall include but need not be limited to:
(a) Identification of economic impairment, if any, affecting the municipality;
(b) Demonstration by the municipality that all  building inspection program permits and services
will be available, including any service agreements for carrying out building program services;
(c) Review of all elements of the assumption plan submitted by the municipality;
(d) Demonstration by the municipality of the ability to  provide building inspection program
services for at least two years; [ and]
(e) Review  of proposed levels of service, including the municipality’s ability to maintain or im-
prove upon existing service levels[ .]; and
(f) Demonstration by the municipality of ability to  sufficiently oversee building official
performance of program administration and enforcement.
[8]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) Upon  completion of a review under subsection (2) of this section, the director shall issue a
final agency order approving or disapproving the application.
SECTION 9.  ORS 455.459 is amended to read:
455.459. (1) As used in this section, “relative” has the meaning given that term  in ORS
95.200.
[(1)] (2)  A person [ shall] may  not inspect or review any project or installation in which the
person, employer of the  person or relative of the person has any financial interest or business af-
filiation. A person designated under  ORS 455.465 (1)(a) may not perform both the inspection and plan
review for the same project or installation. A municipality  or the state shall perform either the in-
spection, the plan review, or both.
[(2) For purposes of this section, “relative” has the meaning given that term in ORS 95.200. ]
(3) A  person employed by the Department of Consumer and Business Services as a plan
reviewer or  inspector may not render services of any type to a business engaged in con-
struction or property development. Except as provided in this section, a person  employed by
or providing services to a municipality as a building official,  plan reviewer or inspector may
not render  services to a business engaged in construction or property development within
the municipality but may render any  lawful services within other jurisdictions. This sub-
section does not prohibit a person from  rendering services without remuneration to a
nonprofit organization.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 203.035, 221.410 and  455.153, a municipality described under ORS
455.148 or 455.150 may not, by contract, ordinance or other  means, allow administration and
enforcement of the state building code within  the municipality in a manner that violates
subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 10.  ORS 455.715 is amended to read:
455.715. As used in ORS 455.715 to 455.740, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Building official” means  a person charged by a municipality with responsibility for admin-
istration and enforcement of the state building code in the municipality.
(2) “Business of providing prefabricated structure plan approvals and inspections” means  an in-
dependent contractor providing prefabricated structure plan approval or inspection services, or both,
under the following specialty codes[ , as provided in ORS 455.020, 455.705 and 455.715 ]:
(a) Structural;
(b) Mechanical;
(c) Plumbing;
(d) Electrical; and
(e) Low-rise residential dwelling.
(3) “Inspector” means:
(a) A person, including a plans examiner, acting under the authority  and direction of a building
official and charged with the responsibility of routine enforcement of one or  more specialty codes
or parts of specialty codes;
(b) A person, including a plans examiner,  who provides enforcement of one or more specialty
codes or parts of specialty codes and who is personally in the business  of providing prefabricated
structure plan approvals or inspections or is employed by such a business;
(c) A specialized building inspector certified under ORS 455.723 who [ is employed by ] provides
services to  a municipality or [ by] through the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(d) A person employed by  [ a municipality or ] the department , or employed by or contracting
[9]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
with a municipality,  who  is certified under ORS 455.732  and authorized by the department or
municipality to perform inspections under one  or more specialty codes throughout a building code
administrative region; or
(e) A person designated  by the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services
to ensure compliance with a specialty code or with any requirement for a license, registration, cer-
tification, endorsement or other authorization to perform work related  to the administration and
enforcement of the state building code.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 455.720 is amended to read:
455.720. (1) In accordance with applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183,  to promote effective
and uniform enforcement of the state  building code by improving the competence of building officials
and inspectors, the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business  Services, with the advice
of the advisory boards, shall:
(a) Establish for building officials and inspectors reasonable minimum training and  experience
standards, including but not limited to courses or subjects  for instruction, facilities for instruction,
qualification of instructors and  methods of instruction. The standards shall include provisions for
determining a practical experience equivalent.
(b) Establish a procedure to be used by municipalities to determine whether a  person meets
minimum standards or has  minimum training to be [ appointed or employed as ] a building official or
inspector. The procedure shall allow for a field examination of a  person to determine if the person
meets the practical experience equivalent of a minimum standard.
(c) Subject  to such terms, conditions and classifications as the director may impose, certify
building officials as being qualified,  and revoke such certifications in the manner provided in ORS
455.740.
(d) Require an applicant for a certificate as a building  official or inspector to demonstrate
knowledge of the laws governing accessibility  to buildings by persons with disabilities by passing
an examination prescribed by the director.
(2) The director shall maintain and, upon request of municipalities, furnish information on ap-
plicants for [ appointment or employment as  building officials or inspectors ] building official or in-
spector positions.
(3) Pursuant to ORS chapter 183, the director shall adopt  rules necessary to carry out the cer-
tification programs provided by subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The  director, by rule, may require evidence of completion of continuing education covering
any certification created under  this section as a condition of maintaining the certification. Nothing
in this subsection shall prohibit the director from delegating any of this power to a municipality.
(5) The director, with the  advice of the appropriate advisory boards, may adopt rules for certi-
fying inspectors as being qualified to enforce one or more particular  specialty codes, subject to any
terms, conditions and classifications the director may impose, and for revoking those certifications
in the manner provided in ORS 455.740.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 455.730 is amended to read:
455.730. [No person shall be appointed or employed ] A municipality may not use a  person  as
a building official or inspector [ by any ] for the  municipality unless the person has been certified
as being  qualified under ORS 455.715 to 455.740, and the certification has not lapsed or been re-
voked.
SECTION 13.  ORS 455.732 is amended to read:
455.732. (1) As used in this section, “building code administrative region” means a region  es-
[10]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tablished by the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services under ORS  455.042
for the uniform administration of the state building code.
(2) The authority of the director under ORS 455.720 and 455.723 to specify terms, conditions  and
classifications for the certification of inspectors includes the authority  to certify an inspector to
perform inspections under multiple specialty codes or parts of a specialty code.
(3) The director may provide for an inspector who is likely to  be employed or contracted with
by a municipality  within a specific building code administrative  region to be certified to perform
inspections throughout a building code administrative  region, whether within or outside of a
municipality. The director  may recognize any training program certified by the director under ORS
455.723 or 455.725 for purposes of  certifying an inspector to perform inspections throughout a
building code administrative region. This subsection does not require  a municipality administering
and enforcing a building inspection program under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 to  allow an inspector
certified under this subsection who is not [ employed by ] an employee of or independent contrac-
tor with the municipality to perform building inspections on behalf of the municipality.
(4) In determining the appropriate experience,  training or other qualifications for an inspector
under ORS 455.720 or 455.723, the director  shall consult with the appropriate advisory boards. The
factors to be considered by the director may include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Any factors specific to, or  of particular relevance to, a specialty code or to the types of
buildings, structures, systems or equipment in a geographic area that are inspected  under the spe-
cialty code;
(b) Staffing  levels or other specific criteria for building inspection programs established by a
municipality where the inspector is  likely to be [ employed] used or for building inspection programs
established by the director; and
(c) Any  factors specific to, or of particular relevance to, the building code administrative region
within which the inspector is likely to be [ employed] used by a municipality .
(5) In determining the scope of certifications and qualifications for an inspector, the director
may utilize field training equivalency, independent evaluations or other methods the  director deems
appropriate.
SECTION 14.  ORS 455.737 is amended to read:
455.737. (1)  Notwithstanding ORS 455.720 (1), the Director of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services, by rule, shall adopt criteria for  review of the experience and training in building
inspection and building plan review acquired by a person  outside the State of Oregon. The criteria
shall be adopted in a manner that facilitates review  of a person’s qualifications by a local building
official.
(2)(a) A local building official who wishes  to [ employ] use  a person who is not certified under
ORS 455.735 as [ an] a building inspector  shall submit the person’s qualifications to the director. The
director shall review  the stated qualifications against the criteria adopted under subsection (1) of
this section, including verification  of experience and training. The director shall respond to the local
building official in writing within 10 working days of receiving the applicant’s qualifications, stating
whether the person meets the applicable criteria.
(b) Upon application and payment of the required fee, the director  shall allow a person whose
qualifications meet the criteria adopted under subsection (1) of this section to  sit for any examina-
tion necessary for the required certification.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 455.740 is amended to read:
455.740. (1) Subject to ORS chapter 183, the Director of the Department of  Consumer and Busi-
[11]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ness Services may deny, condition, suspend, revoke or refuse to renew a  certificate of a building
official or inspector if the director finds that the building official or inspector has:
(a) Consistently failed to act in the public interest in the performance of duties;
(b) Failed to complete the continuing education requirements as required under ORS 455.720 (4);
(c) Provided false information to the department; or
(d) Committed an act described in ORS 455.125 or 455.129.
(2) In any revocation proceeding under this section, the municipality that employs  or contracts
with the building official or inspector shall be entitled to appear as a  party in interest, either for
or against the revocation.
(3) When a certification is suspended or revoked under this section, the director may also  sus-
pend, deny or place conditions on that person’s right to reapply  for certification under ORS 455.735
for a period not to exceed 12 months.
(4) This section does not limit or  otherwise affect the authority of a municipality to dismiss or
suspend a building official or inspector at the discretion of the municipality.
(5) Notwithstanding the requirements of  subsections (1) to (4) of this section, the director may
adopt rules that:
(a) Allow certifications to be placed on inactive status; and
(b) Extend continuing education compliance requirements in case of illness or hardship.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 455.775 is amended to read:
455.775. In  addition to any other authority and power granted under this chapter and ORS
chapters 446, 447, 460, 479, 480 and 693:
(1) The Director of the  Department of Consumer and Business Services may, at the discretion
of the director, enforce the provisions of the state building code and ORS 446.003 to  446.200, 446.225
to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950, 479.995 and 480.510 to 480.670  and this
chapter and ORS chapters 447, 460 and 693 against any person  regardless of whether a permit,
certificate, license or other indicia of authority has been issued. The director may:
(a) Make an investigation;
(b) Take sworn testimony;
(c) With the authorization of the Office of the Attorney  General, subpoena persons and records;
(d) Order corrective action; and
(e) If an immediate hazard to health and safety is imminent, issue an  order to stop all or any
part of the work under the applicable specialty code.
(2) If the director has  reason to believe that any person has been engaged, or is engaging, or
is about to engage in any violation of the state building code, or ORS  446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to
446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 or  480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or ORS
chapter 447, 460  or 693 or any rule adopted under those statutes, the director may issue an order,
subject to ORS 183.413 to 183.497, directed to the person to cease and desist from the  violation or
threatened violation.
(3) If the director has  reason to believe that any person has been engaged, or is engaging, or
is about to engage  in any violation of the state building code or ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to
446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 or  480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or ORS
chapters 447, 460 and 693 or any  rule adopted under those statutes, the director may, without bond,
bring suit in the name and on behalf of  the State of Oregon in the circuit court of any county of this
state to enjoin the acts or practices  and to enforce compliance with the state building code and ORS
446.003 to  446.200, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 and 480.510 to
[12]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
480.670 and this chapter and ORS chapters 447,  460 and 693 and any rule adopted under those
statutes. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order or writ  of
mandamus shall be granted.
(4) This section does not grant any authority over a  municipality or [ an] a building inspector
[employed by ] for a municipality.
SECTION 17.  ORS 446.250 is amended to read:
446.250. The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business  Services shall cause in-
spections to be made, approve plans and specifications,  provide technical services and issue permits
for alteration of manufactured dwellings and installation of manufactured dwellings and manufac-
tured structure  accessory buildings and structures on a lot. The director shall appoint or contract
with municipalities that request such appointment or contract  for inspection and issuance of permits
for alteration of manufactured dwellings and installation of manufactured dwellings and manufac-
tured structure accessory buildings and structures and  alterations of installations of plumbing,
heating, illuminating, cooking or electrical equipment,  provided the municipality [ employs] uses  as
local  inspectors  qualified persons who have been certified by the director for inspection and issu-
ance of permits for alteration of manufactured dwellings and installation of manufactured  dwellings
and manufactured structure accessory buildings and  structures, pursuant to ORS 446.003, 446.111,
446.155, 446.160, 446.176, 446.225 to 446.285 and 446.990. However, the certification standards under
this section shall relate to the inspections to  be performed and shall not be more stringent for mu-
nicipal inspectors than those applying to state inspectors.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 447.091 is amended to read:
447.091. The Department of Consumer and Business Services or local government administering
the plumbing specialty code adopted under ORS 447.020 (2) may,  upon request of any sanitary dis-
trict formed pursuant to  ORS 450.005 to 450.245, sanitary authority established under ORS 450.600
to 450.989, or county service district established  under ORS 451.410 to 451.610, contract for the in-
spection of building sewers constructed to  connect a district sewage system if inspectors [ employed
by such ] used by the  district are certified for sewer inspections under ORS 455.715 to 455.740.
SECTION 19.  ORS 455.129 is amended to read:
455.129. (1) As used in this section, “relative” means an individual related within the third  de-
gree as determined by the common law, a spouse, an individual related  to a spouse within the third
degree as determined by the common law or an individual in an  adoptive relationship within the
third degree as determined by the common law.
(2) Subject to ORS chapter 183, a regulatory body listed in subsection (3) of  this section may
deny a license, certificate, registration or application or may suspend, revoke, condition or refuse
to renew a license, certificate or registration if the  regulatory body finds that the licensee, certif-
icate holder, registrant or applicant:
(a) Has failed  to comply with the laws administered by the regulatory body or with the rules
adopted by the regulatory body.
(b) Has failed to comply with an order of the regulatory body or the Director of  the Department
of Consumer and Business Services, including but not limited to the failure to pay a civil penalty.
(c) Has filed an application for a license, certificate or registration  that, as of the date the li-
cense, certificate or registration was issued or the date of an  order denying the application, was
incomplete in any material respect or contained a statement that,  in light of the circumstances un-
der which it was made, was incorrect or misleading in any respect.
(d) Has performed work  without appropriate licensing, certification or registration or has em-
[13]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ployed individuals to perform work without appropriate licensing, certification or registration.
(e) Has advertised or otherwise  held out as being a licensed, certified or registered specialty
code contractor without holding the appropriate specialty  code contractor license, certificate or
registration.
(f) As a partner, officer, member or employee of a business, has advertised or held  out that the
business is a licensed, certified or registered specialty code contractor if the  business does not
possess the appropriate specialty code contractor license, certificate or registration.
(g) Has engaged in business as a specialty code contractor  without holding a valid specialty
code contractor license, certificate or registration required for the business.
(h) Has failed to meet any condition or  requirement to obtain or maintain a license, certificate
or registration.
(i) Has acted in a manner creating a serious danger to the public health or safety.
(j) Has performed work or operated equipment within the  scope of a specialty code license,
certificate or registration in a manner that violates  an applicable minimum safety standard or a
statute or rule regarding safety.
(k) Has been subject  to a revocation, cancellation or suspension order or to other disciplinary
action  by  the Construction Contractors Board or has failed to pay a civil penalty imposed by the
board.
(L) Has been subject to a revocation, cancellation or suspension order or to other disciplinary
action by another state in regard to  construction standards, permit requirements or construction-
related licensing violations or has failed to pay a civil  penalty imposed by the other state in regard
to construction standards, permit requirements or construction-related licensing violations.
(m) Has, while performing work that requires or that is related to work that requires a valid
license or certificate under ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285,  446.395 to 446.420, 479.510
to 479.945, 479.950 or 480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or  ORS chapter 447, 460 or 693, violated any
statute or rule related to the state building code.
(n) Has performed a code inspection or plan review on a project  to construct, alter, repair or
make an installation in a structure if the inspector or reviewer,  or an employer or relative of the
inspector or reviewer, has a financial interest in or business affiliation with the project  or structure
or has performed an inspection or plan review in violation of ORS 455.459 (3) .
(o) Is a business, the owner or an officer of which has  an outstanding obligation to pay a civil
penalty assessed under ORS 455.895 or has been the subject of action against the license,  certificate
or registration by the Department of Consumer  and Business Services, the director or an appropri-
ate advisory board.
(p) Is a business, owner or officer of a reorganized business entity as defined in ORS  657.682, if
an owner, officer, shareholder or partner of the  reorganized business entity, or a member if the re-
organized business entity  is a member-managed limited liability company, has been subject to a re-
vocation or suspension order or to a  condition or civil penalty under ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225
to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 or 480.510 to  480.670 or this chapter or
ORS chapter 447, 460, 693 or  701, or by another state in regard to construction standards, permit
requirements or construction-related licensing violations.
(q) Is  ordered to pay damages under a judgment or arbitration award that relates to con-
struction and that has become final by operation of law or on appeal.
(r) Is a business, the owner or an officer of  which was an owner or officer in another business
at the time:
[14]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The other business was assessed a civil penalty under ORS 455.895 that remains unpaid; or
(B) An act or failure to act by any owner or officer of the other business resulted  in action
being taken against the license, certificate or registration of  the other business by the department,
the director or any advisory board.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section applies to:
(a) The State Plumbing Board for purposes of licenses  issued under ORS 447.010 to 447.156 or
ORS chapter 693.
(b) The Electrical and Elevator Board for purposes of licenses  issued under ORS 479.510 to
479.945.
(c) The Board of Boiler Rules for purposes of licenses issued under ORS 480.510 to 480.670.
(d) The department for purposes of licenses issued under this chapter.
(e) The department, subject to Electrical and  Elevator Board approval, for purposes of licenses
issued under ORS 460.005 to 460.175.
(f) The department, subject to Residential and Manufactured Structures Board  approval, for
purposes of licenses, certificates and registrations issued under ORS  446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to
446.285 and 446.395 to 446.420.
(4) The department may  administer and enforce subsection (2) of this section in the same manner
and to the same extent as any advisory board.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 479.530 is amended to read:
479.530. As used in ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and 479.995, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Approved testing laboratory” means a  testing laboratory that meets criteria for electrical
product evaluation established by the Director of the Department of  Consumer and Business Ser-
vices with the approval of the Electrical and Elevator Board under ORS 479.730.
(2) “Board” means the Electrical and Elevator Board established under ORS 455.138.
(3) “Certified electrical product” means an electrical  product that is certified under ORS 479.760
and that is not decertified.
[(4) “Competent inspection service” means an electrical inspection service  of a city or county ad-
ministered under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 that employs electrical  inspectors who are certified to meet
standards under ORS 479.810. ]
[(5)] (4)  “Commercial electrical air conditioning  equipment” means heating, cooling, refriger-
ation, dehumidifying, humidifying and  filtering equipment used for climatizing or moving of air if
used in commerce, industry or  government and if installed in a place not accessible to the general
public other than the switches regulating the operation of the equipment.
[(6)] (5)  “Demarcation  point” means the place of interconnection between the communications
cabling, terminal equipment or protective apparatus of  the telecommunications service provider and
the customer’s premises.
[(7)] (6) “Department” means the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
[(8)] (7) “Director” means the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
[(9)] (8)  “Dwelling unit” means one or  more rooms for the use of one or more persons as a
housekeeping unit with space  for eating, living and sleeping and permanent provisions for cooking
and sanitation.
[(10)] (9)  “Electrical installations” means  the construction or installation of electrical wiring
and the permanent attachment or installation of electrical products  in or on any structure that is
not itself an electrical  product. “Electrical installation” also means the maintenance or repair of
installed electrical wiring and permanently attached electrical  products. “Electrical installation”
[15]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
does not include an oil module.
[(11)] (10)  “Electrical product” means any electrical equipment, material, device or apparatus
that, except  as provided in ORS 479.540, requires a license or permit to install and either conveys
or is operated by electrical current.
[(12)] (11) “Equipment” means any material, fittings, devices, appliances, fixtures,  apparatus or
the like that are used as part of or in connection with an electrical installation.
[(13)] (12) “Field evaluation firm” means an independent organization that provides:
(a) Evaluations or testing, or both; and
(b) Documentation regarding compliance with electrical product safety  standards and with the
electrical installation safety code.
[(14)] (13) “Industrial electrical  equipment” means electrical products used in industry or gov-
ernment that utilize electric energy for mechanical,  chemical, heating, lighting or similar purposes,
that are designed to service  or produce a product and that are used directly in the production of
the service or product.
[(15)] (14) “Installation label” means an adhesive tag issued by governmental agencies that ad-
minister the Electrical Safety Law  to licensed electrical contractors for application to those minor
electrical installations for which the board by  rule determines to be appropriate for random in-
spections.
[(16)] (15)  “License” means a permit issued by the department  under ORS 479.630 authorizing
the person whose name appears  as licensee thereon to act as an electrical contractor, supervising
electrician, journeyman electrician, electrical apprentice or limited elevator journeyman as indicated
thereon.
[(17)] (16) “Minimum safety standards” means safety standards prescribed by concurrence of the
board and the director under ORS 479.730.
[(18)] (17) “Multifamily dwelling” means a building containing more than one dwelling unit.
[(19)] (18)  “Oil module” means a prefabricated structure manufactured to the  specifications of
the purchaser and used outside this state in the  exploration for or processing or extraction of pe-
troleum products.
[(20)] (19)  “Permit” means an official document or card issued by the enforcing agency to  au-
thorize performance of a specified electrical installation.
[(21)] (20) “Single family dwelling” means a building consisting solely of one dwelling unit.
[(22)] (21)  “Telecommunications  service provider” means a telecommunications carrier as de-
fined in ORS 133.721  or a telecommunications utility or competitive telecommunications provider,
both as defined in ORS 759.005.
[(23)] (22) “Uncertified product” means any electrical product that is not an electrical product
certified under ORS 479.760.
[16]