Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall establish an Oregon
work study pilot program.
(2) The purpose of the pilot program is  to assist students attending Oregon State Uni-
versity or Western Oregon University in  accessing work study financial aid, which may in-
crease access to federal benefits, such as the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules to implement and administer the pilot program.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  conduct a study
on food insecurity  and access to basic necessities for life among students attending post-
secondary institutions in Oregon and provide  a report as described in subsection (2) of this
section. In conducting the study, the commission shall consult with state agencies,  nonprofit
organizations and members of the public who have an interest in ensuring that  students at-
tending post-secondary institutions  have access to basic necessities for life. As part of the
study, the commission shall:
(a) Determine the number of students eligible for the  Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program but unable to participate in a federal work study program  due to lack of sufficient
funding;
(b) Conduct  an analysis of the impacts on students described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection, in terms of financial aid and matriculation rates;
(c) Review other  state and local models for programs that assist low-income students
with accessing services that provide the basic necessities for life;
(d) Seek direct input from low-income students; and
(e) Identify community-based organizations and key informants  that assist low-income
students outside the higher education system.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2053
HB 2873
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
(2) The commission  shall present the results of the study, along with any recommended
legislative changes, in a report to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related
to higher education in the manner  provided under ORS 192.245 on or before September 15,
2026.
SECTION 3.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $450,000 which may be expended for carrying
out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $50,000 which may be expended for carrying out  the pro-
visions of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
(2) Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]