Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 2. (1) The Public Utility Commission may not approve for a public utility  an
increase of a rate or schedule of rates that is:
(a) Greater than  the maximum percentage increase allowed for the calendar year under
subsection (2) of this section; or
(b) When added to any increases of a rate or schedule of rates that  the commission
previously approved for the calendar year, greater  than the maximum percentage increase
allowed for the calendar year under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The maximum percentage that a public utility may increase  a public utility’s rate or
schedule of  rates for a calendar year is the September annual 12-month average change in
the Consumer Price Index  for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as most re-
cently published by the Bureau of  Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(3) No later than September 30 of each year, the commission shall publish the  maximum
percentage increase allowed for the following calendar year under subsection (2) of  this sec-
tion.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2169