Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department  of Transportation shall forgive all indebtedness related to
the relocation of municipal electric utility facilities  required by the department in connection
with the reconstruction  of the Interstate 84 bridge over McCord Creek, between the John
B. Yeon Trailhead and the bridge.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4888