Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to and not  in lieu of the budget authorization to issue lottery
bonds under ORS 286A.035, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, at the request of the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with the Port
of Siuslaw, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $1,185,640 in net proceeds and interest earnings for
the purpose described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under  this section and interest earnings in an
amount sufficient to provide  $1,185,640 must be transferred to the department to provide a
grant to the Port of Siuslaw. The port shall use the grant to fund repair or replacement of
the Siuslaw River bulkhead.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that  the use of lottery bond proceeds pursuant to this
section will create jobs and further economic development based on the following findings:
(a) The  Siuslaw River bulkhead is a critical piece of infrastructure that protects
waterfront property that is economically important to the Port of  Siuslaw, including a
campground, office space, recreational marina, boat launch, refueling station and parking lot.
(b) The bulkhead has deteriorated due to sinking and corrosion.
(c) Repair or replacement of  the bulkhead will further economic development by pro-
tecting economically significant waterfront property.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2766