Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Early Childhood Education Workforce Development  Fund. All moneys in
the fund are continuously appropriated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for
purposes of carrying out this section.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall administer the fund.
(3) The fund consists of moneys appropriated, allocated,  deposited or transferred to the
fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
(4) The commission shall  distribute moneys in the fund to community colleges operated
under ORS chapter 341 and public universities listed in ORS 352.002 based on  the following
formula:
(a) One-third of the moneys shall be distributed to those community colleges  and public
universities that offer early childhood education degrees and certificate programs;
(b) One-third of  the moneys shall be distributed to those community colleges and public
universities with campus-based childcare and learning centers that offer  on-the-job training
for students enrolled in early childhood education degree programs; and
(c) One-third of the moneys  shall be distributed to community colleges and public uni-
versities based on the number of early childhood education degrees and certificates  granted,
with the first distribution to be based  on an average of the degrees and certificates granted
in the preceding three years.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000  which shall be transferred to the
Early Childhood Education Workforce Development Fund to carry out the purposes  of sec-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1811
HB 3011
1
2
3
4
5
tion 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]