Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 632.715 is amended to read:
632.715. (1) Unless the person holds a permit issued under ORS 632.730,  a person may not sell
or distribute within this state any eggs to consumers or to  retailers without having first obtained
an egg handler’s license from the State Department of Agriculture. The license is not required:
(a) Of a producer selling and delivering eggs of  the producer’s own production directly to an
individual consumer  or a restaurant, as defined in ORS 624.010 ;
(b) For the sale of uncandled eggs to other than a consumer;
(c) For the sale by a retailer to a consumer of eggs that previously have been candled  and
graded by an egg handler in compliance with ORS 632.705 to 632.815; or
(d) For  the sale on consignment under ORS 616.683 (2)(f) of eggs produced by a licensed egg
handler.
(2) Application for an  egg handler’s license shall be made to the department, on forms prescribed
by the department.
(3) Each egg handler’s license expires on June 30 next following the date of issuance or on  such
date as may be specified by department rule. The  license is not transferable to any person. The
original of the  license shall be conspicuously displayed in the main office of the licensee. A duplicate
copy of the license shall be conspicuously displayed in each separate branch, store, sales outlet, of-
fice, warehouse or location operated or owned by the  licensee in which eggs are candled or graded.
(4) The department, in accordance with ORS chapter 183, may refuse to issue, or may  suspend
or revoke, an egg handler’s license issued under  this section, or a permit issued under ORS 632.730,
if the applicant, the permit holder or the licensee has violated  or is violating the provisions of ORS
632.705 to 632.815 or rules promulgated pursuant thereto.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3763