Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 192.324 is amended to read:
192.324. (1) A public body that is the custodian of any public record that a person has  a right
to inspect shall give the person, upon receipt of a written request:
(a) A copy of the public record if the public record is of a nature permitting copying; or
(b) A reasonable opportunity to inspect or copy the public record.
(2) If an individual who is identified in a public body’s procedure  described in subsection (7)(a)
of this section receives a written request to inspect or receive a  copy of a public record, the public
body shall within five business days after receiving  the request acknowledge receipt of the request
or complete the public body’s response to the request. An acknowledgment under this subsection
must:
(a) Confirm that the public body is the custodian of the requested record;
(b) Inform the requester that the public body is not the custodian of the requested record; or
(c) Notify the requester that the public body is uncertain whether the public body  is the custo-
dian of the requested record.
(3) If  the public record is maintained in a machine readable or electronic form, the public body
shall provide a copy of the public record in the  form requested, if available. If the public record is
not available in the form requested, the public body shall make  the public record available in the
form in which the public body maintains the public record.
(4)(a) The public body  may establish fees reasonably calculated to reimburse the public body for
the public body’s actual cost of making  public records available, including costs for summarizing,
compiling or tailoring the public records, either in organization or media, to meet the request.
(b) The public body may include  in a fee established under paragraph (a) of this subsection the
cost of time spent by an attorney for the public body  in reviewing the public records, redacting
material from the public records or segregating the public  records into exempt and nonexempt re-
cords.  The  public body may not include in a fee established under paragraph (a) of this subsection
the cost of  time spent by an attorney for the public body in determining the application of the pro-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3555
HB 3056
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
visions of ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(c) The public body may not establish a fee greater than  $25 under this section unless the public
body first provides the requester with a written notification of the estimated amount of the fee  and
the requester confirms that the requester wants the public body to proceed  with making the public
record  available.
(d) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection, when the public records are  those
filed with the Secretary of State under ORS chapter 79 or ORS 80.100 to  80.130, the fees for fur-
nishing copies, summaries or compilations of the public records are the fees established by  the
Secretary of State by rule under ORS chapter 79 or ORS 80.100 to 80.130.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection, when the requester is  a
member of the Legislative Assembly and the request is for public records filed with a state
agency, the state agency shall waive all fees associated with the request for public records.
(5) The  custodian of a public record may furnish copies without charge or at a substantially
reduced fee if the custodian  determines that the waiver or reduction of fees is in the public interest
because making the record available primarily benefits the general public.
(6) A requester who believes that there has been an unreasonable denial of a  fee waiver or fee
reduction may petition the Attorney General or the district attorney in the  same manner as a re-
quester who petitions when inspection of a public record is denied under ORS  192.311 to 192.478.
The Attorney  General, the district attorney and the court have the same authority in instances
when a fee waiver or reduction is denied as when inspection of a public record is denied.
(7) A public body shall make available to the public a written procedure for making public  re-
cords requests that includes:
(a) The name of one or more individuals within the public body to whom  public records requests
may be sent, with addresses; and
(b) The amounts of and the manner  of calculating fees that the public body charges for re-
sponding to requests for public records.
(8) This section does not apply to signatures of individuals submitted under ORS chapter  247 for
purposes of registering to vote as provided in ORS 247.973.
[2]