Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 197.843, as amended by  section 10, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
197.843. (1) The Land Use Board of Appeals shall award attorney fees to:
(a) An applicant whose application is only for  the development of affordable housing, if the
board reverses a quasi-judicial land use  decision denying the application , charged against the local
government and the intervenors, if any ;
(b) An applicant, if the board reverses a quasi-judicial land use decision denying the ap-
plication and a party has intervened on behalf of the  local government, charged only against
the intervenors;
[(b)] (c)  An applicant whose application [ is only for the development of  housing and ] was ap-
proved by the local government, if the board affirms the decision; and
[(c)] (d)  The local government that approved a quasi-judicial land use decision  described in
paragraph [ (b)] (c)  of this subsection.
[(2) For housing other  than affordable housing, the attorney fees specified in subsection (1)(b) and
(c) of this section apply only within urban growth boundaries. ]
[(3)] (2)  [ A party ] An applicant  who was awarded attorney fees under this section or ORS
197.850 shall repay the fees plus  any interest from the time of the judgment if the property upon
which the fees are based is developed for a use other than the [ proposed housing ] use proposed by
the appealed application.
[(4)] (3) As used in this section:
(a) “Affordable housing” means affordable housing,  as defined in ORS 197A.445, or publicly
supported housing, as defined in ORS 456.250.
(b) “Attorney fees” includes  prelitigation legal expenses, including preparing and processing the
application and supporting the application in local land use hearings or proceedings.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 197.843 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to ap-
peals, including appeals for judicial review filed under ORS 197.850, that are filed on or after
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2151
SB 502
1
2
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[2]