Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Public Drinking Water and Sewer  Ratepayer Assistance Fund is es-
tablished in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. The Public
Drinking Water and Sewer Ratepayer Assistance Fund shall consist of all moneys placed in
the fund as provided by law and any gifts, grants, donations, endowments or bequests from
any public or private source.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated the Housing and  Community Ser-
vices Department for the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The department shall provide  grants from moneys deposited in the fund to qualified
organizations to distribute water and sewer  bill payment assistance to low-income residential
households.
(4) Qualified organizations for receiving grants under this section shall include,  but need
not be limited to:
(a) Nonprofit community-based organizations, including but not limited to housing  au-
thorities and community action agencies; and
(b) Public utilities providing domestic water or sewer service.
(5) The  department shall adopt rules necessary for the administration and implementa-
tion of subsections  (3) and (4) of this section. In adopting rules, the department shall con-
sider other utility bill payment or crisis assistance  and low-income assistance programs
administered by the department, including but  not limited to the Low Income Home Energy
Assistance Act of 1981 (42 U.S.C. 8621 et seq.).
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $15,000,000, for deposit in the Public Drinking
Water and Sewer Ratepayer Assistance Fund established under section 1 of this 2023 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3288