Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 91.225 and section 2  of this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of
ORS chapter 90.
SECTION 2. (1) Each  city with a population of less than 200,000 shall establish, by ordi-
nance or resolution,  local standards to promote housing stability applicable to rental agree-
ments within the jurisdiction of the city. The local standards must include:
(a) Health and safety standards; and
(b) Provisions to enforce the local standards, including  by publishing the name of a
landlord or tenant found to be in violation of one or more local standards in  a newspaper of
general circulation in the city.
(2) The local standards established under this  section must include at least three tiers
of application, including separate tiers for landlords that own or manage:
(a) Ten or fewer dwelling units;
(b) Manufactured dwelling parks; and
(c) All other amounts and types of dwelling units.
(3) A city that establishes local standards under this section:
(a) May  include within the ordinance or resolution limits on the maximum rent that may
be charged, or the maximum  percentage by which rent may be increased, for the rental of
a dwelling unit located within the jurisdiction of the city.
(b) Shall consult with an advisory  group when establishing local standards under this
section. The  advisory group shall consist of landlords and tenants from a variety of back-
grounds who reside within the jurisdiction of the city.
(c) At least once every  10 years, shall review the local standards established under this
section and shall adopt or amend  ordinances or resolutions as the city determines is appro-
priate to promote housing stability.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2323
HB 3065
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
SECTION 3.
Each city with a population of less than 200,000  shall establish local stan-
dards to promote housing stability under section 2 of this 2025 Act no later than  July 1, 2027.
SECTION 4.  ORS 91.225 is amended to read:
91.225. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that there  is a social and economic need to insure an
adequate supply of  affordable housing for Oregonians. [ The Legislative Assembly also finds that the
imposition of general restrictions on housing rents will disrupt an orderly housing market, increase
deferred maintenance of existing housing stock, lead to abandonment of existing rental  units and create
a property tax shift from rental-owned to owner-occupied housing. ] Therefore, the  Legislative Assem-
bly declares that the imposition of rent control on housing in the  State of Oregon is a matter of
statewide concern.
(2) [Except as provided in subsections (3) to (5) of this section, ] A city  with a population of less
than 200,000 or county [ shall not enact any ] may only enact or enforce an  ordinance or resolution
[which] that controls the rent that may be charged for the rental of any dwelling unit  as  provided
in this section or section 2 of this 2025 Act .
(3) [This section does not impair the right of any state agency, city, county or urban renewal agency
as defined by ORS  457.035 to ] A city or county may  reserve to itself the right to approve rent in-
creases, establish base rents or establish limitations on rents on any residential property  for which
it has entered into  a contract under which certain benefits are applied to the property for the ex-
pressed purpose of  providing reduced rents for low income tenants. Such benefits include, but are
not limited to, property tax exemptions, long-term financing, rent subsidies, code enforcement  pro-
cedures and zoning density bonuses.
(4) [ Cities and counties  are not prohibited from including in condominium conversion ordinances
a requirement ] A city or county may require  that, during the notification period specified in ORS
100.305, the owner or developer may  not raise the rents of any affected tenant except by an amount
established by ordinance that does not exceed the limit imposed by ORS 90.493.
(5) [ Cities, counties and state agencies ] A city or  county  may impose temporary rent controls
when a natural or man-made disaster that materially eliminates  a significant portion of the rental
housing supply occurs, but must remove the controls when the rental  housing supply is restored to
substantially normal levels.
[(6) As used in this section, “dwelling unit” and  “rent” have the meaning given those terms in ORS
90.100.]
[(7) This section is  applicable throughout this state and in all cities and counties therein. The
electors or the governing body of a city or county shall not enact, and the governing body shall  not
enforce, any ordinance, resolution or other regulation that is inconsistent with this section. ]
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]