Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For purposes of this section, the term “institutions of higher
education” means:
(a) Community colleges operated under ORS chapter 341;
(b) Eastern Oregon University;
(c) Oregon Institute of Technology;
(d) Southern Oregon University; and
(e) Western Oregon University.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 350.075 (3)(n), the Higher Education Coordinating Commission
shall establish a direct admissions program for institutions of higher education.
(3)(a) The program established under subsection (2) of this section  must include a re-
quirement that, at the end of each school year, each high school in this state  provide to the
nearest community college  to that high school, in addition to Eastern Oregon University,
Oregon Institute of Technology, Southern  Oregon University and Western Oregon Univer-
sity, the name and other information to be determined  by the commission by rule of each
student who received a high school diploma.
(b) A student’s information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may not be
provided unless  that student consents to the provision of that student’s information in ac-
cordance with the policy of each school district board.
(4) The information that is provided to institutions of higher education under subsection
(3) of this section shall operate as a provisional automatic registration to  those institutions.
(5) A provisional automatic registration  under this section supersedes any other admis-
sion requirement at any institution of higher education.
(6) The commission and the State Board of Education shall adopt rules to  implement this
section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1076
HB 2398
1
2
3
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act first applies to the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 3.  Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on July 1, 2035.
[2]