Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of  $_______, which may be distributed to school districts to fund
services provided to migrant children in a  manner consistent with the Migrant Education
Program, as established by  Title I, Part C of the federal Elementary and Secondary Educa-
tion Act of 1965, including expanding eligibility criteria and providing services for children
for up to six years.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4566