Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 18.
SECTION 2. In any civil action in which a party that is not a  natural person obtains a
judgment against the State  of Oregon that includes a money award, the court may include
in the  judgment restrictions requiring the moneys awarded to be used for specific purposes
related to the action and requiring the party to provide  accountings of the use of the moneys
awarded to the court. If the party  does not comply with the restrictions included in the
judgment under this section, the court may set aside or modify  the judgment under ORS
18.082.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2017 Act applies only to judgments  entered on or after the
effective date of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2921