Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Invasive Species Council, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $480,000, for the following purposes:
(1) $80,000 for emergency purposes.
(2) $100,000 for outreach and education.
(3) $300,000 for the operation of the council.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1397