Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Human Services shall study regulatory responses to vi-
olations of staffing requirements in  long term care facilities and other state-regulated pro-
grams. The department shall submit a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to health no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3464