Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 137.090 is amended to read:
137.090. (1) In determining aggravation or mitigation, the court shall consider:
(a) Any evidence received during the proceeding;
(b) The presentence report, where one is available; and
(c) Any other evidence  relevant to aggravation or mitigation that the court finds trustworthy
and reliable.
(2) In determining mitigation, the court may consider:
(a) Evidence regarding the defendant’s status as a servicemember as defined in ORS 135.881.
(b) Whether the  defendant committed the crime while under duress, compulsion, direction or
pressure from another person who has:
(A) Committed acts of domestic violence, as defined in ORS 135.230, against the defendant;
(B) Committed acts of abuse as a family or household  member of the defendant, as those terms
are defined in ORS 107.705, against the defendant; or
(C) Used force, intimidation, fraud or coercion  to cause the defendant to engage, or attempt to
engage, in a commercial sex act.
(3) In determining aggravation, the court  shall consider whether the person was wearing body
armor in the course of and in furtherance of the crime, or to facilitate the  immediate flight there-
from.
(4) The court shall consider the defendant  having partially or fully concealed the
defendant’s face during commission of the crime, with the intent to avoid arrest or facilitate
the commission of the crime, as aggravation.
[(4)] (5) When a witness is so sick or infirm as to be unable to  attend a sentencing proceeding,
the deposition  of the witness may be taken out of court at such time and place, and upon such notice
to the adverse party, and before such person authorized to take depositions, as the court directs.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1421