Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Department of Justice,  for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000 for distribution  to the
Liberty House to provide children’s advocacy center services,  including child abuse medical
assessments, forensic interviewing, mental health services and child  abuse prevention edu-
cation.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3896