Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Definitions. As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Administrative costs” means the Oregon Infrastructure Finance Authority’s  direct
and indirect costs for:
(a) Investigating and processing applications for financial assistance submitted under
section 3 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Negotiating agreements with Oregon ports under section 4 of this 2025 Act;
(c) Providing financial and other assistance to Oregon ports;
(d) Monitoring the use of financial assistance by Oregon ports;
(e) Investigating and resolving discrepancies in the budgets of  Oregon ports as they re-
late to the use of financial assistance; and
(f) Winding up eligible port projects.
(2) “Container service” means the  handling of containerized cargo used to transport
goods.
(3) “Eligible port project” means  an infrastructure, capital improvement or dredging
project for Oregon ports that have existing container service at the  time the Oregon port
applies for financial assistance under sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
(4) “Financial assistance” means loans, including forgivable loans, and grants  available
under the program developed under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(5) “Oregon port” means an Oregon port district formed under ORS chapter 777 or 778.
SECTION 2.
Program for financial assistance for Oregon port projects.  (1)(a) The Oregon
Business Development Department shall develop a program to  award financial assistance to
Oregon ports for eligible port projects.
(b) The department shall adopt rules for the administration of sections 1 to 5 of this 2025
Act.
(2) The  Oregon Infrastructure Finance Authority established under ORS 285A.096 shall
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 360
HB 3050
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
administer the program.
SECTION 3.
Applications for financial assistance. (1) The Oregon  Infrastructure Finance
Authority shall adopt an application process by which an Oregon  port may apply for financial
assistance for eligible port projects under sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The application process must set forth at a minimum:
(a) Any information or documents that must be included with the application.
(b) A  requirement that the applicant demonstrate to the satisfaction of the authority
that the eligible port project will support existing container service.
(c) A process for reviewing and approving or rejecting the applications.
(d) The amount of financial assistance that may be provided to Oregon ports.
SECTION 4.
Agreements with ports;  required provisions; repayment.  (1) If the Oregon
Infrastructure Finance Authority approves  an application for financial assistance submitted
under section 3 of this 2025 Act, the authority  may pay the proceeds of the financial assist-
ance to the applicant only in accordance with the terms and conditions of an agreement  en-
tered into by the authority and the applicant that governs the disbursement and use of  the
financial assistance.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,  or any restriction on indebtedness
contained in a charter or  other organizational document, an Oregon port awarded financial
assistance for an eligible port project under sections 1 to 5 of this  2025 Act may enter into
an agreement with  the authority to borrow or otherwise receive moneys from the Port
Capital Improvement Fund established under section 5 of this 2025 Act.
(b) An agreement entered into under this subsection cannot become  effective until it is
authorized by an ordinance, resolution or order adopted by the governing body of the  Oregon
port.
(3) The agreement shall include, at a minimum, the following terms and conditions:
(a) The liability of the state under the agreement is contingent upon the availability  of
moneys in the Port Capital Improvement  Fund established under section 5 of this 2025 Act
for use in the eligible port project to which the agreement relates.
(b) If any portion of the financial assistance is in the form of a loan, the debtor  shall
grant the authority a lien on, or security interest in, such collateral as  the authority deter-
mines is necessary to secure repayment of the loan.
(c) The  authority shall specify the facts and circumstances that constitute nonperform-
ance by the recipient, a means for curing nonperformance,  penalties for nonperformance and
the means for recovering financial assistance amounts.
(d) Any other provisions the authority considers necessary  or appropriate to the imple-
mentation of the financial assistance program.
(4) The Oregon port may repay the financial assistance from:
(a) The revenues of  the eligible port project, including, but not limited to, special as-
sessment revenues;
(b) The general fund of the Oregon port; or
(c) Any other lawful source.
SECTION 5.
Port Capital Improvement Fund.  (1) The Port Capital Improvement Fund is
established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest
earned by the Port Capital Improvement Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2)(a) Moneys in the Port Capital Improvement Fund are continuously appropriated to the
[2]
HB 3050
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
Oregon Business Development Department for the Oregon  Infrastructure Finance Authority
for the purposes set forth in sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
(b) The authority may charge administrative costs to the fund.
(3) The fund shall consist of moneys credited to the fund, including:
(a) Moneys that the Legislative Assembly appropriates or otherwise transfers to  the
fund;
(b) Moneys transferred to the fund by the department;
(c) Earnings on moneys in the fund;
(d) Repayment amounts, including interest and penalties,  of financial assistance awarded
under sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act;
(e) Moneys received from the federal government or state or local governments; and
(f) Moneys, or the proceeds of assets,  from any other public or private source, including,
but not limited to, grants and gifts.
(4)(a) The authority shall administer the fund.
(b) The department shall adopt rules for the administration of the fund.
SECTION 6.
Section captions not part of  law. The section captions used in this 2025 Act
are provided only for the convenience of the reader and do not  become part of the statutory
law of this state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[3]