Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
 REBATE PROGRAM
SECTION 1. As used in this section and section 2 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Light-duty zero-emission vehicle” means a motor vehicle that:
(a) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 8,500 pounds or less;
(b) Is capable of attaining a speed of 55 miles per hour or more; and
(c) Is powered by any of the following means:
(A) Primarily through the use of an electric battery but may use a flywheel energy
storage device or a capacitor that also stores energy to assist in vehicle operation.
(B) Polymer electrolyte  membrane fuel cells or proton exchange membrane fuel cells that
use hydrogen fuel and oxygen from the air to produce electricity.
(C) Predominantly through the use of a zero-emission energy storage device that provides
enough power for the vehicle to travel 75 miles or  more using only electricity but may use
a backup alternative power unit that does not operate until the  energy storage device is fully
depleted.
(2) “Neighborhood electric vehicle” means a low-speed vehicle that:
(a) Is powered using an electric battery;
(b) Has a gross vehicle weight not exceeding 3,000 pounds; and
(c) Has at least four wheels.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1772
HB 2704
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) “Person” means a person as defined in ORS 174.100 or a public body  as defined in ORS
174.109.
(4) “Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle” means a hybrid electric vehicle that:
(a) Has zero evaporative emissions from its fuel system;
(b) Has an on-board electrical energy storage device with useful capacity  of 10 or more
miles of urban dynamometer driving schedule range, as  described by the United States En-
vironmental Protection Agency, on electricity alone;
(c) Is equipped with an on-board charger;
(d) Is rechargeable from an external connection to an off-board electrical source;
(e) Meets the super ultra-low emission vehicle standards for exhaust emissions, as  de-
fined by the State Department of Energy by rule;
(f) Has a 15-year and 150,000-mile warranty on emission control components; and
(g) Is capable of attaining a speed of 55 miles per hour or more.
(5) “Public transportation” means transportation provided by:
(a) A city, county, special  district or any other political subdivision or municipal or public
corporation; or
(b) A community action agency.
(6) “Qualifying vehicle” means a vehicle that:
(a) Is of a type defined in this section as a:
(A) Light-duty zero-emission vehicle;
(B) Neighborhood electric vehicle;
(C) Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle; or
(D) Zero-emission motorcycle;
(b) Is new, or has been previously used only as a dealership floor model  or test-drive
vehicle;
(c) Has not previously been registered;
(d) Is  constructed entirely from new parts that have never been the subject of a retail
sale;
(e) Has a base manufacturer’s suggested retail price of less than $60,000;
(f) Is covered by a manufacturer’s express warranty on  the vehicle drive train, including
the applicable energy  storage system or battery pack, for at least 24 months from the date
of purchase; and
(g) Is certified by the manufacturer to comply with  all applicable federal safety standards
issued by the National Highway Traffic  Safety Administration for new motor vehicles and
new motor vehicle equipment.
(7) “Vehicle dealer” means a person issued  a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020
or renewed under ORS 822.040.
(8) “Zero-emission transit bus” means a commercial bus that:
(a) Does not  produce carbon or particulate matter exhaust emissions under any opera-
tional modes or conditions;
(b) Will be operated after purchase to provide public transportation;
(c) Is new and is constructed entirely from new parts that have  never been the subject
of a retail sale;
(d) Has not previously been registered; and
(e) Is of a model that has been tested by, and received  a passing score from, the Federal
[2]
HB 2704
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Transit Administration at a facility authorized under 49 U.S.C. 5318(a).
(9) “Zero-emission motorcycle” means a  vehicle that has zero evaporative emissions from
its fuel system, is capable of attaining a speed of 55 miles per hour or more and:
(a) Is a fully-enclosed vehicle designed to travel on three wheels; or
(b) Is a motorcycle designed to travel on two wheels and is powered by electricity.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Environmental Quality Commission shall  hire or contract with a
third-party organization to  implement and administer an alternative fuel or zero-emission
vehicle rebate program to provide rebates to persons that purchase and register  qualifying
vehicles and zero-emission transit buses in this state.
(2) The purchaser or lessee of a qualifying vehicle or zero-emission transit  bus registered
in this state may apply for a  rebate for a portion of the purchase price or may choose to
assign the rebate to a vehicle dealer or lessor.
(3) Rebates under this section shall be  made from moneys credited to or deposited in the
Zero-Emission Incentive Fund  established under section 8 of this 2017 Act. A rebate may not
be made if sufficient funds are not available in the fund to make the rebate.
(4) The commission by rule shall prescribe the rebate application procedure for purchas-
ers. All rebate applications must include a declaration under penalty of perjury in the  form
required by ORCP 1 E.
(5)(a) Subject  to section 9 of this 2017 Act, rebates for the following qualifying vehicles
under this section shall be as follows:
(A) For light-duty zero-emission vehicles and plug-in hybrid electric  vehicles with an
electrochemical energy storage capacity of 10 kilowatt hours or more, $2,500.
(B) For light-duty  zero-emission vehicles or plug-in hybrid electric vehicles with an
electrochemical energy storage capacity of less than 10 kilowatt hours, $1,500.
(C) For neighborhood electric vehicles, $750.
(D) For zero-emission motorcycles, $750.
(b) Subject to section 9 of  this 2017 Act, rebates for zero-emission transit buses shall be
$250,000.
(6) To be eligible for a rebate, a person requesting a rebate under this section shall:
(a) Purchase or lease a new qualifying vehicle. Any lease must have a  minimum term of
24 months.
(b) Register the qualifying vehicle in Oregon.
(c) Submit an application for a rebate to the Department of Environmental Quality within
six months of the date of purchase or six months from the date the lease begins.
(d) Retain registration of the qualifying vehicle in Oregon for a minimum  of 24 consec-
utive months following the date of purchase or following the date the lease begins.
(7) A  person that receives a rebate under this section may not make or allow any mod-
ifications to the vehicle’s emissions control systems, hardware, software  calibrations or hy-
brid system.
(8) If a rebate recipient intends to sell the vehicle, or otherwise terminate the vehicle
lease before the end of 24 months, the rebate recipient shall notify the department  of the
recipient’s intent to  sell the vehicle or terminate a lease and reimburse the department for
the entire rebate amount.
(9) The department  may request participation from rebate recipients in ongoing research
efforts.
[3]
HB 2704
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(10) The department shall work  to ensure timely payment of rebates with a goal of paying
rebates within 60 days of receiving an application for a rebate.
(11) The  department may adopt any rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section.
 CHARGE AHEAD OREGON PROGRAM
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section, “battery-operated vehicle” means a vehicle pow-
ered by any of the following means:
(a) Primarily through the use of an electric battery but may use a flywheel  energy stor-
age device or a capacitor that also stores energy to assist in vehicle operation.
(b) Polymer electrolyte membrane fuel cells or proton exchange  membrane fuel cells that
use hydrogen fuel and oxygen from the air to produce electricity.
(c) Predominantly by a zero-emission energy storage device that provides enough power
for the vehicle to travel 75 miles or more using only electricity but may use a backup auxil-
iary power unit that does not operate until the energy storage device is almost depleted.
(2) The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality  shall hire or contract with
a third-party organization to develop and implement a  Charge Ahead Oregon program for the
purpose of achieving the goals described in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The goals of the Charge Ahead Oregon program include but are  not limited to the
following:
(a) Increasing the use of electric vehicles and battery-operated vehicles across Oregon;
(b) Increasing the use of electric vehicles and battery-operated vehicles in rural com-
munities;
(c) Increasing the use of electric vehicles and battery-operated vehicles among low  in-
come households and moderate income households, as those terms are defined in ORS
456.270;
(d) Making electric vehicles  and battery-operated vehicles more affordable to all
Oregonians; and
(e) Increasing electric  vehicle and battery-operated vehicle infrastructure throughout
this state.
(4) To maximize participation, at least three programs shall be developed  across this
state to reach communities that might not otherwise have access to electric vehicles  or
battery-operated vehicles.
REPORTS
SECTION 4.
(1) No later than October 30,  2018, the Director of the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality shall provide a  report on the Charge Ahead Oregon program described in
section 3 of this 2017 Act to the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided  in ORS 192.945.
The report must summarize:
(a) How the funds for the program have been spent.
(b) What impact the funding had on achieving the  goals described in section 3 of this 2017
Act.
(c) Recommendations for legislation necessary to meet the goals of the program.
[4]
HB 2704
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) No later than October 30, 2019, the director shall provide a report  to the Legislative
Assembly in the manner provided in ORS 192.945.  The report must summarize the uses to
date of moneys in the Zero-Emission Incentive Fund established under section 8 of this 2017
Act and project the level of funding that would  be required to continue to provide rebates
described in section 2 of this 2017 Act to all purchasers or lessees of qualifying  vehicles
through the 2019-2021 biennium.
 TAX CREDIT AUCTION
SECTION 5.
 Section 9, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  (1) A credit against the taxes that are otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 or,  if the
taxpayer is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317 or 318, is allowed to a taxpayer for certified al-
ternative fuel vehicle contributions made by the taxpayer during the tax year to the  [ Alternative
Fuel Vehicle Revolving Fund established under section 2 of this 2013 Act ] Zero-Emission Incentive
Fund established under section 8 of this 2017 Act .
(2)(a) The Department of Revenue shall,  in cooperation with the [ State Department of Energy ]
Department of Environmental  Quality, conduct an auction of tax credits under this section. The
Department of Revenue may not auction more than $3 million  of tax credits under this section. The
department may conduct the auction in the manner that the department determines is best suited
to maximize the return to the state on the sale of tax credit certifications and  shall announce a
reserve bid prior to conducting the auction. The reserve amount shall be at least 95  percent of the
total amount of  the tax credit. Moneys necessary to reimburse the Department of Revenue for the
actual costs incurred by  the department in administering an auction, not to exceed 0.25 percent of
auction proceeds, are continuously appropriated to the department. The Department of  Revenue
shall deposit net receipts from the auction required under this section in the [ Alternative  Fuel Ve-
hicle Revolving Fund established under section 2  of this 2013 Act. Net receipts from the auction re-
quired under this section shall  be used to provide loans as described in section 3 of this 2013 Act ]
Zero-Emission Incentive Fund established under section 8 of this 2017 Act .
(b) The [ State Department of Energy ] Environmental Quality Commission  shall adopt rules for
the administration and implementation of this section.
(3) Contributions made under this section shall be deposited in the [ Alternative Fuel Vehicle
Revolving Fund ] Zero-Emission Incentive Fund .
(4)(a) Upon  receipt of a contribution, the [ State Department of Energy ] Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality  shall issue to the  taxpayer written certification of the amount certified for tax
credit  under  this section to the extent the amount certified for tax credit, when added to all amounts
previously certified for tax credit under  this section, does not exceed $3 million for the tax year
beginning on or after  January 1, 2013 , and before January 1, 2017, and $23 million for any
biennium beginning on or after July 1, 2017 .
(b) The [ State Department of Energy ] Department of Environmental Quality  and the Depart-
ment of Revenue are not liable, and a refund of a  contributed amount need not be made, if a tax-
payer who has received tax credit certification is unable to use all or  a portion of the tax credit to
offset the tax liability of the taxpayer.
(5) The  tax credit allowed under this section for any one tax year may not exceed the tax li-
ability of the taxpayer.
(6) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this  section that is not used by the taxpayer in a
[5]
HB 2704
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability for the next
succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax year  may be carried
forward and used in the second succeeding tax year,  and, likewise, any credit not used in the second
succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the third succeeding tax year but may  not
be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(7) If a tax credit is claimed under this section by a  nonresident or part-year resident taxpayer,
the amount shall be allowed without proration under ORS 316.117.
(8) If the amount of contribution for which a tax credit certification is made  is allowed as a
deduction for federal tax purposes, the amount of the contribution shall be  added to federal taxable
income for Oregon tax purposes.
SECTION 6.
 Section 11,  chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section 9, chapter 38,
Oregon Laws 2014, is amended to read:
Sec. 11. (1) Section 9, chapter 774,  Oregon Laws 2013, applies to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2013, and before January 1, [ 2017] 2027.
(2) The amendments to section 9, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2013,  by section 5 of this 2017
Act apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 7. The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality may hire or con-
tract with a marketer to market the tax  credits described in section 9, chapter 774, Oregon
Laws 2013, to taxpayers.
 ZERO-EMISSION INCENTIVE FUND
SECTION 8. (1) The Zero-Emission  Incentive Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Interest earned by the Zero-Emission Incentive
Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Zero-Emission Incentive Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source; and
(d) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) Moneys in the  fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Environ-
mental Quality. Each biennium after the payment of  refunds to taxpayers as described in
section 9, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2013, out of the moneys  deposited in the fund per
biennium, the remaining funds may be used as follows:
(a) Up to 
 percent per biennium may be expended to  pay a third-party organiza-
tion to implement and administer the alternative fuel or zero-emission vehicle  rebate pro-
gram described in section 2 of this 2017 Act and to  market the tax credits described in
section 9, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2013, to taxpayers.
(b) Up to  percent  per biennium may be expended to pay a third-party organiza-
tion to design  and implement the Charge Ahead Oregon program described in section 3 of
this 2017 Act.
(c) Up to  percent per biennium may be expended to pay the Department of En-
vironmental Quality’s costs of administering sections 1 to 4 and 7 to 9 of this 2017 Act.
(4) Expenditures from the fund are not subject to ORS 291.232 to 291.260.
[6]
HB 2704
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
(5) The Department of Environmental Quality shall seek moneys to be deposited in the
fund to be used as provided  for in subsection (3) of this section, that may include but need
not be limited to, gifts, grants,  donations or allocations of moneys received pursuant to
settlement agreements that must be used for purposes related to  engine emissions re-
ductions.
SECTION 9. (1) The total amount of potential tax credits for  Zero-Emission Incentive
Fund contributions in this state may not, at the time of certification under section 9, chapter
774, Oregon Laws 2013, exceed $23 million for any biennium.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission may adopt rules as necessary to carry out
the provisions of this section.
 MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 10. Section 2 of this  2017 Act applies to applications for rebates submitted on
or after July 1, 2018.
SECTION 11. (1)(a) Sections 1  to 3, 8 and 9 of this 2017 Act are repealed on January 2,
2027.
(b) Any  moneys remaining in the Zero-Emission Incentive Fund on the date of the repeal
specified in  subsection (1) of this section that are unexpended, unobligated and not subject
to any conditions shall be transferred by the  State Treasurer to the credit of an account of
the Department of Environmental Quality to be used for vehicle emission reduction pro-
grams.
(2) Section 4 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2019.
SECTION 12.
The unit  captions used in this 2017 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 13. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[7]