Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 342.173, a school district, an education service dis-
trict or a public charter school  may employ any person who is not licensed or registered with
the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission to teach reading to students.
(2) Employment of a person to teach reading is solely at the discretion of a  district or
school. A district or school may prescribe any requirements for the  employment of a person
to teach reading.
(3) A person employed to teach reading  as provided by this section is not considered a
teacher for purposes of state or federal law.
SECTION 2. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 185