Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Grid Resilience Matching Fund is established in  the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Moneys in  the Grid Resilience Matching Fund
shall consist of moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative
Assembly and other moneys deposited into the fund from any other source.
(2) All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the State Department of
Energy for the purposes of providing state matching funds to leverage federal grant  funding
for grid resilience projects, and for related administrative costs of the department.
(3) Not later than December 31 of each  even-numbered year, the department shall report,
in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim  committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to energy regarding the  expenditures of moneys in the fund and the status
of grid resilience projects that have received moneys from the fund.
(4) The department may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 384