Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act shall  be known and may be cited as Angela’s Law.
SECTION 2. Section 3 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 135.230 to
135.290.
SECTION 3. (1) If a defendant is charged with a  crime constituting domestic violence and
is released before judgment, in addition to the release conditions described in  ORS 135.250,
the court shall order that the defendant:
(a) Wear a tamper-resistant location tracking device secured to the defendant’s person
at all times while the defendant is released; and
(b) Not enter within 1,000 feet of the victim’s home, place of work and any other location
frequented by the victim and designated by the court.
(2) The location tracking device required under this section:
(a) Must have the capability to notify  the victim and law enforcement agencies in real
time if the defendant enters within 1,000 feet of the victim’s home, place of  work or any
other location designated by the court.
(b) Must have  the capability to immediately notify the victim and law enforcement
agencies if the device is removed or tampered with.
(c) May require the use by  the victim of a cell phone application or a paired receptor
device.
(3) The court may require that the defendant pay a fee  for the location tracking device
described in this section.
(4) The court may enter an order waiving or modifying the condition described in  this
section if:
(a) The victim petitions the court for a waiver; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3777
SB 1096
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The court finds, after a  hearing on the petition, that the defendant does not pose a
threat to the victim and that waiving or modifying  the condition is in the best interests of
the parties and the community.
(5) When a defendant subject to a release condition described in  this section violates the
condition, the court:
(a) Shall cause the defendant to be taken back into custody; and
(b) May not authorize any form of release except  as required by the Oregon or United
States Constitution.
(6) As  used in this section, “location tracking device” means an electronic device that
permits the real-time tracking of a person by means of global positioning system coordinates.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 135.250 is amended to read:
135.250. (1) If a defendant is released before judgment, the conditions of the release  agreement
shall be that the defendant will:
(a) Appear to answer the charge in the court having  jurisdiction on a day certain and thereafter
as ordered by the court until the defendant is discharged or the judgment is entered;
(b) Submit to the orders and process of the court;
(c) Not depart this state without leave of the court; and
(d) Comply with such other conditions as the court may impose.
(2)(a) In addition to the conditions listed in subsection (1) of this section, if the defendant  is
charged with an offense that also constitutes domestic violence,  the court shall include as a condi-
tion of the release agreement that the defendant not contact the victim of the violence.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the court may enter  an order waiving the
condition that the defendant have no contact with the victim if:
(A) The victim petitions the court for a waiver; and
(B) The court finds, after a hearing on the petition, that  the defendant does not  pose a threat
to the victim and that  waiving the condition is in the  best interests of the parties and the com-
munity.
(c) If the defendant was provided notice and an  opportunity to be heard, the court shall also
include in the  agreement, when appropriate, terms and findings sufficient under 18 U.S.C. 922 (d)(8)
and (g)(8) to affect the defendant’s ability to  possess firearms and ammunition or engage in activities
involving firearms.
(d) ORS 107.720 applies to release agreements executed by defendants charged  with an offense
that constitutes domestic violence,  except that proof of service of the release agreement is not re-
quired and the agreement may not be terminated at the request of the victim without a hearing.
(e) If a defendant subject to the release condition described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section violates the condition, the court:
(A) Shall cause the defendant to be taken back into custody; and
(B) May not authorize any form of release except as required by the Oregon or  United
States Constitution.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 135.260 is amended to read:
135.260. (1) Conditional release may include one or more of the following conditions:
(a) Release  of the defendant into the care of a qualified person or organization responsible for
supervising the defendant and assisting  the defendant in appearing in court. The supervisor shall
not be  required to be financially responsible for the defendant, nor to forfeit money in the event the
defendant fails to appear in  court. The supervisor, however, shall notify the court immediately in the
[2]
SB 1096
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
event that the defendant breaches the conditional release.
(b) Reasonable regulations on the  activities, movements, associations and residences of the de-
fendant, including, if the  court finds it appropriate, restriction of the defendant to the defendant’s
own residence or to the premises thereof.
(c) Release of the defendant from custody during working hours.
(d) Any other reasonable restriction designed to assure the defendant’s appearance.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 135.250 (2)(b), conditional release shall include , [ a
prohibition against contacting the victim ] if the defendant  is charged with an offense that also con-
stitutes domestic violence :
(a) A prohibition against contacting the victim; and
(b) The release conditions described in section 3 of this 2025 Act .
SECTION 6.
 ORS 137.540 is amended to read:
137.540. (1) The court may sentence the defendant to probation subject to the following  general
conditions unless specifically deleted by the court. The probationer shall:
(a) Pay fines, restitution or fees ordered by the court.
(b) Submit to testing for controlled substance, cannabis or alcohol use  if the probationer has a
history of substance abuse or if there is a reasonable suspicion that  the probationer has illegally
used controlled substances.
(c) Participate in a substance abuse evaluation as  directed by the supervising officer and follow
the recommendations of the evaluator if there are reasonable grounds to believe there  is a history
of substance abuse.
(d) Remain in the State  of Oregon until written permission to leave is granted by the Depart-
ment of Corrections or a county community corrections agency.
(e) Not change residence without  prior permission from the Department of Corrections or a
county community corrections agency and inform the parole and probation officer of any change  in
employment.
(f) Permit the parole and probation officer to  visit the probationer or the probationer’s work site
or residence and to conduct a walk-through of the common areas and of the  rooms in the residence
occupied by or under the control of the probationer.
(g) Consent to the search  of person, vehicle or premises upon the request of a representative
of the supervising officer if the supervising officer  has reasonable grounds to believe that evidence
of a violation will be found, and submit to  fingerprinting or photographing, or both, when requested
by the Department of Corrections or  a county community corrections agency for supervision pur-
poses.
(h) Obey all laws, municipal, county, state and federal, and  in circumstances in which state and
federal law conflict, obey state law.
(i) Promptly and truthfully answer all reasonable inquiries by the  Department of Corrections or
a county community corrections agency.
(j) Not possess weapons, firearms or dangerous animals.
(k) Report as required and abide by the direction of the supervising officer.
(L) If recommended by the  supervising officer, successfully complete a sex offender treatment
program approved by the  supervising officer and submit to polygraph examinations at the direction
of the supervising officer if the probationer:
(A) Is under supervision for a sex  crime as defined in ORS 163A.005 or harassment under ORS
166.065 (4)(a)(A);
[3]
SB 1096
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Was previously convicted of a sex crime as defined in ORS 163A.005; or
(C) Was previously convicted in another jurisdiction of an offense  that would constitute a sex
crime as defined in ORS 163A.005 if committed in this state.
(m) Participate in a mental health evaluation as directed by  the supervising officer and follow
the recommendation of the evaluator.
(n) If  required to report as a sex offender under ORS 163A.015, report with the Department of
State Police, a city police department, a county sheriff’s office or the supervising agency:
(A) When supervision begins;
(B) Within 10 days of a change in residence;
(C) Once each year within 10 days of the probationer’s date of birth;
(D) Within 10 days of the first day the person works at, carries on  a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(E) Within 10 days of a  change in work, vocation or attendance status at an institution of higher
education.
(o) Submit to a risk and needs  assessment as directed by the supervising officer and follow
reasonable recommendations resulting from the assessment.
(2) In addition to the general conditions, the court may  impose any special conditions of pro-
bation that are reasonably related to the crime of conviction or the needs of the probationer for  the
protection of the public or reformation of the probationer,  or both, including, but not limited to, that
the probationer shall:
(a) For crimes committed prior to November 1,  1989, and misdemeanors committed on or after
November 1, 1989, be  confined to the county jail or be restricted to the probationer’s own residence
or to the premises thereof, or be subject to any combination  of such confinement and restriction,
such confinement or restriction  or combination thereof to be for a period not to exceed one year
or one-half of the maximum period of confinement that could be  imposed for the offense for which
the defendant is convicted, whichever is the lesser.
(b) For felonies committed on or after November 1, 1989:
(A) Be confined in the county jail, or be subject to other custodial sanctions  under community
supervision, or both, as provided by rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission; and
(B) Comply with any special conditions of probation that are imposed by  the supervising officer
in accordance with subsection (9) of this section.
(c) For crimes committed on or  after December 5, 1996, sell any assets of the probationer as
specifically ordered by the court in order to pay restitution.
(d) For crimes constituting delivery of a controlled substance,  as those terms are defined in ORS
475.005, or for telephonic harassment under ORS 166.090, or for crimes  involving domestic violence,
as defined in ORS 135.230, be prohibited from using Internet  websites that provide anonymous text
message services.
(e) Not use or possess controlled substances except pursuant to a medical prescription.
(3)(a) If a person is released on probation following  conviction of stalking under ORS 163.732
(2)(b) or violating a court’s stalking protective order  under ORS 163.750 (2)(b), the court may include
as a special condition of the person’s probation reasonable residency restrictions.
(b) If the court imposes the special condition of probation described in this subsection and  if at
any time during the  period of probation the victim moves to a location that causes the probationer
to be in violation of the special condition of probation,  the court may not require the probationer
to change the probationer’s residence in order to comply with the special condition of probation.
[4]
SB 1096
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4)(a) When a person who is a sex offender is released on probation, the  court shall impose as
a special condition of probation  that the person not reside in any dwelling in which another sex
offender who is on probation, parole  or post-prison supervision resides, without the approval of the
person’s supervising parole and probation officer, or in which more than one other sex offender who
is on probation, parole or post-prison supervision resides, without the approval  of the director of the
probation agency that  is supervising the person or of the county manager of the Department of
Corrections, or a designee of the director  or manager. As soon as practicable, the supervising parole
and probation officer of  a person subject to the requirements of this subsection shall review the
person’s living arrangement with the person’s sex offender treatment provider to ensure that  the
arrangement supports the goals of offender rehabilitation and community safety. As used in  this
[subsection] paragraph:
[(a)] (A)  “Dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 469B.100.
[(b)] (B)  “Dwelling” does not include a residential treatment facility or a halfway house.
[(c)] (C)  “Halfway house” means a publicly or privately operated  profit or nonprofit residential
facility that provides rehabilitative care and treatment for sex offenders.
[(d)] (D)  “Sex offender” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
(b)(A) If a person  is released on probation following conviction of a crime constituting
domestic violence as defined in ORS  135.230, the court shall impose as a special condition of
probation a requirement that the person:
(i) Wear a tamper-resistant location tracking device secured to the person at all  times
for at least the first 90 days of probation; and
(ii) Not enter within 1,000 feet of the victim’s home, place of work and any  other location
frequented by the victim and designated by the court.
(B) The location tracking device must meet the requirements described in section  3 (2)
of this 2025 Act.
(C) The court may waive the requirement described in  this paragraph if the victim re-
quests waiver and the court finds that the person does not pose a threat to the victim.
(5)(a) If the person is released on probation following conviction of a sex crime, as  defined in
ORS 163A.005, or an assault, as defined in ORS 163.175 or 163.185, and the victim was under 18
years of age,  the court, if requested by the victim, shall include as a special condition of the person’s
probation that the person not reside within three miles of the victim unless:
(A) The victim resides in a county having a population of less than 130,000 and  the person is
required to reside in that county;
(B) The person demonstrates to the court by a preponderance of the evidence  that no mental
intimidation or pressure was brought to bear during the commission of the crime;
(C) The  person demonstrates to the court by a preponderance of the evidence that imposition
of the  condition will deprive the person of a residence that would be materially significant in aiding
in the rehabilitation of the person or in the success of the probation; or
(D) The person  resides in a halfway house. As used in this subparagraph, “halfway house” means
a publicly or privately operated profit or nonprofit residential  facility that provides rehabilitative
care and treatment for sex offenders.
(b) A victim may request imposition of the special  condition of probation described in this sub-
section at the time of sentencing in person or through the prosecuting attorney.
(c) If the court imposes the special condition of probation described in this subsection and if  at
any time during the period of probation the victim moves to within three miles of the  probationer’s
[5]
SB 1096
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
residence, the court may not require the probationer  to change the probationer’s residence in order
to comply with the special condition of probation.
(6) When a person who is a sex offender, as defined in  ORS 163A.005, is released on probation,
the Department of Corrections or the county community corrections agency, whichever is appropri-
ate, shall notify the city police department, if the person is going to  reside within a city, and the
county sheriff’s office of the county in  which the person is going to reside of the person’s release
and the conditions of the person’s release.
(7) Failure to abide by all general  and special conditions of probation may result in arrest,
modification of conditions,  revocation of probation or imposition of structured, intermediate sanc-
tions in accordance with rules adopted under ORS 137.595.
(8) The court may order that probation be supervised by the court.
(9)(a) The court may at any time modify the conditions of probation.
(b) When the court orders a defendant placed under the supervision of the Department of  Cor-
rections or a community corrections agency, the supervising officer may file  with the court a pro-
posed modification to the special conditions of probation.  The supervising officer shall provide a
copy of the proposed modification to the district  attorney and the probationer, and shall notify the
probationer of the right to file an objection and have a hearing as described in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph. The notice requirement may be satisfied by providing the probationer  with a copy
of a form  developed in accordance with rules adopted under ORS 137.595 (2)(b) that describes the
right to a hearing. If the district attorney or probationer:
(A) Files  an objection to the proposed modification less than five judicial days after the proposed
modification was filed,  the court shall schedule a hearing no later than 10 judicial days after the
proposed modification was filed, unless the  court finds good cause to schedule a hearing at a later
time.
(B) Does not file an objection to the proposed modification less than  five judicial days after the
proposed modification was filed, the proposed modification becomes effective five  judicial days after
the proposed modification was filed.
(10) A court may  not order revocation of probation as a result of the probationer’s failure to
pay restitution unless the court determines from the  totality of the circumstances that the purposes
of the probation are not being served.
(11) If the court  ordered as a special condition of probation that the probationer find and
maintain employment, it is not a cause for revocation of probation that the  probationer failed to
apply for or accept employment at any workplace where there is a labor dispute in progress. As used
in this subsection, “labor dispute” has the meaning for that term provided in ORS 662.010.
(12) As used in this section, “attends,” “institution of higher  education,” “works” and “carries
on a vocation” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 144.102 is amended to read:
144.102. (1) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or local supervisory authority
responsible for correctional services for a person shall specify in writing the conditions  of post-
prison supervision imposed under ORS 144.096. A copy of the conditions  must be given to the person
upon release from prison or jail.
(2) The board or the supervisory authority shall determine, and may at any time modify,  the
conditions of post-prison supervision, which may include,  among other conditions, that the person
shall:
(a) Comply with the conditions of post-prison supervision as  specified by the board or supervi-
[6]
SB 1096
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sory authority.
(b) Be under the supervision of the Department of Corrections  and its representatives or other
supervisory authority and abide by their direction and counsel.
(c) Answer all reasonable inquiries of the board, the department or the supervisory authority.
(d) Report to the parole officer as directed by the board, the department or the supervisory  au-
thority.
(e) Not own, possess or be in control of any weapon.
(f) Respect and obey all municipal,  county, state and federal laws, and in circumstances in which
state and federal law conflict, obey state law.
(g) Understand that the board  or supervisory authority may, at its discretion, punish violations
of post-prison supervision.
(h) Attend a victim impact treatment session in a county that has a victim impact program.
(i) For crimes constituting delivery of a controlled substance, as those terms are defined in ORS
475.005, or for telephonic harassment under ORS 166.090, or for crimes  involving domestic violence,
as defined in ORS 135.230, be  prohibited from using Internet websites that provide anonymous text
message services.
(3)(a) If [ the] a person is required to report as a sex offender under ORS 163A.010, the board
or supervisory authority shall include as a condition of post-prison supervision  that the person re-
port with  the Department of State Police, a city police department, a county sheriff’s office or the
supervising agency:
[(a)] (A)  When supervision begins;
[(b)] (B)  Within 10 days of a change in residence;
[(c)] (C) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s date of birth;
[(d)] (D) Within 10 days of the first day the person works at, carries on a vocation  at or attends
an institution of higher education; and
[(e)] (E)  Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or attendance status  at an institution of
higher education.
(b)(A) If a person is  on post-prison supervision following a sentence for a conviction
constituting domestic violence as defined in ORS 135.230, the board or supervisory  authority
shall include as a condition of post-prison supervision a requirement that the person:
(i) Wear a secure tamper-resistant location tracking device secured to the person  at all
times for at least the first 90 days of supervision; and
(ii) Not enter within 1,000 feet of the victim’s home, place of work and any  other location
frequented by the victim and designated by the board or supervisory authority.
(B) The location  tracking device must meet the requirements described in section 3 (2)
of this 2025 Act.
(C) The board or supervisory authority may waive the requirement  described in this
paragraph if the victim  requests waiver and the board or supervisory authority finds that the
person does not pose a threat to the victim.
(4)(a) The board or supervisory authority may establish special conditions that the board or su-
pervisory authority considers  necessary because of the individual circumstances of the person on
post-prison supervision.
(b) If the  person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of a sex crime, as defined in
ORS 163A.005, the board or supervisory authority shall include all of the following as special  con-
ditions of the person’s post-prison supervision:
[7]
SB 1096
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Agreement to comply with a curfew set by the board, the supervisory authority or the
supervising officer.
(B) A prohibition against contacting a person under  18 years of age without the prior written
approval of the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(C) A prohibition  against being present more than one time, without the prior written approval
of the board, supervisory authority or supervising  officer, at a place where persons under 18 years
of age regularly congregate.
(D) In addition to the prohibition under subparagraph (C) of this  paragraph, a prohibition
against being present, without the prior written approval of the board,  supervisory authority or
supervising officer, at, or on property adjacent to, a school, child care  center, playground or other
place intended for use primarily by persons under 18 years of age.
(E) A prohibition against working  or volunteering at a school, child care center, park, play-
ground or other place where persons under 18 years of age regularly congregate.
(F) Entry into and completion of or successful discharge  from a sex offender treatment program
approved by the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer. The program  may include
polygraph and plethysmograph testing. The person is responsible  for paying for the treatment pro-
gram.
(G) A prohibition  against direct or indirect contact with the victim, unless approved by the
victim, the person’s treatment provider and the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(H) Unless otherwise indicated for the treatment required under subparagraph (F)  of this para-
graph, a prohibition against viewing, listening to, owning or possessing  sexually stimulating visual
or auditory materials that are relevant to the person’s deviant behavior.
(I) Agreement to consent to a search of the  person or the vehicle or residence of the person
upon the request of a representative of the board or supervisory authority  if the representative has
reasonable grounds to believe that  evidence of a violation of a condition of post-prison supervision
will be found.
(J) Participation in  random polygraph examinations to obtain information for risk management
and treatment. The person is responsible for  paying the expenses of the examinations. The results
of a polygraph examination under this subparagraph may not be used in evidence in a hearing  to
prove a violation of post-prison supervision.
(K) Maintenance of a driving log and  a prohibition against driving a motor vehicle alone unless
approved by the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(L) A  prohibition against using a post-office box unless approved by the board, supervisory au-
thority or supervising officer.
(M) A prohibition against residing in a dwelling in which  another sex offender who is on pro-
bation, parole or post-prison supervision resides unless approved by  the board, supervisory authority
or supervising officer, or in which more than one other sex offender who is on probation, parole or
post-prison supervision  resides unless approved by the board or the director of the supervisory au-
thority, or a designee of the board or director. As soon as practicable, the supervising officer of  a
person subject to the  requirements of this subparagraph shall review the person’s living arrange-
ment with  the person’s sex offender treatment provider to ensure that the arrangement supports the
goals of offender rehabilitation and community safety.
(c)(A) If the person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of a sex crime, as defined
in ORS 163A.005, or an assault, as defined in ORS 163.175  or 163.185, and the victim was under 18
years of age, the board or supervisory authority, if requested by the victim, shall include as a special
[8]
SB 1096
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
condition of the person’s post-prison supervision that the person not reside within three miles of the
victim unless:
(i) The victim resides in a county  having a population of less than 130,000 and the person is
required to reside in that county under subsection (7) of this section;
(ii) The person demonstrates to the board or supervisory authority by a preponderance of  the
evidence that no mental intimidation or pressure was brought to bear during the  commission of the
crime;
(iii) The person demonstrates to the board or supervisory authority by a  preponderance of the
evidence that imposition of the condition  will deprive the person of a residence that would be
materially significant in  aiding in the rehabilitation of the person or in the success of the post-prison
supervision; or
(iv) The person resides in a halfway house.
(B) A victim may request imposition of the special condition of  post-prison supervision described
in this paragraph at  the time of sentencing in person or through the prosecuting attorney. A victim’s
request may be included in the judgment document.
(C) If the board or supervisory authority imposes  the special condition of post-prison supervision
described in this paragraph and  if at any time during the period of post-prison supervision the victim
moves to within three miles of  the person’s residence, the board or supervisory authority may not
require the person to change the person’s  residence in order to comply with the special condition
of post-prison supervision.
(d)(A) If  a person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of stalking under ORS
163.732 (2)(b) or violating a court’s stalking protective order under ORS 163.750 (2)(b), the board  or
supervisory authority may include as a special condition of the person’s post-prison supervision
reasonable residency restrictions.
(B) If the board or supervisory authority imposes  the special condition of post-prison supervision
described in this paragraph and  if at any time during the period of post-prison supervision the victim
moves to a location that causes the person to be in violation of the special condition of post-prison
supervision, the board or supervisory authority may not require the person to change the  person’s
residence in order to comply with the special condition of post-prison supervision.
(5)(a) The board  or supervisory authority may require the person to pay, as a condition of
post-prison supervision, compensatory fines, restitution or attorney fees:
(A) As determined, imposed or required by the sentencing court; or
(B) When previously required as a condition of any type of supervision that is later revoked.
(b) The board may require a person to  pay restitution as a condition of post-prison supervision
imposed for an offense other than the offense for which the restitution was ordered if the person:
(A) Was ordered to pay restitution as a result of another conviction; and
(B) Has not fully paid the restitution by the time the person has completed the period of post-
prison supervision imposed for the offense for which the restitution was ordered.
(6) A person’s failure to apply for or accept employment at a workplace  where there is a labor
dispute in progress does not constitute a violation of the conditions of post-prison supervision.
(7)(a) When  a person is released from imprisonment on post-prison supervision, the board shall
order as a condition of  post-prison supervision that the person reside for the first six months after
release in the county that last supervised the person, if the person was on active supervision  as an
adult for a felony at the time of the offense that resulted in the imprisonment.
(b) If the person was not on active supervision as an adult  for a felony at the time of the offense
[9]
SB 1096
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that resulted in the imprisonment, the board shall order  as a condition of post-prison supervision
that the person reside for the first six months after release in the county where the person  resided
at the time of the offense that resulted in the imprisonment.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (b) of this subsection:
(A) The board shall determine the county where the person resided at the  time of the offense
by examining records such as:
(i) An Oregon driver license, regardless of its validity;
(ii) Records maintained by the Department of Revenue;
(iii) Records maintained by the Department of State Police;
(iv) Records maintained by the Department of Human Services;
(v) Records maintained by the Department of Corrections; and
(vi) Records maintained by the Oregon Health Authority.
(B) If the person did not have an identifiable address at  the time of the offense, or the address
cannot be determined,  the person is considered to have resided in the county where the offense oc-
curred.
(C) If the person is serving multiple sentences, the county of residence is determined  according
to the date of the last arrest resulting in a conviction.
(D) In determining the person’s county of  residence, the board may not consider offenses com-
mitted by the person while the person was incarcerated in a Department of Corrections facility.
(d) Upon motion of the board, the supervisory authority, the person, a victim or a district at-
torney, the board may waive the residency condition under paragraph (b) of this subsection  only
after making a finding that one of the following conditions has been met:
(A) The person provides proof of employment with no set ending date  in a county other than the
county of residence determined under paragraph (c) of this section;
(B) The person is found to pose a significant danger to a victim of the person’s crime residing
in the county of residence, or a victim or victim’s family residing in  the county of residence is found
to pose a significant danger to the person;
(C) The person has a spouse or biological or adoptive family residing in a county other than  the
county of residence who will be materially significant in aiding in the  rehabilitation of the person
and in the success of the post-prison supervision;
(D) As another condition  of post-prison supervision, the person is required to participate in a
treatment program that is not available in the county of residence;
(E) The person requests release to another state; or
(F) The board finds other good cause for the waiver.
(e) The board shall consider eligibility  for transitional housing programs and residential treat-
ment programs when determining whether to waive the residency condition under paragraph  (b) of
this subsection, and the acceptance of the person into a  transitional housing program or a residen-
tial treatment program constitutes good cause as described in paragraph (d)(F) of this subsection.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Attends,” “carries  on a vocation,” “institution of higher education” and “works” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(b)(A) “Dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 469B.100.
(B) “Dwelling” does not mean a residential treatment facility or a halfway house.
(c) “Halfway house” means a residential facility that provides  rehabilitative care and treatment
for sex offenders.
[10]
SB 1096
1
2
(d) “Labor dispute” has the meaning given that term in ORS 662.010.
[11]