Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Parks for  All Subaccount is established as a subaccount in
the Parks Donation  Trust Fund established under ORS 390.153. Interest earned by the Organ
Parks for All Subaccount shall be credited  to the subaccount. The subaccount consists of
moneys appropriated to the subaccount by the Legislative Assembly and  moneys received
under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) Moneys in  the subaccount are continuously appropriated to the State Parks and Re-
creation Department to provide free day-use parking  in state parks for vehicles registered
in this state and as otherwise provided in this section.
(3) Each year, the department shall use no more than $15 million from the subaccount
in the same manner as revenue received  from the sale of day-use parking passes is otherwise
used. Any moneys remaining in the subaccount shall be  spent as provided in subsection (4)
of this section.
(4) The moneys in the subaccount that remain after the expenditure of moneys described
in subsection (3) of this section shall be used for the following:
(a) Maintaining, constructing, improving, developing, managing and operating state
parks, ocean shores,  public beach access areas, natural areas and outdoor and recreation
areas for natural or scenic purposes; and
(b) Maintaining, constructing, improving, developing, managing and operating state
parks, ocean shores, public beach access  areas, historic sites, cultural sites, natural areas
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 812
HB 2137
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
and outdoor and recreation areas for cultural, historical, educational or recreational pur-
poses.
SECTION 2.
(1) A person that applies for vehicle registration or renewal of vehicle reg-
istration has the option  to pay $19 per year of registration or more for deposit into the
Oregon Parks for All Subaccount.
(2) The  vehicle registration application form and the vehicle registration renewal appli-
cation form must state that the applicant has the option  of paying money for deposit into
the Oregon Parks for All Subaccount to help give every Oregon resident free  day-use access
to all of Oregon’s state parks.
(3) After  deducting the expenses for collecting and transferring a payment made under
this section, the Department of Transportation shall transfer the  moneys to the Oregon
Parks for All Subaccount established under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding ORS 390.124, a  day-use parking pass for the use of state
park areas is not required for any vehicle registered in Oregon.
SECTION 4. No later than October 1, 2026, the State Parks  and Recreation Department
shall provide to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to natural re-
sources a report on:
(1) The amount paid into the Oregon Parks for All Subaccount;
(2) The gap, if any, from the amount received and the amount that the  department esti-
mates would have otherwise been received from the purchase of  day-use parking passes by
Oregon residents from January 1, 2026, to until the date the report is prepared;
(3) The approximate increase in the use of state parks; and
(4) Any other information determined by the department to be relevant to  the policy of
providing free day-use access to state parks.
SECTION 5.
(1) Sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Department of  Transportation may adopt rules and take any other action before
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the
department to exercise, on and after the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this
section, all the duties, functions and powers conferred on the department  by section 2 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 6. Sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act are repealed January 2, 2032.
SECTION 7. Any balance in the Oregon Parks for All Subaccount that is unexpended and
unobligated on the date of the repeal of sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act, and all  moneys that
would have been deposited in the Oregon Parks for  All Subaccount had section 2 of this 2025
Act remained in effect,  are appropriated to the State Parks and Recreation Department for
expenditure in the manner of other moneys in the Parks Donation Trust Fund.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]