Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 321.017 is amended to read:
321.017. (1) In addition to the taxes levied under ORS 321.015  (1) to (4), there [ hereby] is levied
a privilege tax upon taxpayers on  the harvesting of all merchantable forest products harvested on
forestlands [ in the amount provided in subsection (2) of this section. ]
[(2) The rate of tax levied in subsection (1) of this  section shall be established annually at the be-
ginning of  each calendar year by the board of directors of the Oregon Forest Resources Institute, ] at
a rate not to exceed 75 cents per thousand feet, board measure, adjusted annually  for inflation since
1991 based on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region  (All Items), as
published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
[(3)] (2) The tax levied under subsection (1) of this section  shall be measured  by and be ap-
plicable to each  per thousand feet, board measure, and such shall be subject to and determined by
the procedures and provisions of ORS 321.015 (5) and (6).
[(4)] (3) The tax [ levied by subsection (1) of this section ] shall be due and payable to the Depart-
ment of Revenue in the manner and procedure, including penalties and interest, as set  forth for the
collection of the privilege tax in ORS 321.005 to 321.185.
[(5)] (4)(a) The revenue from the tax [ levied by subsection (1) of this section ] shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer [ who shall ] for deposit [ it] in a suspense account established under  ORS
321.145 (1).
(b) After payment of refunds, which shall be paid in the same  manner as other forest products
harvest tax refunds are paid [ in] under  ORS 321.145 (2), the balance of the [ additional] revenue
from the  tax [ imposed under subsection (1) of this section ] shall be deposited in  the [ Oregon Forest
Resources Institute Fund ] General Fund .
SECTION 2. The amendments  to ORS 321.017 by section 1 of this 2023 Act apply to the
harvesting of merchantable forest products harvested on forestlands on or after January 1,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3915
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
2024.
SECTION 3.
ORS 526.600, 526.605, 526.610, 526.615, 526.620, 526.625, 526.630, 526.632, 526.635,
526.640, 526.645, 526.650, 526.655, 526.660, 526.665, 526.670 and 526.675 are repealed.
SECTION 4. All moneys in the Oregon Forest Resources Institute Fund that are unex-
pended and unobligated on the date that ORS  526.675 is repealed shall revert to the General
Fund.
SECTION 5.  ORS 321.145 is amended to read:
321.145. (1) The  revenue from the taxes levied [ by] under ORS 321.005 to 321.185 and 321.560
to 321.600 shall be  remitted to the State Treasurer who shall deposit it in a suspense account es-
tablished under the provisions of ORS 293.445.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions  of ORS 291.238, the amount of moneys necessary to pay re-
funds of the taxes levied  under ORS 321.015 [ (1) to (4) hereby ] and 321.017  is appropriated contin-
uously to the  Department of Revenue from the suspense account referred to in subsection (1) of this
section, and shall be used by the department for the payment of all refunds of taxes levied  under
ORS 321.015 [ (1) to (4) ] and 321.017  that have been audited and approved by the department. Any
penalties, interest and taxes then due from the  taxpayer shall be applied in that order in computing
any refund, and only the balance due the taxpayer, if any, shall be  refunded. The department shall
on its records charge each refund against the revenue from  the tax with respect to which the refund
is made.
SECTION 6.  ORS 526.274 is amended to read:
526.274. In furtherance of the policy established in ORS 526.271,  the State Board of Forestry, in
consultation with the Governor, may:
(1) In conformance  with federal law, including Public Law 108-7, direct the State Forester to
facilitate the development of stewardship contracts utilizing private  contractors and, when appro-
priate, to seek and enter into a stewardship  contract agreement with federal agencies to carry out
forest management activities on federal lands. The State Forester may, under the stewardship con-
tract  agreements:
(a) Perform road and trail maintenance;
(b) Set prescribed fires to improve forest health, composition, structure and condition;
(c) Manage vegetation;
(d) Perform watershed restoration and maintenance;
(e) Restore wildlife habitat;
(f) Control exotic weeds and species; and
(g) Perform other activities related to stewardship.
(2) Create a forum for interagency cooperation and collaborative  public involvement regarding
federal forest management issues that may include, at the discretion of  the board, the appointment
of advisory committees, the use  of existing advisory committees and procedures for holding public
hearings.
(3) Provide guidelines for  the State Forestry Department and State Forester to follow that con-
tain directions regarding the management of federal lands and that specify the goals  and objectives
of the board regarding the management of federal lands.
(4) Participate, to the extent allowed  by federal law, in the development of federal forest policies
and the forest management planning processes of federal agencies.
(5) Provide guidelines for the department to follow in implementing this section.
(6) Coordinate with Oregon State University, the State Department of  Fish and Wildlife, [ the
[2]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Oregon Forest Resources Institute, ] the Department of Environmental Quality, the Oregon Business
Development Department, the State Department of Energy and other agencies of  the executive de-
partment, as defined in ORS 174.112, to assist  the State Forestry Department in carrying out the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 7.
ORS 321.684 is amended to read:
321.684. (1) The Department of Revenue may:
(a) Furnish  to any taxpayer or authorized representative, upon request of the taxpayer or au-
thorized representative, a copy of the taxpayer’s forest products harvest tax report or  return re-
quired by ORS 321.045 or 321.741 that  is filed with the department for any year, or a copy of any
report filed by the taxpayer in connection with the return.
(b) Publish a list of taxpayers who are entitled to unclaimed tax refunds.
(c) Publish statistics classified  so as to prevent the identification of taxable value or any par-
ticulars contained in any report or return.
(d) Disclose a taxpayer’s name, address and Social Security number or  employer identification
number to the extent necessary in connection  with the processing and mailing of forms for any re-
port or return required in the administration of ORS 321.045 and 321.741.
[(e) Disclose to the State Forester, upon request of the forester,  for the purpose of soliciting nomi-
nations and  recommendations referred to in ORS 526.610, the names of producers meeting producer
class qualifications established under ORS 526.610 who filed forest products harvest tax returns. ]
[(f)] (e)  Disclose appraisal data collected to make determinations of specially assessed  value of
forestland under ORS 321.201 to 321.222 to any  member of a forestland value advisory committee the
department has convened under ORS 321.213.
(2) The department also may disclose and give access to information described  in ORS 321.682
to:
(a) The Commissioner of Internal Revenue or authorized representative, for tax purposes only.
(b) The  United States Forest Service, Bureau of Land Management and the State Forestry De-
partment pursuant to their regulatory programs and for investigative purposes related to timber
theft.
(c) The Attorney General, assistants and employees in the Department of Justice or other  legal
representative of the State of  Oregon, to the extent the department considers disclosure or access
necessary for the performance of the duties of advising or representing the department  pursuant to
ORS 321.045 and 321.741.
(d) Employees of the State of Oregon, other  than the Department of Revenue or Department of
Justice, to the extent the department  considers disclosure or access necessary for such employees
to perform their duties under contracts  or agreements between the department and any other de-
partment, agency or subdivision of the State of Oregon in the department’s  administration of the tax
laws.
(e) The Legislative Revenue Officer or the authorized  representative of the Legislative Revenue
Officer upon compliance with ORS 173.850. The officer or representative may not remove from  the
premises of the department any materials that would reveal  the identity of any taxpayer or any
other person or the volume of harvest and value reported on individual returns and reports.
(f) Any agency of the State of Oregon, or any person, or any officer  or employee of the agency
or person to whom disclosure or access is given by state  law and not otherwise referred to in this
section, including but not limited to the Secretary of State as  Auditor of Public Accounts under
section 2, Article VI of the Constitution of the State of Oregon.
[3]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
(3) Each officer or employee  of the department and each person described or referred to in
subsection (2)(b) to (f) of this section to whom disclosure or access to the tax information is given
under subsection (2) of this section or any other provision of state law, prior to  beginning employ-
ment or the performance of duties involving such disclosure  or access, shall be advised in writing
of the provisions of ORS 321.682 and 321.686 relating to  penalties for the violation of ORS 321.682,
and shall, as a condition of employment or performance of duties,  execute a certificate for the de-
partment, in a form  prescribed by the department, stating in substance that the person has read
these provisions of law, that the  person has had them explained and that the person is aware of the
penalties for the violation of ORS 321.682.
SECTION 8.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]