Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act:
(1) “Apprenticeship training program” means the  total system of apprenticeship that a
local joint committee, as defined in ORS 660.010, operates, including a local  joint committee’s
registered standards and all  other terms or conditions for qualifying, recruiting, selecting,
employing and training apprentices in apprenticeable occupations.
(2) “Clean energy technology company” means an  industrial or manufacturing entity that
develops or produces clean energy products or components that include:
(a) Equipment that produces or stores energy  from the sun, water, wind, geothermal
deposits or other renewable resources, including microturbines  or energy storage systems
and components, or that modernizes or updates the electrical grid in this state;
(b) Electric heat pump water heaters, electric heat pumps and associated heating,  ven-
tilation and air conditioning components for space heating or cooling, electric  stoves,
cooktops, ranges or ovens, or electric heat pump clothes dryers and associated components;
(c) Zero-emission vehicles, as defined in ORS 283.398, including medium-duty or heavy-
duty zero-emission vehicles, or  components, materials or infrastructure to support zero-
emission vehicles; or
(d) Hydrogen produced through electrolysis using:
(A) A renewable energy source, as defined in ORS 469A.005;
(B) Nonemitting electricity that is not derived from a fossil fuel; or
(C) Electricity that has a carbon intensity that  is equal to or less than the average car-
bon intensity of the electricity served in this state in the calendar year in which construction
or expansion of the facility that produces the hydrogen began.
(3) “Community  benefit agreement” means a project-specific agreement, such as a
project labor agreement, as defined  in 48 C.F.R. 52.222-34, for the purpose of creating mean-
ingful employment opportunities for workers in, and maximizing positive benefits for, the
community in which the bidder, proposer or applicant will undertake the project.
(4) “Disadvantaged  business enterprise” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(5) “Disadvantaged worker” means:
[2]
HB 4112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A minority individual or woman, as those terms are defined in ORS 200.005;
(b) A veteran, as that term is defined in ORS 408.225;
(c) A person who was previously incarcerated; or
(d) A person with a disability.
(6) “Employment plan” means an offer from a bidder or proposer in a procurement, or
from an applicant for a grant,  in which the bidder, proposer or applicant agrees to provide
some or all of the following benefits in return for a preference  from a contracting agency in
evaluating a bid or proposal or a preference from a granting  agency in evaluating a grant
application:
(a) To create jobs in areas in which the bidder, proposer or applicant operates;
(b) To pay living wages and provide family health and retirement benefits;
(c) To set hiring and training goals for disadvantaged workers;
(d) To contract with disadvantaged business enterprises;
(e) To invest in apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training programs;
(f) To enter into a high road training partnership; or
(g) To enter into a community benefit agreement.
(7) “High road training partnership” means a collaborative  partnership, within a desig-
nated geographical region of this state and for the purposes of  improving business conditions
for employers within the region and  providing quality job opportunities for workers within
the region, between an employer and a labor organization and any or all of these parties:
(a) An educational institution;
(b) A workforce training provider;
(c) A local workforce board;
(d) A community-based organization;
(e) A service provider;
(f) A labor market intermediary; and
(g) Individual workers.
(8) “Impact lending” means a loan or an investment made with the intent  to generate
positive, measureable social and environmental benefits, in addition to a financial return.
(9) “Living wage” means a wage that is not less than or is equal  to the greater of the
following applicable wage standards:
(a) The living wage standard in the locality or region where the job is performed;
(b) The prevailing rate of wage that  the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and In-
dustries determines under ORS 279C.815 for a trade or occupation in a specified locality;
(c) The minimum wage specified under the federal Service  Contract Act (41 U.S.C.
351-401) for the same or similar job duties in the same locality;
(d) A wage calculated according to the  Massachusetts Institute of Technology living wage
calculator for the applicable region or county; or
(e) A collective bargaining agreement, if applicable, for the job being performed.
(10) “Preapprenticeship training program” means  a program, the nature, goals, methods
and implementation of which the  commissioner specifies by rule, for preparing underrepre-
sented, disadvantaged or low-skilled individuals to  enter and complete a registered appren-
ticeship training program.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services shall adopt rules
under ORS 279A.070  to govern procurements from clean energy technology companies that
[3]
HB 4112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the department conducts on behalf of state agencies under ORS 279A.140.
(2) In adopting rules under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall  solicit
input from and cooperate with other  state agencies with expertise in energy production and
conservation and in reducing or mitigating environmental impacts.
(3) The department’s rules must permit a clean energy  technology company to submit,
as part of a bid or proposal for large or bulk procurements,  a proposal or price agreement
that includes an employment plan in which the clean energy  technology company proposes
to extend benefits to this state or, if federal moneys fund all or a portion of the procurement,
to a state or region within the United States.
(4) Rules the department adopts under subsection (1) of this section  must provide for
giving a preference to a clean energy technology company  that submits a credible employ-
ment plan under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The department may enter into cooperative procurements  and intergovernmental
agreements under which the department conducts  procurements in combination with other
governmental bodies within this or another state as  a market incentive for clean energy
technology companies to  create and retain high-skilled manufacturing jobs. The cooperative
procurements and intergovernmental agreements may require clean energy  technology
companies to submit an employment plan as  part of the clean energy technology company’s
bid or proposal.
(6) All state agencies that are subject  to ORS 279A.140 shall cooperate with the depart-
ment in adopting and implementing the rules described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1)(a) The Oregon  Clean Energy Technology Manufacturing Opportunity
Fund is established in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. In-
terest earned by,  and loan repayments made to, the Oregon Clean Energy Technology Man-
ufacturing Opportunity Fund must be  credited to the fund. Moneys in the Oregon Clean
Energy Technology Manufacturing  Opportunity Fund are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Business Development Department.
(b) The department may establish accounts within the  Oregon Clean Energy Technology
Manufacturing Opportunity Fund to pay administrative costs  and operational expenses or
otherwise to carry out the purposes of this section.
(2) Moneys in the Oregon  Clean Energy Technology Manufacturing Opportunity Fund
consist of:
(a) Moneys that the Legislative  Assembly appropriates for or otherwise transfers to the
fund;
(b) Moneys received from federal, state or local sources;
(c) Gifts, grants or other moneys contributed to the fund; and
(d) Other moneys deposited in the fund from any source.
(3)(a) The department shall develop  a program to award grants, make low-interest loans
and make other expenditures from moneys in the  Oregon Clean Energy Technology Manu-
facturing Opportunity Fund to clean energy technology companies or  an organization with
demonstrated experience in impact lending for the purpose of:
(A) Attracting, expanding and sustaining within this state:
(i) Clean energy technology companies, including  clean energy technology companies
without a prominent existing domestic manufacturing base;
(ii) Early-stage clean  energy technology companies that have a potential to grow into
[4]
HB 4112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
manufacturing operations;
(iii) Mid-stage clean  energy technology companies that are seeking to establish manu-
facturing facilities; and
(iv) Late-stage clean energy technology companies that are seeking to  expand or retool
existing facilities or set up a new manufacturing base;
(B) Fostering quality job creation  in clean energy technology companies that manufac-
ture products or support a supply chain; and
(C) Supporting clean energy  technology companies in this state by funding activities that
include, but are not limited to:
(i) Research for site location and project development;
(ii) Retooling, expanding or building out manufacturing facilities;
(iii) Technical assistance to support clean energy technology companies  in applying for
competitive federal grants for domestic manufacturing;
(iv) Matching funds for clean energy technology companies that secured federal funding;
(v) Research  and development for innovations in clean energy technology manufacturing;
and
(vi) Employee retraining for living-wage jobs.
(b) The department may, in  consultation with the State Department of Energy, identify
additional eligible clean energy technologies that produce or store energy from  renewable
sources or zero-emission sources.
(4) In making grants or loans under this section,  the department may disburse moneys
as a single payment or in multiple payments and may place conditions  for receiving the
moneys in loan or grant agreements with recipients.
(5) The department shall prioritize approval  of grants or loans to clean energy technology
companies and expenditures for projects that achieve  the purposes described in subsection
(3) of this section, with additional preferences  for clean energy technology companies and
projects that:
(a) Have the best opportunities for growth within this state;
(b) Provide local jobs and economic benefits for environmental  justice communities, as
defined in ORS 182.535, and communities that are economically distressed;
(c) Promote the expansion and long-term economic vitality of clean energy  technologies
in this state, contribute  to research and development, enable manufacturing and provide
other critical links to the supply chain;
(d) Promote and extend this state’s leadership in the field of clean energy  technology and
manufacturing; and
(e) Secure supplies for critical sectors of this state’s clean energy technology economy.
(6) In determining recipients for grants and loans and setting priorities under subsections
(3) and (5) of this section, the department may consult and seek the advice  of the Clean
Technology Leadership Advisory Council established in section 4 of this 2024 Act, independent
experts and stakeholders, and other jurisdictions that  have established similar incentive
programs, and shall solicit feedback from communities in  this state that have suffered dis-
proportionately from job losses and environmental or other impacts.
(7) The department shall use  as part of the department’s evaluation criteria for loans and
grants under this section whether a clean energy technology company included an employ-
ment plan in the clean energy  technology company’s application for the loan or grant and
[5]
HB 4112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
shall give priority to clean energy technology companies that do  include a credible employ-
ment plan with the application.
(8) The department shall seek as  contributions to the Oregon Clean Energy Technology
Manufacturing Opportunity Fund federal  and private investments including, but not limited
to, moneys from  United States Environmental Protection Agency Climate Pollution Re-
duction Grants, the federal Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund and other sources.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Governor shall establish a Clean Technology Leadership Advisory
Council within the office of the Governor. The council must consist of the Governor  or the
Governor’s designee and 12 additional members that the Governor appoints with the aim of
representing the geographic diversity of this state and providing the  council with experience
in areas of concern to the council. The members the Governor appoints must include:
(a) One member who represents the Oregon Business Development Department;
(b) One member who represents the Oregon Department of Administrative Services;
(c) One member who represents the State Department of Energy;
(d) One member with expertise in developing, securing  or implementing clean energy
technology or manufacturing incentives;
(e) Two  members who are representatives of clean energy technology manufacturing
firms with headquarters or operations in this state;
(f) One  member with expertise in leveraging and managing public and private invest-
ments for clean energy technology;
(g) One member from a labor organization that  represents regional manufacturing in-
dustry workers with expertise in labor requirements associated with federal funding;
(h) One member who  represents a labor organization that represents workers in building
trades or construction;
(i) One member who represents an organization  with an interest in combatting or re-
ducing the effects of climate change; and
(j) Two members who represent an organization or local government with expertise in
advancing local or regional economic growth and  job creation, the first of which must reside
in a rural region of this  state and the second of which must reside in an urban area within
this state.
(2) The council shall:
(a) Advise and  consult with the Oregon Business Development Department as described
in section 3 (6) of this 2024 Act;
(b) Provide a forum for members of the public and private sectors to discuss clean energy
technology policy, funding needs and opportunities;
(c) Identify, evaluate and recommend policies or other methods of  fostering, attracting
and sustaining clean energy technology companies and  manufacturing operations in this
state, while maximizing  additional benefits, including creating and sustaining living wage or
union jobs, alleviating supply chain constraints and improving access to clean  energy tech-
nologies, supporting technological innovation  and clean energy leadership and diversifying
the economy of this state;
(d) Consider, in developing the council’s advice and recommendations:
(A) Near-term opportunities for this state to  leverage and maximize consumer-facing and
business-facing incentives from the federal Inflation Reduction Act of 2022, P.L. 117-169, in-
cluding, but not limited to:
[6]
HB 4112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) An extension of advanced energy project credit for clean  technology manufacturing
facilities under section 13501 of the Inflation Reduction Act;
(ii) An advanced manufacturing production tax credit for solar panels,  wind turbines,
inverters and batteries, under sections 13502 and 30001 of the  Inflation Reduction Act, in-
cluding investments under the federal Defense  Production Act of 1950, 50 U.S.C. 4501 et seq.,
for domestic heat pump manufacturing;
(iii) Direct loans to retool  or establish electric vehicle manufacturing facilities under
section 50142 of the Inflation Reduction Act; and
(iv) Moneys from the Greenhouse Gas  Reduction Fund under section 60103 of the In-
flation Reduction Act;
(B) Other methods, including, but not limited to,  rebates, tax credits, loan guarantee
programs and public  procurement policies to promote clean technology manufacturing as-
sembly and supply chains in this state;
(C) Opportunities to provide incentives and utilize procurement preferences to  prospec-
tive contractors and suppliers  to create and retain high-skill jobs by, at a minimum, re-
cruiting disadvantaged workers, investing in  preapprenticeship and apprenticeship training
programs and high road training partnerships, providing family  health and retirement bene-
fits, paying living wages and entering into community benefit agreements; and
(D) Costs, savings and benefits of policies  that attract and sustain clean technology
manufacturing firms,  including short-term and long-term economic, job creation, environ-
mental, climate and health costs, savings and benefits; and
(e) Receive testimony, perform research, consult  with experts, review appropriate liter-
ature, consult with representatives from other jurisdictions that have  adopted or considered
similar incentive programs, solicit feedback from disproportionately impacted communities
around this state  and otherwise undertake activities to inform council members related to
the scope of the council’s duties.
(3) The council may:
(a) Cooperate with or join together with other governmental bodies  in the State of
Washington with a similar mission to form a  regional strategy for attracting and fostering
clean energy manufacturing within the region; and
(b) Appoint other members to the council by majority vote.
(4) A  majority of the members of the council constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the council requires the approval  of a majority of the members of
the council.
(6) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make  an appointment to be-
come immediately effective.
(7) The council shall meet at times and places specified by the  call of the cochairs or of
a majority of the members of the council.
(8) The council may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the council.
(9) The council not later than May 31 of each year shall submit a report in  the manner
provided in ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to an  interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly  related to energy technology, with copies to the
Governor, to the Director of the Oregon Business Development Department,  the Director
of the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services and to the Director of the State De-
[7]
HB 4112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
partment of Energy. The report must describe strategies to promote, attract and  advance
clean energy technology manufacturing in this state.
(10) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall provide staff  support to the
council.
(11) Members of the council are not entitled  to compensation or reimbursement for ex-
penses and serve as volunteers on the council.
(12) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the council in the performance of the duties of the council and,  to the extent permitted by
laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice that the  members of the
council consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of this 2024 Act is repealed on December 31, 2033.
SECTION 6. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000 for deposit into the Oregon  Clean
Energy Technology Manufacturing Opportunity Fund established under  section 3 of this 2024
Act.
SECTION 7. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[8]