Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Human Services  shall administer a program to pro-
vide medical assistance to employed individuals with disabilities residing  in this state who
qualify for Medicaid under 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XVI).
(2) The department may not consider an individual’s income or resources  in determining
eligibility for the program described in subsection (1) of this section, and may establish an
age limit to qualify for  the program only to the extent that an age limit is required by federal
law. The department may consider an individual’s income in determining premium  or other
cost-sharing requirements if necessary to administer the program within available funds.
(3) The department shall coordinate benefits available under the program  described in
subsection (1) of this section with an individual’s employer-sponsored health  insurance, if
any.
(4) The department shall seek federal approval necessary  to exclude from consideration
earnings accumulated in a separate account while an individual participates in the program
described in subsection (1) of this section when determining the individual’s eligibility  for
medical assistance under ORS 414.706.
SECTION 3.
The Department of Human Services shall take all  necessary steps to ensure
that the program described in section 2 of this 2025 Act is in operation no  later than July
1, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 163