Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Rural Traffic  Safety Grant Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Rural Traffic Safety
Grant Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated
to the Department of Transportation to implement a rural traffic safety  improvement pro-
gram as described in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The department may apply for, accept, receive and disburse gifts, grants,  donations
and other moneys from the federal government or from any other source to carry out a
rural traffic safety  improvement program. Moneys received by the department under this
subsection shall be deposited in the fund.
(3) The fund consists of the following:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Earnings on moneys in the fund.
(c) Moneys from any other source.
(4) The department, in consultation with the Transportation Safety Committee,  may
award grants from the fund to applicants that comply with criteria adopted by the depart-
ment under section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Rural city” means a city, town or other community  located in this state that has a
population of 15,000 or less.
(b) “Traffic control device” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.540.
(2) The Department of Transportation, in consultation with the  Transportation Safety
Committee, shall establish  a rural traffic safety improvement program. The department may
provide, from moneys in the Rural Traffic Safety  Grant Fund established under section 1 of
this 2023 Act, grants for  projects to install or improve traffic control devices and crosswalks
in rural cities.
(3) The department shall adopt rules specifying the process by which a rural city may
apply for a grant under this section and prescribing the terms and conditions of grants.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3018
SB 445
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(4) A grant may not be awarded from the fund unless the  applicant pledges matching
funds to the project of at least 25 percent of the amount of the grant.
(5) Grants from the  fund are limited to a maximum of $2.5 million per applicant per
biennium.
(6) The department may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Transportation, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000, for deposit in the  Rural Traffic Safety Grant Fund
established under section 1 of this 2023 Act for the purpose of awarding grants under  section
2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[2]