Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 320.305, as amended by section 3,  chapter 102, Oregon Laws 2016, and section
8, chapter 34, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
320.305. (1)(a) A tax of [ 1.5] 1.8 percent is imposed on any consideration charged  for the sale,
service or furnishing of transient lodging.
(b)(A) The tax must be  computed on the total retail price, including all charges other than taxes,
paid by a person for occupancy of the transient lodging.
(B) The  total retail price paid by a person for occupancy of transient lodging that is part of a
travel package may be determined by reasonable and verifiable standards from books and records
kept in the ordinary course of the transient lodging tax collector’s business.
(c) The tax shall be  collected by the transient lodging provider or transient lodging intermediary
that collects the consideration  charged for occupancy of the transient lodging, or a transient lodging
intermediary described in ORS 320.300 (12)(c), as applicable.
(d) The tax imposed by  this subsection is in addition to and not in lieu of any local transient
lodging tax.
(2) The transient lodging tax collector may withhold a collection reimbursement charge of  five
percent of the amount collected under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2.
The amendments  to ORS 320.305 by section 1 of this 2019 Act apply to con-
sideration charged on or after July 1, 2020, for the  sale, service or furnishing of transient
lodging.
SECTION 3.  ORS 320.335 is amended to read:
320.335. (1) All moneys received by the Department of Revenue pursuant to ORS  320.305 to
320.340, and interest [ thereon] on the  moneys , shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be held in a
suspense account established under ORS 293.445.
(2) After the payment of refunds:
[(1)] (a) Moneys necessary to reimburse the Department of Revenue for the actual costs incurred
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4147
HB 3358
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
by the  department in administering the state transient lodging tax, not to exceed two percent of
state transient lodging tax collections, are continuously appropriated to the department .[; and ]
[(2)] (b) [ The balance ] Any amount  of the  moneys received  that is computed on the basis of
1.5 percent shall be transferred to  the account of the Oregon Tourism Commission established un-
der ORS 284.131. The moneys transferred  under this [ subsection] paragraph are continuously ap-
propriated to the Oregon Tourism Commission for the purposes set forth in ORS 284.131.
(c) Any amount of the moneys received that is computed on a basis in excess of 1.5  per-
cent shall be transferred to  the tax collector of each county in which the transient lodging
taxes were collected, in  proportion to the amount of transient lodging tax revenues collected
in the county for the reporting period.  The tax collector shall deposit the transferred moneys
in the county general fund. The moneys shall be used exclusively for  purposes of addressing
affordable housing in the county.
SECTION 4. The amendments  to ORS 320.335 by section 3 of this 2019 Act apply to
amounts of transient lodging  taxes imposed under ORS 320.305 that are received by the De-
partment of Revenue on or after July 1, 2020.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]