Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out
of the General Fund, the  amount of $2,000,000 for deposit in the Wolf Management Compen-
sation and Proactive Trust Fund established under ORS 610.155  for the purpose of carrying
out the provisions of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
The State Department of Agriculture shall:
(1) In consultation  with the Oregon League of Conservation Voters, use moneys deposited
in the Wolf Management Compensation and Proactive Trust Fund under section 1 of this 2025
Act for relocating wolves that have preyed on  livestock to public lands in Hood River County,
Multnomah County and Washington County.
(2) In consultation with the Oregon  League of Conservation Voters, adopt rules that
govern the relocation.
(3) Ensure that a  wolf that has preyed on livestock is relocated as described in subsection
(1) of this section before the wolf is lethally deterred.
SECTION 3. (1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
(2) Any moneys deposited in the Wolf Management  Compensation and Proactive Trust
Fund under section 1 of this 2025 Act that are unexpended  and unobligated on the date of the
repeal shall revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1422