Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2023 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
476.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) The State Fire Marshal Firefighting Costs Fund  is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(b) The  State Fire Marshal Firefighting Costs Fund consists of moneys appropriated by
the Legislative Assembly for deposit in the fund pursuant to section 3 of  this 2023 Act, fed-
eral grant funds received by the Department of the State Fire Marshal from the  Federal
Emergency Management Agency, and other moneys appropriated,  allocated, deposited or
transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
(c) Moneys in the  fund are continuously appropriated to the department for eligible
firefighting costs incurred by the department and reimbursements pursuant to ORS 476.560.
(d) Expenditures from the fund shall not be considered as a budget item on which  a
limitation is otherwise fixed by law, but shall be in addition to any  specific biennial appro-
priations or amounts authorized to be expended from continuously appropriated  moneys for
any biennial period.
(2) As used in this section, “eligible  firefighting costs” means expenses incurred for re-
sponding to wildfires in Oregon and pre-positioning activities.
SECTION 3. (1) In each biennium, the Department of the State  Fire Marshal shall, in its
agency request budget filed under ORS  291.208, request an appropriation for deposit in the
State Fire Marshal Firefighting Costs Fund in an amount equal to  twice the average annual
expenditures by  the department for eligible firefighting costs and reimbursements pursuant
to ORS 476.560 in the previous five years.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 530
HB 3484
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
(2) Each biennium, the Legislative Assembly  shall appropriate moneys for deposit in the
fund in an amount not less than the  amount requested by the department under subsection
(1) of this section.
(3) On July 1 of each  odd-numbered year, the department shall cause the balance of the
fund to be transferred to the General Fund for general governmental purposes.
(4) As used in this section, “eligible firefighting costs”  has the meaning given that term
in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4.
On or before March 31 of each odd-numbered year, the Department  of the
State Fire Marshal shall report to the standing  or interim Joint Committee on Ways and
Means on the following matters:
(1) The amounts deposited in the  State Fire Marshal Firefighting Costs Fund, from any
source, within the current biennium;
(2) Actual and anticipated expenditures from the fund within the current biennium; and
(3) The anticipated amount to be transferred to the General Fund on the  following July
1 pursuant to section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, the Legislative Assembly  shall ap-
propriate moneys for deposit in the State Fire  Marshal Firefighting Costs Fund in an amount
equal to  twice the average annual expenditures by the Department of the State Fire Marshal
for eligible firefighting costs  as defined in section 2 of this 2023 Act, and for reimbursements
pursuant to ORS 476.560, in the previous five years.
SECTION 6. Section 5 of this 2023 Act is repealed on June 30, 2025.
SECTION 7.  ORS 476.055 is amended to read:
476.055. (1) All moneys received by the Department of  the State Fire Marshal shall be paid into
the State Treasury, and shall be placed by the State Treasurer to the credit of the  State Fire Mar-
shal Fund, except those moneys received and accounted for  under the provisions of ORS 279A.290
and sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act .
(2) Except as otherwise provided by this section, moneys in the State Fire Marshal Fund shall
be available and constitute a continuing appropriation for the payment of  any expense of the de-
partment and for the payment of expenses of the Department of Public Safety Standards  and Train-
ing and the Board on Public  Safety Standards and Training relating to training programs concerning
fire services and accreditation of fire service professionals. The  Department of the State Fire Mar-
shal shall keep on file an itemized statement of all expenses incurred by the  department and shall
approve all disbursements as submitted for  payment. Administrative expenditures made from the
State Fire Marshal Fund shall not exceed a reasonable amount for the services performed.
SECTION 8. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]