Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ELECTION WORKER PARTY AFFILIATION
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 246.
SECTION 2. (1) If volunteers are included in the composition of a board or other entity
established by the county clerk for the purpose of assisting  the county clerk in fulfilling one
or more official duties, the county  clerk shall ensure that the board or other entity contains
an equal number of volunteers affiliated with each major political party.
(2) As used in this section, “major political party” has the meaning given that  term in
ORS 254.005.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 254.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3904
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 4.
(1) Ballots from  an official ballot drop site designated under ORS 254.470 may
be collected only by a team consisting of two or more election workers. Each  team of
election workers must include  an equal number of individuals affiliated with each major
political party.
(2) As used in this section, “election worker” has the meaning given that term in  ORS
247.965.
POLITICAL CONTRIBUTIONS BY CERTAIN ENTITIES
SECTION 5. Section 6 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 260.
SECTION 6. (1) A not-for-profit corporation that is tax exempt under section  501(c) of
the Internal Revenue Code may not make  a contribution, including but not limited to a
monetary contribution or an in-kind contribution, directly or indirectly from any treasury
funds to  a candidate or political committee during a biennium in which the not-for-profit
corporation directly receives moneys from the state.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Contributions organized exclusively to support or oppose a ballot measure;
(b) Communications on any subject by the not-for-profit corporation to the shareholders
and executive or administrative personnel of the corporation and  the families of the share-
holders and executive or administrative personnel of the corporation; and
(c) Nonpartisan registration and get-out-the-vote campaigns by the not-for-profit corpo-
ration that are aimed at the shareholders  and executive or administrative personnel of the
corporation and the families of the shareholders and executive or administrative personnel
of the corporation.
(3) The Secretary of State may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Moneys” includes moneys that are appropriated by the Legislative Assembly for  al-
location to, and that are received by, a not-for-profit corporation.
(b) “State” means state government as defined in ORS 174.111.
INACTIVE VOTERS
SECTION 7.
 ORS 254.411 is amended to read:
254.411. (1) Any elector whose name has been changed may vote once in the county  in which
the elector is registered under the elector’s former name.
(2) Following the election, the registration of the elector shall be considered  inactive. [ The
provisions of ORS 247.281 apply to an elector whose registration becomes inactive under this section. ]
(3) In order to vote at subsequent elections the elector whose name  has changed must update
the elector’s registration.
SECTION 8.  ORS 254.431 is amended to read:
254.431. (1) If a ballot is challenged because it is returned in an unsigned return identification
envelope or because the signature of  an elector on a return identification envelope does not match
the signature in the voter registration record for the elector,  the county clerk shall mail to the
elector a notice that describes the  nature of the challenge. The Secretary of State shall design a
standard form to be used in all notifications sent by county clerks under this subsection.
[2]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2)(a) In order for the vote of  the elector to be counted, the elector must provide evidence suf-
ficient to disprove the challenge not later than the 21st calendar day after the date of  the election.
In the  case of an unsigned return identification envelope, providing sufficient evidence may include
completing a certified statement on a form provided by the county clerk. The Secretary  of State
shall design a standard form to be used for certified statements made under this paragraph.
(b) If the elector does not provide evidence sufficient to disprove a challenge alleging that  the
signature of the elector on  a return identification envelope does not match the signature in the
voter registration record for the elector by the 21st calendar day after the date of  the election, the
registration of the elector shall be considered inactive.
(3)(a) The filing officer may not release  as a public record any information that could be used
to identify an elector whose  ballot has been challenged under this section until the 15th calendar
day after the date of an election.
(b) Following the 14th calendar day after the date of an election, the filing officer may  disclose
as a  public record under ORS 192.311 to 192.478 the following information about each elector whose
ballot was challenged under this section:
(A) The name of the elector;
(B) The residence addresses of the elector; and
(C) The reason the elector’s ballot is being challenged.
[(4) The provisions of ORS 247.281 apply to an elector whose  registration becomes inactive under
this section. ]
[(5)] (4) As used in this section, “filing officer” means:
(a) The Secretary of State,  for federal or statewide elections and for elections to the office of
state Senator or Representative; or
(b) The county clerk, for county, city or district elections.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 247.013 is amended to read:
247.013. (1) A qualified person shall be considered registered to vote in a county  when the
person’s first registration in the county occurs as described in ORS 247.012.
(2) An elector who changes residence address from the county in which the elector is  registered
to a different county within the state, in order to vote in an election,  must be an elector registered
in the county in which the new residence address of the elector is located.
(3) If there is a change in any information required for registration under this chapter, and the
elector has not changed residence address to another county,  the registration of the elector may be
updated as provided in this chapter.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if an elector changes residence ad-
dress from the county in which the elector is registered to a different county  within the state, the
elector need not register again if the registration of the elector is updated.
(5) If the county clerk does not have evidence of a change  in any information required for reg-
istration under this chapter for an elector, the registration of the elector shall be considered active.
(6) The registration of an elector shall be considered inactive if:
(a) The  county clerk has received evidence that there has been a change in the information re-
quired for registration under this chapter  or the elector has neither voted nor  updated the
registration for a period of four or more years ; and
(b) The county clerk has mailed the notice described in ORS 247.563.
(7) The registration of an elector shall not be moved  to an inactive file during the 60-day
period prior to any election because the elector has neither voted nor  updated the registra-
[3]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion for a period of four or more years.
[(7)] (8) The inactive registration of an elector  must be updated before the elector may vote in
an election.
BALLOT ENVELOPES
SECTION 10.
 ORS 254.470 is amended to read:
254.470. (1) The Secretary of State by rule shall establish requirements  and criteria for the
designation of places of deposit for the ballots cast in an election. The rules shall also specify the
dates and times the places of deposit must be open  and the security requirements for the places of
deposit. At a minimum, the places designated under this section shall be  open on the date of the
election for a period of eight or more hours,  but must be open until at least 8 p.m. At each place
of deposit  designated under this section, the county clerk shall prominently display a sign stating
that the location is an official ballot drop site.
(2)(a)(A) Except as provided in paragraphs (b)  to [ (e)] (d) of this subsection, the county clerk
shall mail  by nonforwardable mail an official ballot with a return identification envelope and a se-
crecy  envelope  not sooner than the 20th day before the date of an election and not later than the
14th day before the date of the election, to each active elector  of the electoral district as of the 21st
day before the date of the election.
(B) A ballot envelope used by  the county clerk to mail a ballot to an active elector under
this paragraph may not contain any  outward identifier, including any numeric code, that
would allow an individual to know the political party affiliation, if any, of the active  elector
receiving the ballot.
(C) A return identification envelope mailed to an  active elector under this paragraph may
not contain any outward identifier, including any numeric code, that would allow  an individ-
ual to know the political party affiliation, if any, of the active elector returning the ballot.
(b) If the county clerk determines that an active elector of the electoral district  as of the 21st
day before the date of the election does not receive daily mail service from the United  States Postal
Service, the county clerk shall mail by  nonforwardable mail an official ballot with a return iden-
tification envelope and a secrecy envelope to the elector not sooner than the 20th  day before the
date of an election and not later than the 18th day before the date of the election.
(c) In the case of ballots to be mailed to addresses outside this state to electors who are not
military or overseas electors, the county clerk may mail the ballots not sooner than  the 29th day
before the date of the election.
(d) If an active elector of  the electoral district requests an absentee ballot because the elector
will be absent from the electoral district during the period of time described in paragraph (a)  of this
subsection, the county clerk may, if the elector’s ballot is available:
(A) Allow the elector to receive the elector’s ballot in person at the office of  the county clerk
not sooner than the 43rd day before the date of the election; or
(B) Mail  by nonforwardable mail an official ballot with a return identification envelope and a
secrecy envelope to the elector not sooner than the 43rd day before the date of the election.
[(e) The county clerk is  not required to mail a secrecy envelope under this subsection if the Secre-
tary of  State has approved a different procedure under ORS 254.458 that provides substantially the
same degree of secrecy. ]
(3) For an election held on the date of a primary election:
[4]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The county clerk shall mail the official ballot of a major political party  to each elector who
is registered as being affiliated with the major political party as of  the 21st day before the date of
the election.
(b) The county clerk shall mail the official ballot of a major  political party to an elector not
affiliated with any political party if the elector has applied for the ballot as provided in this  sub-
section and that  party has provided under ORS 254.365 for a primary election that admits electors
not affiliated with any political party.
(c) An elector not affiliated with any political party who wishes to vote  in the primary election
of a major political party shall apply to the county clerk in writing. The application must be com-
pleted, signed and submitted by the elector electronically, in  person or by mail, in a manner deter-
mined by the secretary by rule and must indicate which major political party ballot the  elector
wishes to  receive. Except for electors described in subsection (4) of this section, and subject to ORS
247.203, the application must be  received by the county clerk not later than 5 p.m. of the 21st day
before the date of the election.
(d) If the primary election ballot includes city, county or nonpartisan offices or  measures, the
county clerk shall mail to each elector who is  not eligible to vote for party candidates a ballot
limited to those offices and measures for which the elector is eligible to vote.
(4)[(a)] For each elector who updates a voter registration  after the deadline in ORS 247.025, the
county clerk shall make the official ballot, the return identification  envelope and the secrecy en-
velope available either by mail or at the county clerk’s  office or at another place designated by the
county clerk. An elector to  whom this subsection applies must request a ballot from the county
clerk.
[(b) The  county clerk is not required to make available a secrecy envelope under this subsection if
the Secretary of State has approved a different procedure under ORS 254.458 that  provides substan-
tially the same degree of secrecy. ]
(5) The ballot shall contain the following warning:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Any person who, by use  of force or other means, unduly influences an elector to vote in any
particular manner or to refrain from voting is subject to a fine.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(6)(a) Upon receipt of any ballot described in this section, the elector shall mark the ballot,  sign
the return identification envelope supplied with  the ballot and comply with the instructions provided
with the ballot.
(b) The elector may return the marked ballot to the county  clerk by United States mail or by
depositing the ballot at  the office of the county clerk, at any place of deposit designated by the
county clerk or at any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474.
(c) The ballot must be returned in the return identification envelope.
(d) Subject to paragraph (e) of this subsection, if a  person returns a ballot for an elector  in the
manner permitted under section 13 of this 2025 Act , the person shall deposit the ballot in a
manner described  in paragraph (b) of this subsection not later than two days after receiving the
ballot.
(e) [ If the elector deposits the ballot at the office of the county clerk,  at any place of deposit des-
ignated by  the county clerk or at any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474, the ] A  ballot must
[5]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be received at  the office of the county clerk, at the designated place of deposit or at any location
described in ORS 254.472  or 254.474 not later than the end of the period determined under sub-
section (1) of this section on the date of the election. [ If the elector returns the ballot by mail: ]
[(A) The ballot must be received at  the office of the county clerk not later than the end of the period
determined under subsection (1) of this section on the date of the election; or ]
[(B) The ballot must: ]
[(i) Have a postal indicator showing that the  ballot was mailed not later than the date of the
election; and]
[(ii) Be received at the office of the  county clerk not later than seven calendar days after the date
of the election. ]
[(f) If  a county clerk receives a marked ballot for an elector who does not reside in the clerk’s
county, the ballot shall be forwarded to the county clerk of the county in which the elector  resides not
later than the eighth day after the election. ]
[(7) The following shall appear on the return identification envelope: ]
[(a) Space for the elector to sign the envelope. ]
[(b) A notice designed by rule by the Secretary of State, in consultation with the county  clerks,
explaining that by signing the ballot the  elector is attesting under penalty of perjury that the ballot
was mailed no later than the date of the election. ]
[(c) A  summary of the applicable penalties for knowingly making a false statement, oath or affidavit
under the election laws. ]
[(8) If the elector returns the ballot by mail, and a postal indicator is not present  or legible, the
ballot shall be considered to be mailed  on the date of the election and may be counted if the ballot is
received no later than seven calendar days after the election. ]
[(9)] (7) An elector may obtain a replacement ballot if the ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost or
not received by the elector. Replacement ballots shall be issued and processed as described  in this
section and ORS 254.480. The county clerk shall keep a record of each replacement ballot  provided
under this subsection. Notwithstanding  any deadline for mailing ballots in subsection (2) of this
section, a replacement ballot may be mailed, made available in the office of the county clerk or made
available at one central location in the electoral  district in which the election is conducted. The
county clerk shall designate the central location. A  replacement ballot need not be mailed after the
fifth day before the date of the election.
[(10)] (8) A ballot shall be counted only if:
(a) It is returned in the return identification envelope;
(b) The envelope is signed by the elector to whom the ballot is issued,  unless a certified state-
ment is submitted under ORS 254.431; and
(c) The signature is verified as provided in subsection [ (11)] (9) of this section.
[(11)] (9) The county clerk shall  verify the signature of each elector on the return identification
envelope with the signature on the elector’s registration record, according to the procedure provided
by rules adopted by the Secretary of State. Rules adopted by the secretary under this subsection
must limit personnel authorized to verify  signatures to the personnel authorized to count ballots
under ORS 254.476. If the county clerk determines that an elector to whom a  replacement ballot has
been issued has voted more  than once, the county clerk shall count only one ballot cast by that
elector.
[(12)] (10) At 8 p.m. on election  day, electors who are at the county clerk’s office, a place of
deposit designated under subsection (1) of this  section or any location described in ORS 254.472 or
[6]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
254.474 and who are in line waiting to vote or deposit a voted ballot shall be considered to have
begun the act of voting.
[(13)(a)(A)] (11)(a)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph,  the name of the
Secretary of State may not appear in the secretary’s official capacity  on the return identification
envelope , secrecy envelope  or  on any instructions or materials included with the ballot if the sec-
retary is a candidate in the election for which the ballot is printed.
(B) This paragraph does not prohibit the name of the Secretary of State from  appearing in the
secretary’s official capacity in the voters’ pamphlet.
(b) The name of the county clerk or  other filing officer may not appear in the official capacity
of the county clerk or  filing officer on the return identification envelope , secrecy envelope  or on
any instructions  or materials included with the ballot if the county clerk or filing officer is a can-
didate in the election for which the ballot is printed.
(c) As used in this subsection, “filing officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 254.165.
[(14) As used in this section, “postal indicator” means a postmark or other indicator  on a mailed
ballot, identified by the Secretary of  State by rule, that demonstrates the date or time at which a ballot
was mailed.]
SECTION 11.
 ORS 253.065 is amended to read:
253.065. (1) For electors with  mailing addresses outside this state, the county clerk shall deliver
a ballot:
(a) Not later than the 45th day before the election to each military or overseas elector; and
(b) Not  sooner than the 29th day before the election to each absent elector with a mailing ad-
dress outside this state who is not a military or overseas elector.
(2) The clerk shall deliver with the ballot  instructions for marking and returning the ballot, a
return identification envelope and[ , if used, ] a secrecy envelope. Except  as provided in subsection
(3) of this section, the return identification envelope must contain:
(a) A statement and  space for the elector to sign the envelope[ .], stating that the elector:
(A) Is qualified to vote;
(B) Unless prevented by physical disability, has personally marked the ballot; and
(C) Has not unnecessarily exhibited the marked ballot to any other person; and
[(b) A notice designed by rule by the Secretary of State, in consultation with the county  clerks,
explaining that by signing the ballot the  elector is attesting under penalty of perjury that the ballot
was mailed no later than the date of the election. ]
[(c)] (b) A summary of the applicable penalties for knowingly making a false statement, oath or
affidavit under the election laws.
(3) For a military or overseas elector as defined  in ORS 253.501, the return identification en-
velope provided under subsection (2) of this section must contain:
(a) Any  information that a military or overseas elector is required to sign under the federal Help
America Vote Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252) or other federal law;  and
(b) Space for the elector to sign  the envelope. [; and ]
[(c) To  the extent not required under paragraph (a) of this subsection, a notice designed by rule
by the Secretary of State that ensures that  any military or overseas elector who returns a ballot by
mail makes a legally binding assertion that the  ballot was mailed no later than the date of the
election.]
(4)(a) A ballot envelope used by  the county clerk to mail a ballot to an elector under this
section may not contain any  outward identifier, including any numeric code, that would allow
[7]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
an individual to know the political party affiliation, if any, of the elector receiving the ballot.
(b) A return identification  envelope mailed to an elector under this section may not
contain any outward identifier, including any numeric code,  that would allow an individual
to know the political party affiliation, if any, of the elector returning the ballot.
[(4)] (5) An absent elector may obtain a replacement ballot if the ballot delivered under this
section is destroyed,  spoiled, lost or not received by the elector. The county clerk shall keep a re-
cord of each replacement ballot provided under this subsection.
[(5)] (6) A replacement  ballot provided under subsection [ (4)] (5) of this section may be mailed
or shall be made available in the office of the county clerk.
[(6)] (7) If the county clerk determines  that an absent elector to whom a replacement ballot has
been issued at the request of the elector has voted more than once, the county clerk shall count only
the first ballot received  by the clerk and provide the elector’s name to the Secretary of State for
further review. If the  county clerk is required to reissue ballots due to a change on the ballot for
any reason, that ballot shall be counted in lieu of any previous ballot issued unless:
(a) Only the original ballot was voted and returned; or
(b) The county clerk issued a supplemental ballot that is not a complete  replacement of the or-
iginal ballot.
RETURNED BALLOTS
SECTION 12.
Section 13 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 254.
SECTION 13. (1) Each elector must return the elector’s own ballot in the manner pro-
vided in ORS 254.470. Except as  provided in subsection (2) of this section, an individual may
not collect or return another individual’s ballot.
(2) An individual may collect and return the ballot of a different individual:
(a) Who is an elector; and
(b)(A) Who is a relative of the individual who collects and returns the ballot; and
(B) Who is a member of the household of the  individual who collects and returns the
ballot.
(3) An individual who collects and returns the ballot of a different individual under sub-
section (2) of this section must deposit the ballot in the manner described in ORS  254.470 not
later than two days after collecting the ballot.
(4) As used in this section:
(a)(A) Except as provided in  subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, “member of the house-
hold” means any  individual who resides with the individual whose ballot is collected and re-
turned.
(B) “Member of the household” does not include an individual who is not a  relative of the
individual whose ballot is collected, but who lives or works at the same nursing home facility,
multifamily housing facility or encampment as the individual whose ballot is collected.
(b) “Relative” means:
(A) The spouse of the individual whose ballot is collected and returned;
(B) A parent of the individual whose ballot is collected and returned;
(C) Any individual for whom the individual whose  ballot is collected and returned has a
legal support obligation;
(D) Any individual for whom the individual whose ballot is collected and returned pro-
[8]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vides benefits; or
(E) Any individual for whom the individual whose ballot is collected and returned receives
benefits arising from that individual’s employment.
INFORMAL BALLOT DROP BOXES
SECTION 14.
 ORS 260.695 is amended to read:
260.695. (1)(a) If a person prints or circulates an imitation of the ballot or sample ballot:
(A) The imitation ballot or  sample ballot and the back of any return envelope enclosed with the
ballot or sample ballot shall  state the following: “THIS IS NOT A REAL BALLOT. DO NOT USE
TO VOTE.” The statement on the imitation ballot or sample ballot shall  be in bold print that is at
least two times as large as the majority of  the text on the ballot or sample ballot or 20-point type,
whichever is larger. The statement on the back of a return envelope shall be  in bold print that is
at least 36-point type.
(B) The word “UNOFFICIAL” must be superimposed on the imitation ballot  or sample ballot so
that the word extends diagonally  across the ballot from one margin of the text to the other. The
superimposed word may be printed in lighter ink than other text on the ballot or sample ballot.
(b) For purposes  of this subsection, an imitation of the ballot or sample ballot includes an imi-
tation of a portion of the ballot or sample ballot.
(2)(a) As used in this subsection, “imitation  voters’ pamphlet” means a document that imitates
the physical characteristics or appearance of a voters’ pamphlet  or a portion of a voters’ pamphlet
published by the Secretary of State or  county clerk, as defined in ORS 251.005, under ORS chapter
251 and likely misleads or confuses a reasonable person as  to whether the document is an official
voters’ pamphlet or a  portion of an official voters’ pamphlet in the absence of the required state-
ment.
(b) If a person prints or circulates  an imitation voters’ pamphlet, including by electronic means:
(A)(i) The imitation voters’ pamphlet shall state the  following: “THIS IS NOT THE OFFICIAL
VOTERS’ PAMPHLET.” Except as provided  in sub-subparagraph (ii) of this subparagraph, the
statement on the imitation voters’ pamphlet shall be in bold print that is at least 36-point type.
(ii) For an imitation voters’ pamphlet that is circulated  electronically, the statement described
in sub-subparagraph (i) of this  subparagraph shall be in bold print in a typeface of contrasting color
and in a font size that is at least three times as large  as the font size used for the majority of the
text in the imitation voters’ pamphlet.
(B) The  word “UNOFFICIAL” must be superimposed on each page of the imitation voters’
pamphlet so that the word extends diagonally across the imitation  voters’ pamphlet from one margin
of text  to the other. The superimposed word may be printed or displayed in lighter ink than other
text on the imitation voters’ pamphlet.
(3) A person may not do any electioneering, including circulating any cards or handbills, or  so-
liciting of signatures to any petition,  within any building in which any state or local government
elections office designated for the deposit of ballots under ORS 254.470 is located, or within 100  feet
measured radially from any entrance to the  building. A person may not do any electioneering by
public address system located more than 100 feet from an entrance to the building if  the person is
capable  of  being understood within 100 feet of the building. The electioneering need not relate to
the election being conducted.  This subsection applies during the business hours of the building or,
if the building is a county elections office, during the hours the office is  open to the public, during
[9]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the period beginning on the date that ballots are mailed  to electors as provided in ORS 254.470 and
ending on election day at 8 p.m. or  when all persons waiting in line at the building who began the
act of voting as described in ORS 254.470 [ (12)] (10) by 8 p.m. have finished voting.
(4) A person may not obstruct an entrance of a building  in which ballots are issued or a place
designated for the deposit of ballots under ORS 254.470 or any voting  booth maintained under ORS
254.474 is located. This subsection applies during the period beginning on  the date that ballots are
mailed to electors as provided in ORS 254.470 and ending on election day at  8 p.m. or when all
persons waiting in line at the building or location who began the  act of voting as described in ORS
254.470 [(12)] (10) by 8 p.m. have finished voting.
(5) A person may not vote or offer to vote in any election knowing the  person is not entitled
to vote.
(6) A person may not make a false statement about the person’s inability to mark a ballot.
(7) A person, except an elections official in performance of duties  or another person providing
assistance to an elector as described in ORS 254.445, may not ask a  person at any place designated
for the deposit of ballots under ORS 254.470 or at any location described in ORS  254.472 or 254.474
for whom that person intends to vote, or examine or attempt to examine the person’s ballot.
(8) An elections official, other than in the performance of duties, may not disclose to  any person
any information by which it can be ascertained for whom any elector has voted.
(9) A person, except an elections official in performance of duties, may not do anything to  a
ballot to permit identification of the person who voted.
(10) An elector may not willfully leave at any  place designated for the deposit of ballots under
ORS 254.470 or at any location described in ORS 254.472 or  254.474 anything that will show how the
elector’s ballot was marked.
(11) A  person, except an elections official in performance of duties, may not remove a ballot
from any place designated for the deposit of ballots under ORS  254.470 or any location described in
ORS 254.472 or 254.474.
(12) A person, except an elections official in performance of duties or  a person authorized by
that official, may not willfully deface, remove, alter or destroy a posted election notice.
(13) A person, except an  elections official in performance of duties, may not willfully remove,
alter or destroy election equipment  or supplies, or break the seal or open any sealed package con-
taining election supplies.
(14) A person, except an elections official in performance of duties, may not provide  elections
advice or attempt to  collect voted ballots within any building in which any state or local govern-
ment elections office designated for the deposit of ballots under ORS 254.470 is  located, or within
100 feet measured radially from any entrance to the building.
(15)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a person[ , except an  elections
official in performance of duties, ] may  not establish a location to collect ballots voted by electors
[unless:].
(b) An elections official in performance of duties may  establish official ballot drop sites
designated under ORS 254.470.
[(a) The person prominently displays at the  location a sign stating: “NOT AN OFFICIAL BAL-
LOT DROP SITE”; and ]
[(b) The sign is printed in all capital letters in bold 50-point type. ]
SECRECY ENVELOPES
[10]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 15.
 ORS 254.408 is amended to read:
254.408. (1) A person offering to vote and who claims  to be an elector, but for whom no evidence
of active or inactive registration can be found, shall be granted the right to vote in the manner
provided in this section.
(2) Whenever an elector updates a  registration at a county clerk’s office after the ballots have
been mailed under ORS  254.470, the elector shall vote in that election in the manner provided in this
section.
(3) An elector voting under this section shall complete and sign a registration card.
(4)(a)[(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this  paragraph, ] The elector shall insert the
ballot into a small envelope provided by the county clerk and then insert the  small envelope into
a larger envelope.  The larger envelope shall be delivered to the county clerk and shall be segregated
and not counted until the registration of the elector is verified under this section.
[(B) The  county clerk shall inform the elector of any alterations to the process described in sub-
paragraph (A) of this paragraph that are necessary if  the Secretary of State has approved a procedure
under ORS 254.458 to be used in lieu of the envelope procedures. ]
(b) An envelope provided under this subsection must comply  with the prohibitions set forth in
ORS 254.470 [ (13)] (11).
(5) The county clerk shall determine if the elector is validly registered to vote and if the vote
was properly cast. The  ballot shall be counted only if the county clerk determines the registration
of the elector is considered active or inactive.
(6) A  vote shall be counted only if the elector is qualified to vote for the particular office or
on the measure.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 254.478 is amended to read:
254.478. (1) Subject to ORS 260.705, upon receipt of ballots, the county clerk may:
(a) Begin opening return identification envelopes and secrecy envelopes  of ballots [ and any
used secrecy envelopes of ballots ]; and
(b) In accordance with a security plan  approved by the Secretary of State under ORS 254.074,
begin scanning ballots into a vote tally system.
(2) The county clerk may take any other actions that are necessary to count ballots.
PROOF OF CITIZENSHIP
SECTION 17.
Section 18 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 247.
SECTION 18. (1) A person  who is registering to vote in accordance with ORS 247.012 (1)
must provide evidence of the person’s United States citizenship with the registration.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this  section, evidence of United States citizenship
may include:
(a) Any form of identification  issued in accordance with the requirements of the federal
Real ID Act of 2005, 119 Stat. 231, that indicates the person is a United States citizen;
(b) A valid United States passport;
(c) A United States military identification card, together with  a United States military
record of service showing that the person’s place of birth was in the United States;
(d) A valid government-issued photo identification card  issued by a federal, state or tribal
government showing that the person’s place of birth was in the United States; or
(e) A valid government-issued photo identification card issued  by a federal, state or tribal
[11]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
government, other than an identification described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection,
if also presented together with one or more of the following:
(A) A certified birth certificate, including any legal  documentation proving that the
person’s legal name has changed since birth;
(B) An extract from a United States  hospital record of birth created at the time of the
applicant’s birth that indicates that the applicant’s place of birth was in the United States;
(C) A final adoption decree showing the person’s name and that the person was born in
the United States;
(D) A consular report of birth abroad for a citizen  of the United States or a certification
of the person’s report of  birth of a United States citizen issued by the United States Secre-
tary of State;
(E) A naturalization  certificate or certificate of citizenship issued by the United States
Secretary of Homeland Security or any other document or method of proof of  United States
citizenship issued by the federal government under the federal Immigration and  Nationality
Act (8 U.S.C. 1101 et seq.) (1952); or
(F) A United States Bureau of Indian Affairs card number, tribal treaty  card number or
tribal enrollment number.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 247.171, as amended by section 7,  chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
247.171. (1) Except as provided  in this subsection, the Secretary of State shall design, prepare
and distribute state voter registration cards. The Secretary of State shall also distribute  federal
registration  cards.  Any person may apply in writing to the Secretary of State for permission to print,
copy or otherwise prepare and distribute the registration cards  designed by the Secretary of State.
The secretary may revoke any  permission granted under this subsection at any time. All registration
cards shall be distributed to the public without charge.
(2) The Secretary of State shall approve any voter registration application form  developed for
use by [ any] the Department of Transportation under ORS 247.017 or by  any other  agency
designated as a voter registration agency under ORS 247.208.
(3) Each voter registration card designed  or approved by the Secretary of State shall describe
the penalties for knowingly supplying false information on the registration card and shall  contain
space for a person to provide the following information:
(a) Full name;
(b) Residence address,  mailing address or any other information necessary to locate the resi-
dence of the person offering to register to vote;
(c) The name of the political party with which the person is affiliated, if any;
(d) Date of birth;
(e) An indication that the person is a citizen of the United States; and
(f) [ Except as provided in ORS 247.018, ] A signature attesting to the fact that the person is
qualified to be an elector.
(4) Each voter registration card designed by the Secretary of State must  state that evi-
dence of United States citizenship is required for persons who are  registering to vote in this
state and must list examples of documents that are accepted as evidence of citizenship.
[(4)] (5) Any form containing a voter registration  card may also include space for a person to
provide:
(a) A telephone number where the person may be contacted; and
[12]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) If previously registered to vote in this state, the name then supplied by  the person and the
county and, if known, the address of previous registration.
[(5)] (6) A person shall not supply  any information under subsection (3) or [ (4)] (5) of this section
knowing it to be false.
[(6)] (7) A county clerk or other person accepting registration cards shall not request any in-
formation unless it is authorized by state or federal law.
[(7)] (8) [ Except as provided  in ORS 247.018, ] A person shall attest to the information supplied
on the voter registration card by signing the completed registration card.
[(8)] (9) [ Except as  provided in subsection (7) of this section, ] Any completed and signed regis-
tration card described in subsection (3) of this section shall be the official registration card of  the
elector.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 247.012, as amended by  section 4, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
247.012. (1) A qualified person may register to vote or update a registration to vote by:
(a) Delivering by mail, having a person deliver or otherwise delivering  a completed registration
card to any county clerk, the Secretary of State, any office of the Department of Transportation or
any designated voter registration agency as described in ORS 247.208;
(b) Personally delivering, or having a person deliver, the card  to an official designated by a
county clerk under subsection (7) of this section;  or
(c) Completing the  voter registration portion of the application for issuance or renewal
of a driver license, issuance of a state identification card under ORS 807.400 or a change of
address at an office of the Department of Transportation.
[(c) Submitting the person’s legal name, age, residence and  citizenship information and electronic
signature to the Department of Transportation; ]
[(d) Submitting the  person’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship information to the Oregon
Health Authority for use in the Oregon Health Plan; or ]
[(e) Completing a registration card using the electronic voter  registration system described in ORS
247.019.]
(2) If a registration card is mailed or delivered to:
(a) Any person other than a county clerk or the Secretary of State, the  person shall forward the
card to a county clerk or the Secretary of State not later  than the fifth day after receiving the card;
or
(b) The Secretary of State or a  county clerk for a county other than the county in which the
person applying for registration resides, the Secretary of State or county clerk  shall forward the
card to the county clerk for the county in which the person  resides not later than the fifth day after
receiving the card.
[(3) Registration of a qualified person occurs: ]
[(a) When a legible, accurate and complete registration card is received in the office of any  county
clerk, the Office of the Secretary of  State, an office of the Department of Transportation, a designated
voter registration agency under  ORS 247.208 or at a location designated by a county clerk under sub-
section (7) of this section; ]
[(b) On the date a registration card is postmarked if the card  is received after the 21st day imme-
diately preceding an election but is postmarked not later than the 21st day immediately preceding  the
election and is addressed to an office of any  county clerk, the Office of the Secretary of State, an office
of the Department of Transportation or any designated voter  registration agency as described in ORS
[13]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
247.208; or]
[(c) In the case  of a registration card missing a date of birth, containing an incomplete date of birth
or containing an unintentional scrivener’s error that is supplied or corrected as  described in subsection
(4) or (6) of this section, on the date that registration would  have occurred if the registration card had
not been missing the date of birth, contained  an incomplete date of birth or contained the scrivener’s
error.]
[(4)(a)(A)] (3) The county clerk  for the county in which the person resides shall register
the person,  except as provided in ORS 247.125, if [ a] the person’s  registration card is :
(a) Legible, accurate and contains, at a minimum, the [ registrant’s] person’s name,  residence
address, date of birth and signature[ , the county clerk shall register the person. ]; and
[(B) The county clerk shall register a person Pursuant  to ORS 247.018, regardless of whether the
person’s registration card contains a signature, if the person’s registration  card is legible, accurate and
contains, at a minimum, the registrant’s name, residence address and date of birth. ]
(b) Accompanied by evidence of United States citizenship.
[(b)] (4) If the information or evidence of United States citizenship  required under  [paragraph
(a)(A) of this ] subsection  (3) of this section  is missing  [ from the registration card ] or the date of
birth is incomplete, [ or if the signature of a person described in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection
has not been submitted, ] the county clerk shall attempt  to obtain the missing or incomplete infor-
mation from all sources available to the county clerk, including but not limited to  current and pre-
vious addresses and phone  numbers of the registrant. The county clerk may also supply the
registrant’s date of birth from any previous registration of the  registrant. If the missing or incom-
plete information cannot be obtained from sources available to the county clerk,  the county clerk
shall use reasonable efforts to contact the registrant  by phone, mail and electronic mail to obtain
the missing or incomplete information.
(5) If a registration card meets  the requirements of subsection [ (4)] (3) of this section but is
missing an indication of political party affiliation, the  registrant [ shall be ] is considered not affil-
iated with any political party. This subsection  does not apply if an elector is updating a registration.
(6) If a registration card contains an unintentional scrivener’s error,  the county clerk may at-
tempt to contact the person to correct the error.
(7) A county clerk may appoint officials to accept registration of persons at designated locations.
The appointments and locations shall be in writing and filed in the office of the county clerk. The
county clerk [ shall be ] is responsible for the performance of duties by those appointed.
(8) A registration [ card received and accepted ] that occurs  under this section  [ shall be ] is con-
sidered an active registration.
(9) A registration may be updated at any time.
(10) The county clerk shall mail a written notice to each person who  has attempted to
register to vote in this state under  this section. The notice must indicate whether the person
is registered and must be mailed not  later than seven business days after the county clerk
receives registration materials under subsection (1)  or (2) of this section. The registration
of a qualified person  occurs on the date the county clerk mails the notice confirming the
registration of the person.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 247.025 is amended to read:
247.025. To vote in an election:
(1) Except as provided in ORS 247.012 (10),  a person’s registration  card must be received at
an office or location described in ORS 247.012 not later than the time the office  or location closes
[14]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for business on the 21st day immediately preceding the election, but in no case later than  midnight
of the 21st day immediately preceding the election;  or
(2) Except as provided  in ORS 247.012 (10),  a person’s registration card must be postmarked
not later than the 21st day immediately preceding the election and be addressed to an  office of any
county clerk, the Office of the Secretary of State, an office of the Department  of Transportation or
any designated voter registration agency as described in ORS 247.208[ ; or ].
[(3) A person’s registration  card must be delivered electronically as described in ORS 247.019 not
later than 11:59 p.m. of the 21st day immediately preceding the election. ]
SECTION 22.
 ORS 260.993 is amended to read:
260.993. (1) The penalty for violation  of ORS 260.532 is limited to that provided in ORS 260.532
(6) and (8).
(2) Violation of ORS 247.125  (1), 247.171 [ (5)] (6) , 247.420 (2), 253.710, 260.402, 260.555, 260.558,
260.575, 260.645 or 260.665 (2) or (3) involving any action described in ORS 260.665 (2)(d) to (f)  or
260.715 is a Class C felony.
(3) Violation of ORS 260.695 (5) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) Violation of ORS 247.171 [ (6)] (7) is a Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 22a.
ORS 247.019 is repealed.
REPEAL OF OHA VOTER REGISTRATION
SECTION 23.  ORS 247.002, as amended by  section 3, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
247.002. As used in this chapter:
(1) “County clerk” means the county clerk or the county official in charge of elections.
(2) “Elector” means an individual qualified to vote under Article II, section 2, Oregon  Consti-
tution.
(3) “Registration card” means:
(a) A state voter registration card approved by the Secretary of State under ORS 247.171;  or
(b) A federal voter registration application form prescribed  by the Federal Election Commission
pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-31)[ ;].
[(c) An electronic record containing an individual’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship in-
formation and electronic signature submitted to the Department  of Transportation in the manner de-
scribed in ORS 247.017; or ]
[(d) An electronic record containing  an individual’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship in-
formation submitted to the Oregon Health Authority in the manner described in ORS 247.018. ]
SECTION 24.
 ORS 247.014, as amended by section 6,  chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
247.014. In implementing ORS 247.012, 247.017[ , 247.018] and 247.171,  the Department of Trans-
portation [ and the  Oregon Health Authority ] shall take steps reasonably necessary to allow transfer
of voter registration information by electronic or magnetic medium.
SECTION 25.  ORS 247.292, as amended by  section 5, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
247.292. (1) A county clerk shall update the registration of an  elector in the county upon re-
ceiving written evidence from:
(a) The elector indicating a residence or mailing address that is different from the residence or
[15]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mailing address for the elector as contained in the records of the county clerk;
(b) The United States Postal Service indicating  a residence address that is different from the
residence address for the elector as contained in the records of the county clerk; or
(c) The Secretary of State as provided in ORS [ 247.017, 247.018 or] 247.295.
(2) When a county clerk updates the registration of  an elector under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, the clerk shall send a new  voter notification card by nonforwardable mail to the elector as
provided in ORS 247.181. The clerk shall include a notice stating that if the residence address or
mailing address is not correct, the elector must notify the clerk.
(3) An elector is not disqualified from voting due to any error relating to  an update of regis-
tration made under this section.
REPEAL OF ODOT VOTER REGISTRATION
SECTION 26.
 ORS 247.017 is amended to read:
247.017. [(1) The  Secretary of State shall by rule establish a schedule by which the Department of
Transportation shall provide to the  secretary electronic records containing the legal name, age, resi-
dence and citizenship information for, and the electronic signature of, each  person who meets quali-
fications identified by the secretary by rule. ]
[(2) Upon receiving the electronic record  for, and electronic signature of, a person described in
subsection (1) of this section, the Secretary of State shall provide the information  to the county clerk
of the county in which the person may be registered as an elector. The secretary  or county clerk shall
notify each person of the process to: ]
[(a) Decline being registered as an elector. ]
[(b) Adopt a political party affiliation. ]
[(3) If a person notified under subsection (2) of this section does not decline to be  registered as an
elector within 21 calendar days after the Secretary of  State or county clerk issues the notification, the
person’s electronic  record and electronic signature submitted under subsection (1) of this section will
constitute a completed registration card for the person for purposes  of this chapter. The person shall
be registered to vote if the county clerk determines that the person is qualified to vote under Article
II, section 2, of the Oregon Constitution, and the person is not already registered to vote. ]
[(4) A county clerk may not  send a ballot to, or add to an elector registration list, a person who
meets eligibility requirements until at least 21  calendar days after the Secretary of State or county clerk
provided notification to the person as described in subsection (2) of this section. ]
[(5) In addition to providing electronic records to the Secretary of  State under subsection (1) of this
section, the Department of Transportation may  by rule develop, and require the availability or use of,
any form or application the department determines is necessary to ensure compliance with  the voter
registration provisions of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-31). ]
[(6) The Secretary of State shall adopt  rules required to implement subsections (1) to (4) of this
section.]
(1) The Department of Transportation shall make a voter registration card available  to
any person at any  office of the department where a license or renewal application is dis-
tributed or received.
(2) When a person who is at  least 17 years of age applies for issuance or renewal of an
Oregon driver license, as  defined in ORS 801.245, or issuance of a state identification card
under ORS 807.400 or submits  a change of address application form at a department office
[16]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
where a driver license issuance or renewal application, state identification card  application
or change of address  application is distributed or received, department personnel shall in-
form the person that the person may register to vote  at the department office. Department
personnel shall ask the applicant  whether the applicant is registered to vote at the
applicant’s current  address and if the applicant is not, whether the applicant would like to
register to vote at the department office.
(3) Each department office  shall deliver in a timely manner any completed voter regis-
tration card to the county clerk or elections officer of the county in  which the office is lo-
cated. The county clerk or elections officer of the  county where the office is located shall
forward the registration card to the county clerk or elections officer of the county in which
the applicant resides. The county clerk or  elections officer may reject any registration card
in accordance with ORS 247.174. The  Secretary of State shall determine by rule the time and
manner any completed registration card is to be delivered  to the appropriate county clerk
or elections officer.
(4) The department shall develop a driver license issuance or renewal and  voter regis-
tration application procedure, a state identification card issuance  and voter registration ap-
plication procedure and a change of address and voter registration application procedure that
allows an applicant for the issuance or renewal of a driver license, the issuance of  a state
identification card or a change of address to register  to vote by providing the information
required by ORS 247.171 and the information required for the issuance or renewal of a license
or for issuance of a state identification card. The Secretary of State shall approve the  voter
registration portion of each application procedure and change of address procedure.
(5) The voter registration portion  of an application described in subsection (4) of this
section must comply with provisions of the National Voter Registration Act of  1993 (P.L.
103-31).
(6) Information relating to the failure of an applicant under this section to  sign the voter
registration portion  of an application for issuance or renewal of a driver license, issuance
of a state identification card or for a change of address may  not be used for other than voter
registration purposes.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 247.302 is amended to read:
247.302. (1) The effective date of a voter registration updated under ORS 247.292 is the date  on
which the county clerk receives written evidence of the change of residence or mailing address.
(2) The effective date of a voter registration updated under ORS 247.296  is the date on which
the county clerk changes the address information on the voter registration file.
SECTION 28. A qualified person may register to  vote at an office of the Department of
Transportation as provided in ORS 247.017.
RECEIPT OF BALLOTS
SECTION 29.  ORS 253.070 is amended to read:
253.070. [ (1) Upon receipt of  a ballot the absent elector shall mark it and comply with the in-
structions provided with the ballot.  The absent elector may return the marked ballot to the office of the
clerk, by any appropriate means. ]
[(2) If the absent elector returns the marked  ballot by any means other than by mail, the ballot
must be received by a county clerk not later than 8 p.m. of the day of the election. ]
[17]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(3) If the absent elector returns the marked ballot by mail: ]
[(a) The ballot must be received by a county clerk not later than 8 p.m. on the day of the  election;
or]
[(b) The ballot must: ]
[(A) Have a postal indicator showing that the ballot was  mailed not later than the date of the
election; and]
[(B) Be received at the office of the county clerk not later  than seven calendar days after the date
of the election. ]
[(4) If the elector returns the ballot by mail, and a postal indicator is not present  or legible, the
ballot shall be considered to be mailed  on the date of the election and may be counted if the ballot is
received no later than seven calendar days after the election. ]
[(5) If a county clerk receives a marked ballot for an elector who does  not reside in the clerk’s
county, the ballot shall be forwarded to the county clerk of the county in which the elector  resides not
later than the eighth day after the election. ]
[(6) As used in this section, “postal indicator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 254.470. ]
A ballot from an absent elector must be received  by a county clerk not later than 8 p.m.
on the day of the election.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 254.485, as amended by section 3, chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
254.485. (1) Ballots may be tallied by  a vote tally system or by a counting board. A counting
board may tally ballots at the  precinct or in the office of the county clerk. In any event, the ballots
shall be tallied and returned by precinct.
(2) If a counting board has  been appointed, the tally of ballots may begin on the date of the
election.
(3)(a) If  ballots are tallied by a counting board, after the tally has begun it shall continue until
completed. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a  counting board shall tally
without adjournment and in the presence of the clerks and persons authorized to attend.
(b) A counting board may be relieved by another board if  the tally is not completed after 12
hours.
(4) A  counting board shall audibly announce the tally as it proceeds. The board shall use only
pen and ink to tally.
(5) For ballots cast using a voting machine, the county clerk shall:
(a) Enter the ballots cast using the machine into the vote tally system; and
(b) In the event of a recount, provide the paper record copy recorded  by the machine to the
counting board.
(6) A person other than the county clerk, a member of a counting board  or any other elections
official designated by the county clerk may not tally ballots under this chapter.
[(7) The Secretary of State shall  by rule establish a procedure for announcing the status of the tally
of the ballots received after the date of the election. Rules adopted under this subsection must: ]
[(a) Consider the number of ballots being released in relation to the size of the district; ]
[(b) Prioritize voter anonymity; and ]
[(c) After prioritizing voter  anonymity under paragraph (b) of this subsection, prioritize the im-
portance of timely reporting election results. ]
SECTION 31.
 ORS 253.690 is amended to read:
253.690. (1) A military or overseas elector described in ORS  253.510 may cast a ballot using a
[18]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
facsimile machine or by electronic mail as provided  in this section. Notwithstanding ORS 254.470
[(10)] (8), a ballot cast under this section shall be counted only if the ballot:
(a) Is received in the office of the county clerk not later than 8 p.m.  on the day of the election;
(b) Is accompanied by a return identification envelope containing the  signature of the elector
and a signed waiver described in subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) The signature is verified as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(2) Each elector who casts a ballot under this section shall complete and  submit a waiver de-
scribed in this subsection. The  elector shall attest to the information supplied on the waiver by
signing the completed waiver. The Secretary of State by rule shall design the form  of the waiver,
which shall include all of the following:
(a) Space for the elector to provide the elector’s full  name, residence or mailing address, an
electronic mail address, phone or facsimile number where  the elector may be contacted and any
other necessary information.
(b) A waiver in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
I, _____________, acknowledge that by casting my voted ballot  using a facsimile machine or by
electronic mail I have waived my right to a secret ballot.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(c) A statement to notify the elector that the elector’s  ballot will not be counted unless the
elector has complied with the provisions of this section.
(d) Space for the elector to provide the  elector’s signature to attest to the information supplied.
(3)(a) If a ballot is cast under this section using a facsimile  machine, the return identification
envelope and waiver shall also be submitted using a facsimile machine.
(b) If a ballot is cast under this section by  electronic mail, the return identification envelope
and waiver shall also be submitted by electronic mail.
(4) The county clerk shall verify the signature of each  elector on the return identification en-
velope transmitted by facsimile machine or electronic mail under this section with  the signature on
the elector’s registration  record, according to the procedure provided by rules adopted by the Sec-
retary of State. Rules adopted by the  secretary under this subsection must limit personnel author-
ized to verify signatures to the personnel authorized to count ballots under ORS 254.476.
(5) The Secretary of  State shall adopt rules to administer this section and to ensure the secrecy
of ballots cast using a facsimile machine or by electronic mail to the greatest extent possible.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 253.585 is amended to read:
253.585. (1) The Secretary of State may receive ballots from military or overseas electors.
(2) If the Secretary of State receives a  ballot cast by a military or overseas elector, the Secre-
tary of  State shall deliver the ballot to the county clerk or elections officer of the county in which
the elector who cast the ballot is registered.
(3) A ballot received by the Secretary of State under this section not later  than 8 p.m. of the
day of the election  shall be considered to  have been received by the county clerk as described in
ORS 253.070. [ if:]
[(a) The Secretary of State receives the ballot not later than 8 p.m. on the day of the election; or ]
[(b) The ballot: ]
[(A) Has a postal indicator showing that the ballot  was mailed not later than the date of the
[19]
SB 1048
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
election; and]
[(B) Is received  by the Secretary of State not later than seven calendar days after the date of the
election.]
[(4) If a military or overseas  elector returns the ballot by mail, and a postal indicator is not present
or legible, the  ballot shall be considered to be mailed on the date of the election and may be counted
if the ballot is received no later than seven calendar days after the election. ]
[(5) As used in this section “postal indicator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 254.470. ]
SECTION 33.
 ORS 254.458 is amended to read:
254.458. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of ORS 254.470:
(a) A county clerk may apply to the Secretary of State for approval of any procedure to be  used
in lieu of the secrecy envelope procedures described in ORS 254.470; and
(b) Upon receiving  an application under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the secretary may ap-
prove a procedure to be used in lieu of the secrecy envelope procedures described  in ORS 254.470
if the secretary determines that  the procedure will provide substantially the same degree of secrecy
as ORS 254.470.
(2) A procedure approved by  the secretary under this section must comply with the prohibitions
set forth in ORS 254.470 [ (13)] (11).
SECTION 34.
ORS 247.018, 247.275, 247.281 and 254.458 and section 9, chapter 492, Oregon
Laws 2023, are repealed.
SECTION 35. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 36. (1) Section 18 of this 2025 Act, the amendments  to ORS 247.012, 247.025,
247.171 and 260.993 by sections 19 to 22 of  this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS 247.019 by
section 22a of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) Section 6 of this 2025 Act first applies to  not-for-profit corporations that directly re-
ceive moneys from the state during the 2025-2027 biennium.
(3) Section 18 of this 2025 Act applies to persons who register to vote in this state on  or
after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The amendments to ORS 247.171 by section 19 of this 2025 Act apply to  voter regis-
tration cards  designed, prepared or distributed on or after the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section  and to persons who register to vote in this state on or after
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) The amendments  to ORS 247.012 by section 20 of this 2025 Act apply to voter regis-
tration cards received, delivered or completed on or after the operative date specified  in
subsection (1) of this section.
(6) The  amendments to ORS 253.065, 253.070, 253.585, 253.690, 254.408, 254.458, 254.470,
254.485 and 260.695 by sections 10, 11, 14, 15 and  29 to 33 of this 2025 Act apply to elections
held on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 37. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[20]