Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall study how different disposi-
tional outcomes for drug enforcement misdemeanor  charges affect rates of recidivism. The
commission shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS  192.245, and may include
recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  re-
lated to the judiciary no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3253