Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
[2]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
“GREENHOUSE GAS” DEFINED FOR PURPOSES OF
AIR QUALITY LAWS
SECTION 1.  ORS 468A.005 is amended to read:
468A.005. As used in ORS chapters 468, 468A and 468B, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Air-cleaning device” means any  method, process or equipment which removes, reduces or
renders less noxious air contaminants prior to their discharge in the atmosphere.
(2) “Air contaminant” means a dust, fume, gas, mist, odor, smoke,  vapor, pollen, soot, carbon,
acid or particulate matter or any combination thereof.
(3) “Air contamination” means the presence in  the outdoor atmosphere of one or more air con-
taminants which contribute to a condition of air pollution.
(4) “Air contamination source” means any source at, from, or by reason of which there is  emit-
ted into the atmosphere any air contaminant, regardless of who the person may be  who owns or
operates the building,  premises or other property in, at or on which such source is located, or the
facility, equipment or other property by which the emission is caused or from which the  emission
comes.
(5) “Air pollution” means the presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or more air contam-
inants, or any combination thereof, in sufficient quantities and of such characteristics  and of a du-
ration as are or are likely  to be injurious to public welfare, to the health of human, plant or animal
life or to  property or to interfere unreasonably with enjoyment of life and property throughout such
area of the state as shall be affected thereby.
(6) “Area of the state” means any city or county or  portion thereof or other geographical area
of the state as may be designated by the Environmental Quality Commission.
(7) “Greenhouse gas” includes, but is not limited to, carbon dioxide, methane,  nitrous
oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, sulfur hexafluoride and nitrogen trifluoride.
STATEWIDE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION LIMITS
SECTION 2.
ORS 468A.205 is repealed.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2018 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 468A.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section, “statewide greenhouse gas emissions” means:
(a) The total annual emissions of anthropogenic greenhouse gases in this state; and
(b) All emissions of anthropogenic greenhouse gases from outside this  state that are at-
tributable to the generation of  electricity that is delivered to and consumed in this state,
accounting for transmission and distribution line losses.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission shall adopt by rule:
(a) A statewide greenhouse gas  emissions reduction goal to, by the year 2025, achieve
greenhouse gas levels that are at least 20 percent below 1990 levels;
(b) A statewide greenhouse gas emissions limit that, for the year 2035, requires
greenhouse gas emissions to be reduced to levels that are at least  45 percent below 1990
levels; and
(c) A  statewide greenhouse gas emissions limit that, for the year 2050, requires
greenhouse gas emissions to be reduced to levels that are at least  80 percent below 1990
levels.
(3) This section  does not create any additional regulatory authority for an agency of the
[3]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
executive department as defined in ORS 174.112.
JOINT LEGISLATIVE COMMITTEE ON CLIMATE
SECTION 5. (1) There is established the Joint Legislative Committee on Climate.
(2) The joint committee consists of members of the Senate appointed by  the President
of the Senate and members of the House of Representatives  appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives.
(3) The President of the Senate and  the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
each appoint one cochair for the joint committee  with the duties and powers necessary for
the performance of the functions of the offices as the President and the Speaker determine.
(4) The joint committee has a continuing  existence and may meet, act and conduct its
business during sessions of the  Legislative Assembly or any recess thereof and in the interim
between sessions.
(5) The term of a member shall expire upon the date of the convening of  the odd-
numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly next following the commence-
ment of the member’s term.
(6)(a) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing  authority shall make an ap-
pointment to become immediately effective.
(b) When a vacancy occurs in the membership of the  joint committee in the interim be-
tween odd-numbered year regular sessions, until the vacancy is filled:
(A) The membership of the  joint committee shall be considered not to include the vacant
position for the purpose of determining whether a quorum is present; and
(B) A majority of the remaining members constitutes a quorum.
(7)(a) Members of the joint committee shall receive an amount equal to that authorized
under ORS 171.072 from funds appropriated to the Legislative Assembly for each day spent
in the performance of their duties as members  of the joint committee or any subcommittee
of the joint committee in lieu of reimbursement for in-state travel expenses.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, when engaged in out-of-state travel,
members shall be entitled to receive their actual and necessary  expenses in lieu of the
amount authorized by this  subsection. Payment shall be made from funds appropriated to the
Legislative Assembly.
(8) The joint  committee may not transact business unless a quorum is present. Except
as provided in subsection (6)(b)(B) of this section, a quorum consists of a majority of joint
committee members from the House of Representatives and  a majority of joint committee
members from the Senate.
(9) Action by the joint committee requires the affirmative vote  of a majority of joint
committee members from the House of Representatives and  a majority of joint committee
members from the Senate.
(10) The joint committee may adopt rules  necessary for the operation of the joint com-
mittee.
(11) The Legislative Policy and Research Director may employ persons necessary for the
performance of the functions of the joint committee. The director shall fix the  duties and
amounts of compensation of the employees. The joint committee  shall use the services of
continuing legislative staff, without employing additional  persons, to the greatest extent
[4]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
practicable.
(12) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the joint committee in the performance of the duties of the  joint committee and, to the ex-
tent permitted by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the
members of the joint committee consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Joint Legislative Committee on Climate shall:
(a) Provide general legislative oversight of policy related to climate, including  but not
limited to the program established under sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act;
(b) Examine expenditures  and investments of state proceeds from auctions conducted
under section 16 of this 2018 Act; and
(c) Make recommendations related to the expenditures  and investments of state proceeds
from auctions conducted under section 16 of this 2018 Act to the Joint Committee  on Ways
and Means.
(2) In developing recommendations under subsection (1)(c) of this section,  the Joint
Legislative Committee on Climate shall consider the recommendations of the  program advi-
sory committee established under section 8 of this 2018 Act and shall solicit and  consider the
recommendations of the Oregon Global Warming Commission, the Oregon Climate Change
Research Institute and the Environmental Justice Task Force.
GREENHOUSE GAS CAP AND INVESTMENT PROGRAM
(Program Advisory Committee)
SECTION 7.
Sections 8 to 18 of this 2018  Act and ORS 468A.200 to 468A.260 are added to
and made a part of ORS chapter 468A.
SECTION 8. (1) There is  established in the Department of Environmental Quality a pro-
gram advisory committee consisting of 21 members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(a) Five members  who are recommended to the Governor by the Environmental Justice
Task Force;
(b) Two members who represent Indian tribes;
(c) Three members with expertise in  the economic drivers in rural communities in this
state, including one with expertise in agriculture, one  with expertise in forestry and one with
expertise in fisheries;
(d) Three members who represent the interests of business and industry,  including one
who represents covered entities, one who represents small businesses and one who repres-
ents business sectors affected by climate change;
(e) Two members who  represent local governments, including one who represents the
interests of cities and one who represents the interests of counties;
(f) Two members who represent labor unions;
(g) Two members who represent environmental organizations, including one with exper-
tise in climate mitigation and one with expertise in climate resiliency;
(h) One member with expertise in climate science; and
(i) One member with expertise in public health equity.
(2) In making appointments to the committee, the  Governor shall seek to reflect the
geographic and demographic diversity of this state’s population.
(3)(a) The term of office of each member is four years, but a member serves at the
[5]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
pleasure of the Governor.
(b) Before the expiration  of the term of a member, the Governor shall appoint a succes-
sor whose term begins on January 1 next following.
(c) A member is eligible for reappointment.
(d) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment  to be-
come immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) A majority of the members of the committee constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) The Governor  shall appoint one of the members of the committee to serve as chair-
person.
(6) A member of the committee is entitled to actual and necessary travel and  other ex-
penses as provided in ORS 292.495.
(7) The department shall provide the committee with necessary staff support.
(8) All agencies of the executive department  as defined in ORS 174.112 are directed to
assist the committee in the performance of  its duties and, to the extent permitted by laws
relating to confidentiality, to furnish such information and advice as the members of  the
committee consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 9.
Notwithstanding the term of office specified by section  8 of this 2018 Act,
of the members first appointed to the program advisory committee established under  section
8 of this 2018 Act:
(1) Five shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2020.
(2) Five shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2021.
(3) Five shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2022.
(4) Six shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2023.
SECTION 10.
(1) The program  advisory committee established under section 8 of this 2018
Act shall:
(a) Advise the Environmental  Quality Commission, the Department of Environmental
Quality and other relevant state agencies  on the development and implementation of rules
for the program established under sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act; and
(b) Advise the Governor, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the  De-
partment of  Transportation, the Public Utility Commission and other relevant state agencies
on the development and  implementation of rules for the program established under sections
12 to 17 of this 2018 Act and on the expenditures and investments of state  proceeds from
auctions conducted under section 16 of this 2018 Act.
(2) The program advisory committee may conduct studies, request information and  pro-
vide other advice related to the program established under sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act
and the expenditures and investments of state proceeds from auctions conducted under  sec-
tion 16 of this 2018 Act as necessary to provide advice as described in subsection  (1) of this
section.
(3)(a) The program advisory committee shall prepare a biennial report that includes:
(A) The recommendations of the committee for the expenditures and investments of
state proceeds from auctions conducted under section  16 of this 2018 Act that are deposited
in the Climate Investments Fund established under section 26 of  this 2018 Act and in the
Transportation Decarbonization Investments Fund established under section 27 of  this 2018
Act;  and
[6]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The recommendations of the committee, which may include recommendations  for
legislation, regarding the effectiveness of implementation  of sections 12 to 17, 25 to 30, 31 and
32 of this 2018 Act.
(b) The committee shall submit the report required by this subsection to:
(A) The interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to climate, in the man-
ner provided by ORS 192.245; and
(B) The Governor by July 1 of each even-numbered year for consideration  by the Gover-
nor during the preparation of the Governor’s budget.
(Statement of Purposes)
SECTION 11.
(1) The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that the purposes of the
program established under sections 12 to 17 of this 2018  Act and the investments provided
for in sections 25 to 30, 31 and 32 of this 2018 Act are to reduce greenhouse  gas emissions
consistent with the statewide greenhouse gas  emissions limits established under section 4
of this 2018 Act and to promote carbon sequestration and adaptation  and resilience by this
state’s natural and working lands, communities and economy in  the face of climate change
and ocean acidification.
(2) Sections 12 to  17 of this 2018 Act and the rules adopted pursuant to sections 12 to 17
of this 2018 Act:
(a) May not be interpreted to limit the authority of any state agency  to adopt and im-
plement measures to reduce greenhouse gas emissions; and
(b) Shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with federal law.
(Greenhouse Gas Cap and Market-Based Compliance Mechanism)
SECTION 12. Definitions. As used in ORS 468A.200 to 468A.260  and sections 8 to 17 of this
2018 Act:
(1) “Aggregation” means an  approach for qualifying and quantifying offset projects that
allows for the grouping together of two  or more geographically or temporally separate ac-
tivities that result in reductions or removals of greenhouse gases in a similar manner.
(2) “Allocation of electricity” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.518.
(3) “Allowance” means a tradable authorization to emit one metric ton  of carbon dioxide
equivalent.
(4) “Annual allowance budget”  means the number of allowances available to be allocated
during one year of the program established under sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act.
(5) “Carbon dioxide equivalent” means the  amount of carbon dioxide by weight that would
produce the same global warming impact as a given weight of another greenhouse gas, based
on considerations including but not limited to the best available science,  including informa-
tion from the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change.
(6) “Coal-fired resource” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.518.
(7) “Compliance instrument” means  one allowance or one offset credit that may be used
to fulfill a compliance obligation.
(8) “Compliance obligation” means the  quantity of regulated emissions for which a cov-
ered entity must submit compliance instruments to  the Department of Environmental
[7]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Quality during a compliance period.
(9) “Consumer-owned utility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.270.
(10) “Covered entity” means a person that is designated by the Environmental Quality
Commission as subject to the program established under sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act.
(11) “Direct environmental benefits in this state” means:
(a) A reduction in or avoidance of emissions of any  air contaminant in this state other
than a greenhouse gas;
(b) A reduction in or avoidance of pollution of any of the waters of the state, as the
terms “pollution” and “the waters of the state” are defined in ORS 468B.005; or
(c) An improvement in the health of natural and working lands in this state.
(12) “Electric company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(13) “Electricity service supplier” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(14) “General market participant” means a person that:
(a) Is a registered entity;
(b) Is not a covered entity or an opt-in entity; and
(c) Intends to purchase, hold, sell or voluntarily surrender compliance instruments.
(15) “Impacted communities”  means communities most at risk of being disproportion-
ately impacted by climate change  as designated by the Environmental Quality Commission
under section 18 of this 2018 Act.
(16) “Leakage” means a reduction in  greenhouse gas emissions within this state that is
counteracted by an increase in greenhouse gas emissions outside this state.
(17) “Natural and working lands” means:
(a) Land that is actively used by  an agricultural owner or operator for an agricultural
operation that includes, but need not be limited to, active  engagement in farming or ranch-
ing;
(b) Land producing forest products;
(c) Lands consisting of  forests, grasslands, deserts, freshwater and riparian systems,
wetlands, coastal and estuarine areas, watersheds, wildlands or wildlife habitat; or
(d) Lands used for recreational purposes such as parks,  urban and community forests,
trails, greenbelts and other similar open space land.
(18) “Natural gas  utility” means a natural gas utility regulated by the Public Utility
Commission under ORS chapter 757.
(19) “Offset credit” means a  tradable credit generated through an offset project that re-
presents a greenhouse gas emissions reduction  or removal of one metric ton of carbon
dioxide equivalent.
(20) “Offset project”  means a project that reduces or removes greenhouse gas emissions
that are not regulated emissions.
(21) “Opt-in entity” means a  person that is not designated as a covered entity by the
Environmental Quality  Commission and that voluntarily chooses to participate in the pro-
gram established under sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act as if the entity were a  covered en-
tity.
(22) “Registered entity” means a  covered entity, opt-in entity or general market partic-
ipant that has successfully  registered to participate in the program established under
sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act.
(23) “Regulated emissions” means the verified greenhouse gas emissions reported  by or
[8]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
assigned to a covered entity or opt-in entity under ORS 468A.280 that the commission de-
termines by rule are greenhouse gas emissions regulated under sections  12 to 17 of this 2018
Act.
(24) “Surrender” means to transfer a compliance instrument to the Department of En-
vironmental Quality:
(a) To satisfy a compliance obligation or an adjusted compliance obligation; or
(b) On a voluntary basis.
SECTION 13.
Adoption of program; general provisions.  (1) The Environmental Quality
Commission shall, by rule, adopt a program that places a cap on the total  anthropogenic
greenhouse gas emissions by  all covered entities through setting annual allowance budgets
and that provides a market-based mechanism for  covered entities to demonstrate compliance
with the program. In adopting the  program required by this section, the commission shall
set an annual allowance budget for the calendar year 2021,  and a schedule of annual allow-
ance budgets that decline by a predetermined rate each calendar year until 2050. The  sched-
ule of annual allowance budgets must reflect the  total anthropogenic greenhouse gas
emissions from all covered entities as a  proportionate share of statewide greenhouse gas
emissions, as defined in section 4 of this  2018 Act, that must be reduced to prevent
exceedance of the statewide  greenhouse gas emissions limits established under section 4 of
this 2018 Act.
(2) The commission shall designate persons as covered entities as follows:
(a) The commission shall designate a person in control  of an air contamination source
for which a permit is issued  pursuant to ORS 468.065, 468A.040 or 468A.155 as a covered en-
tity if the annual regulated emissions  attributable to the air contamination source meet or
exceed 25,000 metric tons of  carbon dioxide equivalent. The commission shall exempt from
regulation under sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act the  methane emissions from a landfill that
are demonstrated to have been recaptured and used for the generation of renewable energy,
including but not limited to electricity, transportation fuels or heat.
(b) For  the purpose of regulating persons that import, sell, allocate or distribute for use
in this state electricity generated outside this state, and unless the commission determines
that a method exists for regulating persons described in this paragraph  that is more accu-
rate or efficient or that  better enables the state to pursue linkage agreements under section
17 of this 2018 Act, the commission shall:
(A) Designate an  electric company or a consumer-owned utility as a covered entity if the
regulated emissions that are attributable to the generation of electricity for  which the elec-
tric company  or consumer-owned utility is the load serving entity meet or exceed 25,000
metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent.
(B) Designate an electricity service supplier  as a covered entity for the purpose of ad-
dressing regulated emissions attributable to the electricity service supplier.
(c) The commission shall, for the purpose of regulating persons that import, sell  or dis-
tribute for use in this state fuel that emits greenhouse gases when combusted:
(A) Designate a natural gas marketer as a covered entity for the  purpose of addressing
annual regulated emissions that are attributable to the  combustion of natural gas that is
sold by the natural gas marketer for use in this state by  air contamination sources that are
not designated as covered entities under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(B) Designate a natural gas utility as a covered  entity for the purpose of addressing an-
[9]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
nual regulated emissions that are attributable to the  combustion of natural gas that the
natural gas utility imports, sells or distributes  for use in this state and that are not emis-
sions accounted for through the regulation of air contamination sources under paragraph  (a)
of this subsection or natural gas marketers under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) Designate  as covered entities persons not described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of
this paragraph as necessary to address regulated emissions that  are attributable to the
combustion of fuel  that is imported, sold or distributed for use in this state. For purposes
of this subparagraph, the commission:
(i) May exclude from designation as a covered entity any person that imports  in a cal-
endar year less than a de  minimis amount of gasoline and diesel fuel, in total, as determined
by the commission by rule. Gasoline and diesel fuel  imported by persons that are related or
share common ownership or control  shall be aggregated in determining whether a person
may be excluded under this sub-subparagraph.
(ii) Shall exclude from regulated emissions the greenhouse gas emissions  from the com-
bustion of fuel that is demonstrated to have been used as watercraft or aviation fuel.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules for the market-based compliance mechanism  re-
quired by subsection (1) of this section that include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Criteria for the allocation of allowances pursuant to section 14 of this 2018 Act;
(b) Standards, pursuant to section 15 of this 2018  Act, for offset projects and for covered
entities to use offset credits;
(c) Rules for the administration of auctions of allowances pursuant to section  16 of this
2018 Act;
(d) Rules allowing for the trading of compliance instruments;
(e) Rules allowing opt-in entities and general market participants to participate  in the
market-based compliance mechanism; and
(f) Compliance periods, standards for calculating compliance obligations and procedures
for covered entities to demonstrate compliance with the compliance obligations.
(4) The commission shall require a covered entity or opt-in entity to surrender  to the
Department of Environmental Quality a quantity of compliance instruments equal to  the
covered entity’s or opt-in entity’s compliance obligation no later than  the surrender date
specified by the commission by rule or order. In addition to  any penalty provided by law,
rules adopted by the commission may require a covered entity or opt-in entity  that fails to
timely surrender to the department a sufficient quantity of compliance instruments  to meet
a compliance obligation to surrender to the department an adjusted compliance obligation.
(5)(a) All covered entities, opt-in entities and general market participants must register
as registered entities to participate in the program established  under sections 12 to 17 of this
2018 Act.
(b) The commission  shall adopt by rule registration requirements and any additional re-
quirements necessary for registered  entities to participate in auctions administered pursuant
to section 16 of this 2018 Act.
(c) The commission may adopt a schedule of fees for  registration under this subsection.
Fees must be reasonably calculated not to exceed the  costs to the department in adminis-
tering sections 8 to 18 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 14.
Allocation of allowances. (1) The Department of Environmental  Quality
shall allocate a  percentage of allowances from each annual allowance budget to be distributed
[10]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
directly into an allowance price containment reserve  designed to assist in containing com-
pliance costs for covered entities.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission shall, in consultation with the Public Utility
Commission, adopt rules for distributing allowances to covered entities that are  electric
companies and natural gas utilities. Rules adopted under this subsection must:
(a) Require the department  to allocate allowances for direct distribution at no cost to
electric companies and  natural gas utilities and require the electric companies and natural
gas utilities to  consign the directly distributed allowances to the state to be auctioned pur-
suant to section 16 of this 2018 Act; and
(b) Include a methodology for determining the allocation for distribution directly  to cov-
ered entities described  in this subsection that, to the extent feasible, is based on the follow-
ing principles:
(A) The direct distribution to a covered entity during the  calendar year 2021 should rep-
resent an amount equal to 100 percent of the  covered entity’s proportionate share of regu-
lated emissions during representative calendar years prior to 2018; and
(B) The direct distribution received by a covered entity  under this subsection during
calendar years subsequent to 2021 should decline annually at  a rate equal to the predeter-
mined rate of decline for annual allowance budgets adopted under section 13 of this 2018  Act.
(3)(a) The department shall allocate  allowances for direct distribution at no cost to a
covered entity that is a consumer-owned utility. The Environmental Quality Commission may
adopt rules allowing for  a consumer-owned utility to consign directly distributed allowances
to the state to be auctioned pursuant to section 16 of this 2018 Act. Auction proceeds from
the sale of allowances consigned to the state  for auction under this subsection must be used
by the consumer-owned utility for the  benefit of ratepayers, consistent with the purposes
stated in section 11 of this 2018 Act and as further required by  the governing body of the
consumer-owned utility.
(b) In determining the allocation for a consumer-owned utility, the department shall
employ a methodology based on the principles set forth in subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(c) The governing body of  a consumer-owned utility that receives directly distributed al-
lowances under this subsection shall,  no later than September 15 of each even-numbered
year, submit a report to the Joint Legislative Committee on Climate on the  uses by the
consumer-owned utility of the directly distributed allowances. The report  must include, but
not be limited to, a  description of the uses by the consumer-owned utility of auction proceeds
from the sale of allowances consigned to the state for auction under this subsection.
(4)(a) In order to mitigate leakage, the  commission shall adopt rules for allocating al-
lowances for direct distribution at no cost to covered entities that are engaged in
emissions-intensive, trade-exposed processes.  The department shall hire or contract with a
third-party organization to assist the commission and the department in gathering  data and
conducting analysis as necessary to implement the provisions of this subsection.
(b) Rules  adopted under this subsection must utilize an output-based benchmarking
methodology for determining the allocation for a covered entity. The methodology must:
(A) Apply, for  each emissions-intensive, trade-exposed process, an emissions efficiency
benchmark that equals up to 90 percent of the average regional emissions intensity per  unit
of output from that  process, based on greenhouse gas emissions data from representative
years prior to 2018; and
[11]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Require the allocation to a covered entity to decline annually at a rate equal  to the
predetermined rate of decline for annual allowance budgets  adopted under section 13 of this
2018 Act.
(c) The commission shall, by the year 2024 and once every three years thereafter, con-
duct a  review of rules adopted under this subsection and any updated data and analysis to
determine whether updates to the rules are necessary to:
(A) Mitigate leakage by covered entities  engaged in emissions-intensive, trade-exposed
processes; or
(B) Prevent allocation to covered entities of allowances  under this section that are in
excess of the allocation necessary to mitigate leakage.
(d) In addition to and not in lieu  of the review required by paragraph (c) of this sub-
section, the commission may update the rules adopted under  paragraph (a) of this subsection
if a covered entity makes a proposal  to the commission that an update to the rules is nec-
essary to mitigate leakage.
(e) A covered entity that is a fossil fuel distribution and storage facility  or
infrastructure, or an electric generating unit, may not receive  an allocation under this sub-
section.
(5) After making all allocations provided for in subsections (1) to (4) of  this section, the
department shall allocate all remaining  allowances in the annual allowance budget to be
distributed to an auction  holding account for auction pursuant to section 16 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 15. Offset projects. (1) Offset projects:
(a) Must  be located in the United States or in a jurisdiction with which the Environ-
mental Quality Commission has entered into a linkage agreement pursuant to  section 17 of
this 2018 Act;
(b) Must not be otherwise required by law; and
(c) Must result in greenhouse gas emissions reductions or removals that:
(A) Are real, permanent, quantifiable, verifiable and enforceable; and
(B) Are in addition to greenhouse gas emissions reductions or  removals otherwise re-
quired by law and any other greenhouse gas emissions reductions or  removals that would
otherwise occur.
(2)(a) A total of no more than  four percent of a covered entity’s compliance obligation
may be met  by surrendering offset credits. A total of no more than two percent of a covered
entity’s compliance obligation may be met by surrendering offset credits that  are sourced
from offset projects that do not provide direct environmental benefits in this state.
(b)(A) The commission may by rule adopt additional restrictions on the number  of offset
credits that may be surrendered by a covered entity that is  an air contamination source that
is geographically located in an impacted community if:
(i) The geographic area  within which the air contamination source is located is also a
nonattainment area or an attainment area projected by the Department of Environmental
Quality to exceed air quality standards  within five years and the air contamination source
substantially contributes to or causes the nonattainment or  projected nonattainment of air
quality standards; or
(ii) The air contamination source is  individually causing an exceedance of air quality
standards.
(B) Additional restrictions adopted under this paragraph may include,  but need not be
[12]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
limited to,  restrictions that prohibit an air contamination source described in this paragraph
from surrendering offset credits to meet a compliance obligation.
(3) In adopting rules governing offset projects and covered entities’ use of offset  credits,
the commission shall:
(a) Take into consideration standards, rules or protocols  for offset projects and offset
credits established by other states,  provinces and countries with programs comparable to the
program established under sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act;
(b) Encourage opportunities for the development of offset  projects in this state by
adopting offset protocols that must  include, but need not be limited to, protocols that make
use of aggregation or  other mechanisms to reduce transaction costs related to the develop-
ment of offset projects;
(c) Consult with and consider the recommendations  of the advisory committee required
by subsection (4)  of this section, the State Department of Agriculture, the State Board of
Forestry, the Environmental Justice Task Force and other relevant state agencies; and
(d) Adopt by rule a process for the Department of Environmental Quality  to investigate
and invalidate issued offset credits as necessary to uphold the environmental integrity of  the
program established under sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act.
(4) The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall appoint a  compliance
offsets protocol advisory  committee to aid and advise the commission in adopting and up-
dating rules governing offset projects  and covered entities’ use of offset credits. The advisory
committee shall  provide guidance to the commission in developing and updating offset pro-
tocols for the purposes of increasing offset projects with direct  environmental benefits in
this state while prioritizing offset projects  that benefit impacted communities, Indian tribes
and natural and working lands. The director shall appoint at least one member to the  advi-
sory committee from each of the following groups:
(a) Scientists;
(b) Public health experts;
(c) Carbon market experts;
(d) Representatives of Indian tribes;
(e) Environmental justice advocates;
(f) Labor and workforce representatives;
(g) Forestry experts;
(h) Agriculture experts;
(i) Environmental advocates;
(j) Conservation advocates; and
(k) Dairy experts.
SECTION 16.
Auctions. (1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, auctions
of allowances are open to registered entities.
(2) The Department of Environmental Quality shall hold auctions at least annually.
(3) The department may engage:
(a) A qualified, independent auction administrator to administer auctions; or
(b) A qualified  financial services administrator to conduct financial transactions related
to the auction.
(4) The department shall issue notice for an upcoming auction prior to the auction.
(5) The Environmental Quality Commission shall:
[13]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Set an auction floor price for the year 2021 and a schedule  for the floor price to in-
crease by a predetermined amount each calendar year; and
(b) Take actions to minimize the potential for market  manipulation and to guard against
bidder collusion, including but not limited  to specifying as holding limits the maximum
number of allowances that may be held for use or trade by a registered entity at any time.
(6) Reserve auctions of allowances from the allowance price containment reserve shall
be conducted separately from the auction of other allowances for the  purpose of addressing
high costs of compliance instruments. Allowances unsold at  a reserve auction must be made
available again at future reserve auctions. Only covered  entities may participate in reserve
auctions.
(7) The proceeds of an auction shall be transferred as follows:
(a) Auction proceeds from the sale of allowances consigned to  the state for auction shall
be transferred to the electric company, natural gas utility or consumer-owned utility  that
consigned the allowances.
(b) Auction proceeds payable  to the state shall be transferred to the State Treasurer to
be deposited in the Auction Proceeds Distribution Fund established under section 24 of this
2018 Act.
SECTION 17.
Linkage with market-based compliance mechanisms  in other jurisdictions.
(1) In adopting and implementing rules under sections 12 to 17 of this 2018  Act, the Envi-
ronmental Quality Commission and the Department of Environmental Quality shall:
(a) Consider market-based compliance mechanisms designed to  reduce greenhouse gas
emissions in other jurisdictions; and
(b) Implement the program established under sections  12 to 17 of this 2018 Act in a
manner that:
(A) Avoids double counting of emissions or emissions reductions; and
(B) Enables the state to pursue linkage agreements pursuant to this section  with other
jurisdictions.
(2) The commission may not link the  market-based compliance mechanism established
pursuant to sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act and rules adopted under sections 12 to 17  of
this 2018 Act with the market-based compliance mechanism of  any other jurisdiction unless
the commission notifies the Governor that the commission intends to link  the market-based
compliance mechanism and the Governor makes the following findings:
(a) The jurisdiction with which the commission proposes to link has adopted  program
requirements for greenhouse gas reductions, including but  not limited to requirements for
offsets, that are equivalent to or stricter than those required by  sections 12 to 17 of this 2018
Act;
(b) Under the proposed linkage, the State of Oregon is able to  enforce sections 12 to 17
of this 2018 Act against any entity subject to regulation under sections 12  to 17 of this 2018
Act and against any entity  located within the linking jurisdiction to the maximum extent
permitted under the United States and Oregon Constitutions;
(c) The proposed linkage provides for enforcement of applicable laws by the commission
or by the linking jurisdiction of program  requirements that are equivalent to or stricter than
those required by sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act; and
(d) The proposed linkage and any related engagement by the State of Oregon of  an inde-
pendent organization to  provide administrative or technical services to support implementa-
[14]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion of sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act shall not impose any significant  liability on the state
or any state agency for any failure associated with the linkage.
(3) The Governor shall issue findings pursuant to subsection (2) of this section within  45
days of receiving a notice from the commission that the commission intends to link  the
market-based compliance mechanism and shall provide the findings to the Legislative As-
sembly. The  Governor, in making the findings, shall consider the advice of the Attorney
General. Findings issued pursuant to subsection (2)  of this section are not subject to judicial
review.
(Methodology for Designating Impacted Communities)
SECTION 18.
(1) The Environmental Quality Commission, by rule and in  consultation
with the Portland State University Population Research Center, the Oregon Health Author-
ity, the program advisory committee  established under section 8 of this 2018 Act and other
relevant state agencies and local agencies and officials, shall designate impacted  communi-
ties, as defined in section 12 of this 2018 Act, by census tract. The commission shall designate
impacted communities based on a methodology that takes into consideration  geographic,
socioeconomic, public health and environmental hazard criteria. The  commission may desig-
nate as impacted communities areas that include, but are not limited to:
(a) Areas with above average concentrations of low income  households, high unemploy-
ment, low levels of homeownership, high rent burden, sensitive populations or residents with
low levels of educational attainment.
(b) Areas disproportionately affected by environmental pollution and  other hazards that
can lead to negative public health effects, exposure or environmental degradation.
(2) The methodology  required by this section must give greater weight to those criteria
that the commission  determines are the most accurate predictors of vulnerability to the
impacts of climate change and ocean acidification.
(3) The commission shall review and update the methodology required  by this section and
the designation of impacted communities a minimum of once every five years.
(Department of Environmental Quality Program Development Fee)
SECTION 19.
Section 20 of this 2018 Act  is added to and made a part of ORS chapter
468A.
SECTION 20. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any  other fee required by law, and
subject to subsection (3) of this  section, a person required to register and report greenhouse
gas emissions to the  Department of Environmental Quality under ORS 468A.280 shall pay to
the department an annual program  development fee of $  if, for the year prior
to the year  in which the annual program development fee is assessed, the person reported
annual greenhouse gas  emissions attributable to the person that equal or exceed 25,000
metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent.
(2) Fees collected under this section shall  be deposited into the State Treasury to the
credit of  an account of the department. Moneys deposited under this subsection are con-
tinuously appropriated to the department for the payment  of expenses of the department and
the Environmental Quality Commission in developing and  preparing for implementation of
[15]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sections 8 to 18 of this 2018 Act.
(3) A person described in  subsection (1) of this section shall pay to the department the
fee required under this section no later than 30 days after the date  of the invoice issued by
the department for the fee.
(4) The commission may adopt rules necessary  to implement the provisions of this sec-
tion, including but not limited to rules imposing a penalty for failure  to pay, substantial
underpayment of or late payment of the fee required by this section.
SECTION 21. Section 20 of this 2018 Act is repealed on January 2, 2021.
(Auction Proceeds Investment)
SECTION 22. Section 23 of this  2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 23. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Auction proceeds” means revenue  transferred to an electric company or natural gas
utility under section 16 of this 2018 Act from the sale of allowances that the electric company
or natural gas utility consigned to the  state for auction, pursuant to the program established
by the Environmental Quality Commission under sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act.
(b) “Electric company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(c) “Natural gas utility” means a natural gas utility regulated by the Public Utility
Commission under this chapter.
(2) Auction proceeds received by an electric  company or natural gas utility must be spent
within the service territory of the electric company or  natural gas utility and must be used
only for activities that  serve to reduce greenhouse gas emissions, as defined in ORS 468A.005,
or to stabilize or reduce energy bills for customers.
(3) An electric company or  natural gas utility shall use the auction proceeds for activities
that benefit the following customers, in the following order:
(a) Low-income residential customers, including but not limited to  low-income residential
customers that are tenants.
(b) All other customers, including residential customers, small  commercial customers
and energy intensive industrial customers that are not covered  entities receiving allowances
directly allocated at no cost under section 14 of this 2018 Act.
(4)(a) An electric company or natural gas  utility shall prioritize the use of auction pro-
ceeds for bill assistance, weatherization and energy  efficiency measures. Except as provided
in paragraph (b) of this subsection, auction proceeds  returned to customers as bill assistance
must be returned in a nonvolumetric manner.
(b) An electric company or natural gas utility shall  expend a portion of the auction pro-
ceeds received by the electric company or natural gas utility each year to fund volumetric
bill assistance to low-income residential customers.
(5) The Public Utility Commission shall, pursuant to  ORS 756.040 and in consultation with
the Housing and Community Services Department and  the program advisory committee es-
tablished under section 8 of this 2018 Act, adopt rules for the  implementation and enforce-
ment of this section.
SECTION 24.
 (1) The Auction Proceeds Distribution Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Auction Proceeds Distribution Fund shall consist of  moneys transferred to the
[16]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
fund under section 16 of this 2018 Act. Interest earned by the fund shall be credited to the
fund.
(3) Subject to  subsection (4) of this section, the Department of Environmental Quality
shall certify the  amount of moneys available for distribution in the Auction Proceeds Dis-
tribution Fund and distribute the moneys as follows:
(a) All moneys that constitute revenues described in Article IX, section 3a  (1), of the
Oregon Constitution, must  be transferred to the Transportation Decarbonization Invest-
ments Fund; and
(b) Of the moneys remaining after the transfer under paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) Eighty-five percent must be  transferred to the Oregon Climate Investments Fund;
and
(B) Fifteen percent must be transferred to the Just Transition Fund.
(4) The Department of Environmental Quality shall consult  with the Department of
Transportation in determining the amount of moneys to be transferred under subsection
(3)(a) of this section.
SECTION 25.
As used in sections 25 to 30 of this 2018 Act:
(1) “Impacted communities” has the meaning given that term in section  12 of this 2018
Act.
(2) “Metropolitan planning  organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 197.629.
(3) “Natural and working lands” has the meaning given  that term in section 12 of this
2018 Act.
(4) “Regional transportation plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 184.899.
SECTION 26.
(1) The Climate Investments Fund is established in  the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Moneys in the Climate Investments Fund  are
continuously appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services to  be dis-
tributed by the department as provided in this section. The fund shall consist  of moneys
deposited in the fund under section 24 of  this 2018 Act. Interest earned by the fund shall be
credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the  Climate Investments Fund may be used only for projects, programs and
activities that further the purposes stated in section 11 of this 2018 Act.
(3) The  Legislative Assembly shall allocate the moneys deposited in the fund subject to
section 28 of this 2018 Act. Of the moneys deposited in the fund each biennium:
(a) Sixty percent must be  allocated for projects, programs or activities that are to the
benefit of or geographically located in impacted communities;
(b) Twenty percent must be allocated for projects,  programs or activities that represent
investments in natural and working lands; and
(c) Twenty percent may be allocated for any projects, programs or activities  that meet
the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, as further described in section 28 of this
2018 Act, regardless of whether a program,  project or activity funded under this paragraph
is described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(4) Of the moneys allocated by the Legislative Assembly under subsection (3)(a)  of this
section, at least 33 percent  must be allocated for activities that benefit rural areas that are
designated as impacted communities. For purposes of  this subsection, “rural area” means
an area located entirely  outside of the acknowledged Portland Metropolitan Area Regional
Urban Growth Boundary and the acknowledged urban growth boundaries of cities with pop-
[17]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ulations of 30,000 or more.
(5) The department may perform activities necessary to  ensure that recipients of moneys
distributed from the Climate Investments Fund comply with applicable requirements. If  the
department determines that a recipient  has not complied with applicable requirements, the
department may order the recipient to refund all moneys distributed from the fund.  Moneys
refunded pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the fund.
SECTION 27. (1) The Transportation Decarbonization Investments Fund is  established in
the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Transportation Decarbonization Investments  Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in
the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
to be distributed by the department as provided in this section.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys deposited  in the fund under section 24 of this 2018
Act.
(3) Moneys deposited in the fund shall be used only:
(a) For the uses stated in Article IX, section 3a, of the Oregon Constitution; and
(b) For activities that further the purposes stated in section 11 of this 2018 Act.
(4) The  Legislative Assembly shall allocate the moneys deposited in the fund subject to
section 28 of this 2018 Act. At least 60 percent of  the moneys deposited in the fund each
biennium must be allocated for purposes that benefit impacted communities.
(5) The department may perform activities necessary to  ensure that recipients of moneys
distributed from the Transportation Decarbonization Investments Fund  comply with appli-
cable requirements. If the department determines  that a recipient has not complied with
applicable requirements, the department may order the recipient to refund  all moneys dis-
tributed from the  fund. Moneys refunded pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the
fund.
SECTION 28.
(1) Moneys deposited in the Climate Investments Fund and moneys depos-
ited in the Transportation Decarbonization Investments Fund shall  be allocated, where ap-
plicable to the extent feasible, cost-effective  and consistent with law, to support the purposes
stated in section 11 of this 2018 Act and to:
(a) Complement efforts to achieve and maintain local air quality;
(b) Provide opportunities for Indian tribes, members of impacted communities and  busi-
nesses owned by women or members of minority groups to participate in and  benefit from
statewide efforts to reduce greenhouse gas emissions;
(c) Make use of domestically produced products to the maximum extent feasible; or
(d) Promote low carbon economic development opportunities and creation of jobs  that
sustain living wages.
(2) Moneys may be allocated from the Climate Investments Fund for investments that
may include, but need not be limited to, any of the following:
(a) Funding to reduce greenhouse  gas emissions or promote adaptation or resiliency
through energy efficiency and energy conservation in buildings, low-income weatherization
and support of affordable housing that is transit oriented  or located near employment cen-
ters.
(b) Funding to reduce  greenhouse gas emissions through electrical grid decarbonization
efforts, including but not limited to investments in energy generation from  renewable re-
sources, distributed energy resources, transmission and storage  projects for renewable en-
[18]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ergy, demand response, community solar projects  and other community-scale renewable
energy projects.
(c) Funding to reduce greenhouse gas emissions  associated with transportation, including
but not limited to investments in transportation electrification,  transit, fuel and energy ef-
ficiency in vessels powered  by marine engines and roadside landscape management efforts
that promote carbon sequestration.
(d) Funding to support planning or implementation of  planning by local governments and
metropolitan planning organizations  for reducing greenhouse gas emissions or promoting
carbon sequestration, adaptation or resilience, including but not limited  to funding for met-
ropolitan planning organizations to incorporate and implement strategies  for reducing
greenhouse gas emissions in regional transportation plans.
(e) Funding to reduce greenhouse gas  emissions or support adaptation or resiliency
through investments in natural and working lands, including  but not limited to investments
in agricultural or forestry practices that reduce greenhouse gas emissions or promote carbon
sequestration, restoration of tidal marsh or intertidal areas of  estuaries, irrigation efficiency
projects, riparian zone restoration projects and methane recovery.
(f) Funding to facilitate the development in Oregon of clean energy  infrastructure or
technologies, low carbon infrastructure or  technologies, carbon capture and storage or
carbon-free infrastructure and technologies.
(3)(a) In allocating moneys from the Transportation Decarbonization Investments Fund,
the Legislative Assembly shall, to the extent feasible and consistent  with law, seek to invest
in programs, projects or  activities that are consistent with, or that complement, investments
described in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) A project, program or activity that is eligible to be funded by moneys deposited  in the
Transportation Decarbonization Investments Fund may also be eligible to be funded  by
moneys deposited in the Climate Investments Fund for those portions of  the project, pro-
gram or activity that may not be constitutionally funded  by revenues described in Article IX,
section 3a (1), of the Oregon Constitution.
(4) If a construction project is funded in  whole or in part by moneys deposited in the
Climate Investments Fund or  the Transportation Decarbonization Investments Fund, the
primary contractor participating in the construction project:
(a) Shall participate in an apprenticeship program registered with the State  Apprentice-
ship and Training Council;
(b) May not be a contractor listed by the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and In-
dustries under ORS 279C.860 as ineligible to receive a contract or subcontract for public
works;
(c) Must demonstrate a history of compliance with the rules and  other requirements of
the Construction Contractors Board and  of the Workers’ Compensation Division and the
Occupational Safety and Health Division of the Department of Consumer and  Business Ser-
vices; and
(d) Must demonstrate a history of compliance with federal and state wage and  hour laws.
(5)(a) If a construction project is funded in whole or in part by moneys  deposited in the
Climate Investments Fund or  the Transportation Decarbonization Investments Fund, the
state agency charged with administering the funds for the project may require the  use of a
high road agreement or  a project labor agreement if the use of either type of agreement
[19]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
would advance the public interest and be consistent with law.
(b)(A) A high road agreement required under paragraph (a)  of this subsection must be
an agreement among multiple stakeholders that specifies goals for a project or program  that
are related to the quality and accessibility of  economic opportunities provided by that project
or program and that includes:
(i) Strategies for advancing the specified goals based on metrics that may  include but are
not limited to:
(I) Requirements for wages and benefits;
(II) Workforce and business diversity;
(III) Training and career development; and
(IV) Environmental benefits;
(ii) A mechanism for implementing the agreement; and
(iii) A process  for evaluating the progress of a project or program toward achieving the
goals specified in the agreement.
(B) A project labor agreement required under paragraph (a) of this subsection must  be
a collective bargaining agreement with one or more  labor organizations that establishes the
terms and conditions of employment for a specific construction project and that,  at a mini-
mum:
(i) Binds all contractors  and subcontractors on the construction project through the
inclusion of appropriate  specifications in all relevant solicitation provisions and contract
documents;
(ii) Allows all contractors and subcontractors  to compete for contracts and subcontracts
without regard to whether the contractors or subcontractors are parties to  any other col-
lective bargaining agreement;
(iii) Contains guarantees against strikes, lockouts and similar job disruptions; and
(iv) Sets forth  effective, prompt and mutually binding procedures for resolving labor
disputes that arise during the term of the project labor agreement.
(6) Agencies of the executive department as defined in ORS  174.112, counties, cities and
all other public and private entities receiving moneys under sections 25 to 30 of this 2018 Act
shall report annually to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services on the expen-
ditures of the moneys.
(7) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall make an annual report to
the Legislative Assembly presenting the information required by subsection (6) of this sec-
tion. The report must be made to the Joint Legislative Committee on Climate.
(8) If an allocation of  moneys for a particular purpose by the Legislative Assembly under
sections 25 to 30 of this 2018 Act is  determined by a court to be inconsistent with law, the
allocation is  hereby declared independent and severable and the invalidity, if any, of any part
or feature of  the allocation shall not affect or render the remainder of the allocations by the
Legislative Assembly under sections 25 to 30 of this 2018 Act invalid or inoperative.
SECTION 29.
In preparing the Governor’s budget as required under ORS 291.202, the
Governor shall consider the recommendations for the expenditures and investments  of state
proceeds from auctions conducted under section 16 of this 2018 Act that are contained in the
biennial report prepared by the program advisory committee under section 10  of this 2018
Act.
SECTION 30.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services, in consultation with
[20]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the program advisory committee established under section 8 of this 2018 Act, the Department
of Transportation and other interested state agencies, shall adopt rules  as necessary to im-
plement sections 25 to 30 of this 2018 Act.
(2) Rules adopted under this section must include guidelines for agencies that receive
allocations of funds under sections 25 to 30 of this 2018  Act for ensuring that expenditures
of funds allocated under sections 25 to 30 of this 2018 Act comply with all applicable laws.
SECTION 31.
(1) The Just Transition Fund is established  in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Just Transition Fund  shall be
credited to the fund. Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission to be  distributed pursuant to the Just Transition Program
established under section 32 of this 2018 Act.
(2) The Just Transition Fund shall consist of  moneys deposited in the fund under section
24 of this 2018 Act.
(3)(a) Of the moneys  deposited in the fund each biennium, the commission shall set aside
50 percent of the funds in a reserve account.
(b) The commission shall continue to credit the reserve  account in the manner required
under this subsection until the balance in the reserve account is the lesser of:
(A) An amount that, in the commission’s determination, is adequate for the purposes
specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection; or
(B) $2.5 million.
(c) The reserve account shall be maintained and used by the  commission only to fund
programs or activities that provide financial support  for workers dislocated or adversely af-
fected by climate change or climate change policies.
SECTION 32.
(1) The Higher  Education Coordinating Commission, in consultation with
the program advisory committee established under section 8  of this 2018 Act, the Employ-
ment Department and other interested state  agencies, shall jointly establish a Just Transi-
tion Program for the purpose of distributing moneys deposited in the Just Transition Fund.
(2) Moneys distributed through the Just Transition Program shall be distributed to:
(a) Support economic  diversification, job creation, job training and other employment
services;
(b) Provide financial support for workers  dislocated or adversely affected by climate
change or climate change policies;
(c) Provide mental health services  for workers dislocated or adversely affected by climate
change or climate change policies; or
(d) Consistent with the purposes stated in  section 11 of this 2018 Act, provide other re-
lated workforce support to  communities in this state that are adversely affected by climate
change or climate change policies.
(3) The commission  shall seek to develop and implement the Just Transition Program in
a manner that is consistent with and complementary to other local, state and  federal pro-
grams, policies and  incentives that serve to carry out the activities described in subsection
(2) of this section, including  but not limited to activities undertaken by the commission un-
der ORS 660.318. The Just Transition Program may  include, but need not be limited to, a
competitive grant program.
(4) The commission may adopt rules necessary for the administration of the  Just Tran-
sition Program, including but not limited to rules that set standards for awarding grants.
[21]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) A grant program adopted under this section may:
(a) Encourage,  but not require, a grant applicant to provide matching funds for com-
pletion of the project, program or activity for which a grant is awarded; and
(b) Allow a grant  applicant to appeal to the office for reevaluation of any determination
of grant funding.
(6) The commission may perform  activities necessary to ensure that recipients of moneys
distributed from the Just Transition Fund  comply with applicable requirements. If the com-
mission determines that a recipient has not complied with  applicable requirements, the
commission may order the recipient to refund all moneys distributed  from the fund. Moneys
refunded pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the fund.
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REGISTRATION AND REPORTING
SECTION 33.
 ORS 468A.280 is amended to read:
468A.280. (1) [ In addition to any registration and reporting that may be required under ORS
468A.050,] The Environmental Quality Commission by rule  may require registration and reporting
of information necessary to determine greenhouse gas emissions  by:
(a) A person in control of an air contamination source  of any class for which registration
and reporting is required under ORS 468A.050.
[(a)] (b) [ Any ] A  person who imports, sells, allocates or distributes electricity for use in this
state [ electricity, the generation of which emits greenhouse gases ].
[(b)] (c)  [ Any ] A  person who imports, sells  or distributes for use in this state [ fossil] fuel that
[generates] emits  greenhouse gases when combusted.
(2) A person required to register and report under subsection (1)  of this section shall
register with the Department of Environmental Quality and  make reports containing infor-
mation that the commission by  rule may require that is relevant to determining and verify-
ing greenhouse gas emissions. The commission may  by rule require the person to provide an
audit by an independent and disinterested party to verify that the greenhouse gas  emissions
information reported by the person is true and accurate.
[(2)] (3) Rules adopted by the  commission under this section for electricity that is imported, sold,
allocated or distributed  for use in this state may require reporting of information necessary to de-
termine greenhouse gas emissions  from generating facilities used to produce the electricity and re-
lated electricity transmission line losses.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a)  The commission shall allow consumer-owned utilities, as defined in ORS 757.270,
to comply with reporting requirements imposed  under this section by the submission of a report
prepared by a third party. A report submitted under  this paragraph may include information for
more than one consumer-owned utility, but must include  all information required by the commission
for each individual utility.
(b) For the purpose of determining greenhouse gas emissions  related to electricity purchased
from the Bonneville Power Administration by a consumer-owned utility, as defined in  ORS 757.270,
the commission may require only that the utility report:
(A) The number of megawatt-hours of electricity purchased by the  utility from the Bonneville
Power Administration, segregated by the types  of contracts entered into by the utility with the
Bonneville Power Administration; and
(B) The percentage of each fuel  or energy type used to produce electricity purchased under each
[22]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
type of contract.
[(4)(a)] (5)(a)  Rules adopted by the  commission pursuant to this section for electricity that is
purchased, imported, sold, allocated or distributed for  use in this state by an electric company, as
defined in ORS 757.600, must be limited to the reporting of:
(A) The generating facility fuel type and  greenhouse gas emissions emitted from generating
facilities owned or operated by the electric company;
(B) The megawatt-hours of electricity generated by the electric company for  use in this
state;
[(B)] (C) Greenhouse gas emissions  emitted from transmission equipment owned or operated by
the electric company;
[(C)] (D)  The number of megawatt-hours of electricity  purchased by the electric company for use
in this state, including information, if known, on:
(i) The seller of the electricity to the electric company; and
(ii) The original generating facility fuel type or types; and
[(D)] (E)  An estimate of the amount of  greenhouse gas emissions[ , using default greenhouse gas
emissions factors established by the commission by rule, ] attributable to:
(i) Electricity purchases made by a particular seller to the electric company;
(ii) Electricity purchases from an unknown origin or from a seller who is unable  to identify the
original generating facility fuel type or types;
(iii) Electricity purchases for which a renewable energy certificate  under ORS 469A.130 has
been issued but subsequently transferred or sold to a person other than the electric company;
(iv) Electricity transmitted for others by the electric company; and
(v) Total energy losses from  electricity transmission and distribution equipment owned or oper-
ated by the electric company.
(b) Pursuant to paragraph  (a) of this subsection, a multijurisdictional electric company may rely
upon a cost allocation methodology approved by the Public  Utility Commission for reporting emis-
sions allocated in this state.
[(5)] (6) Rules adopted  by the commission under this section for [ fossil] fuel that is imported, sold
or distributed for use in this state may require reporting of the type  and quantity of the fuel and
any additional information necessary to determine the [ carbon content ] greenhouse gas emissions
associated with the  use or combustion  of the fuel. [ For the purpose of determining greenhouse gas
emissions related to liquefied petroleum gas, the commission shall allow reporting using  publications
or submission of data  by the American Petroleum Institute but may require reporting of such other
information necessary to achieve the purposes of the  rules adopted by the commission under this sec-
tion.]
[(6)] (7) To  an extent that is consistent with the purposes of the rules adopted by the commission
under this section, the commission shall minimize the burden of the reporting required under this
section by:
(a) Allowing concurrent reporting of information that is also reported to another state agency;
(b) Allowing electronic reporting;
(c) Allowing use of good engineering  practice calculations in reports, or of emission factors
published by the United States Environmental Protection Agency;
(d) Establishing thresholds for the  amount of specific greenhouse gases that may be emitted or
generated without reporting;
(e) Requiring  reporting by the fewest number of persons in a fuel distribution system that will
[23]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
allow the commission to acquire the information needed by the commission; or
(f) Other appropriate means and procedures determined by the commission.
[(7) As used in this section, “greenhouse gas”  has the meaning given that term in ORS
468A.210.]
(8) The department may require a person for  which registration and reporting is required
under subsection (1) of this section to provide any pertinent records  related to verification
of greenhouse gas emissions in order to determine  compliance with and to enforce this sec-
tion and rules adopted pursuant to this section.
(9) If a person required to register and report under subsection (1) of this  section fails
to submit a report under this section, the department may develop  an assigned emissions
level for the person if  necessary for the purpose of regulating persons under sections 12 to
17 of this 2018 Act.
(10)(a) By rule the commission may establish a schedule of fees for registration and  re-
porting under this section. Before establishing fees pursuant to this subsection,  the com-
mission shall consider the total fees for each person subject to reporting under  this section.
(b) The commission shall limit the fees established under this subsection to the antic-
ipated cost of developing, implementing and analyzing  data collected under greenhouse gas
registration and reporting programs.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 34.  ORS 184.617 is amended to read:
184.617. (1) The Oregon Transportation Commission shall:
(a) Establish the  policies for the operation of the Department of Transportation in a manner
consistent with the policies and purposes of ORS 184.610 to 184.665.
(b) Develop and maintain state transportation policies, including but not limited to  policies re-
lated to the management, construction and maintenance  of highways and other transportation sys-
tems in Oregon, including but not limited to aviation, ports and rail.
(c) Develop and maintain a comprehensive,  20-year long-range plan for a safe, multimodal
transportation system for the state which encompasses  economic efficiency, orderly economic de-
velopment and environmental quality. The comprehensive, long-range plan:
(A) Must include, but not be limited to, aviation, highways, mass transit, ports,  rails and
waterways; and
(B) Must be used by all agencies and officers to guide and coordinate transportation activities
and to ensure transportation planning utilizes the potential  of all existing and developing modes of
transportation.
(d) In coordination with the State Marine Board, the  Oregon Business Development Department,
the State Aviation Board, cities, counties, mass transit districts organized under  ORS 267.010 to
267.390 and transportation districts organized under ORS 267.510 to 267.650, develop plans for  each
mode of transportation and multimodal plans for the movement of people  and freight. Subject to
paragraph (c) of this subsection, the plans must include a list of  projects needed to maintain and
develop the transportation infrastructure of this state for at least 20 years in the future.
(e) For the plans developed under paragraph (d) of this subsection, include a list of projects  for
at least 20 years into the future that are capable of  being accomplished using the resources rea-
sonably expected to be available. As the plans are developed by the commission, the  Director of
[24]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Transportation shall prepare and submit implementation programs  to the commission for approval.
Work approved by the  commission to carry out the plans shall be assigned to the appropriate unit
of the Department of Transportation or other appropriate public body, as defined in ORS 174.109.
(f) Initiate studies, as it  deems necessary, to guide the director concerning the transportation
needs of Oregon.
(g) Prescribe the administrative practices followed by the director in the performance of  any
duty imposed on the director by law.
(h) Seek to enter into intergovernmental agreements with local governments  and local service
districts, as those  terms are defined in ORS 174.116, to encourage cooperation between the depart-
ment and local governments and local service  districts to maximize the efficiency of transportation
systems in Oregon.
(i) Review and approve the department’s:
(A) Proposed transportation projects, as described in the Statewide Transportation Improvement
Program, and any  significant transportation project modifications, as determined by the commission;
(B) Proposed  budget form prior to the department submitting the form to the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services under ORS 291.208;
(C) Anticipated capital construction requirements;
(D) Construction priorities; and
(E) Selection, vacation or abandonment of state highways.
(j) Adopt a statewide transportation strategy on greenhouse gas emissions to aid in achieving
the greenhouse gas emissions  reduction goals set forth in ORS 468A.205  (2017 Edition) . The com-
mission shall  focus on reducing greenhouse gas emissions resulting from transportation. In develop-
ing the strategy, the commission shall consider state and federal programs, policies  and incentives
related to reducing greenhouse gas emissions. The commission shall  consult and cooperate with
metropolitan planning organizations, other state  agencies, local governments and stakeholders and
shall actively solicit public review and comment in the development of the strategy.  The commis-
sion shall  periodically assess, update and modify the strategy as necessary to prevent
exceedance of the greenhouse gas emissions limits established  under section 4 of this 2018
Act.
(k) Perform any other duty vested in it by law.
(2) The commission has general power to take any action necessary to coordinate and administer
programs relating to highways, motor carriers, motor vehicles,  public transit, rail, transportation
safety and such other programs related to transportation.
(3) The commission may require the director to furnish whatever  reports, statistics, information
or assistance the commission may request in order  to study the department or transportation-related
issues.
SECTION 35.
 ORS 468A.210 is amended to read:
468A.210. As used in ORS 352.823 and 468A.200 to 468A.260 ,[:]
[(1)] “global  warming” means an increase in the average temperature of the earth’s atmosphere
that is associated with the release of greenhouse gases.
[(2) “Greenhouse gas” means any gas that contributes to anthropogenic global warming  including,
but not limited to, carbon dioxide,  methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons and
sulfur hexafluoride.]
[(3) “Greenhouse gas cap-and-trade system” means a system that: ]
[(a) Establishes a total cap on greenhouse gas emissions from an identified group of emitters; ]
[25]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(b) Establishes a market for allowances that represent emissions; and ]
[(c) Allows trading of allowances among greenhouse gas emitters. ]
SECTION 36.  ORS 468A.235 is amended to read:
468A.235. The Oregon Global Warming Commission shall recommend ways to coordinate  state
and local efforts to reduce greenhouse  gas emissions in Oregon consistent with [ the greenhouse gas
emissions reduction goals established by ORS 468A.205 ] section 4 of  this 2018 Act  and shall re-
commend efforts to help Oregon prepare for the effects of global warming. The Office  of the Gov-
ernor and state agencies working on multistate and  regional efforts to reduce greenhouse gas
emissions shall inform the commission about these efforts and shall consider input  from the com-
mission for such efforts.
SECTION 37.  ORS 468A.240 is amended to read:
468A.240. (1) In furtherance of [ the greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals established  by ORS
468A.205] section  4 of this 2018 Act , the Oregon Global Warming Commission may recommend
statutory and administrative changes,  policy measures and other recommendations to be carried out
by state and local governments, businesses, nonprofit organizations or residents.  In developing its
recommendations, the commission shall consider economic, environmental, health and social costs,
and the risks and benefits of alternative strategies, including least-cost  options. The commission
shall solicit and consider public comment relating to statutory, administrative  or policy recommen-
dations.
[(2) The commission shall examine  greenhouse gas cap-and-trade systems, including a statewide
and multistate carbon cap-and-trade system and market-based mechanisms, as a means of achieving the
greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals established by ORS 468A.205. ]
[(3)] (2)  The commission shall examine possible  funding mechanisms to obtain low-cost
greenhouse gas emissions reductions and energy  efficiency enhancements, including but not limited
to those in the natural gas industry.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 468A.250 is amended to read:
468A.250. (1) The Oregon Global Warming Commission shall track and evaluate:
(a) Economic, environmental, health and social assessments of global warming impacts on
Oregon and the Pacific Northwest;
(b) Existing greenhouse gas emissions reduction policies and measures;
(c) Economic, environmental, health  and social costs, and the risks and benefits of alternative
strategies, including least-cost options;
(d) The physical science of global warming;
(e) Progress toward [ the greenhouse gas emissions reduction  goals established by ORS 468A.205 ]
preventing exceedance of the greenhouse gas emissions limits established under section  4 of
this 2018 Act ;
(f) Greenhouse  gases emitted by various sectors of the state economy, including but not limited
to industrial, transportation and utility sectors;
(g) Technological progress on sources of energy the use of which generates no  or low
greenhouse gas emissions and methods for carbon sequestration;
(h) Efforts to identify the greenhouse  gas emissions attributable to the residential and commer-
cial building sectors;
(i) The carbon sequestration potential of Oregon’s forests, alternative  methods of forest man-
agement that can increase carbon sequestration and reduce the loss of carbon sequestration to
wildfire, changes in the mortality and distribution of tree and other plant species and the extent  to
[26]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
which carbon is stored in tree-based building materials;
(j) The advancement of regional, national and international policies  to reduce greenhouse gas
emissions;
(k) Local and regional efforts to prepare for the effects of global warming; and
(L) Any other information, policies or analyses that the commission determines will aid in [ the
achievement of the greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals established  by ORS 468A.205. ] prevent-
ing exceedance of the greenhouse gas emissions limits established under section 4 of this 2018
Act.
(2) The commission shall:
(a) Work with the State  Department of Energy and the Department of Environmental Quality
to evaluate all gases with the potential to be greenhouse gases and to determine a carbon  dioxide
equivalency for those gases; and
(b) Use regional and national  baseline studies of building performance to identify incremental
targets for  the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions attributable to residential and commercial
building construction and operations.
SECTION 39.
 ORS 468A.260 is amended to read:
468A.260. The Oregon Global  Warming Commission shall submit a report to the Legislative As-
sembly, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, by [ March 31 of each odd-numbered year ] Septem-
ber 15 of each even-numbered year  that describes Oregon’s progress toward [ achievement of the
greenhouse  gas  emissions reduction goals established by ORS 468A.205 ] preventing exceedance of
the greenhouse gas emissions  limits established under section 4 of this 2018 Act . The report
may include relevant issues and trends of significance,  including trends of greenhouse gas emissions,
emerging public policy and technological advances. The report also may discuss measures the  state
may adopt  to mitigate the impacts of global warming on the environment, the economy and the
residents of Oregon and to prepare for those impacts.
SECTION 40.  ORS 468A.265 is amended to read:
468A.265. As used in ORS 468A.265 to 468A.277:
(1) “Biodiesel” means a motor vehicle  fuel consisting of mono-alkyl esters of long chain fatty
acids derived  from vegetable oils, animal fats or other nonpetroleum resources, not including palm
oil.
(2) “Clean fuels program” means the  program adopted by rule by the Environmental Quality
Commission under ORS 468A.266 (1)(b).
(3) “Compliance period” means the calendar  year during which a regulated party must demon-
strate compliance with the low carbon fuel standards  through participation in the clean fuels pro-
gram.
(4) “Credit” means a unit of measure generated when a fuel with  a carbon intensity that is less
than the applicable low carbon  fuel standard is produced, imported or dispensed for use in Oregon,
such that one credit is equal to one metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent.
(5) “Credit aggregator” means a person  who voluntarily registers to participate in the clean
fuels program to facilitate  credit generation on behalf of a credit generator and to trade credits with
regulated parties, credit generators and other credit aggregators.
(6) “Credit generator” means a person eligible  to generate credits by providing fuels for use in
Oregon with carbon intensities less than the applicable low carbon fuel standard.
(7) “Deferral” means a delay or change in the applicability of a scheduled  applicable low carbon
fuel standard for a period of time, accomplished pursuant to an order issued under ORS  468A.273
[27]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or 468A.274.
(8) “Deficit” means a  unit of measure generated when a fuel with a carbon intensity that is more
than the applicable low carbon  fuel standard is produced, imported or dispensed for use in Oregon,
such that one deficit is equal to one metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent.
[(9) “Greenhouse gas” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468A.210. ]
[(10)] (9) “Low carbon  fuel standard” means a standard adopted by the commission by rule under
ORS 468A.266 for the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions, on average, per unit of fuel energy.
[(11)] (10) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.360.
[(12)] (11) “Regulated  party” means a person responsible for complying with the low carbon fuel
standards.
[(13)] (12) “Small deficit” means a net  deficit balance at the end of a compliance period, after
retirement of all credits held by a regulated party, that  does not exceed a percentage set by the
commission by rule of the total number  of deficits that the regulated party generated for a compli-
ance period and that may  not be greater than 10 percent of the total number of deficits that the
regulated party generated for a compliance period.
SECTION 41.  ORS 468A.279 is amended to read:
468A.279. (1) As used in this section[ :],
[(a) “Greenhouse gas” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468A.210. ]
[(b)] “motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.360.
(2) The  Environmental Quality Commission may adopt by rule standards and requirements de-
scribed in this section to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.
(3)(a) The commission  may adopt requirements to prevent the tampering, alteration and modifi-
cation of the original design or performance of motor vehicle pollution control systems.
(b) Before adopting requirements under this section, the  commission shall consider the anti-
tampering requirements and exemptions of the State of California.
(4) The commission may adopt requirements for motor  vehicle service providers to check and
inflate tire pressure  according to the tire manufacturer’s or motor vehicle manufacturer’s recom-
mended specifications, provided that the requirements:
(a) Do not apply when the primary purpose of the motor vehicle service  is fueling vehicles; and
(b) Do not require motor vehicle service providers to purchase equipment to check and  inflate
tire pressure.
(5) The commission may adopt restrictions on engine use by commercial ships while at port,  and
requirements that ports provide alternatives to engine use such as electric power, provided that:
(a) Engine  use shall be allowed when necessary to power mechanical or electrical operations if
alternatives are not reasonably available;
(b) Engine use shall be allowed  when necessary for reasonable periods due to emergencies and
other considerations as determined by the commission; and
(c) The  requirements must be developed in consultation with representatives of Oregon ports
and take into account  operational considerations, operational agreements, international protocols
and limitations, the ability to  fund the purchase and use of electric power equipment and the po-
tential effect of the requirements on competition with other ports.
(6) In adopting rules under this section, the commission shall evaluate:
(a) Safety, feasibility, net reduction of greenhouse gas emissions and cost-effectiveness;
(b) Potential adverse impacts to public health and the environment,  including but not limited to
air quality, water quality and the generation and disposal of waste in this state;
[28]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Flexible implementation approaches to minimize compliance costs; and
(d) Technical and economic studies of comparable  greenhouse gas emissions reduction measures
implemented in other states and any other studies as determined by the commission.
(7) The provisions of this section do not apply to:
(a) Motor vehicles registered as farm vehicles under the provisions of ORS 805.300.
(b) Farm tractors, as defined in ORS 801.265.
(c) Implements of husbandry, as defined in ORS 801.310.
(d) Motor trucks, as defined in ORS 801.355, used primarily to transport logs.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 757.357 is amended to read:
757.357. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(b) “Transportation electrification” means:
(A) The use of electricity from external sources to provide power to all or part of a vehicle;
(B) Programs  related to developing the use of electricity for the purpose described in subpara-
graph (A) of this paragraph; and
(C) Infrastructure investments related to  developing the use of electricity for the purpose de-
scribed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(c) “Vehicle” means a vehicle, vessel, train, boat or any other equipment that is mobile.
(2) The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(a) Transportation electrification is necessary to reduce petroleum use,  achieve optimum levels
of energy efficiency and carbon reduction, meet federal and state air quality standards,  [ meet this
state’s greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals described  in ORS 468A.205 ] prevent exceedance
of the greenhouse gas emissions limits established under section 4 of this 2018 Act  and im-
prove the public health and safety;
(b) Widespread  transportation electrification requires that electric companies increase access to
the use of electricity as a transportation fuel;
(c) Widespread transportation  electrification requires that electric companies increase access to
the use of electricity as a transportation fuel in low and moderate income communities;
(d) Widespread transportation electrification should stimulate innovation and competition,  pro-
vide consumers with increased options in the use of charging equipment and in  procuring services
from suppliers of electricity, attract private capital investments and create high quality  jobs in this
state;
(e) Transportation electrification and the purchase and use of  electric vehicles should assist in
managing the electrical grid, integrating generation from renewable  energy resources and improving
electric system efficiency and operational flexibility, including the ability of an electric company  to
integrate variable generating resources;
(f) Deploying transportation electrification and electric vehicles creates the opportunity  for an
electric company to propose,  to the Public Utility Commission, that a net benefit for the customers
of the electric company is attainable; and
(g) Charging electric vehicles in a manner that provides benefits to electrical  grid management
affords fuel cost savings for vehicle drivers.
(3) The Public Utility Commission shall direct each electric company to file applications, in  a
form and  manner prescribed by the commission, for programs to accelerate transportation
electrification. A program proposed by an electric company may include prudent investments in  or
customer rebates for electric vehicle charging and related infrastructure.
[29]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) When considering a transportation electrification program and determining cost recovery for
investments and  other expenditures related to a program proposed by an electric company under
subsection (3) of this section, the commission shall consider whether the investments  and other
expenditures:
(a) Are within the service territory of the electric company;
(b) Are prudent as determined by the commission;
(c) Are reasonably expected to be used and useful as determined by the commission;
(d) Are reasonably expected to enable the electric company to support the electric  company’s
electrical system;
(e) Are reasonably  expected to improve the electric company’s electrical system efficiency and
operational flexibility, including the ability of the electric  company to integrate variable generating
resources;  and
(f) Are reasonably expected to stimulate innovation, competition and customer choice  in electric
vehicle charging and related infrastructure and services.
(5)(a) Tariff schedules and rates allowed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section:
(A) May allow a return of and a return on an  investment made by an electric company under
subsection (3) of this section; and
(B) Shall be recovered from all customers of an electric company in a  manner that is similar to
the recovery of distribution system investments.
(b) A return on investment allowed  under this subsection may be earned for a period of time
that does not exceed the depreciation schedule of the  investment approved by the commission. When
an electric company’s investment is  fully depreciated, the commission may authorize the electric
company to donate the electric  vehicle charging infrastructure to the owner of the property on
which the infrastructure is located.
(6) For purposes  of ORS 757.355, electric vehicle charging infrastructure provides utility service
to the customers of an electric company.
(7) In authorizing programs described in subsection  (3) of this section, the commission shall re-
view data concerning current  and future adoption of electric vehicles and utilization of electric ve-
hicle  charging  infrastructure. If market barriers unrelated to the investment made by an electric
company prevent electric vehicles  from adequately utilizing available electric vehicle charging
infrastructure, the commission may  not permit additional investments in transportation
electrification without a reasonable showing that the investments would not result in  long-term
stranded costs recoverable from the customers of electric companies.
SECTION 43.
 ORS 757.528 is amended to read:
757.528. (1) Unless modified by rule by the State Department of Energy as  provided in this sec-
tion, the  greenhouse gas emissions standard that applies to consumer-owned utilities is 1,100 pounds
of greenhouse gases per megawatt-hour for a generating facility.
(2) Unless modified pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the greenhouse  gas emissions
standard includes only carbon dioxide emissions.
(3) For purposes of applying the emissions  standard to cogeneration facilities, the department
shall establish an output-based methodology to ensure that the calculation of emissions  of
greenhouse gases for cogeneration facilities recognizes the total usable energy output  of the process
and includes all greenhouse gases emitted by the facility in the  production of both electrical and
thermal energy.
(4) The department shall review the greenhouse gas emissions standard established under  this
[30]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section no more than once every three years. After public notice and hearing, and  consultation with
the Public Utility Commission, the department may:
(a) Modify the emissions standard to include other  greenhouse gases as defined in ORS
[468A.210] 468A.005, with the  other greenhouse gases expressed as their carbon dioxide equivalent;
and
(b) Modify the emissions standard based upon current information on the rate of  greenhouse gas
emissions from a commercially available combined-cycle natural gas generating facility that:
(A) Employs a combination of one or more gas turbines and one  or more steam turbines and
produces electricity in the steam turbines from waste heat produced by the gas turbines;
(B) Has  a heat rate at high elevation within the boundaries of the Western Electricity Coordi-
nating Council; and
(C) Has a heat rate at  ambient temperatures when operating during the hottest day of the year.
(5) In modifying the greenhouse gas emissions standard, the department shall:
(a) Use an output-based  methodology to ensure that the calculation of greenhouse gas emissions
through cogeneration recognizes the total usable  energy output of the process and includes all
greenhouse gases emitted by  the generating facility in the production of both electrical and thermal
energy; and
(b) Consider the effects of the  emissions standard on system reliability and overall costs to
electricity consumers.
(6) If upon a review conducted pursuant  to subsection (4) of this section, the department deter-
mines that a mandatory greenhouse gas emissions limit has been established  pursuant to state or
federal law, the department shall issue a report to the appropriate legislative  committees of the
Legislative  Assembly  stating which portions, if any, of the greenhouse gas emissions standard are
no longer necessary as a matter of state law.
SECTION 44.
 Section 9, chapter 751, Oregon Laws 2009, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  (1) The Public Utility Commission  shall develop estimates of the rate impacts for electric
companies and natural gas companies to meet the following alternative greenhouse  gas emission
reduction goals for 2020:
(a) Ten percent below 1990 levels[ , as specified in ORS 468A.205 ]; and
(b) Fifteen percent below 2005 levels.
(2) The commission shall  submit a report presenting the estimates and explaining the analysis
used to  develop the estimates to the appropriate interim committee of the Legislative Assembly prior
to November 1 of each even-numbered year.
EXPEDITED JUDICIAL REVIEW TO SUPREME COURT;
EXPIRATION
SECTION 45.
(1) It is the intent of the  Legislative Assembly that the provisions of this
2018 Act relating to the receipt of moneys by the state through the sale of allowances  by
auction as part  of the market-based compliance mechanism for the program established un-
der sections 12 to 17 of this 2018  Act do not render this 2018 Act a bill for raising revenue
subject to the provisions of Article IV, sections 18 and 25 (2), of the Oregon Constitution.
(2) Jurisdiction is conferred on  the Supreme Court to determine whether this 2018 Act
is a bill for raising revenue subject to the provisions of Article IV, sections 18  and 25 (2), of
the Oregon Constitution.
[31]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) A person that is or  that will be adversely affected by the provisions of sections 12 to
17 of this 2018 Act relating  to the receipt of moneys by the state through the sale of allow-
ances by auction as part of the market-based  compliance mechanism for the program es-
tablished under sections 12 to 17 of this 2018 Act may institute a proceeding for review  by
filing with the Supreme Court a petition that meets the following requirements:
(a) The petition must be filed on or before January 1, 2019.
(b) The petition must include the following:
(A) A statement of the basis of the challenge; and
(B) A statement  and supporting affidavit showing how the petitioner is or will be ad-
versely affected.
(4) The petitioner shall serve a copy of the petition by registered  or certified mail upon
the Environmental Quality Commission, the Department of Environmental  Quality, the At-
torney General and the Governor.
(5) Proceedings for review under this  section shall be given priority over all other mat-
ters before the Supreme Court.
(6) In the event that the Supreme Court  determines that there are factual issues in the
petition, the Supreme Court may appoint a special master to hear evidence and  to prepare
recommended findings of fact.
APPROPRIATION FOR ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE TASK FORCE
SECTION 46.
In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Environmental Justice Task Force, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2017,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for  compensation
and expenses incurred by members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative
Assembly in the manner and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495, and for provision by  the
Governor of clerical and administrative staff support to the task force.
OPERATIVE DATES
SECTION 47.  (1)(a) Sections 19 to 21 of this 2018 Act become operative on July 1, 2019.
(b) The Environmental  Quality Commission may adopt rules or take any actions before
the operative date specified in paragraph (a) of  this subsection that are necessary to enable
the commission, on and after the operative date specified in paragraph (a) of  this subsection,
to carry out the provisions of sections 19 to 21 of this 2018 Act.
(2)(a) Sections 3 to 10 of this 2018 Act, the amendments to statutes and uncodified law
by sections 1 and 33 to 44 of this 2018 Act and the repeal of ORS 468A.205 by section 2 of  this
2018 Act become operative on January 1, 2019.
(b) The Environmental Quality Commission may adopt rules or take any  actions before
the operative date specified in paragraph (a) of  this subsection that are necessary to enable
the commission, on and after the operative date specified in paragraph (a) of  this subsection,
to carry out the provisions of sections 3 to 10  of this 2018 Act, the amendments to statutes
and uncodified law by sections 1 and 33 to  44 of this 2018 Act and the repeal of ORS 468A.205
by section  2 of this 2018 Act. Any rules adopted under this paragraph may not become op-
erative until January 1, 2019.
[32]
HB 4001
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
(3)(a) Sections 11 to  18 and 22 to 32 of this 2018 Act become operative on January 1, 2021.
(b) The Environmental Quality Commission, the Public Utility Commission, the  Depart-
ment of Transportation, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the  Governor
and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission may adopt rules or  take any actions
before the operative date specified in  paragraph (a) of this subsection that are necessary to
enable the Governor, the commissions and the departments, on and after the operative date
specified in paragraph (a) of this  subsection, to carry out the provisions of sections 11 to 18
and 22 to 32 of  this 2018 Act. Any rules adopted under this paragraph may not become op-
erative until January 1, 2021.
REPORTS AND REVIEWS
SECTION 48.
On or before September 15, 2020, the Department of Environmental Quality
shall report on the actions  being taken by the Environmental Quality Commission and the
department to prepare for implementation of sections 11 to 18 and 22 to 32 of this 2018 Act
to the interim legislative committees on the environment and natural resources.
SECTION 49.
On or before September 15, 2031, the Department of Environmental Quality
shall conduct a review and provide a report to the  Legislative Assembly in the manner pro-
vided by ORS 192.245 on the implementation of section 15 of this  2018 Act and rules adopted
under section 15 of this 2018 Act. The report may include recommendations  for legislation.
The review and report must:
(1) Assess the implementation of laws, policies and protocols for offset projects and  the
use of offset credits by covered entities; and
(2) Make determinations and recommendations regarding whether changes  to laws, poli-
cies or protocols are necessary or advisable to address any  negative impacts or to best align
the laws, policies or protocols with the purposes set forth in section 11 of this 2018 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 50. The unit and section captions used in this 2018 Act are provided  only for
the convenience of the reader and  do not become part of the statutory law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2018 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 51. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[33]