Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Climate disaster” means an event  that meets any of the following threshold quali-
fications and is determined by impact attribution science or extreme event attribution  sci-
ence to be worsened to  a statistically significant degree or caused by climate change from
responsible parties’ products, or is extreme weather attributable to climate change from re-
sponsible parties’ products:
(a) Any natural catastrophe,  including any hurricane, tornado, storm, high water, wind-
driven water, tidal wave, tsunami, earthquake,  volcanic eruption, landslide, mudslide,
snowstorm or drought, or, regardless of cause, any fire, flood or explosion,  which in the de-
termination of the President of the United States causes damage of sufficient severity and
magnitude to warrant major disaster assistance under federal law to supplement the  efforts
and available resources of states, local governments and disaster relief  organizations in al-
leviating the damage, loss, hardship or suffering caused thereby.
(b) Any natural or man-made incident that results in extraordinary  levels of mass casu-
alties, damage or disruption severely affecting the population, infrastructure,  environment,
economy, national morale or government functions, including an event that results in sus-
tained impacts over a prolonged period of time, almost immediately exceeds  resources
normally available to local, state, tribal and private sector authorities in the impacted  area
and significantly interrupts governmental  operations and emergency services to such an ex-
tent that national security could be threatened.
(c) An event that qualifies or would have  qualified for inclusion on the National Centers
for Environmental Information’s Billion-Dollar Weather  and Climate Disasters program and
data list as it existed on July 30, 2024,  without recognition of any changes weakening the
agency program that  may occur at a later time by subsequent agency administration or
abolition of the  program, the National Centers for Environmental Information or the Na-
tional Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.
(d) An event that results in a declaration of emergency under ORS 401.165.
(2) “Extreme event attribution science” means research aimed  at understanding how
human-induced changes in the global climate system affect  the probability, severity and
other characteristics of  extreme weather events such as hurricanes and heat waves, includ-
[3]
SB 679
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ing but not limited to a determination  of the likelihood of the particular event happening
today compared to how it  might have unfolded without human-caused increase in concen-
tration of greenhouse gases in the atmosphere.
(3) “Extreme weather attributable  to climate change” means weather, climate or envi-
ronmental conditions, including but  not limited to temperature, precipitation, drought or
flooding, that rank above a threshold value near  the upper or lower ends of the range of
historical measurements for  a particular place and time of year, with unusual characteristics
in terms of magnitude, location, timing or extent,  and including events that extreme event
attribution science determines would  not have been possible without the influence of climate
change.
(4)(a) “Harmed party” means a person who incurs damages as a result of a climate dis-
aster or extreme weather attributable to climate change.
(b) “Harmed party” does not include a public body.
(5) “Impact attribution science” means research aimed at understanding  how global cli-
mate change affects human and  natural systems, including localized physical impacts, such
as floods, droughts and sea level rise, and the corresponding effects on infrastructure,  public
health, ecosystems, agriculture and economies.
(6) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(7) “Qualified product” means a fossil fuel product including, but not limited to:
(a) Crude petroleum oil and all other hydrocarbons, regardless of gravity,  that are
produced at the wellhead in liquid form by ordinary production methods.
(b) Natural, manufactured, mixed and byproduct hydrocarbon gas.
(c) Refined crude oil, crude tops,  topped crude, processed crude, processed crude petro-
leum, residue from crude petroleum, cracking  stock, uncracked fuel oil, fuel oil, treated
crude oil, residuum,  gas oil, casinghead gasoline, natural-gas gasoline, kerosene, benzine,
wash oil, waste oil, blended gasoline, lubricating oil and blends or mixtures  of oil with one
or more liquid products or byproducts derived from oil or gas.
(8)(a) “Responsible party”  means a firm, corporation, company, partnership, society, joint
stock company or any other entity or association that:
(A) Since January 1, 1965:
(i) Has  emitted total greenhouse gas emissions of at least one billion metric tons of car-
bon dioxide equivalent; or
(ii) Has caused to be emitted, through the  extracting, storing, transporting, refining,
importing, exporting,  producing, manufacturing, distributing, compounding, marketing or
offering for wholesale or retail sale of a qualified product, total greenhouse  gas emissions
of at least one billion metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent; and
(B) At any time on or after January 1, 1965:
(i) Did business in this state;
(ii) Was registered to do business in this state;
(iii) Acted as an agent of this state; or
(iv) Otherwise had sufficient contacts with this state to allow the responsible  party to
be subject to personal jurisdiction in this state.
(b) “Responsible party” does not include a public body.
SECTION 2.
The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Decades of intentional  lies, misinformation or disinformation and misrepresentations
[4]
SB 679
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by responsible parties about the  connection between qualified products and climate change
has directly and causally contributed to  concrete and particularized injuries in this state
from climate disasters and extreme weather attributable to climate change.
(2) A judicial forum is necessary for Oregonians to  redress the harm that responsible
parties have caused and continue to cause through  climate disasters and extreme weather
attributable to climate change fueled by their  products and actions. This state has a com-
pelling state interest in  empowering citizens to recover, recoup or rebuild the value of lost,
damaged and destroyed property, as well as the full extent of economic  and noneconomic
damages allowable under this state’s laws and the Oregon Constitution.
(3) The courts of this state  are the appropriate venue to provide additional relief to
plaintiffs as deemed necessary or  proper in the course of legal proceedings brought under the
authority of sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
(4) This state has a compelling interest in preserving public resources for  traditional
public purposes, and this state should not continue paying for increased damages to  harmed
parties caused by the profit-seeking acts and omissions of responsible parties.
(5) Climate disasters and extreme weather attributable  to climate change by impact at-
tribution science and extreme weather attribution science should not be deemed acts of God,
unforeseeable or otherwise classified as a force majeure  event eligible for litigation limita-
tions or defenses, except as explicitly and unambiguously provided.
(6) It is the intent  of this state to provide a judicial forum for the efficient, just and eq-
uitable resolution of harmed parties’ claims for damages stemming from climate disasters
and extreme weather attributable to climate change against responsible parties.
(7) Responsible parties must be accountable to harmed parties.
(8) The state has a sovereign  and compelling state interest in providing a forum for in-
dividuals, businesses and associations sustaining injuries and  harms caused by responsible
parties’ deceptive behavior and linked to the harms  of responsible parties’ qualified products
and actions.
SECTION 3.
(1) A harmed  party or a group of harmed parties that has incurred a total
amount of damages of at least $10,000  as a result of extreme weather attributable to climate
change or a climate disaster may bring an action to recover damages under this section.
(2) All responsible parties are strictly liable, jointly and severally, for  damages incurred
by a harmed party or group of harmed  parties entitled to bring an action under this section.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of  this section, a harmed party that prevails in
an action under this section is entitled to recover:
(a) Economic and noneconomic damages, as defined in ORS  31.705. The amount of eco-
nomic damages to which a harmed party is entitled under  this section includes the fair
market value of recovering, recouping, rebuilding  or remediating the value of lost, damaged
and destroyed property.
(b) Reasonable attorney fees and costs.
(4) The  damages to which a harmed party is entitled under subsection (3) of this section
shall be offset by:
(a) Any amounts paid by a public body to compensate the harmed party for  the damages
claimed in the action under this section.
(b) Any amounts paid to a harmed party pursuant to a contract of insurance.
(5) An insurer may  bring a subrogation action against responsible parties for recovery
[5]
SB 679
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of payments made to  harmed parties under a contract of insurance regardless of whether the
insured has been made whole.
(6) The  court may not award attorney fees to a prevailing responsible party in an action
under this section unless the court finds that an  objectively reasonable basis for bringing the
action did not exist.
(7) A harmed party may bring an action under this section in:
(a) The county in which all or a substantial part of the  events giving rise to the action
occurred;
(b) The county of residence for any one of the natural person responsible  parties at the
time the cause of action accrued;
(c) The county of the principal office in  this state of any one of the responsible parties
that is not a natural person; or
(d) The  county of residence of the harmed party if the harmed party is a natural person
residing in this state.
(8) An action under this section must  be commenced by a harmed party no later than
three years from the  date the harmed party incurs damages as a result of extreme weather
attributable to climate change or a climate disaster.
(9) The following are affirmative defenses to an action under this section:
(a) That the harmed party intentionally destroyed  property or intentionally worsened
damages to reach $10,000 of incurred damages.
(b) That the harmed party’s damages were incurred as a result  of the gross negligence
of the harmed party.
(10) The following are not defenses to an action under this section:
(a) A responsible party’s ignorance or mistake of law.
(b) A  responsible party’s belief that the requirements of sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act
are unconstitutional or were unconstitutional.
(c) A responsible party’s reliance on  any court decision that has been overruled on appeal
or by a subsequent court, even if that court decision had not been overruled when the de-
fendant engaged in conduct that violates sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
(d) A responsible party’s reliance on any state or  federal court decision that is not
binding on the court in which the action has been brought.
(e) Nonmutual issue preclusion or nonmutual claim preclusion.
(f) Any claim  that the enforcement of sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act or the imposition
of civil liability against the responsible party will violate a constitutional right  of a third
party.
(g) A responsible party’s assertion  that sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act proscribe conduct
that is separately prohibited by any other law of this state.
(h) Any claim that  responsible parties’ qualified products were not misused, or were not
intended to be misused, in an unlawful manner.
(i) A responsible party’s assertion that state  or federal laws relating to qualified products
and responsible parties’ operations displace, abrogate or supersede  the actions authorized
under sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act, the authority of the courts of this  state to provide a
forum for the action or the authority of the courts of this state to  provide a remedy to
harmed parties.
(j) A responsible  party’s assertion that choice-of-law and choice-of-forum clauses govern
[6]
SB 679
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the action, regardless of whether such clauses  apply to harmed parties by basis of consumer
transactions.
(k) A responsible party’s assertion that a harmed party assumed a  risk of harm through
the use of the responsible party’s products.
(L) A responsible party’s forum non conveniens assertion,  so long as the requirements
of subsection (7) of this section are satisfied.
(11) An action under this section is  not subject to court-ordered arbitration under ORS
36.400 to 36.425.
(12) A public body may not intervene in an  action under this section, but a court may
allow a public body to appear as amicus curiae in an action under this section.
(13) The Chief Justice  of the Supreme Court shall adopt procedural rules for actions un-
der this section that include simplified procedures.
SECTION 4.
Sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act may not be construed to:
(1) Limit the enforceability of any other laws that regulate or prohibit any conduct  re-
lating to climate disasters, extreme weather, greenhouse gas emissions or  consumer pro-
tection.
(2) Replace legally mandated disaster recovery  funds or designated disaster recovery
funds established through legislation, administrative  rule or contractually obligated or
court-ordered insurance claim payouts.
(3) Impose liability on any speech, expression or conduct protected by the  First Amend-
ment to the United  States Constitution, as made applicable to the states through the Four-
teenth Amendment to the United States Constitution, or by the Oregon Constitution.
(4) Wholly  or partially repeal, either expressly or by implication, any other statute that
regulates or prohibits  conduct relating to climate disaster or extreme weather attributable
to climate change.
SECTION 5. (1) Existing litigation filed in the courts of this state under the statutes of
this state may not be expressly or impliedly preempted,  displaced, mooted or dismissed upon
any other prudential consideration arguably arising from sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
(2) To the extent that any aspect of existing litigation filed  in the courts of this state is
reviewed for the application of sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act, it is severable in  each of its
applications to every person and circumstance. If any statute that  provides financial benefits
to victims  or survivors of climate disasters or extreme weather attributable to climate
change, or results in the collection of  damages by the state for damage to consumers and
state interests from climate disasters or extreme weather  events, is found by any court to
be unconstitutional, either  on its face or as applied, then all applications of that statute that
do not violate the United States Constitution and the Oregon Constitution  shall be severed
from the unconstitutional applications and shall remain  enforceable, notwithstanding any
other law, and the statute shall be interpreted as if containing language limiting the statute’s
application to the persons, group of persons or circumstances for  which the statute’s appli-
cation will not violate the United States Constitution and the Oregon Constitution.
(3) The remedies provided under sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act are  in addition to any
other remedy available to a person at common law or under statute. Sections 1 to  5 of this
2025 Act may not be interpreted to prevent a person or  the state from pursuing a civil action
or any other remedy available at common law or under statute.
(4) Sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act do not:
[7]
SB 679
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
(a) Relieve the liability of a person for damages resulting from climate change, as  pro-
vided by law.
(b) Preempt, displace or restrict any rights or remedies  of a person, the state, units of
local government or tribal government under law  relating to a past, present or future
allegation of:
(A) Deception concerning the effects of fossil fuels on climate change.
(B) Damage or injury resulting from  the role of fossil fuels in contributing to climate
change.
(C) Failure to  avoid damage or injury related to climate change, including claims for
nuisance, trespass, design  defect, negligence, failure to warn or deceptive or unfair practices
and claims for injunctive, declaratory, monetary or other relief.
(5) Sections 1 to 5 of this 2025  Act do not preempt, supersede or displace any state law
or local ordinance, regulation, policy or program that:
(a) Limits, sets or enforces standards for emissions of greenhouse gases.
(b) Requires monitoring, reporting or keeping records of emissions of greenhouse gases.
(c) Provides for the collection of revenue through fees or impose taxes.
(d) Provides for the performance or support of investigations.
SECTION 6.
Sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act apply to causes of action arising on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[8]