Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Disability” means a disability, as defined by the Americans with Disabilities  Act of
1990 (42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) and that interferes with the person’s ability to  effectively
communicate with a police officer.
(b) “Health care  professional” means a person licensed in this state to practice as a
physician, physician associate, naturopathic physician,  nurse practitioner, psychologist, pro-
fessional counselor or marriage and family therapist.
(2) A person who has a disability may  request that the Department of Transportation add
a symbol on the person’s registration card, driver license, driver permit or identification card
that indicates that the disability  interferes with the person’s ability to effectively communi-
cate with a police officer.
(3) The department shall approve a request to include a symbol on the person’s  regis-
tration card, driver license, driver permit or  identification card by any person whose disa-
bility is verified by a  health care professional and who submits an application that complies
with this section.
(4) An application for approval to include a symbol on a  person’s registration card, driver
license, driver permit or identification card must include:
(a) A certificate, signed and dated  within six months preceding the date of application,
submitted by a health care professional  to the department verifying that the applicant is a
person with a disability;
(b) The state-issued licensing number of the  health care professional who signed the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3781
HB 2683
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
certificate; and
(c) The number of the registration card,  driver license, driver permit or identification
card issued to the applicant by the department.
(5) At the time of renewal or replacement  of a registration card, driver license, driver
permit or identification card, a person may elect to remove the symbol.
(6) The verification requirements under this section do not  apply to a person who elects
to include a designation on the person’s registration card, driver license, driver permit  or
identification card as permitted under ORS 803.500 (7) or 807.110 (1)(m) because the  person
is deaf or hard of hearing.
(7) A request for the inclusion of a  symbol under this section does not, by itself, consti-
tute good cause to impose restrictions on driving privileges as provided under ORS 807.120.
(8) The department may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 807.110 is amended to read:
807.110. (1) A driver license issued by the Department  of Transportation shall contain all of the
following:
(a) The distinguishing number assigned to the person issued the  driver license by the depart-
ment.
(b) For the purpose of identification, a brief description  of the person to whom the driver license
is issued.
(c) The full legal name of the person to whom the driver license  is issued, except that the de-
partment may limit the number of characters displayed on the driver license.
(d) The date of birth and sex of the person to whom the driver license is issued.
(e) Except as provided for corrections officers in ORS  802.253, eligible employees in ORS 802.250
or Address Confidentiality Program participants in ORS 192.846, the residence address of  the person
to whom the driver license is issued.
(f) Upon request of the person to whom the driver  license is issued, the fact that the person is
an anatomical donor.
(g) Upon request of the person to whom the driver license is issued and  presentation of proof,
as determined by the department, the fact that the person is a veteran, as defined in ORS 408.225.
(h) Upon order of the juvenile court, the fact that the person to whom the driver  license is is-
sued is an emancipated minor.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in  subsection (2) of this section, a photograph described in this
paragraph. A photograph required under this paragraph shall:
(A) Be a full-faced, color photograph of the person to whom the driver license is issued;
(B) Be of a size approved by the department; and
(C) Be taken at the time of application  for issuance of the driver license whether the application
is for an original driver license, replacement of a driver license under ORS 807.160 or renewal of a
driver license under ORS 807.150, except that the department, by  rule, may allow the applicant to
use a photograph already on file with the department.
(j) The class of driver license issued and any endorsements granted.
(k) The signature of the person to whom the driver license is issued.
(L) If the driver license is not a Real ID, a design differentiating it from a Real ID.
(m) Upon request of the person to whom the driver license is issued,  the fact that the person is
deaf or hard of hearing.
(n) Subject to approval  under section 2 of this 2025 Act, upon request of the person to
[2]
HB 2683
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
whom the driver license is issued, the fact that the person has  a disability as defined in
section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The department may issue a  valid driver license, other than a commercial driver license,
without a photograph to an applicant:
(a) Who objects on religious grounds;
(b) Who objects because of the applicant’s facial disfigurement; or
(c) Who is stationed outside  of this state while serving in the active military service in the
Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard, and  the department does not have an
acceptable photograph of the applicant, as determined by the  department by rule. This paragraph
applies to an applicant who is renewing or replacing a driver license.
(3) A limited term driver license  or a limited term commercial driver license issued under ORS
807.730 shall indicate:
(a) That it is a limited term driver license; and
(b) The date on which the limited term driver license expires.
(4) The department shall use  security procedures, processes and materials in the preparation,
manufacture and issuance of any driver license that prohibit as nearly as possible anyone’s ability
to alter,  counterfeit, duplicate or modify the driver license without ready detection. The security
features used in the production of the driver licenses shall provide for:
(a) The authentication of a genuine document in a reasonable time; and
(b) The production of the driver license only by equipment that  requires verification of the
identity of the operator of the equipment before a driver license may be produced.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 803.500 is amended to read:
803.500. The Department of Transportation shall furnish for each  vehicle and camper registered
by the department, a registration card that shows all of the following information:
(1) The name of the registered owner.
(2) The make.
(3) The year model.
(4) The vehicle identification number as denoted by the title issued for the vehicle or camper.
(5) The mileage of the vehicle as reported to the department  at the time the most recent title
transfer was reported to the department, or the mileage reported to the department at the  time the
vehicle was initially titled in Oregon, whichever occurred last.
(6) The  word “totaled” if the vehicle has been reported to the department as a totaled vehicle
under the provisions of  ORS 819.012 or 819.014, unless the reason for the report was theft and the
vehicle has been recovered.
(7) Upon request of the registered owner, the fact  that the registered owner, or a person who
may operate the vehicle, is deaf or hard of hearing.
(8) Subject to section 2 of this 2025 Act, upon request of the person to whom the  regis-
tration card is issued, the fact that the person has a  disability as defined in section 2 of this
2025 Act.
[(8)] (9) Any other information required by the department.
[(9)] (10) Notwithstanding subsection [ (8)] (9) of this section, after receiving the registration card
from the department, the registered owner may black out or otherwise obscure the  residence ad-
dress, business address, mailing address or vehicle address shown on the registration card.  No other
information on the registration card may be blacked out or otherwise obscured.
SECTION 5.
The Department of Transportation  shall conduct public awareness cam-
[3]
HB 2683
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
paigns to inform individuals with disabilities, as defined in  section 2 of this 2025 Act, and
their families about the availability of the communication impairment  designation on regis-
tration cards, driver licenses, driver permits and identification cards pursuant to section 2
of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 803.500 and 807.110 by sections 3 and 4 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
Section 5 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 7. Section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 803.500 and  807.110
by sections 3  and 4 of this 2025 Act apply to registration cards, driver licenses, driver permits
and identification cards issued, renewed or replaced on or after  the effective date of this 2025
Act.
[4]