Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CHILDREN IN CARE
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 418.257 to
418.259.
SECTION 2. (1) A child-caring agency, developmental disabilities residential facility,
proctor foster home, certified foster  home, adjudicated youth foster home, caretaker or
other person with a duty of care to a child in care abuses the child in  care if the child-caring
agency, developmental disabilities residential facility, proctor foster  home, certified foster
home, adjudicated youth foster home, caretaker or other person fails to make a reasonable
effort to protect the child in care from abuse as described in this section or ORS 419B.005.
(2) A person abuses a child in care for purposes of ORS 418.257 to 418.259 if:
(a) The person neglects the child in care  by failing to provide education, care, supervision
or services that the person has a duty to provide; and
(b) The education, care, supervision or services are  necessary to maintain the physical,
developmental and mental health of the child in care.
(3) An individual abuses a child in  care if the individual is an employee, operator, con-
tractor, agent or volunteer of  a child-caring agency, developmental disabilities residential
facility, proctor foster home, certified foster home or adjudicated youth foster home or  is
any other person who, due to the child’s status as a child in care, is responsible for  the
provision of care or services to the child in care and the individual:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 281
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Neglects the child in care by:
(A) Failing to provide  the care, supervision or services necessary to maintain the phys-
ical and mental health of the child in care; or
(B) Failing to make a reasonable effort to protect the child in care from abuse as de-
scribed in this section or ORS 419B.005.
(b) Abandons the child  in care, including deserting or willfully forsaking the child in care
or withdrawing or neglecting duties  and obligations owed to the child in care by the individ-
ual.
(4) An individual abuses a child in care if:
(a) The individual is at least 18 years of age;
(b) The individual is not a child in care;
(c) The individual:
(A) Is an employee,  volunteer or contractor of a child-caring agency, a developmental
disabilities residential facility, a proctor foster  home, a certified foster home or an adjudi-
cated youth foster home;
(B) Is an operator of a child-caring  agency, a developmental disabilities residential facil-
ity, a proctor foster home, a certified foster home or an adjudicated youth foster home;
(C) Resides in the  same child-caring agency, developmental disabilities residential facility,
proctor foster home, certified foster home or adjudicated youth foster home as the child in
care; or
(D) Has access to the child  in care due to the individual’s relationship with a person de-
scribed in subparagraphs (A) to (C) of this paragraph; and
(d) The individual does one or more of the following:
(A) Assaults  the child in care or otherwise subjects the child in care to unreasonable,
unlawful or unjustified use of force.
(B) Commits an act that causes physical injury to  the child in care and the act is non-
accidental or  the injury appears at variance with the individual’s explanation of the act
causing the injury.
(C) Imposes a restraint or  involuntary seclusion on the child in care in violation of ORS
418.521 or 418.523.
(D) Willfully inflicts physical pain or injury upon the child in care.
(E) Commits an act involving the child in care that constitutes a  crime under ORS
163.263, 163.264, 163.266, 163.413, 163.465,  163.467, 163.535, 163.537, 163.547, 163.575, 163.670,
163.700 or 163.701.
(F) Verbally abuses the child  in care by threatening significant physical or emotional
harm to the child in care through any means, including:
(i) The use of derogatory or inappropriate names, insults,  verbal assaults, profanity or
ridicule;
(ii) Harassment, coercion, humiliation, mental cruelty or inappropriate  sexual comments;
or
(iii) Intimidation, including compelling or deterring conduct by threat.
(G) Engages in financial exploitation of the child in care by:
(i) Wrongfully taking the assets, funds or property belonging to or intended for  the use
of the child in care;
(ii) Alarming the child  in care by conveying a threat to wrongfully take or appropriate
[2]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
moneys or property of the  child in care if the child in care would reasonably believe that the
threat conveyed would be carried out;
(iii) Misappropriating, misusing or transferring without authorization any  moneys from
any account held jointly or singly by a child in care; or
(iv) Failing to use the income or assets of  the child in care effectively for the support
and maintenance of the child in care.
(H) Engages in sexual abuse of the child in care by committing an act that constitutes:
(i) Sexual harassment of the child in care;
(ii) Inappropriate exposure of the  child in care to sexually explicit material or language;
or
(iii) Sexual contact, as defined in ORS 163.305, with the child in care, regardless  of
whether the sexual contact constitutes a crime under ORS chapter 163.
(I) Sexually exploits the child in care by any means, including:
(i) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring  the child in care to engage in prostitution
as described in ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act as defined in ORS 163.266, to purchase
sex with a minor as described in ORS 163.413 or  to engage in commercial sexual solicitation
as described in ORS 167.008;
(ii) Directing or encouraging another person to engage  in sexual contact, as defined in
ORS 163.305, with the child in care;
(iii) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of the child in care, as  described in ORS
163.435; or
(iv)(I) Engaging  in other conduct that allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or
encourages the child in care to engage  in a performance to be observed, photographed,
filmed, tape recorded or otherwise exhibited, if the performance, in whole  or in part, depicts
sexual conduct or sexual  contact, as those terms are defined in ORS 167.002, or sexually ex-
plicit conduct as described in ORS 163.665 and 163.670, or sexual abuse  involving the child in
care or rape of the child in care.
(II) As used in this sub-subparagraph,  “conduct” does not include any conduct that is
part of any investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 418.258, 418.259  or 419B.020, or that is
designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Financial exploitation” does not include age-appropriate  discipline that may involve
the threat to withhold, or the withholding of, privileges.
(b) “Intimidation” does not include age-appropriate discipline that may involve  the threat
to withhold privileges.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 418.257 is amended to read:
418.257. As used in ORS 418.257 to 418.259:
[(1) “Abuse” means one or more of the following: ]
[(a) Any physical injury to a child in care caused by other than  accidental means, or that appears
to be at variance with the explanation given of the injury. ]
[(b) Neglect of a child in care. ]
[(c) Abandonment, including desertion or willful forsaking of a child in care or  the withdrawal or
neglect of duties and obligations owed a child in care by a  child-caring agency, caretaker, certified
foster home, developmental disabilities residential facility or other person. ]
[(d) Willful infliction of physical pain or injury upon a child in care. ]
[3]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(e) An act that constitutes a  crime under ORS 163.375, 163.405, 163.411, 163.415, 163.425, 163.427,
163.465, 163.467 or 163.525.]
[(f) Verbal abuse. ]
[(g) Financial exploitation. ]
[(h) Sexual abuse. ]
[(i) The use of restraint or involuntary seclusion of a child in care in violation of ORS 418.521  or
418.523.]
(1) “Abuse” means abuse as described in section 2 of this 2026 Act.
(2) “Adjudicated youth foster home” means a foster home certified by the Oregon  Youth
Authority under ORS 420.888 to 420.892.
[(2) “Certified foster home” means a foster home  certified by the Department of Human Services
and subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645. ]
(3)(a) “Child in care” means a person under 21 years of age who is :
(A) In the physical or legal custody of the Department of Human Services; or
(B) Is residing in or receiving care or services from:
[(A)] (i) A Child-caring agency or proctor foster home subject to ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.241,
418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970;
[(B)] (ii) A certified foster home; [ or]
[(C)] (iii) A developmental disabilities residential facility[ .]; or
(iv) An adjudicated youth foster home.
(b) “Child in care” does not include a  person under 21 years of age who is residing in any of
the entities listed in paragraph  (a) (B) of this subsection when the care provided is in the home of
the child by the child’s parent.
[(4) “Developmental disabilities  residential facility” means a residential facility or foster home for
children who are 17 years of age or younger and receiving developmental disability  services that is
subject to ORS 443.400 to 443.455, 443.830 and 443.835. ]
[(5)(a) “Financial exploitation” means: ]
[(A) Wrongfully taking the assets, funds or property belonging to or intended for the use of a child
in care. ]
[(B) Alarming a child  in care by conveying a threat to wrongfully take or appropriate moneys or
property of the child in care if the child would reasonably  believe that the threat conveyed would be
carried out. ]
[(C) Misappropriating, misusing or transferring without authorization  any moneys from any ac-
count held jointly or singly by a child in care. ]
[(D) Failing to use the  income or assets of a child in care effectively for the support and mainte-
nance of the child in care. ]
[(b) “Financial exploitation” does not include age-appropriate discipline that may involve  the threat
to withhold, or the withholding of, privileges. ]
[(6) “Intimidation” means  compelling or deterring conduct by threat. “Intimidation” does not in-
clude age-appropriate discipline that may involve the threat to withhold privileges. ]
[(7) “Involuntary seclusion” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.519. ]
[(8)] (4) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) Any city or municipal police department.
(b) Any county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
[4]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Any district attorney.
(e) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
[(9) “Neglect” means: ]
[(a) Failure to provide the care, supervision  or services necessary to maintain the physical and
mental health of a child in care; or ]
[(b) The failure of  a child-caring agency, proctor foster home, certified foster home, developmental
disabilities residential facility,  caretaker or other person to make a reasonable effort to protect a child
in care from abuse. ]
[(10) “Restraint” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.519. ]
[(11)] (5)  “Services” includes but is not limited to the provision of food, clothing, medicine,
housing, medical services, assistance with  bathing or personal hygiene or any other service essential
to the well-being of a child in care.
[(12) “Sexual abuse” means: ]
[(a) Sexual harassment, sexual exploitation  or inappropriate exposure to sexually explicit material
or language; ]
[(b) Any sexual contact between a child in care and an employee of a child-caring  agency, proctor
foster home, certified foster home, developmental disabilities residential facility, caretaker or  other
person responsible for the provision of care or services to a child in care; ]
[(c) Any  sexual contact between a person and a child in care that is unlawful under ORS chapter
163 and not subject to a defense under that chapter; or ]
[(d) Any sexual contact that is achieved through force, trickery, threat or coercion. ]
[(13) “Sexual contact” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163.305. ]
[(14) “Sexual exploitation” means sexual exploitation as described in ORS 419B.005 (1)(a)(E). ]
[(15) “Verbal abuse” means to threaten significant physical  or emotional harm to a child in care
through the use of: ]
[(a) Derogatory or inappropriate names, insults, verbal assaults, profanity or ridicule; or ]
[(b) Harassment, coercion, threats, intimidation, humiliation, mental cruelty  or inappropriate sexual
comments.]
SECTION 4.
 ORS 418.992 is amended to read:
418.992. (1) In addition to any other  liability or penalty provided by law, the Director of Human
Services may impose a  corrective action or  civil penalty  or both :
(a) On a child-caring agency  that is subject to ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.241, 418.519 to
418.532, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970 for any of the following:
(A) Violation of any of the terms or conditions of a license, certificate or other authorization
issued under ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970.
(B) Violation of any rule adopted by,  or general order of, the Department of Human Services
that pertains to a child-caring agency.
(C) Violation of any final order of  the director that pertains specifically to the child-caring
agency.
(D) Violation of the requirement  to have a license, certificate or other authorization under ORS
418.205 to 418.327, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970.
(b) On a  provider of  secure transportation services [ provider], as defined in ORS 418.241, that
violates the disclosure requirement described in ORS 418.241.
(2) The director shall impose a civil penalty not to exceed $500, unless otherwise required by
law, on any child-caring agency for falsifying records,  reports, documents or financial statements or
[5]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for causing another person to do so.
(3) The director shall impose a civil penalty of not less than $250 nor more than  $500, unless
otherwise required by  law, on a child-caring facility as defined in ORS 418.950  that assumes care
or custody of, or provides care or services to, a child knowing that the child’s  care needs exceed
the license, certificate or authorization  classification of the child-caring agency if the assumption
of care or custody, or provision of care or services, places that child’s health, safety  or welfare at
risk.
(4) Unless the health, safety  or welfare of a child is at risk, the director in every case shall
prescribe a reasonable time for elimination of a violation:
(a) Not to exceed 45 days after first notice of a violation; or
(b) In cases where the violation  requires more than 45 days to correct, such time as is specified
in a plan of correction found acceptable by the director.
(5) A civil penalty imposed under this section may be remitted or reduced upon such  terms and
conditions as the director considers proper and consistent with the public health and safety.
(6) The department  shall adopt rules establishing objective criteria for the imposition and
amount of civil penalties under ORS 418.992 to 418.998  consistent with this section .
CHILD-CARING AGENCY REGULATION
SECTION 5.
 ORS 418.205 is amended to read:
418.205. As used in ORS 418.205 to 418.327, [ 418.330,] 418.470, 418.475, 418.950 to 418.970  and
418.992 to 418.998, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Certified foster home” means a foster home certified by the  Department of Human
Services and subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645.
[(1)] (2)  “Child” means an unmarried person under 21 years of age [ who resides in or receives
care or services from a child-caring agency ].
[(2)(a) “Child-caring agency” means: ]
[(A) Any private school, private agency, private organization or county program providing: ]
[(i) Day treatment for children with emotional disturbances; ]
[(ii) Adoption placement services; ]
[(iii) Residential care, including but not limited to foster care or residential treatment for
children;]
[(iv) Residential care in combination with academic education and therapeutic care, including  but
not limited to treatment for emotional, behavioral or mental health disturbances; ]
[(v) Outdoor youth programs; or ]
[(vi) Other similar care or services for children. ]
[(B) Any private organization or person that provides secure transportation  services as defined in
ORS 418.241 during any segment of a child’s trip to or from a child-caring agency, certified foster home
as defined in ORS 418.241 or developmental disabilities residential facility  as defined in ORS 418.241,
if the route of the child’s trip begins or ends in this state. ]
[(b) “Child-caring agency” includes the following: ]
[(A) A shelter-care home that is not a foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645; ]
[(B) An independent residence  facility as described in ORS 418.475 that meets the standards es-
tablished by the Department of Human Services by rule to be considered a child-caring agency; ]
[(C) A private residential boarding school; ]
[6]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(D) A child-caring facility as defined in ORS 418.950; and ]
[(E) A secure nonemergency medical transportation provider, as defined in ORS 418.241. ]
[(c) “Child-caring agency” does not include: ]
[(A) Residential  facilities or foster care homes certified or licensed by the Department of Human
Services under ORS 443.400 to 443.455, 443.830 and 443.835 for children  receiving developmental dis-
ability services; ]
[(B) Any private agency  or organization facilitating the provision of respite services for parents
pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS 109.056. For purposes of this subpara-
graph, “respite services” means the voluntary assumption of short-term care and control  of a minor
child without compensation or reimbursement of expenses for the purpose of providing a parent in crisis
with relief from the demands of ongoing care of the parent’s child; ]
[(C) A youth job development organization as defined in ORS 344.415; ]
[(D) A shelter-care home that is a foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645; ]
[(E) A foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645; ]
[(F) A facility that exclusively serves individuals 18 years of age and older; or ]
[(G) A facility that primarily serves both adults and children but requires  that any child must be
accompanied at all times by at least one custodial parent or guardian. ]
(3) “Child-caring agency”  means a children’s care or services provider that is required
under ORS 418.215 to be licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by the Department of
Human Services under ORS 418.240.
[(3) “Child-caring facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.950. ]
[(4)(a) “County program” means any  county operated program that provides care or services to
children:]
[(A) In the custody of the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Youth Authority; or ]
[(B) Under a contract with the Oregon Health Authority. ]
[(b) “County program” does not include any local juvenile detention facility that receives state ser-
vices provided and coordinated by the Department of Corrections under ORS 169.070. ]
(4) “Developmental  disabilities residential facility” means a residential facility or foster
home that is subject to ORS 443.400 to 443.455 or 443.830 and 443.835 for children who are
under 18 years of age and receiving developmental disability services.
[(5)] (5)  “Governmental agency” means  an executive, legislative or judicial agency, department,
board, commission, authority, institution or instrumentality of this state or of a county,  municipality
or other political subdivision of this state.
[(6) “Independent residence facility” means a facility as described in ORS 418.475. ]
(6) “Managers” means the individuals at  the highest levels of an organization’s leadership
who have significant responsibility for the operations, finances or overall governance of the
organization.
[(7)(a) “Outdoor  youth program” means a program that provides, in an outdoor living setting, ser-
vices to children who have behavioral problems, mental health problems or problems with abuse of al-
cohol or drugs. ]
[(b) “Outdoor youth program” does not include any program, facility or activity: ]
[(A) Operated by a governmental entity; ]
[(B) Operated or affiliated with the Oregon Youth Corps; ]
[(C) Licensed by the Department of Human Services under other authority of the department; or ]
[(D) Operated by a youth job development organization as defined in ORS 344.415. ]
[7]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(8)] (7)  “Private” means not  owned, operated or administered by any governmental agency or
unit.
[(9) “Private residential boarding school” means either of the following as the context requires: ]
[(a) A child-caring agency that is a private school that provides residential  care in combination
with academic education and therapeutic  care, including but not limited to treatment for emotional,
behavioral or mental health disturbances; or ]
[(b) A private school providing  residential care that is primarily engaged in educational work un-
der ORS 418.327. ]
[(10)] (8)  “Proctor foster home” means a foster home certified by  a child-caring agency under
ORS 418.248 that is [ not subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645 ] not a certified foster home .
[(11) “Provider of care or services for children” means a person,  entity or organization that pro-
vides care or services to children, regardless of  whether the child is in the custody of the Department
of Human Services, and that does not otherwise meet the definition of,  or requirements for, a child-
caring agency. “Provider of care or  services for children” includes a proctor foster home certified by
a child-caring agency under ORS 418.248. ]
[(12)] (9) “Qualified residential treatment program” means a program described in ORS 418.323.
[(13) “Shelter-care home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.470. ]
SECTION 6.
 ORS 418.210 is amended to read:
418.210. ORS 418.205 to 418.327 [ shall] and 418.241 do not apply to:
(1) [ Homes] A home  established and maintained by a fraternal [ organizations ] organization
wherein only members, [ their] members’  spouses and surviving spouses in marriages and children
are admitted as residents;
(2) [ Any ] Except as specifically provided in ORS 418.257 to 418.259, a certified  foster home
[that is subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645 ];
(3) [Any ] A  child care facility that is subject to ORS 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450;
(4) [Any ] An  individual, or home of an individual, providing respite services,  as defined in ORS
[418.205] 418.215 (2)(b) , for parents pursuant to  a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056;
(5) [ Any ] A  private agency or organization facilitating the  provision of respite services, as de-
fined in ORS [ 418.205] 418.215 (2)(b), for  parents pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney
under ORS 109.056; or
[(6) A shelter-care home that is subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645. ]
[(7) Any governmental entity, other  than a county program, that is a provider of care or services
for children, including but not limited to the Oregon Youth Authority. ]
(6) Except as specifically provided in ORS 418.257 to  418.259, a governmental entity, in-
cluding the Oregon Youth  Authority, that provides care or services to children, regardless
of whether the children are in the custody of the Department of Human Services, if:
(a) The governmental entity is not a child-caring agency; and
(b) The governmental entity is not a county program, as defined in ORS 418.215.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 418.215 is amended to read:
418.215. [(1) A child-caring agency may not provide or  engage in any care or services described in
ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.470,  418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970 unless the agency is licensed, certified
or otherwise authorized to provide or  engage in the provision of care or services to a child by the
Department of Human Services under ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.470,  418.475 or 418.950 to
418.970.]
[8]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(2) A child-caring agency that provides care or services  to a child may not be licensed, certified
or authorized under ORS 418.205 to 418.327,  418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970 unless the
agency: ]
[(a) Is duly incorporated under the corporation laws of any state; or ]
[(b) Is a county program. ]
(1) The following  children’s care or services providers must be licensed, certified or oth-
erwise authorized by the Department of Human  Services under ORS 418.240 to provide or
engage in the provision of care or  services described in ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.241,
418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970:
(a) A private school, private agency, private organization or county program that is:
(A) A provider of psychiatric day treatment for children;
(B) A provider of adoption placement services;
(C) A provider of residential care, including but not limited to foster care or  residential
treatment for children;
(D) A provider of residential care  in combination with academic education, therapeutic
care and disability-related supports, including but not limited to treatment for emotional,
behavioral or mental health disturbances;
(E) An outdoor youth program, as defined in ORS 418.246; or
(F) A provider of other similar care or services for children;
(b) Any private organization or person that provides secure transportation  services as
defined in ORS 418.241 during any segment of a child’s trip  to or from a child-caring agency,
certified foster home or developmental disabilities  residential facility, if the route of the
child’s trip begins or ends in this state;
(c) A shelter-care home, as defined in ORS 418.470, that is not a certified foster home;
(d) An independent residence facility as described in ORS 418.475 that meets  the stan-
dards established by the department by rule to be  considered a provider described in this
section;
(e) A private residential boarding school, as defined in ORS 418.327; and
(f) A child-caring facility as defined in ORS 418.950.
(2) The following providers of care or services to children are not required  to be licensed,
certified or otherwise authorized by the department under ORS 418.240:
(a) A developmental disabilities residential facility unless the developmental disabilities
residential facility  also serves children that are not eligible to receive developmental disa-
bility services;
(b) Any private agency  or organization facilitating the provision of respite services for
parents pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS 109.056. For purposes
of this paragraph, “respite services” means the voluntary assumption  of short-term care and
control of a minor child without compensation  or reimbursement of expenses for the purpose
of providing a parent in crisis with relief from the demands of ongoing care of the parent’s
child;
(c) A youth job development organization as defined in ORS 344.415;
(d) A shelter-care home, as defined in ORS 418.470, that is a certified foster home;
(e) A certified foster home;
(f) A facility that exclusively serves individuals 18 years of age and older;
(g) A facility that primarily serves both adults  and children but requires that any child
[9]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
must be accompanied at all times by at least one custodial parent or guardian;
(h) An ambulance service as defined in ORS 682.025; or
(i) A host home described in ORS 417.803.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “County program” means any county-operated  program that provides care or services
to children:
(A) In the custody of the department or the Oregon Youth Authority; or
(B) Under a contract with the Oregon Health Authority.
(b) “County program” does not include any local  juvenile detention facility that receives
state services provided and coordinated by the Department of Corrections under ORS 169.070.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 418.240 is amended to read:
418.240. (1) [ All child-caring agencies shall obtain from the Department of Human  Services a li-
cense, certificate or other  authorization to provide ] The Department of Human Services shall adopt
rules, consistent with this section, for the licensing, certification  or authorization of pro-
viders described in ORS  418.215 of care or services to children under ORS 418.205 to 418.327,
418.241, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970. The  rules must set forth, at a minimum, the fol-
lowing criteria for issuance,  renewal, suspension or revocation of, or for placing conditions on, a
license, certificate or authorization under this section [ must] and:
[(a) Be set forth in rules adopted by the department; ]
(a) Require that the child-caring agency be:
(A) Duly incorporated under the corporation laws of any state; or
(B) A county program as defined in ORS 418.215;
(b) Include the full compliance requirements set forth in subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) Include, but [ are not ] not be  limited to, the following:
(A) The fitness of the child-caring agency.
(B) The employment of capable, trained  or experienced staff that meet minimum staffing re-
quirements.
(C) Sufficient financial backing to ensure effective operations.
(D) The probability of permanence in the child-caring agency.
(E) The care and services provided to the children served will  be in their best interests and that
of society.
(F) That the child-caring agency is or will be in compliance with the standards of  care and
treatment established in rules adopted by the department.
(2)(a) The  department may not issue or renew a license, certificate or other authorization to a
child-caring agency unless the  department finds the agency is or will be in full compliance with all
of the following:
(A) The agency ensures child and family rights.
(B) The agency complies with abuse reporting and investigation requirements.
(C) The agency engages in and applies appropriate behavior management techniques.
(D) The agency provides adequate furnishings and personal items for children.
(E) The agency provides appropriate food services.
(F) The agency ensures the safety of children.
(G) The agency utilizes approved  procedures and protocols for use of medications for children
receiving care or services from the agency.
(H) The agency or the agency’s employees or agents have not  engaged in financial mismanage-
[10]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment.
(I) The agency provides financial statements as required under ORS 418.255.
[(I)] (J) The agency fully and timely corrects  violations and maintains standards in accordance
with any plan of correction imposed by the department.
[(J)] (K)  The agency provides access as required under ORS 418.305 to a child  or the agency’s
premises to the department or the  department’s employees, investigators, court appointed special
advocates, attorneys for a child or other authorized persons or entities.
[(K)] (L)  The  agency provides the department with true copies of records relating to incidents
involving the restraint or involuntary seclusion of children in care as  required under ORS 418.526
(2).
(M) The agency complies  with ORS 418.519 to 418.532 regarding the use of restraint and
involuntary seclusion on children in care and incident reporting requirements.
(b) The department may suspend, revoke or place conditions on a license,  certificate or author-
ization of a child-caring agency if the department finds  the agency is not in full compliance with any
one or more of the full compliance requirements listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The department must take immediate steps to suspend or revoke  the license, certificate or
other authorization of a child-caring agency, if any of the following are found to exist:
(A) There has been the death of a child  as a result of abuse [ or neglect ], neglect or regulatory
noncompliance on the part of the agency or any of the agency’s employees or agents.
[(B) There has been sexual or physical abuse or neglect of a child in the agency’s care  or custody
that was known to the agency and the agency did not take  immediate steps to report the abuse or
neglect and to ensure the child’s safety ].
(B) The agency failed to take reasonable action to  remedy, prevent or end the abuse of
any child in  the agency’s care or custody, despite having knowledge that sexual or physical
abuse or neglect of a child in the agency’s care or custody was occurring.
(C) The [ agency] agency’s managers or other relevant employees of  the agency failed to
cooperate  fully  with any local, state or federal regulatory [ entity’s investigation ] authority’s inves-
tigation or assessment  of the agency or of the agency’s operations or employees.
[(D) The agency failed to provide financial statements as required under ORS 418.255. ]
(d) The department shall take immediate steps to place conditions on  or suspend or re-
voke the license, certificate or other authorization of a child-caring agency, if  any of the
following are found to exist:
(A) The  agency’s managers or other relevant employees of the agency failed to provide
financial statements as required by ORS 418.255; or
(B) The agency failed to provide access to a child  in the agency’s care or custody as re-
quired by ORS 418.305.
[(d)] (e)  If any of the  circumstances described in paragraph (c) or (d)  of this subsection exists,
the department may immediately place conditions on  the license, certificate or authorization of the
child-caring agency prior to a hearing if, consistent with ORS 183.430, the department finds there
is a serious danger to the public health or safety and sets forth specific reasons for such findings.
[(e)] (f)  It is grounds to deny issuance or renewal[ ,] of or  suspend, revoke or place conditions
on a license, certificate or other authorization if the department becomes aware that a  child-caring
agency, or the owner , [ or operator ] operator or manager  of the agency, has been found by other
state or federal entities to have engaged in financial, civil or criminal misconduct.
(3)(a) If the Director of Human Services has taken action under subsection (2)(c) of this  section
[11]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to suspend or revoke a license, certificate or other authorization, the  notice of intent to suspend or
revoke may be rescinded  if the director determines that the concerns regarding the health and
safety of the children in the child-caring agency’s care or  custody have been ameliorated and any
conditions placed on the license, certificate or other authorization of the  child-caring agency have
been resolved.
(b) Fourteen days before rescinding a notice of intent to suspend or revoke,  the Director of
Human Services must provide written notice regarding the intent to rescind to the Governor  and
the Children’s Advocate . The notice of intent to rescind is a public record and open for inspection
by any person without order of a court. The notice of intent to rescind must include  the following
information:
(A) The circumstances that led to the notice of intent to suspend or revoke;
(B) The actions taken by the child-caring agency, the Department of Human Services,  the At-
torney General, the Oregon Youth Authority and the Oregon Health Authority in  response to the
circumstances leading to the notice of intent to suspend or revoke;
(C) Any penalties, fees or charges made or levied against the child-caring agency; and
(D)(i) A complete  description of changes that were made at the child-caring agency and the
reasons for the  determination that the concerns regarding the health and safety of children in the
child-caring agency’s care or custody have been ameliorated or that any conditions placed on the
license, certificate or other authorization of the child-caring agency have been resolved ; and
(ii) A description of the  evidence provided by the child-caring agency that clearly dem-
onstrates its ability to maintain regulatory compliance .
(c) [ In making ] A decision to rescind a notice of intent to suspend  or revoke under this
subsection[ , the decision ] must be based solely on the health and safety of the children  served by the
child-caring agency. Systemwide capacity of  the child welfare system may not be considered as an
element of the decision.
(d) For three years after a notice of intent to suspend  or revoke is rescinded under this sub-
section, the child-caring agency must apply for  a renewal of the child-caring agency’s license, cer-
tificate or other authorization on an annual basis.
(e) The department must provide the following with  copies of a notice of intent to rescind within
five business days of issuing the notice:
(A) The Governor; [ and]
(B) The Children’s Advocate; and
[(B)] (C) The committees of the Legislative Assembly relating to child welfare.
(4) The department may immediately place  conditions on any license, certificate or authorization
issued under this section, including but not limited to placing full or partial restrictions  on admis-
sion of children, temporary suspension, limitation of  operations subject to an intent to revoke and
limitation of operations subject to correction of violations as specified in a plan of correction im-
posed by the department. The department  shall immediately notify any state or governmental agency
or unit that has  a contract with the child-caring agency to provide care or services to a child, and
the governing board, trustees, owners, managers, operators or other appropriate authorities respon-
sible for the child-caring agency,  of conditions placed by the department on the child-caring agency’s
license, certificate or authorization under this section.
(5) If applicable, an applicant shall submit written proof  of compliance with the notification re-
quirements in ORS 336.575.
[(6) The department may not charge a fee for inspections leading to decisions regarding, and issu-
[12]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ance of, licenses, certifications or authorizations under this section, but may impose fees to cover costs
of related inspections done for the department by other governmental agencies. ]
[(7)] (6)  Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a license, certificate or authori-
zation issued by the department to a child-caring agency  under this section shall  be valid for a
period of two years, unless suspended or revoked sooner by the department. However,  the depart-
ment at any time may  require amendments to an existing license, certificate or authorization to
accommodate changes in the factors upon which the issuance was based.
[(8)] (7) When a condition exists that seriously endangers or places at  risk the health, safety or
welfare of a child who is receiving care or services at a child-caring agency:
(a) The director shall issue an interim emergency order without notice, or with reasonable no-
tice under the circumstances,  requiring the agency to correct the conditions and ensure the safety
of children in the care  of the agency. The interim emergency order shall remain in force until a final
order, after a hearing, has been entered in accordance with ORS chapter 183.
(b) The director may commence an action to enjoin operation of a child-caring agency:
(A) If the agency is being operated without a valid license, certificate  or other authorization
issued under this section; or
(B) If the agency fails to comply with a plan of correction imposed  by the department or to
correct conditions not in conformity with standards as set out in an order issued under paragraph
(a) of this subsection, within the time specified in the order.
[(9)] (8)  If  the director, the director’s designee or the department becomes aware through any
means that a child-caring agency, or an owner, operator , manager  or  employee of a child-caring
agency, is the subject of an investigation by another state agency, law enforcement agency or fed-
eral agency, the director or director’s designee shall [ take immediate steps  to cause an investigation
to take place into the circumstances surrounding the  investigation and whether there is a threat to a
child, or whether  a child is at risk, at the child-caring agency. Upon determination of the level of
threat or risk to children at the agency, the director shall take appropriate steps to protect and  ensure
the health, safety and welfare of children as necessary under the circumstances. Failure to comply  with
the requirements of this subsection constitutes grounds for a charge of  official misconduct in the second
degree under ORS 162.405. ] immediately conduct a complete and thorough assessment of  the
circumstances surrounding the investigation and determine whether the  circumstances
threaten the health, safety, rights or welfare of any child in the agency’s care  or custody.
If the director or the director’s designee determines  there is such a threat, the department
shall immediately take appropriate action to ensure the health, safety, rights and welfare of
children as necessary  under the circumstances. Failure to comply with the requirements of
this subsection constitutes grounds for a charge  of official misconduct in the second degree
under ORS 162.405.
[(10)] (9)  If the Department of Justice or Bureau of Labor and Industries commences  an inves-
tigation of a child-caring agency  or an owner, operator or employee of a child-caring agency, the
Department of Justice or Bureau of Labor and Industries shall notify, inform and regularly update
the director, the director’s designee or such other personnel in the  Department of Human Services
designated to receive such information regarding the investigation. The director and the  department
shall immediately undertake the responsive action required by subsection  [ (9)] (8)  of this section
upon receiving such  notification. Interference with, discouragement of or impediment to the receipt
of the notification, information and updates required  under this subsection constitutes official mis-
conduct in the second degree under ORS 162.405.
[13]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(11)] (10) The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules to implement the provisions  of
this section.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 418.248 is amended to read:
418.248. (1) A child-caring agency may certify a proctor  foster home as a provider of care or
services for children , regardless of whether the children are in the custody of the Department
of Human Services, provided  the proctor foster home is not required to be licensed by the
department under ORS 418.215 . The child-caring agency may not certify a  proctor foster home
under this section unless the child-caring agency determines that the proctor foster home  meets
minimum standards as established by rules  adopted by the Department of Human Services or the
Oregon  Youth  Authority, as applicable. The determination that a proctor foster home meets mini-
mum standards and the certification by the child-caring agency must  take place before placement
of a child in the proctor foster home.
(2)(a) Prior to certification as a  proctor foster home, an applicant shall provide the department
or the youth authority, as applicable, and the child-caring agency with a release of  information or
other authorization sufficient to  enable the department or the youth authority to release to the
child-caring agency information about whether there is an ongoing investigation involving  the ap-
plicant, or a finding of substantiated allegations  of abuse or neglect by the applicant, related to a
vulnerable  person,  including but not limited to a child, elderly person, person with a disability or
person residing in a long term care facility  as defined in ORS 442.015, a residential facility as de-
fined in ORS 443.400, including  but not limited to an assisted living facility, or an adult foster home
as defined in  ORS 443.705. Within 30 days of receipt of a release or authorization under this para-
graph, the department  or the youth authority shall provide the child-caring agency with information
regarding ongoing investigations involving, or substantiated allegations of abuse or  neglect against,
the applicant.
(b) In addition to the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection, an applicant must disclose
in writing to the  department or the youth authority, as applicable, and the child-caring agency any
criminal conviction, imposition  of a restraining or protective order against the applicant or abuse
or neglect investigation of the applicant related to a vulnerable person as described  in paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(3) If a decision is made not to  certify a proctor foster home under this section for reasons re-
lated to an ongoing investigation involving the applicant, or findings of substantiated allegations of
abuse or neglect by an applicant,  the child-caring agency shall disclose to the applicant the reasons
for the denial of certification.
(4) The department and the youth authority shall adopt rules to implement  the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 418.255 is amended to read:
418.255. (1) The Department of Human Services shall inspect and supervise all  child-caring
agencies subject to ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.241, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to  418.970 as pro-
vided in this section.
(2) Inspections of the premises of a  child-caring agency shall occur no less frequently than once
per year and shall be made at unexpected times, with irregular intervals between  inspections and
without previous notice to the agency. Inspections under this subsection  shall be limited to premises
where children reside and receive care or services from employees or staff who do not reside  on the
premises.
(3)(a)(A) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, a child-caring  agency subject
[14]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.241, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970 that has annual
[revenues] combined revenues generated in this state and any other state in excess of $1 million
shall provide the Department of Human Services[ , at such times as the  department specifies by rule, ]
with annual financial statements that have been audited  by an independent certified public ac-
countant and a tax compliance certificate issued by the Department of Revenue.
(B) The financial statements and tax compliance certificates described  in this paragraph
must be provided when the child-caring agency applies for  a license and subsequently at such
times as the department specifies by rule but in no case less often than once per year.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection,  a child-caring agency subject to ORS
418.205 to 418.327, 418.241, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970 that  has annual combined reven-
ues of $1 million or less shall  provide the Department of Human Services, upon request or at such
times as the department specifies by  rule, with financial statements that have been reviewed by an
independent certified public accountant and a tax compliance certificate issued by the  Department
of Revenue.
(c) A child-caring agency subject to ORS 418.205 to 418.327,  418.241, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950
to 418.970 that provides adoption placement services but  does not provide care to a child and does
not receive public funds  shall provide the Department of Human Services, upon request or at such
times as the department specifies by rule, with a tax compliance certificate issued by the  Depart-
ment of Revenue.
(d) Information in financial statements and tax compliance certificates submitted to the Depart-
ment of Human Services under this  subsection is a public record and open for inspection by any
person without order of a court.
(e) The Department of Revenue shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection
pertaining to tax compliance certificates.
(4) The Department of Human Services may conduct an audit, including  a forensic audit, of any
child-caring agency subject to ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.241, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to  418.970
to determine compliance with ORS 418.205 to 418.327,  418.241, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970.
The department may, upon request at any time, inspect and audit  the books and records, including
but not limited to financial  records, of the agency. An audit or inspection under this subsection shall
be at the expense of the department.
(5) Failure to permit an inspection, whether of the premises or  of the books and records of the
child-caring agency, or failure to provide the financial statements, as  required by this section is
grounds for the  immediate suspension or revocation of a license, certificate or authorization under
ORS 418.240 and for the denial of issuance of a license, certificate or  other authorization by the
Department of Human Services.
(6) The Department of Human Services may advise the operators, owners and employees  of
child-caring  agencies  subject to ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.241, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to
418.970 in regard to approved methods of child care, recommended housing  and equipment and ap-
propriate methods to maintain adequate records of operations.
(7) In addition to advice provided under subsection (6) of this section, the Department of  Human
Services shall provide training regarding appropriate ethnic hair and skin care for children of
African-American, Hispanic, Native American, Asian-American or multiracial descent to:
(a) Child-caring agencies;
(b) Persons providing treatment, care or services under the supervision of a  child-caring agency;
and
[15]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Prospective adoptive parents of a child in foster care.
(8) The Department of Human Services  shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 418.258 is amended to read:
418.258. [(1) When the Department of Human Services becomes aware  of a report of suspected child
abuse of a child  in care, whether in the form of an allegation, complaint or formal report made under
this section, and whether made directly to the Director of Human  Services, the department or an em-
ployee of the department, to the centralized child abuse reporting system described in ORS  418.190,
through the mandatory abuse  reporting process set forth in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050 or otherwise,
the department shall immediately: ]
(1)(a) For purposes of this  subsection, the Department of Human Services becomes aware
of allegations or concerns  of suspected abuse when the department learns of the allegations
or concerns through any means, including  but not limited to the centralized child abuse re-
porting system described in ORS 418.190,  through a report made directly to the Director of
Human Services or any employee of the department or during a public meeting.
(b) When the department becomes aware of allegations or concerns of suspected  abuse
of a child in care, the department shall immediately:
[(a)] (A)  Notify appropriate personnel within the department  or the Oregon  Youth
Authority, including but not  limited to employees responsible for licensing, certifying or authorizing
child-caring agencies, adjudicated youth foster homes,  certified foster homes and  developmental
disabilities residential facilities.
[(b)] (B)  Notify any governmental agency that has  a contract with the child-caring agency, ad-
judicated youth foster home,  certified foster home or  developmental disabilities residential facility
to provide care or services to the child in care.
[(c)] (C) Notify the placement authorities of any other  state that retains jurisdiction over a child
in care receiving care or services from the child-caring agency, adjudicated youth foster  home,
certified foster home or developmental disabilities residential facility.
[(d)] (D)  Commence an investigation to determine whether the report of suspected abuse is
substantiated, unsubstantiated or inconclusive under ORS 418.259 if:
[(A)] (i) The reported abuse occurred in this state;
[(B)] (ii) The reported abuse occurred in any other state and involves a child in care  placed by
the department in an out-of-state child-caring agency; or
[(C)] (iii)  The reported abuse occurred in any other state and  the department reasonably be-
lieves that the reported abuse  poses a danger to the health, safety or wellness of a child in care
placed by the department in an out-of-state child-caring agency.
[(e)] (E)  Report to a law enforcement agency any crime that the department has  reason to be-
lieve has occurred with respect to  a child in care or at a child-caring agency, proctor foster home,
adjudicated youth foster home,  certified foster home  or developmental disabilities residential fa-
cility even if the suspected crime is not related to a report of abuse made under this section.
(2)(a) As a condition for issuance  or renewal of a license, certificate or authorization to a
child-caring agency, adjudicated youth foster home,  certified  foster home or developmental disa-
bilities residential facility, the department or the Oregon Youth Authority  shall require and verify
that the child-caring agency, adjudicated youth foster  home,  certified foster home or develop-
mental disabilities residential facility has adopted, follows and enforces  procedures and protocols
that:
[16]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Require employees of  the child-caring agency, a proctor foster home certified by the child-
caring agency, the adjudicated youth foster  home,  the certified foster home or the developmental
disabilities  residential  facility to immediately report suspected abuse of a child in care to the [ di-
rector, the director’s designee or personnel within the  department who have been specifically designated
to receive reports of abuse  of children in care ] centralized child abuse reporting system described
in ORS 418.190;
(B) Mandate that the child-caring agency, adjudicated youth foster  home,  certified foster
home or developmental disabilities residential facility provide an annual training  and written mate-
rials that include information about the centralized child abuse reporting system described in  ORS
418.190, and that the agency, home or  facility advise and educate employees of the child-caring
agency and any proctor foster home certified by the child-caring agency,  of the certified foster home
or of the developmental disabilities residential facility of the duty under  this section and ORS
419B.005 to 419B.050 to report abuse of a child in care; and
(C) Inform  employees of child-caring agencies, proctor foster homes, adjudicated youth foster
homes, certified foster homes and developmental disabilities residential facilities that the duty  to
report abuse of a child in care is personal to the employee  and that the duty is not fulfilled by re-
porting the abuse to the owner, operator or any other employee of the child-caring  agency, proctor
foster home, adjudicated youth foster home,  certified foster home or developmental disabilities
residential facility even if  the owner, operator or other employee reports the abuse of a child in care
to the director, the director’s designee or the department.
(b) A child-caring agency, adjudicated youth foster home,  certified foster home  or develop-
mental disabilities residential facility need not develop and maintain procedures and  protocols or
provide an annual training  and written materials under paragraph (a) of this subsection if the
agency, home or facility does not have any employees, staff or volunteers.
(3) Interference or  hindering an investigation of abuse of a child in care, including but not lim-
ited to the intimidation of witnesses, falsification of records or denial or limitation  of interviews
with the child in care who is the subject of the investigation or with witnesses,  may constitute
grounds for the revocation, suspension or placing of conditions  on the license, certificate or other
authorization of a child-caring agency, proctor foster home, adjudicated youth foster home,  certi-
fied foster home or developmental disabilities residential facility.
(4)(a) Anyone, including but not limited to a child in care or  an employee of a child-caring
agency, proctor foster home,  adjudicated youth foster home,  certified foster home or develop-
mental disabilities residential facility, who makes a  report of suspected abuse of a child in care [ to
the Governor, the  Department of Justice, the Director of Human Services, the director’s designee or the
department] under this section to the centralized  child abuse reporting system described in ORS
418.190 or expresses concern about situations involving abuse  or the department’s response
to allegations of abuse in good faith and  who has reasonable grounds for the making of the report
shall have immunity:
(A) From any liability, civil or criminal, that might  otherwise be incurred or imposed with re-
spect to the making or content of such report  or expression of concern ;
(B) From disciplinary action taken by the person’s employer; and
(C) With respect to participating in any judicial proceeding resulting from or involving the  re-
port or expression of concern .
(b) A person  making a report under this section may include references to otherwise confidential
information for the sole purpose of making the report, and any such disclosure must be  protected
[17]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
from further disclosure to other persons or entities  for any other purpose not related to the making
of the report.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 418.259 is amended to read:
418.259. (1) The investigation conducted by the Department  of Human Services under ORS
418.258 must result in one of the following findings:
(a) That the report is substantiated. A report is substantiated when there is  reasonable cause
to believe that the abuse of a child in care occurred.
(b) That the report is unsubstantiated. A report is unsubstantiated when there is  no evidence
that the abuse of a child in care occurred.
(c) That the report  is inconclusive. A report is inconclusive when there is some indication that
the abuse occurred but  there is insufficient evidence to conclude that there is reasonable cause to
believe that the abuse occurred.
(2) When a report is received under ORS 418.258 alleging that a child in  care may have been
subjected to abuse, the department  shall [ notify the case managers for the child, the attorney for the
child, the child’s court appointed special advocate, the parents or guardians of  the child, ] immediately
notify the child’s case managers, attorney,  court appointed special advocate, developmental
disabilities coordinator, parents or guardians, any attorney representing a parent or guardian
of the child and any governmental agency that has a  contract with the child-caring agency or de-
velopmental disabilities residential facility  to provide care or services to the child that a report has
been received.
(3)(a) The department [ may] shall  interview the child  in care who is the subject of suspected
abuse and any witnesses, including other children, without the presence of employees  of the child-
caring agency, proctor  foster home or developmental disabilities residential facility, the provider of
services at a certified foster home  or adjudicated youth foster home  or department personnel. The
department shall inform the child in care that the child may have the child’s parent or guardian,  if
the child has not been committed to the custody of the department or the  Oregon Youth Authority,
[or] attorney or court appointed special advocate  present  when participating in an interview
conducted in the course of an abuse investigation.
(b) When investigating an allegation of inappropriate use of restraint or involuntary  seclusion,
the department shall:
(A) Conduct the interviews described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(B) Review all relevant incident reports related to the child in care  and other reports related
to the restraint or involuntary seclusion of the child in care;
(C) Review any audio, video or photographic recordings of the restraint or involuntary seclusion,
including the circumstances immediately before and following the incident;
(D) During an interview with the child in care  who is the subject of the suspected abuse, ask
the child about whether they experienced any  reportable injury or pain as a result of the restraint
or involuntary seclusion;
(E) Review the training records related to all of the  individuals who were involved in the use
of restraint or  involuntary seclusion  to determine whether each individual that imposed the
restraint was currently certified in a program approved by the department ; [ and]
(F) Make all reasonable efforts to conduct  [ trauma-informed] trauma-responsive  interviews of
each child witness, including the child in  care who is the subject of suspected abuse [ unless the in-
vestigator makes a specific determination that the interview may significantly traumatize  the child and
is not in the best interests of the child. ]; and
[18]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(G) If  a child who experienced or witnessed the suspected abuse is not interviewed, make
a specific note about the reason why the interview was not  conducted and what reasonable
efforts were made to interview the child.
(c) The department may not substantiate an allegation of abuse by an individual who  was
involved in the use of a  restraint solely because the individual did not possess a current
certification to impose the restraint.
(4) The department shall notify the following when a report of abuse is substantiated:
(a) The Director of Human Services.
(b) Personnel in  the department responsible for the licensing, certificate or authorization of
child-caring agencies.
(c) The department’s lead personnel in that  part of the department that is responsible for child
welfare generally.
(d) With respect to the child in care who is  the subject of the abuse report and investigation,
the case managers for the child, the attorney for the  child, the child’s court appointed special ad-
vocate, the parents or guardians of the  child, any attorney representing a parent or guardian of the
child and any governmental agency that has a contract with the child-caring agency to  provide care
or services to the child.
(e) The parents or guardians of the child in care who is the subject of the abuse report and  in-
vestigation if the  child in care has not been committed to the custody of the department [ or the
youth authority. Notification under this paragraph  may not include any details or information other
than that a report of abuse has been substantiated ].
(f) Any governmental agency that has a contract with  the child-caring agency to provide care
or services to a child in care.
(g) The local citizen review board established by the Judicial Department under ORS 419A.090.
(h) The Children’s Advocate.
(5) The department shall report  on a quarterly basis to the interim legislative committees on
child welfare for the  purposes of public review and oversight of the quality and safety of child-caring
agencies, adjudicated youth foster homes,  certified  foster homes and developmental disabilities
residential facilities that are licensed, certified or authorized by the department in  this state , [ and]
of proctor foster homes that are certified by the child-caring agencies[ .], of out-of-state child-
caring agencies in which the department has placed any  children and of any location that the
department has placed a child on a temporary basis.  Information provided in reports  under this
subsection may not contain the name or any identifying  information of a child in care but must
contain all of the following:
(a) If the department conducted an investigation pursuant to  ORS 418.258 that resulted
in a finding during that quarter that a report of abuse was substantiated:
(A) If the investigation involved a proctor foster home, developmental disabilities resi-
dential facility or child-caring agency, including  an out-of-state child-caring agency, the
name of the proctor foster home, developmental disabilities residential facility or child-caring
agency;
(B) If  the investigation involved a child whom the department had placed on a temporary
basis in a commercial location, identifying information regarding the commercial location;
[(a)] (C) [The name of any child-caring agency, including an out-of-state child-caring agency,
proctor foster home  or developmental disabilities residential facility, or, ] If the investigation involved
a certified foster home,  provided there are five or more certified foster  homes in the county, the
[19]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
name of the county where a certified foster home is located[ , where the  department conducted an
investigation pursuant to ORS 418.258 that resulted in  a finding that the report of abuse was sub-
stantiated during that quarter ]; and
(D) If the investigation involved an adjudicated youth foster home, provided there are five
or more adjudicated youth foster homes in the  county, the name of the county where an
adjudicated youth foster home is located;
(b) The approximate date that the abuse occurred;
(c) The nature of the abuse and a brief narrative description of the abuse that occurred;
(d) Whether the abuse resulted in a reportable injury, sexual abuse or death;
(e) Corrective actions taken or ordered by the department and  the outcome of the corrective
actions; and
(f) Information the department received in  that quarter regarding any substantiated allegations
of child abuse made by any other state involving a congregate care  residential setting, as defined
in ORS 418.322, in which the department has placed Oregon children.
(6) The department’s quarterly report under  subsection (5) of this section must also contain all
of the following , including incidents occurring in out-of-state facilities :
(a) The total number of restraints used in programs that quarter;
(b) The total number of programs that reported the use of  restraints of children in care that
quarter;
(c) The total number of individual children in care who were placed in restraints  by programs
that quarter;
(d) The number of reportable injuries to children in care that resulted from those restraints;
(e) The number of incidents in which an at least  one individual who restrained a child in care
in a  program was not appropriately trained in the [ use of the restraint used on a child in care in a
program; and ] type of restraint used;
[(f) The number of incidents that were reported for potential inappropriate use of restraint. ]
(f) The total number of individuals who restrained children in care in the incidents  de-
scribed in paragraph (e) of this subsection who were not  appropriately trained in the types
of restraint used;
(g) The number  of incidents that were reported for inappropriate use of restraint of a
child in care to the centralized child abuse reporting system described in ORS 418.190;
(h) The number of incidents in which a restraint prohibited under  ORS 418.521 was used;
(i) A description  of the actions taken by the division of the department responsible for
licensure or certification in response to regulatory  violations related to the use of restraint
or involuntary seclusion,  including the number of licensing complaint investigations initiated
and any conditions, required  trainings or civil penalties that were imposed as a result of
failure to be in compliance with regulations related to the use of restraint  or involuntary
seclusion;
(j) The total number of allegations of abuse of children in  care that had an inconclusive
finding in that quarter, disaggregated by setting;
(k) The total number of restraints imposed on Oregon  children in care at out-of-state
congregate care facilities in that quarter, including the number of children in care that ex-
perienced a reportable injury as a result of a physical restraint, disaggregated by facility; and
(L) The total number of  children in care that experienced restraint at an out-of-state
congregate care facility in that  quarter, including the number of children in care that expe-
[20]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rienced a reportable injury as a result of a physical restraint, disaggregated by facility.
(7) In compiling records, reports and other information  during an investigation under ORS
418.258 (1) and in issuing findings, letters of concern or reprimands, the Director of Human Services
or the director’s designee and the department may  not refer to the employee, person or entity that
is the subject of the  investigation as an “alleged perpetrator” but must refer to the employee, person
or entity as the “respondent.”
[(8) As used in this section, “program,” “reportable injury”  and “restraint” have the meanings
given those terms in ORS 418.519. ]
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Developmental disabilities foster home” means a foster home that  is subject to ORS
443.400 to 443.455 or 443.830 and 443.835 for children who are under 18 years of age and  re-
ceiving developmental disability services.
(b) “Involuntary seclusion” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.519.
(c) “Program” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.519.
(d) “Reportable injury” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.519.
(e) “Restraint” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.519.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 418.260 is amended to read:
418.260. [ (1) If the Department of Human Services receives a report or otherwise becomes aware
that any suspected or founded abuses, deficiencies, violations or failures  to comply with the full com-
pliance requirements described in ORS 418.240 are occurring in a child-caring agency, whether  as a
part of  the inspections undertaken pursuant to ORS 418.255 or otherwise, the department shall imme-
diately notify appropriate personnel within the department, including  but not limited to employees re-
sponsible for licensing, certifying or authorizing child-caring agencies, who shall investigate and take
appropriate action without undue  delay, with primary concern given to the health, safety and welfare
of the children for  whom the child-caring agency is responsible. The department may notify law
enforcement agencies as necessary to coordinate and assist  in the investigation and enforcement of
corrective actions undertaken by the department. If the child-caring agency is known or  found to serve
children also served by the Oregon Youth Authority, county  juvenile departments or developmental
disabilities services within the department, the department  shall notify those entities of the report or
suspected or founded abuses, deficiencies, violations or failures. ]
[(2) If the department finds, after investigation by the department or law enforcement agencies,  that
the abuses, deficiencies, violations or failures  to comply are founded, the department may suspend, re-
voke or place conditions on the license, certificate or other authorization of the child-caring agency.
The conditions placed on a license, certificate  or authorization may include, but are not limited to,
placing full or partial  restrictions on admission of children, temporary suspension, limitation of oper-
ations subject to an intent to revoke or limitation of operations subject  to correction of violations as
specified in a plan  of correction. If the department imposes a plan of correction, and the corrections
are not made within 45  days from the effective date of the plan of correction, the department may im-
mediately suspend or revoke the license, certificate or authorization of  the child-caring agency. The
department shall immediately notify any governmental agency that  has a contract with the child-caring
agency to provide care or services to a child of any suspension or revocation of, or conditions placed
on, the license, certificate or other authorization of the child-caring agency. ]
(1) The Department of Human Services shall:
(a) Conduct a complete and detailed review of each application for an initial or renewed
child-caring agency license, certification or other authorization; and
[21]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Monitor the  ongoing regulatory compliance of a child-caring agency by, at a mini-
mum, responding to and assessing reports or allegations of noncompliance.
(2) If the department becomes aware by  any means of an actual or suspected failure of
a child-caring agency to maintain substantial regulatory compliance or full compliance with
requirements related to the health, safety, welfare or  rights of children in care, the depart-
ment shall immediately:
(a) Ensure that the individuals with the department responsible for monitoring the
child-caring agency are notified; and
(b) Ensure  that the individuals notified under paragraph (a) of this subsection conduct a
complete and detailed assessment to determine whether the child-caring agency  is in com-
pliance.
(3) If the department finds that  the child-caring agency is not in compliance, the de-
partment shall take immediate and appropriate action to ensure that the child-caring  agency
comes into compliance. The action may include, but need not be limited  to, one or more of
the following:
(a) Revoking or temporarily suspending a license, certificate or other authorization;
(b) Placing conditions on the license, certificate or other authorization, including but not
limited to placing a full or partial restriction on the admission of children;
(c) Imposing a limitation of operations subject to an intent to revoke;
(d) Imposing a limitation  of operations subject to a correction of the violations as speci-
fied in a plan of correction;
(e) Subjecting the child-caring agency to  enhanced oversight, including on-site super-
vision by the department;
(f) Requiring additional training  for the employees or agents of the child-caring agency;
or
(g) Imposing fines or civil penalties.
(4) When determining the action to take in response to noncompliance of a  child-caring
agency, the department shall:
(a) Ensure all necessary actions are taken to protect the health, safety, rights  and wel-
fare of children in care and the general public;
(b) Consider whether the violation is temporary or systemic;
(c) Consider whether this is a repeat violation or part of a pattern  of frequent or ongoing
violations;
(d) Consider the timeliness and  thoroughness of the child-caring agency’s cooperation
with the department in its thorough assessment of the concerns; and
(e) Consider any  unique circumstances, other than system capacity, that impact the
noncompliance.
(5) If  the department imposes a plan of correction, and the corrections are not made
within 45 days from the effective date of the  plan of correction, the department may imme-
diately take appropriate action on the child-caring agency’s license, certificate  or other au-
thorization.
(6) The department may not take action  to suspend or revoke a child-caring agency’s li-
cense, certification or authorization unless:
(a) The violation or violations pose an imminent risk to the health, safety, rights or
welfare of children in care, the general public or staff of the facility;
[22]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The violation or violations are part of a pattern of frequent or repeated  noncompli-
ance;
(c) The department first took less punitive actions and the child-caring agency failed  to
comply or failed to maintain compliance; or
(d) The suspension or revocation is otherwise authorized or required by  state or federal
law.
[(3)] (7)  If  the department determines at any time during or after an investigation that the
abuses, deficiencies, violations or failures  to comply are or threaten a serious danger to any child
or to  the public, or place a child at risk with respect to the child’s health, safety or welfare, the
department may immediately suspend or revoke the child-caring agency’s license, certificate or au-
thorization, subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183.
(8) The department shall  immediately notify the parents or guardians privately obtaining
services or care for their children from the child-caring agency  and any governmental agency
that has  a contract with the child-caring agency to provide care or services to a child of any sus-
pension or revocation of the license, certificate or other authorization of the child-caring agency
under [ this] subsection (7) of this section  and of any conditions placed on the child-caring agency’s
license, certificate or authorization pursuant to ORS 418.240. The  department shall immediately re-
port the alleged  deficiencies or violations to the governmental agency and the governing board re-
sponsible for the oversight of the child-caring agency.
[(4)] (9)  If the  department determines that the abuses, deficiencies, violations or failures to
comply are founded and the department imposes a plan of correction that the child-caring agency
does not comply with in the time allotted for correction, the department shall  immediately post
notice of the failure to  comply on the department’s website and  notify the following of the
failure of the child-caring agency to comply with the plan of correction:
[(a) The Legislative Assembly or the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly relating to
child welfare.]
[(b)] (a)  Members of the governing board responsible for the child-caring agency.
[(c)] (b)  Any governmental agency that has a contract with  the child-caring agency to provide
care or services to a child.
(c) The  parents or guardians of any child in care that is privately placed in the child-
caring agency by the parents or guardians.
[(5)] (10)  Any employee of the department that has  reasonable cause to believe that a child-
caring agency has [ committed an abuse or ] incurred  a deficiency or violation, or that grounds for
immediate suspension or revocation  of a license, certificate or authorization exist under ORS
418.240, and that such abuse, deficiency, violation or grounds are or threaten a  danger to any child
at the child-caring agency or to the  public, or place a child at risk with respect to the child’s health,
safety or welfare, [ is required  to ] shall  immediately inform the Director of Human Services, the
director’s designee or  such other personnel in the department designated to receive such informa-
tion. Upon receipt of an employee report under this subsection, the director  and department per-
sonnel shall immediately [ commence an investigation and ] conduct a complete and  detailed
assessment or an investigation and  take all reasonably prudent  and necessary actions to ensure
the health, safety and welfare of  children at the child-caring agency. Failure to commence an in-
vestigation [ and] or take  actions as required by this subsection constitutes official misconduct in the
second degree under ORS 162.405.
(11) An employee’s duty to  report under this section is in addition to, and not in lieu of,
[23]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the employee’s duty to report suspected abuse under ORS 419B.010.
(12) The department shall post a notice of any actions taken under subsection (3) of  this
section on its website that provides information to the public about the licensure of regulated
entities. The notice must remain posted for not less than 24 months.
(13) If the noncompliance involved the use of restraint  or seclusion or the sufficiency of
an emergency preparedness plan at a nonhospital facility  providing psychiatric inpatient
services for individuals under 21 years of age, the department shall immediately notify  the
individual at the Oregon Health Authority responsible for  conducting health care regulation
surveys for the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 418.327 is amended to read:
418.327. (1) Upon finding that the facilities and operation of a private residential boarding school
meet the standards of the Department of Human Services  for the physical health, care and safety
of the children, the department shall issue a license to operate the school. The  license shall be valid
for a  period of two years, unless sooner suspended or revoked by the department pursuant to the
provisions of ORS 418.240. However, the department at any  time may require amendments to an
existing license to accommodate changes in the factors upon which the issuance was based.
(2) The department may not charge a fee for inspections  leading to decisions regarding, and is-
suance of, licenses under this section, but may charge fees to cover  costs of inspections done by
other governmental agencies for the department.
(3) The department may place conditions  on any license issued under this section in accordance
with the provisions of ORS 418.240, including but not limited to placing  full or partial restrictions
on admission of children, temporary suspension, limitation of operations subject to an intent to re-
voke and limitation of operations subject to correction of violations as specified in a  plan of cor-
rection imposed by the department.
(4) No person or organization shall operate a private residential boarding school without  having
a current, valid license issued by the department.
(5) Any person, including the  Director of Human Services, may file a complaint with the de-
partment alleging that children attending a private residential  boarding school, or that children
within the control of  any other organization that provides boarding or residential programs, are not
receiving  shelter,  food, guidance, training or education necessary to the health, safety, welfare or
social growth of the children or necessary to serve the best interests of society.
(6) The  department shall immediately investigate complaints made under subsection (5) of this
section in the manner provided under ORS 418.205 to 418.327.
(7) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall cooperate with the department upon request
by advising the department as to whether or not the educational  program conducted at the private
residential boarding school meets minimum standards required of public educational institutions.
(8) Nothing in this section applies  to public or private institutions of higher education, commu-
nity colleges, common or union high school districts that provide board and  room in lieu of trans-
portation  or  any other child-caring program already subject to state licensing procedures by any
agency of this state.
(9) As used in this section, “private residential boarding school” means:
(a) A private school providing residential care in combination with  academic therapeutic
care, including but not limited to treatment for emotional, behavioral or mental health dis-
turbances; or
(b) A private school  providing residential care that is primarily engaged in educational
[24]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
work.
OUT-OF-STATE PLACEMENTS OF CHILDREN
SECTION 15.
 ORS 418.322 is amended to read:
418.322. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Congregate care residential setting” means any setting that cares for  more than one child
or ward and is not a setting  described in [ ORS 418.205 (2)(c)(A), (D), (E) or (F) or (10) ] ORS 418.205
(8) or 418.215 (2)(a), (c), (d), (e), (f) or (g) .
(b) “Sex trafficking”  means the recruitment, harboring, transportation, provision, obtaining, pa-
tronizing or soliciting of a person under 18 years of age for the purpose  of a commercial sex act,
as defined in ORS 163.266, or  the recruitment, harboring, transportation, provision or obtaining of
a person over 18 years of age using force, fraud or coercion for the purpose of a commercial sex
act, as defined in ORS 163.266.
(2) The Department of Human Services  may place a child or ward in a congregate care resi-
dential setting only if the setting is:
(a) A child-caring agency[ , as defined in ORS 418.205, ] a hospital, as defined in ORS 442.015, or
a rural hospital, as defined in ORS 442.470; and
(b) A qualified residential treatment program [ described in ORS 418.323 ].
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of  this section, the department may place a child or ward in
a child-caring agency that is not a qualified residential treatment program if:
(a) The child-caring agency is providing prenatal, postpartum or  parenting supports to the child
or ward[ .];
(b) The child or ward is placed in an independent residence facility described in  ORS 418.475
that is licensed by the department as a child-caring agency[ .];
(c) The  child or ward is, or is at risk of becoming, a victim of sex trafficking and the child-caring
agency is providing high-quality residential care and supportive services to the child or ward[ .];
(d) The  Oregon Health Authority has approved the [ placement as medically necessary ] services
and treatment as medically necessary and medically appropriate and the child-caring agency:
(A) Is a  [ residential care facility; ] psychiatric residential treatment facility that meets the
requirements prescribed by the authority by rule, consistent with all  federal requirements
for certification as  a facility providing inpatient psychiatric services for persons under 21
years of age;
(B) Is licensed by the  authority and maintains site-specific accreditation from a nationally re-
cognized organization to provide psychiatric treatment to children; and
(C) Has an active provider agreement with the Oregon Medicaid program[ .];
(e) The child-caring agency is an  adolescent residential drug and alcohol treatment program li-
censed or certified by the State of Oregon to provide  residential care, and the court has approved,
or approval is pending for, the placement  in the child-caring agency of each child or ward over
whom the department retains jurisdiction[ .];
(f) The placement with the child-caring agency  is for the purpose of placing the child or ward
in a proctor foster home[ .];
(g) The child-caring agency is a residential care facility licensed by the department that provides
short-term assessment and stabilization services[ .];
(h) The child-caring agency is a shelter-care home, as defined in ORS 418.470, that  provides
[25]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
short-term assessment and stabilization services[ .];
(i) The child-caring agency is a homeless, runaway or transitional living shelter licensed  by the
department that provides short-term assessment and stabilization services[ .]; or
(j) The ward  is 18 years of age or older and the child-caring agency is a residential treatment
facility or a residential home licensed or certified by the department or the Oregon Health Author-
ity.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the department may place a child
or ward in a congregate care residential setting that is not a child-caring agency or a  quali-
fied residential treatment program if:
(a) The child or ward is 16 years of age or older;
(b) A licensed  health care provider who is acting within the health care provider’s scope
of practice and who is not an employee of the authority has personally assessed  the child or
ward and has determined that the child or ward requires residential treatment  for a sub-
stance use disorder;
(c) The congregate care residential setting is licensed, certified  or otherwise approved
by the Oregon Health Authority to provide substance use disorder treatment;
(d) The congregate care residential setting primarily serves individuals who are  18 years
of age or older; and
(e) The admission is medically necessary and medically appropriate.
[(4)] (5)  The department may not place a child  or ward in a residential care facility or shelter-
care home described in subsection (3)(g) or (h) of this section:
(a) For more than 60 consecutive days or 90 cumulative days in a 12-month period; or
(b) If the residential care facility or shelter-care home also serves youths  or adjudicated youths
served by the county juvenile department or adjudicated youths committed to the custody  of the
Oregon Youth Authority by the court.
[(5)] (6)  The department may not place a child or ward in a homeless, runaway or transitional
living shelter described in subsection (3)(i) of this section for more  than 60 consecutive or 90 cu-
mulative days in any 12-month period.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (5)(a) and  (6) of this section, the department may ex-
tend the placement of a child or ward that is at least 16 years of age if:
(A) The child’s attorney affirms in writing that, after consultation with the attorney,  the
child or ward does not object to the extension; and
(B) The court approves the extension.
(b) An extension under this subsection may last up to  90 cumulative days, and further
extensions may be granted by the court if  the child or ward, after consultation with the at-
torney of the child or ward, does not object and the child or ward maintains regular attend-
ance at the local public school.
[(6)] (8)  Calculations  of the number of days a child or ward is placed in a shelter-care home
under subsection  (3)(h) of this section or a homeless, runaway or transitional living shelter under
subsection (3)(i) of this section exclude the days the child or ward  is in the shelter-care home or
shelter if the child or ward:
(a) Accessed the shelter-care home or shelter without the support or direction of the department;
and
(b) Is homeless or a runaway, as defined by the department by rule.
[(7)(a)] (9)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the Oregon Youth Authority from placing an ad-
[26]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
judicated youth committed to its custody in a placement that is not a qualified residential  treatment
program.
(b) Nothing in this  section prohibits the Oregon Youth Authority or a county juvenile depart-
ment from placing an adjudicated youth or a youth served by the Oregon  Youth Authority or the
county juvenile department in shelter care or detention under ORS chapter 419C.
(10) All approvals of the extensions described in subsection (7) of this section  must be
made by the director of the division of the department that  administers the state child wel-
fare program.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 418.500 is amended to read:
418.500. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and  subject to ORS 418.322,
if the Department of Human  Services determines that need exists for care and treatment of a child
who is eligible for such care and treatment that is not  available through any public or private
agency or facility in this state, it may enter into  an agreement with a public or private agency
outside this state for the purchase of care for the child. Such agreements shall  contain the matter
described in ORS 418.321 and 418.495 and shall apply to children described therein.
(2)(a) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Institution  for mental disease” means a hospital, nursing facility or other institution
of more than 16 beds, that  is primarily engaged in providing diagnosis, treatment or care of
persons with mental  diseases, including medical attention, nursing care and related services.
(B) “Institution for mental disease”  does not include a psychiatric residential treatment
facility described in ORS 418.322 (3)(d)(A).
(b) The department may not  place a child or ward in an out-of-state institution for
mental disease.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 17.
 ORS 329A.030 is amended to read:
329A.030. (1) The Department of Early Learning and Care shall establish  a Central Background
Registry and may maintain information in the registry through electronic records systems.
(2)(a) A subject individual described in subsection (11)(a), (c) or (d) of this section  shall apply
to and must be enrolled in the Central Background Registry prior to the provision of care.
(b) An individual who has been the subject of a founded or substantiated report  of child abuse
shall apply to and must  be enrolled in the Central Background Registry prior to providing any of
the types of care identified in ORS 329A.250 (4)(b)(A), (E) or (F) if:
(A) The child abuse occurred on or after  January 1, 2017, and involved a child who died or
suffered serious physical injury, as defined in ORS 161.015; or
(B) The child  abuse occurred on or after September 1, 2019, and involved any child for whom
the individual was providing child care, as defined in ORS 329A.250 (4),  or care identified in ORS
329A.250 (4)(b)(A), (C), (E), (F) or (G).
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, an individual described in paragraph (b)(B)
of this  subsection is not required to enroll in the Central Background Registry if more than seven
years has elapsed since the date of the child abuse determination.
(3)(a) Upon receiving an application for enrollment in the Central Background Registry, the de-
partment shall complete:
(A) A criminal records check under ORS 181A.195;
[27]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) A criminal records check of other  registries or databases in accordance with rules adopted
by the Early Learning Council;
(C) A child abuse and neglect records check  in accordance with rules adopted by the council;
and
(D) A foster care certification check and an adult protective services check  in accordance with
rules adopted by the council.
(b) In  addition to the information that the department is required to check under paragraph (a)
of this subsection, the department may consider any other information obtained by the  department
that the department, based on rules adopted by the  Early Learning Council, determines is relevant
to enrollment in the Central Background Registry.
(4) The department shall enroll the individual in the Central Background Registry  if the indi-
vidual:
(a) Is determined to  have no criminal, child abuse and neglect, negative adult protective services
or negative foster home certification history, or to have dealt with the  issues and provided adequate
evidence of suitability for the registry;
(b) Has paid the applicable fee established pursuant to ORS 329A.275; and
(c) Has complied with the rules of the Early  Learning Council adopted pursuant to this section.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (3) and (4) of  this section, the department may not enroll an
individual in the Central Background Registry if:
(A) The individual has a disqualifying condition as defined in rules adopted by the council; or
(B) The individual is an exempt  prohibited individual, as provided by ORS 329A.252, unless the
individual qualifies for limited enrollment pursuant to rules adopted by  the Early Learning Council.
(b) If an individual prohibited from  enrolling in the registry as provided by this subsection is
enrolled in the registry, the department shall remove the individual from the registry.
(6)(a) The department may conditionally enroll  an individual in the Central Background Registry
pending the results of a nationwide criminal records check through the Federal  Bureau of Investi-
gation if the individual has successfully completed  the criminal records check and the child abuse
and neglect records check  in this state and in the state of the individual’s residence, if other than
Oregon.
(b) The department may enroll an individual  in the registry subject to limitations identified in
rules adopted by the council.
(7) The department may grant limited enrollment  in the Central Background Registry to a sub-
ject individual who is a relative caretaker of  a child for whom care is provided in a subsidized care
facility, regardless of whether the individual was previously denied  enrollment in the Central
Background Registry, if the individual otherwise meets the criteria established in rule by  the Early
Learning Council.
(8) An enrollment in the Central Background Registry may  be renewed upon application to the
department, payment of the  fee established pursuant to ORS 329A.275 and compliance with rules
adopted by the Early Learning Council pursuant to this section. However, an  individual who is
determined to be ineligible for enrollment in the registry after the date of  initial enrollment shall
be removed or suspended from the registry by the department.
(9)(a) A  child care facility, preschool recorded program or school-age recorded program may not
hire or employ an individual if the individual is not enrolled in the Central Background Registry.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)  of this subsection, a child care facility, preschool recorded
program or school-age recorded program may employ on a probationary basis an individual who is
[28]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
conditionally enrolled in the Central Background Registry.
(10) The Early  Learning Council may adopt any rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this
section, including but not limited to rules regarding expiration and  renewal periods and limitations
related to the subject individual’s enrollment in the Central Background Registry.
(11) As used in this section, “subject individual” means:
(a) A subject individual as defined by the Early Learning Council by rule;
(b) An individual subject to subsection (2)(b) of this section;
(c) A person who applies to be:
(A) The operator or an employee of a child care or treatment program;
(B) The operator or an employee of a provider under the Oregon Prenatal to  Kindergarten
Program under ORS 329.172 to 329.200;
(C) The operator or an employee of  a federal Head Start program regulated by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services;
(D) An individual  in a child care facility, preschool recorded program or school-age recorded
program who may have unsupervised contact with children, as determined by the council by rule;
(E) A contractor or an employee of the contractor who:
(i) Provides early childhood special education or early intervention services  pursuant to ORS
343.455 to 343.534; and
(ii) Is not subject to the criminal records check requirements of ORS 326.603 or 342.223;
(F) A child care provider who is required to be enrolled  in the Central Background Registry by
any state agency;
(G) A contractor, employee or volunteer of a metropolitan  service district organized under ORS
chapter 268 who may have unsupervised contact  with children and who is required to be enrolled
in the Central Background Registry by the metropolitan service district;
(H) A provider of respite services, as defined in ORS [ 418.205] 418.215 (2)(b) , for parents pur-
suant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS 109.056 who is providing respite services
as a volunteer with  a private agency or organization that facilitates the provision of such respite
services;
(I) The operator or an employee of an early learning program as defined in rules adopted by the
council;  or
(J) The operator or an employee of a preschool recorded program  or a school-age recorded
program; or
(d)(A) An individual who operates a subsidized care facility;
(B) An individual who has attained 18 years of age and resides in a subsidized care facility; or
(C) An individual in a  subsidized care facility who has attained 18 years of age and who may
have unsupervised contact with children, as determined by the council by rule.
(12)(a) Information provided to a metropolitan service district organized  under ORS chapter 268
about the enrollment status of the persons described in subsection (11)(c)(G) of this  section shall be
subject to a reciprocal agreement with the metropolitan service district.  The agreement must pro-
vide for the recovery  of administrative, including direct and indirect, costs incurred by the depart-
ment from participation  in the agreement. Any moneys collected under this paragraph shall be
deposited in the Child Care Fund established under ORS 329A.273.
(b) Information provided to a private  agency or organization facilitating the provision of respite
services, as defined in  ORS [ 418.205] 418.215 (2)(b) , for parents pursuant to a properly executed
power of attorney under ORS 109.056 about  the enrollment status of the persons described in sub-
[29]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section (11)(c)(H) of this section shall be subject to an agreement with the private agency or or-
ganization. The agreement must provide for the  recovery of administrative, including direct and
indirect, costs incurred by the department  from participation in the agreement. Any moneys col-
lected under this paragraph  shall be deposited in the Child Care Fund established under ORS
329A.273.
(c) Information provided to a private agency or organization about the enrollment status  of the
persons described in subsection (11)(c)(I) of this section shall be  subject to an agreement with the
private agency or organization.  The agreement must provide for the recovery of administrative, in-
cluding direct and indirect, costs incurred by the department  from participation in the agreement.
Any moneys collected under  this paragraph shall be deposited in the Child Care Fund established
under ORS 329A.273.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 329A.275 is amended to read:
329A.275. (1) The  Early Learning Council shall adopt rules establishing fees for certification,
registration and recording under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(2) Subject to prior approval of the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services and a report
to the  Legislative Assembly prior to adopting the fees and charges, the fees and charges established
under ORS 181A.195, 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450 may not exceed the cost  of administering
the program of the Department of Early Learning and  Care pertaining to the purpose for which the
fee is established, as authorized by the Legislative Assembly within  the budget of the Department
of Early Learning and Care.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section and any other provision of this chapter,  the
following fees established by the Early Learning Council under ORS 329A.030  and 329A.250 to
329A.450 may not exceed:
(a) For Certified Family Child Care Home Initial Certification, $25;
(b) For Certified Family Child Care Home Annual Fee Per Certified Space, $2;
(c) For Child Care Center Initial Certification, $100;
(d) For Child Care Center Annual Fee Per Certified Space, $2;
(e) For Registered Family Child Care Home Registration, $30;
(f) For Preschool Recorded Program Recording, $20;
(g) For School-Age Recorded Program Recording, $20;
(h) For administering a class on child care abuse and neglect issues, $10; and
(i) For enrollment in the  Central Background Registry, the cost of administering the program,
including fees for:
(A) Duplicate enrollment in the Central Background Registry;
(B) Law Enforcement Data System criminal records check; and
(C) Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint check.
(4) The Early Learning Council,  by rule, shall waive the fees described in subsection (3)(i) of this
section for an employee of or volunteer with a private agency or organization that facilitates the
provision of respite services,  as defined in ORS [ 418.205 (2)(c)(B)] 418.215 (2)(b), for parents pursuant
to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS 109.056.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 418.241 is amended to read:
418.241. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Certified foster home” means a foster home certified  by the Department of Human Services
and subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645.
(b) “Child-caring agency” has the meaning given that term under ORS 418.205.
[30]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) “Developmental disabilities residential facility” means  a residential facility or foster home
for children who are 17 years of age or younger and  receiving developmental disability services that
is subject to ORS 443.400 to 443.455, 443.830 and 443.835.
(d) “Secure escort” means escort services for a child who poses a risk  of elopement or where
restraint or seclusion may be utilized if the child  poses a risk of injury to self or others, and as
further defined by the department by rule.
(e) “Secure nonemergency  medical transportation provider” means a private organization or
person that provides nonemergency medical secure transportation services  subject to rules adopted
by the Oregon Health Authority.
(f) “Secure  transportation” means the transport of a child in a vehicle specifically equipped to
prevent a passenger from exiting, eloping or interfering with the operator of  the vehicle, and as
further defined by the department by rule.
(g) “Secure transportation services” means the  secure transportation or secure escort of chil-
dren.
(2) The department shall adopt rules consistent with this section for the issuance, under  ORS
418.215 and 418.240, of licenses to provide secure transportation services  to providers that are
child-caring agencies solely as the  result of providing secure transportation services as described in
ORS [ 418.205 (2)(a)(B) ] 418.215 (1)(b)  and for the issuance of supplemental licenses to child-caring
agencies  described  in ORS [ 418.205 (2)(a)(A) ] 418.215 (1)(a)  that also provide secure transportation
services as described in ORS [ 418.205 (2)(a)(B)] 418.215 (1)(b).
(3)(a) The following secure  transportation services providers are exempt from the requirements
under ORS 418.215 and 418.240 to obtain from the department a license or  a supplemental license
to provide secure transportation services:
(A) A secure nonemergency medical transportation provider.
(B) A child-caring agency that is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by  the department
to provide or engage in the provision of care or services to children if:
(i) The agency is not primarily engaged in the provision of secure transportation services;
(ii) The child being  transported or escorted resides in or is otherwise receiving services from
the agency; and
(iii) The transportation or escort is provided consistent with the rules  adopted by the depart-
ment under this section.
(C) An ambulance service, as defined in ORS 682.025, that  is transporting a child in an ambu-
lance for the purpose of obtaining medical care for the child.
(D) A developmental disabilities residential facility if:
(i) The facility is not primarily engaged in the provision of secure transportation services;
(ii) The child being transported or escorted resides in or is otherwise  receiving services from
the facility; and
(iii) The transportation or escort  is provided consistent with the rules adopted by the depart-
ment under this section.
(b) The licensing exemptions under paragraph (a)(B)  and (D) of this subsection do not apply if
the child-caring agency or developmental  disabilities residential facility is transporting the child for
the purposes  of placing the child in a facility that is not licensed by the department or in a hospital
that is not licensed by the authority.
(4)(a) A secure transportation services provider, including a provider that is described in sub-
section (3) of this section, must  display the disclosure described in ORS 418.359 (2) in a conspicuous
[31]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
location in any advertisements or  promotional materials for its secure transportation services and
in each vehicle it uses to provide its secure transportation services if:
(A) The provider is not  licensed by the department under ORS 418.215 or 418.240 to provide
secure transportation services; and
(B) The provider holds itself out as being an Oregon provider of  secure transportation services,
including by registering in this  state the vehicles it uses in the provision of its secure transportation
services or representing or otherwise indicating in advertisements or promotional materials  that the
provider is based in this state, maintains a mailing address in this state  or is licensed, certified or
otherwise authorized by the department or the authority  to provide secure transportation services
or similar services in this state.
(b) The  disclosure under paragraph (a) of this subsection must also indicate that the secure
transportation services provider is not licensed by the department under ORS 418.215  or 418.240 to
provide secure transportation services and, if  applicable, the reason for the provider’s licensing ex-
emption under subsection (3) of this section.
(c) If a provider that is required to make a disclosure under this subsection is authorized by the
authority to provide secure transportation services, the provider’s disclosure under this  subsection
may, consistent with rules adopted by the authority, also include a statement  that the provider is
authorized by the authority to provide secure transportation services.
(5) The department  and the authority may adopt rules for the provision of secure transportation
services consistent with this section and ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.359 and 418.519 to 418.532.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 418.246 is amended to read:
418.246. (1) In addition to any requirements  for licensure established by the Department of Hu-
man Services, each outdoor youth program that is applying for licensure as a child-caring agency
shall file with the department a bond in the amount of $50,000 or 50 percent of the  program’s yearly
budget, whichever amount is less. The bond shall be issued by a surety company or an  insured in-
stitution, as defined in ORS 706.008, authorized to do business in this state.
(2) The bond required under subsection (1) of this section shall be continuous  until canceled and
shall remain in full force and unimpaired at all times to comply with this  section. The surety or
insured institution shall give the department  at least 30 days’ written notice before it cancels or
terminates its liability under the bond.
(3) An action on the bond may be brought by any person aggrieved by the  misconduct of an
outdoor youth program required to be licensed under ORS 418.205 to 418.327.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Outdoor youth program” means a program that provides, in an outdoor living  set-
ting, services to children who have behavioral problems, mental health  problems or problems
with abuse of alcohol or drugs.
(b) “Outdoor youth program” does not include any program, facility or activity:
(A) Operated by a governmental entity;
(B) Operated by or affiliated with the Oregon Youth Corps;
(C) Licensed by the Department of Human Services under  the authority of the depart-
ment other than ORS 418.205 to 418.327; or
(D) Operated by a youth job development organization, as defined in ORS 344.415.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 418.330 is amended to read:
418.330. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child” means:
[32]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) A person under 18 years of age;
(B) A person under  21 years of age if the Department of Human Services determines that the
person has a mental or physical disability that warrants the continuation of assistance; or
(C) A person who has attained 18 years of age and:
(i) On whose  behalf payments under this section were received prior to the person attaining 18
years of age, provided the person was at least 16 years of age at the time the payments commenced;
(ii) Has not attained 21 years of age; and
(iii)(I) Is completing secondary education or a program leading to an equivalent credential;
(II) Is enrolled in an institution or program that provides post-secondary or  vocational educa-
tion;
(III) Is participating in a program or activity designed to promote, or remove barriers to, em-
ployment;
(IV) Is employed for at least 80 hours per month; or
(V) Is incapable of doing any of the activities described in sub-sub-subparagraphs (I)  to (IV) of
this sub-subparagraph due to a medical condition,  which incapability is supported by regularly up-
dated documentation.
(b) “Nonrecurring adoption or guardianship expenses” means reasonable and  necessary adoption
or guardianship  fees, court costs, attorney fees and other expenses that are directly related to the
adoption of, or establishment of a guardianship for, a child with special needs and that are  not in-
curred in violation of state or federal law.
(2) The department may make payments to adoptive parents or guardians on behalf of  a child
placed for adoption or establishment of a  guardianship by the department, or placed for adoption
by an approved child-caring agency, as defined in ORS 418.205,  when the department determines:
(a) The child  has special needs because of an impediment to adoptive placement or establishment
of a guardianship by reason of the child’s physical or mental  condition, race, age, or membership in
a sibling group; or
(b) The adoptive  family or guardian is capable of providing the permanent family relationships
needed by  the child in all respects other than financial, and the needs of the child are beyond the
economic ability and resources of the family.
(3) Payments to subsidize adoptions or guardianships made under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Shall include payment  of nonrecurring adoption or guardianship expenses incurred by or on
behalf of adoptive parents or guardians in connection with the  adoption of, or establishment of a
guardianship for, a child with special needs;
(b) May include, but are not limited to,  the maintenance costs, medical and surgical expenses,
and other costs incidental to the care, training and education of the child;
(c) May not exceed the cost of providing comparable assistance in foster care; and
(d) May not be made:
(A) For a child who has not attained 18 years of age, when the  adoptive parents or guardians
are no longer legally responsible for the support of the child; or
(B) When the child is no longer receiving any support from the adoptive parents or guardians.
(4) Adoptive parents or guardians receiving payments under subsection (2) of  this section shall
inform the department of circumstances that would make the adoptive parents or guardians:
(a) Ineligible to receive the payments; or
(b) Eligible to receive the payments in a different amount.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 418.519 is amended to read:
[33]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
418.519. As used in ORS 418.519 to 418.532:
(1) “Certified foster home” means a foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645.
(2) “Chemical  restraint” means a drug or medication that is administered to a child in care to
control behavior or restrict freedom of movement.
(3) “Child-caring agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.205.
(4) “Child in care” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.257.
(5) “Children’s emergency safety intervention specialist” means a qualified  mental health pro-
fessional licensed to order, monitor and  evaluate the use of seclusion and restraint in accredited and
certified facilities that provide intensive mental health  treatment services to individuals under 21
years of age.
(6) “Developmental disabilities residential facility” has the meaning given  that term in ORS
[418.257] 418.205.
(7)(a) “Involuntary seclusion” means the confinement of a child  in care alone in a room or an
enclosed space from which the child in care is prevented from leaving by any means.
(b) “Involuntary seclusion” does  not include age-appropriate discipline, including, but not limited
to, time-out if the time-out is in a setting from which the child in care is not prevented from leaving
by any means.
(8) “Mechanical restraint” means  a device used to restrict the movement of a child in care or
the movement or normal function of a portion of the body of a child in care.
(9) “Proctor foster home” means a foster home certified by a child-caring agency  under ORS
418.248.
(10) “Program” means:
(a) A child-caring agency;
(b) A proctor foster home; or
(c) A developmental disabilities residential  facility that is a residential training home or facility
licensed under ORS 443.415 to serve children under 18 years of age.
(11) “Prone restraint” means a  restraint in which a child in care is held face down on the floor.
(12) “Reportable injury” means any type  of injury to a child in care, including but not limited
to rug burns, fractures, sprains, bruising, pain, soft tissue injury, punctures,  scratches, concussions,
abrasions, dizziness, loss of consciousness, loss of vision, visual disturbance or death.
(13) “Restraint” means the physical restriction of a child in care’s actions or  movements by
holding the child in care or using pressure or other means.
(14) “Secure adolescent inpatient treatment program” means a child-caring agency  that is an
intensive treatment services program, as described by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, that
provides inpatient psychiatric stabilization and treatment services to individuals under  21 years of
age who require a secure intensive treatment setting.
(15) “Secure children’s  inpatient treatment program” means a child-caring agency that is an in-
tensive treatment services program, as described by the authority by rule, that provides inpatient
psychiatric stabilization and treatment services to children under  14 years of age who require a
secure intensive treatment setting.
(16) “Serious  bodily injury” means any significant impairment of the physical condition of an
individual, as determined by  qualified medical personnel, whether self-inflicted or inflicted by some-
one else.
(17) “Supine restraint” means a restraint in which a child in care is held face up on the floor.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 418.625 is amended to read:
[34]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
418.625. As used in ORS 418.625 to 418.645:
(1) “Certificate” means a written approval to  operate a foster home issued by the Department
of Human Services on a form  prescribed by the department that states the name of the foster parent,
the address  of the premises to which the certificate applies and the maximum number of children
to be maintained or boarded in the foster home at any one time.
(2) “Department” means the Department of Human Services.
(3)(a) “Foster home” means any home maintained by a person who has under the  care of the
person in the  home any child under the age of 21 years unattended by the child’s parent or guardian,
for the purpose of providing the child with care, food and lodging[ , but does not include: ].
(b) “Foster home” does not include:
[(a)] (A)  Any boarding school that is essentially and primarily engaged in educational work;
[(b)] (B)  Any home in which a child is provided board and room by a school board;
[(c)] (C)  Any foster home under the direct supervision of a child-caring agency or institution
certified by the department;
[(d)] (D)  Any home under the direct supervision of a  custodial parent for the purpose of pro-
viding respite care as defined by rule;
[(e)] (E)  Any developmental disability child foster home as defined in ORS 443.830; or
[(f)] (F)  Any home of a provider of respite services, as defined in ORS [ 418.205] 418.215 (2)(b),
for parents pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS 109.056.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 419B.005 is amended to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any assault, as defined  in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a child that
has been caused by other than accidental means,  including any injury that appears to be at variance
with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any mental injury to a child, which shall include only cruel or unconscionable acts or
statements made, or  threatened to be made, to a child if the acts, statements or threats result in
severe harm to the child’s psychological, cognitive, emotional or social well-being and functioning.
(C) Rape of a child,  which includes but is not limited to rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Allowing, permitting, encouraging  or hiring a child to engage in prostitution as de-
scribed in ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act as defined in ORS 163.266, to  purchase sex
with a minor as described in ORS 163.413 or  to engage in commercial sexual solicitation as
described in ORS 167.008;
[(i)] (ii)  Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a  minor, as defined in ORS chapter 163[ ,
and]; or
(iii)(I) Any other conduct that allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces  or encourages a
child to engage in [ the performing for people to observe or the  photographing, filming, tape recording
or other exhibition that ] a  performance to be observed, photographed, filmed, tape recorded or
otherwise exhibited, if the performance , in whole or in part, depicts  sexual conduct or contact,
as defined  in ORS 167.002 or described in ORS 163.665 and 163.670, sexual abuse involving a child
or rape of a child[ , but not including ].
(II) As used in this sub-subparagraph, “conduct” does not  include any conduct that is part
[35]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of any investigation conducted pursuant  to ORS 419B.020 or that is designed to serve educational
or other legitimate purposes[ ; and ].
[(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring a child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a  commercial sex act as defined in ORS 163.266, to purchase sex with a minor as
described in ORS  163.413 or to engage in commercial sexual solicitation as described in ORS
167.008.]
(F) Negligent treatment or  maltreatment of a child, including but not limited to the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care that  is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm  to a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial risk of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful  exposure to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to the unlawful
manufacturing of a cannabinoid  extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child to a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
(K) The restraint or seclusion of a child in violation of ORS 339.285, 339.288,  339.291, 339.303
or 339.308.
(L) The infliction of corporal punishment on a child in violation of ORS 339.250 (9).
(b) “Abuse” does not include  reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is a child in care, as defined in ORS 418.257.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment of  the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the receipt  of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or physician associate licensed under ORS chapter 677 or  naturopathic physician,
including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed practical  nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
[36]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the Department of Human Services, Oregon Health  Authority, Department of
Early Learning and Care, Department of Education, Youth Development Division,  the Oregon Youth
Authority, a local health department, a community mental health program, a  community develop-
mental disabilities  program, a county juvenile department, a child-caring agency as that term is de-
fined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) Court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) Child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) Elected official of a branch of government of  this state or a state agency, board, commission
or department of a branch of government of this state or of  a city, county or other political subdi-
vision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards  and Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) Operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) Operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or organization  facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS [ 418.205] 418.215 (2)(b), for parents pursuant to a properly executed power of at-
torney under ORS 109.056.
(bb) Employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services or activities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or camp that is operated under the guidance, supervision or  auspices of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined in  ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or hu-
man trafficking.
(cc) Coach, assistant coach or  trainer of an amateur, semiprofessional or professional athlete,
[37]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of  a school district board, an education service district board or a public charter
school governing body.
(hh) Individual who is paid by a public body, in accordance with ORS 430.215, to provide a ser-
vice identified in an individualized service plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
(jj) Parole and probation officer, as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(kk) Behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst licensed under ORS  676.810 or behavior
analysis interventionist registered by the Health Licensing Office under ORS 676.815.
(LL) Massage therapist, as defined in ORS 687.011.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 419B.005, as amended  by section 6, chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2023, section
65, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, and section 10, chapter 308, Oregon Laws 2025, is  amended to
read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any assault, as defined  in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a child that
has been caused by other than accidental means,  including any injury that appears to be at variance
with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any mental injury to a child, which shall include only cruel or unconscionable acts or
statements made, or threatened to be made, to a child if the acts, statements or threats  result in
severe harm to the child’s psychological, cognitive, emotional or social well-being and functioning.
(C) Rape of a child, which includes but is not limited to rape,  sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring a child to engage in  prostitution as de-
scribed in ORS  167.007 or a commercial sex act as defined in ORS 163.266, to purchase sex
with a minor as described in ORS 163.413  or to engage in commercial sexual solicitation as
described in ORS 167.008;
[(i)] (ii)  Contributing to the sexual delinquency of  a minor, as defined in ORS chapter 163[ ,
and]; or
(iii)(I) Any other conduct  that allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a
child to engage in [ the performing for people to observe or the photographing, filming, tape recording
or other exhibition that ] a performance to be observed, photographed,  filmed, tape recorded or
otherwise exhibited, if the performance , in whole or in part, depicts sexual conduct or contact,
as defined in ORS 167.002 or described in ORS 163.665 and 163.670, sexual abuse involving a  child
or rape of a child[ , but not including ].
(II) As used in this sub-subparagraph, “conduct” does not  include any conduct that is part
of any investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or that is  designed to serve educational
or other legitimate purposes[ ; and ].
[(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring a child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act as defined in ORS 163.266, to purchase sex with  a minor as
[38]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
described in ORS 163.413 or to engage in commercial sexual solicitation as described in ORS
167.008.]
(F) Negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child, including but not limited to  the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care  that is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm to a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial risk  of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful exposure to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to the  unlawful
manufacturing of a cannabinoid extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child  to a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
(K) The infliction of corporal punishment on a child in violation of ORS 339.250 (9).
(b) “Abuse” does not include  reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is a child in care, as defined in ORS 418.257.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment of  the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the receipt  of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or physician associate licensed under ORS chapter 677 or  naturopathic physician,
including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed practical  nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the Department of Human Services, Oregon Health  Authority, Department of
Early Learning and Care, Department of Education, Youth Development Division,  the Oregon Youth
Authority, a local health department, a community mental health program, a  community develop-
mental disabilities  program, a county juvenile department, a child-caring agency as that term is de-
fined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
[39]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) Court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) Child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) Elected official of a branch of government of  this state or a state agency, board, commission
or department of a branch of government of  this state or of a city, county or other political subdi-
vision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards and Practices  Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) Operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) Operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or  organization facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS [ 418.205] 418.215 (2)(b), for parents pursuant to a properly executed power of at-
torney under ORS 109.056.
(bb) Employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services or activities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or camp  that is operated under the guidance, supervision or auspices of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined in  ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or hu-
man trafficking.
(cc) Coach, assistant coach or trainer of an amateur,  semiprofessional or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of a school district board, an education service district board or a  public charter
school governing body.
[40]
SB 1534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
(hh) Individual who is paid by a public body, in accordance with ORS 430.215, to provide a ser-
vice identified in an individualized service plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
(jj) Parole and probation officer, as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(kk) Behavior analyst or  assistant behavior analyst licensed under ORS 676.810 or behavior
analysis interventionist registered by the Health Licensing Office under ORS 676.815.
(LL) Massage therapist, as defined in ORS 687.011.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 419C.620 is amended to read:
419C.620. (1) When required by the court, the Oregon  Youth Authority or a private agency
having guardianship or  legal custody of an adjudicated youth pursuant to court order shall file re-
ports on the adjudicated youth with the juvenile court that entered the original order  concerning
the adjudicated youth.
(2) A county juvenile department shall file  a report with the juvenile court under this section
if an  adjudicated youth remains under juvenile department care for six consecutive months from the
date of initial placement and:
(a) The county juvenile department is a county program, as defined in ORS [ 418.205] 418.215;
(b) The county juvenile department is participating in programs related to Title IV-E of the So-
cial Security Act;
(c) The county juvenile department has responsibility  for the care and placement of the adjudi-
cated youth; and
(d) The placement is not a detention facility.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 704.023 is amended to read:
704.023. In addition to  meeting the requirements in ORS 704.020, any person who provides out-
fitting and guiding services for outdoor youth programs,  as defined in ORS [ 418.205] 418.246, shall
furnish proof of a current child-caring agency license  for outdoor youth programs from the Depart-
ment of Human Services prior to being registered as an outfitter and guide.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 28. The unit captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 29. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[41]