Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “rural county” means a county in which no  mu-
nicipal police department exists.
(2) A resident or nonresident  individual shall be allowed a credit in the amount of $5,000
against taxes that are otherwise due under ORS chapter 316  if during the tax year the indi-
vidual is a duly sworn member of, and is  employed as a sheriff’s deputy for an average of
at least 20 hours per week by, a sheriff’s department in a rural county.
(3) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules relating  to the administration and
enforcement of this section. The department shall prescribe a form that  requires the sheriff
of the county in  which the taxpayer is employed to certify that the individual qualifies for
the credit allowed under this section.
(4) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax  liability of the taxpayer
and may not be carried forward to another tax year.
(5) A nonresident shall be  allowed the credit under this section in the proportion provided
in ORS 316.117. If a change in the status of a taxpayer  from resident to nonresident or from
nonresident to resident occurs, the credit  allowed by this section shall be determined in a
manner consistent with ORS 316.117.
(6) A credit  may not be allowed under this section for any tax year for which a credit is
claimed under ORS 315.622.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 989