Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
On or before January 1, 2027, the Land Conservation and Development
Commission shall adopt one or more model ordinances under ORS  197A.025 by which a city
with a population of  less than 25,000 may add lands to its urban growth boundary under ORS
197.626, 197A.280, 197A.310 or 197A.312 or a statewide  land use planning goal related to
housing or urbanization.
SECTION 2.  ORS  197A.025, as amended by section 38, chapter 102, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
197A.025. (1) In adopting rules under ORS  chapter 197A and statewide planning goals relating
to housing or urbanization, or  administering the rules or statutes, the Land Conservation and De-
velopment Commission and Department of Land Conservation  and Development shall be guided by
the following principles:
(a) Housing  that is safe, accessible and affordable in the community of their choice should be
available to every Oregonian.
(b) Building enough equitable housing must be a top priority.
(c) The  development and implementation of the housing production strategy should be the focal
point by which the department collaborates with local governments  to address and eliminate local
barriers to housing production.
(d) Expertise, technical assistance, model ordinances and other tools and resources  to address
housing production  should be provided to local governments, using cooperative planning tools em-
bodied in ORS 197A.103 and 197A.130, but not to the exclusion of the expedient use of enforcement
authority, including compliance orders under ORS 197.319 to 197.335.
(e) Housing production should  support fair and equitable housing outcomes, environmental jus-
tice, climate resilience and access to opportunity.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1179
SB 1136
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
(f) Housing production should not be  undermined by litigation, regulatory uncertainty or repet-
itive or unnecessary procedures.
(g) Local governments, to the greatest extent possible,  should take actions within their control
to facilitate the production of housing to meet housing production targets under ORS 184.455.
(2) Each public body, as defined in ORS  174.109, shall use its authority to remove barriers to,
and to create pathways for, the development of needed housing and shall collaborate  with the de-
partment and local governments to identify and implement strategies to support housing  production
where there is insufficient housing production and choice.
(3) In adopting rules implementing ORS chapter 197A and statewide land use  goals relating to
housing and urbanization, the commission may approve  a range of methodologies, policy options ,
model ordinances or assumptions that a local government may adopt in determining:
(a) Needed housing;
(b) Housing production strategies or housing coordination strategies;
(c) Buildable lands or housing capacity;
(d) Amendments to urban growth boundaries, including under  ORS 197A.215, 197A.270 (5)(a),
197A.285, 197A.300 to 197A.325, 197A.350 (6)(a) and 197A.362; or
(e) Adoption or amendments to urban reserves or  rural reserves under ORS 197A.230 to
197A.250.
(4) A land use regulation that substantially uses the language  in a model ordinance that
was adopted by rule of the commission under this section may  not be appealed on the basis
that it does not comply with a statute or statewide land use planning goal that it implements,
unless the rule that establishes the model ordinance is invalidated under ORS 183.400 or
substantially amended or repealed by the commission.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]