Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Youth Apprenticeship is established.
(2) The task force consists of 13 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from  among the members of
the Senate, including one member from the majority party and one member from the mi-
nority party.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives, including one member  from the majority party
and one member from the minority party.
(c) The  Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries, shall appoint the following
nine members:
(A) A representative of the Bureau of Labor and Industries;
(B) A representative of the Department of Education;
(C) A representative of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission;
(D) A representative of employer interests;
(E) A representative of labor interests;
(F) A student who has participated in a youth apprenticeship program;
(G) A representative of an  organization that supports the interests of youth and young
adults;
(H) A representative  with experience and involvement in workforce development initi-
atives; and
(I) A social services representative.
(3) The task force  shall perform a comprehensive study of youth apprenticeship programs
in the  United States including the youth workforce development activities and investments
occurring in this state.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3155
HB 3181
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) At a minimum, the task force shall examine:
(a) Inefficiencies and barriers within the existing youth apprenticeship system that  in-
hibit accessibility, transferability and implementation of  youth apprenticeship programs
across high schools and post-secondary institutions;
(b) Processes for developing consistent criteria and standards for  youth apprenticeship
programs;
(c) Best practices for approving youth apprenticeship programs;
(d) A youth apprenticeship system that provides flexibility in the administration of adult
apprenticeship programs designed to include adults 18 to 24 years of age and  youth appren-
ticeship programs designed for high school students and students in post-secondary insti-
tutions, including:
(A) Ways to increase coordination across those programs; and
(B) Flexible options to obtain industry-recognized credentials for students who enter into
a youth apprenticeship program  during high school but who will not complete the program
before the student’s expected high school graduation date;
(e) The methods used to measure the terms of apprenticeship, including:
(A) Time-based approaches that require a specified minimum number of  hours of on-
the-job learning;
(B) Competency-based approaches that measure skill acquisition  through an apprentice’s
successful demonstration of acquired skills and knowledge; and
(C) Hybrid approaches that combine the time-based and competency-based approaches;
(f) How best to increase coordination between state agencies that support youth appren-
ticeship program initiatives to maximize participation  in such programs and promote full
access to the services and benefits made available through such programs;
(g) Potential funding sources for supporting youth apprenticeship programs,  including
existing funding sources that may be leveraged to provide such support; and
(h) Available funding streams for businesses that  may be used to reduce barriers to
participation in youth apprenticeship programs.
(5) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The President of the Senate and the Speaker  of the House of Representatives shall
select one member of the task force  to serve as chairperson and another to serve as vice
chairperson, with the duties and powers necessary for the performance of the functions  of
the offices as the President and the Speaker determine.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee  of the Legislative
Assembly related to  business and labor no later than December 1, 2026. The report must in-
clude:
[2]
HB 3181
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
(a) An evaluation and findings from the study described under this section regarding
youth apprenticeship programs in other states and regions that could serve  as a model for
youth apprenticeship programs in this state.
(b) Recommendations for addressing barriers  to implementing a robust youth appren-
ticeship system in this state, including any recommendations  for changes to statutes, ad-
ministrative rules and education and outreach efforts.
(c) Identified best practices for administering youth apprenticeship programs.
(d) An assessment of the feasibility  of establishing a youth apprenticeship framework
that is capable of being implemented on a statewide basis.
(12)(a) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall provide  staff support to the
task force.
(b) The director may contract  with a third party to assist the task force in conducting
the study described under this section.
(13) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task  force are entitled to compensation or reimbursement for ex-
penses as provided in ORS 292.495.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]