Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 319.020 is amended to read:
319.020. (1) Subject to subsections (2) to (4) of this section, in addition to the taxes  otherwise
provided for by law, every dealer engaging in the dealer’s own name, or in  the name of others, in
the first  sale, use or distribution of motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel or withdrawal of motor vehicle
fuel or aircraft fuel for  sale, use or distribution within areas in this state within which the state
lacks the power to tax the sale, use or distribution of motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel, shall:
(a) Not later than the 25th  day of each calendar month, render a statement to the Department
of Transportation of all motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel sold, used, distributed  or so withdrawn
by the dealer in  the State of Oregon as well as all such fuel sold, used or distributed in this state
by a purchaser thereof upon which sale, use or distribution the dealer has assumed liability for  the
applicable license tax during the  preceding calendar month. The dealer shall render the statement
to the department in the manner provided by the department by rule.
(b) Except as provided in ORS 319.270, pay a license tax computed on the basis of 30  cents per
gallon on the first  sale, use or distribution of such motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel so sold, used,
distributed or withdrawn as shown by such statement in the manner and  within the time provided
in ORS 319.010 to 319.430.
(2) When aircraft fuel is sold, used or distributed by a  dealer, the license tax shall be computed
on the basis of [ 11] 12 cents per gallon of fuel so sold, used or distributed, except that  when aircraft
fuel usable in aircraft operated by turbine engines (turbo-prop or  jet) is sold, used or distributed, the
tax rate shall be [ three] four cents per gallon.
(3) In lieu of claiming refund of the  tax paid on motor vehicle fuel consumed by such dealer in
nonhighway use as  provided in ORS 319.280, 319.290 and 319.320, or of any prior erroneous payment
of license tax  made to the state by such dealer, the dealer may show such motor vehicle fuel as a
credit or deduction on the monthly statement and payment of tax.
(4) The license tax computed on the basis of the sale, use, distribution or withdrawal of  motor
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2732
HB 2437
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vehicle or aircraft fuel may not be imposed  wherever such tax is prohibited by the Constitution or
laws of the United States with respect to such tax.
SECTION 2.  ORS 319.330 is amended to read:
319.330. (1) Whenever any  statement and invoices are presented to the Department of Trans-
portation showing that motor vehicle fuel or  aircraft fuel has been purchased and used in operating
aircraft engines and upon which the  full tax for motor vehicle fuel has been paid, the department
shall refund the tax paid, but only after deducting from the  tax paid [ 11] 12 cents for each gallon
of such fuel so purchased and used, except  that when such fuel is used in operating aircraft turbine
engines (turbo-prop or jet)  the deduction shall be [ three] four cents for each gallon. No deduction
provided under this subsection shall be  made on claims presented by the United States or on claims
presented where a satisfactory showing has been made to the department that such aircraft fuel  has
been used  solely in aircraft operations from a point within the State of Oregon directly to a point
not within any state of the United States. The amount so deducted  shall be paid on warrant of the
Oregon Department of  Administrative Services to the State Treasurer, who shall credit the amount
to the State Aviation Account for the purpose of carrying  out the provisions of the state aviation
law. Moneys credited to the account under this section are continuously appropriated to the  Oregon
Department of Aviation.
(2) If satisfactory evidence  is presented to the Department of Transportation showing that air-
craft fuel upon which the tax has been paid has been purchased and used solely  in aircraft oper-
ations from a point within the State of Oregon directly to a point not within any  state of the United
States, the department shall refund the tax paid.
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments to ORS 319.020 by  section 1 of this 2017 Act apply to
aircraft fuel sold, used or distributed on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2022.
(2) The amendments to ORS 319.330 by section 2 of this 2017 Act apply to fuel  purchased
and used in operating aircraft engines on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2022.
SECTION 4.  ORS 319.020, as amended by section 4, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2015,  is amended
to read:
319.020. (1)  Subject to subsections (2) to (4) of this section, in addition to the taxes otherwise
provided for by law, every dealer  engaging in the dealer’s own name, or in the name of others, in
the first  sale, use or distribution of motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel or withdrawal of motor vehicle
fuel or aircraft fuel for sale, use or distribution within areas in this state  within which the state
lacks the power to tax the sale, use or distribution of motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel, shall:
(a) Not later than the 25th day of each calendar month, render  a statement to the Department
of Transportation of all  motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel sold, used, distributed or so withdrawn
by the dealer in the State of Oregon as well as all such fuel sold, used or distributed  in this state
by a purchaser thereof upon which sale, use or distribution the dealer has assumed liability for  the
applicable license tax during the preceding calendar month. The dealer  shall render the statement
to the department in the manner provided by the department by rule.
(b) Except as  provided in ORS 319.270, pay a license tax computed on the basis of 30 cents per
gallon on the first sale, use or distribution of such motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel  so sold, used,
distributed or withdrawn as shown  by such statement in the manner and within the time provided
in ORS 319.010 to 319.430.
(2) When aircraft fuel is sold, used or distributed by a  dealer, the license tax shall be computed
on the basis of [ nine] 10 cents per  gallon of fuel so sold, used or distributed, except that when air-
craft fuel  usable in aircraft operated by turbine engines (turbo-prop or jet) is sold, used or distrib-
[2]
HB 2437
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
uted, the tax rate shall be [ one cent ] two cents  per gallon.
(3) In lieu of claiming refund of the tax paid on motor  vehicle fuel consumed by such dealer in
nonhighway use as  provided in ORS 319.280, 319.290 and 319.320, or of any prior erroneous payment
of license tax made to the state by such dealer, the dealer may show such motor vehicle fuel  as a
credit or deduction on the monthly statement and payment of tax.
(4) The  license tax computed on the basis of the sale, use, distribution or withdrawal of motor
vehicle or aircraft fuel may not be imposed wherever such  tax is prohibited by the Constitution or
laws of the United States with respect to such tax.
SECTION 5.  ORS 319.330, as amended by section 5, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2015,  is amended
to read:
319.330. (1) Whenever any  statement and invoices are presented to the Department of Trans-
portation showing that motor vehicle fuel or  aircraft fuel has been purchased and used in operating
aircraft engines and upon which the  full tax for motor vehicle fuel has been paid, the department
shall refund the tax paid, but only after deducting from the tax paid [ nine] 10 cents for each gallon
of such fuel so purchased and used, except  that when such fuel is used in operating aircraft turbine
engines (turbo-prop or jet) the deduction shall be [ one cent ] two cents  for each  gallon. No deduction
provided under this subsection shall be  made on claims presented by the United States or on claims
presented where a satisfactory showing has been made to the department that such aircraft fuel  has
been used  solely in aircraft operations from a point within the State of Oregon directly to a point
not within any state of the United States. The amount so deducted  shall be paid on warrant of the
Oregon Department of  Administrative Services to the State Treasurer, who shall credit the amount
to the State Aviation Account for the purpose of carrying  out the provisions of the state aviation
law. Moneys credited to the account under this section are continuously appropriated to the  Oregon
Department of Aviation.
(2) If satisfactory evidence  is presented to the Department of Transportation showing that air-
craft fuel upon which the tax has been paid has been purchased and used solely  in aircraft oper-
ations from a point within the State of Oregon directly to a point not within any  state of the United
States, the department shall refund the tax paid.
SECTION 6. (1) The amendments to ORS 319.020 by  section 4 of this 2017 Act apply to
aircraft fuel sold, used or distributed on or after January 1, 2022.
(2) The amendments to ORS 319.330 by section 5 of this 2017 Act apply to fuel  purchased
and used in operating aircraft engines on or after January 1, 2022.
SECTION 7. Section 8 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 836.
SECTION 8. (1) The following amounts are continuously appropriated to the Oregon De-
partment of Aviation for distribution in the manner prescribed in this section:
(a) Any amount of tax on aircraft fuel usable in aircraft operated  by turbine engines that
is computed on a basis in excess of three cents per gallon and  any amount of tax on all other
aircraft fuel that is  computed on a basis in excess of 11 cents per gallon, under ORS 319.020
(2); and
(b) Any amount of tax on aircraft fuel usable in aircraft operated by turbine  engines in
excess of three cents per gallon and any amount of tax on all other aircraft  fuel in excess
of 11 cents per gallon, that is deducted before the refunding of tax under ORS 319.330 (1).
(2)(a) The department may retain  five percent of the amounts described in subsection (1)
of this section for the costs of the department in administering this section.
(b) The remaining 95  percent of the amounts described in subsection (1) of this section
[3]
HB 2437
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
shall be distributed pursuant to subsections (3) of this section.
(3)(a) Ninety-five percent of the amounts described in subsection (2)(b) of  this section
shall be distributed for the following purposes:
(A) Aviation and space educational programs in schools in Oregon;
(B) Science, technology, engineering and math programs related to  aviation and aer-
onautics;
(C) Aviation flight training programs and certifications; and
(D) Aviation programs certified by the Federal Aviation Administration.
(b) Five percent shall be used for financial  assistance under ORS 836.015 for aviation and
aeronautics education programs and certifications.
(4) The department shall adopt rules for purposes of administering this section.
SECTION 9.
 Section 8 of this 2017 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) The following amounts are  continuously appropriated to the Oregon Department of
Aviation for distribution in the manner prescribed in this section:
(a) Any amount  of tax on aircraft fuel usable in aircraft operated by turbine engines that is
computed on a basis in excess of [ three cents ] one cent  per gallon and any amount of tax on all
other aircraft fuel that is computed on a basis  in excess of [ 11] nine cents per gallon, under ORS
319.020 (2); and
(b) Any amount of tax  on aircraft fuel usable in aircraft operated by turbine engines in excess
of [ three cents ] one cent  per gallon and any amount of tax on all other aircraft fuel in excess of
[11] nine cents per gallon, that is deducted before the refunding of tax under ORS 319.330 (1).
(2)(a) The department may retain five percent of the amounts described in subsection  (1) of this
section for the costs of the department in administering this section.
(b) The remaining 95 percent of the amounts described in subsection (1) of this section shall  be
distributed pursuant to subsections (3) of this section.
(3)(a) Ninety-five percent of the amounts described in subsection (2)(b) of this section shall  be
distributed for the following purposes:
(A) Aviation and space educational programs in schools in Oregon;
(B) Science, technology, engineering and math programs related to aviation and aeronautics;
(C) Aviation flight training programs and certifications; and
(D) Aviation programs certified by the Federal Aviation Administration.
(b) Five percent shall be used for financial assistance under ORS 836.015 for aviation  and aer-
onautics education programs and certifications.
(4) The department shall adopt rules for purposes of administering this section.
SECTION 10.
The amendments to section 8 of this 2017 Act by section 9 of this 2017 Act
become operative on January 1, 2022.
SECTION 11.  Section 7, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  (1) The following amounts shall be distributed in the manner prescribed in this section:
(a) Any amount of tax on aircraft fuel usable in aircraft operated by turbine engines  that is
computed on a basis [ in excess of one cent ] of more than one cent  but not more than three cents
per gallon and any amount of tax on all other aircraft fuel  that is computed on a basis [ in excess
of nine cents ] of more than nine cents but not more than 11 cents  per  gallon, under ORS 319.020
(2); and
(b) Any amount of tax on aircraft fuel usable  in aircraft operated by turbine engines [ in excess
of one cent ] of more than one cent but not more  than three cents  per gallon and any amount
[4]
HB 2437
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of tax  on all other aircraft fuel [ in excess of nine cents ] of more than nine cents but not more
than 11 cents  per gallon, that is deducted before the refunding of tax under ORS 319.330 (1).
(2) Applications for  distributions under this section may not be approved unless the applicant
demonstrates a commitment to contribute  at least five percent of the costs of the project to which
the application relates.  The Oregon Department of Aviation shall adopt rules for purposes of this
subsection.
(3)(a) The State Aviation Board shall establish  a review committee composed of one member
from each  of the area commissions on transportation chartered by the Oregon Transportation Com-
mission.
(b) The review committee shall meet as necessary to review applications for  distributions of
amounts pursuant to this section. The criteria specified in ORS 367.084 (3) apply to the review  pro-
cess of the review committee.
(c) The review committee shall recommend applications to  the State Aviation Board, which shall
select applications with the following priority:
(A) First, to applications filed pursuant to subsection (5)(a)(A) of this section;
(B) Second, to applications filed with respect to safety and infrastructure development; and
(C) Third, to applications filed with respect to aviation-related economic benefits related to air-
ports.
(4)(a) Five percent  of the amounts described in subsection (1) of this section are appropriated
to the Oregon  Department of Aviation for the costs of the department and the State Aviation Board
in administering this section.
(b) The remaining 95 percent of the amounts described in subsection (1) of this section shall  be
distributed pursuant to subsections (5) to (7) of this section.
(5)(a) Fifty percent  of the amounts described in subsection (4)(b) of this section shall be distrib-
uted for the following purposes:
(A) To assist airports in Oregon with match requirements  for Federal Aviation Administration
Airport Improvement Program grants.
(B) To make grants for emergency preparedness and  infrastructure projects, in accordance with
the Oregon Resilience Plan, including grants  for emergency management plan development, seismic
studies and emergency generators and similar equipment.
(C) To make grants for:
(i) Services critical or essential to aviation, including, but not  limited to, fuel, sewer, water and
weather equipment.
(ii) Aviation-related business development, including, but not limited to, hangars, parking for
business aircraft and related facilities.
(iii) Airport development for local economic benefit, including, but not  limited to, signs and
marketing.
(b) Priority in distributing grants shall be given to projects for which  applicants demonstrate a
commitment to contribute the  greatest amounts toward the costs of the projects to which the ap-
plications relate.
(6) Twenty-five percent  of the amounts described in subsection (4)(b) of this section shall be
distributed for the purpose of assisting commercial air service to rural Oregon.
(7) Twenty-five percent of the amounts described in subsection (4)(b) of this section  shall be
distributed to state-owned airports for the purposes of:
(a) Safety improvements recommended by the  State Aviation Board and local community air-
[5]
HB 2437
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
ports.
(b) Infrastructure projects at public use airports.
(8)(a) The State Aviation Board shall submit reports, in  the manner provided in ORS 192.245 and
paragraph (b) of this subsection, that describe in detail the projects for which applications have been
submitted and approved, the airports affected, the  names of the applicants and the persons who will
perform the work proposed in the applications, the progress of projects for which  applications have
been approved and  any other information the board considers necessary for a comprehensive anal-
ysis of the implementation of this section.
(b) The reports described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be submitted:
(A) Not later than February 10  of each year to the committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to air transportation; and
(B) Not later than  September 30 of each year to the interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to air transportation.
SECTION 12.
 Section 8, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2015 is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) Section 7 [ of this 2015 Act ], chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2015,  is repealed on  January
[2] 1, 2022.
(2) Amounts  described in section 7 (1) [ of this 2015 Act ], chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2015,  that
are uncommitted on the  date specified in subsection (1) of this section for distributions made pur-
suant to section 7 (5) to (7)  [ of this 2015 Act ], chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2015,  may be expended
as other aviation fuel tax revenues are expended.
SECTION 13. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[6]