Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Youth  Development Division, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000 to provide grants
to community-based youth development programs that inspire and enable all youth  to realize
their full  potential as productive, responsible and caring citizens through the development
of a positive self-image and self-reliance.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1061