Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act:
(1)(a) “Credit-eligible taxes” means ad valorem property taxes that are:
(A) Operating taxes as defined in ORS 310.055; or
(B) Local option taxes as defined in ORS 310.202.
(b) “Credit-eligible taxes” does not mean ad valorem property  taxes that are levied to
repay bonded indebtedness.
(2) “Eligible homestead” means residential property that:
(a) Is owned by a resident of this state described in section 2 (1) of this 2025 Act; and
(b) Would be  occupied by the resident as a primary residence, but for military service
described in section 2 (1) of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) A property tax credit is allowable for the homestead  of any resident of
this state who is:
(a) Serving in the Oregon National Guard,  military reserve forces or organized militia
of any other state or territory of the United States; and
(b) Performing service:
(A) Under Title 10 of the United  States Code or pursuant to a deployment made under
the authority of the Emergency Management Assistance Compact; and
(B) For more than 178  consecutive days, if at least one of the days falls within the
property tax year for which the tax credit is claimed.
(2)(a) Upon compliance with section 3 of this  2025 Act, and regardless of any value as-
sessed on the eligible homestead, a credit against the credit-eligible taxes  otherwise due on
an eligible homestead shall be allowed  for any property tax year in an amount equal to the
lesser of:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2258
SB 119
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The credit-eligible taxes due on the property; or
(B) $1,750.
(b) The maximum amount of the  credit allowable under paragraph (a) of this subsection
shall be adjusted annually by  the percentage, if any, by which the monthly averaged Con-
sumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as  published by the
Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department  of Labor, for the 12 consecutive
months ending August 31 of the property tax year for which the credit is  allowable exceeds
the monthly averaged index for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31, 2025.
(3)(a) The amount of the  tax credit used against the property taxes imposed on an eligible
homestead shall be withheld from the taxing districts of the code area in which the eligible
homestead is located according to the  percentage schedule prepared and filed under ORS
311.390.
(b) The total amount of the credit  shall be allocated proportionately among the credit-
eligible taxes to which it relates.
(c) For any partial payments of credit-eligible  taxes, the amount of the credit allowed
against the payment  shall be proportional to the percentage of the total taxes due that are
paid.
(d) If the amount of the credit exceeds the  credit-eligible taxes due on the eligible
homestead for the property tax  year, the excess may not be used in any succeeding property
tax year.
(4)(a) A resident currently receiving the partial exemption  against a homestead’s as-
sessed value granted  under ORS 307.286 may, for the succeeding property tax year, file a
claim for and receive  instead the tax credit allowed under this section against the credit-
eligible taxes imposed on the homestead.
(b) A homestead may not receive both the partial  exemption and the tax credit for any
property tax year.
(5) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that a tax credit allowed under this sec-
tion does not subject the eligible homestead to revaluation  under Article XI, section 11
(1)(c)(E) or (2), of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 3.
(1) Each resident  seeking the property tax credit allowable under section 2
of this 2025 Act shall file with the county assessor, on forms supplied by the assessor, a claim
in writing on or before August 1 following the end of the property tax year for which the tax
credit is claimed.
(2) A claim for the tax credit under section 2 of this 2025 Act shall:
(a) Designate the eligible homestead to which the tax credit will apply;
(b) Set forth the basis for eligibility of the claimant  and the homestead for the tax credit;
and
(c) Include a statement by the claimant, subject to the penalties for false  swearing under
ORS 162.075, that all information contained in the claim is true.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section and section  2 (1) of this 2025 Act, the
eligible homestead of  a resident described in section 2 (1) of this 2025 Act who files a claim
prior to the date on which the resident’s service begins shall be allowed  the tax credit if the
claimant has written orders that require the performance of service for at least one  day
during the property tax year for  which the tax credit is being claimed and the claimant and
the homestead are otherwise eligible for the tax credit.
[2]
SB 119
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section and section  2 (1) of this 2025 Act, an
individual, other than the eligible resident, who is lawfully occupying an eligible homestead
may file a claim for  the tax credit allowable under section 2 of this 2025 Act by the time
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section if the eligible resident died while performing  the
service described in section 2 (1)(b)(A)  of this 2025 Act during the current or preceding tax
year.
(b) The claim  shall be allowed by the county assessor if the eligible resident met all of
the requirements for a tax credit under section 2 of this 2025 Act prior to death,  other than
the number of consecutive days of service specified in section 2 (1)(b)(B) of this 2025 Act.
(5) The tax credit shall be allowed for the property tax year in which the claim is required
to be filed.
(6) If the credit-eligible taxes for the  property tax year for which the tax credit is allowed
have not been paid, the amount of the tax credit and any  interest on the amount shall be
abated.
(7)(a) If the credit-eligible taxes for the property tax  year for which the tax credit is al-
lowed have been paid without allowance of the tax credit, notwithstanding  section 2 (3)(d)
of this 2025 Act, the amount of the credit allowed shall be refunded  in the manner prescribed
in this subsection.
(b) The tax collector shall notify the governing body of the county of any refund  required
under this subsection and the governing body shall cause a refund of the credit-eligible taxes
and any interest paid on the taxes to be made from the unsegregated tax collections account
described in ORS 311.385.
(c) The refund shall be made without interest.
(d) Refund amounts shall be withheld from the taxing districts of  the code area in which
the eligible homestead is located according to  the percentage schedule prepared and filed
under ORS 311.390.
(e) The county assessor and tax collector shall make the  necessary corrections in the
records of their offices.
SECTION 4.
Property tax credits under sections 1 to 3 of this  2025 Act may be allowed
against credit-eligible taxes due for property tax years beginning on or after July 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. (1) Except as provided in ORS 307.289 (4), an initial year  of partial exemption
under ORS 307.286 may not be granted for property  tax years beginning on or after July 1,
2026.
(2) Notwithstanding the sunset date provided in subsection (1)  of this section, a home-
stead that is  granted a partial exemption for the property tax year beginning on July 1, 2025,
shall continue to receive the partial exemption for as long as  the resident and the homestead
qualify for it under ORS 307.286.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]