Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 468A.360, the Environmental Quality Commission
may not  adopt, pursuant to section 177 of the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7507, a motor
vehicle emission standard to implement any standard adopted by the State of  California re-
quiring that any or all new medium- or heavy-duty vehicles sold in this state  be zero-
emission vehicles.
(2) The Department of Environmental Quality may not enforce a motor vehicle  emission
standard described in subsection (1) of this section  adopted by the commission prior to the
effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2315