Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Definitions. As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Chargemaster”  means a list maintained by a hospital that contains all items and
services for which the hospital has established a standard charge.
(2) “Deidentified maximum negotiated charge” means  the highest standard charge that
a hospital has negotiated with all third-party payors for an item or service.
(3) “Deidentified minimum negotiated charge”  means the lowest standard charge that a
hospital has negotiated with all third-party payors for an item or service.
(4) “Discounted  cash price” means a standard charge for an item or service that a hos-
pital charges to an individual who pays out of pocket.
(5) “Gross charge” means a standard charge for an  item or service listed in a hospital’s
chargemaster, absent any discounts.
(6) “Item or service” means an item  or service offered or provided by a hospital to a
patient in connection with an inpatient admission or outpatient visit.
(7) “Machine readable file” means a digital representation of information in a  file that
can be easily imported or read into a computer system for further processing  without any
additional preparation.
(8) “Payor-specific  negotiated charge” means a standard charge that a hospital has ne-
gotiated with a third-party payor for an item or service.
(9) “Standard charge” means a regular rate or price established by a hospital for an item
or service provided by the hospital to a specific group of patients.
(10) “Third-party payor” means an entity that is, by statute, contract or agreement,  le-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4293
SB 1060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
gally responsible for payment of claim for an item or service.
SECTION 2.
List of standard  charges required. A hospital licensed in this state shall es-
tablish, update and make public a list of standard charges, as provided  under sections 3 and
4 of this 2025 Act and rules adopted by the Oregon Health Authority.
SECTION 3. List of  standard charges; machine-readable file.  (1)(a) A hospital licensed in
this state  shall establish, update and make public a machine-readable file that contains a list
of all standard charges, expressed in dollar amounts, for items and services  offered or pro-
vided by the hospital.
(b) If a hospital has a different set of standard charges  for different locations operated
by the hospital, the hospital shall make public a separate machine-readable file for each  lo-
cation that has a different set of standard charges.
(c) A list of standard charges must identify  and distinguish between charges for inpatient
and outpatient services, as applicable.
(2) A list of standard charges must include for  each item and service the following in-
formation:
(a) A description of the item or service;
(b) The gross charge;
(c) The payor-specific  negotiated charge for each third-party payor, type of payor and
coverage plan;
(d) The deidentified minimum negotiated charge;
(e) The deidentified maximum negotiated charge;
(f) The discounted cash price; and
(g) All codes used by the hospital  for purposes of accounting or billing for the item or
service, including the current procedural terminology (CPT)  code, healthcare common pro-
cedure coding system (HCPCS) code, diagnosis related group (DRG) code, national drug code
(NDC) or other common identifier.
(3) A list of standard charges must contain the following general information:
(a) The hospital’s name;
(b) The hospital’s licensing number;
(c) Names and addresses  of the hospital’s facilities for which the list of standard charges
applies; and
(d) The date that the list of standard charges was made public or last updated.
(4) The Oregon Health Authority may by rule require or specify:
(a) Additional information to be included in a list of standard charges; or
(b) The form, manner, format, layout or file in which a list of standard charges must be
made public.
(5)(a) A hospital shall make public a list of standard charges by publishing  the list of
standard charges in  a single digital file to the hospital’s website or, if the hospital does not
have a website, on a website for the purpose of making public the list of standard charges.
(b) The digital file must be in a machine-readable format and digitally searchable.
(c) The digital file must be accessible:
(A) Free of charge;
(B) Without requiring a person to establish a user account or password;
(C) Without requiring a person to submit personal identifying information; and
(D) To automated searches and direct file downloads.
[2]
SB 1060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) A hospital shall provide each file that the hospital establishes  or updates to the au-
thority and certify with the authority  that the information contained within the hospital’s
list of standard charges is true, accurate and complete as of the date the list  is made public
or updated.
SECTION 4.
List of standard charges for shoppable services.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Ancillary service” means an item  or service that a hospital customarily provides as
part of or in conjunction with a shoppable service.
(b) “Shoppable service” means a service offered by a hospital that a  person can schedule
in advance. A service may be an aggregation of items and services that are offered by  a
hospital as a single service.
(2) A hospital licensed in this state shall  establish, update and make public a list of
standard charges  for shoppable services offered by the hospital as required under this sec-
tion.
(3) A list of standard charges for shoppable  services must include at least 300 shoppable
services out of the shoppable services offered by the hospital. In choosing the shoppable
services to place on the list of  standard charges, a hospital shall consider the frequency at
which the hospital provides a shoppable service. If a hospital does not offer 300  shoppable
services, the list of standard charges for shoppable services must include all shoppable ser-
vices offered by the hospital.
(4) A list of standard charges  for shoppable services must include any shoppable service
offered by the hospital that is specified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid  Services
pursuant to section 2718 of the federal Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. 300gg-18.  A
shoppable service described under this subsection that is on  a list of standard charges shall
count towards the number of shoppable  services required to be listed under subsection (3)
of this section.
(5) A list of standard charges for shoppable services offered by a hospital must  include
for each shoppable service, and associated ancillary  services as applicable, the following in-
formation:
(a) A plainly worded description of the shoppable service;
(b) If applicable, information that a shoppable service described under subsection (4) of
this section is not offered by the hospital;
(c) The names and addresses of the hospital’s facilities where the shoppable  service is
provided;
(d) The payor-specific negotiated charge for each third-party payor, type  of payor and
coverage plan;
(e) The discounted cash price or gross charge  if a hospital does not offer a discounted
cash price;
(f) The deidentified minimum negotiated charge;
(g) The deidentified maximum negotiated charge;
(h) Whether the standard charges for  the shoppable service apply to an inpatient or
outpatient setting; and
(i) All codes  used by the hospital for purposes of accounting or billing for the item or
service, including the current procedural  terminology (CPT) code, healthcare common pro-
cedure coding system (HCPCS) code, diagnosis related group (DRG) code, national drug code
(NDC) or other common identifier.
[3]
SB 1060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) A hospital shall make public a list  of standard charges for shoppable services by
publishing the list of standard charges to the  hospital’s website or, if the hospital does not
have a website, on a website for the purpose of making public the list of shoppable  services.
The list of standard charges must be:
(a) Accessible:
(A) Free of charge;
(B) Without requiring a person to establish a user account or password; and
(C) Without requiring a person to submit personal identifying information; and
(b) Searchable by service description, billing code and payor.
SECTION 5.
Reporting requirements; audit. (1) Each time  a hospital licensed in this state
creates or updates a list of standard charges under section 3 or 4  of this 2025 Act, the hos-
pital shall provide the list, and a report on the  list, to the Oregon Health Authority. The
authority shall prescribe the form in which the updated list and report is to be provided. A
list that includes less than 95 percent of all values required under section 3 or 4 of  this 2025
Act shall be considered insufficient to meet the requirements under this subsection.
(2) The authority shall retain a list of standard  charges, and any additional records, that
the authority receives under this section for at least  five years from the date the authority
receives the list and records.
(3) The authority may audit a hospital’s publicly available website to  determine compli-
ance with the provisions of sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
Actions to  remedy violations. (1) If the Oregon Health Authority determines
that a hospital is in violation of a provision of sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act, the authority
shall issue to the hospital a written notice of  violation. The notice shall clearly explain the
manner in which the hospital is in violation and whether the authority requires the  hospital
to take immediate action to remedy the violation or submit a corrective action plan.
(2) If a hospital is required to take immediate action to  remedy a violation, the hospital
shall confirm with the authority when the hospital has remedied the violation.
(3) If a hospital is  required to submit a corrective action plan, the hospital shall submit
to the authority a corrective action plan within 30 days from  the date of the notice of vio-
lation and complete the corrective action plan no later than the date  specified by the au-
thority.
SECTION 7.
Submission of complaints. The Oregon Health Authority shall establish an
electronic form that individuals may use to submit complaints to  the authority for alleged
violations of sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act  and make the form publicly available on the
authority’s website.
SECTION 8. Noncompliane; prohibition on collecting debt. (1) As used in this section,
“item or service” has the meaning given that term in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(2) A hospital licensed in this state may not initiate or pursue  a collection action for a
debt owed on an item or service if the hospital is not in compliance with the provisions of
sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act on the date that the item or service is provided  or purchased.
(3)(a) A  person may bring an individual action in an appropriate court against a hospital
licensed in this state if:
(A) The hospital initiates  or pursues a collection action against the person for a debt
owed on an item or service; and
(B) The hospital was not in compliance with the provisions of sections 1 to  5 of this 2025
[4]
SB 1060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
Act on the date that the item or service were provided or purchased.
(b) In an individual action brought under this subsection, the  court shall determine
whether the hospital was in compliance with the provisions of sections 1 to 5 of this 2025
Act, as related to the item or service that was provided or purchased, on the date  that the
item or service was provided or purchased. If the  court finds that the hospital was not in
compliance with the provisions of sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act, as related to the item  or
service that was provided or purchased, on the date that the item or service was  provided
or purchased, the court shall:
(A) Order  the hospital to dismiss with prejudice any court action that the hospital has
open seeking to collect the debt owed on the item or service;
(B) Order the hospital to refund any amount paid  to the hospital for the item or service;
(C) Award the person an  amount equal to three times the amount of the debt that the
hospital sought to collect in initiating or pursuing a collection action against the person;  and
(D) Award reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred.
(4) Individual actions brought  under subsection (3) of this section shall be commenced
within one year from the date the hospital last took a collection action against the person.
(5) Upon commencement of any individual action brought under subsection (3)  of this
section, the  clerk of the court shall mail a copy of the complaint or other initial pleading to
the Oregon Health Authority and, upon entry of any judgment in the individual action, shall
mail a copy of such judgment to the authority.
SECTION 9.
Civil penalties. (1) A hospital that fails to perform as required under sections
1 to 6 of this 2025 Act and  rules adopted by the Oregon Health Authority may be subject to
a civil penalty.
(2) The authority shall adopt  a schedule of civil penalties not to exceed $5,000 per day of
violation that are based on the severity of the violation and the  number of previous vio-
lations.
(3) Civil penalties imposed under this section shall be  imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
(4) Civil penalties imposed  under this section may be remitted or mitigated upon such
terms and conditions as the authority considers proper and consistent with the public health
and safety.
(5) Civil penalties incurred under this  section are not allowable as costs for the purpose
of rate determination or for reimbursement by a third-party payor.
SECTION 10.
Captions. The section captions  used in this 2025 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory  law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[5]