Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health Authority shall contract with a third  party that has ex-
perience and recognized expertise in corporate restructuring to examine the structure  of the
agency and make recommendation for changes to  the structure to improve efficiency and
responsiveness of the agency. The authority shall  report the findings of the contractor, in
the manner provided by ORS 192.245, which may include recommendations for legislation, to
the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to health no later than Septem-
ber 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3122