Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Forestry Department may enter into a lease  agreement with the
United States Forest Service or other relevant federal agency to assume management  au-
thority and responsibility for the Ochoco National Forest for no less than 15 years.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4525