Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2, 3 and 4 of this 2017 Act are added to  and made a part of the
Oregon Vehicle Code.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish a State Parks  regis-
tration plate program to issue special  registration plates called “State Parks registration
plates” upon request to owners of motor vehicles registered under ORS 803.420 (1). In addi-
tion, the department may adopt rules for issuance of State Parks  registration plates for ve-
hicles not registered under ORS 803.420 (1).
(2) In addition to any other fee authorized by law, for each State Parks  registration plate
issued under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall collect a surcharge of $40
per year of registration, payable when the plate is issued and upon each  subsequent renewal
of registration of a vehicle bearing the  plate. The department shall distribute the surcharge
as provided in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 803.530, State Parks registration plates may be transferred from
vehicle to vehicle if the department stops issuing the  plates, as long as the plates are not
so old, damaged, mutilated  or otherwise rendered illegible as to be not useful for purposes
of identification.
SECTION 3.
Moneys from the surcharge imposed by section 2 of this 2017  Act shall be
transferred to the State  Parks and Recreation Department Fund established under ORS
390.134, after  deduction of the cost of administration of the State Parks registration plate
program, including but not limited to the costs of collecting the State Parks registration
plate surcharge and transferring State Parks registration plates that  are above the normal
costs of issuing, renewing and transferring  registration plates in the normal course of busi-
ness of the Department of Transportation.
SECTION 4. (1) The Department of Transportation, after consultation  with the State
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2461
SB 417
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Parks and Recreation Department, shall design the State Parks registration plates  issued
under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Except as otherwise required by subsection (1) of  this section, State Parks registra-
tion plates shall comply with the requirements of ORS 803.535.
SECTION 5. (1) There is appropriated to the Department of Transportation,  for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for the
purpose of initiating the State Parks registration plate program established under  section 2
of this 2017 Act, including but not limited to the State Parks registration plate design,  com-
puter programming and production  setup. Any portion of the appropriation not used for ini-
tiating the State Parks registration plate program shall be  transferred to the account
described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding section 3 of this 2017 Act, after deduction  of the cost of adminis-
tration of the State Parks registration plate program, as described in section 3  of this 2017
Act, the department shall transfer the moneys  from the surcharge imposed by section 2 of
this 2017 Act to an account in the General Fund until sufficient funds have accumulated  for
the purpose described in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) When the department determines that moneys in sufficient amount are available in
the account described in subsection (2) of this section, but  no later than June 30, 2019, the
department shall reimburse the General Fund, without interest, in an  amount equal to the
amount appropriated from the General Fund under subsection (1) of this section. The moneys
used to reimburse the General Fund under this  subsection may not be considered a budget
item on which a limitation is otherwise fixed by law, but shall  be in addition to any specific
biennial appropriation or amount authorized to be expended from continuously appropriated
moneys for any biennial period.
(4) Any moneys remaining in  the account described in subsection (2) of this section after
the reimbursement required under  subsection (3) of this section shall be transferred to the
State Parks and Recreation Department Fund as provided in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6.  ORS 390.124 is amended to read:
390.124. (1) In accordance  with any applicable provision of ORS chapter 183, the State Parks and
Recreation Commission may adopt rules necessary to  carry out the duties, functions and powers
imposed by law upon the commission  and the State Parks and Recreation Department. Rules adopted
pursuant to this section shall be duly entered in the minutes and records of the commission.
(2) The commission  may adopt rules that assess reasonable charges for the use of areas estab-
lished and maintained  by the department. The department may also adopt rules establishing re-
ductions in waivers of or exemption from the charges. However, the commission shall  authorize the
use of any state park, individual campsite or day use fee area without charge:
(a) Upon  the showing of proper identification, by a person maintaining a foster home, as defined
by ORS 418.625, and the person’s children, when accompanied by a  foster child residing in the home.
(b) Upon the showing  of proper identification, by a person maintaining a developmental disabil-
ity child foster home, as defined by  ORS 443.830, and the person’s children, when accompanied by
a foster child residing in the home.
(c) If a deed to, lease of or contract to use the property used as a  state park, campsite or day
use fee area prohibits the charging of fees for use of the property.
(d) Upon the showing of proper identification, by  either a disabled veteran or a person on leave
from military active duty status on Memorial Day, Independence Day or Veterans Day.
[2]
SB 417
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Upon showing that the vehicle being used by the person has a registration  plate that
is a State Parks registration plate issued under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(3) The commission  shall adopt any rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183 that the commission
considers necessary to carry out ORS 273.563 to 273.591.
SECTION 7.  ORS 390.134 is amended to read:
390.134. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Camper” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.180.
(b) “County” includes a metropolitan service district organized under ORS chapter 268, but only
to the extent that the  district has acquired, through title transfer, and is operating a park or re-
creation site of a county pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement.
(c) “Motor home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.350.
(d) “Travel trailer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.565.
(2) The State Parks and Recreation Department Fund is established separate and distinct from
the General Fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State Parks and Recre-
ation Department for the purposes provided by law. The fund shall consist of the following:
(a) All moneys placed in the fund as provided by law. Any interest  or other income derived from
the depositing or other investing of the fund must be credited to the fund.
(b) All registration fees received by the Department of  Transportation for campers, motor homes
and travel trailers that are transferred to the fund  under ORS 366.512. The funds must be deposited
in a separate subaccount established under subsection (3) of this section.
(c) Revenue from charges pursuant to ORS 390.124.
(d) All funds received by the State Parks and Recreation Department under  ORS 390.141. The
funds must be deposited in a separate subaccount established under subsection (3) of this section.
(e) Funds transferred under section 3 of this 2017 Act from the issuance or renewal  of
the State Parks registration plates.
(3) Any moneys placed in the fund for a  particular purpose may be placed in a separate subac-
count  within  the fund. Each separate subaccount established under this subsection must be sepa-
rately accounted for. Moneys placed in a  subaccount must be used for the purposes for which they
are deposited.
(4) All of the moneys in the fund except those moneys described in subsection (3), (5), (6), (7), (8)
or (9) of this section must be deposited in  a separate subaccount within the fund and used by the
State Parks and Recreation Department for the acquisition, development, maintenance, care and use
of park and recreation sites. The moneys deposited in  the subaccount under this subsection must
be accounted for separately and stated separately in the State Parks and  Recreation Department’s
biennial budget.
(5)(a) Forty-five percent of the amount transferred to the State  Parks and Recreation Depart-
ment under  ORS 366.512 from the registration of travel trailers, campers and motor homes and under
ORS 803.601 from recreational vehicle trip permits must be deposited in a  separate subaccount
within the fund to be distributed for the acquisition, development, maintenance, care and  use of
county  park  and recreation sites. The moneys deposited in the subaccount under this paragraph
must be accounted for separately. The following apply to the distribution of moneys under this par-
agraph:
(A) The  moneys must be distributed among the several counties for the purposes described in
this paragraph. The distribution shall be  made at times determined by the State Parks and Recre-
ation Department but must be made not less than once a year.
[3]
SB 417
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The sums designated under this paragraph must be remitted to the county treasurers of  the
several counties by warrant.
(b) The department shall establish an  advisory committee to advise the department in the per-
formance of its duties under this subsection.  The composition of the advisory committee under this
subsection is as determined by the department by rule. In  determining the composition of the advi-
sory committee, the department shall attempt to provide  reasonable representation for county offi-
cials or employees with responsibilities relating to county parks and recreation sites.
(c) The  department, by rule, shall establish a program to provide moneys to counties for the
acquisition, development, maintenance, care and use of  county park and recreation sites. The rules
under this paragraph shall provide for distribution of moneys based on use and need and,  as the
department determines necessary, on the need for  the development and maintenance of facilities to
provide camping sites for campers, motor homes and travel trailers.
(d) The counties may not use the  moneys received under this subsection to supplant moneys
otherwise made available to the  counties for the acquisition, development, maintenance, care and
use of county park and recreation sites.
(e) On or before January 15 of each odd-numbered year regular session of the Legislative As-
sembly, the State Parks and Recreation Director and a  representative of the directors of county
park and recreation sites shall submit a report to the Joint  Committee on Ways and Means created
by ORS 171.555, or the Joint Interim  Committee on Ways and Means, that describes the measurable
biennial and cumulative results of  county activities and programs financed by moneys transferred
to the counties from the registration of travel trailers, campers and motor homes and from recre-
ational vehicle trip permits. Notwithstanding  ORS 192.230 to 192.250, the report shall be made in a
manner as the committee may prescribe.
(6) The department shall create a separate City  and County Subaccount within the fund to be
used to reimburse cities and counties as provided in ORS 390.290.
(7) The department shall create a separate  rural Fire Protection District Subaccount to be used
to provide funds for the fire protection districts as provided in ORS 390.290.
(8) Twelve percent of the amount transferred to  the State Parks and Recreation Department
Fund from the Parks Subaccount shall be used only to carry out the purposes  and achievements
described in ORS 390.135 (2) and (3) through the awarding of grants to regional or local  government
entities to acquire property for  public parks, natural areas or outdoor recreation areas or to develop
or improve public parks, natural areas or outdoor recreation areas. Moneys  described in this sub-
section may not be used to  pay the cost of administering grants or the cost of any Secretary of State
audit required under section 4c, Article XV of the Oregon Constitution.
(9) If the amount transferred to the State Parks and Recreation Department Fund from the Parks
Subaccount during a biennium is more than 150 percent  of the amount that was transferred during
the 2009-2011 biennium, the State Treasurer shall, during the next following biennium, deposit for
use as described in  subsection (8) of this section the amount required under subsection (8) of this
section plus an amount equal to  the difference between the amount deposited for use as described
in subsection (8) of this section during the preceding biennium and 25 percent of  the moneys trans-
ferred to the State Parks and Recreation Department Fund  from the Parks Subaccount during the
preceding  biennium.
(10) Subsections (8) and  (9) of this section apply only for biennia in which the Legislative As-
sembly does not  require a greater percentage of the amount transferred to the State Parks and Re-
creation Department Fund from the  Parks Subaccount to be used for the purposes described in
[4]
SB 417
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
subsection (8) of  this section. The Legislative Assembly may not authorize the percentage of the
amount transferred to the State Parks and  Recreation Department Fund from the Parks Subaccount
that is deposited for use as described in subsection (8) of this section in a biennium to be less  than
the percentage required to be deposited under subsections (8) and (9) of this section.
(11) On or before January 15 of each odd-numbered year, the director shall submit a  report to
the Joint Committee on Ways  and Means created by ORS 171.555, or the Joint Interim Committee
on Ways and Means,  that describes the measurable biennial and cumulative results of activities and
programs financed by moneys transferred to the State Parks and Recreation Department  Fund from
the Parks Subaccount. Notwithstanding ORS 192.230 to 192.250, the director shall make the  report
in a form and manner as the committee may prescribe.
SECTION 8. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]