Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Land Conservation  and Development shall conduct a
study of the formation of a new city in the Stafford triangle area in Clackamas County.  The
department shall  submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to land use no later than September 15,  2026.
The report may include recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3539