Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Water Resources Department shall study the  decline of ground water
levels. The department shall submit a report  in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to water no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4292