Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of  Environmental Quality shall study potential uses of
government revenue from a program for placing a price on greenhouse gas emissions. The
department shall submit the results of the study to an interim committee of  the Legislative
Assembly related to the environment no later than September 15, 2020.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2020 Act is repealed on January 2, 2021.
SECTION 3. This 2020 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2020
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 127