Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Basic needs  programming” means programming, services and supports provided to
students for assistance in meeting  certain basic needs, including food, housing, transporta-
tion, textbooks or other related needs, as determined  by the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission.
(b) “Public institution of higher education” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; and
(B) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341.
(2) The Higher Education  Coordinating Commission shall administer a grant program to
provide funding for basic needs programming at each public institution of  higher education.
The commission shall establish a formula for the distribution  of grants awarded under this
subsection. The total amount of grants awarded shall be based on the percentage of  students
at each public institution of higher education who are recipients  of an award from the
Oregon Opportunity Grant program established under ORS 348.205.
(3) The commission  shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to higher education not later than
September 15, 2026. The report submitted under this subsection must include an  assessment
of how the  awarding of grants under this section impacted the basic needs programming at
each public institution of higher education.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2821
HB 3182
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. (1) The Task Force on Student Housing is established.
(2) The task force consists of 14 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one  member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Senate Minority Leader  shall appoint one member from among members of the
Senate.
(c) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(d) The House Minority Leader shall appoint one  member from among members of the
House of Representatives.
(e) The Governor shall appoint the following voting members of the task force:
(A) One member who is a commissioner  on the Higher Education Coordinating Commis-
sion;
(B) One member who represents the Housing and Community Services Department;
(C) One member who represents public universities listed in ORS 352.002;
(D) One member who represents community colleges operated under ORS chapter 341;
(E) One member who is a student enrolled at a public university;
(F) One member who is a student enrolled at a community college;
(G) One member  who represents an organization or nonprofit corporation that advocates
for affordable housing;
(H) One member  who represents an organization or nonprofit corporation that advocates
for houseless individuals;
(I) One member who is employed at the housing office of a public university; and
(J) One member who is employed at the housing office of a community college.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Review existing research on barriers that students in higher  education face in ac-
cessing affordable housing;
(b) Report on the barriers students face to accessing affordable housing; and
(c) Make recommendations on policy changes that increase post-secondary student  ac-
cess to affordable housing.
(4) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The Governor shall designate one member appointed under subsection  (2)(e) of this
section as chairperson and another as vice chairperson of the task force.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report  in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 that sets
forth the findings and  recommendations made by the task force under subsection (3) of this
section, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committee of the
[2]
HB 3182
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
Legislative Assembly related to higher education no later than December 15, 2026.
(11) The Legislative Policy and Research  Director shall provide staff support to the task
force.
(12) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, to fund the grant program described
in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
The Higher  Education Coordinating Commission shall award grants to
nonprofit organizations that  provide affordable housing support to low-income students in
higher education in this state.
SECTION 7. Section 6 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $6,500,000, for purposes of section 6 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 9.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]