Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A plaintiff may bring a civil action for sexual battery  against a person
if:
(a) The person engages in any form of sexual intercourse with the plaintiff;
(b) There is an agreement between the parties that  a condom will be used during the
intercourse; and
(c) Prior to or during the intercourse, the person intentionally removes the condom
without the plaintiff’s verbal consent, causing direct contact between a  sexual organ, mouth
or anus of the plaintiff and a sexual organ of the person.
(2) A  plaintiff who prevails in a cause of action for sexual battery under this section may
recover:
(a) Special and general damages, including damages for emotional distress;
(b) Punitive damages;
(c) Reasonable attorney fees and costs; and
(d) Any other appropriate equitable relief.
(3) As used in this section, “any form of  sexual intercourse” means oral or anal sexual
intercourse or sexual intercourse as those terms are defined in ORS 163.305.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act applies to conduct occurring on  or after the ef-
fective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2511