Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a pilot program to determine
the extent to which the availability of telehealth services in schools increases student access
to health care services.
(2) The authority shall enter into a contract with a third party telehealth  provider that
has experience working with schools to provide telehealth services to students in  partic-
ipating school districts, as defined in ORS 342.621, for the 2025-2026 school year.
(3) The authority shall issue  a request for proposals to select the telehealth provider and
schools districts to participate in the pilot program.
(4) In order to be considered for selection as the telehealth provider, an applicant must:
(a) Be providing telehealth services to at least 50,000 students at the time the  application
is submitted.
(b) Have experience providing culturally competent pediatric care.
(c) Demonstrate the ability  to provide high-quality physical and behavioral telehealth
services.
(d) Demonstrate  the ability to establish an adequate network of telehealth providers in
Oregon to provide required telehealth services under the pilot program.
(e) Have a technology platform to provide and coordinate telehealth services for  students
in participating school districts.
(f) Have the ability to bill health insurers for services provided under the pilot program.
(g) Agree to provide telehealth services at no cost to students who are uninsured  and to
waive or reimburse  students for all cost-sharing incurred for telehealth services under the
pilot program.
(h) Agree to cooperate with the authority and participating school districts to  evaluate
the pilot program and prepare the report described in subsection (7) of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1103
HB 2577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
(5) In order to be considered to participate in the pilot program, a school district must:
(a) Make telehealth services available to all students within the school district.
(b) Cooperate with the  authority and telehealth provider to evaluate the pilot program
and prepare the report described in subsection (7) of this section.
(6) The authority may accept gifts, grants, donations or other financial support from any
source for the purpose of carrying out the pilot program under this section.
(7)(a) The authority, in conjunction with the telehealth provider and participating school
districts, shall evaluate and prepare a  report on the extent to which the pilot program in-
creased student access to health care services.
(b) The authority shall submit the report  described in paragraph (a) of this subsection in
the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education no later than Sep-
tember 15, 2026.
(8) The authority may adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, to carry out  the provisions of section 1 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]