Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 656.605 is amended to read:
656.605. (1) The Workers’ Benefit Fund  is created in the State Treasury, separate and distinct
from the General Fund. Moneys in the fund shall be invested in the same manner as  other state
moneys and investment earnings shall be credited to the  fund. The fund shall consist of the follow-
ing:
(a) Moneys received pursuant to ORS 656.506.
(b) Moneys recovered under ORS 656.054.
(c) Penalties recovered under ORS 656.735.
(d) All moneys received by the Director of the Department of Consumer  and Business Services
pursuant to law or from any other source for purposes for which the fund may be expended.
(2) Moneys in the Workers’ Benefit Fund may be expended for the following purposes:
(a) Expenses of programs under ORS 656.445, 656.506, 656.622, 656.625, 656.628 and 656.630.
(b) Proceedings against noncomplying employers pursuant to ORS 656.054 and 656.735.
(c) Expenses of vocational assistance on claims, the cost of  which was imposed pursuant to
section 15, chapter 600, Oregon Laws 1985.
(d) Payment of supplemental temporary disability benefits for  workers employed in more than
one job at the time of injury and reimbursement of the  costs of administering payments resulting
from elections by insurers and self-insured employers as provided by ORS 656.210 (5).
(e) Payments made to injured workers pursuant to section 6a, chapter 865, Oregon Laws 2001.
(f) Expenses of the Bureau of Labor and Industries  for enforcing ORS 659A.040, 659A.043,
659A.046, 659A.049 and 659A.052, subject  to an agreement between the Director of the Department
of Consumer and Business Services  and the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
The agreement must include, but is not limited to, the amount of funds to be  transferred to the bu-
reau for enforcing ORS 659A.040, 659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.049 and 659A.052 and the information
relating to the enforcement of ORS 659A.040, 659A.043,  659A.046, 659A.049 and 659A.052 that the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4038
HB 3750
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
bureau must report to the director.
(g) Reimbursement to the  insurer or self-insured employer for the amount of permanent total
disability benefits paid  after the date of the notice of closure that was upheld pursuant to ORS
656.206.
(h) Reimbursement of vocational benefit expenses as provided in ORS 656.313.
(i) Expenses of the Commissioner  of the Bureau of Labor and Industries in carrying out
the duties set forth in ORS 651.050.
(3) Subject to the following provisions, all moneys in the fund  are appropriated continuously to
the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services to carry out  the activities for
which the fund may be expended:
(a) Moneys received pursuant to ORS 656.054 and 656.735 and  transfers made pursuant to ORS
705.148 may be expended only to carry  out the provisions of ORS 656.054 and 656.735 and section
15, chapter 600, Oregon Laws 1985.
(b) Moneys received pursuant to ORS 656.506 and the transfers of  unexpended and unobligated
moneys in the Retroactive Reserve,  Reemployment Assistance Reserve, Reopened Claims Reserve
and Handicapped Workers Reserve referred to in ORS 656.506, 656.622,  656.625 and 656.628 (All 1993
Edition) may be expended only to carry out the programs  referred to in ORS 656.506, 656.622,
656.625, 656.628 and 656.630.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the director determines at any  time
that there are insufficient moneys in the Workers’ Benefit Fund to pay the expenses of  programs for
which expenditure of the fund is authorized, the director  may reduce the level of benefits payable
accordingly.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]