Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue  Officer shall study means for raising dedicated re-
venue to support recreation activities in Oregon. The Legislative  Revenue Officer shall sub-
mit a report  in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for
legislation, to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to revenue no later
than December 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4283