Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Department of Revenue,  for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $150,000 for distribution to the
Curry County assessor, in accordance with section 2 of this 2021 Act, to be  used by the
assessor for the pilot program created pursuant to section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) The Department of Revenue shall distribute the moneys appropriated
under section 1 of this 2021 Act to the Curry County assessor as follows:
(A) For the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2021, $75,000.
(B) For the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2022, $75,000.
(b) The department may not distribute the  moneys until the assessor has available for
the pilot program created pursuant to subsection (3) of this section a matching amount  of
$50,000 per year.
(2)(a) The assessor shall withhold or collect the annual $50,000 matching moneys from the
taxing districts within the  county, other than education districts, in proportion to each tax-
ing district’s share of the percentage schedule filed under ORS 311.390 for the  current prop-
erty tax year, computed excluding the share of education districts.
(b) As used in this subsection “education district”  means school districts, education
service districts and community college districts.
(3)(a) The assessor shall use the moneys distributed under  subsection (1)(a) of this sec-
tion, and the matching moneys required under subsection  (1)(b) of this section, to create a
pilot program that will increase employment in the office of  the assessor for the purpose of
achieving an assessment rotation of seven years for taxable property located  in the county.
The moneys may not be used for any other purpose.
(b) The moneys shall supplement and may not supplant  the expenditures for assessment
and taxation included in the county budget for the current fiscal year.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, the county may reduce expenditures
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2945
HB 2805
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
for assessment and taxation for fiscal years in the  biennium beginning on July 1, 2021, if the
reduction is a proportional part of across-the-board budget reductions.
(4) The assessor shall submit reports to the department  containing the substance, and
in the form and manner, prescribed by the department. The purpose of the reports is to  en-
able the department to monitor the pilot program.
(5) The department shall submit  a report reviewing the experience of the pilot program
in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to revenue on or before September 15, 2023.
SECTION 3.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]