Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $400,000, for distribution to the La
Grande/Union County Airport to expand the capacity of the airport’s fuel farm.
SECTION 2. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 205