Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Bureau of Labor  and Industries shall study issues regarding the mini-
mum salary threshold  for exemptions from overtime pay. The bureau shall submit a report
in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations  for legislation,
to the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to business and labor no later
than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4428