Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Corrections, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_____, to be  distributed to the Snake River Correctional In-
stitution, Eastern Oregon Correctional  Institution, Powder River Correctional Facility and
Two Rivers Correction Institution for the purpose  of providing education programs to adults
in custody.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1342