Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 2 of this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 2. A public utility that makes sales of electricity may not establish a  rate for
any service performed, controlled or  operated by the public utility in this state, and related
to making sales of electricity, that provides the public utility with a rate  of return that ex-
ceeds 4.5 percent.
SECTION 3.  ORS 757.205 is amended to read:
757.205. [(1)] (1)(a) [ Every] Each public utility shall file with the Public  Utility Commission[ ,
within a time to be fixed by the commission, ] schedules [ which shall be ] that are  open to public in-
spection, showing all rates, tolls and charges [ which it ] that the public utility  has  established and
[which] that are in force at the time for any service performed by [ it within ] the  public utility in
this state, or for any  service [ in connection therewith or ] related to a service performed by the
public utility in this state, for any  service performed by any public utility controlled or operated
by [ it] the public utility.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of  this subsection, the commission shall deter-
mine by rule or order the date on which schedules must be filed under paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 108
SB 1552
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) A public utility  that makes sales of electricity shall file all schedules with the com-
mission once per year on July 1.
(2) [ Every] Each public utility shall file with and  as part of every [ such] schedule [ all] filed
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section the  rules and regulations  that in any manner affect the
rates charged or to be charged for [ any] a service. [ Every] Each  public utility shall also file with
the commission  copies of interstate rate schedules and rules and regulations issued by [ it] the public
utility or to which [ it ] the public utility is a party.
(3) [ Where] If a schedule of joint rates  or charges is or may be in force between two or more
public utilities, [ such schedules shall in like manner be printed and ] the schedule must be  filed with
the commission as described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section .
SECTION 4.  ORS 757.210 is amended to read:
757.210. (1)(a) Whenever any public utility files  with the Public Utility Commission any rate or
schedule of rates stating or establishing a new  rate or schedule of rates or increasing an existing
rate or schedule of rates, the commission may, either upon  written complaint or upon the
commission’s own  initiative, after reasonable notice, conduct a hearing to determine whether the
rate or schedule is  fair, just and reasonable. Upon written complaint filed by the public utility,
its customer or customers  or any other proper party,  the commission shall conduct the hearing
[upon written complaint  filed by the utility, its customer or customers, or any other proper party ] within
60 days of the  public utility’s filing[ ; provided that no ]. A  hearing does not  need to be held  if the
particular rate change is the result of an automatic adjustment clause. At the hearing the public
utility [ shall bear ] bears the burden of showing that the rate or schedule of rates proposed  to be
established or increased or changed is fair, just and reasonable. The commission may  not authorize
a rate or schedule of rates that is not fair, just and reasonable.
(b) In lieu of  the requirement that a hearing conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection be held within 60 days of a public utility’s filing,  for any public utility that makes
sales of electricity, a hearing conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection must
be held on or  before June 30 of the calendar year subsequent to the calendar year in which
the public utility filed the rate or schedule of rates.
[(b)] (c) As used in this subsection, “automatic adjustment clause” means a provision  of a rate
schedule that provides for rate increases or decreases  or both, without prior hearing, reflecting in-
creases or decreases or both in costs  incurred, taxes paid to units of government or revenues earned
by a public utility and that is subject to review by the commission at least once every two years.
(2)(a) Subsection (1) of this  section does not apply to rate changes under an approved alternative
form of regulation plan, including a resource rate plan under ORS 757.212.
(b) Any alternative form of regulation plan shall include provisions to  ensure that the plan op-
erates in the interests of  public utility customers and the public generally and results  in rates that
are just and reasonable and may include provisions establishing a reasonable range  for rate of re-
turn on investment. In approving  a plan, the commission shall, at a minimum, consider whether the
plan:
(A) Promotes increased efficiencies and cost control;
(B) Is consistent with least-cost resources acquisition policies;
(C) Yields  rates that are consistent with those that would be obtained following application of
ORS 757.269;
(D) Is consistent with maintenance of safe, adequate and reliable service; and
(E) Is beneficial to public utility customers generally, for example, by  minimizing public utility
[2]
SB 1552
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rates.
(c) Prior to implementing a rate change under an alternative  form of regulation plan, the
public utility shall present a report that demonstrates  the calculation of any proposed rate
change at a public meeting of the commission.
[(c)] (d) As used in this subsection, “alternative form  of regulation plan” means a plan adopted
by the commission  upon petition by a public utility, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing,
that sets rates and revenues and  a method for changes in rates and revenues using alternatives to
cost-of-service rate regulation.
[(d) Prior to implementing a  rate change under an alternative form of regulation plan, the utility
shall present a report  that demonstrates the calculation of any proposed rate change at a public meeting
of the commission. ]
(3) Except as provided in ORS 757.212, the commission,  at any time, may order a public utility
to appear and  establish that any, or all, of its rates in a plan authorized under subsection (2) of this
section  are  in conformity with the plan and are just and reasonable. Except as provided in ORS
757.212, [such] rates in a plan authorized under subsection (2) of this section , and the alternative
form of regulation  plan under which the rates are set, [ also shall be ] are subject to complaint under
ORS 756.500.
(4) Periodically, but not less often than every two years after the implementation of a plan  re-
ferred to in subsection  (2) of this section, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislative
Assembly that shows the impact of the plan on rates paid by public utility customers.
(5) The commission and staff may consult at any time with,  and provide technical assistance to,
public utilities, their customers[ ,] and  other interested parties on matters relevant to  public utility
rates and charges. If a hearing  is held with respect to a rate change, the commission’s decisions
shall be based on the record made at the hearing.
SECTION 5. The amendments to ORS 757.205 and 757.210 by sections 3 and 4 of this 2018
Act apply to rates and schedules filed with  the Public Utility Commission on or after the
effective date of this 2018 Act.
PUBLIC PURPOSE CHARGE
SECTION 6.  ORS 757.612 is amended to read:
757.612. (1) There is established an annual public purpose  expenditure standard for electric
companies and Oregon Community Power to fund new  cost-effective energy conservation, new mar-
ket transformation efforts, the  above-market costs of new renewable energy resources and new
low-income weatherization. The public purpose expenditure standard shall be funded  by the public
purpose charge described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) Beginning on the date an electric company or Oregon  Community Power offers direct ac-
cess to retail electricity consumers, except residential electricity consumers, the  electric company
or Oregon Community Power shall collect a public purpose  charge from all of the retail electricity
consumers located within the electric company’s or Oregon Community Power’s  service area until
January 1, 2026. Except as  provided in [ paragraph (b) ] paragraphs (b) and (c)  of this subsection,
the public  purpose charge shall be equal to [ three] 1.5 percent of the total revenues collected by the
electric company, Oregon Community  Power or the electricity service supplier from retail electricity
consumers for electricity services, distribution services,  ancillary services, metering and billing,
transition charges and other types of costs included in electric rates on July 23, 1999.
[3]
SB 1552
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) For an aluminum plant that averages  more than 100 average megawatts of electricity use
per year, the electric company or Oregon  Community Power, whichever serves territory that abuts
the greatest percentage of the site of the aluminum plant, shall collect  from the aluminum
company, subject to paragraph (c) of this subsection,  a  public purpose charge equal to one per-
cent of  the total revenue from the sale of electricity [ services ] to the aluminum plant[  from any
source].
(c) A public purpose  charge collected under this subsection may not exceed the public
purpose charge collected by the electric company, Oregon Community Power  or the elec-
tricity service supplier from the retail electricity consumer for the 2015 calendar year.
(3)(a) The Public Utility  Commission shall establish rules implementing the provisions of this
section relating to electric companies and Oregon Community Power.
(b) Except as  provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, funds collected through public pur-
pose charges under subsection (2) of this section shall be allocated as follows:
(A) Sixty-three percent for new cost-effective local energy conservation and new market trans-
formation efforts.
(B) Nineteen  percent for the above-market costs of constructing and operating new renewable
energy resources with  a nominal electric generating capacity, as defined in ORS 469.300, of 20
megawatts or less.
(C) Thirteen percent for new low-income weatherization.
(D) Five percent for deposit in the Housing and Community Services Department Electricity
Public Purpose Charge Fund established by ORS 456.587 (1) for the purpose of providing grants as
described in ORS 458.625 (2).
(c) The costs of administering  subsections (1) to (6) of this section for an electric company or
Oregon Community Power shall be paid out of the funds collected through public  purpose charges.
The commission may require an electric company or  Oregon Community Power to direct funds col-
lected through public purpose charges to state agencies responsible for implementing  subsections (1)
to (6) of this section in order  to pay the costs of [ administering subsections (1) to (6) of this section ]
implementation.
(d) The commission shall direct the manner in which public purpose charges are  collected and
spent by an electric company or Oregon Community  Power and may require an electric company
or Oregon Community Power to expend funds through  competitive bids or other means designed to
encourage competition, except that funds dedicated  for new low-income weatherization shall be di-
rected to the Housing and Community Services Department for purposes related to new low-income
weatherization. The commission may also require funds collected  through public purpose charges to
be paid to a nongovernmental entity for investment in public purposes described in subsection (1)
of this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection:
(A) If an electric company collected the funds, at least 80 percent of the funds  allocated for new
cost-effective local energy conservation shall  be spent within the service area of the electric com-
pany; or
(B) If Oregon Community Power collected the funds, at least 80 percent of  the funds allocated
for new cost-effective local energy conservation shall be  spent within the service area of Oregon
Community Power.
(e)(A) The first 10 percent of funds collected each year  by an electric company or Oregon
Community Power under  subsection (2) of this section shall be distributed to school districts that
are located in the  service territory of the electric company or Oregon Community Power. The funds
[4]
SB 1552
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
shall be distributed to individual school districts according to the weighted average  daily member-
ship (ADMw) of each school district for  the prior fiscal year as calculated under ORS 327.013. The
commission shall establish by rule  a methodology for distributing a proportionate share of funds
under this paragraph to school districts that  are only partially located in the service territory of the
electric company or Oregon Community Power.
(B) A school district that receives funds under this paragraph shall use the funds  first to pay
for energy audits for schools located within the school district. A  school district may not expend
additional funds received under this paragraph  on a school until an energy audit has been completed
for that school. To the extent practicable, a school  district shall coordinate with the State De-
partment of Energy and incorporate federal funding  in complying with this paragraph. Following
completion  of  an energy audit for an individual school, the school district may expend funds received
under this paragraph to  implement the energy audit. Once an energy audit has been conducted and
completely  implemented  for each school within the school district, the school district may expend
funds received under this paragraph for any of the following purposes:
(i) Conducting additional energy audits. A school  district shall conduct an energy audit prior to
expending funds on any other purpose authorized  under this paragraph unless the school district has
performed an energy audit within the three years immediately prior to receiving the funds.
(ii) Weatherizing school district facilities and upgrading  the energy efficiency of school district
facilities.
(iii) Energy conservation education programs.
(iv) Purchasing electricity from [ environmentally focused ] sources that protect the environ-
ment.
(v) Investing in renewable energy resources.
(f) The commission may not establish a different public purpose charge than the  public purpose
charge described in subsection (2) of this section.
(g) If the  commission requires funds collected through public purpose charges to be paid to a
nongovernmental entity, the entity, pursuant  to an agreement entered into or renewed be-
tween the commission and  the entity [ shall]:
(A) Shall include on the entity’s board  of directors an ex officio member designated by the
commission, who shall also serve on the entity’s nominating committee for filling board vacancies.
(B) Shall require the entity’s officers and directors  to provide an annual disclosure of economic
interest to be filed with the commission on  or prior to April 15 of each calendar year for public
review in a form similar to the statement of  economic interest required for public officials under
ORS 244.060.
(C) Shall require the entity’s officers and directors to declare actual and potential conflicts  of
interest at regular meetings of the entity’s governing body when such conflicts arise[ ,] and shall
require an officer or director to abstain from participating in any discussion  or voting on any item
where that officer or director has an actual conflict of interest. For the  purposes of this subpara-
graph, “actual conflict of interest” and “potential conflict of interest” have the meanings given those
terms in ORS 244.020.
(D) May not pay an officer, director or  employee of the entity an annual salary that ex-
ceeds the Governor’s annual salary for the preceding calendar year.
(E) May not, in any calendar year,  provide an officer, director or employee of the entity
benefits or any form of compensation in addition to the officer’s, director’s  or employee’s
salary the aggregate value of which is an amount that  exceeds 25 percent of the officer’s,
[5]
SB 1552
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
director’s or employee’s annual salary.
[(D)] (F) Annually, shall arrange for an independent auditor to audit the entity’s financial
statements, and shall direct the auditor to file an audit opinion with the  commission for public re-
view.
[(E)] (G) Annually , shall  file with the  commission the entity’s budget, action plan and quarterly
and annual reports for public review.
[(F)] (H) At least once every five  years, shall contract for an independent management evalu-
ation to review the entity’s operations, efficiency and effectiveness[ ,] and shall direct the independ-
ent reviewer to file a report with the commission for public review.
(h) The commission  may remove from the board of directors of a nongovernmental entity an of-
ficer or director who fails to provide an annual disclosure  of economic interest as described in
paragraph (g)(B) of this subsection , or who fails to declare an actual or potential conflict of
interest[, ] as described in paragraph [ (g)(B) and (C) ] (g)(C) of this  subsection, if the failure is con-
nected to the allocation or expenditure of funds collected  through public purpose charges and paid
to the entity.
(4)(a) An electric company that satisfies its obligations under this section:
(A) Has no  further obligation to invest in new cost-effective  local  energy conservation, new
market transformation or new low-income weatherization, or to provide a commercial  energy con-
servation services program; and
(B) Is not subject to ORS 469.631 to 469.645 and 469.860 to 469.900.
(b) Oregon Community Power, for any period during which Oregon Community  Power collects
a public purpose charge under subsection (2) of this section:
(A) Has no further obligation to invest in new cost-effective  local  energy  conservation, new
market transformation or  new low-income weatherization, or to provide a commercial energy con-
servation services program; and
(B) Is not subject to ORS 469.631 to 469.645 and 469.860 to 469.900.
(5)(a) A retail electricity consumer that uses more  than one average megawatt of electricity at
any site in the prior year shall receive a credit  against public purpose charges billed by an electric
company or Oregon Community Power for  that site. The amount of the credit shall be equal to the
total amount of qualifying expenditures  for new cost-effective local energy conservation, not to ex-
ceed 68 percent of the  annual public purpose charges, and the above-market costs of new renewable
energy resources incurred by the retail electricity consumer, not to exceed 19 percent of the annual
public purpose charges, less administration costs incurred  under this paragraph and paragraphs (b)
and (c) of this subsection. The credit may not exceed, on an annual basis, the lesser of:
(A) The amount of the retail electricity consumer’s qualifying expenditures; or
(B) The portion of the public purpose charge billed to the retail electricity consumer  that is
dedicated to new cost-effective local energy conservation, new market transformation or the above-
market costs of new renewable energy resources.
(b) To obtain a credit under paragraph (a) of this subsection, a  retail electricity consumer shall
file with the State Department of Energy a description of the  proposed conservation project or new
renewable energy resource and a declaration that the retail electricity consumer  plans to incur the
qualifying expenditure. The State Department of Energy shall issue a notice  of precertification
within 30 days of receipt of the filing, if such filing is consistent with paragraph (a) of this sub-
section.  The  credit may be taken after a retail electricity consumer provides to the State Depart-
ment of Energy  a letter from a certified public accountant [ to the State Department of  Energy ]
[6]
SB 1552
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
verifying that the precertified qualifying expenditure has been made.
(c) Credits earned by a retail electricity consumer  as a result of qualifying expenditures that
are not used in one year may be carried forward for use in subsequent years.
(d)(A) A retail electricity consumer that uses more than one average megawatt of electricity  at
any site in the prior year may  request that the State Department of Energy hire an independent
auditor to assess the potential  for conservation investments at the site. If the independent auditor
determines there is  no available conservation measure at the site that would have a simple payback
of one to 10 years, the retail electricity consumer shall be relieved of 54 percent of its payment
obligation for public purpose charges related to the site. If the independent  auditor determines that
there are potential conservation measures available  at the site, the retail electricity consumer shall
be entitled to a  credit against public purpose charges related to the site equal to 54 percent of the
public purpose charges less the estimated cost of available conservation measures.
(B) A  retail electricity consumer shall be entitled each year to the credit described in this par-
agraph unless a subsequent independent audit determines that new conservation investment  oppor-
tunities are available. The State Department of Energy may require  that a new independent audit
be performed on the site to determine whether  new conservation measures are available, provided
that the independent audits occur no more than once every two years.
(C) The retail electricity consumer shall pay the cost of the independent audits  described in this
paragraph.
(6) Electric utilities and retail electricity consumers shall  receive a fair and reasonable credit
for the public purpose expenditures of  their energy suppliers. The State Department of Energy shall
adopt rules to determine eligible expenditures and the method by which such credits are accounted
for and used.  The State Department of Energy also shall adopt methods to account for eligible public
purpose expenditures made through consortia or collaborative projects.
(7)(a) In addition to the public purpose charge provided  under subsection (2) of this section, an
electric company or Oregon Community Power shall collect funds  for low-income electric bill pay-
ment assistance in an amount [ determined] established under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The commission shall establish the amount to be  collected by each electric company from
retail electricity consumers, and the rates to be  charged by each electric company to retail elec-
tricity consumers, so that the forecasted collection  by all electric companies in calendar year 2018
is $20 million. In subsequent calendar years, the commission may not  decrease the rates below those
established for calendar year 2018. The commission may temporarily adjust the  rates if forecasted
collections or actual collections are less than  $20 million in any calendar year. A retail electricity
consumer may  not be required to pay more than $500 per month per site for low-income electric bill
payment assistance.
(c) Funds collected  through the low-income electric bill payment assistance charge shall be paid
into the Housing and Community Services Department Low-Income  Electric Bill Payment Assistance
Fund established by ORS  456.587 (2). Moneys deposited in the fund under this paragraph shall be
used by the Housing and Community Services Department solely  for purposes related to low-income
electric bill payment assistance  and for the Housing and Community Services Department’s cost of
administering this subsection. Funds collected by an electric company or  Oregon Community Power
under this subsection shall be expended in the service area of the electric  company or Oregon
Community Power from which the funds are collected.
(d)(A) The Housing and Community  Services Department shall determine the manner in which
funds collected under this subsection will be allocated by  the Housing and Community Services
[7]
SB 1552
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Department to energy assistance program providers for the purpose of providing low-income  bill
payment [ and crisis ] assistance.
(B) The Housing and Community Services Department,  in consultation with electric companies,
shall investigate and may  implement alternative delivery models to effectively reduce service dis-
connections and related costs to retail electricity consumers and electric utilities.
(C) Priority assistance shall  be directed to low-income electricity consumers who are in danger
of having their electricity service disconnected.
(D) The Housing and Community Services Department shall maintain records  and provide those
records upon request to an electric company, Oregon Community Power and the Citizens’  Utility
Board established under ORS chapter 774 on a quarterly basis. Records maintained must include
the numbers of low-income electricity consumers served, the average amounts  paid to low-income
electricity consumers and  the [ type] types of assistance provided to low-income electricity consum-
ers. Electric companies and Oregon Community Power shall, if requested, provide  the Housing and
Community Services  Department with aggregate data relating to low-income electricity consumers
served on a quarterly basis to support program development.
(e) Interest on moneys deposited in  the Housing and Community Services Department Low-
Income Electric Bill Payment Assistance Fund established by ORS 456.587 (2) may  be used to pro-
vide bill payment and crisis  assistance to electricity consumers whose primary source of heat is not
electricity.
(f) Notwithstanding ORS 757.310, the commission may allow an electric company or  Oregon
Community Power to provide reduced  rates or other bill payment [ or crisis ] assistance or low-income
program assistance to a low-income household eligible for assistance under the federal Low Income
Home Energy Assistance Act of 1981, as amended and in effect on July 23, 1999.
(8) For  purposes of this section, “retail electricity consumers” includes any direct service in-
dustrial consumer  that purchases electricity without purchasing distribution services from the elec-
tric utility.
(9) For purposes of this section, funds collected by Oregon Community Power  through public
purpose charges are not considered moneys received from electric utility operations.
SECTION 7.
The amendments to ORS 757.612 (3) by  section 6 of this 2018 Act apply to
agreements entered into  or renewed between the Public Utility Commission and nongovern-
mental entities on or after the effective date of this 2018 Act.
REMOVAL OF KLAMATH RIVER DAMS
SECTION 8. As used in this section and sections 9 and 10 of this 2018 Act:
(1) “Customer” means a retail electricity customer of PacifiCorp that is located in  this
state.
(2) “Klamath River dam” means the J.C. Boyle Dam located  in Oregon, the Copco 1 Dam
located in California, the Copco 2 Dam located in California or the  Iron Gate Dam located in
California.
SECTION 9. ORS 757.732, 757.734, 757.736, 757.738, 757.740, 757.742 and 757.744 are repealed
on January 1, 2019, if the physical act of  removing a Klamath River dam has not begun on
or before December 31, 2018.
SECTION 10. (1) If the physical act of  removing a Klamath River dam has not begun on
or before December 31, 2018:
[8]
SB 1552
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) On January  1, 2019, each trust account established by the Public Utility Commission
under ORS 757.738 is abolished.
(b) All  moneys in each trust account established by the commission under ORS 757.738
are transferred to the General Fund and are available for general governmental purposes.
(c) PacifiCorp shall credit the electric bill of each customer from which PacifiCorp col-
lected a surcharge pursuant to ORS  757.736 in an amount that equals the total amount paid
by the customer to PacifiCorp as a surcharge pursuant  to ORS 757.736, plus four percent of
the total amount paid by the customer to  PacifiCorp as a surcharge pursuant to ORS 757.736.
(2) The commission shall adopt by rule  a schedule by which PacifiCorp must credit elec-
tric bills as described in subsection (1)(c) of this section. The schedule adopted under this
subsection must require PacifiCorp to fully credit electric bills as described in subsection
(1)(c) of this section no later than January 1, 2020.
SUPERFUND SITES
SECTION 11.
Section 12 of this  2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 12. The Public Utility Commission may not  approve any rate schedule estab-
lished by a public utility that makes sales of electricity if the public utility is proposing to
use moneys  collected pursuant to the imposition of those rates for the purpose of remediat-
ing land listed pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 9605 as a national priority  for responding to the release
of hazardous substances, pollutants and contaminants on land.
NONCOMPETITION AGREEMENTS
SECTION 13.
Section 14 of this  2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 756.
SECTION 14. (1) For purposes described in ORS 653.295 (1)(c)(B), each  Public Utility
Commissioner and each employee of the Public  Utility Commission must enter into a non-
competition agreement with this state under which the commissioner or employee  may not
be subsequently employed by a public utility that makes sales of electricity.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (3) of  this section, a noncompetition
agreement entered into under  this section must comport with the standards and processes
set forth in ORS 653.295.
(3) The  term of a noncompetition agreement entered into under this section must be two
years.
SECTION 15. Section 14 of this 2018 Act applies to Public  Utility Commissioners ap-
pointed on or after the effective date of this 2018 Act and employees of the  Public Utility
Commission hired on or after the effective date of this 2018 Act.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 16. The unit captions used in this 2018 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2018 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
[9]
SB 1552
1
2
3
4
SECTION 17. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[10]