Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 53, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended  by section 54, chapter 649,
Oregon Laws 2013, section 1, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2019, and section 18,  chapter 78, Oregon
Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 53.  (1)(a)  In consultation with the Justice Reinvestment Grant Review Committee estab-
lished under  subsection (2) of this section, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall administer
the Justice Reinvestment Program described in this  section. From funds appropriated to the com-
mission for purposes of the program, the commission  shall award grants to counties that establish
a process to assess offenders and provide  a continuum of community-based sanctions, services and
programs that are designed to reduce recidivism and decrease  the county’s utilization of
imprisonment in a  Department of Corrections institution while protecting public safety , [ and] hold-
ing offenders accountable  and ensuring that the Justice Reinvestment Program is  effectively
serving all populations, including historically underserved populations,  in an equitable man-
ner.
(b) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, no less than 10 percent of grant funds
awarded under this  section must be distributed to community-based nonprofit organizations that
provide services to victims of crime,  with priority given to culturally specific organizations and
culturally responsive services.
(2) The Justice Reinvestment Grant Review Committee is established,  consisting of the following
members:
(a) The Governor shall appoint the following [ seven] ten  members:
(A) One member shall be a district attorney  or a representative of district attorneys .
(B) One member shall be a county sheriff or a representative of county sheriffs .
(C) One member shall be a chief of police  or a representative of chiefs of police .
(D) One member shall be  a county commissioner  or a representative of county commission-
ers.
(E) One member shall be a community corrections director who is not a sheriff.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 453
HB 2934
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(F) Two members  shall be representatives of community-based organizations that provide ser-
vices for underserved racial, ethnic or minority communities.
(G) One member shall be  a public defense practitioner or a representative of public de-
fense practitioners.
(H) Two members shall  be individuals with lived experience in the criminal justice sys-
tem.
(b) The Chief Justice of the Supreme  Court shall appoint one nonvoting member who is a judge.
(c) The President of  the Senate shall appoint two nonvoting members from among members of
the Senate.
(d) The Speaker of  the House of Representatives shall appoint two nonvoting members from
among members of the House of Representatives.
(3)(a) A majority of the voting members of  the committee constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(b) The committee shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(c) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appointment  to
become effective immediately.
(d) The committee shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson or a
majority of the voting members of the committee.
(e) Legislative members of the committee shall be entitled to payment of compensation  and ex-
penses under ORS 171.072, payable from funds appropriated to the Legislative Assembly.
(4)(a) An application for a grant described  in this section must be submitted by a local public
safety coordinating council convened under ORS 423.560.
(b) The  grant application must include a statement of commitment, from the relevant
stakeholders of the  service or program for which the county is requesting funding and including the
district  attorney,  presiding judge and community corrections director, to reduce recidivism and de-
crease the county’s utilization  of imprisonment in Department of Corrections facilities while pro-
tecting public safety , [ and] holding offenders accountable  and ensuring that the  Justice
Reinvestment Program is effectively serving all populations, including historically under-
served populations, in an equitable manner .
(5)(a) During a  grant application period established by the commission, the proportion of grant
funds available to each  county shall be determined in accordance with the formula used to distribute
baseline funding under ORS 423.483.
(b) At the conclusion of the grant application period, the commission  shall award grants in ac-
cordance with rules adopted by the commission. If unallocated funds remain at the  conclusion of the
grant acceptance period, the commission may  establish a supplemental grant period and distribute
the unallocated funds.
(6)(a) The commission shall regularly evaluate  the community-based sanctions, services and
programs funded  under this section. The commission shall specifically assess the extent to which
each county is reducing utilization of imprisonment in Department of Corrections facilities  by
offenders convicted of felonies under ORS 137.717, 475.752 to 475.980, 811.182, 813.010 or 813.011.
(b) The commission shall report the results of an evaluation conducted under this section  to a
committee of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary.
(7)(a) Before applying for grant funds to administer a community-based  program described in
subsection (10)(a)(D) of this section, the county must obtain the  consent of the presiding judge of the
judicial district in which the county is located.
[2]
HB 2934
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A grant application to administer a  community-based program described in subsection
(10)(a)(D) of this section must include the costs of appointed counsel.
(8) After consulting with the Justice Reinvestment Grant Review  Committee, the commission
shall adopt rules to administer the Justice Reinvestment Program. The rules must include:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications  and distributing grant funds.
Rules described in this paragraph must provide the Justice Reinvestment Grant  Review Committee
with the ability to approve grant applications for submission for final approval by the commission.
The rules must provide that  the  commission may either approve the grant application or return
the application for reconsideration by the committee  with specific instructions for  further re-
view. The rules must provide that the commission may return an application only once .
(b) A process for evaluating the efficacy of community-based sanctions, services  and programs
funded under this section.
(c) A requirement that the grant review committee consider, when approving grant applications,
each county’s historical reduction of  utilization of imprisonment in Department of Corrections fa-
cilities by offenders convicted of felonies under  ORS 137.717, 475.752 to 475.980, 811.182, 813.010 or
813.011.
(d) Provisions allowing the grant review committee to submit to  the commission, and the com-
mission to approve, provisional funding plans for counties applying for grants under this section.
(9)(a) If a county does  not reduce utilization of imprisonment in Department of Corrections fa-
cilities by offenders convicted of felonies under ORS 137.717,  475.752 to 475.980, 811.182, 813.010 or
813.011, upon request of the grant review  committee, the commission shall decline to grant the full
grant amount requested by a  county, provide technical assistance, withhold approved grant funds
or terminate further distribution of the grant award.
(b) If  the commission takes an action described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, any remain-
ing moneys may be redistributed by  the commission through a supplemental grant program. Priority
shall be given to counties  funding programs for historically underserved communities including rural
communities, racial, ethnic and minority communities  and tribal communities. Rural counties may
apply for supplemental grants in cooperation with other rural counties.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based program” includes:
(A) Work release programs;
(B) Structured, transitional leave programs;
(C) Evidence-based programs designed to reduce recidivism that include the balanced adminis-
tration of sanctions, supervision and treatment;
(D) Administering a reentry court under section 29, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013; and
(E) Specialty courts aimed at medium-risk and high-risk offenders.
(b) “County” includes a regional collection of counties.
(c) “Culturally responsive  service” means a service that is respectful of, and relevant to, the
beliefs, practices, cultures and linguistic  needs of diverse consumer or client populations and com-
munities whose members identify as having particular cultural or  linguistic affiliations by virtue of
their place of birth, ancestry or  ethnic origin, religion, preferred language or language spoken at
home. A culturally responsive service has the capacity to respond to the  issues of diverse commu-
nities and require knowledge and  capacity at systemic, organizational, professional and individual
levels of intervention.
(d) “Culturally specific organization” means an organization, or a program  within an organiza-
[3]
HB 2934
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
tion, that  serves a particular cultural community, that is primarily staffed and led by members of
that community  and that demonstrates self-advocacy, positive cultural identity and intimate knowl-
edge of the lived experience of the community, including but not limited to:
(A) The impact of structural and individual racism or discrimination on the community;
(B) Specific disparities in access to services and resources experienced by the community; and
(C) Community strengths, cultural practices, beliefs and traditions.
[4]