Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 2 of this 2018 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 660.300 to
660.364.
SECTION 2. (1) The Prosperity  1,000 Pilot Program is established to provide career
coaching, occupational training and job placement services for 1,000 low-income  job seekers
in east Multnomah County.
(2) The goals of the pilot program are to:
(a) Include 1,000 total participants;
(b) Ensure that 100 percent  of the participants are individuals who receive supplemental
nutrition assistance under ORS 411.806 to 411.845;
(c) Ensure that at least 50 percent of the participants are immigrants or  members of a
racial or ethnic minority group;
(d) Ensure that at least 50 percent of the participants are women;
(e) Ensure that individuals who are in offender reentry programs are included;
(f) Ensure that at least 80 percent of the participants  successfully complete the program;
(g) Ensure that  at least 75 percent of the participants successfully obtain employment;
and
(h) Ensure that at least 75 percent of the participants who successfully obtain  employ-
ment earn at least $15 per hour.
(3) The pilot program shall be administered by the  local workforce development board
serving Multnomah and Washington Counties. The board shall:
(a) Coordinate with community-based organizations to provide career coaching, occupa-
tional training and job placement services to pilot program participants;
(b) Distribute available funds to community-based  organizations that provide services to
pilot program participants; and
(c) Identify and conduct outreach to target sector businesses and industry organizations
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 175
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
regarding participation in the pilot program.
(4)(a) As used in this subsection, the “SNAP Employment and Training Program”  means
the employment and training component  of the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program under 7 U.S.C. 2015(d)(4).
(b) The Department of Human  Services shall incorporate the pilot program into the
statewide plan for the SNAP Employment and Training Program and shall seek federal  re-
imbursement of 50 percent of the pilot program’s costs.
(c) In addition to the responsibilities described in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, the
department shall:
(A) Refer individuals who receive supplemental nutrition  assistance under ORS 411.806
to 411.845 to participate in the pilot program; and
(B) Coordinate necessary support services, including child care, for participants of the
pilot program.
(5) The board and the department shall establish a joint steering committee to oversee
the progress of the pilot  program and to ensure that pilot program goals are met. The board
shall provide staff support for the steering committee.
SECTION 3. The local workforce development board serving  Multnomah and Washington
Counties shall submit an  annual report to the interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to  workforce development no later than December 31 of each calendar year,
in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the progress of the pilot program established un-
der section 2 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 4.
There is appropriated to the State Workforce and Talent Development
Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, out  of the General Fund, the amount of
$5,000,000, for distribution to the local workforce development board serving  Multnomah and
Washington Counties for the purpose of  implementing the pilot program established under
section 2 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 5. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2018 Act are repealed on January 2, 2021.
SECTION 6. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]