Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $30,000,000, to provide a grant to the Regional
Rural Revitalization Strategies Consortium,  established as an intergovernmental agreement
under ORS 190.003 to 190.130, to provide  planning, infrastructure, capital equipment and
predevelopment costs for  housing, to award grants and loans to capacity builders and devel-
opers of housing and to enter into public-private partnerships for the development  of hous-
ing. Housing supported with moneys appropriated under this section  may be located in any
area of this state, except for within the urban growth boundary of a  city with a population
greater than 50,000.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1384