Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “paid sick leave” means sick leave required by
federal, state or local law.
(2) A credit against taxes that are otherwise due under ORS  chapter 316 or, if the tax-
payer is a corporation, under  ORS chapter 317 or 318 is allowed to a taxpayer that provides
paid sick leave as defined  in this section. The credit shall be determined as set forth in sec-
tion 3 of this 2025 Act.
(3) A taxpayer may qualify for the credit allowed under this section if the taxpayer:
(a) Employs not more than 50 employees at any time during the tax year;
(b) Provides paid sick leave in accordance with all applicable federal,  state and local laws;
and
(c) Has paid to its employees the full amount of  wages due for paid sick leave taken
during the tax year not later than December 31 of the tax year.
(4) A taxpayer must obtain a written certification of eligibility from  the Department of
Consumer and Business Services prior to claiming the credit allowed under this section.
(5) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax  liability of the taxpayer
for the tax year.
(6) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this section that is not  used by the taxpayer
in a particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax  liability
for the next succeeding tax  year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax
year may be carried forward and used in the second succeeding tax year, and likewise any
credit not used in that second succeeding tax year may be  carried forward and used in the
third succeeding tax year but may not be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(7) A nonresident  shall be allowed the credit under this section. The credit shall be
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1721
HB 2911
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
computed in the same manner and be subject to the same limitations as the credit granted
to a resident.
(8) If a change in the  taxable year of the taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085,
or if the Department of Revenue  terminates the taxpayer’s taxable year under ORS 314.440,
the credit allowed by  this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with
ORS 314.085.
(9) If a change  in the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from nonres-
ident to resident occurs, the credit  allowed by this section shall be determined in a manner
consistent with ORS 316.117.
(10) The Department of Consumer and Business Services, in consultation with  the Bu-
reau of Labor and Industries, shall adopt rules for  the purposes of this section, including
rules establishing policies and procedures for providing written certification to taxpayers el-
igible for the credit allowed under this section, as required by subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 3.
The credit under section 2 of this 2025 Act is allowed as follows:
(1) For tax years beginning  on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2027, the
amount of the tax credit is 75 percent of the qualified paid sick  leave wages that are paid by
the taxpayer during the tax year.
(2) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before  January 1, 2028, the
amount of the tax credit is 50 percent of the qualified paid sick  leave wages that are paid by
the taxpayer during the tax year.
(3) For tax years beginning  on or after January 1, 2028, and before January 1, 2029, the
amount of the tax credit is 35 percent of the qualified paid sick  leave wages that are paid by
the taxpayer during the tax year.
(4) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2029, and before  January 1, 2030, the
amount of the tax credit is 25 percent of the qualified paid sick  leave wages that are paid by
the taxpayer during the tax year.
SECTION 4.  ORS 314.772 is amended to read:
314.772. (1) Except as provided in ORS 314.766 (5)(b), the tax credits allowed or allowable  to a
C corporation for purposes  of ORS chapter 317 or 318 shall not be allowed to an S corporation. The
business tax credits allowed or allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 316 shall be allowed  or are
allowable to the shareholders of the S corporation.
(2) In determining the tax imposed under ORS chapter 316, as provided under ORS 314.763, on
income of the  shareholder of an S corporation, there shall be taken into account the shareholder’s
pro rata share of  business tax credit (or item thereof) that would be allowed to the corporation (but
for subsection (1) of this section) or  recapture or recovery thereof. The credit (or item thereof), re-
capture or recovery shall be passed through to shareholders in pro rata shares as determined in the
manner prescribed under section 1377(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) The character of any item included in a shareholder’s pro rata  share under subsection (2)
of this section shall be determined as if such item were realized  directly from the source from which
realized by the corporation, or incurred in the same manner as incurred by the corporation.
(4) If the shareholder is a nonresident and there is a requirement applicable  for the business tax
credit that in the case of a nonresident the credit be allowed  in the proportion provided in ORS
316.117, then that provision shall apply to the nonresident shareholder.
(5) As used in this section, “business  tax credit” means the following credits: ORS 315.104
(forestation and reforestation), ORS 315.124 (small forest option), ORS 315.133 (agricultural overtime
[2]
HB 2911
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
pay), ORS 315.138 (fish screening, by-pass  devices, fishways), ORS 315.141 (biomass production for
biofuel), ORS  315.156 (crop gleaning), ORS 315.164 and 315.169 (agriculture workforce housing), ORS
315.176 (bovine manure), ORS 315.204 (dependent care assistance), ORS 315.208 (dependent care fa-
cilities), ORS 315.213 (contributions for child care), ORS  315.237 (employee and dependent scholar-
ships), ORS 315.271  (individual development accounts), ORS 315.283 (affordable housing sales), ORS
315.304 (pollution control facility),  ORS 315.326 (renewable energy development contributions), ORS
315.331 (energy conservation  projects), ORS 315.336 (transportation projects), ORS 315.341
(renewable energy resource equipment  manufacturing facilities), ORS 315.354 and 469B.151 (energy
conservation facilities), ORS  315.506 (tribal taxes on reservation enterprise zones and reservation
partnership zones), ORS 315.507 (electronic commerce), ORS 315.514 (film production development
contributions), ORS 315.518 (semiconductors),  ORS 315.523 (employee training programs), ORS
315.533 (low income community jobs initiative), ORS 315.593 (short  line railroads), ORS 315.640
(university venture development funds), ORS 315.643 (Opportunity Grant Fund contributions), ORS
315.675 (Trust for Cultural Development Account contributions), ORS 317.097 (loans for affordable
housing), ORS 317.124 (long term enterprise zone facilities), ORS 317.147  (loans for agriculture
workforce housing), ORS 317.152  (qualified research expenses) and ORS 317.154 (alternative qualified
research  expenses)  and section 9, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2013 (alternative fuel vehicle contribu-
tions), and section 2 of this 2025 Act (paid sick leave) .
SECTION 5.
 ORS 318.031 is amended to read:
318.031. It being the intention of the Legislative Assembly that this chapter and ORS chapter
317 shall be administered as uniformly as  possible (allowance being made for the difference in im-
position of the taxes), ORS 305.140  and 305.150, ORS chapter 314 and the following sections are in-
corporated into and made a part of this chapter: ORS 315.104, 315.124, 315.133, 315.141,  315.156,
315.176, 315.204, 315.208, 315.213, 315.283, 315.304, 315.326, 315.331, 315.336, 315.506, 315.507, 315.523,
315.533, 315.593 and 315.643 and section 2 of this 2025 Act (all only  to the extent applicable to a
corporation) and ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 6. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act  apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2030.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]