Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 475B.759 is amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate  and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)[(a)] The Department of Revenue shall certify  quarterly the amount of moneys available in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(4) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, and after the  transfer required in ORS
475B.895 (7), but before making any other transfer out of the Oregon  Marijuana Account, the
department shall make a quarterly transfer out of the Oregon Marijuana Account:
(a) To any city with a population exceeding 10,000  that is located in a combined statistical
area, as designated by the  United States Office of Management and Budget, with a population
exceeding 600,000, as determined by Portland State University under ORS 190.510 to 190.610,
on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer.
(b) In a percentage of the amount certified under subsection  (3) of this section that is
calculated by taking the ratio, for the immediately preceding calendar quarter,  of retail sales
in the city compared to retail sales throughout the state, and dividing that ratio by 10.
[(b)] (5)(a) Subject to subsection [ (4)] (6) of this  section, the department shall transfer quarterly
20 percent of the moneys  remaining  in  the Oregon Marijuana Account after the transfers re-
quired in subsection (4) of this section and section 16, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018,  as fol-
lows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be  transferred to the cities of this state ,
other than a city described in subsection (4) of this section,  in the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred  in shares that reflect the popu-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 674
HB 2014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
lation of each city of this state that is not exempt from this paragraph pursuant  to  subsection
[(4)(a)] (6)(a) of this section compared to  the population of all cities of this state that are not exempt
from this paragraph pursuant to subsection [ (4)(a)] (6)(a) of this section, as  determined by Portland
State University under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately  preceding the date of the
transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the  number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100  and 475B.105 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the  following
shares:
(i) Fifty  percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in each county compared to the total commercially  available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses held pursuant to  ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of  the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS  475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located  in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
[(c)] (b) Eighty percent  of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty  percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the  account must be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for  purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the  moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
[(4)(a)] (6)(a) A city that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises  for which
issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required  is not eligible
to receive transfers of moneys under subsection [ (3)(b)(A)] (5)(a)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection [ (3)(b)(B)(i)] (5)(a)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection [ (3)(b)(B)(ii)] (5)(a)(B)(ii) of this section.
[(5)(a)] (7)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection [ (4)] (6) of this section to re-
ceive a transfer of moneys from the Oregon Marijuana Account during  a given quarter but has re-
ceived a transfer of moneys for that quarter shall return the amount transferred  to the Department
of Revenue, with interest as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection.  An ineligible city or
[2]
HB 2014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
county may voluntarily transfer the moneys to the Department of Revenue  immediately upon receipt
of the ineligible transfer.
(b) If the Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services determines that a city
or county received a transfer of moneys under subsection [ (3)(b)] (5)(a) of this section but was in-
eligible to receive that transfer under subsection [ (4)] (6) of  this section, the director shall provide
notice to the ineligible city or county and order the city or county to  return the amount received
to the Department of Revenue, with interest  as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection.
A city or county may  appeal the order within 30 days of the date of the order under the procedures
for a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under paragraph  (b) of this subsection becomes final, the director shall
notify the Department of  Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon notification, the Depart-
ment of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have the benefit of all  laws of the state pertaining to the
collection of income and excise taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts described  in the no-
tice under paragraph (c) of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not necessary and  the collection
described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject to an order  to return moneys from an ineligible transfer, the
city or county shall  be denied any further relief in connection with the ineligible transfer on or after
the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at the  rate established in ORS 305.220 beginning on
the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys and the interest collected from or returned by an  ineligible city or county
shall be redistributed to the cities  or counties that were eligible to receive a transfer under sub-
section [ (3)(b)] (5)(a) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
[(6)(a)] (8)(a) Not later than July 1 of each  year, each city and county in this state shall certify
with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services whether the city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issuance  of a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required. The certification shall  be made concurrently with the
certifications  under  ORS 221.770, in a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services.
(b) If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive transfers  of
moneys under subsection [ (3)(b)(A)] (5)(a)(A) of this section. If a county  fails to comply with this
subsection, the county is not eligible to receive transfers of  moneys under subsection [ (3)(b)(B)]
(5)(a)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as provided  in ORS 475B.496 shall file an updated
certification with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services in a  form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, noting the effective date of  the change. A city or county that repeals an
ordinance as provided in ORS 475B.496 is eligible to  receive quarterly transfers of moneys under
this section for quarters where  the repeal is effective for the entire quarter and the updated certi-
fication was filed at least 30 days before the date of transfer.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 475B.759, as amended by section 1 of this 2021 Act, is amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate  and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly  the amount of moneys available in the
[3]
HB 2014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Oregon Marijuana Account.
[(4) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, and after the transfer required in ORS 475B.895 (7),
but before making  any other transfer out of the Oregon Marijuana Account, the department shall make
a quarterly transfer out of the Oregon Marijuana Account: ]
[(a) To any city  with a population exceeding 10,000 that is located in a combined statistical area,
as designated by the United States Office  of Management and Budget, with a population exceeding
600,000, as determined by Portland State University under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the  date imme-
diately preceding the date of the transfer. ]
[(b) In a percentage of the amount certified  under subsection (3) of this section that is calculated
by taking the ratio,  for the immediately preceding calendar quarter, of retail sales in the city compared
to retail sales throughout the state, and dividing that ratio by 10. ]
[(5)(a)] (b) Subject to subsection [ (6)] (4) of this section, the department shall  transfer quarterly
20 percent of the moneys [ remaining] in the Oregon Marijuana Account [ after the transfers  required
in subsection (4) of this section and section 16, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018, ] as follows:
(A) Ten percent  of the moneys in the account must be transferred to the cities of this state[ ,
other than a city described in subsection (4) of this section, ] in the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred  in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that is not exempt from this paragraph pursuant  to  subsection
[(6)(a)] (4)(a) of this section compared to  the population of all cities of this state that are not exempt
from this paragraph pursuant to subsection [ (6)(a)] (4)(a) of this section, as  determined by Portland
State University under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately  preceding the date of the
transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the  number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100  and 475B.105 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the  following
shares:
(i) Fifty  percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in each county compared to the total commercially  available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses held pursuant to  ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the  number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business  day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of  the transfer for premises located in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
[(b)] (c) Eighty percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for  which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account must  be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
[4]
HB 2014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Fifteen percent of  the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for  purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
[(6)(a)] (4)(a) A city that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises  for which
issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required  is not eligible
to receive transfers of moneys under subsection [ (5)(a)(A)] (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection [ (5)(a)(B)(i)] (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection [ (5)(a)(B)(ii)] (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
[(7)(a)] (5)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection [ (6)] (4) of this section to re-
ceive a transfer of moneys from the Oregon Marijuana Account during  a given quarter but has re-
ceived a transfer of moneys for that quarter shall return the amount transferred  to the Department
of Revenue, with interest as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection.  An ineligible city or
county may voluntarily transfer the moneys to the Department of Revenue  immediately upon receipt
of the ineligible transfer.
(b) If the Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services determines that a city
or county received a transfer of moneys under subsection [ (5)(a)] (3)(a) of this section but was in-
eligible to receive that transfer under subsection [ (6)] (4) of  this section, the director shall provide
notice to the ineligible city or county and order the city or county to  return the amount received
to the Department of Revenue, with interest  as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection.
A city or county may  appeal the order within 30 days of the date of the order under the procedures
for a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under paragraph  (b) of this subsection becomes final, the director shall
notify the Department of Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon  notification, the Depart-
ment of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have the  benefit of all laws of the state pertaining to the
collection of income and  excise taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts described in the no-
tice under paragraph (c) of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not necessary and  the collection
described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject to  an order to return moneys from an ineligible transfer, the
city or county shall  be denied any further relief in connection with the ineligible transfer on or after
the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at  the rate established in ORS 305.220 beginning on
the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys and  the interest collected from or returned by an ineligible city or county
shall be redistributed to the cities or counties that were eligible to  receive a transfer under sub-
section [ (5)(a)] (3)(b) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
[(8)(a)] (6)(a) Not later than July 1 of each  year, each city and county in this state shall certify
with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services whether the city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required.  The certification shall be made concurrently with the
[5]
HB 2014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
certifications under ORS 221.770, in a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon Department  of
Administrative Services.
(b) If  a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive transfers of
moneys under subsection [ (5)(a)(A)] (3)(b)(A) of  this section. If a county fails to comply with this
subsection, the county is not  eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection [ (5)(a)(B)]
(3)(b)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as provided  in ORS 475B.496 shall file an updated
certification with the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services in a form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, noting the effective date of  the change. A city or county that repeals an
ordinance as provided in ORS 475B.496 is  eligible to receive quarterly transfers of moneys under
this section for quarters where the repeal is effective for the entire quarter  and the updated certi-
fication was filed at least 30 days before the date of transfer.
SECTION 3.
 Section 16, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 16.  (1) Notwithstanding ORS 475B.759  (5) , after making the transfers required under
ORS 475B.759 (4) and 475B.895 (7), but  before making any other  distribution from the Oregon
Marijuana Account established under ORS 475B.759, the Department of Revenue shall [ first] dis-
tribute quarterly from the account the following:
(a) $875,000 to the Oregon  Liquor Control Commission for deposit in the Marijuana Control and
Regulation Fund established under ORS 475B.296; and
(b) $375,000 to the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission for deposit into the Illegal Marijuana
Market  Enforcement  Grant Program Fund established under section 15 , chapter 103, Oregon Laws
2018, [ of this 2018 Act ] for the purposes of paying the costs incurred by the commission  in carrying
out the provisions of section 13 , chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018  [ of this 2018 Act ].
(2) The final distribution made under subsection (1) of this section shall be made  in the fiscal
quarter beginning on October 1, 2023.
SECTION 4. (1) The amendments to ORS 475B.759 by section 1 of this 2021 Act apply to
distributions from the Oregon Marijuana Account occurring  in calendar quarters beginning
on or after January 1, 2022, and before July 1, 2027.
(2) The amendments to ORS 475B.759 by section 2  of this 2021 Act apply to distributions
from the Oregon Marijuana Account occurring  in calendar quarters beginning on or after
July 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[6]