Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Housing and Community Services Department shall study issues re-
garding housing. The department shall submit a report in the manner  provided by ORS
192.245 to the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to housing no later
than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4551