Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.071 is amended to read:
336.071. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Panic alarm” means a security system signal used by a school that:
(A) Is not audible within a school building;
(B) Is generated by the manual activation of a  device or the manual activation of a signal
through electronic means;
(C) Is used when there is a perceived safety threat within the school building; and
(D) Is immediately sent  to law enforcement to indicate that there is a potentially life-
threatening or emergency situation that requires a response from law enforcement.
(b) “School” means any:
(A) Kindergarten through grade 12 public or  private school, including a public charter
school; or
(B) Educational institution having an average daily attendance of 50 or more students.
(c) “School building” means any building that is  regularly used by a school to provide
educational services to students in kindergarten through grade 12 or any  combination of
those grade levels.
(2) Every school is required to have emergency safeguards to  protect the safety and
well-being of students and staff at the  school. The emergency safeguards must include, at a
minimum:
[(1)] (a) [ All schools are required to instruct  and drill students ] Drills and instruction  on
emergency procedures so that [ the] students can respond to an  emergency without confusion or
panic.
(b) At least one panic alarm in each school building.
(3) The [ emergency procedures shall include ] drills and  instruction required by this section
must be  on:
(a) Fires;
(b) Earthquakes, which shall include tsunami drills and instruction in schools in a tsunami haz-
ard zone; and
(c) Safety threats.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 19
HB 3101
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
[(2)(a)] (4)(a) Drills and  instruction on fire emergencies shall include routes and methods of ex-
iting the school building.
(b) Drills and instruction on earthquake emergencies shall include the earthquake emergency
response procedure known as “drop, cover  and hold on.” A school may drill earthquake emergency
response procedures in addition to “drop, cover and hold on” when  the school determines, based on
evaluation of specific engineering and structural issues related to a building,  that “drop, cover and
hold on” may not be the most effective earthquake emergency response procedure to prevent or limit
injury or loss of life.
(c) Drills and instruction on tsunami emergencies shall include immediate evacuation after an
earthquake when appropriate or after a tsunami  warning to protect students against inundation by
tsunamis.
(d) Drills and instruction on safety threats shall include:
(A) Procedures related to lockdown, lockout, shelter in place and evacuation; and
(B) Other appropriate actions to take when there is a threat to safety.
[(3)(a)] (5)(a) At  least 30 minutes in each school month shall be used to instruct students on the
emergency procedures for emergencies  described in subsection [ (1)] (3) of this section.
(b) At least two drills on earthquakes shall be conducted each year.
(c) At least two drills on safety threats shall be conducted each year.
(d) In schools in a tsunami hazard zone, at least three drills on earthquakes and tsunamis shall
be conducted each year.
[(4)] (6) All schools shall maintain all exit doors so that the doors  can be opened from the inside
without a key during school hours  and shall ensure that all panic  alarms are maintained and
in working order.
[(5)] (7) Units of local government and state agencies associated with emergency procedures
training and planning shall:
(a) Review emergency procedures proposed by schools; and
(b) Assist schools in the instruction and drilling of students in emergency procedures.
[(6) As used in this section, “school” means any: ]
[(a) Kindergarten through grade 12 public or private school; or ]
[(b) Educational institution having an average daily attendance of 50 or more students. ]
[2]