Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,900,000 million, to be distributed by  grant
to the Salvage Chief (LSM380) Foundation, an  Oregon public benefit corporation, for the
purpose of repairing, upgrading and returning to operation the vessel  known as the Salvage
Chief, as follows:
(1) $1,200,000 million for hull repairs;
(2) $400,000 for engine and fire pump upgrades; and
(3) $300,000 for emergency communications upgrades, United States  Coast Guard in-
spection and contingency.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1366