Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of  Emergency Management shall study and
make recommendations regarding improvements to the operations of the department.
(2) The department shall submit a report  on its findings to an appropriate committee of
the Legislative Assembly no later than January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2219