Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CARBON POLLUTION PERMIT PROGRAM
(Statement of Purposes)
SECTION 1. Sections 2 to 17 of this 2017 Act are added to and made a part  of ORS
chapter 468A.
SECTION 2. (1) The Legislative Assembly  finds and declares that the purposes of sections
2 to 17 of this 2017 Act  are to reduce greenhouse gas emissions consistent with the
greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals established  under ORS 468A.205 and to promote
adaptation and resilience by this state’s communities and economy in the face of  climate
change.
(2) Sections  2 to 17 of this 2017 Act and the rules adopted pursuant to sections 2 to 17
of this 2017 Act:
(a) May not be interpreted  to limit the authority of any state agency to adopt and im-
plement measures to reduce greenhouse gas emissions; and
(b) Shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with federal law.
(Rules Adoption and Implementation Oversight Advisory Committees)
SECTION 3. (1) In adopting rules as required by  sections 6, 7 and 13 of this 2017 Act, the
Environmental Quality Commission shall consult with the Environmental Justice  Task
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1238
SB 748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Force, Indian tribes, the Public Utility Commission, the State Department of Energy,  the
Department of Transportation and other interested state and federal  agencies, and shall be
advised by an advisory committee appointed by the Governor.
(2) The advisory committee required by this section shall be composed of:
(a) One member appointed by the Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs;
(b) One member appointed by the Commission on Black Affairs;
(c) One member appointed by the Commission on Hispanic Affairs;
(d) One member appointed by the Commission on Indian Services; and
(e) Five members appointed by the Governor who  reflect the geographic and demographic
diversity of this state, and who have the qualifications  deemed necessary by the Governor
to advise the Environmental Quality Commission on the  diversity of interests relating to
efforts by the state to limit greenhouse gas emissions consistent  with ORS 468A.205, with a
preference in making appointments given to individuals who can represent the interests  of
multiple constituencies.
(3) Members of the advisory committee are not entitled to compensation or  reimburse-
ment for expenses and serve as volunteers on the advisory committee.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Carbon Pollution Permit Program Oversight Committee is created.
The committee consists of nine members as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one  member from among the members of
the Senate.
(b) The  Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
the members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) One member who represents the office of the Governor;
(B) One member who represents disadvantaged communities;
(C) One member who represents the interests of labor organizations;
(D) One member who represents environmental organizations;
(E) One member who represents covered entities;
(F) One member with expertise in climate science; and
(G) One member who represents the interests of business sectors  impacted by climate
change.
(2) The term of a  legislative member of the committee shall be two years. If a person
appointed by the President of the Senate  or by the Speaker of the House ceases to be a
Senator or Representative during the person’s term on the committee, the person  may con-
tinue to  serve as a member of the committee for the balance of the member’s term on the
committee. The term of all  other appointed members shall be four years. Appointed members
of the committee may be  reappointed. If a vacancy occurs in one of the appointed positions
for any reason during the term of membership, the official who appointed the  member to the
vacated position shall appoint a new member to serve  the remainder of the term. An ap-
pointed member of the committee may be removed from the committee at  any time by the
official who appointed the member.
(3)(a) The members of the committee shall select  from among themselves a chairperson
and a vice chairperson.
(b) The committee shall meet at such times and  places as determined by the chairperson.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 171.072, members of the committee who are members of the
[2]
SB 748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Legislative Assembly  are not entitled to mileage expenses or a per diem and serve as volun-
teers on the committee.  Other members of the committee are not entitled to compensation
or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the committee.
(5) The committee shall:
(a) Study the implementation of sections 2 to 17 of this 2017 Act, with particular  focus
on the use of the moneys received as fees and penalties pursuant to sections 6 and 7  of this
2017 Act and the following matters relating to the use of the moneys:
(A) Greenhouse gas emissions reductions that have resulted from the use of the moneys;
(B) The geographic distribution of activities, programs or persons that  have benefitted
from the use of the moneys; and
(C) How disadvantaged  communities and economically distressed areas have benefitted
from the use of the moneys;
(b) Make any recommendations to the Environmental  Quality Commission, the Governor
and the Legislative Assembly that the committee deems necessary to increase the effective-
ness of the implementation of sections 2 to 17 of this 2017 Act;
(c) Make any recommendations for additional legislation governing  the adoption and im-
plementation of the carbon pollution permitting program; and
(d) Conduct such other studies as necessary to provide oversight to the implementation
of sections 2 to 17 of this 2017 Act.
(6) The Department of Environmental Quality shall provide  the committee with staff,
subject to availability of funding for that purpose.
(Definitions)
SECTION 5.
As used in sections 2 to 17 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Carbon dioxide  equivalent” means the potential contribution of a greenhouse gas to
anthropogenic climate change expressed such that the  potential contribution of one unit of
carbon dioxide equivalent is equal to the potential contribution of one metric ton  of carbon
dioxide.
(2) “Carbon pollution  permit program” means the system for regulating greenhouse gas
emissions established by  the Environmental Quality Commission by rule under section 6 of
this 2017 Act.
(3) “Covered entity” means  a source that is required by the Environmental Quality
Commission to participate in the carbon pollution permit program.
(4) “Disadvantaged communities” includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Communities with a high percentage of people  of color, low-income households, im-
migrants or refugees relative to other communities;
(b) Linguistically isolated communities;
(c) Communities with high exposures to pollution or toxics relative to other communities;
and
(d) Rural communities with  unemployment rates that are above this state’s mean state-
wide unemployment rate.
(5) “Economically distressed area” means an area designated as distressed by  the Oregon
Business Development Department under ORS 285A.020 and 285A.075.
(6) “Electric utility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
[3]
SB 748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) “Greenhouse gas” means any  gas that contributes to anthropogenic climate change,
including but not limited to carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous  oxide, hydrofluorocarbons,
perfluorocarbons and sulfur hexaflouride.
(8) “High road agreement”  means an agreement among multiple stakeholders that spec-
ifies goals for a project or program that are related to  the quality and accessibility of eco-
nomic opportunities provided by that project or program, and that includes:
(a) Strategies for advancing the specified goals based on metrics that may include but
are not limited to:
(A) Requirements for wages and benefits;
(B) Workforce and business diversity;
(C) Training and career development; and
(D) Environmental benefits;
(b) A mechanism for implementing the agreement; and
(c) A process for evaluating the progress of a project or program  toward achieving the
goals specified in the agreement.
(9) “Individual emissions limit”  means the maximum amount of greenhouse gases, ex-
pressed in units  of carbon dioxide equivalent, that an individual covered entity is permitted
to emit in one calendar year under the carbon pollution permit program.
(10) “Leakage” means a reduction in  greenhouse gas emissions within this state that is
offset by an increase in greenhouse gas emissions outside this state.
(11) “Natural gas  utility” means a natural gas utility regulated by the Public Utility
Commission under ORS chapter 757.
(12) “Project labor  agreement” means a collective bargaining agreement with one or
more labor organizations that establishes the terms  and conditions of employment for a
specific construction project and that, at a minimum:
(a) Binds all contractors and subcontractors on the construction project through the
inclusion of appropriate specifications in all relevant solicitation provisions  and contract
documents;
(b) Allows all contractors and subcontractors to compete  for contracts and subcontracts
without regard to whether they are parties to any other collective bargaining agreement;
(c) Contains guarantees against strikes, lockouts and similar job disruptions; and
(d) Sets forth effective, prompt and mutually binding procedures for  resolving labor dis-
putes that arise during the term of the project labor agreement.
(13) “Source” means:
(a) An air contamination source as defined in ORS 468A.005;
(b) Any person that imports, sells, allocates or distributes for use in this state electricity,
the generation of which emits greenhouse gases; or
(c) Any person that imports,  sells or distributes for use in this state fossil fuel that
generates greenhouse gases when combusted.
(14) “Statewide greenhouse gas emissions” means:
(a) The total annual greenhouse gas emissions in this state; and
(b) All greenhouse gas emissions from outside this state that are attributable to the
generation of electricity that is delivered to and consumed in this state, accounting  for
transmission and distribution line losses.
[4]
SB 748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(Carbon Pollution Permit Program)
SECTION 6. (1) The Environmental  Quality Commission shall adopt a carbon pollution
permit program by rule. Rules adopted under this subsection must:
(a) Identify sources subject to the  carbon pollution permit program. In adopting rules
under this subsection, the commission may not require a source to be subject to the  carbon
pollution permit program unless or until the annual verified greenhouse gas emissions re-
ported under ORS 468A.050 or 468A.280 attributable  to that source meet or exceed 25,000
units of carbon dioxide equivalent.
(b) Set a cap on the total combined greenhouse gas emissions allowed from all covered
entities during the calendar year 2021, and set a schedule for the cap to decrease  by a pre-
determined amount  each calendar year until 2050. The cap and schedule shall reflect the total
greenhouse gas emissions from covered entities as  a proportionate share of statewide
greenhouse gas  emissions that must be reduced in order to achieve the greenhouse gas
emissions reduction goals set forth in ORS 468A.205.
(c) Set an individual emissions limit on the greenhouse gas emissions from each covered
entity for the calendar year 2021, and set a schedule  for the individual emissions limit to
decrease by a predetermined amount each calendar year until 2050, consistent with  the cap
and schedule set under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) Require covered entities to annually  obtain a permit from the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality to authorize greenhouse gas  emissions up to the individual emissions limit
set under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(e) Establish multiyear compliance reporting periods and, subject to section 7  of this 2017
Act, procedures by which covered entities must  meet the entities’ compliance obligations
under the carbon pollution permit program.
(2)(a) The commission shall adopt  by rule a schedule of fees for permits required under
this section. A fee schedule established under this subsection shall:
(A) Apply only to greenhouse gas emissions by a covered entity that  are in excess of the
first 25,000 units of carbon dioxide equivalent emitted per year by the covered entity; and
(B) Be based on factors that the commission finds appropriate, including, but not be
limited to, the level of greenhouse gas emissions authorized under the  individual emissions
limit set for the covered entity under subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(b) The  commission shall hire or contract with a third party organization to provide data
and analysis identifying leakage risk from specific covered entities including,  but not limited
to, covered entities that are part of an  emissions-intensive, trade-exposed industry. The
commission shall use the  data and analysis provided by the third party organization under
this section to develop a schedule of reduced fees for  permits required under this section and
rules for applying the reduced fee schedule  to certain covered entities as necessary to ad-
dress leakage. No less than once every five years, the commission shall:
(A) Require that any data and analysis provided under this subsection be updated by the
third party organization.
(B) Adjust the rules adopted under this section  as necessary to reflect the updated data
and analysis.
SECTION 7.
(1) A  covered entity subject to the carbon pollution permit program devel-
oped under section 6  of this 2017 Act must submit to the Department of Environmental
[5]
SB 748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Quality, in a form prescribed by the  Environmental Quality Commission by rule, a report
detailing the covered entities’ compliance with  the individual emissions limits set forth under
section 6 of this 2017 Act during a compliance reporting period  no later than the reporting
date for a compliance reporting period specified by the  Environmental Quality Commission
by rule or order.
(2) In addition to any other penalty provided  by law, a covered entity that reports
greenhouse gas emissions under this section in excess of the covered entity’s  individual
emissions limits for any year during a compliance reporting period must, no later  than six
months after the specified reporting date for the compliance reporting period, pay to  the
department a penalty equal to $  for each unit of  carbon dioxide equivalent that
the covered entity emitted  in excess of the covered entity’s individual emissions limits during
the compliance reporting period.
DISTRIBUTION OF MONEYS RECEIVED FROM FEES AND PENALTIES
SECTION 8. (1) All moneys received by the Department  of Environmental Quality from
fees and penalties paid by covered  entities under sections 6 and 7 of this 2017 Act that con-
stitute revenues described in Article IX, section 3a, of the Oregon Constitution, shall be paid
to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the Climate Investments Account in  the State
Highway Fund.
(2) All moneys received by the department from  fees and penalties paid by covered enti-
ties under sections  6 and 7 of this 2017 Act that do not constitute revenues as described in
subsection (1) of this section and that are received  from electric utilities and natural gas
utilities shall be paid to the State Treasurer to  be deposited in the Climate Assistance Fund.
(3) All moneys received by the department from  fees and penalties paid by covered enti-
ties under sections 6 and 7 of  this 2017 Act that are not described in subsections (1) or (2)
of this section shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be deposited as follows:
(a) Eighty-five percent in the Oregon Climate Investments Fund; and
(b) Fifteen percent in the Just Transition Fund.
(Climate Investments Account in the State Highway Fund)
SECTION 9.
(1) The Climate Investments Account is established within  the State High-
way Fund. Interest  earned by the Climate Investments Account shall be credited to the ac-
count. Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated  to the Department of
Transportation to be used only for activities that further the purposes of sections 2 to 17  of
this 2017 Act as stated in section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys deposited in  the account under section 8 of this
2017 Act.
(3)(a) Of the moneys deposited in the account each biennium:
(A) At least 20 percent must be used to support  projects that are geographically located
in disadvantaged communities; and
(B) At least 20 percent must be used to support projects that otherwise benefit disad-
vantaged communities.
(b) For purposes of this section, the Department  of Transportation shall designate dis-
[6]
SB 748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
advantaged communities using  the methodology adopted by the Environmental Quality
Commission by rule under section 13 of this 2017 Act.
(4) In distributing moneys in the account, the Department of Transportation shall:
(a) Consult with the Climate Investments  in Disadvantaged Communities Advisory Com-
mittee created under section 14 of this 2017 Act; and
(b) To the maximum extent feasible and practicable, give funding preference to projects
that will result in the greatest greenhouse gas emissions reductions.
(5) If a construction project is  funded in whole or in part by moneys from the account,
the primary contractor participating in the construction project:
(a) Must participate in  an apprenticeship program registered with the State Apprentice-
ship and Training Council;
(b) May not be a contractor listed by the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and In-
dustries under ORS 279C.860 as ineligible to receive a contract or subcontract for public
works;
(c) Must demonstrate a  history of compliance with the rules and other requirements of
the Construction Contractors Board and of the Workers’  Compensation Division and the
Occupational Safety and  Health Division of the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices; and
(d) Must demonstrate a history of compliance with federal and state wage and  hour laws.
(6) If a construction project is funded in whole or in part  by moneys from the account,
the Department of Transportation may, on a project-by-project basis, require the use  of a
high road agreement or  a project labor agreement if the use of either type of agreement
would advance the public interest and be consistent with law.
(Climate Assistance Fund)
SECTION 10.
(1) The Climate Assistance Fund is established  in the State Treasury, sep-
arate and distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the Climate Assistance Fund
shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys deposited  in the fund under section 8 of this 2017
Act.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Department of Environ-
mental Quality to be used to further the purposes of sections 2  to 17 of this 2017 Act as
stated in section 2 of this  2017 Act through the development and implementation of programs
or activities that benefit low-income customers of electric utilities and natural gas utilities.
SECTION 11. (1) There is created in the Department  of Environmental Quality an advi-
sory committee to be appointed by the Governor  to advise the department regarding the
development and implementation of programs and activities funded  by moneys in the Climate
Assistance Fund. The advisory committee shall consist of nine members including a repre-
sentative of the  State Department of Energy, a representative of the Public Utility Com-
mission, and at least four members who represent the interests  of persons whom the
programs and activities are intended to benefit.
(2) The members  shall be appointed to serve for terms of four years each. A vacancy on
the committee shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired term.
(3) The committee shall meet at times and places fixed by the chairperson of the com-
[7]
SB 748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mittee. The committee may meet at other times  upon notice by the chairperson or three
members of the committee.  The department shall provide office space and personnel to assist
the committee as requested by  the chairperson, within the limits of available funds. The
committee shall adopt rules to govern its proceedings and may select officers it  considers
necessary.
(4) Members  of the advisory committee are not entitled to compensation or reimburse-
ment for expenses and serve as volunteers on the advisory committee.
(Oregon Climate Investments Fund)
SECTION 12. (1) The Oregon Climate Investments Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Cli-
mate Investments Fund shall be credited to the fund.  Moneys in the fund are continuously
appropriated to the Department of Environmental Quality to be distributed pursuant to the
Climate Investments Grant Program adopted under section 13 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys deposited  in the fund under section 8 of this 2017
Act.
(3) Moneys in the fund  may be used only for activities that further the purposes of
sections 2 to 17 of this 2017 Act as stated in section 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 13. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission shall adopt by  rule a Climate
Investments Grant Program for distributing moneys in the Oregon  Climate Investments
Fund. The  grant program must carry out the purposes of sections 2 to 17 of this 2017 Act
as stated in section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(2)(a) Moneys must be distributed through the grant program  developed under this sec-
tion such that, of the moneys deposited in or  credited to the Oregon Climate Investments
Fund each biennium:
(A) At least 40 percent of the moneys are distributed to projects or programs that are
geographically located in disadvantaged communities; and
(B) At  least 40 percent of the moneys are distributed to projects or programs that are
geographically located in economically distressed areas, with an emphasis placed on  projects
or programs that support job creation and job education and training opportunities.
(b) Disadvantaged communities and economically distressed areas  may be, but need not
be, considered mutually exclusive for purposes of this subsection.
(c) The commission shall consult with the Environmental  Justice Task Force, other state
agencies, local agencies and local officials  in adopting by rule a methodology for designating
disadvantaged communities for purposes of this subsection.
(3)(a) The grant program shall include the appointment of a grant  committee. Members
of the grant committee shall  be appointed by the Governor. The grant committee may be
composed of any number of individuals with  qualifications that the Governor determines
necessary. However, the Governor shall  appoint at least one member from each congres-
sional district in this state and  shall include individuals with experience in administering
state grant programs.
(b) The appointment of members of the grant committee is subject  to confirmation by
the Senate in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(c) Members of the grant committee are not entitled to compensation or  reimbursement
[8]
SB 748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for expenses and serve as volunteers on the grant committee.
(4) The commission shall determine the form and method of applying for grants from the
grant program, the eligibility requirements  for grant applicants and general terms and con-
ditions of the grants.
(5) The rules adopted by the commission under this section shall provide that  the grant
committee consult with the Climate Investments  in Disadvantaged Communities Advisory
Committee created under  section 14 of this 2017 Act in reviewing grant applications and
making determinations of funding based  on a scoring system developed by the commission.
The scoring system shall give funding preference to projects and programs that:
(a) Maximize multiple benefits  in this state, including but not limited to environmental,
social and economic benefits;
(b) Result in greenhouse gas emissions reductions that are cost effective or  that are the
product of business and research development interests in this state;
(c) Constitute investments in, and facilitate the development of, clean energy
infrastructure and technologies in this state;
(d) Complement efforts to achieve and maintain federal and state air quality standards;
(e) Protect disadvantaged communities and economically  distressed areas from economic
uncertainties associated with climate change or climate change policies; or
(f) Make use of domestically produced products to the maximum extent feasible.
(6) The grant program adopted under this section may:
(a) Require that a grant  applicant provide matching funds for completion of the project
or program for which a grant is awarded; and
(b) Allow an applicant to  appeal to the commission for reevaluation of any determination
of grant funding.
(7) If a construction project is  funded in whole or in part by a grant awarded under the
grant program, the grant  agreement shall require that the primary contractor participating
in the construction project:
(a) Must participate in  an apprenticeship program registered with the State Apprentice-
ship and Training Council;
(b) May not be a contractor listed by the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and In-
dustries under ORS 279C.860 as ineligible to receive a contract or subcontract for public
works;
(c) Must demonstrate a  history of compliance with the rules and other requirements of
the Construction Contractors Board and of the Workers’  Compensation Division and the
Occupational Safety and  Health Division of the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices; and
(d) Must demonstrate a history of compliance with federal and state wage and  hour laws.
(8) If a construction project is  funded in whole or in part by a grant awarded under the
grant program, the Department of Environmental Quality may, on a  project-by-project basis,
require the use of a high road agreement or a project labor agreement  if the use of either
type of agreement would advance the public interest and be consistent with law.
(9) Subject to the rules adopted by the commission,  and subject to reevaluation by the
commission on appeal, the grant committee has  the responsibility to review grant applica-
tions and make funding determinations  under the grant program adopted pursuant to this
section.
[9]
SB 748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 14. (1) There is created a Climate Investments  in Disadvantaged Communities
Advisory Committee consisting of 17 members  appointed by the Governor, with at least one
member from each congressional district in this state. The Governor shall appoint  members
to the advisory committee as follows:
(a) Eight members must  be recommended by the Environmental Justice Task Force and
have experience in working to support environmental justice in disadvantaged communities;
(b) Three members must represent labor interests;
(c) Three members must have experience in sustainable development;
(d) One member must represent the interests of cities;
(e) One member must represent the interests of counties; and
(f) One member must represent the interests of business.
(2) The advisory committee shall consult with and make recommendations to the follow-
ing public bodies regarding the investment of funds in projects and programs that are ge-
ographically located in disadvantaged communities or that otherwise  benefit disadvantaged
communities:
(a) The Department of Transportation with relation to the use of moneys in the  Climate
Investments Account; and
(b) The grant committee appointed by the Governor under section 13 of this 2017 Act with
relation to the award of grants under the Climate Investments Grant Program.
(3) A majority of the members of the  advisory committee constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(4) The advisory committee shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(5) The  term of a member of the advisory committee shall be four years. Members of the
advisory committee may be  reappointed. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor
shall make an appointment to become immediately effective.
(6) The  advisory committee shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the
chairperson or of a majority of the members of the advisory committee.
(7) Members  of the advisory committee are not entitled to compensation or reimburse-
ment for expenses and serve as volunteers on the advisory committee.
SECTION 15.
Notwithstanding the term of  office specified by section 14 of this 2017 Act,
of the members first appointed to  the Climate Investments in Disadvantaged Communities
Advisory Committee:
(1) Four shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2022.
(2) Four shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2023.
(3) Four shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2024.
(4) Five shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2025.
(Just Transition Fund)
SECTION 16.
(1) The Just Transition Fund is established  in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Just Transition Fund  shall be
credited to the fund. Moneys in the  fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department to be distributed pursuant  to the Just Transition Grant Pro-
gram developed under section 17 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys deposited in the  fund under section 8 of this 2017
[10]
SB 748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Act.
(3) Moneys in the fund may be used only for activities that  further the purposes of
sections 2 to 17 of this 2017 Act as stated in section 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 17. (1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall adopt by rule a
Just Transition Grant Program for the disbursement of moneys in the Just Transition Fund.
In developing the grant program, the department shall consult  with the advisory committee
created under section 3 of this 2017 Act. The purpose of the grant program  shall be to sup-
port economic diversification, job creation, job training and other employment and  mental
health services for workers and communities in  this state that are adversely affected by
climate change or climate change policies.
(2) The grant program shall include the appointment of a grant committee. Members of
the grant committee shall  be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the
Senate in the manner  provided in ORS 171.562 and 171.565. The grant committee may be
composed of any number of individuals  with qualifications that the Governor determines
necessary. However, the Governor shall include on the grant committee:
(a) Individuals who have experience in administering state grant programs;
(b) Individuals recommended by the Environmental Justice Task Force who have  experi-
ence in working to support environmental justice in disadvantaged communities;
(c) Representatives of labor organizations;
(d) Individuals with energy and climate policy expertise; and
(e) At least one individual from each congressional district in this state.
(3) Subject to the rules adopted by the department, and  subject to reevaluation by the
department on appeal, the  grant committee has the responsibility to review grant applica-
tions and make funding determinations under the grant program  adopted pursuant to this
section.
(4) Members of the grant committee are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement
for expenses and serve as volunteers on the grant committee.
(5) The department shall  determine the form and method of applying for grants from the
grant program, the eligibility requirements  for grant applicants and general terms and con-
ditions of the grants.
(6) The grant program adopted under this section may:
(a) Require that a grant  applicant provide matching funds for completion of the project
or program for which a grant is awarded; and
(b) Allow an applicant to appeal to the  department for reevaluation of any determination
of grant funding.
CONFORMING AMENDMENT
SECTION 18.
 ORS 468A.020 is amended to read:
468A.020. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the  air pollution laws con-
tained in ORS chapters 468, 468A and 468B do not apply to:
(a) Agricultural operations, including but not limited to:
(A) Growing or harvesting crops;
(B) Raising fowl or animals;
(C) Clearing or grading agricultural land;
[11]
SB 748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) Propagating and raising nursery stock;
(E) Propane flaming of mint stubble; and
(F) Stack or pile burning of residue from Christmas  trees, as defined in ORS 571.505, during the
period beginning October 1 and ending May 31 of the following year.
(b) Equipment used in  agricultural operations, except boilers used in connection with propagat-
ing and raising nursery stock.
(c) Barbecue equipment used in connection with any residence.
(d) Heating equipment in or used in  connection with residences used exclusively as dwellings for
not more than four families, except solid fuel burning devices, as defined in ORS 468A.485,  that are
subject to regulation under this section and ORS 468A.140 and 468A.460 to 468A.515.
(e) Fires set or permitted  by any public agency when such fire is set or permitted in the per-
formance of its official duty for the purpose of weed abatement, prevention  or elimination of a fire
hazard, or instruction of employees in the methods of  fire fighting, which in the opinion of the
agency is necessary.
(f) Fires set pursuant to permit for the purpose of instruction of employees  of private industrial
concerns in methods of fire fighting, or for civil defense instruction.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the extent:
(a) Otherwise provided in ORS 468A.555 to 468A.620, 468A.790, 468A.992, 476.380 and 478.960;
(b) Necessary to implement  the federal Clean Air Act (P.L. 88-206 as amended) under ORS
468A.025, 468A.030, 468A.035, 468A.040, 468A.045 and 468A.300 to 468A.330; or
(c) Necessary for the Environmental Quality Commission, in the  commission’s discretion, to im-
plement a recommendation of the  Task Force on Dairy Air Quality created under section 3, chapter
799, Oregon Laws 2007, for the regulation of dairy air contaminant emissions.
(3)(a) Except to the extent necessary to  implement the federal Clean Air Act (P.L. 88-206 as
amended), [the air pollution laws contained in ] ORS 468A.025, 468A.030, 468A.035, 468A.040, 468A.045
and 468A.300 to 468A.330 and sections 2 to 17 of this  2017 Act  do not apply to carbon dioxide
emissions from the combustion or decomposition of biomass.
(b) As used in this subsection, “biomass” means:
(A) Nonfossilized and biodegradable organic materials that  originate from plants, animals and
microorganisms  and  that are products, byproducts, residues or wastes from agriculture, forestry and
related industries;
(B) Nonfossilized and biodegradable organic fractions of industrial and municipal wastes; and
(C) Gases  and liquids recovered from the decomposition of nonfossilized and biodegradable or-
ganic matter.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 19.
(1) Sections 1 to 17 of this 2017 Act and the amendments to ORS 468A.020
by section 18 of this 2017 Act become operative January 1, 2021.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission and the Oregon  Business Development De-
partment may adopt rules or take any actions before the operative date specified in  sub-
section (1) of  this section that are necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 1 to 17
of this 2017 Act.
CAPTIONS
[12]
SB 748
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
SECTION 20. The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 21. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[13]