Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the State Parks and Recreation Department, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $______ for outreach
and development of educational signs that warn  the public about the natural dangers of
ocean beaches, to be posted at key public beach access sites in this state.
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1071