Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Parks  and Recreation Department shall permit and arrange for
the placement within the State Capitol  State Park a suitable monument commemorating the
Ten Commandments that contains the following text:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4288
HB 3710
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
The Ten Commandments
I AM the LORD thy God.
Thou shalt not make to thyself any graven images.
Thou shalt not take the Name of the Lord thy God in vain.
Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy.
Honor thy father and thy mother, that thy days may be long upon
the land which the Lord thy God giveth thee.
Thou shalt not kill.
Thou shalt not commit adultery.
Thou shalt not steal.
Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor.
Though shalt not covet thy neighbor’s house.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor’s wife, nor his manservant,
nor his maidservant, nor his cattle, or anything that is
thy neighbors.
(2) The department shall coordinate with a nonprofit organization to ensure that  the
monument is designed, constructed and placed in the State Capitol State  Park at no cost to
the State of Oregon.
(3)(a) The department, in consultation with the Capitol Planning Commission, shall:
(A) Approve the design and site selection for the monument; and
(B) Arrange a suitable time for its placement.
(b) The monument must be sited in a location within the  State Capitol State Park where
there are other monuments.
(4) In the event  that placement of the monument in the State Capitol State Park is
subject to a legal challenge, the Attorney General may:
(a) Prepare and present a legal defense of the placement of the monument; or
(b) Request the assistance  of a nonprofit legal organization that specializes in First
Amendment cases  to prepare and present a legal defense of the placement of the monument.
(5) The placement of the monument under this section is not intended to convey  that the
State of Oregon favors any particular religion or denomination over others.
[2]