Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Senator Aaron Woods Commission on Artificial Intelligence is es-
tablished within the office of Enterprise Information Services. The purpose of the commis-
sion is to:
(a) Serve as a central resource  for legislators to monitor trends in and impacts from the
use of artificial intelligence technologies; and
(b) Identify and report on long-term policy implications in the use of artificial intelligence
technologies to assist policymakers  in making strategic, well-informed decisions that foster
innovation while safeguarding the well-being of Oregonians.
(2) The commission shall:
(a) Conduct literature reviews of public policy issues around  the use of artificial intelli-
gence technologies, including the benefits and risks to the broader public and historically
disadvantaged communities, taking into consideration  equity, workforce impacts and ethical
concerns;
(b) Conduct reviews of existing protections under federal,  state and local laws of
individuals’ data and privacy rights, civil rights, intellectual property rights and safety, and
how federal, state and local laws that apply to  artificial intelligence technologies align, differ,
conflict or interact;
(c) Identify uses of artificial intelligence systems that present  or create a high risk to
individuals, such as risks to individuals’ safety, employment rights,  civil rights or constitu-
tional rights;
(d) Identify opportunities to  support or promote innovation and economic growth in this
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 120
HB 4103
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
state in artificial intelligence technologies through the use of grants or incentives;
(e) Provide recommendations on limitations on the use of artificial intelligence;
(f) Provide recommendations on educational  opportunities that are available in this state
and policies to maximize those  opportunities, including workforce development, higher edu-
cation and kindergarten through grade 12 science, technology, engineering and mathematics
education;
(g) Identify impacts from the use  of artificial intelligence systems on privacy interests
of individuals in this state and what policies are needed to protect individuals’ privacy in-
terests from any diminution caused  by the use of artificial intelligence systems in the private
or public sector;
(h) Identify impacts and  opportunities related to the use of artificial intelligence systems
on jobs and incomes in this state  and recommend policies to protect jobs and incomes from
adverse effects from the use of artificial intelligence systems;
(i) Review the state of education in this state around  the uses of artificial intelligence
systems at the primary, secondary and post-secondary education levels  and identify at what
level of education different subjects that  incorporate information about artificial intelligence
technologies, including ethics, are taught;
(j) Provide recommendations relating to the industry-wide standards and legal use of data
to train artificial intelligence models;
(k) Conduct a review of issues around unlawful discrimination, on the basis of race, color,
national origin, creed, religion,  sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, age, vet-
eran or military status, marital status, family status or any other protected class, from  the
use of  artificial intelligence systems and provide recommendations for mitigating or pro-
tecting against such discrimination;
(L) Provide recommendations on prioritizing transparency to improve  the understanding
of the behavior  and functional components of artificial intelligence systems and enable the
identification of performance issues,  safety and privacy concerns, biases, exclusionary prac-
tices and unintended outcomes;
(m) Conduct a review of legal and contractual protections for individual personhood
against the use of artificial intelligence systems  to create an artificial replica, including an
artificial replica of a person’s voice, image or likeness; and
(n) Conduct a review  on the use of artificial intelligence systems to support or make
decisions around employment.
(3) The commission shall consist  of 14 voting members and four nonvoting members as
follows:
(a) The President of the Senate and  the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
jointly appoint the following voting members:
(A) Three members who represent business leagues, including trade or  professional as-
sociations.
(B) Three members who represent workers,  including from organized labor and trade or
professional associations.
(C) One member who represents consumer advocacy groups.
(D) One member who represents  the public universities listed in ORS 352.002, private
post-secondary institutions  authorized to confer academic degrees under ORS 348.594 to
348.615 or community colleges, as defined in ORS 341.005, and who has expertise in the de-
[2]
HB 4103
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sign, effects and ethical use of artificial intelligence systems.
(E) One member who represents  the education system from early learning through high
school.
(F) One member who has expertise in ethics and technology.
(G) One member who has expertise in privacy and data protection.
(H) One member who represents tribal governments.
(b) The Governor shall appoint, subject  to confirmation by the Senate in the manner
prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565, the following voting members:
(A) One member who represents communities that are disproportionately vulnerable  to
being harmed by algorithmic bias.
(B) One member who represents public safety.
(c) The nonvoting members shall be:
(A) The Chief Artificial Intelligence Officer or the officer’s designee.
(B) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries or  the commissioner’s
designee.
(C) The Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee.
(D) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court or the Chief Justice’s designee.
(4) The voting members of the commission must have experience in technology policy.
(5) The term of office of each voting member is three years. A voting member serves
at the pleasure of the  appointing authority. Before the expiration of the term of a voting
member, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor whose term begins on January
1 of the following year. A voting member may be reappointed. If there is a  vacancy for any
cause, the appointing authority shall  make an appointment to become immediately effective
for the unexpired term.
(6)(a) The commission may establish one or more advisory subcommittees to advise  in
an area impacted by artificial intelligence. An advisory  subcommittee may be established for
an ongoing or limited duration. In establishing an advisory subcommittee, the commission
shall define the  advisory subcommittee’s charge, subject area of focus and scope of activity.
An advisory subcommittee’s subject area of focus  may include, but is not limited to, one or
more of the following areas:
(A) Workforce and labor;
(B) Privacy and data;
(C) Ethics and bias in health  care, housing, law enforcement, education, civil rights or
employment;
(D) Education; or
(E) Innovation.
(b) Members of  an advisory subcommittee are appointed by the chairperson of the com-
mission subject to approval by a majority of the voting members of the commission.
(c) An advisory subcommittee shall consist of no more than seven members.
(d) Members of an advisory subcommittee must represent a broad  and diverse cross
section of stakeholders in the area advised on by the advisory subcommittee  and include, at
a minimum, the following members:
(A) One member who has industry expertise relevant to the advisory  subcommittee’s
subject area of focus.
(B) One member who represents an advocacy group.
[3]
HB 4103
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) One member who represents an organization that represents work in an  area that is
relevant to the advisory subcommittee’s subject area of focus.
(e) Members of the commission may not serve on an advisory subcommittee.
(7) In carrying out  the commission’s duties, the commission shall seek input from com-
munity members and  state agencies, including the Department of Education, Department of
Consumer and Business Services, Oregon Health Authority and State Department  of Energy
and any other state agency.
(8) On or before September 1 of each year, the commission shall submit a report in  the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, regu-
lations or policies, to the Legislative Assembly.
(9) A majority of voting members of the commission constitutes a  quorum for the
transaction of business.
(10) The commission shall elect one of its  voting members to serve as chairperson of the
commission.
(11) The commission shall meet at least once every  three months at times and places
specified by the call of the chairperson or of a majority  of voting members of the commis-
sion.
(12) Members of the commission shall be paid compensation and  expenses as provided in
ORS 292.495 from such funds as may be available to the commission.
(13) The Chief Artificial Intelligence Officer shall provide  resources and staffing required
by the commission to carry out the commission’s duties.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding the term of  office specified in section 1 (5) of this 2026 Act,
of the voting members first appointed  to the Senator Aaron Woods Commission on Artificial
Intelligence:
(1) Four shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2029.
(2) Five shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2030.
(3) Five shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2031.
SECTION 3.
(1) The  Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall employ a Chief
Artificial Intelligence Officer.
(2) The Chief Artificial Intelligence Officer shall:
(a) Assist and advise the Senator Aaron Woods Commission on Artificial  Intelligence
established under section 1 of this 2026 Act; and
(b) Provide policy and support staff  to the commission to assist the commission in car-
rying out the commission’s duties.
SECTION 4.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may charge an assess-
ment to a state  or local agency, officer, board or commission for the cost incurred by the
department or the Senator Aaron Woods Commission  on Artificial Intelligence in providing
services related to artificial  intelligence systems requested by a state or local agency, officer,
board or commission.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended by the de-
partment to hire additional full-time employees to enable the Chief Artificial Intelligence
Officer to carry out the Chief Artificial Intelligence Officer’s duties under sections  1 and 3
of this 2026 Act.
[4]
HB 4103
1
[5]