Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2019 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 284.701
to 284.749.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Gap funding” means funding  provided to an Oregon small business located in a rural
area to fund the initial phase of a business or invention endeavor  until funding for subse-
quent phases of the endeavor can be obtained from another source.
(b) “Rural area” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285A.010.
(c) “Seed and start-up capital” means financing that  is provided for the initial phases of
development, refinement and commercialization of an invention, technology, product, process
or innovation and  includes, but is not limited to, funding for space, technical assistance and
support and tools to produce patentable prototypes.
(d) “Small business” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285A.010.
(2) The Oregon Innovation Council, in consultation with the Oregon Business  Develop-
ment Department, may make  grants from the Oregon Fund for Rural Small Business De-
velopment established under section 3 of this 2019 Act to:
(a) Provide seed and start-up capital and gap funding to small businesses in rural  areas
of this state whose principal  objectives are to create and support invention, innovation and
economic development in rural areas of this state; and
(b) Provide monetary awards  to winners of contests designed to attract invention, inno-
vative and entrepreneurial solutions and opportunities in rural areas of this state.
(3) To qualify for a  grant under subsection (2) of this section, a proposal must be sub-
mitted in accordance with the standards and  requirements adopted by the Oregon Innovation
Council by rule, which must, at a minimum, require that a proposal:
(a) Contain a verified statement that the applicant has established  or intends to establish
a small business in a rural area of this  state and spends, or will spend, at least 50 percent
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1151
HB 2544
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
of the payroll on employees who are residents of a rural area of this state;
(b) Demonstrate that the objectives and goals of  the applicant align or will align with
regional business strategies;
(c) Demonstrate that the applicant has relevant workforce development skills and  objec-
tives; and
(d) Demonstrate that the objectives and goals of the applicant  integrate with regional
educational and training opportunities and community need.
(4) The Oregon  Innovation Council shall give preference in awarding grants under this
section to an applicant that demonstrates that the  applicant has or will establish partner-
ships between and collaborations with schools, research institutions and public and  private
entities to create and support invention,  innovation and economic development in rural areas
of this state.
(5) The Oregon Innovation  Council shall adopt rules to implement and administer the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 3. (1) The Oregon  Fund for Rural Small Business Development is established
in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Oregon Fund for Rural Small Business Development shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Oregon Fund for Rural Small Business Development shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated  or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Income earned on moneys in the fund; and
(d) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Oregon Innovation Council
for the purpose of making grants under section 2 of this 2019 Act.
[2]