Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $800,000, for deposit in  the Oregon Agricultural
Heritage Fund established under ORS 541.978, for the purpose of hiring for the  following
three positions related to programs under ORS 541.977 to 541.989:
(1) A full-time program coordinator.
(2) A conservation easement specialist.
(3) A grant support specialist.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023,
out of the General  Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit in the Oregon Agricultural
Heritage Fund  established under ORS 541.978, for the purposes described in ORS 541.979
(1)(a).
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3617