Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “state agency” means any state officer, board,
commission, bureau, department or division in the executive branch of state government.
(2) A state agency may not implement or enforce any rule that requires  a person to be
vaccinated against COVID-19.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2021