Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019,
out of the General  Fund, the amount of $738,652 for the purposes of hiring personnel and
contracting for services to carry out the provisions of ORS 541.977 to 541.989.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $9,250,000,  to be deposited in the Oregon Agricultural
Heritage Fund established under ORS 541.978.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1299