Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $9,523,300,000 for the State School Fund.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of
$447,700,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum  limit for
payment of expenses from lottery  moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Education for the State School Fund.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of
$4,261,193 is established  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from  fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or
received by the Department of Education for the State School Fund.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding ORS 327.008 and 327.013, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, the Department of Education:
(1) May spend up to $968,000 from the  State School Fund for the contract described in
ORS 329.488.
(2) May spend up to  $1,600,000 from the State School Fund for purposes related to the
Oregon Virtual School District.
(3) May spend up to $12,500,000  from the State School Fund for an English language
learners program. Up to $10,000,000 of this amount  may be used to support school districts
that are identified as low-performing districts  relating to English language learners. Up to
$2,500,000 of this amount may be used for technical assistance, best practice support and
implementation of the statewide English language learners plan.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2750
SB 671
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
SECTION 5. (1) The Department of Education may  not spend more than $4,885,790,000
from the State School Fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2017.
(2) The Department of Education may not spend more than $5,085,210,000 from  the State
School Fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018.
SECTION 6. The amount of $3,860,367 is transferred  from the State School Fund to the
Local Option Equalization Grants Account created in ORS 327.339.
SECTION 7. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[2]