Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. (1) As  used in this section, “medical loss ratio” means the proportion of a
coordinated care organization’s  global budget that is spent on health care services, quality
improvement and fraud prevention activities, as prescribed by the Oregon Health Authority
by rule consistent with federal law.
(2)(a) The authority shall establish  a minimum medical loss ratio for coordinated care
organizations at 85 percent.
(b) The authority may not apply the  minimum medical loss ratio established under this
section to revenue or expenditures of prepaid managed care health services  organizations
that provide dental care to members of a coordinated care organization.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to contracts between  a coordinated care
organization and the Oregon Health Authority entered  into, amended or renewed on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2590