Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
HOME HEALTH STAFFING PLANS
(Definitions)
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 12 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Exclusive representative” has the meaning given that term in ORS 441.760.
(2) “Home health agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.014.
(3) “Home health care staff” means individuals who provide home health  services. “Home
health care staff” does not include:
(a) Home care workers, as defined in ORS 410.600;
(b) Direct caregivers employed by an in-home care agency as defined in ORS 443.305;
(c) Physicians;
(d) Nurse practitioners;
(e) Psychiatrists;
(f) Psychologists;
(g) Volunteers; or
(h) Individuals classified as a supervisor under  an applicable collective bargaining agree-
ment or certified as a supervisor by the National Labor Relations Board or  the Employment
Relations Board.
(4) “Home health services” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.014.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 194
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(Staffing Committees)
SECTION 2.
(1)(a) For each home health agency licensed under  ORS 443.015 there shall
be established a home health  staffing committee. Each home health staffing committee shall
consist of an equal number of home health agency managers and home health care staff.
(b) If any of the home  health care staff have an exclusive representative, the exclusive
representative shall select the home health care staff members of the committee.
(c) If more than one exclusive representative represents any of the  home health care
staff, each exclusive representative shall select from among the home health care staff that
it represents  an equal number of the home health care staff members of the committee. The
remaining home health care staff members of the committee shall be selected by  mutual
agreement of the exclusive representatives.
(d) If none of the home health care staff are represented by an  exclusive representative,
the home health care staff  shall select by majority vote the home health care staff members
of the committee.
(2) A home health staffing committee shall develop a written staffing plan in  accordance
with this section and  sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act. The committee’s primary goals in
developing the staffing plan shall be to ensure that the home health agency is staffed to meet
the health care needs of patients.  The committee shall review and modify the staffing plan
in accordance with section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(3) A majority of the members of a  home health staffing committee constitutes a quorum
for the transaction of business.
(4) A home health staffing committee shall have  two cochairs. One cochair shall be a
home health agency manager elected by the members of the committee  who are home health
agency managers, and one cochair shall be a home health care staff  person elected by the
members of the committee who are home health care staff.
(5) A decision made by a home health staffing committee must be made by a vote of  a
majority of the members of the committee. If a quorum of members  present at a meeting
comprises an unequal number of home health  agency managers and home health care staff,
only an equal number of home health agency managers and  home health care staff may vote.
(6) A home health staffing committee shall meet:
(a) At least once every calendar quarter; and
(b) At any time and place specified by either cochair.
(7)(a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a home health staffing committee
meeting must be open to:
(A) The home health agency’s staff and any exclusive  representative that represents
home health care staff as observers; and
(B) Upon invitation by either cochair, other observers or presenters.
(b) At any time, either cochair  may exclude persons described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection from a committee meeting for purposes related to deliberation or voting.
(8) Minutes of home health staffing committee meetings must:
(a) Include motions made and outcomes of votes taken;
(b) Summarize discussions; and
(c) Be made available in a  timely manner to home health care staff, other home health
agency staff and any exclusive representative that represents home  health care staff upon
[2]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
request.
(9) A home health  agency shall release a member of a home health staffing committee
from the member’s assignment,  and provide the member with paid time, to attend committee
meetings.
(Staffing Plans)
SECTION 3.
(1) Each home  health agency shall implement a written staffing plan for
home health services that:
(a) Meets the requirements of this section and sections 2 and 4 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Has been developed and approved by the home health staffing committee established
under section 2 of this 2025 Act;
(c) Includes any staffing-related terms and conditions that were  adopted through any
applicable collective bargaining agreement, including meal periods and rest periods,  unless a
term or condition is in direct conflict with an applicable statute or administrative rule;
(d) Incorporates feedback from home health care staff in each of the home  health
agency’s practice specialities;
(e) Is based on the specialized qualifications and competencies of the home health care
staff and the skill  mix and level of competency needed to ensure that the home health agency
is staffed to meet the health care needs of patients; and
(f) As applicable to the patient  population served by the home health care staff, is con-
sistent with nationally recognized evidence-based standards and guidelines established  by
professional home health organizations, if any.
(2) The home health staffing committee shall include  the following factors in a home
health staffing plan:
(a) Patient acuity;
(b) Safety of the patient’s home environment;
(c) Type of patient visit;
(d) Travel time to and from the patient’s home;
(e) Staff time spent on:
(A) Case management and patient care coordination;
(B) Clinical and administrative documentation, including any additional time spent as a
result of technological barriers;
(C) Continuing education and training requirements;
(D) Duties as a clinical preceptor; and
(E) Any other required tasks not related to providing direct patient care;
(f) On-call shifts;
(g) Meal and rest periods;
(h) Sick leave, vacation leave or other approved leave; and
(i) Any other factors relevant to ensuring that the home health agency  is staffed to meet
the health care needs of patients.
(3)(a)(A) If the home health  staffing committee does not adopt a home health staffing
plan, either cochair of the committee may invoke the commencement of a  60-day period
during which the committee shall continue to develop the staffing plan.
(B) If by the end of the 60-day period, the home health staffing committee  does not adopt
[3]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a home health staffing plan, the members of the committee may extend deliberations  for one
additional 60-day period only by a majority vote of the members of the committee.
(b) If by the end of the initial 60-day period of deliberations or by  the end of the second
60-day period of deliberations, if deliberations are  extended under paragraph (a)(B) of this
subsection, the home health staffing committee does not adopt  a home health staffing plan,
the cochairs of the committee shall submit the disputed plan or parts of the plan,  as appli-
cable, to the Oregon Health Authority, and  the authority shall initiate expedited binding ar-
bitration.
(c) The arbitrator shall be selected  using alternating strikes by the cochairs or their
designees from a list of seven drawn from the  interest arbitrator panel maintained by the
State Conciliation Service.
(d) Arbitration must be scheduled by mutual agreement no later than 30 calendar days
after the  cochairs submit the disputed home health staffing plan or the disputed parts of the
plan to the authority except as, by mutual agreement, the time may be extended.
(e) The arbitrator shall issue a decision on the home health  staffing plan or the disputed
parts of the plan, as  applicable, based on the written submissions of evidence and arguments
and may not conduct  an evidentiary hearing or allow discovery. The arbitrator’s decision
must be based on and within the parameters of the versions  of the plan or the disputed parts
of the plan submitted by the cochairs and must be within the staffing parameters.
(f) The arbitrator shall issue a decision no later than 60 days  after the submission of
evidence and written arguments.
(g) The home health agency shall pay for the cost of the arbitrator.
(4) A home health agency shall submit the home  health staffing plan adopted under this
section to the  authority no later than 30 days after adoption of the staffing plan and shall
submit any subsequent changes to the authority no later than 30 days  after the changes are
adopted.
(5) A home health agency shall make readily available to all  home health agency staff the
home health staffing plan adopted under  this section and any subsequent changes to the
plan.
(6) A home health agency must maintain and post, in a physical location  or online, a list
of on-call  and per diem home health care staff or staffing agencies to provide replacement
home health care staff in the event of a vacancy. The list of  on-call and per diem home
health care staff or staffing agencies must be sufficient to provide for  replacement home
health care staff.
SECTION 4.
(1) A home health staffing committee established  pursuant to section 2 of
this 2025 Act shall review the home health staffing plan:
(a) At least once every calendar quarter; and
(b) At any other date and time specified by either cochair of the committee.
(2) In reviewing a home health staffing plan, a home health staffing committee shall
consider:
(a) Patient outcomes, including consideration of:
(A) Quality assurance and performance improvement data; and
(B) The number of patient hospitalizations and emergency  department visits that re-
sulted from inadequate home health agency staffing;
(b) The number of missed patient visits;
[4]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Delays in patient care, including secondary evaluations and follow-up care;
(d) Patient complaints regarding staffing, including complaints about a delay or  absence
of home health services;
(e) The aggregate hours of mandatory overtime worked by the home health care staff;
(f) The aggregate hours of voluntary overtime worked by the home health care staff;
(g) The aggregate hours worked by any home health care staff who  are exempt from
overtime compensation as established by local, state or federal law; and
(h) Any  other matter determined by the committee to be necessary to ensure that the
home health agency is staffed to meet the health care needs of patients.
(3) After reviewing a home health staffing plan, a home health staffing  committee shall
modify the staffing plan as needed to ensure that the home health agency is staffed  to meet
the health care needs of patients.
(4) If a home health staffing committee cannot reach an  agreement on the modifications
to a home  health staffing plan under subsection (3) of this section, the cochairs of the com-
mittee shall submit  the disputed modifications to the Oregon Health Authority, and the au-
thority shall initiate expedited binding arbitration according to the procedures described in
section 3 (3) of this 2025 Act.
(Modification in Case of Emergency or Epidemic)
SECTION 5.
(1) For purposes of  this section, “epidemic” means the occurrence of a group
of similar conditions of public health importance in a  community or region that are in excess
of normal expectancy and that are from a common or propagated source.
(2) Notwithstanding sections 1 to 12 of this 2025 Act, a home health agency  is not re-
quired to follow a written home health staffing plan  developed and approved by the home
health staffing committee established under section 2  of this 2025 Act upon the occurrence
of:
(a) A national emergency or state emergency declared under  ORS 401.165 to 401.236 or
433.441 to 433.452 requiring the  implementation of a disaster plan and crisis standards of
care;
(b) Sudden unforeseen adverse weather conditions; or
(c) An infectious disease epidemic suffered by home health agency staff.
(3)(a) No later than 30 days after a home health agency deviates  from a written home
health staffing plan under subsection (2)(a) of this section, the home health agency shall re-
port to the cochairs of the home health staffing committee established under section 2 of
this 2025 Act  an assessment of the home health staffing needs arising from the national or
state emergency declaration.
(b) Upon receipt of the report described in  this subsection, the home health staffing
committee shall convene to  develop a contingency home health staffing plan to address the
needs arising from the national  or state emergency declaration. The contingency home
health staffing plan must include crisis standards of care.
(c) The home health agency’s deviation from the written home health staffing  plan may
not be in effect for more than  90 days without the approval of the home health staffing
committee.
(4) Upon the occurrence of a national or state  emergency declaration or circumstances
[5]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
not described in subsection (2) of this section, either cochair of the home health staffing
committee may require the committee to meet to review and potentially  modify the home
health staffing plan in response to the emergency declaration or circumstances.
(Records)
SECTION 6.
A home health agency shall  keep and maintain records necessary to dem-
onstrate compliance with sections 1 to 12 of this 2025 Act.  A home health agency must pro-
vide records kept and maintained under this section to the  Oregon Health Authority upon
request.
SECTION 7. The Oregon Health Authority shall post on a website maintained  by the au-
thority:
(1) The home health staffing plans  received by the authority under sections 1 to 12 of this
2025 Act;
(2) Any report, described in section 9 (2)  of this 2025 Act, made pursuant to an investi-
gation of a complaint for which the authority issued a warning or imposed a civil  penalty
under section 10 of this 2025 Act; and
(3) Any order suspending or revoking the  license of a home health agency pursuant to
section 11 of this 2025 Act.
(Enforcement)
SECTION 8. (1) As used in  this section, “employee” has the meaning given that term in
ORS 653.258.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall implement a process for an employee  or an
employee’s exclusive representative to file a complaint under ORS 653.258 (2)(a) against a
home health agency for missed meal periods and rest periods.
(3) The authority shall forward to the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Indus-
tries any complaint filed under this section no later than 14 days after the complaint is filed.
(4) No  later than 30 days after receiving a complaint under this section, the authority
shall provide notice of the filing of the complaint to the following:
(a) The home health agency;
(b) The  cochairs of the relevant home health staffing committee established pursuant to
section 2 of this 2025 Act; and
(c) The exclusive representative, if any, of the employee filing the complaint.
SECTION 9.
(1) As used in this  section, “valid complaint” means a complaint containing
an allegation that, if assumed to be true, is a violation listed in section 10 of this 2025 Act.
(2) To ensure compliance with sections 1 to 12 of this 2025 Act,  the Oregon Health Au-
thority shall:
(a) Establish a method by which a home health care staff person or an exclusive  repre-
sentative of a home health care staff person  may submit a complaint through the authority’s
website regarding any violation listed in section 10 of this 2025 Act;
(b) No later than 14 days after receiving a complaint, send a copy of the complaint to the
complainant and to the exclusive representative, if any, of  the complainant, with a request
to provide any additional information;
[6]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) No later than 30 days after receiving a complaint:
(A) Provide notice to the complainant and the exclusive representative, if any,  of the
complainant that the  authority has determined that the complaint is not a valid complaint;
or
(B)(i) Open an investigation of the home health agency; and
(ii) Provide notice of the investigation to the complainant,  the home health agency, the
cochairs of the relevant home health staffing committee established pursuant to  section 2
of this 2025 Act and the exclusive representative, if any, of the complainant. The notice must
include a summary of the complaint that does not include the complainant’s  name or the
specific date, shift or unit but does include the calendar week in which the complaint arose;
(d) Not later than 80 days after opening  the investigation, conclude the investigation and
provide a written  report on the complaint to the complainant, the home health agency, the
cochairs of  the staffing committee and the exclusive representative, if any, of the
complainant. The report:
(A) Shall include a summary of the complaint;
(B) Shall include the nature of the alleged violation or violations;
(C) Shall include the authority’s findings and factual bases for the findings;
(D) Shall include other information the authority determines is appropriate to include  in
the report; and
(E) May not include the name of  any complainant, the name of any patient or the names
of any individuals that the authority interviewed in investigating the complaint;
(e) In determining whether  a violation has occurred, consider all relevant evidence, in-
cluding but not limited to witness testimony, written documents  and the observations of the
investigator; and
(f) If the authority issues a warning or imposes one or more civil penalties based on  the
report described in this subsection, provide a notice of the civil penalty  that complies with
ORS 183.415 and 183.745 and section 11 of  this 2025 Act to the home health agency, the
cochairs of the applicable home health staffing  committee, the complainant and the exclusive
representative, if any, of the complainant.
(3) A home health agency subject to a valid complaint  shall provide to the authority, no
later than 20 days after receiving a notice of investigation under  subsection (2) of this sec-
tion:
(a) The home health staffing plan that is the subject of the complaint;
(b) If relevant to the complaint, documents that  show the scheduled staffing and the
actual staffing on the unit  that is the subject of the complaint during the period of time
specified in the complaint; and
(c) Documents that show the actions described in section 11 (4) of this 2025 Act, if any,
that the home health  agency took to comply with the staffing plan or to address the issue
raised by the complaint.
(4) In conducting an investigation, the authority shall review any document:
(a) Related to the complaint that is provided by the exclusive representative  that filed
the complaint or by the  home health care staff person who filed the complaint and the
person’s exclusive representative, if any; and
(b) Provided by the home health agency in response to the complaint.
(5) In conducting an investigation, the authority:
[7]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Shall interview the home health care staff person or staff persons who filed  the
complaint unless the individual declines to be interviewed;
(b) May interview the manager and any other staff persons with information relevant  to
the complaint;
(c) May interview the cochairs of the relevant home health staffing committee; and
(d) May compel the production of books, papers, accounts,  documents and testimony
pertaining to the complaint, other than documents that are privileged or not otherwise  sub-
ject to disclosure.
(6) A complaint by a home health care staff person or the staff person’s  exclusive rep-
resentative must be filed no later  than 60 days after the date of the violation alleged in the
complaint. The authority may not investigate a complaint or take any enforcement  action
with respect to a complaint that has not been timely filed.
SECTION 10.
(1) Following the  receipt of a complaint and completion of an investigation
described in section 9 of this 2025  Act, for a violation described in subsection (2) of this
section, the Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Issue a warning for the first violation in a four-year period;
(b) Impose a civil penalty of $1,750 for the second violation of the same provision  in a
four-year period;
(c) Impose a civil penalty of  $2,500 for the third violation of the same provision in a
four-year period; and
(d) Impose a civil penalty of $5,000 for the fourth  and subsequent violations of the same
provision in a four-year period.
(2) The authority shall take  the actions described in subsection (1) of this section for the
following violations by a home health agency of sections 1 to 12 of this 2025 Act:
(a) Failure to establish a home health staffing committee under section 2 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Failure to create,  by agreement or after binding arbitration, a home health staffing
plan that complies with the requirements of section 3 of this 2025 Act;
(c) Failure to comply with the  staffing level in the home health staffing plan implemented
under section 3 of this 2025 Act;
(d) Failure to review the home health  staffing plan in accordance with section 4 of this
2025 Act;
(e) Failure to maintain or post a list of on-call and per diem home health care staff in
accordance with section 3 of this 2025 Act;
(f) Failure to report to  the cochairs of a home health staffing committee after deviating
from a home health staffing plan under section 5 of this 2025 Act; or
(g) Continuing to deviate from a home health staffing plan under section 5 of this 2025
Act for more than 90 days without the approval of the home health staffing committee.
(3) If a staff person at a home health agency is unable to  attend a home health staffing
committee meeting because the home health agency did not release the staff person from
other duties to attend the meeting, in violation of section 2  (9) of this 2025 Act, the authority
shall:
(a) Issue a warning for the first violation; and
(b) Impose a civil penalty of $500 for a second and each subsequent violation.
(4) A home health care staff person, or an  exclusive representative of a home health care
staff person,  may elect to enforce meal period and rest period violations under ORS 653.261
[8]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by filing a complaint with the authority in accordance with section 9 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 11.
(1) Civil penalties imposed by  the Oregon Health Authority for a violation
listed in section 10 of this 2025 Act shall be imposed in the manner provided in ORS 183.745.
(2) The authority may suspend or revoke the license of a home health agency,  in the
manner provided in ORS 443.045, for a violation listed in section 10 of this 2025 Act.
(3) Each violation of a written home health  staffing plan shall be considered a separate
violation and there is no cap on the number of times that a penalty may be imposed for  a
repeat of a violation.
(4) The authority may not  impose a civil penalty for a violation of a home health staffing
plan, if the home health agency took the following actions:
(a) Scheduled staff in accordance with the staffing plan;
(b) Sought volunteers from all available qualified employees to work extra time;
(c) Contacted qualified employees who made themselves available to work extra time;
(d) Solicited per diem staff to work; and
(e) Contacted contracted temporary agencies, that the home health  agency regularly
uses, if temporary staff from such agencies are permitted to work for  the home health
agency by law or any applicable collective bargaining agreement.
(5) The authority shall maintain for public inspection records of any civil  penalties or li-
cense suspensions or revocations imposed on home health agencies penalized  under sub-
section (1) or (2) of this section.
SECTION 12.
The Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules necessary to carry  out
sections 1 to 12 of this 2025 Act.
HOME HOSPICE STAFFING COMMITTEES
(Definitions)
SECTION 13. As used in sections 13 to 24 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Exclusive representative” has the meaning given that term in ORS 441.760.
(2) “Home hospice care staff” means  individuals who provide home hospice services.
“Home hospice care staff” does not include:
(a) Home care workers, as defined in ORS 410.600;
(b) Direct caregivers employed by an in-home care agency as defined in ORS 443.305;
(c) Physicians;
(d) Nurse practitioners;
(e) Psychiatrists;
(f) Psychologists;
(g) Volunteers; or
(h) Individuals classified as a supervisor  under an applicable collective bargaining agree-
ment or certified as a supervisor by the National Labor Relations Board or  the Employment
Relations Board.
(3) “Home hospice program” means a coordinated program of home  care, available 24
hours a day, that utilizes an interdisciplinary team of personnel trained to provide palliative
and supportive services to a patient-family unit experiencing a life threatening disease  with
a limited prognosis.
(4) “Home hospice services”  includes items and services provided to a patient-family unit
[9]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by a home hospice program or by other individuals  or community agencies under a consult-
ing or contractual arrangement with a home hospice program, such  as acute care, respite,
home care and bereavement  services provided to meet the physical, psychosocial, spiritual
and other special needs of a  patient-family unit during the final states of illness, dying and
the bereavement period.
(Staffing Committees)
SECTION 14.
(1)(a) For each home hospice program licensed under ORS 443.860 there
shall be established a home hospice staffing committee. Each home hospice staffing com-
mittee shall consist  of an equal number of home hospice program managers and home
hospice care staff.
(b) If any of the home hospice care staff  have an exclusive representative, the exclusive
representative shall select the home hospice care staff members of the committee.
(c) If more than one exclusive representative  represents any of the home hospice care
staff, each exclusive representative shall select from among the home  hospice care staff that
it represents  an equal number of the home hospice care staff members of the committee.
The remaining home hospice care staff members of the committee shall be selected by mu-
tual agreement of the exclusive representatives.
(d) If none of the home hospice care staff are  represented by an exclusive representative,
the home hospice care staff shall  select by majority vote the home hospice care staff mem-
bers of the committee.
(2) A home hospice staffing committee shall develop a  written staffing plan in accordance
with this section and  sections 15 and 16 of this 2025 Act. The committee’s primary goals in
developing the staffing plan shall be to ensure that the home  hospice program is staffed to
meet the health care needs of patients. The committee shall review and  modify the staffing
plan in accordance with section 16 of this 2025 Act.
(3) A majority of the members of a home hospice staffing committee constitutes  a quo-
rum for the transaction of business.
(4) A home hospice staffing committee shall  have two cochairs. One cochair shall be a
home hospice  program manager elected by the members of the committee who are home
hospice program managers, and  one cochair shall be a home hospice care staff person elected
by the members of the committee who are home hospice care staff.
(5) A decision made by a home hospice staffing committee must be made by a vote of  a
majority of the members of the committee. If a quorum of members  present at a meeting
comprises an unequal number of home  hospice program managers and home hospice care
staff, only an equal number of home hospice  program managers and home hospice care staff
may vote.
(6) A home hospice staffing committee shall meet:
(a) At least once every calendar quarter; and
(b) At any time and place specified by either cochair.
(7)(a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection, a home hospice staffing committee
meeting must be open to:
(A) The home hospice program’s staff and any exclusive representative  that represents
home hospice care staff as observers; and
[10]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Upon invitation by either cochair, other observers or presenters.
(b) At any time, either cochair  may exclude persons described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection from a committee meeting for purposes related to deliberation or voting.
(8) Minutes of home hospice staffing committee meetings must:
(a) Include motions made and outcomes of votes taken;
(b) Summarize discussions; and
(c) Be  made available in a timely manner to home hospice care staff, other home hospice
program staff and any exclusive representative that represents home hospice  care staff upon
request.
(9) A home hospice program shall release a  member of a home hospice staffing commit-
tee from the member’s assignment, and provide the member  with paid time, to attend com-
mittee meetings.
(Staffing Plans)
SECTION 15.
(1) Each home hospice program shall implement a written  staffing plan for
home hospice services that:
(a) Meets the requirements of this section and sections 14 and 16 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Has been developed and approved by the home hospice staffing committee established
under section 14 of this 2025 Act;
(c) Includes any staffing-related terms and conditions that were  adopted through any
applicable collective bargaining agreement, including meal periods and rest periods,  unless a
term or condition is in direct conflict with an applicable statute or administrative rule;
(d) Incorporates feedback from home  hospice care staff in each of the home hospice
program’s practice specialties;
(e) Is based on the  specialized qualifications and competencies of the home hospice care
staff and the skill mix and level of competency needed to ensure that the home hospice
program is staffed to meet the health care needs of patients; and
(f) As applicable to the patient population served by the home hospice care  staff, is con-
sistent with  nationally recognized evidence-based standards and guidelines established by
professional home hospice organizations, if any.
(2) The home hospice staffing committee shall include the following factors  in a home
hospice staffing plan:
(a) Patient acuity;
(b) Safety of the patient’s home environment;
(c) Type of patient visit;
(d) Travel time to and from the patient’s home;
(e) Staff time spent on:
(A) Case management and patient care coordination;
(B) Clinical and administrative documentation, including any additional time spent as a
result of technological barriers;
(C) Continuing education and training requirements;
(D) Duties as a clinical preceptor; and
(E) Any other required tasks not related to providing direct patient care;
(f) On-call shifts;
[11]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) Meal and rest periods;
(h) Sick leave, vacation leave or other approved leave; and
(i) Any other factors relevant to ensuring that the home hospice program is staffed  to
meet the health care needs of patients.
(3)(a)(A) If the home hospice staffing committee does not adopt  a home hospice staffing
plan, either cochair of the committee may invoke the commencement of a  60-day period
during which the committee shall continue to develop the staffing plan.
(B) If by the  end of the 60-day period, the home hospice staffing committee does not
adopt a home hospice staffing plan, the members of  the committee may extend deliberations
for one additional 60-day period only by a majority vote of the members of the committee.
(b) If by the end of the initial 60-day period of deliberations or by  the end of the second
60-day period of deliberations, if deliberations are  extended under paragraph (a)(B) of this
subsection, the home hospice staffing committee does not adopt a home hospice staffing plan,
the cochairs of  the committee shall submit the disputed plan or parts of the plan, as appli-
cable, to the Oregon Health Authority, and the  authority shall initiate expedited binding ar-
bitration.
(c) The arbitrator shall be selected using alternating strikes  by the cochairs or their
designees from a list of seven drawn  from the interest arbitrator panel maintained by the
State Conciliation Service.
(d) Arbitration must be scheduled by mutual agreement no later than 30 calendar days
after the cochairs submit the disputed home hospice staffing plan  or the disputed parts of
the plan to the authority except as, by mutual agreement, the time may be extended.
(e) The arbitrator shall issue a decision on the  home hospice staffing plan or the disputed
parts of the plan, as  applicable, based on the written submissions of evidence and arguments
and may not conduct  an evidentiary hearing or allow discovery. The arbitrator’s decision
must be based on and within the parameters of the versions  of the plan or the disputed parts
of the plan submitted by the cochairs and must be within the staffing parameters.
(f) The arbitrator shall issue  a decision no later than 60 days after the submission of
evidence and written arguments.
(g) The home hospice program shall pay for the cost of the arbitrator.
(4) A home hospice program shall submit  the home hospice staffing plan adopted under
this section to the authority no later than 30 days after adoption of the staffing plan and
shall submit any subsequent  changes to the authority no later than 30 days after the changes
are adopted.
(5) A home hospice program  shall make readily available to all home hospice program
staff the home hospice staffing plan adopted under this section and  any subsequent changes
to the plan.
(6) A  home hospice program must maintain and post, in a physical location or online, a
list of on-call and per diem home hospice care staff or staffing agencies  to provide replace-
ment home hospice care staff in the event of a  vacancy. The list of on-call and per diem
home hospice care staff or staffing agencies  must be sufficient to provide for replacement
home hospice care staff.
SECTION 16.
(1) A home hospice staffing committee established pursuant to section 14
of this 2025 Act shall review the home hospice staffing plan:
(a) At least once every calendar quarter; and
[12]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) At any other date and time specified by either cochair of the committee.
(2) In reviewing a home hospice staffing plan, a  home hospice staffing committee shall
consider:
(a) Patient outcomes, including consideration of:
(A) Quality assurance and performance improvement data; and
(B) The number of patient  hospitalizations and emergency department visits that re-
sulted from inadequate home hospice program staffing;
(b) The number of missed patient visits;
(c) Delays in patient care, including secondary evaluations and follow-up care;
(d) Patient complaints regarding staffing, including complaints about a delay or absence
of home hospice services;
(e) The aggregate hours of mandatory overtime worked by the home hospice care staff;
(f) The aggregate hours of voluntary overtime worked by the home hospice care staff;
(g) The aggregate hours worked by any home hospice care staff who are exempt from
overtime compensation as established by local, state or federal law; and
(h) Any  other matter determined by the committee to be necessary to ensure that the
home hospice program is staffed to meet the health care needs of patients.
(3) After reviewing a home hospice staffing plan,  a home hospice staffing committee shall
modify the staffing plan as needed to ensure that the home hospice program is staffed  to
meet the health care needs of patients.
(4) If a home hospice staffing  committee cannot reach an agreement on the modifications
to a home hospice staffing plan under subsection (3) of this section, the cochairs of the
committee shall submit the  disputed modifications to the Oregon Health Authority, and the
authority shall initiate expedited binding arbitration according to  the procedures described
in section 15 (3) of this 2025 Act.
(Modification in Case of Emergency or Epidemic)
SECTION 17.
(1) For purposes of this section, “epidemic” means the occurrence of a
group of similar conditions of  public health importance in a community or region that are
in excess of normal expectancy and that are from a common or propagated source.
(2) Notwithstanding sections 13 to 24 of this 2025 Act, a  home hospice program is not
required to follow a written home hospice staffing plan developed and approved by the home
hospice staffing committee established under section 14 of this 2025 Act upon the occurrence
of:
(a) A national emergency or state emergency declared under  ORS 401.165 to 401.236 or
433.441 to 433.452 requiring the  implementation of a disaster plan and crisis standards of
care;
(b) Sudden unforeseen adverse weather conditions; or
(c) An infectious disease epidemic suffered by home hospice program staff.
(3)(a) No later than 30 days after a home hospice program deviates from a  written home
hospice staffing plan under subsection (2)(a) of this section, the home hospice  program shall
report to the cochairs of the home  hospice staffing committee established under section 14
of this 2025 Act an assessment of the home hospice staffing needs  arising from the national
or state emergency declaration.
[13]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Upon receipt  of the report described in this subsection, the home hospice staffing
committee shall convene to develop a contingency home hospice staffing plan to address  the
needs arising from the national  or state emergency declaration. The contingency home
hospice staffing plan must include crisis standards of care.
(c) The home hospice program’s deviation from  the written home hospice staffing plan
may not be in effect for more than 90 days without the approval  of the home hospice staffing
committee.
(4) Upon the occurrence of  a national or state emergency declaration or circumstances
not described in subsection (2) of this section, either cochair of the committee may  require
the home hospice staffing  committee to meet to review and potentially modify the home
hospice staffing plan in response to the emergency declaration or circumstances.
(Records)
SECTION 18.
A home  hospice program shall keep and maintain records necessary to
demonstrate compliance with sections 13  to 24 of this 2025 Act. A home hospice program
must provide records kept and maintained  under this section to the Oregon Health Authority
upon request.
SECTION 19. The Oregon Health Authority shall post on a website maintained  by the
authority:
(1) The home  hospice staffing plans received by the authority under sections 13 to 24 of
this 2025 Act;
(2) Any report, described in section 21 (2)  of this 2025 Act, made pursuant to an investi-
gation of a complaint for which the authority issued a warning or imposed a civil  penalty
under section 22 of this 2025 Act; and
(3) Any order suspending or revoking the license of a home  hospice program pursuant
to section 23 of this 2025 Act.
(Enforcement)
SECTION 20. (1) As used in this section, “employee” has  the meaning given that term in
ORS 653.258.
(2) The Oregon  Health Authority shall implement a process for an employee or an
employee’s exclusive representative to file a complaint under ORS 653.258 (2)(a) against a
home hospice program for missed meal periods and rest periods.
(3) The authority shall forward to the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Indus-
tries any complaint filed under this section no later than 14 days after the complaint is filed.
(4) No later than 30 days after receiving a complaint under this section, the  authority
shall provide notice of the filing of the complaint to the following:
(a) The home hospice program;
(b) The cochairs of the  relevant home hospice staffing committee established pursuant
to section 14 of this 2025 Act; and
(c) The exclusive representative, if any, of the employee filing the complaint.
SECTION 21.
(1) As used  in this section, “valid complaint” means a complaint containing
an allegation that, if assumed to be true, is a violation listed in section 22 of this 2025 Act.
[14]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) To ensure compliance with sections 13 to 24 of this 2025 Act,  the Oregon Health Au-
thority shall:
(a) Establish a method by which a home hospice care staff person or an  exclusive rep-
resentative of a home hospice care staff person may submit a complaint through  the
authority’s website regarding any violation listed in section 22 of this 2025 Act;
(b) No later than 14 days after receiving a complaint, send a copy of the complaint to the
complainant and to the exclusive representative,  if any, of the complainant, with a request
to provide any additional information;
(c) No later than 30 days after receiving a complaint:
(A) Provide notice  to the complainant and the exclusive representative, if any, of the
complainant that the authority has determined that the complaint is not a  valid complaint;
or
(B)(i) Open an investigation of the home hospice program; and
(ii) Provide notice of the investigation to the complainant, the home hospice program, the
cochairs of  the relevant home hospice staffing committee established pursuant to section 14
of this 2025 Act and the exclusive representative, if any, of  the complainant. The notice must
include a summary of the complaint that does not include the complainant’s  name or the
specific date, shift or unit but does include the calendar week in which the complaint arose;
(d) Not later than 80 days after opening  the investigation, conclude the investigation and
provide a written report on the complaint to the complainant, the home  hospice program,
the cochairs  of the staffing committee and the exclusive representative, if any, of the
complainant. The report:
(A) Shall include a summary of the complaint;
(B) Shall include the nature of the alleged violation or violations;
(C) Shall include the authority’s findings and factual bases for the findings;
(D) Shall include other information the authority determines is appropriate to include  in
the report; and
(E) May not include the name of  any complainant, the name of any patient or the names
of any individuals that the authority interviewed in investigating the complaint;
(e) In determining whether  a violation has occurred, consider all relevant evidence, in-
cluding but not limited to witness testimony, written documents  and the observations of the
investigator; and
(f) If the authority issues a warning or imposes one or more civil penalties based on  the
report described in this subsection, provide a notice of the civil penalty  that complies with
ORS 183.415 and 183.745 and section 23 of this 2025 Act to the home hospice program, the
cochairs of the  applicable home hospice staffing committee, the complainant and the exclu-
sive representative, if any, of the complainant.
(3) A home hospice program subject to a valid complaint shall provide  to the authority,
no later than 20 days after receiving a notice of investigation under subsection (2) of  this
section:
(a) The home hospice staffing plan that is the subject of the complaint;
(b) If relevant to the complaint, documents  that show the scheduled staffing and the
actual staffing on the unit that is the subject of the complaint during  the period of time
specified in the complaint; and
(c) Documents that show the actions described in section 23 (4) of this 2025 Act, if any,
[15]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that the home  hospice program took to comply with the staffing plan or to address the issue
raised by the complaint.
(4) In conducting an investigation, the authority shall review any document:
(a) Related to the complaint that is provided by the exclusive representative  that filed
the complaint or by the home hospice  care staff person who filed the complaint and the
person’s exclusive representative, if any; and
(b) Provided by the home hospice program in response to the complaint.
(5) In conducting an investigation, the authority:
(a) Shall interview the home hospice care staff person or staff  persons who filed the
complaint unless the individual declines to be interviewed;
(b) May  interview the manager and any other staff persons with information relevant to
the complaint;
(c) May interview the cochairs of the relevant home hospice staffing committee; and
(d) May compel the  production of books, papers, accounts, documents and testimony
pertaining to  the complaint, other than documents that are privileged or not otherwise sub-
ject to disclosure.
(6) A complaint by a  home hospice care staff person or the staff person’s exclusive rep-
resentative must be filed no later than 60 days after the date of  the violation alleged in the
complaint. The  authority may not investigate a complaint or take any enforcement action
with respect to a complaint that has not been timely filed.
SECTION 22.
(1) Following the  receipt of a complaint and completion of an investigation
described in section 21 of this 2025  Act, for a violation described in subsection (2) of this
section, the Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Issue a warning for the first violation in a four-year period;
(b) Impose a civil penalty of $1,750 for the second violation of the same provision  in a
four-year period;
(c) Impose a civil penalty of  $2,500 for the third violation of the same provision in a
four-year period; and
(d) Impose a civil penalty of $5,000 for the fourth  and subsequent violations of the same
provision in a four-year period.
(2) The authority shall take  the actions described in subsection (1) of this section for the
following violations by a home hospice program of sections 13 to 24 of this 2025 Act:
(a) Failure to establish a home hospice staffing committee under section 14  of this 2025
Act;
(b) Failure to create, by agreement or  after binding arbitration, a home hospice staffing
plan that complies with the requirements of section 15 of this 2025 Act;
(c) Failure to comply with the staffing  level in the home hospice staffing plan imple-
mented under section 15 of this 2025 Act;
(d) Failure to review  the home hospice staffing plan in accordance with section 16 of this
2025 Act;
(e) Failure to maintain or post a list of on-call and per diem home hospice care staff in
accordance with section 15 of this 2025 Act;
(f) Failure to report to the cochairs of a home hospice staffing committee after deviating
from a home hospice staffing plan under section 17 of this 2025 Act; or
(g) Continuing to deviate from a home hospice staffing plan under section 17  of this 2025
[16]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Act for more than 90 days without the approval of the home hospice staffing committee.
(3) If a staff person at a home hospice program is unable  to attend a home hospice
staffing committee meeting because the home hospice program did not release  the staff
person from other duties to attend the meeting, in violation of section 14  (9) of this 2025 Act,
the authority shall:
(a) Issue a warning for the first violation; and
(b) Impose a civil penalty of $500 for a second and each subsequent violation.
(4) A home hospice  care staff person, or an exclusive representative of a home hospice
care staff person, may elect to enforce meal period and rest period  violations under ORS
653.261 by filing a complaint with the authority in accordance with section  21 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 23.
(1) Civil penalties imposed by the  Oregon Health Authority for a violation
listed in section 22 of this 2025 Act shall be imposed in the manner provided in ORS 183.745.
(2) The authority may suspend or revoke the license of a home hospice program, in the
manner provided in ORS 443.045, for a violation listed in section 22 of this 2025 Act.
(3) Each violation of a  written home hospice staffing plan shall be considered a separate
violation and there is no cap on the number of times that a penalty may be imposed for a
repeat of a violation.
(4) The authority may  not impose a civil penalty for a violation of a home hospice staffing
plan, if the home hospice program took the following actions:
(a) Scheduled staff in accordance with the staffing plan;
(b) Sought volunteers from all available qualified employees to work extra time;
(c) Contacted qualified employees who made themselves available to work extra time;
(d) Solicited per diem staff to work; and
(e) Contacted contracted temporary agencies, that the home hospice program  regularly
uses, if temporary staff from such agencies  are permitted to work for the home hospice
program by law or any applicable collective bargaining agreement.
(5) The authority shall  maintain for public inspection records of any civil penalties or li-
cense suspensions or revocations  imposed on home hospice programs penalized under sub-
section (1) or (2) of this section.
SECTION 24.
The Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules necessary to carry  out
sections 13 to 24 of this 2025 Act.
COMBINING STAFFING COMMITTEES
SECTION 25. (1) A home health staffing committee established under section 2 of this
2025 Act and a home hospice staffing committee established under section 14 of this 2025  Act
may, by mutual agreement, combine into one staffing committee if:
(a) The structures of the committees to be combined meet the  requirements of section
2 or 14 of this 2025 Act, as applicable;
(b) All members of the committee  who are home health care staff, as defined in section
1 of this  2025 Act, or home hospice care staff, as defined in section 13 of this 2025 Act, are
represented by a single exclusive representative as defined in ORS 441.760; and
(c) The members of the committee who are  home health care staff or home hospice care
staff are selected from each committee by the exclusive representative.
[17]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) A majority of the members of a combined staffing committee constitutes  a quorum
for the transaction  of business. If there is an unequal number of staff and managers present
at a  meeting of the combined staffing committee, only an equal number of staff and manag-
ers may vote.
(3) The members of a combined  staffing committee shall decide by a majority vote
whether the combined staffing committee shall be governed  by the home health staffing
committee provisions in  sections 1 to 12 of this 2025 Act or the home hospice staffing com-
mittee provisions in sections 13 to 24 of this 2025 Act.
(4) Disputes arising in combined staffing committees shall be resolved using the dispute
resolution process under section 3 or section 15 of this 2025 Act, as applicable.
(5) The Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules necessary to carry out this section.
MEAL AND REST PERIODS
SECTION 26.
 ORS 653.258 is amended to read:
653.258. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Employee” includes the following:
(i) Registered nurses who provide direct care as defined in ORS 441.760;
(ii) Professional staff as defined in ORS 441.760;
(iii) Technical staff, as defined in ORS 441.760; [ and]
(iv) Service staff, as defined in ORS 441.760 ;
(v) Home health care staff, as defined in section 1 of this 2025 Act; and
(vi) Home hospice care staff, as defined in section 13 of this 2025 Act .
(B) “Employee” does not include an individual  described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph
if the individual is covered  by a collective bargaining agreement that includes a monetary remedy
for missed meal periods and missed rest periods.
(b) “Employer” includes the following:
(A) A “hospital,” as defined in ORS 441.760;
(B) A “home health agency,” as defined in section 1 of this 2025 Act; and
(C) A “home hospice program,” as defined in section 13 of this 2025 Act.
[(b)] (c) “Exclusive representative” has the meaning given that term in ORS 441.760.
(2) An employee  or an exclusive representative of an employee may enforce requirements for
meal periods and rest periods adopted  by rule by the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and In-
dustries under ORS 653.261 by electing to file a complaint in one of the following ways:
(a) With  the Oregon Health Authority in accordance with ORS 441.790  or section 8 or 20 of
this 2025 Act ; or
(b) With the commissioner [ of the  Bureau of Labor and Industries ] in accordance with rules
adopted pursuant to ORS 653.261.
(3) Upon the receipt of a complaint forwarded by the authority to the commissioner under ORS
441.790 or section 8 or 20 of this 2025 Act , the commissioner shall proceed on the complaint in
accordance with this section.
(4) The commissioner shall deem a complaint filed under subsection (2) of  this section to be
withdrawn if notified by an employer that:
(a) The employer received a grievance filed by  the employee or an exclusive representative of
the employee  alleging the same violation as the violation alleged in a complaint filed under sub-
[18]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section (2) of this section; or
(b) The employee or the exclusive  representative of the employee has filed a civil complaint
against the employer alleging the same violation as the violation alleged in a complaint filed under
subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If the commissioner receives a complaint under subsection  (2)(a) of this section that was filed
with the authority more than 60 days  after the date of the missed meal period or missed rest period
alleged in the complaint, the commissioner:
(a) Shall dismiss the complaint; and
(b) May not investigate the complaint or  take any enforcement action with respect to the com-
plaint.
(6)(a) Following an investigation of  a complaint filed under subsection (2)[ (a)] of this section, if
the commissioner determines that a  civil penalty is appropriate, the commissioner shall provide to
the [ hospital] employer , to the cochairs of the relevant staffing committee  and to the exclusive
representative, if any, of the complainant a notice,  in accordance with ORS 183.415, 183.417 and
183.745, of the commissioner’s intent to assess a civil penalty of $200.
(b) A civil penalty imposed under this section:
(A) Constitutes the liquidated damages of  the complainant for the missed meal period or rest
period;
(B) May not be combined with a penalty assessed under ORS 653.256;
(C) Precludes any other penalty or remedy  provided by law for the violation found by the com-
missioner; and
(D) Becomes final if an application for hearing is not requested in a timely manner.
(7)(a) The liquidated damages imposed under  this section shall be paid to the complainant no
later than 15 business days after  the date on which the order becomes final by operation of law or
15 days after the issuance of a decision on appeal.
(b) [ A hospital ] An employer  shall provide  to the commissioner proof of the payment of liqui-
dated damages under paragraph (a) of this subsection no  later than 30 days after making the pay-
ment.
(8) An employee’s failure to  file a complaint under subsection (2) of this section does not pre-
clude the employee from pursuing any other remedy otherwise available to the employee under  any
provision of law.
(9) Nothing in this section creates a private cause of action.
APPLICABILITY
SECTION 27.
(1)(a) A home health staffing committee established under  section 2 of this
2025 Act shall develop a home health staffing plan that  complies with sections 1 to 12 of this
2025 Act no later than January 1, 2027.
(b) A home health staffing plan that is in  effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act that
does not comply with sections 1 to 12  of this 2025 Act continues in force until a home health
staffing committee revises the  plan or develops a new plan. The committee shall revise the
plan, or develop a new plan, to comply with sections 1 to 12 of this 2025 Act no later than
January 1, 2027.
(c) A  home health staffing plan that is in effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act and
that complies with sections 1 to 12 of this 2025 Act  remains in effect until revised in ac-
[19]
HB 3176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
cordance with sections 1 to 12 of this 2025 Act.
(2)(a) A home  hospice staffing committee established under section 14 of this 2025 Act
shall develop a home hospice staffing plan that complies with sections 13 to  24 of this 2025
Act no later than January 1, 2027.
(b) A home hospice staffing plan that is in effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act
that does not comply with sections 13  to 24 of this 2025 Act continues in force until a home
hospice staffing committee revises the plan or develops a new plan. The committee shall  re-
vise the plan, or develop a new plan,  to comply with sections 13 to 24 of this 2025 Act no later
than January 1, 2027.
(c) A  home hospice staffing plan that is in effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act
and that complies with section 13 to 24 of this 2025 Act remains in effect until revised  in
accordance with sections 13 to 24 of this 2025 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 28.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 29. (1) Sections 1 to 25  of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 653.258
by section 26 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority and the Bureau of Labor and Industries may take any
action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section that is necessary
to enable the authority and the bureau to exercise, on and after the operative  date specified
in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the
authority and the bureau by sections 1 to 25 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS
653.258 by section 26 of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 30.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[20]