Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 198.857 is amended to read:
198.857. (1) (a) Notwithstanding ORS 198.750, 198.755, 198.760, 198.765, 198.775, 198.850  and
198.855, [a parcel of land may be annexed to a district as provided in this section. ]
[(2) When ] the owner of a parcel of land [ wants] seeking to annex  that land to a district[ , the
owner] may file an annexation petition with the county board.
(b) More than one  parcel of land may be included in the petition if the petition relates
to a single district.
(2)(a) The  petition shall declare that the petition is filed pursuant to this section, state the name
of the affected district and  all affected counties, indicate the principal Act of the affected district
and be signed by [ the owner of the parcel of land ] all the owners of parcels  of land seeking
annexation.
(b) Before the petition is filed with the county board, the  petition must be approved by in-
dorsement thereon by the board of the affected district and by any other  agency also required by
the principal Act to indorse or approve the petition.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this  section,  if a petition filed under this sec-
tion meets the requirements of  this section and is otherwise sufficient under the principal Act  of
the affected district , the county board shall set a date for a public hearing on the petition.
(b) The hearing shall be held not sooner  than 20 days [ nor] or later than 50 days after the date
on which the petition is filed.
(c) Written notice of the hearing shall be mailed to the [ petitioner] petitioners and to the  board
of the affected district.
(4)(a) At the time stated in the notice described in subsection (3) of this section, the  county
board shall hold a public hearing to consider the petition.
(b) When determining whether to approve the petition, the  county board shall consider the local
comprehensive plan for the area and any service agreement executed  between a local government
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2140
HB 2355
1
2
3
4
5
6
and the affected district.
(c) If the petition is approved, the county board shall enter an order  describing the boundaries
of the land and declaring the land annexed to the district.
(5) A public hearing on the petition is not required if the petition  is signed by a majority
of the electors residing on the land to be annexed.
[2]