Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 814.210 is amended to read:
814.210. (1) A person commits the offense of  operation of a moped on a sidewalk or bicycle trail
if the person operates a moped  or a Class  3 electric assisted bicycle  upon a sidewalk, a bicycle
path or a bicycle lane.
(2) Exemptions to this section are provided under ORS 811.440.
(3) The offense described in this section, operation of a moped on a sidewalk or  bicycle trail, is
a Class D traffic violation.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 811.050 is amended to read:
811.050. (1) As used in this section, “bicycle” does not include a Class 3 electric  assisted
bicycle.
[(1)] (2) A person commits the offense of failure of a [ motor] vehicle  operator to yield to a rider
on a bicycle lane if the person is operating a [ motor] vehicle and the person does not yield the right
of way to a person operating a bicycle, electric assisted bicycle, electric  personal assistive mobility
device, moped, motor assisted scooter or motorized wheelchair upon a bicycle lane.
[(2)] (3) This  section does not require a person operating a moped  or a Class 3 electric assisted
bicycle to yield the right of way  to a bicycle or a motor assisted scooter if the moped or the Class
3 electric assisted bicycle  is operated on a bicycle lane in the  manner permitted under ORS
811.440.
[(3)] (4) The offense described in this section, failure of a [ motor] vehicle  operator to yield to a
rider on a bicycle lane, is a Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 3.  ORS 811.440 is amended to read:
811.440. This section provides exemptions from the prohibitions under ORS  811.435 and 814.210
against operating [ motor] vehicles on bicycle lanes and paths. The following vehicles are not  subject
to ORS 811.435 and 814.210 under the circumstances described:
(1) A person may operate a moped  or a Class 3 electric assisted bicycle  on a  bicycle lane that
is immediately adjacent to the roadway only while the  moped or the Class 3 electric assisted bi-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1682
SB 471
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cycle is being exclusively powered by human power.
(2) A person may operate a [ motor] vehicle upon a bicycle lane when:
(a) Making a turn;
(b) Entering or leaving an alley, private road or driveway; or
(c) Required in the course of official duty.
(3) An implement of husbandry may momentarily cross into a bicycle lane to permit other vehi-
cles to overtake and pass the implement of husbandry.
(4) A person may operate a motorized wheelchair on a bicycle lane or path.
(5) A person may operate a motor assisted scooter on a bicycle lane or path.
(6) A person may operate an electric personal assistive mobility device on a bicycle lane or path.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 814.420 is amended to read:
814.420. (1) Except as provided  in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a person commits the
offense of failure to use a bicycle lane or path if the person operates a bicycle  on any portion of a
roadway that is not a bicycle lane or bicycle path when a bicycle lane or bicycle path  is adjacent
to or near the roadway.
(2) A person is not required to comply with  this section unless the state or local authority with
jurisdiction over the roadway finds, after public hearing, that the bicycle lane or bicycle path is
suitable for safe bicycle use at reasonable rates of speed.
(3) A person is not in violation of the offense under this section if the person is able  to safely
move out of the bicycle lane or path for the purpose of:
(a) Overtaking and passing another bicycle, a vehicle or  a pedestrian that is in the bicycle lane
or path and passage cannot safely be made in the lane or path.
(b) Preparing to execute a left turn at an intersection or into a private road or driveway.
(c) Avoiding debris or other hazardous conditions.
(d) Preparing to execute a right turn where a right turn is authorized.
(e) Continuing straight at an intersection where the bicycle  lane or path is to the right of a lane
from which a motor vehicle must turn right.
(4) This section applies only to bicycles that are not  Class 3 electric assisted bicycles.
ORS 814.210 prohibits Class 3 electric assisted bicycles from operating on a bicycle path  or
bicycle lane, except when authorized to use bicycle lanes under ORS 811.440.
[(4)] (5)  The offense described in  this section, failure to use a bicycle lane or path, is a Class
D traffic violation.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 814.430 is amended to read:
814.430. (1) A person commits the offense  of improper use of lanes by a bicycle if the person is
operating a bicycle on a roadway at less  than the normal speed of traffic using the roadway at that
time and place  under the existing conditions and the person does not ride as close as practicable
to the right curb or edge of the roadway.
(2) A person is not in violation of the offense under this section if the person is not operating
a bicycle as close as practicable to the right curb or  edge of the roadway under any of the following
circumstances:
(a) When overtaking and passing another bicycle or vehicle that  is proceeding in the same di-
rection.
(b) When preparing to execute a left turn.
(c) When reasonably  necessary to avoid hazardous conditions including, but not limited to, fixed
or moving objects, parked or moving vehicles, bicycles, pedestrians, animals,  surface hazards or
[2]
SB 471
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
other conditions that make continued operation  along the right curb or edge unsafe or to avoid
unsafe operation in a lane on the  roadway that is too narrow for a bicycle and vehicle to travel
safely side by side. Nothing in this paragraph excuses the operator of a bicycle from the  require-
ments under ORS 811.425 or from the penalties for failure to comply with those requirements.
(d) When operating within a city as  near as practicable to the left curb or edge of a roadway
that is designated to allow traffic to move  in only one direction along the roadway. A bicycle that
is operated under this paragraph is subject to the  same requirements and exceptions when operating
along the  left curb or edge as are applicable when a bicycle is operating along the right curb or
edge of the roadway.
(e) When  operating a bicycle alongside not more than one other bicycle as long as the bicycles
are both being operated within a single lane and in a manner that does not impede the normal  and
reasonable movement of traffic.
(f) When operating on a bicycle lane or bicycle path. The exception provided in this para-
graph applies to a person riding a Class 3 electric assisted bicycle only when the bicycle is
powered exclusively by human power.
(3) The offense described in this section, improper use of lanes  by a bicycle, is a Class D traffic
violation.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 811.435 is amended to read:
811.435. (1) A person commits the offense of operation of a motor vehicle on a  bicycle trail if
the person operates a motor vehicle upon a bicycle lane or a bicycle path.
(2) Exemptions to this section are provided under ORS 811.440.
(3) This section is not  applicable to mopeds  and Class 3 electric assisted bicycles . ORS 811.440
and 814.210 control the operation and use of mopeds and Class 3  electric assisted bicycles  on bi-
cycle lanes and paths.
(4) The offense described in this section, operation  of a motor vehicle on a bicycle trail, is a
Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 814.410 is amended to read:
814.410. (1) A person commits the offense of unsafe operation of a bicycle on a sidewalk if the
person does any of the following:
(a) Operates the bicycle so as to suddenly leave a curb or other place of  safety and move into
the path of a vehicle that is so close as to constitute an immediate hazard.
(b) Operates a bicycle upon a sidewalk and does not give an audible warning before  overtaking
and passing a pedestrian and does not yield the right of way to all pedestrians on the sidewalk.
(c) Operates a bicycle on a sidewalk in a careless manner that endangers or would be likely to
endanger any person or property.
(d) Operates the bicycle at a speed greater than an  ordinary walk when approaching or entering
a crosswalk, approaching or crossing a driveway or crossing a curb  cut or pedestrian ramp and a
motor vehicle is approaching the crosswalk, driveway, curb cut or pedestrian ramp.  This paragraph
does not require  reduced speeds for bicycles at places on sidewalks or other pedestrian ways other
than places where the path for pedestrians or bicycle traffic approaches  or crosses that for motor
vehicle traffic.
(e) Operates [ an] a Class 1 electric assisted bicycle or a Class 2  electric assisted  bicycle on
a sidewalk.
(2) This section is not  applicable to Class 3 electric assisted bicycles. ORS 814.210 controls
the operation of Class 3 electric assisted bicycles on sidewalks.
[3]
SB 471
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
[(2)] (3)  Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, a bicyclist  on a sidewalk or in a
crosswalk has the same rights and duties as a pedestrian on a sidewalk or in a crosswalk.
[(3)] (4)  The offense described in this section, unsafe operation of a bicycle on  a sidewalk, is a
Class D traffic violation.
SECTION 8.
 The amendments to ORS 811.050, 811.435, 811.440,  814.210, 814.410, 814.420 and
814.430 by sections 1 to 7 of this 2025 Act apply to conduct occurring on  or after the effective
date of this 2025 Act.
[4]