Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 276A.342 is amended to read:
276A.342. (1) A covered product may not be:
(a) Installed or downloaded onto a state information technology asset; or
(b) Used or accessed by a state information technology asset.
(2) A state agency shall:
(a) Remove any covered product that is installed or downloaded onto a state information tech-
nology asset that is under the management or control of the state agency; and
(b) Implement all measures necessary to prevent the:
(A) Installation or download of a covered product onto a  state information technology asset that
is under the management or control of the state agency; or
(B) Use or access of a covered product by a state information  technology asset that is under the
management or control of the state agency.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsections  (1) and (2) of this section, a state agency may, for
investigatory, regulatory or law enforcement purposes, permit the:
(A) Installation or download of a covered product onto a state information technology asset; or
(B) Use or access of a covered product by a state information technology asset.
(b) A state agency that permits the installation, download, use  or access of a covered product
under this subsection shall adopt risk mitigation standards and procedures related to the  installa-
tion, download, use or access of the covered product.
(4) A state agency may apply to the State Chief Information Officer for a  limited waiver
to the prohibitions or requirements under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The officer
shall grant a limited waiver if the state agency shows that a waiver is needed for the  state
agency, or a contractor of the state agency, to perform the duties of the state agency  or
contractor of the state agency.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4198
HB 3684
1
2
3
4
5
6
[(4)] (5) The State Chief Information Officer shall  coordinate with and oversee state agencies to
implement the provisions of this section in accordance with the policies  and standards adopted un-
der ORS 276A.344 (3).
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]