Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $25 million,  which may be expended for the purpose of awarding
grants under the  Career and Technical Education Revitalization Grant Program established
by ORS 344.075.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $25 million, for deposit in  the Community Col-
lege Support Fund established under ORS 341.620 for distribution to community colleges and
community college service districts for career and technical education programs.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1992