Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Moneys in the Oregon Medical Insurance Pool Account established in ORS
735.612 shall  be transferred to the Oregon Health Authority Fund established in ORS 413.101
to be used for funding medical assistance under ORS chapter 414. The transfer shall  be made
on the effective date of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4538