Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 254.482 is amended to read:
254.482. (1) After the date that ballots are mailed as provided in ORS 254.470, the county
clerk[ , if  requested, ] shall permit authorized persons to be at the office of the county clerk to
[watch] observe the receiving and counting of votes. The authorization shall be in writing, shall  be
signed by an officer or its county affiliate of a  political party, a candidate or the county clerk and
shall be filed  with the county clerk. The county clerk shall permit only so many  persons as
[watchers] observers under  this section as will not interfere with an orderly procedure at the office
of the county clerk.
(2) At minimum, persons authorized under subsection (1) of  this section must be per-
mitted to observe any signature verification procedure.
SECTION 2.  ORS 254.485, as amended by section 3, chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
254.485. (1) Ballots may be tallied by a vote tally system or  by a counting board. A counting
board may tally ballots at the  precinct or in the office of the county clerk. In any event, the ballots
shall be tallied and returned by precinct.
(2) If a counting board has been appointed, the tally of ballots may begin  on the date of the
election.
(3)(a) If ballots are tallied by a counting board, after the tally has begun it shall continue  until
completed. Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, a counting board shall tally
without adjournment and in the presence of the clerks and persons authorized to  attend under ORS
254.482.
(b) A counting board may be relieved by  another board if the tally is not completed after 12
hours.
(4) A counting board shall audibly announce the tally as it proceeds. The board shall use  only
pen and ink to tally.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4582
SB 1053
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(5) For ballots cast using a voting machine, the county clerk shall:
(a) Enter the ballots cast using the machine into the vote tally system; and
(b) In the event of a  recount, provide the paper record copy recorded by the machine to the
counting board.
(6) A person other than  the county clerk, a member of a counting board or any other elections
official designated by the county clerk may not tally ballots under this chapter.
(7) The Secretary of State shall by rule establish a procedure for announcing the status  of the
tally of the ballots received after the date of the election. Rules adopted under this  subsection must:
(a) Consider the number of ballots being released in relation to the size of the district;
(b) Prioritize voter anonymity; and
(c) After prioritizing voter anonymity under paragraph (b) of this  subsection, prioritize the im-
portance of timely reporting election results.
[2]