Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 818.030 is amended to read:
818.030. This section  establishes exemptions from the maximum weight limitations under ORS
818.010 and 818.020. The exemptions under this section  are in addition to any exemptions under ORS
801.026. Operation in accordance with one of the exemptions described is not subject to the penalties
in ORS 818.020. Exemptions are partial or complete as described in the following:
(1) The maximum weight limitations do not apply on any way, thoroughfare or  place owned by
a district formed under ORS chapters 545, 547 and 551 or a corporation formed  under ORS chapter
554.
(2) The maximum  weight limitations do not apply on any road or thoroughfare or property in
private ownership or any road  or thoroughfare, other than a state highway or county road, used
pursuant to any agreement with any agency of the United  States or with a licensee of such agency,
or both.
(3) The maximum weight  limitations do not apply to any vehicle, combination of vehicles, article,
machine or other equipment while being used by the federal government, the  State of Oregon or any
county or incorporated city in  the construction, maintenance or repair of public highways and at
the immediate location or site of such construction, maintenance or repair.
(4) The maximum weight limitations do not apply to vehicles while being used on  the roads of
a road authority by mass  transit districts for the purposes authorized under ORS 267.010 to 267.394,
provided the weight of the vehicles is approved by the road authority for the roads.
(5) Subject  to the maximum weight limitations under Tables I and III of ORS 818.010, any vehicle
with a single rear axle  specially equipped with a self-compactor and used exclusively for garbage
or refuse operations may have a loaded weight upon a single axle of not  more than 22,000 pounds
when laden with garbage or  refuse. When unladen or when operating on any highway that is part
of the federal interstate highway system such vehicles shall comply  with the weight limitations un-
der Table II of ORS 818.010.
(6) Weight limitations are  not applicable in any place and to the extent the weight limitations
are modified by  a road authority under ORS 810.060. The exemption under this subsection is subject
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1217
SB 94
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
to the limitations imposed by the road authority exercising the powers granted under ORS 810.060.
(7) Operations authorized to exceed weight limitations by a  variance permit issued under ORS
818.200 are subject to the terms of the permit. It shall be a defense to any charge of violation  of
ORS 818.020 if the person so charged produces a variance permit issued under ORS 818.200 author-
izing the operation of the vehicle or combination  of vehicles issued prior to and valid at the time
of the offense.
(8)(a) Notwithstanding Table III of ORS 818.010,  two consecutive sets of tandem axles may have
a loaded weight of 34,000 pounds each when operating on interstate  highways with a permit and on
other highways without a permit, providing the distance between the first and last axles  of the two
sets of tandem axles is at least 30 feet but less than 36 feet.
(b) Notwithstanding Table III of ORS 818.010, two consecutive sets of tandem axles may have
a loaded  weight of 34,000 pounds each when operating on any highway if the overall distance be-
tween the first and the last axles of the sets of tandem axles is 36 feet or more.
(9) Notwithstanding Table III of ORS 818.010, a group of four axles consisting  of a set of tandem
axles and two axles spaced nine feet or more apart may have a loaded  weight of more than 65,500
pounds and up to 70,000 pounds when operating on interstate highways with a permit and  on other
highways without a permit, providing  the distance between the first and last axles of the group is
35 feet or more.
(10) The maximum weight limitations do not apply to a vehicle equipped with a fully  functional
idle reduction system designed to reduce fuel use and emissions from engine idling. The vehicle may
exceed the weight limitations established under ORS 818.010 by not more than 550 pounds.
(11) The maximum weight limitations do not apply to a vehicle that uses natural gas as its  fuel
source  or  a vehicle powered primarily by means of an electric battery. The vehicle may exceed the
weight limitations established under ORS 818.010 by not more than 2,000 pounds.
(12) A vehicle carrying fluid milk products may have a loaded weight of not more than
129,000 pounds.
[2]