Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 183.400 is amended to read:
183.400. (1) The validity of any rule  may be determined upon a petition by any person to the
Court of  Appeals in the manner provided for review of orders in contested cases. The court shall
have jurisdiction to review the validity of the rule  whether or not the petitioner has first requested
the agency to pass upon  the validity of the rule in question, but not when the petitioner is a party
to an order or a contested case in which the validity of the rule may be determined by a court.
(2) The validity of any applicable rule may also be determined by a court,  upon review of an
order in any manner provided by law or pursuant to ORS 183.480 or upon enforcement  of such rule
or order in the manner provided by law.
(3) Judicial review of a rule shall be limited to an examination of:
(a) The rule under review;
(b) The statutory provisions authorizing the rule; [ and]
(c) Relevant federal laws and regulations; and
[(c)] (d) Copies of  all documents necessary to demonstrate compliance with applicable
rulemaking procedures.
(4) The court shall declare the rule invalid only if it finds that the rule:
(a) Violates constitutional provisions;
(b) Requires a public body, as defined in ORS 174.109,  to fail to comply with federal laws
or regulations;
[(b)] (c) Exceeds the statutory authority of the agency; or
[(c)] (d) Was adopted without compliance with applicable rulemaking procedures.
(5) In the case  of disputed allegations of irregularities in procedure which, if proved, would
warrant reversal or remand, the Court of Appeals may refer the allegations to a master  appointed
by the court to take evidence and make findings of fact. The  court’s review of the master’s findings
of fact shall be de novo on the evidence.
(6) The court shall not declare a rule invalid solely because it was adopted without compliance
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1111
HB 2303
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
with applicable rulemaking procedures after a  period of two years after the date the rule was filed
in the office of the Secretary of  State, if the agency attempted to comply with those procedures and
its failure to do so did not substantially prejudice the interests of the parties.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 137.673 is amended to read:
137.673. Rules  adopted by the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall not be declared invalid
solely  because  of irregularities in procedural rulemaking, including but not limited to the provisions
of ORS 183.335 or 183.400 [ (4)(c)] (4)(d).
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 183.400 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to pe-
titions for judicial review filed on and after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[2]