Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 332.
SECTION 2. A school district may  be a member of and pay any fees to a voluntary or-
ganization that  administers interscholastic activities, or that facilitates the scheduling and
programming of interscholastic activities, only if the organization:
(1) Implements equity-focused policies that:
(a) Address discriminatory harassment or bullying behavior by  any person, including
spectators, at an interscholastic activity, including:
(A) Discriminatory harassment or bullying behavior  based on a person’s perceived age,
disability, national origin, race, color, marital status, religion, sex or  sexual orientation; and
(B) The use of derogatory or inappropriate  names, insults, verbal assaults, profanity or
ridicule;
(b) Prohibit discrimination as defined in ORS 659.850;
(c) Permit a student to wear religious clothing in  accordance with the student’s sincerely
held religious belief and consistent with any safety and health requirements; and
(d) Balance the health, safety and reasonable accommodation needs  of participants on
an activity-by-activity basis.
(2) Maintains a transparent complaint process that:
(a) Has a reporting system to allow participants of interscholastic activities or members
of the public to make complaints about student, coach or spectator behavior;
(b) Responds to a complaint made  under paragraph (a) of this subsection within 48 hours
of the complaint being received; and
(c) Strives to resolve a complaint received under paragraph (a)  of this subsection within
30 days of the complaint being received.
(3) Develops and implements a system of sanctions against schools, students, coaches and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4590
HB 3807
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
spectators if a complaint made under subsection (2) of this section is verified. If  a verified
complaint involves a violation of an  equity-focused policy addressing harassment or behavior
described in subsection (1)(a) of this section and the violation was committed by participants
of an interscholastic activity or  by a coach of the participants, the organization shall impose
sanctions on the school, participants or coach that, at a minimum, are the following:
(a) After  the first violation for the school year, the participants and coach are required
to undergo training  to prevent future violations and are required to be informed of the con-
sequences of additional violations.
(b) After the second violation for the school year, any or all of the following  are applied:
(A) Identified participants or the coach are subjected to suspension from competitions;
(B) The school is subjected to a fine; or
(C) Other consequences are imposed that affect all participants of the team.
(c) After the third violation for the school year, the participants  and coach are required
to forfeit a competition or be disqualified from playoffs.
(4) Establishes a system for referees and  judges of interscholastic competitions to ad-
dress situations that may be a violation of an equity-focused policy  addressing harassment
or behavior described in subsection (1)(a) of this section, including:
(a) The development of responsive procedures for use by referees and judges;
(b) The development of codes of conduct for participants of interscholastic  activities and
the coaches of those participants;
(c) Scenario-based training  for referees and judges to implement responsive procedures
developed under paragraph (a) of this subsection and to enforce codes of  conduct developed
under paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(d) The provision of a neutral third-party mediator during a competition  to assist refer-
ees and judges with decisions made during the competition;
(e) Post-competition support  to allow referees and judges to debrief with other officials
to discuss any situations that arose during a competition; and
(f) An anonymous reporting system for a referee or judge to use if the referee or  judge
reconsiders a situation after a competition has been completed and believes that  sanctions
described in subsection (3) of this section may need to be imposed.
(5) Issues a report to a district school board regarding any complaints made  under sub-
section (2) of this section involving the school district and requires the district  school board
to hold a public hearing to discuss any reports under this subsection.
(6) Performs an annual  survey of students and their parents to understand and respond
to potential violations of equity-focused policies adopted under subsection  (1) of this section
or violations of ORS 659.850.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 332.075 is amended to read:
332.075. (1) Any district school board may:
(a) Fix the days of the year and the hours of the day when schools shall be in session.
(b) Adopt textbooks and other instructional materials as provided in ORS  337.120 and 337.141
and courses of study for the use of such schools as provided in ORS 336.035.
(c) Authorize the use of the  schools for purposes of training students of an approved educator
preparation provider, as defined in ORS 342.120, and for such purposes  may enter into contracts
with the  approved educator preparation provider on such terms as may be agreed upon. Such con-
tracts as they  relate to student teachers shall have the same effect and be subject to the same
[2]
HB 3807
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
regulations as a contract between a licensed teacher and a district school board.
(d) Develop and operate with other  school districts or community college districts secondary
career and technical education programs for  pupils of more than one district and fix by agreement
the duration  of the district’s obligation to continue such activity, subject to the availability of funds
therefor.
(e) Authorize the  school district to be a member of and pay fees, if any, to any voluntary or-
ganization that administers interscholastic activities or that  facilitates the scheduling and pro-
gramming of interscholastic activities only if the organization  complies with the requirements of
section 2 of this 2025 Act and  the school district holds any public hearings as required under
section 2 (5) of this 2025 Act. [:]
[(A) Implements equity focused policies that: ]
[(i) Address the  use of derogatory or inappropriate names, insults, verbal assaults, profanity or
ridicule that occurs  at an interscholastic activity, including by spectators of the interscholastic
activity;]
[(ii) Prohibit discrimination as defined in ORS 659.850; ]
[(iii) Permit a student to wear religious clothing in  accordance with the student’s sincerely held
religious belief and consistent with any safety and health requirements; and ]
[(iv) Balance the health, safety and  reasonable accommodation needs of participants on an
activity-by-activity basis;]
[(B) Maintains a transparent complaint process that: ]
[(i) Has a reporting system to allow participants of interscholastic activities or members of the
public to make complaints about student, coach or spectator behavior; ]
[(ii) Responds to a  complaint made under sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph within 48
hours of the complaint being received; and ]
[(iii) Strives  to resolve a complaint received under sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph
within 30 days of the complaint being received; ]
[(C) Develops and implements a system of sanctions against  schools, students, coaches and specta-
tors if a complaint made under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph is verified; and ]
[(D) Performs an annual survey of  students and their parents to understand and respond to po-
tential violations of  equity focused policies adopted under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph or vio-
lations of ORS 659.850. ]
(f) Accept money or property donated for the use or  benefit of the school district and, consistent
with the laws of this state, use such money or property for the purpose for which it was donated.
(g) Enter into an approved  written agreement with the governing body of a federally recognized
Native American tribe in Oregon to allow the use of a mascot that represents, is  associated with
or is significant to  the Native American tribe entering into the agreement. An agreement entered
into under this paragraph must:
(A) Describe the acceptable uses of the mascot;
(B) Comply with rules adopted by the State Board of Education that:
(i) Are  adopted after consultation with the federally recognized tribes in Oregon pursuant to
ORS 182.164 (3); and
(ii) Prescribe the requirements for approval; and
(C) Be approved by the State Board of Education, which the board must provide if the agreement
meets the requirements of this paragraph and the rules adopted under this paragraph.
(2) All contracts of the school district must be  approved by the district school board before an
[3]
HB 3807
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
order can be drawn for payment. If a contract is made without the authority of  the district school
board, the individual making such contract shall be personally liable.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a  district school board may, by resolution or
policy,  authorize  its superintendent or the superintendent’s designee to enter into and approve pay-
ment on contracts for products, materials, supplies, capital  outlay, equipment and services that are
within appropriations made by the district school board  pursuant to ORS 294.456. A district school
board may not authorize its  superintendent or the superintendent’s designee under this subsection
to enter into and approve  payment on contracts that are collective bargaining agreements or service
contracts that include the provision of labor performed by employees of the school district.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[4]