Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 2. (1) A person commits the offense of sleeping in a highway danger zone  if the
person sleeps  on the ground within 10 feet of the outside edge or curb of the roadway any
time from sunset to sunrise.
(2) The offense described in this section, sleeping in a highway danger zone, is a Class D
traffic violation.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2461