Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 653.010 to
653.261.
SECTION 2. (1) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 653.412 to 653.485, an employer shall:
(a) Compensate an employee for time spent on call or on standby when the  employee is
required to  be at the premises of the employer or available to report to work within 90
minutes after  being contacted by the employer such that the employee is unable to use the
scheduled hours effectively for the employee’s personal purposes, regardless of whether  the
employee is asked by the employer to perform work.
(b) Pay an employee scheduled for an on-call shift or standby shift described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection at least the federal minimum wage rate.
(c) Post employee work schedules at least  14 days in advance that include all work shifts
and on-call or standby shifts for the period.
(2) A work schedule described under this section:
(a) May not be changed without the voluntary consent of the employee; and
(b) Must be posted in a conspicuous and accessible location.
(3) The requirements  of this section apply to nonexempt employees under the federal Fair
Labor Standards Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 911