Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Direct care staff” has the meaning given that term in ORS 441.760.
(b) “Health care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(c) “Home health agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.014.
(d) “Home  hospice program” means a coordinated program of home care, available 24
hours a day, that utilizes an interdisciplinary team of personnel trained to provide palliative
and supportive services to a patient-family unit experiencing a life threatening disease with
a limited prognosis.
(e) “Hospital” has the meaning given that term in ORS 441.760.
(f) “Labor organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 663.005.
(2) The Task Force on Improving Safety in Health Care Settings is established.
(3) The task force consists of 15 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of  the Senate shall appoint one member from the majority party of the
Senate and one member from the minority party of the Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from the
majority party of the House of Representatives and one member  from the minority party of
the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint 11 members as follows:
(A) A representative of a hospital.
(B) A representative of a home health agency.
(C) A representative of a home hospice program.
(D) A representative of a health care facility.
(E) A representative of direct care staff.
(F) Two representatives of direct care staff who  are represented by a labor organization.
(G) A representative who  represents the interests of individuals with intellectual disa-
bilities.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3360
HB 2750
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
(H) A representative of a state police office, a municipal  police department or sheriff’s
office.
(I) A representative of a district attorney’s office.
(J) A representative of a public defender’s office.
(4) The task force  shall consider and recommend strategies for eliminating workplace
violence in health care settings.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task  force shall submit reports in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the  Legislative As-
sembly related to health care no later than December 15, 2026.
(12) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of Legislative Assembly appointed  to the task force are nonvoting members
of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2027.
[2]