Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 279A.128 is amended to read:
279A.128. (1) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Construction materials” means manufactured products, consumable supplies, raw
materials and other goods that:
(A) Are used in constructing, reconstructing, or performing a major renovation upon,  a
public improvement; or
(B) Become part of a public improvement upon  completion of construction, recon-
struction or a major renovation.
(b) “Services” means  services as defined in ORS 279A.010 (1)(kk) and personal services desig-
nated under ORS 279A.055.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding provisions of law requiring a contracting  agency to award a contract to
the lowest responsible bidder or  best proposer or provider of a quotation, a contracting agency that
uses public funds to procure goods or services for  a public use under ORS chapter 279B , or procure
construction materials for  a public improvement under ORS chapter 279C, may give preference
to:
(A) Procuring goods , [ or] services  or construction materials  provided  by a benefit company
that is incorporated, organized, formed or  created under ORS 60.754, that submits with a bid or
proposal a certificate of existence issued under ORS 60.027 and  has the majority of the benefit
company’s regular, full-time workforce located in this  state at the time the benefit company submits
the bid or proposal, if the goods , [ or] services  or construction materials  cost not more than five
percent more than goods , [ or] services  or construction materials  available from  a contractor that
is not a benefit company; or
(B) Procuring goods  or construction materials  that are fabricated or  processed, or services
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4378
HB 3672
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
that are performed, entirely within this state if the goods , [ or] services  or construction materials
cost not more than 10 percent more than goods  or construction materials  that are not fabricated
or processed, or services that are not performed, entirely within this state.
(b) If more than one bidder or proposer qualifies for  a preference described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the contracting agency may give a further preference to a  qualifying bidder or
proposer that resides in or is headquartered in this state.
(c) The contracting  agency by order may set a higher percentage than the percentages set forth
in paragraph (a) of this subsection if the contracting agency,  in a written determination to support
the order, finds good cause  to set the higher percentage and explains the contracting agency’s rea-
sons and evidence for the finding.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 279C.320 (1), subsection (2) of this section does  not apply to emergency
work, minor  alterations, ordinary repairs or maintenance work for public improvements or to
[other] construction contracts [ described in ORS 279C.320 (1) ] other than public improvement
contracts.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 279A.128 by section  1 of this 2025 Act apply to
procurements that a contracting agency first advertises or otherwise solicits or, if  a con-
tracting agency does not advertise or solicit the  procurement, to public improvement con-
tracts into which a contracting agency enters on  or after the operative date specified in
section 3 of this section.
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments to ORS 279A.128 by section 1  of this 2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Attorney General, the Director of the Oregon  Department of Administrative
Services, the Director of Transportation and  a contracting agency that adopts rules under
ORS 279A.065 or 279A.070 may adopt rules and take any other action before  the operative
date specified in  subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the Attorney
General, the directors or the contracting agency, on and after  the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this  section, to undertake and exercise all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the Attorney General, the directors or  the contracting agency by the
amendments to ORS 279A.128 by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]