Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 163.165 is amended to read:
163.165. (1) A person commits the crime of assault in the third degree if the person:
(a) Recklessly causes serious physical injury to  another by means of a deadly or dangerous
weapon;
(b) Recklessly causes serious physical injury to another under circumstances manifesting  ex-
treme indifference to the value of human life;
(c) Recklessly causes physical injury to another by means of a deadly or dangerous weapon un-
der circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life;
(d) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes, by  means other than a motor vehicle, physical
injury to the operator of a public transit  vehicle while the operator is [ in control of or operating the
vehicle] acting in the course of performing official duties . As used in this paragraph, “public
transit vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.116;
(e) While being aided by another  person actually present, intentionally or knowingly causes
physical injury to another;
(f) While committed to a youth correction facility, intentionally or  knowingly causes physical
injury to another knowing the other person is a staff member while  the other person is acting in the
course of official duty;
(g) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes physical injury to an emergency medical ser-
vices provider, as defined in ORS 682.025,  while the emergency medical services provider is per-
forming official duties;
(h) Being  at least 18 years of age, intentionally or knowingly causes physical injury to a child
10 years of age or younger;
(i) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes, by means other than a motor vehicle, physical
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4357
SB 1124
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
injury to the operator of a taxi while the operator is in control of the taxi; or
(j) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes physical  injury to a flagger or a highway
worker while the flagger or highway worker is performing official duties.
(2)(a) Assault in the third degree is a Class C felony.
(b) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, assault in the third degree under sub-
section (1)(a) or (b) of this section is a Class B felony if:
(A) The assault resulted from the operation of a motor vehicle; and
(B) The defendant was the driver of the  motor vehicle and was driving while under the influence
of intoxicants.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Flagger” has the meaning given that term in ORS 811.230.
(b) “Highway worker” has the meaning given that term in ORS 811.230.
(c) “Staff member” means:
(A) A corrections officer  as defined in ORS 181A.355, a youth correction officer, a youth cor-
rection facility staff member, a Department of  Corrections or Oregon Youth Authority staff member
or a person employed pursuant to a contract with the department or youth authority to work  with,
or in the vicinity of, adults in custody, youths or adjudicated youths; and
(B) A volunteer authorized by the department,  youth authority or other entity in charge of a
corrections facility to work with, or in the vicinity of,  adults in custody, youths or adjudicated
youths.
(d) “Youth correction facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 162.135.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 166.070 is amended to read:
166.070. (1) A person commits the crime  of aggravated harassment if the person, knowing that
the other person is [ a]:
(a) A staff  member, knowingly propels saliva, blood, urine, semen, feces or other dangerous
substance at the staff member while the staff member is acting in the course of official duty or  as
a result of the staff member’s official duties;
(b) A public safety officer, knowingly propels blood,  urine, semen or feces at the public safety
officer  while  the public safety officer is acting in the course of official duty or as a result of the
public safety officer’s official duties; [ or]
(c) A public safety officer, intentionally propels saliva at the public safety  officer, and the saliva
comes into physical contact with the public safety  officer, while the public safety officer is acting
in the course of official duty or as a result of the public safety officer’s official duties[ .]; or
(d) An operator of a public transit vehicle,  knowingly propels saliva, blood, urine, semen,
feces or other dangerous substance at the  operator while the operator is acting in the course
of performing official duties.
(2) Aggravated harassment is a Class  C felony. When a person is convicted of violating sub-
section (1)(a) of this section, in addition to any other sentence it may impose, the court shall  impose
a term of incarceration in a state correctional facility.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Public safety officer” means an emergency medical services provider as  defined in ORS
682.025, a regulatory specialist as defined in ORS 471.001 or a fire service professional,  a parole and
probation officer or a police officer as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355.
(b) “Public transit vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.116.
[(b)] (c)  “Staff member” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163.165.
[2]
SB 1124
1
2
3
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 163.165 and 166.070 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025
Act apply to conduct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[3]