Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 475C.604 is amended to read:
475C.604. (1) As is necessary to protect the public health  and safety, and in consultation with
the Oregon Health Authority and the State Department of  Agriculture, the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission shall adopt rules establishing standards for the labeling  of marijuana items
and inhalant delivery systems that contain industrial  hemp-derived vapor items, including but not
limited to:
(a) Ensuring that usable marijuana, cannabinoid  concentrates and extracts, cannabinoid edibles,
other cannabinoid  products and inhalant delivery systems that contain industrial hemp-derived vapor
items have labeling that communicates:
(A) Health and safety warnings;
(B) If applicable, activation time;
(C) Potency;
(D) For cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts,  serving size and the
number of servings included in a cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract  pack-
age; [and]
(E) Content of the marijuana item or inhalant delivery system that contains an  industrial
hemp-derived vapor item; and
(F) That the  minimum age for consumption or use of the marijuana item or inhalant
delivery system that contains an industrial hemp-derived vapor item is 21 years of age; and
(b) Labeling that is in accordance with applicable  state food labeling requirements for the same
type of food product or potable liquid when the food product or potable  liquid does not contain
marijuana or cannabinoids.
(2) In  adopting rules under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919, the authority shall require all usable
marijuana, cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts transferred by a  med-
ical marijuana dispensary registered under  ORS 475C.833 to be labeled in accordance with sub-
section (1) of this section and rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) In adopting rules under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, the commission  shall require all usable
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3861
SB 908
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
marijuana, cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts  sold or transferred by
a marijuana retailer that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.097 to be  labeled in accordance
with subsection (1) of this section and rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) In adopting rules under subsection (1) of this section, the commission:
(a) May establish different labeling standards for different  varieties of usable marijuana, for
different types of  cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts and for inhalant
delivery systems that contain industrial hemp-derived vapor items;
(b) May establish different minimum labeling standards for  persons registered under ORS
475C.770 to 475C.919 and persons licensed under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525;
(c) Shall  consider the cost of a potential requirement and how that cost will affect the cost to
the ultimate consumer of the  marijuana item or inhalant delivery system that contains an industrial
hemp-derived vapor item; and
(d) May not adopt rules that are more restrictive than is reasonably necessary to protect  the
public health and safety.
[2]