Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CALCULATION OF SUSTAINABLE HARVEST LEVELS
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 10 of this 2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 526.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 10 of this 2024 Act:
(1) “Available land”  means all state forestland on which the State Forester has legal
discretion to harvest timber, taking into account any applicable requirements  of any habitat
conservation plan  approved by the National Marine Fisheries Service or the United States
Fish and Wildlife Service, pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C. 1531  to
1544).
(2) “State forestland” means:
(a) Forestland acquired under ORS 530.010 to 530.040; and
(b) Common School Forest Lands managed under ORS 530.490.
(3) “Sustainable harvest level” means a planned volume of timber to be:
(a) Harvested from available land in each year during a five-year period; and
(b) Offered for sale.
SECTION 3.
(1) The State Forester shall calculate:
(a) A new sustainable harvest level for every five-year period; and
(b) An amended sustainable harvest level  under circumstances described in subsection
(3) of this section, as described in subsection (4) of this section.
(2) To calculate a new or amended sustainable harvest level, the State Forester shall:
(a) Identify available land;
(b) Develop a timber inventory model that:
(A) Is based on an inventory of timber on the available land that is current as of not
more than one year before  a draft of the sustainable harvest level is published under section
4 of this 2024 Act; and
(B) Projects the yield and growth  of the inventory of the timber for 100 years under an-
ticipated management; and
(c) Use the timber inventory model to  derive a sustainable harvest level that maximizes
the net present value of the available land, using a discount rate commonly used  for owners
of a size of private forestland that is similar to the size of the available land.
(3) Before the State Board of Forestry or the  State Forester adopts or amends any forest
management plan, rule, order or policy that would alter management  of available land, the
State Forester shall calculate an amended sustainable harvest level.
(4) An amended sustainable harvest level:
(a) Modifies the  planned volume of timber to be harvested from available land during one
[2]
HB 4106
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or more years remaining in the five-year period for the sustainable harvest level that is being
amended.
(b) Applies during the years remaining in the five-year period for the sustainable harvest
level that is being amended.
(c) Does not start a new five-year period for a sustainable harvest level.
SECTION 4.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 183.325  to 183.410, the adoption of a sustainable
harvest level or an amended sustainable harvest level  by rule, pursuant to ORS 526.041 (2),
shall be as provided in this section.
(2) At least 120 days before the beginning of a five-year  period for a sustainable harvest
level, or as soon as practicable after the State Forester calculates an amended  harvest level
pursuant to section 3 (3) of this 2024 Act, the State Forester shall publish:
(a) A draft of the sustainable harvest level or the amended sustainable harvest level;
(b) The timber inventory model described in section 3 of this 2024 Act;
(c) A thorough and detailed description of the timber  inventory model that describes in
detail, at minimum:
(A) The inputs and  methodology used to determine the inventory of timber on the avail-
able land and the projected yield and growth of the inventory of the timber;
(B) Any constraints on harvesting timber on the available land that were used  as inputs
for the timber inventory model, including stream buffers, wildlife setbacks,  inoperable land
or other physical constraints, and any cases, laws or rules that  constrain the harvest of
timber on the available land;
(C) How the constraints  were determined, including the State Forester’s interpretation
of any applicable case, law or rule;
(D) Any financial or economic assumptions that were used as inputs;
(E) Any other data or assumptions that were used as inputs;
(F) How tax revenues and revenues from timber sales that would  accrue to counties and
the Common School Fund will likely be affected by the amendments to the sustainable har-
vest level; and
(G) How local communities and direct consumers  of wood products from state forestland
will likely be economically affected, including any economic multiplier effects, by the
amendments to the sustainable harvest level; and
(d) For a draft amended sustainable harvest level, any changes to:
(A) The amount of available land identified; and
(B) How the available land was identified.
(3) After publishing the documents described in subsection (2) of  this section, the State
Forester shall:
(a) Hold a public hearing on the documents; and
(b) Allow 60 days for the public, the State Board  of Forestry and the Forest Trust Land
Advisory Committee described in ORS 526.156 to comment on the documents.
(4) Not more than 60 days after the 60-day comment period closes, the State Forester:
(a) Shall consider, and provide responses  to, all suggestions and information provided at
the hearing or in properly submitted public comments;
(b) May incorporate any of the suggestions or information into a final sustainable harvest
level or a final amended sustainable  harvest level without providing an additional opportunity
for a hearing or public comment; and
[3]
HB 4106
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Shall issue an order adopting a final sustainable harvest level or  a final amended
sustainable harvest level.
(5) After  the State Forester issues an order under subsection (4) of this section, as
needed for consistency with the order:
(a) The State Board of Forestry shall amend forest management plans, as defined  in ORS
526.455, adopted by rule pursuant to ORS 526.041 (1)(b); and
(b) The State Forester shall amend,  and otherwise update, planning documents and poli-
cies for management of state forestland.
SECTION 5.
The State Forester  shall first publish a draft sustainable harvest level as
described in section 4 of this 2024 Act on or before December 31, 2025.
SALES OF TIMBER AT
SUSTAINABLE HARVEST LEVEL
SECTION 6. During each five-year period, subject  to the provisions of ORS 530.050,
530.059 and 530.500, the State Forester shall offer timber for sale at the applicable sustainable
harvest level.
SECTION 7. (1) As used in this section,  “shortfall” means a reduction in the volume of
timber offered for sale from the  available land during one year as compared to the volume
planned to be offered for sale that year under the sustainable harvest level.
(2) On or before September 15 of each  year, the State Forester shall make publicly
available on a State Forestry Department website:
(a) A calculation of the volume of timber harvested and offered for sale from  the avail-
able land during the previous year;
(b) A calculation of any shortfall;
(c) A description of specific reasons for any shortfall; and
(d) If  a shortfall occurred, a plan for achieving, during any remaining years in the five-
year period, the offer  for sale of the difference in the volume of timber planned to be offered
for sale under the sustainable harvest level and the volume of timber that was  offered for
sale during the year.
(3) Under the plan described in subsection (2)(d) of this  section, to the extent feasible,
the difference in the volume of timber must be offered for sale within the  county or counties
most affected by the shortfall.
SECTION 8.
The requirements of section 7 of this 2024 Act apply on and after January
1, 2026.
SECTION 9. (1) If, at the end of a five-year period for a  sustainable harvest level, the
volume of timber harvested  from the available land and offered for sale is less than the
sustainable harvest level, the State Forester shall offer for  sale the additional timber during
the next five-year period, in addition to  the sustainable harvest level applicable during the
next five-year period.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  the State Forester may reduce the
amount of additional timber to be offered for  sale during the next five-year period to the
degree that the additional timber was not offered for  sale during the previous five-year pe-
riod as a result of catastrophic wildfire or another catastrophic environmental event, after:
(a) Making a finding on why the additional timber was not harvested; and
[4]
HB 4106
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Issuing a final order that describes facts and circumstances supporting the finding.
SECTION 10.
(1) Notwithstanding any  contrary provision of law, a person described in
subsection (2) of this section may  apply to the Circuit Court for Marion County for a tem-
porary or permanent injunction directing the State  Forester to comply with the applicable
requirement if the State Forester does not:
(a) Offer timber for sale as required  by section 9 (1) of this 2024 Act, subject to any ap-
plicable reduction under section 9 (2) of this 2024 Act; or
(b) Calculate an amended sustainable  harvest level as required by section 3 (3) of this
2024 Act.
(2) This section confers standing to bring an action  under subsection (1) of this section
on any person that demonstrates that the person has received revenue from the  harvest of
timber on state forestland or has purchased timber  sale contracts in this state, without a
further showing of individualized interest.
(3) The court may award costs, but not  attorney fees, to a party that prevails under this
section.
ADOPTION OF POLICIES BY RULE
SECTION 11.  ORS 526.041 is amended to read:
526.041. The [ forester] State Forester , under the general supervision of the State Board of
Forestry, shall:
(1) In compliance with ORS chapter 183[ ,]:
(a) [ Promulgate] Adopt  rules consistent with law for the enforcement of the state forest  laws
relating directly to the protection of forestland and the conservation of forest resources.
(b) Adopt by rule forest management plans, as defined in ORS 526.455.
(2) Adopt by rule sustainable  harvest levels and any amended sustainable harvest levels,
as described in sections 3 and 4 of this 2024 Act.
[(2)] (3) Appoint and instruct fire wardens as provided in ORS chapter 477.
[(3)] (4) Direct the improvement and protection of forestland owned by the State of Oregon.
[(4)] (5) Collect data relative to forest conditions.
[(5)] (6) Take action authorized by law to prevent and extinguish forest, brush and grass fires.
[(6)] (7) Enforce all laws pertaining to forestland and prosecute violations of such laws.
[(7)] (8) Cooperate with landowners, political subdivisions, private associations  and agencies and
others in forest protection.
[(8)] (9) Advise and encourage reforestation.
[(9)] (10) Publish such information on forestry as the forester determines to be in the  public in-
terest.
[(10)] (11)  Enter into contracts and cooperative agreements pertaining  to experiments and re-
search in forestry.
[(11)] (12) Sell, exchange or otherwise dispose of  any real property heretofore or hereafter ac-
quired by the board for administrative purposes and no longer needed.
[(12)] (13)  Coordinate any activities of the State Forestry Department related to a  watershed
enhancement project approved by the Oregon  Watershed Enhancement Board under ORS 541.932
with activities of other cooperating state and federal agencies participating in the project.
[(13)] (14)  Prescribe uniform state standards for certification of  wildland fire training courses
[5]
HB 4106
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and educational programs.
[(14)] (15) Serve  as the Governor’s authorized representative for the purpose of initiating the fire
management assistance declaration process with the Federal Emergency Management  Agency and
administering Federal Emergency Management Agency fire management assistance grants.
SECTION 12.
The amendments to ORS 526.041 by section 11 of this 2024 Act  apply to the
adoption of policies described in ORS 526.041 (1)(b) and (2)  on and after the effective date of
this 2024 Act.
SECTION 13.  ORS 526.990 is amended to read:
526.990. Violation of any rule [ promulgated] adopted under ORS 526.041 (1) (a) is, upon con-
viction, punishable as a misdemeanor.
JUDICIAL REVIEW OF RULES ADOPTING POLICIES
SECTION 14. Section 15 of this  2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 526.
SECTION 15. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 183.400, 183.480 (2) and (3), 183.482 and 183.484, ju-
dicial review of a final rule described in ORS 526.041  (1)(b) or (2) shall be as described in this
section.
(2) This section confers standing to bring an action  under this section on any person that
demonstrates that the person  has received revenue from the harvest of timber on state
forestland or has purchased timber sale contracts in this state, without a  further showing
of individualized interest.
(3) A person described in subsection (2) of  this section may institute a proceeding for
judicial review under this section by:
(a) Filing a petition in the Circuit Court for Marion County, not more than  21 days after
the rule is published, that includes:
(A) A statement of the rule the petitioner is challenging;
(B) A statement of the legal basis for the challenge; and
(C) A  statement and supporting affidavit demonstrating how the petitioner is adversely
affected by the rule; and
(b) Serving a  copy of the petition, by registered or certified mail, upon the State
Forester, the State Board of Forestry and the Attorney General.
(4)(a) At any time subsequent  to the filing of a petition and prior to a date set for a
hearing, the State Forester may suspend the rule for purposes of reconsideration.
(b) If the State Forester suspends a rule for purposes  of reconsideration, the State
Forester shall, within such time as the court may  allow, readopt, amend or permanently
suspend the rule.
(c) If the petitioner is dissatisfied with the readoption or amendment of the rule,  the
petitioner may refile the petition and judicial review shall proceed upon  the readopted or
amended rule.
(d) An amended petition for review shall not  be required if the State Forester, on re-
consideration, readopts or amends the rule with only minor changes.
(e) If the State Forester suspends a rule  for purposes of reconsideration and amends the
rule in favor of the petitioner, the  court shall allow the petitioner costs, but not attorney
fees, to be paid from funds available to the State Forester or the State Board of Forestry.
(5) Judicial review of a rule under this section shall be limited to an examination of:
[6]
HB 4106
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The rule;
(b) The statutory provisions authorizing the rule; and
(c) Copies of any documents related to notice  and comment on the rule, including a
timber inventory model, as described in section 3 of this 2024 Act,  or a sustainable harvest
level, as defined in section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(6) The court shall declare the rule invalid only if it finds that the rule:
(a) Violates a constitutional provision;
(b) Contravenes or exceeds the statutory authority of the State Forester;
(c) Was adopted without compliance with applicable rulemaking procedures;
(d) Is inconsistent with a different rule of the State Forester  or a rule of the State Board
of Forestry, with an officially stated position of the  State Forester or the State Board of
Forestry or  with a prior practice of the State Forester or the State Board of Forestry, if the
State Forester has not explained the inconsistency; or
(e) Is not supported by evidence, including  evidence to support calculations underpinning
the rule, that, taken in isolation and not in light of the whole record,  a reasonable person
could accept as adequate to support a conclusion.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section, in reviewing a rule under  this section,
the court may not:
(a) Consider whether the rule secures the greatest permanent  value of lands, as de-
scribed in ORS 530.050;
(b) Examine any interpretation by the State Forester, the State Board of Forestry or  the
State Forestry Department of the  applicability or requirements of a habitat conservation
plan approved by the National Marine Fisheries Services or  the United States Fish and
Wildlife Service, pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C. 1531 to 1544); or
(c) Declare the rule invalid more than two years  after the date the rule was filed in the
office of the Secretary of State solely because the  rule was adopted without compliance with
applicable rulemaking procedures, if the State  Forester attempted to comply with the pro-
cedures and the failure  to do so did not substantially prejudice the interests of the petitioner.
(8) The form and scope of the judgment of the court shall be as described in ORS 183.486.
(9) Notwithstanding ORS 183.497 (2), awards  of costs and attorney fees to a petitioner
shall be as described in ORS 183.497.
(10) Any party to the proceeding may appeal the judgment of the court as described in
ORS 183.500.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 183.480 is amended to read:
183.480. (1) Except as provided in ORS 183.417 (3)(b), any person adversely affected or  aggrieved
by an order  or any party to an agency proceeding is entitled to judicial review of a final order,
whether such order is affirmative or negative in form. A petition  for rehearing or reconsideration
need not be filed as a condition of judicial review  unless specifically otherwise provided by statute
or agency rule.
(2) Judicial review of final orders of agencies shall be solely as provided by ORS 183.482,
183.484, 183.490 and 183.500.
(3) No action or suit shall be maintained as to the validity of any agency order  except a final
order as provided in this section and ORS 183.482, 183.484, 183.490 and  183.500 or except upon
showing that the agency is proceeding without probable cause, or that the party  will suffer sub-
stantial and irreparable harm if interlocutory relief is not granted.
[7]
HB 4106
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) Judicial review of orders issued pursuant to ORS 813.410 shall be as provided  by ORS
813.410.
(5) Judicial review of rules described in ORS 526.041 (1)(b) and (2) shall be  as provided by
section 15 of this 2024 Act.
FOREST MANAGEMENT REPORTS
SECTION 17.
ORS 526.255 and 526.265 are added to and made a part of sections 2 to 10
of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 18.  ORS 526.255 is amended to read:
526.255. (1) The State Forester shall :
(a) Submit a biennial report  on  forest management  to the Governor and to [ those] the  com-
mittees or interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly [ with responsibility for forestry
matters] that relate to natural resources .
(b) Present orally on the report to the committees  or interim committees of the Legis-
lative Assembly that relate to natural resources, after the end of each fiscal year:
(A) On or before the following September;
(B) On or before the following January; or
(C) During the first 15 days of the following regular legislative session.
(2) The report [ shall contain matters that include, but are not limited  to ] must describe, at
minimum:
[(1)] (a)  [ The] Long range forest management plans based on current resource  descriptions and
technical assumptions, including [ sustained yield calculations for the purpose of maintaining economic
stability in each management region ] the timber inventory model described in section 3 of this
2024 Act.
(b) The applicable sustainable harvest level, as defined in section 2 of this 2024 Act.
[(2)] (c)  Marketing, reforestation and intensive forest management programs for the  last com-
pleted biennium and the current biennium, and projected programs for the ensuing biennium.
(d) [ The marketing report shall include ] The volume and value of new  sales, the volume and
value of timber harvested [ and], timber sales receipts distributed to  counties and to the Common
School Fund  and the information described in section 3 (2) of this 2024 Act .
[(3)] (e)  The  programmed harvest level on federal lands or federal policy changes that would
impact that level of harvest on lands in Oregon.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 526.265 is amended to read:
526.265. (1) Before finalizing the report described in ORS  526.255, the State Forester [ may]
shall:
(a) Make a copy of a draft of the report publicly available;
(b) Provide the public with no less than 30 days to submit written comments on  the draft
of the report; and
(c) After the period described in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  conduct  biennial public
hearings in each  forest  management region  described in subsection  (2) of this section  to
[report]:
(A) Describe  the matters included in [ ORS 526.255] the draft of the report;  and [ to]
(B) Accept public testimony  on the draft of the report .
(2) For the purpose of this section [ and ORS  526.255], the following forest management regions
[8]
HB 4106
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
are established:
(a) Northwest Region, consisting of Clatsop, Columbia, Tillamook, Washington and  Yamhill
Counties.
(b) Willamette Region, consisting  of Multnomah, Clackamas, Marion, Polk, Lincoln, Benton, Linn
and Lane Counties.
(c) Southern Region, consisting of Douglas, Coos, Curry, Josephine and Jackson Counties.
(d) Eastern  Region, consisting of Hood River, Wasco, Gilliam, Sherman, Morrow, Umatilla, Un-
ion, Wallowa, Jefferson, Wheeler, Grant, Baker, Deschutes,  Crook, Klamath, Lake, Harney and
Malheur Counties.
APPROPRIATION
SECTION 20.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Forester, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $______, for developing:
(1) A timber inventory model described in section 3 of this 2024 Act; and
(2) A sustainable harvest  level, as defined in section 2 of this 2024 Act, or an amended
sustainable harvest level.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 21.
The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 22. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[9]