Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 475.005 to
475.285.
SECTION 2. The State Board of Pharmacy shall adopt rules to classify xylazine  as a
Schedule IV controlled substance.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 582