Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 342.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “deafblind intervener” means a person who has
the knowledge and skills to communicate  in an educational setting with a student who is
deafblind.
(2) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall adopt  by rule standards nec-
essary for:
(a) The issuance, denial, continuation, renewal, lapse or reinstatement of  certification
as a deafblind intervener; and
(b) The establishment and collection of fees for certification as a deafblind intervener.
(3) The commission may adopt by rule procedures for revocation of a certificate as a
deafblind intervener that are consistent with ORS 342.175 to 342.180.
(4) The commission shall issue and renew a certificate  as a deafblind intervener to a
person who complies with  the rules established by the commission for the certification and
practice of deafblind interveners.
(5) A  certificate issued under this section is not a teaching license. A deafblind intervener
holding a certificate issued under this section is not subject to ORS 342.805 to 342.937.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 342.223 is amended to read:
342.223. (1) For the purpose of requesting a state or nationwide criminal records check under
ORS 181A.195, the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission may require the fingerprints of:
(a) A person who is applying for a license or registration  under ORS 342.120 to 342.430 as a
teacher, administrator or personnel specialist if the person has not submitted  to a criminal records
check by the commission within  the previous three years or has remained continuously licensed by
or registered with  the commission for a different license or registration for which the person already
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4559
HB 3808
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
has submitted to a criminal records check by the commission.
(b) A person who is applying for reinstatement of a license or registration as a  teacher, admin-
istrator or personnel specialist, or a certificate as  a school nurse, whose license, registration or
certificate has lapsed for at least three years.
(c) A person who is applying for a certificate under ORS 342.475 as a school nurse.
(d) A person who is registering with the  commission for supervised clinical practice experience,
practicum or internship as  a teacher, administrator or personnel specialist, if the person does not
hold a current license  issued by the commission and has not submitted to a criminal records check
by the commission within the previous three years for student teaching, practicum  or internship as
a teacher, administrator or personnel specialist.
(e) A person who is applying for a registration as a public  charter school teacher or adminis-
trator under ORS 342.125.
(f) A person who is applying for a certificate  as a deafblind intervener under section 2
of this 2025 Act.
(2) The making of any false statement as to the conviction of a  crime is grounds for refusal to
issue, renew or reinstate a license, certificate or registration and is in addition to the grounds stated
in ORS 342.143.
(3) A person may  appeal the refusal to issue a license, registration or certificate under this
section as a contested case under ORS 183.413 to 183.470, but the refusal  to renew or reinstate a
license or registration is subject to  ORS 342.175 to 342.180, and the commission shall notify the
person of the right to appeal.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 329.007 is amended to read:
329.007. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Academic content standards” means expectations of student knowledge  and skills adopted
by the State Board of Education under ORS 329.045.
(2) “Administrator” includes all persons whose duties require an administrative license.
(3) “Board” or “state board” means the State Board of Education.
(4) “Community learning  center” means a school-based or school-linked program providing in-
formal meeting places and coordination for community activities, adult education,  child care, infor-
mation and referral and  other services as described in ORS 329.157. “Community learning center”
includes, but is not limited  to, a community school program as defined in ORS 336.505, family re-
source centers as described in ORS 417.725, full service schools,  lighted schools and 21st century
community learning centers.
(5) “Department” means the Department of Education.
(6) “Higher education and career path skills” means instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Applying for  jobs, including preparing a resume or filling out a job application and develop-
ing job interview skills;
(b) Applying for admission to a post-secondary institution  of education, including applying for
financial aid and scholarships;
(c) Applying for post-secondary learning and  job training opportunities and programs that do not
require a four-year degree, including apprenticeships and how  to meet the prerequisites for those
opportunities and programs;
(d) Developing career-related skills, including improving employability skills, taking  advantage
of community-based experiential learning and gaining knowledge of career opportunities; and
(e) Seeking assistance, including accessing  community resources and acting as a self-advocate
[2]
HB 3808
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for mental, physical and financial well-being.
(7) “History, geography, economics and civics” includes, but is not limited to, Oregon Studies.
(8) “Language arts” includes reading, writing and other  communications in any language, in-
cluding English.
(9) “Oregon Studies” means history, geography,  economics and civics specific to the State of
Oregon. Oregon Studies instruction in  Oregon government shall include municipal, county, tribal
and state government, as well as the electoral and legislative processes.
(10) “Parents” means parents or guardians of students who are covered by this chapter.
(11) “Personal financial education” means instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Credit scores, including how to build credit, the costs  and benefits of borrowing money on
credit and the long-term impacts of high or low credit scores;
(b) Investments, asset building and debt,  including how to open a bank account, different types
of bank accounts, compound  interest, the total cost of loan repayment, comparing investment options
and types of investments and understanding different types of retirement accounts;
(c) Strategies for creating  a budget, tracking and modifying spending patterns and understanding
insurance products, including exploring common costs associated with rentals and home ownership;
(d) Taxes, including accessing tax credits, understanding tax cycles, being familiar  with state
and federal tax forms and being familiar with federal, state, regional and local taxes; and
(e) Building financial well-being, including  evaluating the impact of behavioral economics and
the psychology of money,  explaining trends in financial health and evaluating consumer skills, in-
cluding fraud and identity theft prevention.
(12) “Public charter school” has the meaning given that term in ORS 338.005.
(13) “School district” means a school district as defined in ORS  332.002, a state-operated school
or any legally constituted combination of such entities.
(14)(a) “Teacher” means any licensed employee of a school district who  has direct responsibility
for instruction, coordination of educational programs or supervision  of students and who is com-
pensated for such services from public funds.
(b) “Teacher” does not include :
(A) A school nurse, as defined in ORS 342.455[ , or ];
(B) A deafblind intervener, as defined in section 2 of this 2025 Act; or
(C) A person whose duties require an administrative license.
(15) “The arts” includes, but is not limited to, literary arts, performing arts and visual arts.
(16) “World  languages” includes sign language, heritage languages and languages other than a
student’s primary language.
(17) “21st Century Schools Council” means a council established pursuant to ORS 329.704.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 329.007, as amended by section 6, chapter  253, Oregon Laws 2019, section 3,
chapter 178, Oregon Laws 2021, and section 4, chapter 564, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
329.007. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Academic content standards” means expectations of student knowledge  and skills adopted
by the State Board of Education under ORS 329.045.
(2) “Administrator” includes all persons whose duties require an administrative license.
(3) “Board” or “state board” means the State Board of Education.
(4) “Community learning  center” means a school-based or school-linked program providing in-
formal meeting places and coordination for community activities, adult education,  child care, infor-
mation and referral and  other services as described in ORS 329.157. “Community learning center”
[3]
HB 3808
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
includes, but is not limited  to, a community school program as defined in ORS 336.505, family re-
source centers as described in ORS 417.725, full service schools,  lighted schools and 21st century
community learning centers.
(5) “Department” means the Department of Education.
(6) “Higher education and career path skills” means instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Applying for  jobs, including preparing a resume or filling out a job application and develop-
ing job interview skills;
(b) Applying for admission to a post-secondary institution  of education, including applying for
financial aid and scholarships;
(c) Applying for post-secondary learning and  job training opportunities and programs that do not
require a four-year degree, including apprenticeships and how  to meet the prerequisites for those
opportunities and programs;
(d) Developing career-related skills, including improving employability skills, taking  advantage
of community-based experiential learning and gaining knowledge of career opportunities; and
(e) Seeking assistance, including accessing  community resources and acting as a self-advocate
for mental, physical and financial well-being.
(7) “History, geography, economics and civics” includes, but is  not limited to, Holocaust and
genocide studies and Oregon Studies.
(8) “Holocaust and genocide  studies” means studies on the Holocaust, genocide and other acts
of mass violence that comply with the requirements described in ORS 329.494.
(9) “Language arts” includes reading, writing and other  communications in any language, in-
cluding English.
(10) “Oregon Studies”  means history, geography, economics and civics specific to the State of
Oregon. Oregon Studies instruction in  Oregon government shall include municipal, county, tribal
and state government, as well as the electoral and legislative processes.
(11) “Parents” means parents or guardians of students who are covered by this chapter.
(12) “Personal financial education” means instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Credit scores, including how to build credit, the costs  and benefits of borrowing money on
credit and the long-term impacts of high or low credit scores;
(b) Investments, asset building and debt,  including how to open a bank account, different types
of bank accounts, compound  interest, the total cost of loan repayment, comparing investment options
and types of investments and understanding different types of retirement accounts;
(c) Strategies for creating  a budget, tracking and modifying spending patterns and understanding
insurance products, including exploring common costs associated with rentals and home ownership;
(d) Taxes, including accessing tax credits, understanding tax cycles, being familiar  with state
and federal tax forms and being familiar with federal, state, regional and local taxes; and
(e) Building financial well-being, including  evaluating the impact of behavioral economics and
the psychology of money,  explaining trends in financial health and evaluating consumer skills, in-
cluding fraud and identity theft prevention.
(13) “Public charter school” has the meaning given that term in ORS 338.005.
(14) “School district” means a school district as defined in ORS  332.002, a state-operated school
or any legally constituted combination of such entities.
(15)(a) “Teacher” means any licensed employee of a school district who  has direct responsibility
for instruction, coordination of educational programs or supervision  of students and who is com-
pensated for such services from public funds.
[4]
HB 3808
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) “Teacher” does not include :
(A) A school nurse, as defined in ORS 342.455[ , or ];
(B) A deafblind intervener, as defined in section 2 of this 2025 Act; or
(C) A person whose duties require an administrative license.
(16) “The arts” includes, but is not limited to, literary arts, performing arts and visual arts.
(17) “World  languages” includes sign language, heritage languages and languages other than a
student’s primary language.
(18) “21st Century Schools Council” means a council established pursuant to ORS 329.704.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 342.120 is amended to read:
342.120. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Administrator” includes but is not limited to all superintendents,  assistant superintendents,
principals  and  academic program directors in public schools or education service districts who have
direct responsibility for supervision  or evaluation of licensed teachers and who are compensated for
their services from public funds.
(2) “Administrative license” means a license issued under ORS 342.125 (3)(f) or (g).
(3) “Approved educator preparation program” means a licensure program that:
(a) Prepares persons to become educators in any grade from preprimary through grade 12;
(b) Is offered by an approved educator preparation provider; and
(c) Meets the standards of the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission, as provided by ORS
342.147.
(4) “Approved educator preparation provider” means a sponsor  or provider of an educator
preparation program that meets the standards of the Teacher  Standards and Practices Commission,
as provided by ORS 342.147.
(5) “Commission licensee” means a person  whom the Teacher Standards and Practices Commis-
sion has the authority to investigate or discipline because the person:
(a) Is enrolled in an approved educator preparation program;
(b) Is an applicant for a Teacher Standards and Practices Commission license or registration;
(c) Holds a license or registration issued by the Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission;
or
(d) Has held a  license or registration issued by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission
at any time during the previous five years.
(6) “Instruction” includes preparation of curriculum,  assessment and direction of learning in
class, in small groups, in individual situations, online, in the library and in  guidance and counseling,
but does not include the  provision of related services, as defined in ORS 343.035, to a child identified
as a child with a disability pursuant to ORS 343.146  to 343.183 when provided in accordance with
ORS 343.221.
(7) “Instructional assistant” means a classified school employee who  does not require a license
to teach, who is employed by a school district or  education service district and whose assignment
consists of and is  limited to assisting a licensed teacher in accordance with rules established by the
Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(8)(a) “Teacher” includes all licensed employees in the public schools or employed by an  edu-
cation service district who  have direct responsibility for instruction or coordination of educational
programs and who are compensated for their services from public funds.
(b) “Teacher” does not include :
(A) A school nurse as defined in ORS 342.455 [ or];
[5]
HB 3808
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
(B) A deafblind intervener as defined in section 2 of this 2025 Act; or
(C) An instructional assistant.
(9) “Teaching license” means a license issued under ORS 342.125 or 342.144.
(10) “Underrepresented person” means:
(a) A person having origins in any of the black racial groups of Africa, but who is not Hispanic;
(b) A person of Hispanic culture or origin;
(c) A person having origins in any of the original peoples of the Far East, Southeast  Asia, the
Indian subcontinent or the Pacific Islands; or
(d) An American Indian or Alaska Native  having origins in any of the original peoples of North
America.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Department  of Education shall establish a program to increase the
number of deafblind interveners certified under section 2 of this  2025 Act who are employed
in the education service districts and school districts of this state.
(2) Through the program established under this section, the department shall distribute
moneys to education  service districts and school districts to hire and retain deafblind
interveners certified under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The State  Board of Education may adopt rules necessary for the administration of
this section, including specifying any qualifications and requirements for  an education ser-
vice district or school district to receive moneys under this section.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $_______, which may be expended for the program developed
under section 7 of this 2025 Act.
[6]