Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Department of Land Conservation and Development shall study af-
fordable housing, including the  development of housing by religious organizations. The de-
partment shall submit a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and may include
recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to housing no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2651