Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
AMENDMENTS TO OIL OR HAZARDOUS MATERIAL
SPILLAGE STATUTES
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468B.300 is amended to read:
468B.300. As used in ORS 468.020, 468.095, 468.140 (3) and 468B.300 to 468B.500:
(1) “Applicable rail carrier” means a railroad  operating in this state that is classified as
a Class I or Class II carrier under 49  C.F.R. 1201 and that owns or operates high hazard train
routes.
[(1)] (2)  “Bulk” means material stored or transported in loose,  unpackaged liquid, powder or
granular form capable of being conveyed by a pipe, bucket, chute or belt system.
[(2)] (3) “Cargo vessel” means a self-propelled ship in commerce,  other than a tank vessel, of 300
gross tons or more. “Cargo vessel” does not include a vessel used solely for  commercial fish har-
vesting.
[(3)] (4) “Commercial fish harvesting” means taking food fish with any gear unlawful for  angling
under ORS 506.006, or taking food fish in  excess of the limits permitted for personal use, or taking
food fish with the intent of disposing of such food fish or parts thereof for profit, or by sale, barter
or trade, in commercial channels.
[(4)] (5) “Contingency plan” means an oil spill prevention and emergency response  plan required
under ORS 468B.345.
[(5)] (6) “Covered vessel” means a tank vessel, cargo vessel, passenger vessel or dredge vessel.
[(6)] (7)  “Damages” includes damages, costs, losses, penalties or attorney  fees of any kind for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2361
SB 7
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
which liability may exist under the laws  of this state resulting from, arising out of or related to the
discharge or threatened discharge of oil.
[(7)] (8)  “Discharge”  means any emission other than natural seepage of oil, whether intentional
or unintentional. “Discharge” includes but is not limited  to spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring,
emitting, emptying or dumping oil.
[(8)] (9) “Dredge vessel” means a self-propelled vessel of 300 or more gross tons  that is equipped
for regularly engaging in dredging of submerged and submersible lands.
[(9)] (10)  “Exploration facility” means a platform, vessel or  other offshore facility used to ex-
plore for  oil in the navigable waters of the state. “Exploration facility” does not include platforms
or vessels used for  stratigraphic drilling or other operations that are not authorized or intended to
drill to a producing formation.
[(10)] (11)  “Facility” means a pipeline , a railroad car  or any structure, group of structures,
equipment or device, other than a vessel that transfers oil over  navigable waters of the state, that
is used for  producing, storing, handling, transferring, processing or transporting oil in bulk and that
is capable of storing or transporting 10,000 or more gallons of oil. “Facility” does not include:
(a) A [ railroad car, ] motor vehicle or [ other] rolling stock  other than a railroad car  while
transporting oil over the highways [ or rail lines ] of this state;
(b) An underground storage tank regulated by the Department  of Environmental Quality or a
local government under ORS 466.706 to 466.882 and 466.994; or
(c) A marina, or  a public fueling station, that is engaged exclusively in the direct sale of fuel,
or any other product used for propulsion, to a final user of the fuel or other product.
[(11)] (12) “Federal on-scene coordinator” means the federal official predesignated by the  United
States Environmental Protection Agency or the  United States Coast Guard to coordinate and direct
federal responses or the official designated by  the lead agency to coordinate and direct removal
under the National Contingency Plan.
[(12)] (13) “Hazardous material” has the meaning given that term in ORS 466.605.
(14) “High hazard train route” means a section of rail lines in this state:
(a) That abuts or travels over navigable waters of the state, an  inland watershed or a
drinking water intake; and
(b) Over which trains operate that consist of multiple tanker railroad cars transporting
oil or hazardous material as cargo.
(15) “Listed sensitive area” means an area or location  listed as an area of special eco-
nomic or environmental  importance in an Area Contingency Plan or Sub-Area Contingency
Plan prepared and published pursuant to section 311(j) of the Federal Water Pollution Control
Act, 33 U.S.C. 1321(j), as amended by the Oil Pollution Act of 1990, P.L. 101-380.
[(13)] (16) “Maritime association”  means an association or cooperative of marine terminals, fa-
cilities, vessel owners, vessel operators, vessel agents or other maritime industry  groups, that pro-
vides oil spill response planning and spill related communications services within the state.
[(14)] (17) “Maximum probable spill” means the maximum probable  spill for a vessel operating
in the navigable waters of the state considering  the history of spills of vessels of the same class
operating on the west coast of the United States.
[(15)] (18) “Navigable waters” means the Columbia River, the Willamette River  up to Willamette
Falls, the Pacific Ocean and estuaries to the head of tidewater.
[(16)] (19) “National Contingency Plan” means the plan  prepared and published under section
311(d) of the  Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. 1321(d), as amended by the Oil Pollution
[2]
SB 7
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-380).
[(17)] (20) “Offshore facility”  means any facility located in, on or under any of the navigable
waters of the state.
[(18)] (21) “Oils” or “oil” means oil, including gasoline, crude oil, bitumen, synthetic  crude
oil, natural gas condensate,  fuel oil, diesel oil, lubricating oil, sludge, oil refuse and  any other
petroleum related product and liquefied natural gas.
[(19)] (22) “Onshore facility” means any facility located in, on or under any land  of the state,
other than submerged land, that, because of its location, could reasonably be expected  to cause
substantial harm to the environment by discharging oil into or on the  navigable waters of the state
or adjoining shorelines.
[(20)] (23) “Passenger vessel” means a ship of 300 or more gross tons carrying passengers for
compensation.
[(21)] (24) “Person” has the meaning given the term in ORS 468.005.
[(22)] (25) “Person having control over oil” includes but is not  limited to any person using,
storing or transporting oil immediately prior to entry of such oil  into the [ navigable] waters of the
state, and shall specifically include carriers and bailees of such oil.
[(23)] (26) “Pipeline” means a facility, including piping, compressors, pump  stations and storage
tanks, used to transport oil between facilities or between facilities and tank vessels.
[(24)] (27) “Region  of operation” with respect to the holder of a contingency plan means the area
where the operations of the holder that require a contingency plan are located.
[(25)] (28) “Removal costs” means the  costs of removal that are incurred after a discharge of
oil has occurred or, in any case in which there is a  substantial threat of a discharge of oil, the costs
to prevent, minimize or mitigate oil pollution from the incident.
[(26)] (29) “Responsible party” has the  meaning given under section 1001 of the Oil Pollution
Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-380).
[(27)] (30) “Ship” means any boat, ship, vessel, barge or other floating craft of any kind.
[(28)(a)] (31)(a) “State on-scene coordinator” means the state official appointed by  the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality to represent the department and the State of Oregon in response to
an oil or hazardous material spill or release or threatened spill  or release and to coordinate cleanup
response with state and local agencies.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(A) “Spill or release” means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling,  emitting, re-
leasing, leaking or placing of any  oil or hazardous material into the air or into or on any land or
waters of this state except as authorized by a permit issued  under ORS chapter 454, 459, 459A, 468,
468A, 468B or 469 or ORS  466.005 to 466.385, 466.990 (1) and (2) or 466.992 or federal law, or except
when being stored or used for its intended purpose.
(B) “Threatened spill or release” means oil or hazardous material is likely to  escape or be car-
ried into the air or into or on any land or waters of the state, including from a ship as  defined in
this section that is in imminent danger of sinking.
[(29)] (32) “Tank  vessel” means a ship that is constructed or adapted to carry oil in bulk as
cargo or cargo residue. “Tank vessel” does not include:
(a) A vessel carrying oil in drums, barrels or other packages;
(b) A vessel carrying oil as fuel or stores for that vessel; or
(c) An oil spill response barge or vessel.
[(30)] (33) “Worst case spill” means:
[3]
SB 7
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) In the case of a vessel, a spill of the entire cargo and fuel of the tank  vessel complicated
by adverse weather conditions; [ and]
(b) In the case of an onshore or offshore facility,  the largest foreseeable spill in adverse weather
conditions[ .]; and
(c) In the case of an applicable  rail carrier, a spill of a number of barrels of oil as cal-
culated by an applicable rail carrier under section 14 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 2.  ORS 468B.340 is amended to read:
468B.340. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(a) Oil spills present a serious danger to the fragile natural environment of the state.
(b) Commercial vessel activity on the navigable waters of  the state is vital to the economic in-
terests of the people of the state.
(c) Recent studies conducted in the wake  of disastrous oil spills have identified the following
problems in the transport and storage of oil:
(A) Gaps in regulatory oversight;
(B) Incomplete cost recovery by states;
(C) Despite research in spill cleanup technology, it is unlikely that a large percentage of  oil can
be recovered from a catastrophic spill;
(D) Because response efforts cannot effectively reduce the impact of oil  spills, prevention is the
most effective approach to oil spill management; and
(E) Comprehensive oil spill prevention demands participation  by industry, citizens, environ-
mental organizations and local, state, federal and international governments.
(2) Therefore, the Legislative Assembly declares it is the intent of ORS 468B.345  to 468B.415 to
establish a program to promote:
(a) The prevention of oil spills especially on the large, navigable waters of the Columbia  River,
the Willamette River and the Oregon coast;
(b) The prevention of oil  spills to inland rivers and streams serving as essential habitat
for salmon and other wildlife or as a  source of water for consumption, irrigation or other
public use;
(c) The prevention of spills from railroad cars transporting oil as cargo;
(d) The prevention of spills along high hazard train routes;
[(b)] (e) Oil spill response preparedness, including the identification  of actions and content re-
quired for an effective contingency plan;
[(c)] (f) A consistent west coast approach to oil spill prevention and response;
[(d)] (g) The establishment, coordination and duties of safety committees  as provided in ORS
468B.415; and
[(e)] (h) To the maximum extent possible,  coordination of state programs with the programs and
regulations of the United States Coast Guard and adjacent states.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 468B.345  to
468B.415.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding ORS 468B.300,  as used in ORS 468B.345 to 468B.415,
“facility” has the meaning given that term in  ORS 468B.300, except that “facility” does not
include railroad cars.
SECTION 5.  ORS 468B.345 is amended to read:
468B.345. (1)(a) Unless  an oil spill prevention and emergency response plan has been approved
by the Department of Environmental Quality and has been properly implemented, no person shall:
[4]
SB 7
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(a)] (A) Cause or permit the operation of an onshore facility in the state;
[(b)] (B) Cause or permit the operation of an offshore facility in the state; or
[(c)] (C) Cause or permit the operation of a covered  vessel within the navigable waters of the
state.
[(2)] (b) It is not a defense to an action brought for a violation of this subsection [ (1) of this
section] that the person charged believed that a  current contingency plan had been approved by the
department.
[(3)] (c) A contingency plan shall be renewed at least once every five years.
[(4) This section shall not  apply to the operation of a cargo or passenger vessel on Yaquina Bay
or on the navigable waters of  the state in the Pacific Ocean used by cargo or passenger vessels entering
or leaving Yaquina Bay until January 1, 1998. ]
(2)(a) An oil spill prevention and  emergency response plan that has been approved by the
department is required for the operation of a high hazard train route in this state.
(b) It is not a defense to an action brought for a violation of this subsection that  the
person charged believed that  a current contingency plan had been approved by the depart-
ment.
(c) A contingency  plan for a high hazard train route shall be renewed at least once every
three years.
SECTION 6. Section 7 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 468B.345  to
468B.415.
SECTION 7. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission shall adopt rules defining:
(a) Standards for the preparation of contingency plans for high hazard train routes; and
(b) Oil spill response zones along high hazard train routes and  the amount of equipment
identified in a contingency plan that is required to be regularly located in the zones.
(2) The rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) To the  extent feasible and appropriate, define standards for the preparation of con-
tingency plans for high hazard train routes  that are equivalent to standards for the prepa-
ration of contingency plans for facilities adopted under ORS 468B.350; and
(b) Require  the owners and operators of high hazard train routes to demonstrate an
ability to meet the requirements of subsection (3) of this section.
(3) A railroad that owns or operates a high hazard train route in this state shall:
(a) Offer training at  least once every three years to each fire department having juris-
diction along the  high hazard train routes owned or operated by the railroad. Training pro-
vided under this paragraph must address:
(A) General hazards of oil and hazardous materials;
(B) Techniques to assess hazards to the environment and to  the safety of emergency
responders and the public;
(C) Factors that an incident commander must consider in determining whether  to at-
tempt to suppress a fire or to evacuate emergency responders and the public from an area;
(D) Other strategies for initial response by local emergency responders; and
(E) Suggested protocols or practices by which local emergency responders can safely ac-
complish activities associated with items listed in subparagraphs (A) to (D) of this paragraph.
(b) Communicate at least annually with the State  Fire Marshal and with each regional
hazardous material response team having jurisdiction along high hazard train  routes owned
or operated by the railroad, to ensure coordination of emergency response activities between
[5]
SB 7
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the railroad and the regional hazardous material response teams.
(c) Following confirmation of a  discharge from a train along a high hazard train route,
deliver and deploy  sufficient equipment and trained personnel to contain and recover dis-
charged oil or hazardous materials and to protect the environment and public safety.  The
railroad must:
(A) Provide, within one hour of confirmation of the discharge,  a qualified company em-
ployee to advise  the state on-scene coordinator. The employee may be made available by
telephone and must be authorized to  deploy all necessary response resources of the railroad.
(B) Be capable of providing, within three hours of confirmation of the discharge:
(i) Monitoring equipment and a trained  equipment operator to assist in protecting the
safety of emergency responders and the public; and
(ii) Qualified personnel at the discharge site to assess the discharge and  advise the state
on-scene coordinator.
(C) Be capable of delivering and deploying, within eight hours of confirmation of the dis-
charge, containment booms, boats, oil recovery equipment, trained staff and all  other mate-
rials needed to provide:
(i) On-site containment and  recovery of a volume of oil equal to 10 percent of the calcu-
lated worst case spill at any location along the route; and
(ii) Protection of the listed sensitive areas and potable  water intakes that are within one
mile of a discharge  site and within eight hours of water travel time downstream in any river
or stream that the high hazard train route abuts.
(D) Be capable of delivering and deploying, within eight hours of confirmation of  the
discharge, additional containment booms, boats,  oil recovery equipment, trained staff and all
other materials needed to provide containment and  recovery of a worst case spill and to
protect the listed sensitive areas and  potable water intakes that are at any location along
the route.
(d) Be capable of  deploying containment booms from land across sewer outfalls, creeks,
ditches and other places  where oil or hazardous substances may drain, in order to prevent
access by discharged material. A railroad  may arrange with a contractor or other qualified
public or private entity to  supply containment booms under this paragraph. Any arrange-
ment entered into under  this paragraph must be tested by drill at least once every five years.
(e) Conduct at least  one oil containment, recovery and listed sensitive area protection
drill every three years, at a location and time chosen by  the Department of Environmental
Quality. The drill must be attended  by safety representatives of railroad employees governed
by the Railway Labor Act, as amended (45 U.S.C. 153 et seq.).
SECTION 8.
 ORS 468B.355 is amended to read:
468B.355. (1) A contingency plan for a facility or  covered vessel shall be submitted to the De-
partment of Environmental  Quality within 12 months after the Environmental Quality Commission
adopts rules under ORS 468B.350. The department may  adopt a schedule for submission of [ an oil ]
a contingency plan within the 12-month period. The schedule  for the Columbia River shall be coor-
dinated with the State of Washington. The department may  adopt an alternative schedule for the
Oregon coast and the Willamette River.
(2) A contingency plan  for a high hazard train route shall be submitted to the department
within 12  months after the commission adopts rules under section 7 of this 2017 Act. The
department may adopt a schedule for  submission of a contingency plan within the 12-month
[6]
SB 7
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
period.
[(2)] (3) The contingency plan for a  facility shall be submitted by the owner or operator of the
facility or by a qualified oil spill response cooperative in which  the facility owner or operator is a
participating member.
[(3)] (4) The contingency plan for a tank vessel shall be submitted by:
(a) The owner or operator of the tank vessel;
(b) The owner or operator of the facility at which the vessel will be  loading or unloading its
cargo; or
(c) A qualified oil spill response  cooperative in which the tank vessel owner or operator is a
participating member.
[(4)] (5) Subject to conditions imposed  by the department, the contingency plan for a tank vessel,
if submitted by the owner or operator of a facility, may be submitted as a single  plan for all tank
vessels of a particular class that will be loading or unloading cargo at the facility.
[(5)] (6) The contingency plan for a cargo vessel  or passenger vessel may be submitted by the
owner or operator  of the vessel, or the agent for the vessel resident in this state. Subject to con-
ditions imposed by the department, the owner, operator, agent or a maritime  association may submit
a single contingency plan for cargo vessels or passenger vessels of a particular class.
(7) The contingency plan for a high hazard train  route shall be submitted by the railroad
that owns or operates the high hazard train route.
[(6)] (8) A  person that has contracted with a facility , [ or] covered vessel or railroad that op-
erates a high hazard train route  to provide containment and cleanup  services and that meets the
standards established by the commission under ORS 468B.350 or section 7 of  this 2017 Act  may
submit the contingency plan for any facility , [ or] covered vessel  or high hazard train route  for
which the person is contractually  obligated to provide services. Subject to conditions imposed by the
department, the person may submit a single plan for more than one covered vessel.
[(7)] (9) The requirements  of submitting a contingency plan under this section may be satisfied
by a covered vessel by submission of proof of assessment participation by the vessel  in a maritime
association. Subject to conditions  imposed by the department, the association may submit a single
plan for more than one facility or covered vessel or may submit  a single plan providing contingen-
cies to respond for different classes of covered vessels.
[(8)] (10) A contingency plan prepared for an agency of the federal government or an adjacent
state that satisfies the requirements of ORS 468B.345  to 468B.360 and the rules adopted by the
[Environmental Quality] commission may be accepted as a  plan under ORS 468B.345. The commission
shall assure that to the  greatest extent possible, requirements for a contingency plan under ORS
468B.345 to 468B.360 are consistent with requirements for a plan under federal law.
[(9)] (11) Covered vessels may satisfy the requirements of submitting a contingency plan under
this section through proof of current assessment participation in an approved plan  maintained with
the department by a maritime association.
[(10)] (12) A maritime association may submit a  contingency plan for a cooperative group of
covered vessels. Covered vessels that have not previously obtained approval of a plan  may enter the
navigable waters of  the state if, upon entering such waters, the vessel pays the established assess-
ment for participation in the approved plan maintained by the association.
[(11)] (13) A maritime association  shall have a lien on the responsible vessel if the vessel owner
or operator fails to remit any regular operating assessments and shall further have a lien for  the
recovery for any direct costs provided  to or for the vessel by the maritime association for oil spill
[7]
SB 7
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
response or spill related  communications services. The lien shall be enforced in accordance with
applicable law.
[(12)] (14) Obligations incurred by a maritime association and any other liabilities or claims
against the association shall  be enforced only against the assets of the association, and no liability
for the debts or action of the association exists against either the State of Oregon or any  other
subdivision or instrumentality thereof, or  against any member, officer, employee or agent of the as-
sociation in an individual or representative capacity.
[(13)] (15) Except as otherwise provided in ORS chapters 468, 468A and 468B, neither  the mem-
bers of  the association, its officers, agents or employees, nor the business entities by whom the
members are regularly employed, may be held individually responsible  for errors in judgment, mis-
takes or  other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person or employee, save
for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime.
[(14)] (16) Assessment  participation in a maritime association does not constitute a defense to
liability imposed under ORS 468B.345 to 468B.415 or other state or federal law. Such assessment
participation shall not relieve a covered vessel from complying with those portions of the  approved
maritime association contingency plan that may require vessel specific  oil spill response equipment,
training or capabilities for that vessel.
[(15)] (17) A person providing  a contingency plan for a cargo or passenger vessel under this
section  shall  be exempt from liability as provided under ORS 468B.425 for any action taken or
omitted in the course of providing contingency planning service.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 468B.360 is amended to read:
468B.360. In reviewing the  contingency plan required by ORS 468B.345, the Department of En-
vironmental Quality shall consider at least the following factors:
(1) The adequacy of containment and cleanup equipment, personnel, communications  equipment,
notification procedures and  call-down lists, response time and logistical arrangements for coordi-
nation and implementation of response efforts to remove oil spills promptly and properly and  to
protect the environment;
(2) The nature and amount of vessel or high hazard train  route traffic within the area covered
by the plan;
(3) The volume and type of oil being transported within the area covered by the plan;
(4) The existence of navigational hazards within the area covered by the plan;
(5) The history and circumstances surrounding prior spills of  oil within the area covered by the
plan;
(6) The sensitivity of fisheries and wildlife and other natural resources within the area covered
by the plan;
(7) Relevant information on previous spills contained in on-scene coordinator reports  covered
by the plan;
(8) The  extent to which reasonable, cost-effective measures to reduce the likelihood that a spill
will occur have been incorporated into the plan;
(9) The number of covered vessels calling in , and high hazard train routes  and [ the] facilities
located in , the geographic area  and the resulting ability of local agencies and industry groups to
develop, finance and maintain a contingency plan  and spill response system for those vessels , high
hazard train routes  and facilities; and
(10) The spill  response equipment and resources available to a person providing a contingency
plan for cargo and passenger vessels under contingency plans filed by the person under  state or
[8]
SB 7
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
federal law for other covered vessels or facilities owned or operated by that person.
SECTION 10.  ORS 468B.365 is amended to read:
468B.365. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall  approve a contingency plan only
if it determines that :
(a)(A) The plan for a covered vessel or facility  meets the requirements of ORS 468B.345 to
468B.360 and[:]
[(a)] the covered vessel or facility  demonstrates evidence of compliance with ORS 468B.390;
[and] or
(B) The plan for a high hazard train route meets the requirements  of ORS 468B.345 to
486B.360; and
(b) If implemented, the plan is capable, to  the maximum extent practicable in terms of personnel,
materials and equipment, of removing oil promptly and properly  and minimizing any damage to the
environment.
(2) An owner or  operator of a covered vessel , high hazard train route  or facility shall notify
the department in writing immediately of any significant  change affecting the contingency plan, in-
cluding changes in any factor set forth in this section or in rules adopted by the Environmental
Quality Commission. The department may require the  owner or operator to update a contingency
plan as a result of these changes.
(3) A holder of an approved contingency plan does not violate the terms of the  contingency plan
by furnishing to another plan holder, after  notifying the department, equipment, materials or per-
sonnel to assist the other plan holder in a response to an oil discharge.  The plan holder shall re-
place or return the transferred equipment, materials and personnel as soon as feasible.
(4) The department may attach  any reasonable term or condition to its approval or modification
of a contingency plan that the department  determines is necessary to [ insure] ensure that the ap-
plicant:
(a) Has access to sufficient  resources to protect environmentally sensitive areas and to prevent,
contain, clean up and mitigate  potential oil discharges from the facility or tank vessel  or along the
high hazard train route ;
(b) Maintains personnel levels sufficient to carry out emergency operations; and
(c) Complies with the contingency plan.
(5) The contingency plan must provide for the use by  the applicant of the best technology
available at the time the contingency plan was submitted or renewed.
(6) The department may require an applicant or  a holder of an approved contingency plan to
take steps necessary to demonstrate its ability to carry out the contingency plan, including:
(a) Periodic training;
(b) Response team exercises; and
(c) Verification of access to inventories of equipment, supplies and personnel identified as
available in the approved contingency plan.
(7) The department may consider evidence that oil discharge  prevention measures such as dou-
ble hulls or double bottoms on vessels or barges, secondary  containment systems, hydrostatic test-
ing, enhanced vessel traffic  systems or enhanced crew  or staffing  levels have been implemented
and, in its discretion, may make exceptions  to the requirements of this section to reflect the reduced
risk of oil discharges from the facility or tank vessel , or along the  high hazard train route,  for
which the plan is submitted or being modified.
(8) Before the department approves or modifies a contingency plan required under ORS 468B.345,
[9]
SB 7
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the department shall provide a copy of the contingency plan to the State Department  of Fish and
Wildlife, the office of the State Fire Marshal and  the Department of Land Conservation and Devel-
opment for review.  The agencies shall review the plan according to procedures and time limits es-
tablished by rule of the Environmental Quality Commission.
(9) Upon approval of a contingency plan, the department shall issue to the plan holder a  certif-
icate stating that the plan has been approved. The certificate shall include the name  of the
facility , high hazard train route  or tank vessel for which the certificate is issued, the effective
date of the plan and the date by which the plan must be submitted for renewal.
(10) The approval of a contingency plan by the department does not constitute an express  as-
surance regarding the adequacy of  the plan or constitute a defense to liability imposed under ORS
chapters 468, 468A and 468B or any other state law.
SECTION 11.  ORS 468B.385 is amended to read:
468B.385. (1) Upon request of a  plan holder or on the initiative of the Department of Environ-
mental Quality, the  department, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may modify its approval
of a contingency plan if the department determines that a  change has occurred in the operation of
the facility , high hazard train route  or  tank vessel necessitating an amended or supplemental plan,
or that the operator’s discharge experience demonstrates a necessity for modification.
(2) The department, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may revoke its approval of  a con-
tingency plan if the department determines that:
(a) Approval was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation;
(b) The operator does not  have access to the quality or quantity of resources identified in the
plan;
(c) A term or condition of approval or modification has been violated; or
(d) The plan holder is not in compliance with the plan and the deficiency materially affects the
plan holder’s response capability.
(3) Failure of a holder of an approved or modified contingency plan to comply  with the plan or
to have access to the quality or quantity of resources identified in the  plan or to respond with those
resources  within  the shortest possible time in the event of a spill is a violation of ORS 468B.345 to
468B.415 for purposes of ORS 466.992, 468.140, 468.943 and any other applicable law.
(4) If the holder of an approved or modified contingency plan fails to respond to  and conduct
cleanup operations of  an unpermitted discharge of oil with the quality and quantity of resources
identified in the plan and in  a manner required under the plan, the holder is strictly liable, jointly
and severally, for the civil penalty assessed under ORS 466.992 and 468.140.
(5) In order to be considered in compliance with a contingency plan, the plan holder must:
(a) Establish and carry out procedures identified in  the plan as being the responsibility of the
holder of the plan;
(b) Have access to and have on hand the quantity and quality of  equipment, personnel and other
resources identified as being accessible or on hand in the plan;
(c) Fulfill the assurances espoused in the plan in the manner described in the plan;
(d) Comply with terms and  conditions attached to the plan by the department under ORS
468B.345 to 468B.380; and
(e) Successfully demonstrate the ability  to carry out the plan when required by the department
under ORS 468B.370.
RAILROAD SAFETY ASSESSMENTS AND
[10]
SB 7
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY STATEMENTS
SECTION 12. Sections 13 and 14 of this 2017 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
468B.300 to 468B.500.
SECTION 13. (1) The Department of  Environmental Quality shall levy and collect an an-
nual assessment from applicable rail carriers. The  total assessment under this section shall
equal  per year, with each applicable  rail carrier assessed a proportional share
of the total assessment that is based on  the total high hazard train route track miles oper-
ated by the applicable rail carrier within this state.
(2) Moneys collected under this section  shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the
credit of the Oil Spill Prevention Fund to be used in the manner described in  ORS 468B.410
(4) for activities related to high hazard train routes.
SECTION 14. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Worst case spill” means a spill of an amount of barrels of oil calculated as follows:
(A) An applicable rail  carrier shall calculate a percentage equal to (maximum operating
speed/65)
2
, where the maximum operating speed is the top speed that any train carrying  oil
travels on a high hazard train route operated by the applicable rail carrier in this state.
(B) The applicable rail carrier shall multiply  the percentage calculated under subpara-
graph (A) of this paragraph by  the number of barrels of oil moved on the largest train load
of oil that traveled on a high hazard  train route operated by the applicable rail carrier in this
state during the  previous calendar year. The result of the calculation under this subpara-
graph shall equal the worst case spill.
(b) “Cost to clean up a worst case  spill” means a dollar amount equal to the worst case
spill calculated under paragraph (a) of this subsection multiplied by $16,800.
(2) An applicable rail carrier shall annually submit to  the Department of Environmental
Quality a statement that:
(a) Describes all insurance carried by the rail carrier  that covers any losses resulting
from a worst case spill, as well as  the coverage amounts, limitations and other conditions
of the insurance;
(b) Identifies the capacity,  measured in barrels, of the average and of the largest trains
consisting of multiple tanker cars transporting oil  or hazardous materials as cargo that were
operated on high hazard train  routes by the applicable rail carrier in the previous calendar
year; and
(c) Includes additional information sufficient to demonstrate  the applicable rail carrier’s
ability to pay the cost to clean up a worst case spill including, but  not limited to, insurance,
reserve accounts, letters of credit or other  financial instruments or resources that the ap-
plicable rail carrier can rely on to pay the cost to clean up a worst case spill.
(3) An applicable rail carrier shall submit the statement required by this section upon
payment of the annual assessment required under section 13 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 468B.412 is amended to read:
468B.412. (1) By September 30 of each  year, the Department of Environmental Quality shall
publish a report for the  previous fiscal year, commencing on July 1 and ending on June 30, that
addresses:
(a) The fees assessed under ORS 468B.405 on  covered vessels and offshore and onshore facilities;
(b) The assessment on applicable rail carriers under section 13 of this 2017 Act;
[11]
SB 7
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
[(b)] (c) The activities of the department under ORS 468B.410 (4);
[(c)] (d) The penalties recovered by the department under ORS 468B.450 (1); and
[(d)] (e) The activities of the department under ORS 468B.455 (2).
(2)(a) The report published by the department under this section must be in  a format that allows
for the monitoring of fee  and assessment  collection and  related activities by the department and
for ensuring that adequate but not excessive fees and assessments  are collected to meet the
department’s budgetary needs.
(b) The  department shall make the report available to those who paid fees under ORS
468B.405, those who paid the assessment under section 13 of this 2017 Act  and [ to] the general
public.
 MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 16. (1) Sections 3, 4,  6, 7 and 12 to 14 and the amendments to ORS 468B.300,
468B.340, 468B.345, 468B.355, 468B.360, 468B.365, 468B.385 and ORS 468B.412 by sections 1, 2,
5, 8, 9, 10, 11 and 15 of this 2017 Act become operative January 1, 2018.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission and  the Department of Environmental Qual-
ity may take any action before the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section
that is  necessary for the commission or the department to exercise, on and after the oper-
ative date specified in subsection (1) of this section any of the duties, functions and powers
conferred on  the commission or the department by sections 3, 4, 6, 7 and 12 to 14 and the
amendments to ORS 468B.300, 468B.340, 468B.345, 468B.355, 468B.360,  468B.365, 468B.385 and
ORS 468B.412 by sections 1, 2, 5, 8, 9, 10, 11 and 15 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 17. The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 18. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[12]