Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 408.235 is amended to read:
408.235. (1) A veteran is eligible to  use the preference provided for in ORS 408.230 for a civil
service position for which application is made at any time after  discharge or release from service
in the Armed Forces.
(2) An individual is treated as a veteran for purposes of the preference  provided for in ORS
408.230 if the individual:
(a) Meets the definition of “veteran”  under ORS 408.225 except for the requirement that the
individual was discharged or released under honorable conditions; and
(b) Submits a  certification to the public employer that the individual is expected to be dis-
charged  or  released from active duty under honorable conditions not later than 120 days after the
submission of the certification.
(3) An individual is treated as a disabled veteran for purposes of the preference provided  for in
ORS 408.230 if the individual:
(a) Meets the definition of “veteran” under ORS 408.225 except  for the requirement that the
individual was discharged or released under honorable conditions; and
(b) Submits a certification to the public employer that the individual is expected to be  medically
separated from active duty under honorable conditions not later than 120 days after  the submission
of the certification.
(4) A veteran must provide evidence of  eligibility for the preference at the time the vet-
eran makes application for the position. Evidence may include federal DD Form  214 or 215
or any other documentation demonstrating preference eligibility.  Failure to provide evidence
at the time of application will disqualify the veteran from requesting  use of the preference
in the public employer’s consideration of the veteran’s application for the position.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2232
HB 2832
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
SECTION 2.
 ORS 408.237 is amended to read:
408.237. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligibility list” means  a list of ranked eligible candidates for a civil service position who
have become eligible for the position through a test or series of  tests and who will be considered
for the civil service position in ranked order.
(b) “Transferable skill” means a skill that a veteran  has obtained through military education or
experience that substantially relates, directly or indirectly, to the civil service  position for which
the veteran is applying.
(2) When an interview is a component of the  selection process for a civil service position or for
an eligibility list for a civil service position, a public employer shall interview each veteran:
(a) Whom  the public employer determines meets the minimum qualifications and special quali-
fications for the civil service position or eligibility list; and
(b) Who submits application materials that the public employer determines  show sufficient evi-
dence that  the veteran has the transferable skills required and requested by the public employer for
the civil service position or eligibility list.
[(3) A public employer is not required to comply with subsection (2) of this section if the employer
conducts interviews  only as part of the process of selecting a candidate for a civil service position from
an eligibility list. ]
(3) If  a public employer does not interview a veteran who applies for a civil service posi-
tion, the public employer shall, within 14 days of the  decision not to interview the veteran,
provide to the veteran a  written explanation of the employer’s reasons for the decision not
to interview the veteran.
(4) A public employer may consult with the Oregon  Military Department and the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs to determine  whether certain military education or experience produces a
transferable skill.
(5) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall provide training to veterans  on how to show evi-
dence of transferable skills in an application for a civil service position or eligibility list.
(6) Violation of subsection (2)  of this section is an unlawful employment practice under ORS
chapter 659A.
(7) A veteran claiming to be aggrieved by a violation of subsection (2) of this  section may file
a complaint under ORS 659A.820.
[2]