Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 1 to 7 of this 2025 Act shall be known and may be cited as the
Born-Alive Infants Protection Act.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 1 to 7 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Abortion” means the use or  prescription of a drug, medicine, instrument or other
substance or device in order to:
(a) Intentionally kill the unborn child of a pregnant person; or
(b) Terminate a person’s pregnancy with a purpose other than:
(A) After viability, to produce a live birth and  preserve the life and health of the child;
or
(B) To remove a dead unborn child.
(2) “Born alive” means the complete  expulsion or extraction of a child from a person at
any stage of the child’s development and after  the expulsion or extraction, the child is
breathing or has a beating heart, pulsation of the  umbilical cord or definite movement of
voluntary muscles, whether the  umbilical cord has been severed or not. Expulsion or ex-
traction may occur by natural or induced labor, cesarean section or induced abortion.
(3) “Health care practitioner” means a person who is  authorized by a health professional
regulatory agency in this state to engage in the practice of a health care discipline.
SECTION 3.
(1) When an abortion or attempted  abortion results in a child born alive, any
health care practitioner who is present at the time the child is born alive shall:
(a) Exercise the same degree of professional skill, care and diligence to  preserve the life
and health of the child that a  reasonably diligent and conscientious health care practitioner
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2482
SB 384
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
would render to any other child born alive at the same gestational age; and
(b) Following the exercise of skill, care and diligence required under paragraph (a)  of this
subsection, if the child was not born  alive in a hospital, ensure that the child born alive is
immediately transported and admitted to  a hospital. If the child was born alive at a hospital,
the health care  practitioner shall continue to exercise the skill, care and diligence required
under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) A health care practitioner or an  employee of a health care clinic where an abortion
or attempted abortion results  in a child born alive and who has knowledge of a violation of
subsection (1)  of this section shall immediately report the violation to a state law enforce-
ment agency.
SECTION 4.
Nothing in sections 1 to 7 of this 2025  Act shall be construed to affirm, deny,
expand or limit any legal status or legal  right of a member of the species Homo sapiens at
any point prior to being born alive.
SECTION 5. (1) A person who knowingly or recklessly violates  section 3 (1) of this 2025
Act shall be guilty of the crime of failure to exercise proper standard of care.
(2) Failure to exercise proper standard of care is a Class C felony.
(3) The person whose  pregnancy was terminated or attempted to be terminated may not
be prosecuted for a violation of section 3 (1) of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
(1) A  person whose pregnancy was terminated or attempted to be terminated
may maintain a civil action against a person who knowingly or recklessly violates section 3
(1) of this 2025 Act for damages and equitable relief.
(2)(a) A court shall award attorney fees to a plaintiff who  prevails in an action described
in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) A court shall award attorney fees to a defendant against whom an action  described
in subsection (1) of this section is brought if the action is  not successful and the court de-
termines that the action is frivolous or was brought in bad faith.
(3) A civil action  for violation of section 3 (1) of this 2025 Act may not be maintained
against a person whose pregnancy was terminated or attempted to be terminated.
SECTION 7. (1) In an action brought under section 6 of this 2025 Act, the court shall rule,
either by the court’s  own motion or that of a party, whether the identity or any personally
identifiable information of the plaintiff should be exempt from disclosure, unless the plaintiff
consents in a signed writing to the disclosure  of the plaintiff’s identity or personally iden-
tifiable information.
(2) If the court  determines, under subsection (1) of this section, that the plaintiff’s
identity or any personally identifiable information of the plaintiff should be exempt from
disclosure, the court  shall issue orders to the parties, witnesses and counsel regarding the
protection from disclosure  and shall direct that the court record be sealed and that the
proceedings be closed to the public  to the extent necessary to protect from disclosure the
plaintiff’s identity or personally identifiable information.
(3) An order issued under this section must include written findings explaining:
(a) Why the plaintiff’s identity or personally identifiable information should be protected
from disclosure;
(b) Why the order is necessary to protect the plaintiff’s  identity or personally identifiable
information from disclosure;
(c) How the order is narrowly tailored to achieve protection from disclosure; and
[2]
SB 384
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
(d) Why no reasonable less restrictive alternative means exist  to ensure protection from
disclosure.
(4) This section may not be construed to  prevent the disclosure of the identity of the
plaintiff or of witnesses to the defendant or defendant’s counsel.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 174.100 is amended to read:
174.100. As used in the statute laws of this state, unless the context or a specially  applicable
definition requires otherwise:
(1) “Any other state” includes any state and the District of Columbia.
(2) “City” includes any incorporated village or town.
(3) “County court” includes board of county commissioners.
(4) “Gender  identity” means an individual’s gender-related identity, appearance, expression or
behavior, regardless of whether the identity, appearance, expression  or behavior differs from that
associated with the gender assigned to the individual at birth.
(5) “Husband and wife,” “husband or wife,” “husband” or “wife” means spouses or a spouse in
a marriage.
(6) “Individual” includes an infant member of  the species Homo sapiens who is born alive,
as described in section 2 of this 2025 Act, at any stage of the member’s development.
[(6)] (7) “May not” and “shall not” are equivalent expressions of an absolute prohibition.
[(7)] (8)  “Person” includes individuals, corporations,  associations, firms, partnerships, limited li-
ability companies and joint stock companies.
[(8)] (9)  “Sexual orientation” means an individual’s actual or  perceived heterosexuality,
homosexuality or bisexuality.
[(9)] (10) “State Treasury” includes those financial assets the lawful  custody of which are vested
in the  State Treasurer and the office of the State Treasurer relating to the custody of those financial
assets.
[(10)] (11)  “To” means “to and including” when used in a reference to a series of statute
sections, subsections or paragraphs.
[(11)] (12) “United States” includes territories, outlying possessions and the District of Columbia.
[(12)] (13) “Violate” includes failure to comply.
SECTION 9.
Sections 1 to 7 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS  174.100 by sec-
tion 8 of this 2025 Act apply to abortions performed or attempted on or after the effective
date of this 2025 Act.
[3]