Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 161.370 is amended to read:
161.370. (1)(a) When the defendant’s fitness to  proceed is drawn in question, the issue shall be
determined by the court.
(b) If neither the prosecuting attorney nor counsel for the defendant contests the finding of the
report filed under  ORS 161.365, the court may make the determination on the basis of the report.
If the finding  is contested, the court shall hold a hearing on the issue. If the report is received in
evidence in the hearing, the party who contests the finding has the right to summon and to  cross-
examine any certified evaluator who submitted the  report and to offer evidence upon the issue.
Other evidence regarding the defendant’s fitness to proceed may be introduced by either party.
(2)(a) If the court determines that the defendant lacks fitness to proceed, the criminal proceeding
against the defendant shall be suspended and the court shall proceed  in accordance with this sub-
section.
(b) After making the determination under  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the court shall re-
ceive a recommendation from a community mental health program  director or the director’s
designee, and from any local entity that would  be responsible for treating the defendant if the de-
fendant were to be released  in the community, concerning whether appropriate community restora-
tion services are present and available in the community.
(c) If the parties agree as to the appropriate action  under this section, the court may, after
making all findings required by law, enter any order authorized by this section. If the parties  do not
agree as to the appropriate action,  the court and the parties shall, at a hearing, consider an ap-
propriate action in the case, and the court shall make a determination and enter  an order necessary
to implement  the action. In determining the appropriate action, the court shall consider the primary
and secondary release criteria as defined in ORS 135.230, the least restrictive  option appropriate for
the defendant, the needs of the defendant and the interests of justice. Actions  may include but are
not limited to:
(A) Commitment for the defendant to gain or regain fitness to proceed  under subsection (3) or
(4) of this section;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2201
HB 3058
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) An order to engage in community restoration services,  as recommended by the community
mental health program director or designee, under subsection (6) of this section;
(C) Commencement of a civil commitment proceeding under ORS 426.070 to 426.170,  426.701 or
427.235 to 427.292;
(D) Commencement of protective proceedings under ORS chapter 125; or
(E) Dismissal of the charges pursuant to ORS 135.755 and in accordance with ORS 161.367 (6).
(d) If the court, while considering or ordering an appropriate  action under this subsection, does
not order the defendant committed to a state mental hospital or other facility, but  finds that ap-
propriate community restoration  services are not present and available in the community, for any
defendant remaining in custody  after such determination, the court shall set a review hearing seven
days from the date of the determination under paragraph  (a) of this subsection. At the review
hearing, the court shall consider all relevant information and determine if commitment  to the state
mental hospital or other  facility is appropriate under subsection (3) or (4) of this section, or if an-
other action described in  paragraph (c) of this subsection is appropriate. At the conclusion of the
hearing the court shall enter an order in accordance with the defendant’s constitutional rights  to
due process.
(e) If the court determines that the appropriate action in the case is  an order for the defendant
to engage in community restoration  services, but the defendant has a pending criminal case, warrant
or hold in one or more other jurisdictions,  the other jurisdictions shall, within two judicial days of
becoming aware of the proceeding under this section, communicate with the court and the  other
jurisdictions, if applicable, to develop a plan  to address the interests of all jurisdictions in the de-
fendant in a timely manner.
(3)(a) If the most serious offense in the charging instrument  is a felony, the court shall commit
the defendant to the custody of the superintendent of a state  mental hospital or director of a facility
designated by the Oregon Health Authority if the defendant is at least 18 years of age, or to the
custody of the director of a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by the  author-
ity if the defendant is under 18 years of age, if the court makes the following findings:
(A) The defendant requires a  hospital level of care due to public safety concerns if the defendant
is not hospitalized or in custody or the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying  mental
disorder; and
(B) Based on the findings resulting from a consultation described in ORS 161.365 (1),  if applica-
ble, from any information provided by community-based mental health providers or any other
sources, and primary and secondary release criteria as defined in ORS 135.230, the appropriate
community restoration services are not present and available in the community.
(b) If the defendant is committed under this subsection[ ,]:
(A) The  community mental health program director, or director’s designee, shall at regular in-
tervals, during  any period of commitment, review available community restoration services and
maintain communication with the defendant and the superintendent of the state mental hospital  or
director of the facility in order to facilitate an efficient transition to treatment in the  community
when ordered.
(B) The court shall additionally make a finding as to whether  the defendant is dangerous.
For purposes of this section, “dangerous” means that there is a substantial risk that physical
harm will be inflicted by the defendant  upon the defendant’s self or another person, based
upon historical patterns of behavior as those patterns relate to the current  risk of harm. A
finding of dangerousness under this subparagraph does  not require that the defendant pres-
[2]
HB 3058
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ent an imminent risk of harm. If the court finds that the defendant is  dangerous, the finding
may be considered by  a mental health or other medical provider when determining whether
medications may be administered involuntarily to the defendant.
(c) If the  court does not order the commitment of the defendant under this subsection, the court
shall proceed in accordance with subsection (2)(c) of this section to determine  and order an appro-
priate action other than commitment.
(4)(a) If the most serious offense in the charging instrument is a  misdemeanor, the court may
not commit the defendant to the custody of the superintendent of a state mental hospital or  director
of a facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority if the defendant is at least  18 years of age,
or to the  custody of the director of a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by
the authority if the defendant is under 18 years of age, unless the court:
(A)(i) Receives  a recommendation from a certified evaluator that the defendant requires a hos-
pital level of care due to the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder; and
(ii) Receives a recommendation from a community mental health program director,  or director’s
designee, that  the appropriate community restoration services are not present and available in the
community; or
(B) Determines that the defendant  requires a hospital level of care after making all of the fol-
lowing written findings:
(i) The defendant needs a  hospital level of care due to the acuity of the symptoms of the
defendant’s qualifying mental disorder;
(ii) There are public safety concerns; and
(iii) The appropriate community restoration services  are not present and available in the com-
munity.
(b) If at the time of determining the appropriate action  for the case, the court is considering
commitment under paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection and:
(A) Has not received a recommendation from a  certified evaluator as to whether the defendant
requires a hospital level of care due to the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental
disorder, the court shall order a certified evaluator to make such a recommendation.
(B) Has not received a recommendation from the community mental health program  director or
designee concerning whether appropriate community restoration services are  present and available
in the community, the court shall order the director or designee to make such a recommendation.
(c) If the  court does not order the commitment of the defendant under this subsection, the court
shall proceed in accordance with  subsection (2)(c) of this section to determine and order an appro-
priate action other than commitment.
(d) If the defendant is committed under this subsection[ ,]:
(A) The  community mental health program director, or director’s designee, shall at regular in-
tervals, during  any period of commitment, review available community restoration services and
maintain communication with the defendant and the superintendent of the state mental hospital  or
director of the facility in order to facilitate an efficient transition to treatment in the  community
when ordered.
(B) The court shall additionally make a  finding as to whether the defendant is dangerous
as described in subsection (3)(b)(B) of this section.
(5) If the most serious offense in the charging  instrument is a violation, the court may not
commit the defendant to the custody of the superintendent of a state mental hospital  or director of
a facility designated  by the Oregon Health Authority if the defendant is at least 18 years of age,
[3]
HB 3058
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
or to the custody of the director of a secure intensive community inpatient facility  designated by
the authority if the defendant is under 18 years of age.
(6)(a) If the court does not order the commitment of the defendant under subsection (3) or  (4)
of this section, if commitment is precluded under subsection (5) of this section or if the  court de-
termines that care other than commitment would better serve the defendant and the community, the
court shall release the defendant, pursuant to an order that  the defendant engage in community
restoration services, until the defendant has gained or regained  fitness to proceed, or until the court
finds there is no substantial  probability that the defendant will, within the foreseeable future, gain
or regain fitness to proceed. The  court may not order the defendant to engage in community resto-
ration services in another county without permission from the other county.
(b) The court may order  a community mental health program director coordinating the
defendant’s treatment in  the community to provide the court with status reports on the defendant’s
progress in gaining or regaining fitness to proceed. The director shall  provide a status report if the
defendant is not complying with court-ordered restoration services.
(c) A community mental health program director coordinating the defendant’s treatment in the
community shall notify the court if the defendant gains or regains fitness to proceed.  The notice
shall be filed with the  court and may be filed electronically. The clerk of the court shall cause
copies of the notice to be delivered to both the district attorney and the counsel for the defendant.
(d) When a defendant is ordered to engage in community restoration  services under this sub-
section, the court may place conditions that the court deems appropriate on the  release, including
the requirement that the defendant regularly report to a state  mental hospital or a certified evalu-
ator for examination to determine if the defendant has gained or regained fitness to proceed.
(7) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule standards  for the recommendation pro-
vided to the court described in subsection (2) of this section.
[4]