Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. (1) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income any amount that
is paid by the taxpayer during the tax year that is incurred as  premiums for medical, dental
or vision insurance coverage  for an individual who is a dependent of the taxpayer and who
at the close of the tax year is a qualifying child in relation to the taxpayer, as defined  in
section 152(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) In order to claim a subtraction  under this section, the taxpayer must properly report
on the  taxpayer’s federal income tax return adjusted gross income that is at least $90,000
but not more than $150,000, if reported on  a joint return, or at least $45,000 but not more
than $75,000, if reported on any other type of return.
(3) A subtraction under this section:
(a) May not exceed $10,000 per qualifying child dependent of the taxpayer; and
(b) Is not allowed for any amount described in subsection (1) of this section that is taken
into account as a deduction or credit on an income tax return  of the taxpayer, whether state
or federal, for any tax year.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4135