Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 433.318 is amended to read:
433.318. (1) As used in this section, “birthing facility” means a  health care facility, as defined
in ORS 442.015, that provides services related to the delivery of newborns.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules requiring  birthing facilities located in this
state to perform [ a pulse oximetry screening ] on each newborn delivered at the birthing facility  be-
fore discharging the newborn :
(a) A pulse oximetry screening; and
(b) A test for the detection of spinal muscular atrophy .
SECTION 2.
(1) The amendments to ORS 433.318 by  section 1 of this 2021 Act apply to
newborns delivered on or after January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section to enable the authority to exercise, on  and after the opera-
tive date specified in subsection (1) of  this section, all of the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the authority by the amendments to ORS 433.318 by section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3331