Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Add-on” means a payment made  to a residential care facility, in addition to the base
rate, for the residential care provided to a resident  that is assessed to require a higher level
of care or services.
(b) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “Residential care” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.400.
(d) “Residential care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.400.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall  establish payment rates to reimburse the
cost of residential care provided to medical assistance recipients as follows:
(a) A  base rate that is no less than the amount paid to an assisted living facility for a
resident who is assessed at a level 3 need for care.
(b) For a resident who qualifies for one add-on, an  amount that is no less than the
amount paid to an assisted living facility for a resident who is assessed at a level 4 need  for
care.
(c) For a resident who qualifies for two add-ons,  an amount that is no less than the
amount paid to an assisted living facility for a resident who is assessed at a level 5 need  for
care.
(d) For a resident who qualifies for three add-ons, an amount, as determined by the  de-
partment in collaboration with stakeholders, that is sufficient to provide high-quality care
and meet the service needs of the resident.
(3) The department may adopt rules necessary to  carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on June 30, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1139