Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 734.110 to
734.440.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Federal home  loan bank” has the definition given that term in 12 U.S.C. 1422, as in
effect on the effective date of this 2021 Act.
(b) “Insurer-member” means an insurer that is a member of a federal home loan bank.
(2) Notwithstanding requirements  for a form of claim against an insurer that are set
forth in ORS 734.280 and notwithstanding the priority of preferred claims against an  insurer
that are specified in ORS 734.290, of special deposit claims  against an insurer that are spec-
ified in ORS 734.300 or of secured claims against an insurer that are  specified in ORS 734.310:
(a) A court may  not stay or prohibit a federal home loan bank from exercising the federal
home loan bank’s rights with respect to collateral that an insurer-member has pledged; and
(b) A receiver shall comply with the provisions of this section with respect to:
(A) The federal home loan bank’s rights in connection with an insurer-member; and
(B) Claims against an insurer-member.
(3) A federal home  loan bank that exercises a right with respect to collateral pledged by
an insurer-member that is subject to a  delinquency proceeding shall repurchase any out-
standing capital stock that exceeds the amount of the federal home  loan bank’s stock that
the insurer-member  must hold as a minimum investment if the federal home loan bank de-
termines in good faith that the repurchase is:
(a) Permissible under applicable laws, regulations,  regulatory obligations and the federal
home loan bank’s capital plan; and
(b) Consistent with  the current capital stock practices the federal home loan bank applies
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3529
HB 3340
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
to the entire membership of the federal home loan bank.
(4) After the appointment of a receiver  for an insurer-member, a federal home loan bank,
within 10 business days  after a request from the receiver, shall establish a process and
timeline for:
(a) Releasing collateral that, under the terms of applicable  agreements between the fed-
eral home loan bank and the  insurer-member, exceeds the amount required to support obli-
gations that remain after repaying loans;
(b) Releasing any of  the insurer-member’s collateral that remains in the federal home
loan bank’s possession after payment in full of all of the insurer-member’s outstanding obli-
gations;
(c) Paying fees the insurer-member owes  and operating the insurer-member’s deposits
and accounts with the federal home loan bank; and
(d) Redeeming or repurchasing federal home loan bank stock or excess  stock of any class
that an insurer-member must own.
(5) A federal home loan bank, at a receiver’s request, shall provide any available oppor-
tunities that may exist  for an insurer-member that is subject to a delinquency proceeding
to renew or restructure a loan to defer prepayment fees, with due regard for:
(a) Market conditions;
(b) The terms of any loans to the insurer-member that are outstanding;
(c) Applicable policies of the federal home loan bank; and
(d) The federal home loan bank’s compliance with federal laws and regulations.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 734.350 and except as provided in paragraph  (b) of this sub-
section, a receiver for an  insurer-member, including the Director of the Department of
Consumer and Business Services, may not void any transfer of, or obligation  to transfer,
moneys or property that occurs or arises under or in connection with:
(A) A federal home loan bank security agreement;
(B) A pledge, security, collateral or guarantee agreement; or
(C) Any other similar  arrangement or credit enhancement that relates to a federal home
loan bank security agreement made  in the ordinary course of business and in compliance
with the applicable federal home loan bank agreement.
(b) A receiver may  void a transfer if the transfer was made with an intent to hinder,
delay or defraud the insurer-member, the receiver or existing or future creditors.
(c) This subsection does not affect a receiver’s rights  under 12 C.F.R. part 1266.4, as in
effect on the effective  date of this 2021 Act, with respect to advances to an insurer-member
that is subject to a delinquency proceeding.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2021  Act applies to delinquency proceedings that begin on
or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]