Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 319.950 is amended to read:
319.950. (1) The governing body of a city, county or other local government may enact  or amend
any charter provision, ordinance, resolution or  other provision taxing fuel for motor vehicles [ after
submitting the proposed tax to the electors of the local government for their approval ].
(2) The governing body of a local government that imposes a  tax on fuel for motor vehicles
pursuant to this section may enter into  an intergovernmental agreement under ORS 190.010 with the
Department of Transportation pursuant to which the department shall collect and distribute the re-
venues from the tax.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 801.041 is amended to read:
801.041. The following apply to the authority granted to counties by ORS 801.040  to establish
registration fees for vehicles:
(1) An ordinance establishing registration fees under this section must be enacted by the  county
imposing the registration fee and filed with the Department of Transportation. Notwithstanding
ORS 203.055 or any provision of a county charter, the governing body of a  county [ with a population
of 350,000 or more ] may enact an ordinance  establishing registration fees. [ The governing body of a
county with  a population of less than 350,000 may enact an ordinance establishing registration fees
after submitting the ordinance to the electors of the county for their approval. ] The governing body  of
the county imposing the registration  fee shall enter into an intergovernmental agreement under ORS
190.010 with the department by which the department  shall collect the registration fees, pay them
over to the county and, if necessary, allow the credit or credits described in  ORS 803.445 (5). The
intergovernmental agreement must  state the date on which the department shall begin collecting
registration fees for the county.
(2) The  authority granted by this section allows the establishment of registration fees in addition
to those described in ORS 803.420 and 803.422. There  is no authority under this section to affect
registration periods, qualifications, cards, plates, requirements or any other provision  relating to
vehicle registration under the vehicle code.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1359
SB 687
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
(3) Except  as otherwise provided for in this subsection, when registration fees are imposed under
this section, they must  be imposed on all vehicle classes. Registration fees as provided under this
section may not be imposed on the following:
(a) Snowmobiles and Class I all-terrain vehicles.
(b) Fixed load vehicles.
(c) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.100 to disabled veterans.
(d) Vehicles registered as antique vehicles under ORS 805.010.
(e) Vehicles registered as vehicles of special interest under ORS 805.020.
(f) Government-owned or operated vehicles registered under ORS 805.040 or 805.045.
(g) School buses or school activity vehicles registered under ORS 805.050.
(h) Law enforcement undercover vehicles registered under ORS 805.060.
(i) Vehicles registered on a proportional basis for interstate operation.
(j) Vehicles with a registration weight of 26,001 pounds or more described  in ORS 803.420 (14)(a)
or (b).
(k) Vehicles registered as farm vehicles under the provisions of ORS 805.300.
(L) Travel trailers, campers and motor homes.
(m) Vehicles registered to an employment address as provided in ORS 802.250  when the eligible
public employee  or household member’s residence address is not within the county of the employ-
ment address. The department may adopt rules it considers necessary for the administration of  this
paragraph.
(n) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.110 to former prisoners of war.
(4) Any registration fee imposed by a county must be a fixed amount not  to exceed, with respect
to any vehicle class, the sum of the registration fee established under ORS 803.420 (6)(a) and the  fee
applicable to the registered vehicle under ORS 803.422. For vehicles  on which a flat fee is imposed
under ORS 803.420, the fee must be a whole dollar amount.
(5) Moneys from registration fees established under this section must  be paid to the county es-
tablishing the registration fees as provided in ORS 802.110.
(6) Except  as provided in ORS 801.044, or unless a different distribution is agreed upon by the
county and the cities within the jurisdiction of the  county, the county ordinance shall provide for
payment of at least 40 percent of the  moneys from registration fees established under this section
to cities within the county.
(7) The moneys for the cities and the county shall be used for any purpose for which  moneys
from registration fees may be used, including the payment of debt service and costs  related to bonds
or other obligations issued for such purposes.
(8) Two  or more counties may act jointly to impose a registration fee under this section. The
ordinance of each county acting jointly with another under  this subsection must provide for the
distribution of moneys collected through a joint registration fee.
[2]