Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 163A.105 is amended to read:
163A.105. (1) When a person convicted of a crime described in ORS 163.355 to  163.427 is sen-
tenced to a term of imprisonment in a Department of Corrections  institution for that crime, the
State Board of  Parole and Post-Prison Supervision shall assess the person utilizing the risk assess-
ment methodology described in ORS  163A.100. The board shall apply the results of the assessment
to place  the person in one of the levels described in ORS 163A.100 before the person is released from
custody.
(2) When a person convicted of a sex crime is sentenced to a term of incarceration in a  jail, or
is discharged, released or placed on probation by the court, the supervisory authority as  defined in
ORS 144.087 shall assess the person utilizing the risk assessment methodology described  in ORS
163A.100 and apply the results of the assessment to place the person in  one of the levels described
in ORS 163A.100 no later than 90 days  after the person is released from jail or discharged, released
or placed on probation by the court.
(3)(a) When a person is found guilty except for insanity of  a sex crime, the Psychiatric Security
Review Board shall assess the person utilizing the risk assessment methodology described in ORS
163A.100 and apply the results of the assessment to place the person in  one of the levels described
in ORS 163A.100 no later than 90 days after the person is:
(A) Placed on conditional release by the Psychiatric Security Review Board;
(B) Discharged from the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric Security Review Board;
(C) Placed on conditional release by the court pursuant to ORS 161.327; or
(D) Discharged by the court pursuant to ORS 161.329.
(b) If  the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision previously completed a risk as-
sessment and  assigned a classification level described in ORS 163A.100 for a person described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the Psychiatric  Security Review Board need not complete a reas-
sessment for an initial classification.
(c) The court shall notify the Psychiatric Security  Review Board when the court conditionally
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4575
SB 1068
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
releases or discharges a person described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d) The Psychiatric Security Review Board shall notify the  State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision no later than seven days after the Psychiatric  Security Review Board condi-
tionally releases or discharges a  person who has a prior sex crime conviction that obligates the
person to report as a sex offender, unless the person has also been found guilty except  for insanity
of a sex crime that obligates the person to report as a sex offender.
(4)(a) Within 90 days after receiving notice of  a person’s obligation to report in this state from
the Department of State Police, the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision  shall [ assess
the person utilizing the risk assessment methodology described  in ORS 163A.100 and apply the results
of the assessment to ] place the person in one of the  levels described in ORS 163A.100  as described
in paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection  if the person  has been convicted in another United
States court of a crime:
(A) That would constitute a sex crime if committed in this state; or
(B) For which the person would have  to register as a sex offender in that court’s jurisdiction,
or as required under federal law, regardless of whether the crime would  constitute a sex crime in
this state.
(b) If the other court’s jurisdiction uses sex offender risk assessments and  the person
has previously been placed in a risk level in that jurisdiction, the board shall place the person
in the level described  in ORS 163A.100 that either corresponds to or most closely resembles
the person’s previous risk level in the other jurisdiction.
(c) If the other court’s jurisdiction does not use a sex offender risk assessment  or if the
person has not previously been placed in a risk level in the other  jurisdiction, the board shall
assess the person utilizing the  risk assessment methodology described in ORS 163A.100 and
apply the results of the assessment  to place the person in one of the levels described in ORS
163A.100.
[(b)] (5)  If a person has been convicted  of a sex crime and was sentenced to a term of
imprisonment in a Department  of Corrections institution for that sex crime, but was not subjected
to a  risk assessment utilizing the risk assessment methodology described in ORS 163A.100 before
release under subsection (1) of this  section, within 90 days after the person’s release the State Board
of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision shall assess the person utilizing the risk  assessment method-
ology described in ORS 163A.100 and apply the results  of the assessment to place the person in one
of the levels described in ORS 163A.100.
[(5)] (6)  When the State Board of  Parole and Post-Prison Supervision, the Psychiatric Security
Review Board or a supervisory authority [ applies the results of a risk  assessment to place ] places a
person in one of the levels described in ORS 163A.100, the agency shall notify the Department of
State Police of the results of the risk assessment within  three business days after the agency’s
classification. Upon receipt, the Department of State Police shall enter the  results of the risk as-
sessment into the Law Enforcement Data System.
[(6)] (7) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision, the Psychiatric Security Review
Board or a supervisory authority may reassess or reclassify a person placed in one of  the levels
described in ORS 163A.100 under this section if the classifying board or  authority determines that
a factual mistake caused an erroneous assessment or classification.
[(7)(a)] (8)(a)  A person classified under this section as a level two or level three sex offender
as described in ORS 163A.100 may petition the  classifying board or authority for review. Except for
good cause shown, the petition may be filed no later than 60 days after the notice of the classifica-
[2]
SB 1068
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
tion is provided to the person or, if the notice is mailed, no  later than 60 days after the notice is
sent.
(b) When good cause is shown, the time for filing  a petition under this subsection may not be
extended more than 60 days beyond the  date of the person’s next annual report under ORS 163A.010,
163A.015 or 163A.020.
(c) Upon receipt of a petition described in this subsection, the classifying board or authority
shall afford the person an opportunity to be heard as to all factual questions related to the  classi-
fication.  If the person has been classified under  subsection (4)(b) of this section, the person
must be heard on the issue of whether the risk  level described in ORS 163A.100 into which
the person was  placed corresponds to or most closely resembles the person’s previous risk
level in the other jurisdiction.
(d) After providing the person with notice and an opportunity  to be heard in accordance with
this subsection,  the board or authority shall classify the person in accordance with the classifica-
tions described in ORS 163A.100, based on all of the information available to the classifying  board
or authority.
(e) As used in this subsection, “good cause” means that, due to a person’s transience, lack  of
housing, ongoing mental health concerns  or other similar circumstances, a notice mailed to the
person under paragraph (a) of this subsection was not received by the person.
[(8)(a)] (9)(a)  If the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision, the Psychiatric Security
Review Board or a supervisory authority  does not classify a person under ORS 163A.100 because the
person has failed or refused to participate in a  sex offender risk assessment as directed by the board
or authority, the classifying board or authority  shall classify the person as a level three sex offender
under ORS 163A.100 (3).
(b) If person classified as a level three sex offender under this subsection notifies  the classifying
board or authority of the willingness to participate in a sex offender risk assessment,  the classifying
board or authority shall perform the assessment  and classify the person in one of the levels de-
scribed in ORS 163A.100.
[(9)] (10)  The State Board of Parole and  Post-Prison Supervision and the Psychiatric Security
Review Board may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
[3]