Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 161.067 is amended to read:
161.067. (1) When the same conduct or criminal episode violates two  or more statutory pro-
visions and each provision requires  proof of an element that the others do not, there are as many
separately punishable offenses as there are separate statutory violations.
(2) When the same conduct or criminal episode, though violating only one statutory  provision
involves two or more victims, there are as many separately punishable offenses  as there are victims.
However, two or more persons owning  joint interests in real or personal property shall be consid-
ered a single victim for purposes of determining the number of  separately punishable offenses if the
property is the subject of one of the following crimes:
(a) Theft as defined in ORS 164.015.
(b) Unauthorized use of a vehicle as defined in ORS 164.135.
(c) Criminal possession of rented or leased personal property as defined in ORS 164.140.
(d) Criminal possession of a rented or leased motor vehicle as defined in ORS 164.138.
(e) Burglary as defined in ORS 164.215 or 164.225.
(f) Criminal trespass as defined in ORS 164.243, 164.245, 164.255, 164.265 or 164.278.
(g) Arson and related offenses as defined in ORS 164.315, 164.325 or 164.335.
(h) Forgery and related offenses as defined in ORS 165.002 to 165.070.
(3) When the same conduct or criminal episode  violates only one statutory provision and in-
volves only one victim, but nevertheless involves repeated violations of  the same statutory provision
against the same victim, there are as many separately  punishable offenses as there are violations,
except that each violation,  to be separately punishable under this subsection, must be separated
from other such violations by a sufficient  pause in the defendant’s criminal conduct to afford the
defendant an opportunity to renounce the criminal intent. Each method of engaging  in oral or anal
sexual intercourse as defined in  ORS 163.305, and each method of engaging in unlawful sexual pen-
etration as defined in ORS 163.408 and 163.411 shall constitute separate  violations of their respec-
tive statutory provisions for purposes of determining the number of statutory violations.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, each  firearm possessed in violation of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2495
HB 3443
1
2
3
4
5
ORS 166.270 constitutes a separately punishable offense, regardless  of whether the pos-
sessions occurred as part of the same conduct or criminal episode.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 161.067 by section 1 of this 2025 Act  apply to con-
duct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[2]