Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Higher Education Behavioral Health Workforce  Expansion Fund. All
moneys in the Higher Education Behavioral  Health Workforce Expansion Fund are contin-
uously appropriated to the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission for purposes of car-
rying out section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  administer the fund established
under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2. (1) The Higher Education Behavioral Health  Workforce Expansion Fund es-
tablished under section 1 of this 2025 Act consists of:
(a) Moneys transferred to the fund by  the federal government, other state agencies or
local governments.
(b) Moneys transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission.
(c) Gifts, grants and donations from public or private sources.
(d) Interest and other earnings on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund established under section 1 of this 2025 Act shall  be used for ex-
panding the training, employment and  retention of graduate-level providers and other certi-
fied and licensed professionals in the behavioral  health care workforce who can provide
culturally responsive behavioral health services to:
(a) Members of the federally recognized Indian tribes in this state;
(b) Persons of color;
(c) Lesbian, gay, bisexual and transgender youth;
(d) Veterans;
(e) Individuals with disabilities;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 909
HB 3129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) Individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities;
(g) Individuals with limited proficiency in the English language;
(h) Individuals working in correctional facilities; and
(i) Individuals in other underserved communities.
(3) The  commission shall distribute moneys from the fund established under section 1 of
this 2025 Act to community colleges operated under ORS chapter 341, private universities in
this state and the public universities listed in ORS  352.002 to implement programs at those
institutions that will expand the number of professionals working in organizations that  de-
liver publicly funded behavioral health services.
(4) Funds received by colleges and  universities under subsection (3) of this section may
be used to:
(a) Hire and retain behavioral health faculty;
(b) Provide scholarships or stipends to students to enroll in programs  that lead to a ca-
reer in behavioral health;
(c) Pay for costs associated with expanding existing academic  programs for behavioral
health;
(d) Pay for costs, including accreditation costs, associated with developing new behavioral
health programs;
(e) Provide bonuses and stipends for  supervisors of interns in the field of behavioral
health; and
(f) Pay for costs related to licensing or certification examination  preparation in behav-
ioral health.
(5) The commission shall distribute moneys from the fund  each biennium to each insti-
tution based on  a distribution formula determined by the commission by rule. To assist the
commission in determining the  formula under this subsection, the commission shall establish
an advisory group that includes representatives of:
(a) Public universities;
(b) Community colleges;
(c) County mental health programs; and
(d) Other behavioral health employers.
(6) To receive a scholarship or stipend under subsection (4) of this section, a student
must be enrolled in a program to receive a health care certificate or license as:
(a) A licensed psychologist, as that term is defined in ORS 675.010;
(b) A clinical social worker licensed under ORS 675.530;
(c) A master’s social worker licensed under ORS 675.533;
(d) A clinical social work associate certified under ORS 675.537;
(e) A licensed marriage and family therapist, as that term is defined in ORS 675.705;
(f) A licensed professional counselor, as that term is defined in ORS 675.705;
(g) A mental health or  substance abuse treatment provider, as that term is defined in
ORS 443.004; or
(h) Any other behavioral health provider determined by the commission by rule.
(7) The commission may adopt rules to administer this section.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $17,900,000, which shall  be transferred to the
[2]
HB 3129
1
2
3
4
5
6
Higher Education Behavioral Health Workforce Expansion Fund to carry out section 2 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]