Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall provide a grant to an
organization that manages a statewide coordinated strategy to re-enroll residents of  this
state who have some college education, and no  credential, into public higher education, ap-
prenticeship and workforce training programs. The  strategy must include data analytics,
multichannel marketing, live professional coaching and a platform-based user experience.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  for purposes of providing the  grant
required under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2813