Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 8 of this 2017  Act are added to and made a part of ORS 293.701
to 293.857.
SECTION 2. Oregon Investment Department established; Chief Executive Officer;  ap-
pointment; rules; fees.  (1) The Oregon Investment Department is established.
(2) The department shall be under the supervision of a  Chief Executive Officer appointed
by the  Oregon Investment Council. The Chief Executive Officer of the Oregon Investment
Department serves at the pleasure of the council and shall be paid a salary as prescribed  by
the council.
(3) Before assuming the duties of the office, the Chief Executive Officer shall:
(a) Give to the state a fidelity  bond, with one or more corporate sureties authorized to
do business in this state, in a penal sum prescribed by the Director of  the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services, but not less than $50,000. The premium for the bond shall
be paid by the Oregon Investment Department.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 783
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Subscribe to  an oath that the Chief Executive Officer will faithfully and impartially
discharge the duties of the office and that the Chief  Executive Officer will support the Con-
stitution of the United  States and the Constitution of the State of Oregon. The Chief Exec-
utive Officer shall file a copy of the signed oath with the Secretary of State.
(4) The Chief Executive Officer has the powers necessary to carry out the duties of the
department, subject  to policy direction or approval of the council as provided in sections 2
to 8 of this 2017 Act, including but not limited to the power to employ, supervise  and termi-
nate the employment of department staff as the Chief Executive  Officer considers necessary.
The Chief Executive Officer, subject  to ORS chapter 180, shall prescribe the duties and fix
the compensation of the department’s employees, in  accordance with the personnel policies
adopted by the department.
(5) The Chief Executive Officer shall establish an Executive  Office for the department.
The Executive Office shall produce an investment  plan for the department, facilitate dis-
cussions with stakeholders and the  public on topics relating to the investment of the in-
vestment funds, communicate  with the Legislative Assembly and the public regarding the
activities of the department  and assume such other duties as assigned by the Chief Executive
Officer.
(6) The department may adopt rules to carry out its duties, including  but not limited to
rules regarding:
(a) Administration;
(b) Contracting;
(c) Enforcement; and
(d) Fees and charges.
SECTION 3.
Powers and duties of the Oregon Investment Department.  (1) The Oregon
Investment Department shall exercise and  carry out statewide all the powers, rights and
privileges that are expressly conferred upon the  department, are implied by law or are inci-
dent to such powers. Except as provided in ORS  293.701 to 293.857, nothing in ORS 293.701
to 293.857 is intended to affect the powers and duties of the State Treasurer otherwise pro-
vided by law or under the Oregon Constitution.
(2) The mission of the department is to invest the investment funds and any other mon-
eys the department is charged by law with investing.
(3) In addition to any other powers and duties granted by law, the department may:
(a) Invest and reinvest  moneys in the investment funds or any other moneys the de-
partment is charged  by law with investing, except that the moneys deposited in the Oregon
Short Term Fund under ORS 293.701 (2)(n) shall  be invested by the State Treasurer or, at the
request of the  State Treasurer, by the department. In furtherance of the investing, the de-
partment may acquire, retain, manage and dispose of as investments  every kind of invest-
ment that persons of prudence, discretion and intelligence acquire, retain,  manage and
dispose of for their own financial interest.
(b) Enter into contracts  and acquire, hold, own, encumber, issue, replace, deal in and
with and dispose of real and personal property for the department’s own proprietary interest.
(c) Except as provided in ORS  chapter 180, employ persons as the department or the
Oregon Investment Council determines necessary or desirable to carry out the mission  and
powers of the department.
(d) Subject to ORS chapter  180, enter into contracts with advisors, service providers or
[2]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
others as the department determines necessary or desirable to carry out its  mission and
powers, including but not limited to entering into contracts with  one or more persons who
may, in lieu of or  in addition to the department, perform discretionary investment manage-
ment or other functions to the extent provided in the contract.
(e) Collect the principal and interest or other income of  investments when due and pay-
able, and shall pay  the principal and interest or other income, when so collected, into the
appropriate fund. Except as otherwise provided by law, interest or other income of the funds
invested for state agencies shall be paid  into the General Fund as provided in ORS 293.140
to be available for the payment of general governmental expenses.
(f) Exercise any shareholder or other voting rights in connection with an investment.
(g) For  and on behalf of the Public Employees Retirement System and the Public Em-
ployees Retirement Board, enter into  group annuity contracts with one or more insurance
companies authorized to do business in this state. In lieu of  any investment of moneys in the
Public Employees Retirement Fund, the department may make  payments from time to time
under such  annuity contracts using any moneys in that fund available for investment pur-
poses.
(4) In the event of a default, breach or  impairment of the payment of amounts due or
other obligations related to  an investment, or if the department determines it is otherwise
appropriate in furtherance of its powers and duties, the department may:
(a) Accept for exchange purposes refunding bonds or other evidences of indebtedness  at
interest rates agreed upon by the department and the obligor.
(b) Make compromises, adjustments or  disposition of the matured or future principal or
interest or other income of an  investment as the department considers advisable for the
purpose of protecting the moneys invested.
(c) Take such other actions as the department considers necessary or appropriate.
(5) The provisions of ORS 293.235, 293.240 and 293.245 do not apply  to collection of the
principal or interest or other income of investments. Any class action lawsuit or  other legal
proceeding filed with, or on behalf of, other corporate shareholders or investors to  protect
the moneys invested by the  department or to otherwise benefit the invested moneys must
be brought by the Attorney General in the  name of the State Treasurer as custodian of the
moneys deposited in the State Treasury.
(6) The department shall follow generally accepted accounting practices, record the  indi-
vidual amounts and the totals of all investments and provide to the  officer or body control-
ling and administering the invested moneys any information necessary for financial reporting
required by law. The  department shall separately identify investments held in the Oregon
Growth Account created in ORS 348.702 as part  of the information provided on the Education
Stability Fund.
(7) The department shall provide administrative staff  for, consult with and appear before
the council as necessary or desirable to accomplish the respective duties  of the department
and council.
(8) The department shall adopt personnel policies, subject  to ORS 236.605 to 236.640, for
employees of the department who are transferred from the office of the  State Treasurer or
from any other state agency. The department shall fully reimburse the State Treasurer or
any other agency for any costs associated with the transfer of personnel to  the department.
(9)(a) Except  as provided in this subsection, the department is subject to the budget laws
[3]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of this state in the same manner as other executive branch state agencies. Moneys expended
by the department  out of the Oregon Investment Department Fund are not subject to any
expenditure limitation adopted by the Legislative Assembly.
(b) The department shall follow generally accepted accounting principles  and keep finan-
cial and statistical information as  necessary to completely and accurately disclose the fi-
nancial condition and financial operations of the department.
(c) The department  shall prepare, or cause to be prepared, an annual financial statement
of department revenues and expenses and shall make the statement available  for public re-
view. The statement must include the annual costs  incurred by the department and the
council for the management of the  investment funds and any other moneys the department
is charged by  law with investing. The department shall provide a copy of the statement to
the council, the Governor and the Legislative  Assembly not later than the 180th day after
the end of each state fiscal year.
(10) In carrying out the duties, functions and powers of the  department or council, the
department may contract with any  state agency the department considers appropriate, in-
cluding but not limited to the office of the State Treasurer.  A state agency may charge the
department reasonable fees and expenses in connection with providing personnel, equipment,
facilities, space and other support to the department.
(11) In addition to the  services provided under ORS 293.857 and 294.805 to 294.895, the
department may provide services to other governmental entities, including  governmental
entities of other states, for a reasonable fee intended to cover the department’s  expenses in
connection with the services.
(12) In addition to  audits that may be conducted pursuant to the constitutional duties
and authority of  the Secretary of State to audit public accounts, the department may con-
duct independent audits of the department  with internal auditors or outside independent
auditors, if the audits are considered advisable by the  department or are requested by the
council. Except for the filing requirement under ORS 297.250, the audits are subject to  the
exclusive discretion and control of the department. The audits are  subject to disclosure
pursuant to ORS 192.410 to 192.505.
SECTION 4.
State Treasurer investment  of moneys in Oregon Short Term Fund; manner
and powers. When the State Treasurer, in lieu of the Oregon Investment Department, in-
vests moneys in the Oregon Short Term Fund as described in section 3 (3)(a) of this  2017
Act, the State Treasurer may invest moneys in the  fund in the same manner and with the
same powers as provided by law for the department.
SECTION 5. Oregon Investment Council;  appointment; term of office.  (1) There is created
the Oregon Investment Council, consisting  of five voting members and one nonvoting mem-
ber.
(2) The Governor  shall appoint four voting members, subject to Senate confirmation in
the manner provided in ORS 171.562 and 171.565, to the council. Before  appointing a member
under this subsection,  the Governor shall consult with the State Treasurer regarding the
proposed appointee. The  members appointed by the Governor must be qualified by training
and experience in the field of  investment, finance, accounting or insurance. The term of of-
fice of each appointed member  is four years, but each appointed member serves at the
pleasure of the Governor and may be removed from office with or without cause.  A vacancy
in the appointed membership occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled  in the
[4]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
same manner as the original appointment, but for the unexpired term only.
(3) The State Treasurer shall be the fifth voting member of the council.
(4) The Director of the  Public Employees Retirement System shall be an ex officio
member of the council with no voting power.
(5) Each member appointed by  the Governor shall hold office until a successor is ap-
pointed or until an earlier resignation or removal. Before the expiration of the term  of an
appointed member, the Governor shall appoint a successor.
(6) Any member appointed by the Governor may resign at any time  upon written notice
to the Governor. A resignation takes effect at the time  specified in the notice. If a time is
not specified in the notice, the resignation is effective at the time the notice is received by
the Governor. Acceptance by the Governor of a resignation  is not necessary to make the
resignation effective.
SECTION 6.
Powers and duties of the Oregon Investment  Council.  (1) The Oregon In-
vestment Council shall adopt policies  for the investment and reinvestment of moneys in-
vested by the Oregon Investment Department and for the acquisition, retention,
management and disposition of the investments with the objective of making  the moneys as
productive as possible,  subject to applicable fiduciary standards, including but not limited to
ORS 238.660, 238A.025, 293.721  and 293.726. The council, from time to time, shall review the
policies and make changes as it considers necessary or desirable.
(2) Consistent with ORS  293.721 and 293.726 and the duties of the council and the de-
partment as fiduciaries for beneficiaries of the investment funds, the council shall  adopt a
code of ethics applicable to the council, the department and agents of the council and  de-
partment, that is based on the best  practices in the investment industry and reflects the
unique position of trust and loyalty  in which the council, department and their agents are
placed in the investment of public and private moneys. At a minimum, the code shall require
individuals acting for the council or department in the conduct of the duties to:
(a) Act in a professional and ethical manner;
(b) Act for the benefit of the State of Oregon and  the public and private beneficiaries of
the funds entrusted to the council or department for investment;
(c) Act with independence and objectivity;
(d) Act with skill, competence and diligence; and
(e) Communicate with state agencies, public  bodies and others for whom moneys are in-
vested in a timely and accurate manner, including any  disclosures required by law or best
industry practices.
(3) After consultation with the State Treasurer and the Chief Executive Officer of  the
Oregon Investment Department, the council shall:
(a) Recommend eligibility criteria or standards and qualifications for appointment to the
council;
(b) Recommend a clear process for  identifying, vetting and nominating candidates for
appointment to the council; and
(c) Set continuing education requirements for members  of the council who are appointed
by the Governor.
SECTION 7.
Criminal records check; fingerprints required; persons  subject to require-
ment. For the purpose of requesting a state or  nationwide criminal records check under ORS
181A.195, the Oregon Investment Department may require the fingerprints of a person who:
[5]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) Is employed by or applying for employment with the department; or
(2) Is, or will be,  providing services to the department or the Oregon Investment Council
in a position:
(a) In which the person is providing information technology services and  has control
over, or access to, information technology systems that would allow the person to  harm the
information technology systems or the information contained in the systems;
(b) In  which the person has access to information that is confidential or for which state
or federal laws, rules or regulations prohibit disclosure;
(c) That has payroll or investment functions or in which  the person has responsibility for
receiving, receipting or depositing money, negotiable  instruments or securities, for other fi-
nancial transactions or  for purchasing or selling property, or that otherwise has access to
invested moneys;
(d) That has mailroom duties as a primary duty or job function;
(e) In which the person has responsibility for auditing the department or the council;
(f) That has personnel or human resources functions as a primary responsibility;
(g) In which the person has access to bank routing numbers, Social Security numbers
or electronic funds transfer instructions or numbers; or
(h) In which the person has access to tax or financial information about  individuals or
business entities.
SECTION 7a.
Oregon Investment Department and Oregon Investment  Council exempt
from certain laws.  (1) Except as otherwise provided by law,  the provisions of ORS 184.360 and
279.835 to 279.855 and ORS chapters  240, 270, 273, 276, 279B, 282, 283, 291, 292 and 293 do not
apply to the Oregon Investment Department or the Oregon Investment Council.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of  this section, ORS 240.167, 293.115, 293.117, 293.130,
293.169, 293.171, 293.205 to 293.225, 293.250, 293.265 to 293.280,  293.285, 293.295, 293.321, 293.353,
293.375, 293.406, 293.465 to 293.485, 293.490, 293.495, 293.525, 293.701 to 293.857, 293.875, 293.880
and 293.990 and ORS chapter 180 apply to the department and council.
(3) The department and council are integral parts of the State of Oregon, but  are not
subject to any provision of law enacted  after January 1, 2017, with respect to any state
agency or other governmental entity, that is unique to state agencies or governmental  enti-
ties, unless the enacted provision:
(a) Specifically provides that it applies to the department or council; or
(b) Relates to a provision of law identified in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 8.
Oregon Investment Department Fund.  The Oregon Investment Department
Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
Moneys deducted  under ORS 293.718 shall be paid to the Oregon Investment Department
Fund. Interest earned by the fund shall be credited to the  fund. Moneys in the fund are
continuously appropriated to the Oregon Investment Department for  the payment of ex-
penses of the department and the Oregon Investment Council.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 293.701 is amended to read:
293.701. As used in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Council” means the Oregon Investment Council.
(2) “Investment funds” means:
(a) Public Employees Retirement Fund referred to in ORS 238.660;
(b) Industrial Accident Fund referred to in ORS 656.632;
[6]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Consumer and Business Services Fund referred to in ORS 705.145;
(d) Employment Department Special Administrative Fund referred to in ORS 657.822;
(e) Insurance Fund referred to in ORS 278.425;
(f) Funds under the control and administration of the Department of State Lands;
(g) Oregon Student Assistance Fund referred to in ORS 348.570;
(h) Moneys made available to the Commission for the Blind under  ORS 346.270 and 346.540 or
rules adopted thereunder;
(i) Forest Development Revenue Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.147 and State  Forestry
General Obligation Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.280;
(j) Oregon War Veterans’ Fund referred to in ORS 407.495;
(k) Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sinking Account referred to in ORS 407.515;
(L) World War II Veterans’ Compensation Fund;
(m) World War II Veterans’ Bond Sinking Fund;
(n) Funds in the hands of the State Treasurer that are not required to meet current demands
and that are invested in the Oregon Short Term Fund established under ORS 293.728  or in another
commingled investment vehicle;
(o) State funds that are not subject to the control and administration of officers or  bodies spe-
cifically designated by law;
(p) Funds derived from the sale of state bonds;
(q) Social Security Revolving Account referred to in ORS 237.490;
(r) Public University Fund established by ORS 352.450;
(s) Local Government Employer Benefit Trust Fund referred to in ORS 657.513;
(t) Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund established by ORS 391.800;
(u) Education Stability Fund established by ORS 348.696;
(v) Deferred Compensation Fund established under ORS 243.411;
(w) Trust for Cultural Development Account established under ORS 359.405; and
(x) The State Library Donation Fund and the Talking Book and  Braille Library Endowment
Fund subaccount established under ORS 357.195.
[(3) “Investment officer”  means the State Treasurer in the capacity as investment officer for the
council.]
SECTION 10.
 ORS 293.714 is amended to read:
293.714. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 192.650 (1) and (2), full sound  recordings shall be made of ev-
ery meeting of the Oregon Investment Council. The full sound recordings shall be produced on
equipment selected by the [ Oregon Investment Council ] council for compatibility  with equipment for
reproduction by the State Archives.
(2) The council shall  maintain a written log of each sound recording that gives a true reflection
of the matters discussed at the meeting and where those matters are found on the  sound recording.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 192.650 (1), the council  shall make the full sound recording and written
log of each sound recording of each meeting available to the public prior to the  next regularly
scheduled meeting of the council.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 293.718 is amended to read:
293.718. (1) As payment for internal administrative expenses of the  [investment officer ] Oregon
Investment Department and the Oregon Investment  Council, the [ State Treasurer ] department
may deduct monthly a maximum of 0.25 basis points of the most recent market value  of assets under
management for each of the  investment funds . The department shall deposit amounts deducted
[7]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under this subsection in the Oregon Investment Department Fund established under  section
8 of this 2017 Act . [ However,]
(2) For the funds described in ORS 293.701 (2)(n), the State  Treasurer may deduct  a maximum
of 0.435 basis points  [ may be deducted monthly ] each month . Amounts [ so] deducted under this
subsection shall be deposited into the  Miscellaneous Receipts Account established in the General
Fund for the State Treasurer, and are continuously  appropriated for payment of the expenses of the
State Treasurer [ as investment officer ] related to the investment of and accounting  for the
Oregon Short Term Fund  and any other commingled investment vehicle that the State
Treasurer invests.
(3) The limitations of subsections (1) and (2) of this section do  not apply to the payment
of expenses for contracts entered into under ORS 293.741.
SECTION 12.  ORS 293.726 is amended to read:
293.726. (1) [ The investment funds shall be invested and the investments of  those funds managed
as] Consistent with investment policies adopted by the Oregon  Investment Council under
section 6 of this 2017 Act, the Oregon  Investment Department shall invest the investment
funds and any other moneys the department is  charged by law with investing, except that
the moneys deposited in the Oregon  Short Term Fund under ORS 293.701 (2)(n) shall be in-
vested by the department  only at the request of the State Treasurer. The council shall es-
tablish and oversee implementation  of the council’s investment policies. The department and
the State Treasurer shall manage the investments under their management as  a prudent  in-
vestor  would  do, under the circumstances then prevailing and in light of the purposes, terms, dis-
tribution requirements and laws governing each investment fund  or other moneys .
(2) The standard stated in subsection (1) of this section requires the exercise  of reasonable care,
skill and caution, and is to be applied to  investments not in isolation but in the context of [ each
investment fund’s ] the  investment portfolio  of each investment fund or  other moneys  and as a
part of an overall investment strategy, which  should incorporate risk and return objectives reason-
ably suitable to the particular investment fund  or other moneys .
(3) In making  and implementing investment decisions, the [ Oregon Investment Council and the
investment officer have ] department, the council and the State Treasurer have  a duty to diversify
the investments of  the investment funds  or other moneys  unless, under the circumstances, it is not
prudent to do so.
(4) In addition to the duties stated in subsection (3) of this section, the [ council and the  invest-
ment officer ] department, the  council and the State Treasurer, and the agency of the depart-
ment, council or State Treasurer,  must:
(a) Conform to the fundamental fiduciary duties of loyalty and impartiality;
(b) Act with prudence in deciding whether and  how to delegate authority and in the selection
and supervision of agents; and
(c) Incur only costs  that are reasonable in amount and appropriate to the investment responsi-
bilities imposed by law.
(5) The duties [ of the  council and the investment officer under ] described in this section are
subject to contrary provisions of privately created public trusts the  assets of which by law are made
investment funds  or are otherwise invested by  the department or the State Treasurer . Within
the limitations of the standard stated in subsection (1) of this section and  subject to subsection (6)
of this section, there may be  acquired, retained, managed and disposed of as investments of the in-
vestment funds  or other moneys  every kind of investment [ which] that  persons of prudence, dis-
[8]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cretion and intelligence acquire, retain, manage and dispose of for their own account.
(6) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, not more than 50 percent  of the moneys con-
tributed to the Public Employees Retirement Fund or the Industrial  Accident Fund may be invested
in common stock, and not more than 65 percent of the moneys contributed to  the other trust and
endowment funds managed by the Oregon Investment [ Council] Department  or the  State Treasurer
may be invested in common stock.
(7) Subject to the standards  set forth in this section, moneys held in the Deferred Compensation
Fund may be invested in the stock of  any company, association or corporation, including but not
limited to shares of a mutual fund. Investment of moneys  in the Deferred Compensation Fund is not
subject to the limitation imposed by subsection (6) of this section.
SECTION 13.  ORS 293.728 is amended to read:
293.728. (1) The Oregon Short Term Fund is established in the State  Treasury as a commingled
investment vehicle for investment funds and the moneys described in subsection (2)  of this section.
Interest earned by the Oregon Short Term Fund shall be credited to the  participating investor funds
or accounts in the fund in proportion to the amount invested.
(2) Unless a federal  law, court order, settlement or similar agreement or business practice re-
quires otherwise, moneys received by the State Treasurer that may not be discretely invested  as
provided in ORS 293.723 shall  be deposited in the fund. Moneys that may be discretely invested as
provided in ORS 293.723 may be deposited in the fund.
[(3) Moneys in the fund may be transferred as provided in ORS 293.205 to  293.225. The State
Treasurer is the officer in  charge of the fund for purposes of ORS 293.220 and shall determine the
interest rate  to be charged until the moneys are retransferred to the fund. The interest rate may not
be less than the rate specified in ORS 293.220. ]
(3) Moneys in the fund may  be transferred as provided in ORS 293.205 to 293.225. For any
transfers to the General Fund, the State Treasurer is the officer in charge  of the borrowing
fund. The interest rate to be charged in  any agreements entered into under ORS 293.220 for
a transfer from the Oregon Short Term  Fund shall be based on a rate calculated by the State
Treasurer, or by the Oregon Investment Department if the department invests moneys  in
the fund, that approximates the return that would have been earned by  the Oregon Short
Term Fund while the  moneys are loaned, plus any amounts necessary to recover the costs
of the loan. The interest rate may not be less than the rate specified in ORS 293.220.
SECTION 14.  ORS 293.733 is amended to read:
293.733. (1) In  making and implementing investment decisions related to venture capital, the
Oregon Investment Council and the  [ investment officer have a duty to ] Oregon Investment De-
partment must  look first at Oregon  opportunities for diversification unless, under the circum-
stances, it is not prudent to do so.
(2) At any given time, the [ council] department  shall have  at least $100 million in venture
capital investments in Oregon unless, under the circumstances, it is not prudent to do so.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Emerging growth business” means an individual or group of individuals or a new  or small
company, including but not  limited to any new or small partnership, limited liability company, cor-
poration, firm, association or other business entity, that has the  capacity, upon obtaining appropri-
ate capital, to generate significant high-skill, high-wage employment.
(b) “Venture capital” includes but is not limited to emerging growth businesses.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 293.734 is amended to read:
[9]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
293.734. The Oregon Investment [ Council] Department  shall submit an annual  report to the
Oregon Investment Council, the Governor, the  Speaker of the  House of Representatives and the
President of the Senate  detailing the investments and commitments made by the [ council] depart-
ment in accordance with ORS 293.733.
SECTION 15a.  ORS 293.741 is amended to read:
293.741. (1) The Oregon Investment [ Council] Department may  enter into contracts with one
or more persons whom the  [ council] department  determines to be qualified, whereby the persons
undertake, in lieu  of or in addition to the [ investment officer ] department, to perform the functions
specified in [ ORS 293.736 ] section 3 (3)(a) or  4 of this 2017 Act  to the extent provided in the
contract.
(2) Performance of functions under a contract shall be  paid for out of the gross interest or other
income of the investments  with respect to which the functions are performed, and the net interest
or other income of the investments  after that payment shall be considered income of the investment
funds.
(3) The [ council] department may require a person contracted with  to give to the state a fi-
delity bond in a penal sum as may be fixed by law  or, if not so fixed, as may be fixed  by the
[council] department , with  corporate surety authorized to do business in this state. Contracts en-
tered into under this section and functions performed under the contracts are not  subject to ORS
chapter 240 or ORS 279A.140.
SECTION 16.  ORS 293.746 is amended to read:
293.746. [(1)] In the acquisition or disposition of bonds with which approving legal opinions or-
dinarily are furnished, the [ investment officer ] Oregon Investment Department, or the State
Treasurer when investing moneys in the Oregon Short Term Fund,  may require an original or
certified copy of the written opinion of a reputable bond attorney or  attorneys, or the written
opinion of the Attorney General, certifying to the legality of the bonds.
[(2) The Oregon Investment  Council may arrange for the furnishing to the investment officer of
investment counseling services.  The furnishing and acquisition of those services are not subject to the
State Personnel Relations Law or ORS 279A.140. ]
[(3) The investment officer, with the approval of the council, may arrange for services  with respect
to mortgages in which moneys in the investment funds are invested. Those  services shall be paid for
out of the gross interest of the mortgages with respect to which the services are furnished, and  the net
interest of the  mortgages after that payment shall be considered income of the investment funds. The
furnishing and acquisition of those  services are not subject to the State Personnel Relations Law or
ORS 279A.140.]
SECTION 17.  ORS 293.751 is amended to read:
293.751. [(1)] Except as  otherwise provided in ORS 293.741 and this [ subsection] section , all  in-
struments of title of all investments of the  investment funds  or any other moneys the Oregon
Investment Department is charged by law  with investing  shall remain in the custody of the
[investment officer. The investment officer ] department. The instruments of title for investments
of the Oregon Short Term Fund shall be held by the State  Treasurer when the State Treas-
urer invests moneys in the fund. The department, or  the State Treasurer for the Oregon
Short Term  Fund,  may deposit  instruments of title  with one or more custodial agents or banks
[those instruments of title that the State Treasurer considers advisable ], to be held  in safekeeping by
the agents or banks for collection of the principal and interest or  other income, or of the proceeds
of sale or maturity. For purposes of this section, instruments of title [ of investments of the investment
[10]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
funds] may include  such evidence of title as the [ investment officer shall consider ] department or
State Treasurer considers  secure and consistent with modern  investment, banking and commercial
practices, and may include book entry and automated recordation of such title.
[(2) Except as provided in ORS 293.741 and 293.746 (3) and  subsections (1) and (3) of this section,
the investment officer shall collect the principal and interest or other income of investments of  the in-
vestment funds, title  of which is in the investment officer’s custody, when due and payable, and shall
pay the principal and interest or other income, when so collected, into the appropriate fund. Except  as
otherwise provided by law,  interest or other income of investments of funds in the hands of the State
Treasurer that are not required to meet current demands shall be paid into the  General Fund to be
available for the payment of general governmental expenses. ]
[(3) In the event of default in the payment  of principal or interest or other income of any investment
of the investment funds, the investment officer, with the approval of the Oregon  Investment Council,
may:]
[(a) Institute the proper proceedings to collect the matured principal or interest or other income. ]
[(b) Accept for exchange purposes refunding bonds or other evidences of indebtedness at  interest
rates to be agreed upon by the investment officer and obligor. ]
[(c) Make compromises, adjustments or disposition  of the matured principal or interest or other
income as the investment officer considers advisable for  the purpose of protecting the moneys
invested.]
[(d) Make compromises or adjustments as to future payments of principal  or interest or other in-
come as the investment officer considers advisable for the purposes of protecting the moneys invested. ]
SECTION 18.  ORS 293.771 is amended to read:
293.771. The Oregon Investment [ Council] Department  shall report annually to the Governor
and Legislative Assembly [ on the investment funds investment program  at each odd-numbered year
regular session of the Legislative Assembly  and at other times as the council considers in the public
interest]. The report must describe:
(1) The investment funds investment program of the department;
(2) The investment program for any other moneys the department is  charged by law with
investing; and
(3) The annual costs incurred by the department and the Oregon Investment  Council for
the management of the  investment funds and any other moneys the department is charged
by law with investing.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 293.776 is amended to read:
293.776. (1)  The Oregon Investment [ Council] Department  shall  establish  an internal audit
function.
(2) The department shall  provide for an examination and audit of  the investment funds in-
vestment program, and for submission to the  Oregon Investment  Council of a report based on the
examination and audit, at least once every four years and at other  times as the council may require.
[The examination and audit,  and the report based thereon, shall include an evaluation of current in-
vestment funds investment policies and practices and of specific investments of the investment funds in
relation to the objective set forth in ORS 293.721, the standard set forth in ORS  293.726 and other
criteria as may be appropriate, and recommendations relating  to the investment funds investment poli-
cies and practices and to specific investments of the investment funds  as are considered necessary or
desirable.]
(3) The examination and audit required under subsection (2) of  this section shall include:
[11]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The investment funds investment program of the department  in relation to the ob-
jective set forth in section 6 of this 2017 Act and  ORS 293.721, the standard set forth in ORS
293.726 and other criteria as may be appropriate given  the trust nature of certain investment
funds and requirements of federal law;
(b) The investment program for any other moneys the  department is charged by law with
investing; and
(c) The investment policies of the council.
(4) The council shall  make copies of the report submitted to the council under subsection
(2) of this section  or a summary thereof available for distribution to interested persons.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 293.778 is amended to read:
293.778. (1) The [ investment officer singly, or jointly with other public or institutional investors, ]
Oregon Investment Department  may authorize establishment of investment holding companies,
which may be corporations, partnerships or limited liability companies, and placement of investment
funds or [ investments] other  moneys the department is charged by law with investing  in such
companies, when it is appropriate to  do so under the investment standard prescribed in ORS 293.726.
An investment holding company authorized by  this section has the powers and authority granted by
the laws of the jurisdiction in which the company is established.
(2) Any person qualified under the  laws of the jurisdiction in which an investment holding
company is established may serve as an officer,  director, member or manager of the company. Offi-
cers and employees of the office of the State Treasurer  or the department  may serve as directors,
officers and members of investment holding  companies authorized by this section. However, if a
conflict arises between the duties of the officer or employee of the office of  the State Treasurer  or
the department under state law and the duties of the officer  or employee of the office of the State
Treasurer  or the department  as a  director, officer or member of the investment holding company,
the officer or employee shall abstain from acting on behalf of the company. If the conflict cannot
be avoided by abstention, the officer or employee shall immediately resign from the company.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 293.790 is amended to read:
293.790. (1) Under authority of Article XI, section 6, of the Oregon Constitution, the  [ state]
Oregon Investment  Department , subject to subsection [ (2)] (3)  of this section, may hold and dis-
pose of the stock of any company, association or corporation,  including stock already received  by
a state agency , that is donated or bequeathed .[, and the state, ]
(2) Acting on behalf of the  governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002, subject
to subsection [ (2)] (3) of this  section,  the department  may invest and reinvest in the stock of any
company, association or corporation, any funds or moneys of the public  university held in the Public
University Fund established under ORS 352.450 that  is permitted to be held, disposed or invested
under Article XI, section 6, of the Oregon Constitution.
[(2)] (3)  [ The state, including any of its agencies having control of, or authority to  invest and re-
invest in, any stock described in subsection (1) of this section, in holding, disposing of or investing  and
reinvesting in such stock, shall be ] The department, on behalf of  any state agency in receipt of
donated stock or having control  of, or authority to invest and reinvest, any stock, is  governed
by ORS 130.750 to 130.775, notwithstanding the date of acquisition of such stock. Moneys  received
from the disposition of [ such] the  stock, including dividends, shall be maintained separate and dis-
tinct from the General Fund, and those moneys, including interest  earned thereon, are appropriated
continuously for the purposes of the donation or bequest and of the investments and reinvestments.
Except as specifically authorized by law, the state or any of its agencies may not purchase stock.
[12]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(3)] (4)  This section does not apply to investment and reinvestment of moneys  in the Public
Employees Retirement Fund, the Industrial Accident Fund, the  Deferred Compensation Fund and the
Education Stability Fund or to acquisition, retention, management and disposition of  investments of
those funds as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857.
SECTION 22.  ORS 293.793 is amended to read:
293.793. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Related agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 286A.001.
(b) “State government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.111.
(2) If the State Treasurer, [ acting as investment officer, ] the Oregon Investment Department
or a trustee, investing moneys for a related  agency  or the Oregon Short Term Fund , purchases
or acquires bonds issued by state  government, the purchase or acquisition does not cancel or ex-
tinguish the bonds.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 293.796 is amended to read:
293.796. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(a) The availability of venture  capital for the start-up and subsequent expansion of new busi-
nesses is critical to the continued growth and development of the economy of Oregon.
(b) There exists an estimated  gap of between $100 million and $200 million between available
venture capital resources and the need of Oregon businesses for such resources.
(c) Investments in start-up and expanding businesses, in  minority-owned businesses, woman-
owned businesses  and businesses that service-disabled veterans own and in emerging growth busi-
nesses can produce substantial positive returns for long-term investors.
(d) Pension funds managed by the Oregon Investment [ Council] Department  constitute  a major
financial resource of  current and former public employees of  the State of Oregon, and that  such
funds may be prudently invested in start-up and emerging growth businesses in this state under
policies established by the Oregon Investment Council.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Emerging growth  business” means an individual or group of individuals or a new or small
company, including but not limited to any new or small partnership, limited  liability company, cor-
poration, firm, association or other  business entity, that has the capacity, upon obtaining appropri-
ate capital, to generate significant high-skill, high-wage employment.
(b) “Minority-owned business,”  “woman-owned business” and “business that a service-disabled
veteran owns” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 200.005.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 293.819 is amended to read:
293.819. (1) The Oregon Investment  Department  [ Council and  the State Treasurer, in the State
Treasurer’s role as investment officer for the  council,] shall act reasonably and in a manner consistent
with fiduciary standards, including the provisions of  ORS 293.721 and 293.726  and section 6 of this
2017 Act, to try to ensure that managers who are engaged by the  department [ council or  the State
Treasurer ] for the active management of investment  funds consisting of the Public Employees Re-
tirement Fund referred to in ORS 238.660, through the purchase and sale of publicly traded  equities,
are not investing in publicly traded equities of any scrutinized company.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to investment indirectly made through  index
funds, fund of funds or privately placed investments.
SECTION 25.  ORS 293.825 is amended to read:
293.825. (1) Consistent with fiduciary standards, including the provisions of ORS 293.721  and
293.726 and section 6 of this 2017 Act , the  [ State Treasurer ] Oregon Investment Council  shall
[13]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
adopt a statement of policy that describes a process of engagement with managers who:
(a) Are engaged by the Oregon Investment  Department  [ Council or  the State Treasurer ] for the
active management of  investment funds consisting of the Public Employees Retirement Fund referred
to in ORS 238.660 through the purchase and sale of publicly traded equities; and
(b) Have invested such funds in scrutinized companies.
(2) The policy required  under subsection (1) of this section must require the [ State Treasurer ]
department, to the extent practicable, to identify and send  a written notice to the managers de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section. The  notice shall encourage the managers, consistent with
fiduciary standards, including the provisions of ORS  293.721 and 293.726 and section 6 of this 2017
Act, to:
(a) Notify scrutinized  companies with which the managers have made investments of the [ State
Treasurer’s ] council’s  policy adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Not later than 90 days after giving the notice, end investments  in the scrutinized companies
and avoid future investments in the scrutinized companies, as long as the managers  may do so
without monetary loss through reasonable, prudent and productive investments in companies gener-
ating returns that are comparable to the returns generated by the scrutinized companies.
(3) A notice provided by a manager to a  scrutinized company under subsection (2) of this section
shall advise the scrutinized company that the company may comment in writing to the  [ State
Treasurer ] department to dispute the identification of the company as a scrutinized company.
(4) If the [ State Treasurer ] department  determines under subsection (3) of this  section that a
company is not a scrutinized company, the [ State Treasurer ] department  shall  notify the relevant
manager of the [ State Treasurer’s ] determination.
[(5) The State Treasurer shall advise the Oregon Investment Council of a notice the State Treasurer
provides under subsection (2) of  this section if the manager to whom the notice was given has not in-
formed the State Treasurer within 180 days after the date the notice was given that the manager has
ended the manager’s investment in scrutinized companies or plans to  divest from its investment in
scrutinized companies.]
SECTION 26.
 ORS 293.828 is amended to read:
293.828. On or  before March 15 of each year, the [ State Treasurer ] Oregon Investment De-
partment shall make available on the  department’s or the  State  Treasurer’s website a summary
of actions taken during the previous year in accordance with ORS 293.811  to 293.832. The summary
shall include a list of identified scrutinized companies.
SECTION 27.  ORS 293.832 is amended to read:
293.832. ORS 293.825 (2) to [ (5)] (4)  and 293.828 apply only if the Legislative Assembly appro-
priates sufficient moneys [ to the State Treasurer ] for the Oregon Investment Department , other
than moneys described by ORS 293.718 or moneys in the  Public Employees’ Retirement Fund, to
administer ORS 293.825 (2) to [ (5)] (4) and 293.828.
SECTION 28.  ORS 293.839 is amended to read:
293.839. (1) The Oregon Investment  Department  [ Council and  the State Treasurer, in the State
Treasurer’s role as investment officer for the  council,] shall act reasonably and in a manner consistent
with fiduciary standards, including the provisions of  ORS 293.721 and 293.726  and section 6 of this
2017 Act, to try to ensure that managers who are engaged by the department [ council or  the State
Treasurer ] for the active management of investment  funds consisting of the Public Employees Re-
tirement Fund referred to in ORS 238.660, through the purchase and sale of publicly traded  equities,
are not investing in publicly traded equities of any scrutinized company.
[14]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to investments indirectly made through  index
funds, fund of funds or privately placed investments.
SECTION 29.  ORS 293.841 is amended to read:
293.841. (1) Consistent with fiduciary standards, including the provisions of ORS 293.721  and
293.726 and section 6 of this 2017 Act , the  [ State Treasurer ] Oregon Investment Council  shall
adopt a statement of policy that describes a process of engagement with managers who:
(a) Are engaged by the Oregon Investment  Department  [ Council or  the State Treasurer ] for the
active management of  investment funds consisting of the Public Employees Retirement Fund referred
to in ORS 238.660 through the purchase and sale of publicly traded equities; and
(b) Have invested such funds in scrutinized companies.
(2) The policy required  under subsection (1) of this section must require the [ State Treasurer ]
department, to the extent practicable, to identify and send  a written notice to the managers de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section. The  notice shall encourage the managers, consistent with
fiduciary standards, including the provisions of ORS  293.721 and 293.726 and section 6 of this 2017
Act, to:
(a) Notify scrutinized  companies with which the managers have made investments of the [ State
Treasurer’s ] council’s  policy adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Not later than  90 days  after  giving the notice, end investments in the scrutinized companies
and avoid future investments in the scrutinized companies, as long as the managers  may do so
without monetary loss through reasonable, prudent and productive investments in companies gener-
ating returns that are comparable to the returns generated by the scrutinized companies.
(3) A notice given by a manager to  a scrutinized company under subsection (2) of this section
shall advise the [ scrutinized] company that the scrutinized company may comment in writing  to the
[State Treasurer ] department to dispute the identification of the company  as a scrutinized company.
(4) If the [ State Treasurer ] department  determines that a company given notice under sub-
section (3) of this section is not a  scrutinized company, the [ State Treasurer ] department  shall no-
tify the relevant manager of the determination.
[(5) The State Treasurer shall advise the Oregon Investment Council  if a manager to whom the
notice was given under  subsection (2) of this section has not informed the State Treasurer within 180
days after the date the notice was given that the  manager has ended the manager’s investment in
scrutinized companies or plans to divest from the manager’s investment in scrutinized companies. ]
SECTION 30.
 ORS 293.843 is amended to read:
293.843. On or before March 15 of each year, the [ State Treasurer ] Oregon  Investment De-
partment shall make available on  the  department’s or the  State Treasurer’s website a summary
of actions taken during the previous year in accordance with ORS 293.837  to 293.847. The summary
shall include a list of identified scrutinized companies.
SECTION 31.  ORS 293.847 is amended to read:
293.847. (1) ORS 293.841 (2) to [ (5)] (4)  and 293.843 apply only if the Legislative  Assembly ap-
propriates sufficient moneys [ to the State  Treasurer ] for the Oregon Investment Department ,
other than  moneys described in ORS 293.718  or moneys in the Public Employees Retirement
Fund, to administer ORS 293.841 (2) to [ (5)] (4) and 293.843.
(2) Any costs incurred by the Oregon Investment Department or the  State Treasurer in ad-
ministering ORS 293.837 to 293.847 may not be paid from investment funds.
SECTION 32.  ORS 293.857 is amended to read:
293.857. (1) When the [ investment officer ] Oregon  Investment Department or the State
[15]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Treasurer invests the funds of any county, municipality, school  district or other political subdivi-
sion of this state or of a tribal government, the [ investment officer ] department or State Treasurer
shall keep a separate account for each such governmental  unit the funds of which are being in-
vested.
(2) The [ investment officer ] department or State Treasurer  shall  report monthly to each such
governmental unit the  changes made during the preceding month in the investments for the account
of that governmental unit. The  monthly reports shall be provided to the governmental units within
30 days after the end of the month to which they pertain.
(3) All funds  in the Oregon  Short Term Fund or the investment pool as defined in ORS
294.805 that are  invested by the  [ investment officer ] department or State Treasurer  shall be in-
vested in accordance with rules adopted or readopted at least annually by the Oregon Short  Term
Fund Board and approved by the Oregon Investment  Council. [ Such] The  rules shall be published,
shall be made available to  all interested parties and shall be distributed at least annually to all local
governments and tribal governments investing funds pursuant to ORS 294.805 to 294.895.
SECTION 33.  ORS 293.353 is amended to read:
293.353. (1) As payment for expenses of processing banking-related transactions, the  State
Treasurer may charge each state agency having  such transactions involving the State Treasury. The
amount so charged shall be determined by  the number of transactions processed by the State
Treasurer and shall be paid in the manner  determined by the State Treasurer to be most efficient
and cost effective. The  proceeds from such charges shall be deposited in the Miscellaneous Receipts
Account established in the General Fund for the  State Treasurer, and such proceeds are contin-
uously appropriated for payment of expenses of  the office of the State Treasurer in processing
banking-related transactions.
(2) When the [ State Treasurer ] Oregon Investment Department  transfers the assets of the  in-
vestment pool to the Oregon Short Term  Fund established under ORS 293.728 as authorized by ORS
294.882, “state agency,” as used in this section, includes local government and  tribal government
participants in the state investment fund.
SECTION 34.  ORS 294.035 is amended to read:
294.035. (1) Subject to ORS 294.040 and 294.135  to 294.155, the custodial officer may invest any
sinking fund, bond fund or surplus funds in the custody of  the custodial officer in the bank accounts,
classes of securities at current market prices, insurance contracts and other investments  listed in
this section, but only after obtaining  from the governing body of the county, municipality, political
subdivision or school district a written order  that has been entered in the minutes or journal of the
governing  body.
(2) This section does not:
(a) Limit the authority of the custodial officer to invest surplus funds  in other investments when
the investment is specifically authorized by another statute.
(b) Apply to a sinking fund or a bond fund established in  connection with conduit revenue bonds
issued by a county, municipality, political subdivision or school  district for private business entities
or nonprofit corporations.
(3) Investments authorized by this section are:
(a) Lawfully issued general obligations of the United States,  the agencies and instrumentalities
of the United States or enterprises  sponsored by the United States Government and obligations
whose payment  is guaranteed by the United States, the agencies and instrumentalities of the United
States or enterprises sponsored by the United States Government.
[16]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Lawfully issued  debt obligations of the agencies and instrumentalities of the State of Oregon
and its political  subdivisions that have a long-term rating of A or an equivalent rating or better or
are rated on  the settlement date in the highest category for short-term municipal debt by a na-
tionally recognized statistical rating organization.
(c) Lawfully issued debt obligations of  the States of California, Idaho and Washington and poli-
tical  subdivisions  of those states if the obligations have a long-term rating of AA or an equivalent
rating or better or are rated on the settlement date in the highest category  for short-term municipal
debt by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization.
(d) Time deposit open accounts, certificates of deposit and savings  accounts in insured insti-
tutions as defined in ORS 706.008, in credit unions as defined in ORS 723.006 or in  federal credit
unions, if the institution or credit union maintains a head office or a branch in this state.
(e) Share accounts and  savings accounts in credit unions in the name of, or for the benefit of,
a member of the credit union pursuant to a plan of deferred compensation.
(f) Fixed or variable life insurance or annuity contracts as defined by  ORS 731.170 and guaran-
teed investment contracts issued by life insurance companies authorized to do business in this  state.
(g) Trusts in which deferred compensation funds from other public employers are pooled, if:
(A) The purpose is to establish a deferred compensation plan;
(B) The  trust is a public instrumentality of such public employers and described in section (2)(b)
of the  Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. 80a-2(b), as amended, in effect on September 20,
1985, or the trust is a common trust fund described in ORS 709.170;
(C) Under the terms of the plan the net income from or gain or loss due  to fluctuation in value
of the underlying assets of  the trust, or other change in such assets, is reflected in an equal increase
or decrease in the  amount distributable to the employee or the beneficiary thereof and, therefore,
does not ultimately result in a net  increase or decrease in the worth of the public employer or the
state; and
(D) The fidelity of the trustees and others with access to  such assets, other than a trust com-
pany, as defined in ORS 706.008,  is insured by a surety bond that is satisfactory to the public em-
ployer, issued by a company authorized to do a surety business in this state and in an amount  that
is not less than 10 percent of the value of such assets.
(h)(A) Banker’s acceptances, if the banker’s acceptances are:
(i) Guaranteed by, and carried on the books of, a qualified financial institution;
(ii) Eligible for discount by the Federal Reserve System; and
(iii) Issued by a qualified financial institution whose short-term letter of credit  rating is rated
in the highest category by one or more nationally recognized statistical rating organizations.
(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, “qualified financial institution” means:
(i) A financial institution that is located and licensed to do banking business in the State  of
Oregon; or
(ii) A  financial institution that is wholly owned by a financial holding company or a bank hold-
ing company that owns a financial institution  that is located and licensed to do banking business in
the State of Oregon.
(C) A custodial officer shall not permit more than 25 percent of the moneys of  a local govern-
ment that are available for investment, as  determined on the settlement date, to be invested in
banker’s acceptances of any qualified financial institution.
(i)(A) Corporate indebtedness subject to  a valid registration statement on file with the Securities
and Exchange Commission or issued under the authority of section 3(a)(2)  or 3(a)(3) of the Securities
[17]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Act of 1933, as amended. Corporate indebtedness described in this paragraph  does not include
banker’s acceptances. The corporate indebtedness must be issued by a commercial, industrial or
utility business enterprise,  or by or on behalf of a financial institution, including a holding company
owning a majority interest in a qualified financial institution.
(B) Corporate indebtedness must be rated on the settlement date P-1 or  Aa or better by Moody’s
Investors Service or A-1 or AA or better by Standard & Poor’s Corporation or equivalent  rating by
any nationally recognized statistical rating organization.
(C) Notwithstanding  subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the corporate indebtedness must be
rated on the settlement date P-2 or A or better by Moody’s Investors Service or A-2 or A or  better
by Standard & Poor’s Corporation or equivalent rating  by any nationally recognized statistical rat-
ing organization when the corporate indebtedness is:
(i) Issued by a business enterprise that has its headquarters  in Oregon, employs more than 50
percent of its permanent workforce in Oregon or has more than 50 percent of its tangible assets  in
Oregon;  or
(ii) Issued by a holding company owning not less than a majority  interest in a qualified financial
institution, as defined  in paragraph (h) of this subsection, located and licensed to do banking busi-
ness in Oregon or by a holding company owning not less than a majority  interest in a business en-
terprise described in sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph.
(D) A custodial officer may not permit more than 35 percent of  the moneys of a local govern-
ment that are available for investment, as determined on the  settlement date, to be invested in
corporate indebtedness, and may  not permit more than five percent of the moneys of a local gov-
ernment that are available for investment to be invested in corporate indebtedness of  any single
corporate entity and its affiliates or subsidiaries.
(j) Repurchase agreements whereby the custodial officer purchases  securities from a financial
institution or securities dealer  subject to an agreement by the seller to repurchase the securities.
The repurchase agreement must be in writing and executed in advance of the initial purchase  of the
securities that are  the subject of the repurchase agreement. Only securities described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection may be  used in conjunction with a repurchase agreement and such securities
shall have a maturity of not longer than three years. The  price paid by the custodial officer for such
securities may not exceed amounts or percentages  prescribed by written policy of the Oregon In-
vestment Council or the Oregon Short Term Fund Board created by ORS 294.885.
(k) Shares of stock of any company, association or corporation, including but not  limited to
shares of a mutual fund, but only if the  moneys being invested are funds set aside pursuant to a
local government deferred compensation plan and are held in trust for  the exclusive benefit of par-
ticipants and their beneficiaries.
(L) The investment pool as defined in ORS 294.805 and, with  the approval of the State Treasurer
or the  Oregon Investment Department , any other commingled investment pool that may be es-
tablished in the discretion of the State Treasurer  or department for investment of the funds of local
governments. The State Treasurer  or department  may require  the governing body of a local gov-
ernment to enter into an investment agreement with the  State Treasurer  or department  as a con-
dition of investing funds in a commingled investment pool under this paragraph.
SECTION 35.  ORS 294.805 is amended to read:
294.805. As used in ORS 294.805 to 294.895:
(1) “Board” means the Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(2) “Council” means the Oregon Investment Council created under  [ ORS 293.706 ] section 5 of
[18]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
this 2017 Act .
(3) “Funds” means funds under the  control or in the custody of any local government official
or tribal government official by virtue of office that are not required to meet current demands.
(4) “Investment officer” means the State Treasurer  [ in capacity as investment officer for the
council and the investment pool ], or the  Oregon Investment Department if the State Treasurer
requests that the department  invest moneys in the Oregon Short Term Fund or the invest-
ment pool.
(5) “Investment pool” means the aggregate  of all funds from local government officials and tribal
government officials that are [ placed in the custody of  the investment officer for investment and rein-
vestment] invested as provided under ORS 294.805 to 294.895.
(6) “Local government official” means each officer or employee of any agency, political subdi-
vision or public corporation of this state, including the Oregon State Bar, who by law  is made the
custodian of or has control of any funds.
(7) “Oregon Indian tribe” means each  of the Burns Paiute Tribe, the Confederated Tribes of
Coos, Lower Umpqua and Siuslaw Indians, the Confederated Tribes of the Grand  Ronde Community
of Oregon, the Confederated Tribes of Siletz Indians of Oregon, the Confederated Tribes of the
Umatilla Indian Reservation, the Confederated Tribes of the Warm Springs Reservation  of Oregon,
the Coquille Indian Tribe, the Cow Creek Band of Umpqua Tribe of Indians  and the Klamath Tribes,
as long as each remains a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(8) “Public body” means:
(a) A public body as defined in ORS 287A.001; or
(b) An Oregon Indian tribe.
(9) “Tribal government” means the governing body of an Oregon Indian tribe.
(10) “Tribal government official” means each officer or  employee of a tribal government who by
law is made the custodian of or has control of any funds.
SECTION 36.
 ORS 294.810 is amended to read:
294.810. (1)(a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection, with the consent  of the governing
body, a local government official or tribal government official may place  in the aggregate up to $30
million of the funds of the local government or  tribal government in the investment pool, or, if the
assets of the investment pool have been transferred pursuant to ORS  294.882, for investment and
reinvestment [ by the investment officer ] as provided under ORS 293.701 to  293.857 or 294.805 to
294.895, as the case may be.
(b) The [ investment officer ] State Treasurer or the Oregon Investment  Department  may re-
quire the governing body of the local government or tribal government to enter  into an investment
agreement as a condition of placing funds with the [ investment officer ] State Treasurer or depart-
ment pursuant to this subsection.
(2) The $30 million limitation in this section does not apply either to funds of  a governing body
that are  placed in the investment pool on a pass-through basis or to funds invested on behalf of
another government unit. Local governments must remove pass-through funds that result  in an ac-
count balance in the pool in excess of  $30 million within 10 business days. County governments and
tribal governments must remove such excess funds within 20 business days.
(3) The [ investment officer ] State Treasurer or department  shall annually adjust the  $30
million limitation in this section by multiplying $30 million by  the percentage, if any, by which the
monthly averaged U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index  for the 12 consecutive months ending
August 31 of the current calendar year exceeds the monthly averaged U.S. City  Average Consumer
[19]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31, 1995.
SECTION 37.  ORS 294.820 is amended to read:
294.820. (1) If the [ State Treasurer and the Oregon Investment  Council terminate ] Oregon In-
vestment Department terminates  the operation of all investment pools [ created under ORS
293.863,] for public bodies , one or more  public bodies may establish by written agreement under
ORS chapter 190 one or more pools for  the investment of proceeds for the [ purposes identified in
ORS 293.861. In establishing  one or more such pools, the participating public bodies may exercise those
powers conferred on  the State Treasurer and the Oregon Investment Council by ORS 293.863. ] purpose
of reducing the burdens of federal arbitrage  rules on public bodies that issue tax-exempt
obligations.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Proceeds” means funds obtained from the sale of tax-exempt obligations, and other
funds that secure, or are held to pay debt service on, tax-exempt obligations.
(b) “Tax-exempt obligations” means bonds, notes, certificates  or other obligations, the
interest on which is excluded from gross income under the Internal Revenue Code.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 294.825 is amended to read:
294.825. [(1) The State Treasurer is the investment officer for the Oregon Investment  Council and
the investment pool, and shall perform functions in that capacity as authorized or  required by law and,
consistent with law, by the council. ]
[(2) The bond of the State Treasurer required from the State Treasurer by law shall be deemed  to
extend to the faithful  performance of all functions of the office of investment officer under ORS 294.805
to 294.895.]
[(3) The investment officer may: ]
[(a) Subject to any applicable provision of the State  Personnel Relations Law, employ, prescribe the
functions and fix the compensation  of personnel necessary to facilitate and assist in carrying out the
functions of the council, investment officer and investment pool. ]
[(b) Require a fidelity bond of any person  employed by the investment officer who has charge of,
handles or has access to any of the moneys in the investment pool. The amounts of the bonds shall  be
fixed by  the investment officer, except as otherwise provided by law, and the sureties shall be approved
by the investment officer. The premiums on the bonds shall be an expense of the State Treasurer. ]
[(4)] Subject to review by the Oregon Short  Term Fund  Board, the [ investment officer ] State
Treasurer may, pursuant to ORS chapter 183,  [ make] adopt reasonable rules necessary for the ad-
ministration of ORS 294.805 to 294.895.
SECTION 39.  ORS 294.840 is amended to read:
294.840. [Subject to the objective set forth in  ORS 294.831 and the standards set forth in ORS
294.835,] The Oregon Investment Council shall formulate  policies for the investment and reinvest-
ment of moneys in the investment  pool and the acquisition, retention, management and disposition
of investments of the investment pool. The council, from time  to time, shall review those policies
and make changes therein as it  considers necessary or desirable. The council may formulate sepa-
rate policies for any funds from any single public body included in the investment pool.
SECTION 40.  ORS 294.845 is amended to read:
294.845. (1) In amounts available for investment purposes and  subject to the policies formulated
by the Oregon Investment Council, the investment officer shall invest and reinvest moneys  in the
investment pool and acquire, retain, manage, including exercise of any voting rights, and  dispose of
investments of the investment pool.
[20]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The investment officer is subject to the standards, and has the powers and duties,  set
forth in section  3 (3)(a) to (f) and (4) of this 2017 Act when investing moneys in the invest-
ment pool.
SECTION 41.  ORS 294.855 is amended to read:
294.855. [(1)] In the acquisition or disposition of bonds with which approving legal opinions or-
dinarily are furnished, the investment officer  may require an original or certified copy of the written
opinion of a  reputable bond attorney or attorneys, or the written opinion of the Attorney General,
certifying to the legality of the bonds.
[(2) The Oregon Investment  Council may arrange for the furnishing to the investment officer of
investment counseling services.  The furnishing and acquisition of those services are not subject to the
State Personnel Relations Law or ORS 279A.140. ]
[(3) The investment officer, with the approval of the council, may arrange for services  with respect
to mortgages in which moneys in the  investment pool are invested. Those services shall be paid for out
of the gross interest of the mortgages  with respect to which the services are furnished, and the net in-
terest of the mortgages after  that payment shall be considered income of the investment pool. The fur-
nishing and acquisition of those services are not subject to the State  Personnel Relations Law or ORS
279A.140.]
SECTION 42.  ORS 294.860 is amended to read:
294.860. [(1) Except as provided in ORS 294.850  and this subsection, ] All instruments of title of
all investments of the investment pool shall remain in the custody of the investment officer  and be
held as  provided in ORS 293.751 . [ The investment officer may deposit with one or more custodial
agents or banks those instruments of title that  the State Treasurer considers advisable, to be held in
safekeeping by the agents or banks for collection of the principal and interest or  other income, or of the
proceeds of sale or  maturity. For purposes of this section, instruments of title of investments of the in-
vestment pool may include such evidence of title as the investment officer shall consider secure and
consistent with modern investment, banking and commercial practices, and may include book entry and
automated recordation of such title. ]
[(2) Except as provided in ORS 294.850 and 294.855 (3) and  subsections (1) and (3) of this section,
the investment officer  shall collect the principal and interest or other income of investments of the in-
vestment pool, title of which is in the investment officer’s custody, when  due and payable, and shall
pay to the appropriate local government official or tribal government official the principal  and interest
or other income, within 30 days after the last day of the calendar quarter in which  the principal and
interest or other income  accrues. Not less often than quarterly and without regard to whether the
short-term investments were  made with moneys placed by local government officials, by tribal govern-
ment officials or by other sources, the investment officer shall compute  the amount by which the current
fair market value exceeds or is less than the net  purchase price of all short-term investments adminis-
tered by the investment officer that mature more than 270 days from the date computation is made.  The
investment officer shall compute the fair market value  of such investments based upon the mean value
of the bid and ask price  of such investments as of the date of computation, based upon quotations from
reputable dealers or financial institutions dealing in  such investments. If the amount so computed by
the investment officer totals more than one percent of the balance of the pool, either in  terms of a gain
or loss, the investment officer shall allocate the amount to all pool participants. Any addition to or
deduction from amounts to be distributed  shall be allocated among the municipalities and tribal gov-
ernments participating in the pool at any time during the month  in proportion to their average daily
balances of funds  invested through the pool. Investments maturing 270 days or less from the date of
[21]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
computation shall not be subject to  the foregoing computation, but for other purposes shall be valued
at book value or original purchase price. ]
[(3) In the event of default in the payment  of principal or interest or other income of any investment
of the investment pool, the investment officer, with the approval of the council, may: ]
[(a) Institute the proper proceedings to collect the matured principal or interest or other income. ]
[(b) Accept for exchange purposes refunding bonds or other evidences of indebtedness at  interest
rates to be agreed upon by the investment officer and obligor. ]
[(c) Make compromises, adjustments or disposition  of the matured principal or interest or other
income as the investment officer considers advisable for  the purpose of protecting the moneys
invested.]
[(d) Make compromises or adjustments as to future payments of principal  or interest or other in-
come as the investment officer considers advisable for the purposes of protecting the moneys invested. ]
SECTION 43.  ORS 294.865 is amended to read:
294.865. The State Treasurer may deduct monthly a maximum of 0.435 basis points of  the most
recent market value of assets under the management of the investment pool. Amounts so deducted
shall pay the State Treasurer , or the Oregon Investment  Department if the department invests
moneys in the Oregon Short Term Fund,  for  accounting and investment  expenses of the [ State
Treasurer as investment officer and  to the extent the amounts deducted are so used ] investment pool.
The amounts deducted shall be deposited into the Miscellaneous Receipts Account  established in
the General Fund for the State Treasurer, and are continuously appropriated to the State Treas-
urer for payment of the accounting and investment expenses of the [ State Treasurer as investment
officer] investment pool .
SECTION 44.
 ORS 294.870 is amended to read:
294.870. (1) The investment officer shall  keep, for each public body with funds in the investment
pool, a separate account, which shall record the individual  amounts and the totals of all investments
of its moneys in the investment pool.
(2) The investment officer shall report monthly to  the local government official or tribal gov-
ernment official of a public body with funds in  the investment pool the changes in its account made
during the preceding month for the investment pool. The investment officer  shall also furnish a fi-
nancial report monthly to each participating governmental  unit investor in the investment pool.
The financial report shall include, but not be limited to, such comparative data  for the preceding
six months of operation of the investment pool , with respect to participating governmental  unit
investors, as will  provide a basis for analyzing trends and comparing operating results and financial
position. A monthly statement shall be distributed within 30 days after the end of that month.
SECTION 45.  ORS 294.875 is amended to read:
294.875. (1) Not  later than 15 days after the last day of each month, the investment officer shall
submit to the Oregon Investment Council and the Oregon Short  Term Fund Board a report of the
investments made with respect to participating governmental unit  investors  during the preced-
ing month.
(2) The report shall include :
(a) A detailed summary of investment, reinvestment, purchase, sale  and exchange transactions,
setting forth, among other matters, the investments bought, sold and exchanged,  the dates thereof,
the prices paid and obtained, the names of the dealers involved and a statement of the  accounts
referred to in ORS 294.870 (1)[ . The reports shall include ];
(b) A description of every investment  in the portfolio of assets in the investment pool showing
[22]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
issuer, coupon, purchase date, maturity date, yield to maturity, book value, market value as of  the
end of the month for which the report is rendered and the method used to value pool investments;
(c) A computation of the average life of the portfolio of assets in the investment pool  weighted
according to the market value of each investment that matures more than 270  days from the report
date as of the end of the month for which the report is rendered; and
(d) A computation of the annualized rate of  return of the investment pool portfolio, net of ex-
pense.
(3) A copy of the [ reports] report shall be made available to each county,  municipality, school
district and other political subdivision and tribal government the  funds of which are then being in-
vested by the investment officer. The investment officer may send copies of the report to  investment
bankers and brokers [ recommended by the council ].
SECTION 46.  ORS 294.880 is amended to read:
294.880. (1) An examination and audit of the investment pool shall be made  separately from the
audit of the State Treasurer [ for submission ] and shall be submitted  to the Oregon Investment
Department, the  Oregon Investment Council, public bodies that are  investors in the pool, the
Legislative Assembly and the Oregon  Short Term Fund Board at least once a year and at other
times as the [ council] department may require.
(2) An audit report shall be submitted to the  individuals and public bodies specified within 60
days after the end of the fiscal year or as soon as practical.
(3) The report shall include a statement prepared  by the State Treasurer of the investment rules
governing investments authorized by the council.
SECTION 47.  ORS 294.882 is amended to read:
294.882. (1) It is recognized that a  time may come when the interest of local governments and
tribal governments diminishes  to the extent that participation in the investment pool no longer
warrants its operation as a  separate fund. If the investment pool decreases to a level below $125
million, the [ State Treasurer ] Oregon Investment Department  may transfer the assets of the  pool
to the Oregon Short Term Fund established under ORS 293.728. In that event, the investment pool
participant accounts will be treated as  are other state funds and accounts in receiving a propor-
tionate share of the earnings of the Oregon Short  Term Fund. Notwithstanding ORS 294.805 to
294.895, but subject to ORS 294.810, when the [ State Treasurer ] department transfers the assets of
the investment pool to the Oregon Short Term Fund, the  distributions of income to local govern-
ments and tribal governments, payment of related expenses and the  reporting, program examination
and audit functions with respect to the investment pool participant accounts shall be administered
in accordance with ORS 293.353 and 293.701 to 293.857.
(2) The [ State Treasurer ] department , at the discretion of the [ treasurer] department, may re-
establish the investment pool as  a separate fund if the participant accounts increase to over $125
million and, in the [ State Treasurer’s ] judgment  of the Oregon Investment Council , sufficient in-
terest by local government  and tribal government exists to ensure the investment pool will remain
over $125 million. [ Prior to reestablishing the pool as  a separate fund, the State Treasurer shall first
present a  plan for operation, including the reasons for such action, to the Oregon Investment Council
at a regularly scheduled meeting for its review and comment. The State Treasurer ] The department
shall publish notice in the  Secretary of State’s administrative rules bulletin of the [ treasurer’s ]
department’s intent to reestablish the pool as a separate fund at least 30 days prior to  the meeting
at which  the Oregon Investment Council [ shall] will review the proposal, and notice of the meeting
time and location [ of the Oregon Investment Council ] at which the proposal will be discussed.
[23]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 48.  ORS 294.895 is amended to read:
294.895. The Oregon Short Term Fund Board shall:
(1) Advise the [ Oregon Investment Council and the ] investment officer in the management of the
investment pool and in the investment of moneys deposited in the  Oregon Short Term Fund estab-
lished under ORS 293.728 and invested pursuant to ORS 293.701 to 293.857.
(2) Review the rules promulgated by the  [ investment officer ] State Treasurer  as authorized un-
der ORS 294.825 [ (4)].
(3) Consult with  the [ council and the ] investment officer on any matter relating to the investment
and reinvestment of funds in the investment pool and on any  matter relating to the investment or
reinvestment of moneys deposited in the Oregon Short  Term Fund [ and invested by the State Treas-
urer].
SECTION 49.
 ORS 295.101 is amended to read:
295.101. (1) The following public funds  are not subject to the provisions of ORS 295.001 to
295.108:
(a) Funds that are deposited for the purpose of paying principal, interest  or premium, if any, on
bonds, as defined in ORS 286A.001 and 287A.001, and related costs or securing  a borrowing related
to an agreement for exchange of interest rates entered into under ORS 286A.110 or 287A.335.
(b) Funds that are invested in authorized  investments under provisions of law other than ORS
295.001 to 295.108. Funds invested under ORS 293.701 to 293.857  are invested in authorized invest-
ments for purposes of this subsection from the time the funds are transferred  by the State Treasurer
or the Oregon Investment Department  to a third party under  the terms of a contract for in-
vestment or administration of the funds  that requires such a transfer until the time the funds are
returned to the State Treasurer or department  or paid to another party under the terms of the
contract.
(c) Negotiable certificates of deposit purchased by the State Treasurer [ under ORS 293.736], the
department or [ by] an investment manager under  ORS 293.741  or other contract with the State
Treasurer or department pursuant to section 3 of this 2017 Act .
(d) Funds that are held by a public official and  are required by federal law or contractual pro-
visions to be collateralized at 100 percent, if the funds are deposited in an account that  is separate
from other accounts of the public official in a depository, and the public official and the  depository
have entered into a  written agreement that provides a perfected security interest to the public of-
ficial in collateral valued at an amount  at least equal to the amount of funds in the account in a
manner substantially similar to a pledge agreement described in ORS 295.001 (15).
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, funds deposited by a  custodial officer under
ORS 294.035 (3)(d) are subject to the provisions of ORS 295.001 to 295.108.
SECTION 50.  ORS 128.316 is amended to read:
128.316. As used in ORS 128.305 to 128.336:
(1) “Charitable purpose” means the relief of poverty,  the advancement of education or religion,
the promotion  of health, the promotion of a governmental purpose or any other purpose the
achievement of which is beneficial to the community.
(2) “Endowment fund” means an institutional fund or part of an institutional fund that, under
the terms of a gift instrument, is not wholly  expendable by the institution on a current basis.
“Endowment fund” does not include assets that an institution designates as an endowment  fund for
the institution’s own use.
(3) “Gift instrument” means a record or records, including an institutional  solicitation, under
[24]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
which property is granted to, transferred to or held by an institution as an institutional fund.
(4) “Institution” means:
(a) A person, other than an individual,  organized and operated exclusively for charitable pur-
poses;
(b) A government or governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality, to the extent that  it
holds funds exclusively for a charitable purpose; and
(c) A trust that had both charitable and  noncharitable interests, after all noncharitable interests
have terminated.
(5) “Institutional fund” means a fund held by an  institution exclusively for charitable purposes.
“Institutional fund” does not include:
(a) Program-related assets;
(b) A fund held for an institution by a trustee that is not an institution;
(c) A fund  in which a beneficiary that is not an institution has an interest, other than an in-
terest that could arise upon violation or failure of the purposes of the fund; or
(d) A fund managed by the State Treasurer  or  the Oregon Investment Department , moneys
held by the State Treasurer  or the department  for investment or moneys managed  or held for in-
vestment by or on behalf of the State  Treasurer  or the department  under ORS chapter 293 or 348.
(6) “Person” means  an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited
liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation,  government or governmental sub-
division, agency or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(7) “Program-related asset” means an asset held by an  institution primarily to accomplish a
charitable purpose of the institution and not primarily for investment.
(8) “Record” means information that is inscribed  on a tangible medium or that is stored in an
electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.
SECTION 51.
 ORS 192.502 is amended to read:
192.502. The following public records are exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.410 to 192.505:
(1) Communications within a public body or between public bodies of an advisory nature to  the
extent that they cover other than purely factual materials and  are preliminary to any final agency
determination of policy or action. This exemption shall not apply unless the public  body shows that
in the particular instance the public interest in encouraging frank  communication between officials
and employees of public bodies clearly outweighs the public interest in disclosure.
(2) Information of  a personal nature such as but not limited to that kept in a personal, medical
or similar file, if public disclosure would constitute an unreasonable invasion of privacy, unless  the
public interest  by clear and convincing evidence requires disclosure in the particular instance. The
party seeking disclosure shall have the burden of showing that public disclosure  would not consti-
tute an unreasonable invasion of privacy.
(3) Upon  compliance with ORS 192.437, public body employee or volunteer residential addresses,
residential telephone numbers, personal cellular telephone numbers, personal electronic mail ad-
dresses, driver license numbers, employer-issued identification card  numbers, emergency contact in-
formation, Social Security numbers, dates of birth and  other telephone numbers contained in
personnel records maintained by the public body  that is the employer or the recipient of volunteer
services. This exemption:
(a) Does not apply to the addresses, dates of birth and telephone  numbers of employees or vol-
unteers who are elected officials, except that a judge or district attorney subject  to election may
seek to exempt the judge’s  or district attorney’s address or telephone number, or both, under the
[25]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
terms of ORS 192.445;
(b) Does  not apply to employees or volunteers to the extent that the party seeking disclosure
shows by clear and convincing evidence that the public interest  requires disclosure in a particular
instance pursuant to ORS 192.437;
(c) Does not  apply to a substitute teacher as defined in ORS 342.815 when requested by a pro-
fessional education association of which the substitute teacher may be a member; and
(d) Does not relieve a public employer of any duty under ORS 243.650 to 243.782.
(4) Information submitted to  a public body in confidence and not otherwise required by law to
be submitted, where such information should reasonably be considered confidential, the public body
has obliged itself in good  faith not to disclose the information, and when the public interest would
suffer by the disclosure.
(5) Information or records of the Department of Corrections, including  the State Board of Parole
and Post-Prison Supervision, to the extent that disclosure would interfere with the rehabilitation of
a person in  custody of the department or substantially prejudice or prevent the carrying out of the
functions of the department, if the public interest in confidentiality clearly outweighs the public in-
terest in disclosure.
(6) Records, reports and other information received or compiled by the Director of  the Depart-
ment of Consumer and Business Services in the administration of ORS chapters  723 and 725 not
otherwise required by law to  be made public, to the extent that the interests of lending institutions,
their officers, employees and customers  in preserving the confidentiality of such information out-
weighs the public interest in disclosure.
(7) Reports made to or filed with the court under ORS 137.077 or 137.530.
(8) Any public records  or information the disclosure of which is prohibited by federal law or
regulations.
(9)(a) Public records  or information the disclosure of which is prohibited or restricted or other-
wise made confidential or privileged under Oregon law.
(b) Subject to  ORS 192.423, paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to factual information
compiled in a public record when:
(A) The basis for the claim of exemption is ORS 40.225;
(B) The factual information is not prohibited from  disclosure under any applicable state or fed-
eral law, regulation or court  order and is not otherwise exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.410
to 192.505;
(C) The factual information was compiled by or at  the direction of an attorney as part of an
investigation on behalf of  the public body in response to information of possible wrongdoing by the
public body;
(D) The  factual information was not compiled in preparation for litigation, arbitration or an
administrative proceeding that was reasonably likely  to be initiated or that has been initiated by
or against the public body; and
(E) The holder of the privilege under ORS 40.225 has made or authorized a public  statement
characterizing or partially disclosing  the factual information compiled by or at the attorney’s di-
rection.
(10) Public records or information  described in this section, furnished by the public body ori-
ginally compiling, preparing or receiving  them to any other public officer or public body in con-
nection with performance of the duties of the recipient, if the  considerations originally giving rise
to the confidential or exempt nature of the public records or information remain applicable.
[26]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(11) Records of the Energy Facility Siting Council concerning the  review or approval of security
programs pursuant to ORS 469.530.
(12) Employee and retiree address,  telephone number and other nonfinancial membership records
and employee financial records maintained by the Public Employees Retirement System pursuant  to
ORS chapters 238 and 238A.
(13) Records of or submitted to  the State Treasurer, the Oregon Investment Department,  the
Oregon Investment Council , the Oregon Growth Board  or the agents of the State Treasurer , de-
partment, [ or the ] council  or board  relating to  active or proposed publicly traded investments un-
der ORS chapter 293  or 348, including but not limited to records regarding the acquisition, exchange
or liquidation of the investments. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) The exemption does not apply to:
(A) Information in  investment records solely related to the amount paid directly into an invest-
ment by, or returned  from the investment directly to, the State Treasurer , department, council
or board [ or council ]; or
(B) The identity of the entity to which the amount was paid directly or from which the amount
was received directly.
(b) An  investment in a publicly traded investment is no longer active when acquisition, exchange
or liquidation of the investment has been finally concluded.
(14)(a) Records of  or submitted to the State Treasurer, the Oregon Investment Department,
the Oregon Investment  Council, the Oregon Growth Board or the agents of the State Treasurer,
department, council or board relating to  actual or proposed investments under ORS chapter 293
or 348 in a privately placed investment fund or a  private asset , including but not limited to records
regarding the solicitation, acquisition, deployment,  exchange or liquidation of the investments , and
including but not limited to:
(A) Due  diligence information or materials that are proprietary to , or treated as confidential
by a consultant or other agent of,  an investment fund, [ to] an asset ownership or [ to their re-
spective] related investment vehicles.
(B) Financial statements of an investment fund, an  asset ownership or [ their respective ] related
investment vehicles.
(C) Meeting materials of an investment  fund, an asset ownership or [ their respective ] related
investment vehicles.
(D) Records [ containing] or information regarding the portfolio positions in which an investment
fund, an asset ownership or [ their respective ] related investment vehicles invest.
(E) Capital call and distribution  notices of an investment fund, an asset ownership or [ their re-
spective] related investment vehicles.
(F) Investment agreements and related documents.
(b) The exemption under this subsection does not apply to:
(A) The name, address and vintage year of each privately placed investment fund.
(B) The dollar amount of the commitment made to each privately placed  investment fund since
inception of the fund.
(C) The dollar amount  of cash contributions made to each privately placed investment fund since
inception of the fund.
(D) The dollar amount,  on a fiscal year-end basis, of cash distributions received by the State
Treasurer, the Oregon Investment [ Council] Department , the Oregon Growth Board or the agents
of the State Treasurer, [ council] department or board from each privately placed investment fund.
[27]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(E) The dollar  amount, on a fiscal year-end basis, of the remaining value of assets in a privately
placed investment fund attributable to an investment by the State Treasurer,  the Oregon Investment
[Council] Department , the Oregon Growth Board or the agents of the State Treasurer, [ council]
department or board.
(F) The net internal  rate of return of each privately placed investment fund since inception of
the fund.
(G) The  investment multiple of each privately placed investment fund since inception of the fund.
(H) The dollar amount of  the total management fees and costs paid on an annual fiscal year-end
basis to each privately placed investment fund.
(I) The dollar amount of cash profit received  from each privately placed investment fund on a
fiscal year-end basis.
(15) The [ monthly reports prepared and submitted under ORS 293.761 and 293.766 ] information
provided by the Oregon Investment Department under section 3 (6) of this  2017 Act  concern-
ing the Public Employees  Retirement Fund and the Industrial Accident Fund may be uniformly
treated as exempt from disclosure  for a period of up to 90 days after the end of the calendar quarter.
(16) Reports of unclaimed property filed by the  holders of such property to the extent permitted
by ORS 98.352.
(17)(a) The following records, communications and  information submitted to the Oregon Business
Development Commission, the  Oregon Business Development Department, the State Department of
Agriculture, the Oregon Growth Board, the Port of  Portland or other ports as defined in ORS
777.005, or a county or  city governing body and any board, department, commission, council or
agency thereof, by applicants for investment funds, grants, loans, services or  economic development
moneys, support or assistance including, but not limited to, those described in ORS 285A.224:
(A) Personal financial statements.
(B) Financial statements of applicants.
(C) Customer lists.
(D) Information of an applicant pertaining to litigation to which the applicant is  a party if the
complaint has been filed, or if the  complaint has not been filed, if the applicant shows that such
litigation is reasonably  likely to occur; this exemption does not apply to litigation which has been
concluded, and nothing in this subparagraph shall limit any right or opportunity granted by  discov-
ery or deposition statutes to a party to litigation or potential litigation.
(E) Production, sales and cost data.
(F) Marketing strategy information that relates  to applicant’s plan to address specific markets
and applicant’s strategy regarding specific competitors.
(b) The  following records, communications and information submitted to the State Department
of Energy by applicants for tax credits or for grants awarded under ORS 469B.256:
(A) Personal financial statements.
(B) Financial statements of applicants.
(C) Customer lists.
(D) Information of an applicant pertaining to litigation to which the applicant is  a party if the
complaint has been filed, or if the  complaint has not been filed, if the applicant shows that such
litigation is reasonably  likely to occur; this exemption does not apply to litigation which has been
concluded, and nothing in this subparagraph shall limit any right or opportunity granted by  discov-
ery or deposition statutes to a party to litigation or potential litigation.
(E) Production, sales and cost data.
[28]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(F) Marketing strategy information that relates  to applicant’s plan to address specific markets
and applicant’s strategy regarding specific competitors.
(18) Records, reports or returns submitted by private concerns or enterprises required  by law
to be submitted to or inspected by a governmental body to allow it to determine the  amount of any
transient lodging tax payable and the  amounts of such tax payable or paid, to the extent that such
information is in a form which would permit identification of the  individual concern or enterprise.
Nothing in this subsection shall limit the use which  can be made of such information for regulatory
purposes or its admissibility in any  enforcement proceedings. The public body shall notify the tax-
payer of the delinquency immediately by  certified mail. However, in the event that the payment or
delivery of transient lodging taxes otherwise due to a public body is delinquent by over 60 days, the
public body shall disclose, upon the request of any person, the following information:
(a) The identity of the individual concern or enterprise that is delinquent over  60 days in the
payment or delivery of the taxes.
(b) The period for which the taxes are delinquent.
(c) The actual, or estimated, amount of the delinquency.
(19) All information supplied by a person under  ORS 151.485 for the purpose of requesting ap-
pointed counsel, and all information supplied to the court from whatever source  for the purpose of
verifying the financial eligibility of a person pursuant to ORS 151.485.
(20) Workers’ compensation claim records of the Department of Consumer and Business Services,
except in accordance with rules adopted by the Director  of the Department of Consumer and Busi-
ness Services, in any of the following circumstances:
(a) When necessary for insurers, self-insured  employers and third party claim administrators to
process workers’ compensation claims.
(b) When necessary for the director, other governmental agencies of this state or the  United
States to carry out their duties, functions or powers.
(c) When the disclosure is made in such a manner that the disclosed information cannot be used
to identify any worker who is the subject of a claim.
(d) When a worker or the worker’s  representative requests review of the worker’s claim record.
(21) Sensitive  business records or financial or commercial information of the Oregon Health and
Science University that is not customarily provided to business competitors.
(22) Records of Oregon Health and Science University regarding candidates for the position  of
president of the university.
(23) The records of a library, including:
(a) Circulation records, showing use of specific library material by a named person;
(b) The name of a library patron together with the address  or telephone number of the patron;
and
(c) The electronic mail address of a patron.
(24) The following records, communications  and information obtained by the Housing and Com-
munity Services Department in  connection with the department’s monitoring or administration of
financial assistance or of housing or other developments:
(a) Personal and corporate financial statements and information, including tax returns.
(b) Credit reports.
(c) Project appraisals, excluding appraisals obtained in the course of transactions  involving an
interest in real estate that is acquired, leased, rented, exchanged,  transferred or otherwise disposed
of as part of the project, but only after the transactions have closed and are concluded.
[29]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Market studies and analyses.
(e) Articles of incorporation, partnership agreements and operating agreements.
(f) Commitment letters.
(g) Project pro forma statements.
(h) Project cost certifications and cost data.
(i) Audits.
(j) Project tenant correspondence.
(k) Personal information about a tenant.
(L) Housing assistance payments.
(25) Raster geographic information system  (GIS) digital databases, provided by private forestland
owners or their representatives, voluntarily and in  confidence to the State Forestry Department,
that is not otherwise required by law to be submitted.
(26) Sensitive business, commercial or financial information furnished to or developed by a
public body engaged in the business  of providing electricity or electricity services, if the information
is directly related to a transaction described in ORS 261.348, or if  the information is directly related
to a bid, proposal or  negotiations for the sale or purchase of electricity or electricity services, and
disclosure of the information would cause a  competitive disadvantage for the public body or its re-
tail electricity customers. This subsection does not apply to cost-of-service studies used in the  de-
velopment or review of generally applicable rate schedules.
(27) Sensitive business, commercial or financial  information furnished to or developed by the
City of Klamath Falls, acting  solely in connection with the ownership and operation of the Klamath
Cogeneration Project, if the  information is directly related to a transaction described in ORS 225.085
and disclosure  of the information would cause a competitive disadvantage for the Klamath
Cogeneration Project. This subsection does not  apply to cost-of-service studies used in the develop-
ment or review of generally applicable rate schedules.
(28) Personally identifiable information about customers of a municipal electric  utility or a
people’s utility district or the names, dates of birth,  driver license numbers, telephone numbers,
electronic mail addresses or Social Security numbers of customers  who receive water, sewer or
storm drain services from a public  body as defined in ORS 174.109. The utility or district may re-
lease personally identifiable information about a customer, and a  public body providing water, sewer
or storm drain services may release the  name, date of birth, driver license number, telephone num-
ber, electronic mail address or Social Security number of a customer, if the customer consents  in
writing or electronically, if the disclosure is necessary for the utility, district  or other public body
to render services to the customer, if the disclosure is required pursuant to  a court order or if the
disclosure is otherwise required by federal or  state law. The utility, district or other public body
may charge as appropriate for the costs of providing such information. The utility, district  or other
public body may make customer records available to third  party credit agencies on a regular basis
in connection with the establishment and  management of customer accounts or in the event such
accounts are delinquent.
(29) A record of the street and number of an employee’s  address submitted to a special district
to obtain assistance in promoting an alternative to single occupant motor vehicle transportation.
(30) Sensitive  business records, capital development plans or financial or commercial information
of Oregon Corrections Enterprises that is not customarily provided to business competitors.
(31) Documents, materials or other information submitted to the Director of  the Department of
Consumer and Business Services in confidence by a state, federal, foreign or international regulatory
[30]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or law  enforcement agency or by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates
or subsidiaries under ORS 86A.095 to 86A.198, 697.005 to 697.095, 697.602  to 697.842, 705.137, 717.200
to 717.320, 717.900 or 717.905, ORS chapter  59, 723, 725 or 726, the Bank Act or the Insurance Code
when:
(a) The document, material or other information is received  upon notice or with an under-
standing that  it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of
the document, material or other information; and
(b) The director has obligated the Department  of Consumer and Business Services not to dis-
close the document, material or other information.
(32) A county elections security plan developed and filed under ORS 254.074.
(33) Information about review or approval of programs relating to the security of:
(a) Generation, storage or conveyance of:
(A) Electricity;
(B) Gas in liquefied or gaseous form;
(C) Hazardous substances as defined in ORS 453.005 (7)(a), (b) and (d);
(D) Petroleum products;
(E) Sewage; or
(F) Water.
(b) Telecommunication systems, including cellular, wireless or radio systems.
(c) Data transmissions by whatever means provided.
(34) The information specified in ORS 25.020 (8) if the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court  des-
ignates the information as confidential by rule under ORS 1.002.
(35)(a) Employer account records of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(b) As used in this subsection, “employer account records” means  all records maintained in any
form that are specifically related to the account of any employer insured, previously insured or  un-
der consideration to  be insured by the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation and any infor-
mation obtained or developed by the  corporation in connection with providing, offering to provide
or declining to provide insurance to a specific employer. “Employer  account records” includes, but
is not limited to, an employer’s payroll records, premium payment history, payroll  classifications,
employee names and identification information, experience modification factors, loss experience  and
dividend payment history.
(c) The exemption provided by this subsection may not serve as the  basis for opposition to the
discovery documents in litigation pursuant to applicable rules of civil procedure.
(36)(a) Claimant files of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(b) As used in this subsection, “claimant files”  includes, but is not limited to, all records held
by the corporation pertaining to a person who has made a  claim, as defined in ORS 656.005, and all
records pertaining to such a claim.
(c) The exemption provided by this subsection may not serve as the  basis for opposition to the
discovery documents in litigation pursuant to applicable rules of civil procedure.
(37) Except as authorized  by ORS 408.425, records that certify or verify an individual’s discharge
or other separation from military service.
(38) Records of or submitted to a domestic violence service or resource center that relate  to the
name or personal information of an individual who visits a center for service, including the  date of
service, the type of service received, referrals or  contact information or personal information of a
family member of the individual. As used in this subsection, “domestic  violence service or resource
[31]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
center” means an entity, the primary purpose of which is to  assist persons affected by domestic or
sexual violence by  providing referrals, resource information or other assistance specifically of ben-
efit to domestic or sexual violence victims.
(39) Information reported to the Oregon Health Authority under  ORS 431A.860, except as pro-
vided in ORS 431A.860 (2)(b) information disclosed by  the authority under ORS 431A.865 and any
information related to  disclosures made by the authority under ORS 431A.865, including information
identifying the recipient of the information.
(40)(a) Electronic mail addresses  in the possession or custody of an agency or subdivision of the
executive department, as  defined in ORS 174.112, a local government or local service district, as
defined in ORS 174.116, or a special government body, as defined in ORS 174.117.
(b) This subsection does not apply to electronic mail addresses assigned  by a public body to
public employees for use by the employees in the ordinary course of their employment.
(41) Residential addresses, residential telephone numbers,  personal cellular telephone numbers,
personal electronic mail  addresses, driver license numbers, emergency contact information, Social
Security numbers, dates of birth and other telephone  numbers of individuals currently or previously
certified or licensed by the Department of  Public Safety Standards and Training contained in the
records maintained by the department.
(42) Personally identifiable  information and contact information of veterans as defined in ORS
408.225 and  of persons serving on active duty or as reserve members with the Armed Forces of the
United States, National Guard or other reserve component that was obtained by the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs in the course of performing its duties and functions,  including but not limited to
names, residential and employment addresses, dates of birth,  driver license numbers, telephone
numbers, electronic mail addresses, Social Security numbers, marital  status, dependents, the char-
acter of discharge  from military service, military rating or rank, that the person is a veteran or has
provided military service, information relating to an application for or receipt  of federal or state
benefits, information  relating to the basis for receipt or denial of federal or state benefits and in-
formation relating to a home loan or grant application, including  but not limited to financial infor-
mation provided in connection with the application.
SECTION 52.
 ORS 238A.050 is amended to read:
238A.050. (1) The Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan is part  of the Public Employees Re-
tirement System and is administered by the Public Employees Retirement Board.
(2) ORS 238.008,  238.225, 238.229, 238.231, 238.285, 238.410, 238.445, 238.447, 238.450, 238.455,
238.458, 238.460, 238.465, 238.470, 238.600, 238.601, 238.605, 238.610, 238.615, 238.618, 238.630, 238.635,
238.640, 238.645, 238.655, 238.660, 238.661, 238.665, 238.675, 238.692, 238.694, 238.695, 238.696, 238.698,
238.700, 238.705, 238.710 and 238.715 apply to the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan.
(3) The Oregon Investment [ Council] Department shall invest the  assets of the Oregon Public
Service Retirement Plan as a part of the Public Employees  Retirement Fund. Except as provided by
subsection (4) of this section,  the investment of Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan assets is
subject to the  provisions of ORS 293.701 to 293.857. The Oregon Investment [ Council] Department
may invest assets of the individual account  program and pension program differently than the other
assets of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(4) Investment of the assets  of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan is not subject to the
limitations imposed by ORS 293.726 (6).
(5) The board may contract with a  private provider for the administration of the individual ac-
count program. The board is not subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 279A  or 279B in awarding
[32]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a contract under the provisions of this subsection. The board  shall establish procedures for inviting
proposals and awarding contracts under this subsection.
SECTION 53.  ORS 243.401 is amended to read:
243.401. As used in ORS 243.401 to 243.507:
(1) “Board” means the Public Employees Retirement Board described in ORS 238.630.
(2) “Council” means the Oregon Investment Council created  [ by ORS 293.706 ] under section 5
of this 2017 Act .
(3) “Deferred compensation contract” means a written agreement entered into  by the state and
an eligible state employee under the provisions of ORS 243.440.
(4) “Deferred compensation  investment program” means the program established by the Oregon
Investment [ Council] Department under ORS 243.421, for investment of assets  of the Deferred
Compensation Fund.
(5) “Deferred  compensation plan” means a plan established by the state or a local government
for the deferral of compensation payable to employees of the state or  local government and for the
deferral of income taxation on that compensation.
(6) “Eligible state employee” means an officer or employee  of a state board, commission, de-
partment or other instrumentality of state  government, including, but not limited to, all officers and
employees of the executive, judicial and legislative branches of state government, but excluding:
(a) Persons  engaged as independent contractors, except as otherwise specifically allowed by
statute;
(b) Persons who are employed in emergency work and whose periods of employment are on an
intermittent or irregular basis; and
(c) Persons who are provided sheltered  employment or make-work by the state in an employment
or industries program maintained for the benefit of such individuals.
(7) “Fund” means the Deferred Compensation Fund established under ORS 243.411.
(8) “Local government” means a city, county, municipal or public corporation, any  political
subdivision of the  state or any instrumentality thereof, or an agency created by two or more such
political subdivisions to provide themselves governmental services.
(9) “Local government deferred compensation plan” means a deferred compensation  plan that is
established and administered by a local government.
(10) “Local plan participant” means a person participating in a local  government deferred com-
pensation plan.
(11) “Participating local  government” means a local government that invests all or part of the
assets of the  deferred compensation plan established by the local government through the deferred
compensation investment program.
(12) “State deferred compensation plan” means the  deferred compensation plan described in ORS
243.435 for eligible state employees.
(13) “State plan participant” means a person participating  in the state deferred compensation
plan, either through current or past deferrals of compensation.
(14) “System” means the Public Employees Retirement System established in ORS 238.600.
SECTION 54.
 ORS 243.421 is amended to read:
243.421. (1) The Oregon Investment [ Council] Department shall establish a program for invest-
ment of moneys in the Deferred Compensation Fund. The  program shall include policies and proce-
dures for  the investment of moneys in the fund. The program and all investments of moneys under
the program are subject to the provisions of ORS 293.701 to 293.857.
[33]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The [ council] department shall provide to the Public Employees Retirement Board a de-
scription  of  the investment options set forth in the [ council’s] department’s policies and procedures
for the investment of moneys in the fund, the applicable  benchmark for each option and a de-
scription of the characteristics of each benchmark.
(3) The provisions of ORS chapter 59 that require registration of securities do not apply  to any
share, participation or other interest in the  state deferred compensation plan or in the Deferred
Compensation Fund. The provisions of ORS chapter 59 requiring  licensing of certain persons as
broker-dealers or as investment advisors  do not apply to any of the following persons or entities for
the purposes of  implementing and administering the deferred compensation investment program es-
tablished under this section:
(a) The Oregon Investment  Council.
(b) The Oregon Investment Department.
[(b)] (c) The Public Employees Retirement Board.
[(c)] (d) The Public Employees Retirement System.
[(d)] (e) The State Treasurer.
[(e)] (f) Any officer or employee of the persons or entities described in paragraphs (a) to [ (d)]
(e) of this subsection.
SECTION 55.  ORS 243.426 is amended to read:
243.426. (1) On request from the Public Employees Retirement Board, the  State Treasurer shall
establish all accounts in the Deferred Compensation Fund that are necessary to administer the
provisions of ORS 243.401 to 243.507.
(2) The accounts shall  be established and maintained with the charges assessed under ORS
243.472 against the account balances of the state plan participants and the  funds invested by par-
ticipating local governments. The moneys held in the accounts established  by the board may be used
only for payment of the administrative expenses incurred by the system, the State Treasurer , the
Oregon Investment Department  and the Oregon Investment Council  in administering the pro-
visions of ORS 243.401 to 243.507.
SECTION 56.
 ORS 243.472 is amended to read:
243.472. (1)  ORS 243.401 to 243.507 shall be implemented and administered by the Public Em-
ployees Retirement Board so that no expense is  incurred by the State of Oregon or the Public Em-
ployees Retirement Fund and so that the State of Oregon and the Public Employees  Retirement
System incur no liabilities other  than those liabilities that may be imposed under ORS 243.401 to
243.507 or other law. In addition to the amounts that may be deducted by  the  Oregon Investment
Department or the  State Treasurer pursuant to ORS 293.718, the Public  Employees Retirement
System may assess a charge against the accounts of state plan participants  in the Deferred Com-
pensation Fund. The charge may not exceed  two percent of the balances of those accounts. Funds
collected pursuant to the charge are continuously appropriated for and  shall be used only to cover
the costs  incurred by the system to administer the state deferred compensation plan, to issue refunds
and to pay costs incurred in investing the plan assets.
(2) For the purpose of implementing  and administering the provisions of ORS 243.401 to 243.507,
including implementation and administration of  service agreements entered into with local govern-
ments under ORS 243.478, the Public Employees Retirement Board may designate fiscal periods. The
board may apportion extraordinary expenses incurred  during any fiscal period, including but not
limited to expenses for equipment and actuarial studies,  to subsequent fiscal periods for purposes
of equitably distributing the burden of the expenses. The board may carry forward unexpended fees
[34]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
collected in one fiscal period to a later fiscal period for the payment of future expenses.
(3) In the event the assessment provided for in subsection (1)  of this section is inadequate to
meet the administrative expenses incurred by the system for the state deferred compensation plan,
and these expenses are not carried over to another fiscal period, the excess expenses may be  paid
by an additional one-time assessment  against the account balances of state plan participants in the
Deferred Compensation Fund. The additional assessment shall be in an amount determined by  the
Public Employees Retirement Board to be sufficient to  pay the excess expenses in the fiscal period
in which the assessment is made.  The one-time assessment is in addition to the regular assessment
provided for in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Deferred compensation benefit payments, and amounts payable as refunds,  shall not for any
purpose be deemed expenses of the  board and shall not be included in its biennial departmental
budget.
SECTION 57.
 ORS 243.474 is amended to read:
243.474. (1) A local government that establishes a deferred compensation plan may invest all  or
part of the plan’s assets through the deferred compensation investment program  established by the
Oregon Investment [ Council] Department under ORS 243.421. Plan assets of a local government
deferred compensation plan invested through the deferred compensation investment program are  not
subject to the limitations on investment imposed by ORS 294.033 and 294.035. Local  governments
that invest through the deferred  compensation investment program are subject to the policies and
procedures established by the [ council] department for the administration of the program.
(2) A local government that wishes to  become a participating local government pursuant to this
section must enter into a written agreement with the Public Employees Retirement System.  The
agreement must set forth the terms of the investment and the record  keeping and related services
to be performed by the system for the invested funds. The Public Employees Retirement Board may
require that the local government enter into a service agreement under ORS 243.478  as a condition
of an agreement under this subsection. If the local government and the system  cannot reach an
agreement under the provisions of this subsection, the local government  may not become a partic-
ipating local government.
(3) All funds invested by the [ council] department for a participating local government must be
accounted for separately. Investment of funds under this section must be implemented and admin-
istered so that the State of Oregon incurs no expense or liability other than those liabilities that
may be imposed under ORS 243.401 to 243.507 or other law.
(4) In addition to those amounts that may be deducted  by the  department or the  State Treas-
urer pursuant to ORS 293.718, the  system may assess a charge against the total account balances
of all participating local governments that is sufficient  to reimburse the system for any additional
costs  of  investing funds for participating local governments. The Public Employees Retirement Board
shall not act as  a trustee or be considered the trustee of any trust established by a local government
deferred compensation plan.
(5) The terms of the agreement provided for in subsection (2) of this  section shall govern the
nature and extent of the information that must be provided to local government officers  and em-
ployees about the investment of  deferred compensation through the deferred compensation invest-
ment program.
SECTION 58.
 ORS 243.476 is amended to read:
243.476. (1) As a condition of allowing a local government to become  a participating local gov-
ernment, and at any time thereafter, the Oregon  Investment [ Council] Department , the Public Em-
[35]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ployees Retirement Board or the Director of the Public Employees Retirement System  may require
that the local government provide proof that the local government deferred compensation plan
complies with the provisions of section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, that  apply
to governmental plans, including but not  limited to any required declaration of trust related to plan
assets and appointment of a trustee. The [ council] department , board  or director may require an
opinion of counsel or other assurance satisfactory  to the [ council] department , board or director
that participation of a local government deferred compensation plan in the deferred compensation
investment program does not  cause the State of Oregon, its agencies or employees to violate any
federal or state laws or regulations related to investments and securities.
(2) Participating local governments shall take all actions that the Oregon Investment [ Council]
Department, the Public Employees Retirement Board or the Director of the Public  Employees Re-
tirement System, in their discretion, deem necessary for compliance by the deferred  compensation
investment program with all applicable federal and state laws or for qualification  of the program for
any exemptions from  regulation available under those laws, including but not limited to the federal
Securities Act of 1933, as amended, the  Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, and ORS
chapter 59.
SECTION 59.
 ORS 243.478 is amended to read:
243.478. (1) A participating local government and the Public Employees Retirement System may
enter into a written agreement for the system to provide consolidated billing  services, participant
enrollment services, participant accounts, data  processing, record keeping and other related services
that are necessary or appropriate to the administration of the local government  deferred compen-
sation plan. The agreement may provide that the services  be provided directly by the system or
through contracts with other providers.
(2) Agreements under  this section must require that the participating local government remain
the responsible administrator for the local government deferred compensation plan. The agreement
may provide any additional terms and  conditions that the system determines necessary for the pur-
poses of offering the services described in subsection (1) of  this section to local government deferred
compensation plans, including proof of compliance under ORS 243.476. The system  may require that
participating local governments that enter into agreements with the system under  this section have
uniform provisions on plan administration and record keeping.
(3) The system may assess a charge, in an  amount to be determined by the system, against the
total account balances in the Deferred Compensation Fund of all local governments that have  en-
tered into service  agreements under this section. The charge imposed under this subsection is in
addition to any  charges that may be assessed against local governments by the system under ORS
243.474 or deducted by the Oregon Investment  Department or the  State Treasurer under ORS
293.718.
(4) In the event the assessment provided  for in subsection (3) of this section is inadequate to
meet the administrative expenses incurred by the system  for local government deferred compen-
sation plans during a fiscal period, and the expenses  are not carried over to another fiscal period
pursuant to ORS 243.472 (2), the excess expenses may be paid by an additional one-time assessment
against the  account balances in the Deferred Compensation Fund of participating local governments
that have entered into service agreements under this section.
SECTION 60.
 ORS 243.482 is amended to read:
243.482. (1) A civil action for damages may not be brought against the state, the State Treasurer,
the Oregon Investment Department,  the Oregon Investment Council, the  Public Employees Re-
[36]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tirement Board, or the officers or employees of the department, council or  board by reason of:
(a) A breach of any duty in administering or investing of funds  in the Deferred Compensation
Fund;
(b) A breach of any  duty in administering or investing of the funds of participating local gov-
ernments; or
(c) Any losses  suffered by a state plan participant or local plan participant or the beneficiaries
of those participants because of the participant’s choice of an investment option  available through
the deferred compensation investment program established under ORS 243.421.
(2) Any claim that the state, the department,  the council, the board, the State Treasurer or
the system, or any of their officers or employees, violated  federal or state securities laws, including
antifraud provisions, in the implementation or administration of ORS 243.401 to 243.507  is subject
to the provisions of ORS 30.260 to 30.300. With respect to  such claims, the state shall defend, save
harmless and indemnify the state,  the State Treasurer, the system, the department,  members of
the council, the board, and their officers and employees, as provided for other  torts under the pro-
visions of ORS 30.260 to 30.300.
(3) The limitations on liability established by this  section do not include an exemption from any
liability that may be imposed under the provisions  of ORS chapter 59. Except to the extent that the
state deferred compensation plan and the deferred compensation investment program are  exempted
from registration and licensing requirements under ORS 243.421,  ORS chapter 59 applies to the ad-
ministration and investment of the Deferred Compensation Fund, the state deferred  compensation
plan, local government deferred compensation plans and  the deferred compensation investment pro-
gram.
SECTION 61.  ORS 244.020 is amended to read:
244.020. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Actual conflict of interest”  means any action or any decision or recommendation by a per-
son acting  in a capacity as a public official, the effect of which would be to the private pecuniary
benefit or detriment of the person or the person’s relative or any business with which  the person
or a relative of the person is associated unless the pecuniary benefit or detriment arises out of cir-
cumstances described in subsection (13) of this section.
(2) “Business” means any corporation, partnership, proprietorship, firm, enterprise,  franchise,
association, organization, self-employed individual  and any other legal entity operated for economic
gain but excluding any income-producing not-for-profit corporation that is tax exempt under  section
501(c) of the Internal  Revenue Code with which a public official or a relative of the public official
is associated only as a member or board director or in a nonremunerative capacity.
(3) “Business with which the person is associated” means:
(a) Any private business or closely held corporation of which the person or  the person’s relative
is a director, officer, owner or employee, or agent or any private business or  closely held corpo-
ration in which the person or the person’s relative owns or has owned stock, another form of equity
interest, stock options or debt instruments worth $1,000  or more at any point in the preceding cal-
endar year;
(b) Any publicly held corporation in which the person  or the person’s relative owns or has
owned $100,000 or more in stock or another form of equity interest,  stock options or debt instru-
ments at any point in the preceding calendar year;
(c) Any publicly held corporation of which  the person or the person’s relative is a director or
officer;  or
[37]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) For public officials required to file a statement of  economic interest under ORS 244.050, any
business listed as a source of income as required under ORS 244.060 (3).
(4) “Candidate” means an  individual for whom a declaration of candidacy, nominating petition
or certificate of nomination to public office has been filed or whose name  is printed on a ballot or
is expected to be or has been presented,  with the individual’s consent, for nomination or election to
public office.
(5) “Development commission” means any entity that has  the authority to purchase, develop,
improve or lease land or the authority to  operate or direct the use of land. This authority must be
more than ministerial.
(6) “First Partner” means the spouse or  domestic partner of the Governor, or an individual who
primarily has a personal relationship with the Governor as determined by the Oregon Government
Ethics Commission by rule. “First  Partner” encompasses any alternative title that the Governor may
publicly substitute for “First Partner,” including, but not limited  to, “First Lady,” “First Husband”
or “First Spouse.”
(7)(a) “Gift”  means something of economic value given to a public official, a candidate or a rel-
ative or member of the household of the public official or candidate:
(A) Without valuable consideration of equivalent value, including the full or  partial forgiveness
of indebtedness, which is not extended to others who are not public officials or  candidates or the
relatives or members of the household  of public officials or candidates on the same terms and con-
ditions; or
(B) For  valuable consideration less than that required from others who are not public officials
or candidates.
(b) “Gift” does not mean:
(A) Contributions as defined in ORS 260.005.
(B) Gifts from relatives or members of the household of the public official or candidate.
(C) An unsolicited token or award of appreciation in the form of a plaque,  trophy, desk item,
wall memento or similar item, with a resale value reasonably expected to be less than $25.
(D) Informational or program material, publications or subscriptions  related to the recipient’s
performance of official duties.
(E) Admission  provided to or the cost of food or beverage consumed by a public official, a rel-
ative of the public official accompanying the public official, a member of the household of the  public
official accompanying the public official or a staff member of  the public official accompanying the
public official, at  a reception, meal or meeting held by an organization when the public official re-
presents state government as defined in ORS 174.111, a local government as  defined in ORS 174.116
or a special government body as defined in ORS 174.117.
(F) Reasonable expenses paid by any unit of the federal government, a state or local government,
a Native American tribe that is recognized by federal law  or formally acknowledged by a state, a
membership organization to which a  public body as defined in ORS 174.109 pays membership dues
or a not-for-profit corporation that  is tax exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code, for attendance at a convention, fact-finding mission or trip, conference or other meeting if  the
public official is scheduled to deliver  a speech, make a presentation, participate on a panel or rep-
resent state government as defined in ORS 174.111, a local government as defined  in ORS 174.116
or a special government body as defined in ORS 174.117.
(G) Contributions made to a legal expense trust fund established under ORS 244.209  for the
benefit of the public official.
[38]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(H) Reasonable food, travel or lodging expenses provided to a public official, a  relative of the
public official accompanying the public official, a member of the household of the public official ac-
companying the public official or a staff member of the public official accompanying the public offi-
cial, when the public official  is representing state government as defined in ORS 174.111, a local
government as defined in ORS 174.116 or a special government body as defined in ORS 174.117:
(i) On an officially sanctioned trade-promotion or fact-finding mission; or
(ii) In officially designated negotiations, or economic development activities, where receipt of the
expenses is approved in advance.
(I) Food or beverage consumed by a public official acting in an official capacity:
(i) In association with the review, approval, execution of documents or closing of a borrowing,
investment or other financial transaction, including  any business agreement between state govern-
ment as defined in ORS 174.111, a  local government as defined in ORS 174.116 or a special govern-
ment body as defined in ORS 174.117 and a private entity or  public body as defined in ORS 174.109;
(ii) While  engaged in due diligence research or presentations by the office of the State
Treasurer , the Oregon Investment Department or the Oregon Investment Council  related to
an existing or proposed investment or borrowing; or
(iii) While engaged in a meeting of an  advisory, governance or policy-making body of a corpo-
ration, partnership or other entity in which the office of the State Treasurer , the Oregon Invest-
ment Department or the Oregon Investment Council  has invested moneys.
(J) Waiver or discount of registration expenses or materials  provided to a public official or
candidate at a  continuing education event that the public official or candidate may attend to satisfy
a professional licensing requirement.
(K) Expenses provided by one public official to another public official for travel  inside this state
to or from an event that bears a relationship to the  receiving public official’s office and at which
the official participates in an official capacity.
(L) Food or beverage consumed by  a public official or candidate at a reception where the food
or beverage is provided as an incidental part of  the reception and no cost is placed on the food or
beverage.
(M) Entertainment provided  to a public official or candidate or a relative or member of the
household of the public official or candidate that is incidental to the main purpose of another event.
(N) Entertainment provided to  a public official or a relative or member of the household of the
public official where the public official is acting in an official capacity while  representing state
government as defined in ORS 174.111, a local government as defined in  ORS 174.116 or a special
government body as defined in ORS 174.117 for a ceremonial purpose.
(O) Anything of economic value offered to or solicited or received by a public  official or candi-
date, or a relative or member of the household of the public official or candidate:
(i) As part of the usual and customary practice of the person’s private  business, or the person’s
employment or position  as a volunteer with a private business, corporation, partnership,
proprietorship,  firm,  enterprise, franchise, association, organization, not-for-profit corporation or
other legal entity operated for economic value; and
(ii) That  bears no relationship to the public official’s or candidate’s holding of, or candidacy for,
the official position or public office.
(P) Reasonable expenses paid to a public school  employee for accompanying students on an ed-
ucational trip.
(8) “Honorarium” means a payment or something of economic value given  to a public official in
[39]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
exchange for services upon which custom or propriety prevents the setting of  a price. Services in-
clude, but are not limited to, speeches or other services rendered in connection with an event.
(9) “Income”  means income of any nature derived from any source, including, but not limited to,
any salary, wage, advance, payment, dividend, interest, rent, honorarium, return  of capital,
forgiveness of indebtedness, or anything of economic value.
(10) “Legislative or administrative interest” means an economic interest, distinct  from that of
the general public, in:
(a) Any matter subject to the decision or vote of the public official acting in the public official’s
capacity as a public official; or
(b) Any matter that would be subject to the decision or vote of  the candidate who, if elected,
would be acting in the capacity of a public official.
(11) “Member of the household” means any person who resides with the  public official or can-
didate.
(12) “Planning  commission” means a county planning commission created under ORS chapter 215
or a city planning commission created under ORS chapter 227.
(13) “Potential conflict of interest” means any action  or any decision or recommendation by a
person acting in a capacity as a public official, the effect of which could be  to the private pecuniary
benefit or detriment of the  person or the person’s relative, or a business with which the person or
the person’s relative is associated, unless the pecuniary benefit or detriment arises out of  the fol-
lowing:
(a) An interest or membership in a  particular business, industry, occupation or other class re-
quired by law as a prerequisite to the holding by the person of the office or position.
(b) Any action in the person’s official capacity which would affect to the  same degree a class
consisting of all inhabitants of the state, or a smaller class consisting of an  industry, occupation or
other group including one of which or in which the person, or the person’s relative or business with
which the person or the person’s relative is associated, is a member or is engaged.
(c) Membership in or membership on the board of directors of a nonprofit corporation  that is
tax-exempt under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(14) “Public office” has the meaning given that term in ORS 260.005.
(15) “Public official” means the First Partner and any person  who, when an alleged violation
of this chapter occurs,  is serving the State of Oregon or any of its political subdivisions or any other
public body as defined in ORS 174.109 as an elected official, appointed  official, employee or agent,
irrespective of whether the person is compensated for the services.
(16) “Relative” means:
(a) The spouse, parent, stepparent, child, sibling, stepsibling, son-in-law or daughter-in-law of  the
public official or candidate;
(b) The parent, stepparent, child, sibling, stepsibling, son-in-law  or daughter-in-law of the spouse
of the public official or candidate;
(c) Any individual for whom the public official or candidate has a legal support obligation;
(d) Any individual for whom the public official provides benefits arising  from the public official’s
public employment or from whom the public official receives benefits arising from that  individual’s
employment; or
(e) Any individual from whom the candidate receives benefits arising  from that individual’s em-
ployment.
(17) “Statement of economic interest” means a statement as described by ORS 244.060 or 244.070.
[40]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(18) “Zoning commission” means an entity to which  is delegated at least some of the discre-
tionary authority of a planning commission or governing body relating  to zoning and land use mat-
ters.
SECTION 62.  ORS 244.045 is amended to read:
244.045. (1) A person  who has been a Public Utility Commissioner, the Director of the Depart-
ment of Consumer and Business Services, the Administrator of the Division of  Finance and Corpo-
rate Securities, the Administrator of the Insurance  Division, the Administrator of the Oregon Liquor
Control Commission or the Director of the Oregon State Lottery shall not:
(a) Within one year after the public official ceases to hold the  position become an employee of
or receive any financial gain, other than reimbursement of expenses, from any  private employer
engaged in the activity,  occupation or industry over which the former public official had authority;
or
(b) Within two years after the public official ceases to hold the position:
(A) Be a lobbyist for or  appear as a representative before the agency over which the person
exercised authority as a public official;
(B) Influence or try to influence the actions of the agency; or
(C) Disclose any confidential information gained as a public official.
(2) A person who has  been a Deputy Attorney General or an assistant attorney general shall
not, within  two years after the person ceases to hold the position, lobby or appear before an agency
that the person represented while employed by the Department of Justice.
(3) A person who has been the State Treasurer or the Deputy State Treasurer shall not, within
one year after ceasing to hold office:
(a) Accept  employment from or be retained by any private entity with whom the office of the
State Treasurer or the  Oregon Investment [ Council] Department negotiated or to whom either
awarded a contract providing for payment by the state of at least $25,000  in any single year during
the term of office of the treasurer;
(b) Accept  employment from or be retained by any private entity with whom the office of the
State Treasurer or  the Oregon Investment [ Council] Department placed at least $50,000 of invest-
ment moneys in any single year during the term of office of the treasurer; or
(c) Be a lobbyist  for an investment institution, manager or consultant, or appear before the of-
fice of the State Treasurer , the Oregon Investment Department  or the Oregon Investment
Council as a representative of an investment institution, manager or consultant.
(4)(a) A public official who , as part of the official’s  duties , invested public funds shall not within
two years after the public official ceases to hold the position:
[(a)] (A) Be  a lobbyist or appear as a representative before the agency, board or commission for
which the former public official invested public funds;
[(b)] (B) Influence or try to influence the agency, board or commission; or
[(c)] (C) Disclose any confidential information gained as a public official.
(b) Paragraph (a)(A) and (B) of this  subsection does not apply to an individual who is
employed by the  Oregon Investment Department and who, as part of the individual’s duties,
invested public funds.
(5)(a) A  person who has been a member of the Department of State Police, who has held a po-
sition with the department with the responsibility for supervising, directing or  administering pro-
grams relating to gaming by a Native American tribe  or the Oregon State Lottery and who has been
designated by the Superintendent of State Police by rule  shall not, within one year after the member
[41]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the Department of State Police ceases to hold the position:
(A) Accept employment from  or be retained by or receive any financial gain related to gaming
from the Oregon State Lottery or any Native American tribe;
(B) Accept employment from or be retained by or receive any financial gain from  any private
employer selling or offering to sell gaming products or services;
(C) Influence or try to influence the actions of the Department of State Police; or
(D) Disclose any confidential information gained as a member of the Department  of State Police.
(b) This subsection does not apply to:
(A) Appointment or employment of a person as an Oregon State Lottery Commissioner or as  a
Tribal Gaming Commissioner or regulatory agent thereof;
(B) Contracting with the Oregon State Lottery as a lottery game retailer;
(C) Financial gain received from personal gaming activities conducted as a private citizen; or
(D) Subsequent employment in any capacity by the Department of State Police.
(c) As used in this subsection, “Native American tribe” means any recognized  Native American
tribe or band of tribes authorized by the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act of October  17, 1988 (Public
Law 100-497), 25 U.S.C. 2701 et seq., to conduct gambling operations on tribal land.
(6) A person who has been a member of the Legislative Assembly may not receive money  or any
other consideration  for lobbying as defined in ORS 171.725 performed during the period beginning
on the date the person ceases to be a member of the Legislative Assembly and ending  on the date
of adjournment sine die of the next regular session of the Legislative Assembly that  begins after the
date the person ceases to be a member of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 63.
 ORS 244.047 is amended to read:
244.047. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(b) “Public contract” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4)  of this section, a person who ceases to hold a position
as a public official may not have  a direct beneficial financial interest in a public contract described
in subsection (3) of this section for two years after the date the contract was authorized.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section applies to a public contract that was authorized by:
(a) The person acting in the capacity of a public official; or
(b) A board, commission, council, bureau, committee or other governing  body of a public body
of which the person was a member when the contract was authorized.
(4) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to :
(a) A person who was a member of a board, commission, council, bureau,  committee or other
governing  body  of a public body when the contract was authorized, but who did not participate in
the authorization of the contract ; or
(b) An employee of the office of the State  Treasurer who is subsequently employed by the
Oregon Investment Department .
SECTION 64.
 ORS 244.050 is amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file  with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission  a verified statement of economic interest as required under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor,  Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal judges,  except any pro tem
[42]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives.
(g) The  president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Office of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(EE) Administrator of the Office for Oregon Health Policy and Research.
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
[43]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) Public defense services executive director.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs  the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan service  district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial  officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards and commissions:
(A) Board of Geologic and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
[44]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
[(C) Director of the Investment Division. ]
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to 777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of the  board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the board of directors of an authority created under ORS  465.600 to
465.621.
(w) The Chief Executive Officer of the Oregon Investment Department.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a board or commission listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file  with the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics  Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By  April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate described
in subsection (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest  as
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Within 30 days after the filing deadline for  the general election, each candidate described in
subsection (1) of this section who was not a  candidate in the preceding primary election, or who
was nominated for public office described in subsection (1) of this  section at the preceding primary
election by write-in  votes, shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as re-
quired under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (4)  of this section apply only to persons who are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April  15. Subsections
(1) to (4) of this section also apply to persons who do  not become candidates until 30 days after the
filing deadline for the statewide general election.
(6) If a statement required to be filed under this section has not been received by  the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement is  due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply with  the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set by  the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 65.
 ORS 244.050, as amended by section 10,  chapter 88, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file  with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission  a verified statement of economic interest as required under this
[45]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
chapter:
(a) The Governor,  Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal judges,  except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
Legislative Policy and Research Director, the Secretary of the Senate  and the Chief Clerk of the
House of Representatives.
(g) The president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public  uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Office of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(EE) Administrator of the Office for Oregon Health Policy and Research.
[46]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) Public defense services executive director.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs  the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan service  district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial  officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards and commissions:
(A) Board of Geologic and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
[47]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
[(C) Director of the Investment Division. ]
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to 777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of the  board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the board of directors of an authority created under ORS  465.600 to
465.621.
(w) The Chief Executive Officer of the Oregon Investment Department.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a board or commission listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file  with the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics  Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate  described
in subsection  (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Within 30 days after the filing deadline for  the general election, each candidate described in
subsection (1) of this section who was not a  candidate in the preceding primary election, or who
was nominated for public office described  in subsection (1) of this section at the preceding primary
election by write-in votes, shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest  as re-
quired under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (4) of this section apply only to persons who  are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April  15. Subsections
(1) to (4) of this section also apply to persons who do  not become candidates until 30 days after the
filing deadline for the statewide general election.
(6) If a  statement required to be filed under this section has not been received by the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement  is due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply with  the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set by  the
[48]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 66.  ORS 244.055 is amended to read:
244.055. (1) [ In addition to the statement required by ORS 244.050, ] The State Treasurer , the
Deputy State Treasurer, the chief of staff for the office of the State  Treasurer and the di-
rectors of the Finance Division and  the Debt Management Division  [and any person listed under
ORS 244.050 (1)(r) and this subsection ] shall file quarterly at a time fixed by the State Treasurer a
trading statement listing all stocks, bonds and other types of securities  purchased or sold during the
preceding quarter[:].
[(a) Directors of the Cash Management Division and the Debt Management Division. ]
[(b) Equities, fixed income, short term fund, real estate, equities real estate  and commercial and
mortgage real estate investment officers and assistant investment officers. ]
[(c) Fixed income and short term fund investment analysts. ]
[(2)] The statement [ required by subsection (1) of this section ] shall be filed for  review with the
State Treasurer, the Attorney General and the  Division of Audits of the office of the Secretary of
State. The content  of the statement [ is confidential] may not be disclosed as a public record under
ORS 192.410 to 192.505.
[(3)] (2)  If the State Treasurer or the Deputy State  Treasurer determines that a conflict of in-
terest exists for an officer or employee, the State Treasurer shall subject the person to appropriate
discipline, including dismissal  or termination of the contract, or both, pursuant to rule. If the State
Treasurer has cause to believe that a violation of this chapter  has occurred, the State Treasurer
shall file a complaint with the Oregon Government Ethics Commission under ORS 244.260.
[(4)] (3)  If the State Treasurer fails to act on an apparent conflict of  interest under subsection
[(3)] (2)  of this  section or if the statement of the State Treasurer or the Deputy State Treasurer
appears to contain a conflict of interest, the Director of the Division of Audits  shall report the
failure or apparent  conflict to the Attorney General, who may file a complaint with the commission.
(4) Any employees of the Oregon Investment Department  who provide advice or make
decisions with respect to the acquisition, sale or other disposition of  investments of the de-
partment shall file quarterly, at a time fixed by the Chief  Executive Officer of the Oregon
Investment Department, a trading statement  listing all stocks, bonds and other types of se-
curities purchased or sold during the preceding quarter. The statement shall be  filed for re-
view with the Attorney  General and the Division of Audits of the office of the Secretary of
State. The content of  the statement may not be disclosed as a public record under ORS
192.410 to 192.505.
(5) If the Chief Executive Officer of the Oregon Investment  Department determines that
a conflict of interest exists for an employee or a violation of the Oregon  Investment
Council’s code of ethics has occurred, the  Chief Executive Officer shall subject the person
to appropriate discipline. If the Chief Executive  Officer has sufficient cause to reasonably
believe that a violation of this chapter has  occurred, the Chief Executive Officer shall file a
complaint with the Oregon Government Ethics Commission under ORS 244.260.
SECTION 67.
 ORS 293.708 is amended to read:
293.708. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Business” has the meaning given that term in ORS 244.020.
(b) “Business with which the person is associated”  has the meaning given that term in ORS
244.020.
(c) “Relative” has the meaning given that term in ORS 244.020.
[49]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) When a person who is a member of the Oregon Investment Council  becomes aware that
action on a matter pending before the  council might lead to private pecuniary benefit or detriment
to the person, to a relative of the person or to a business with which the person or a relative of  the
person is associated, the member shall notify in writing the  [ State Treasurer or the Deputy State
Treasurer ] Chief Executive Officer of the Oregon  Investment Department and the chairperson
of the council  that any action, decision or recommendation by the member might constitute an ac-
tual or potential conflict of interest. The member shall provide the notice not later than three
business days after the member becomes aware of the possibility of an actual or potential conflict.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply if the pecuniary benefit or detriment arises out
of circumstances described in ORS 244.020 (13).
(4) Complaints of violations of this section may be made to the Oregon Government Ethics
Commission for review and investigation as provided by ORS 244.260  and for possible imposition of
civil penalties as provided by ORS 244.350 or 244.360.
(5) Nothing in this section excuses a member of the council from compliance with ORS 244.120.
SECTION 68.
 ORS 246.590 is amended to read:
246.590. (1) The State Treasurer, [ in the capacity of investment officer for the  Oregon Investment
Council,] for the Oregon  Short Term Fund, or the Oregon Investment Department  may lend
moneys in the investment funds , or  any other moneys the State Treasurer or the department
is charged by law with investing,  as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857 for the acquisition of:
(a) The voting machines or vote tally systems that the Secretary  of State has contracted to sell
to a county.
(b) Computers or  computer systems for the purpose of maintaining and updating elector regis-
tration files or for establishing cross-county elector registration files, including those that  the Sec-
retary of State has contracted to sell to a county.
(2) The Voting Machine Account is  established in the General Fund. The account consists of
moneys lent to the Secretary of State under  this section and payments collected from counties under
ORS 246.600. Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the secretary for:
(a) The purchase of voting machines or vote  tally systems or computers or computer systems
described in subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Repayment of moneys lent under this section, plus interest.
(3) Moneys lent under this section shall be repaid  within five years together with interest at a
rate agreed upon by the State Treasurer , or the department,  and the Secretary of State.
SECTION 69.
 ORS 273.413 is amended to read:
273.413. (1) The Department of  State Lands may dispose of isolated sections and fragments of
sections of state lands which are not suitable for management according to  long-range policies of
the State Land Board. The proceeds  of such sales shall be applied and are continuously appropriated
to the Department of State Lands for the acquisition of lands or other  suitable investments as di-
rected by the board in consultation with the Oregon Investment [ Council] Department .
(2) The proceeds of any sale authorized by subsection (1) of this section shall be  deposited in a
revolving account in the Common School Fund. The costs of acquisition authorized by  subsection (1)
of this section shall be charged to the revolving account.
(3) When requested in writing by the Department  of State Lands, the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services shall draw a warrant on the Common School Fund in favor of the  Depart-
ment of State Lands for use as a revolving account. The State Treasurer shall hold  the revolving
account in special account against which the Department of State Lands may draw checks.
[50]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) The Department of State Lands may use the revolving account for the  purposes specified in
subsection (1) of this section.
(5) Before disposing of lands described in subsection (1)  of this section, the Department of State
Lands shall cause owners or lessees of land adjoining the land to be disposed  of to be notified of the
pending disposition. The notice shall  indicate the time and method of sale, the minimum or reserved
price, if any, and shall invite the landowners or lessees to participate as a prospective purchaser if
the landowner or lessee wishes to do so.
(6) Before purchasing or selling  land, the Department of State Lands shall obtain approval of the
governing body of the county or counties in which such land is located.
(7) The Department of State Lands shall prepare sales materials, including  catalogs of lands
available for sale, and may charge a fee for such materials.
(8) This section does not apply to the sale or management of state-owned submerged  and
submersible lands subject to ORS chapter 274.
SECTION 70.
 ORS 276.013 is amended to read:
276.013. When the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services determines
that an office building as defined in ORS 276.110 would  be the best means to further the public
policy of this  state as declared in ORS 276.426, or otherwise to accomplish the purposes of ORS
276.005 (1), the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services  may request the [ State Treasurer
and] Oregon Investment  Department and the  investing agency, as defined in ORS 276.110, to loan
funds to acquire the buildings necessary to carry out that policy.
SECTION 71.  ORS 276.015 is amended to read:
276.015. For the  purposes of ORS 276.002 to 276.007 and 276.010 to 276.137, the [State
Treasurer ] Oregon Investment Department , with the approval of the investing  agency, as defined
in ORS 276.110, and consistent with investment policies of the  Oregon Investment Council,
may invest not to exceed seven percent of the moneys  in any appropriate fund included in the in-
vestment funds, as defined in ORS 293.701,  on such terms and conditions as the [ State Treasurer ]
Oregon Investment Department , the investing agency and  the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services determine.
SECTION 72.  ORS 276.110 is amended to read:
276.110. As  used in ORS 276.013, 276.015 and 276.110 to 276.137, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Cost  of acquisition” includes the costs of sites, plans, specifications, architects’ fees, interest
on investments of the investing funds and all other costs related to the erection  and equipping of
office buildings or to the purchase, alteration, repair and equipping of buildings for office purposes.
(2) “Investing agency”  means the board, commission, department or other agency whose funds
are defined as investment funds in ORS 293.701.
(3) “Investing funds” means those funds enumerated in ORS  293.701 (2), when invested pursuant
to ORS 276.013, 276.015 and 276.110 to 276.137.
(4) “Office building” means any building in the State of Oregon acquired under ORS 276.013,
276.015 and 276.110 to 276.137, by appropriation therefor, or as otherwise provided by law, to provide
centralized office quarters for state agencies and may include parking, storage, motor pool and  ser-
vice  facilities.
[(5) “State Treasurer” means the State Treasurer in the  capacity of investment officer for the
Oregon Investment Council. ]
SECTION 73.
 ORS 285A.306 is amended to read:
[51]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
285A.306. (1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General
Fund, the Title I Bank Fund. All moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the Oregon
Business Development Department for the Oregon Infrastructure Finance Authority to provide  fi-
nancing for community development projects. Interest earned by the Title I Bank Fund shall  be
credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Title I Bank Fund[ , with the  approval of the State Treasurer, ] may be invested
as provided by ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and the earnings from  such investments and other program
income shall be credited to the Title I Bank Fund.
(3) The Title I Bank Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Repayment of  loans made by cities and counties with grants from the Oregon Community
Development Block Grant Program, including interest earnings.
(4) The Oregon Infrastructure Finance Authority shall administer the fund.
(5) The department shall adopt rules and policies for the administration of the fund.
(6) The authority may charge program administrative costs to the fund to pay  for administrative
expenses incurred to the  authority for processing applications and investigating community devel-
opment projects.
SECTION 74.
 ORS 285A.654 is amended to read:
285A.654. (1) There is created within the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General
Fund, the Port Planning and  Marketing Fund. All moneys in the Port Planning and Marketing Fund
are appropriated continuously to the Oregon Business  Development Department for the Oregon
Infrastructure Finance Authority and shall be used by the authority for:
(a) Administrative expenses of the authority in processing grant  applications and investigating
proposed planning or marketing projects related to ports.
(b) Payment of grants under ORS 285A.654 to  285A.660 to ports formed under ORS 777.010 and
777.050.
(c) Direct purchase by the authority of goods or services to assist  ports in implementing plan-
ning or marketing projects approved for grant financing under ORS 285A.654 to 285A.660.
(2) The Port Planning and Marketing Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Moneys obtained from gifts or grants received under ORS 285A.200.
(c) Moneys obtained from interest earned on the investment of such moneys.
(3) Moneys in the Port Planning and Marketing Fund[ , with  the approval of the State
Treasurer, ] may be invested as  provided by ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and the earnings from such in-
vestments shall be credited to the Port Planning and Marketing Fund.
SECTION 75.
 ORS 285B.119 is amended to read:
285B.119. (1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General
Fund, the  Capital Access Fund. All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon
Business Development  Department for the purpose of making payments to loss reserve accounts es-
tablished under ORS 285B.109 to 285B.119.
(2) Moneys in the Capital Access Fund[ , with the  approval of the State Treasurer, ] may be in-
vested as provided by ORS 293.701  to 293.857, and the earnings from such investment shall be
credited to the Capital Access Fund.
(3) The Capital Access Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
[52]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(c) Moneys returned to the fund from loss reserve accounts or other sources.
(4) If the department deems retrieval of interest earned  on loss reserve accounts appropriate,
the department  may transfer into the fund up to 50 percent of the interest earned on moneys in loss
reserve  accounts.
(5) The department may  charge administrative costs to the fund to pay for actual and necessary
administrative expenses incurred by the department in administering the  fund and establishing and
maintaining loss reserve accounts under ORS 285B.109 to 285B.119.
SECTION 76.
 ORS 286A.025 is amended to read:
286A.025. (1) The State Treasurer may, at the request of a related agency:
(a) Issue bonds when a law of the State of Oregon authorizes bonds to be issued; and
(b) Issue refunding bonds without additional authorization.
(2) In consultation with the related agency, the State Treasurer may:
(a) Sell bonds at a competitive sale  or a negotiated sale or in any other manner determined by
the State Treasurer;
(b) Issue bonds the interest of  which is exempt from federal income taxation or is not exempt
from federal income taxation;
(c) Establish the principal amounts, redemption provisions, optional or mandatory tender pro-
visions, interest rates or methods for determining  variable or adjustable interest rates, denomi-
nations and other terms and conditions of the bonds;
(d) Establish maturity dates  for bonds to provide for short-term, interim or long-term borrowing;
(e) Determine the form and content of a bond offering or disclosure document;
(f) Structure, market and issue bonds in the manner that  the State Treasurer determines is in
the best interest of the people of the State of Oregon; and
(g) Invest moneys  held in connection with or derived from obligations, as defined in ORS
286A.100, without regard to the fund or account  to which the moneys are credited under other
provisions of law, alone or with other invested moneys. In addition, the State Treasurer may:
(A) Establish funds and accounts  separate and distinct from the General Fund in order [ to
invest] that the moneys may be invested  as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857 and  to arrange for
redemption or purchase of bonds; and
(B) Segregate or pool moneys in order to promote financial and  administrative efficiency and
prudence in the management of moneys derived from obligations,  as defined in ORS 286A.100, mon-
eys available for bond repayment and other moneys, and in the administration of bond programs.
(3) Subject to the  approval of the State Treasurer, moneys described in subsection (2)(g) of this
section may be held by a trustee under a trust  agreement, indenture, bond declaration or similar
instrument and may  be invested by the trustee at the direction of the related agency for which the
moneys are held by the trustee. If consistent with the  trust agreement, indenture, bond declaration
or similar instrument, a related agency may authorize a trustee to invest on behalf  of the agency
in the investment funds or with other moneys invested [ by the State  Treasurer ] under ORS 293.701
to 293.857 and may authorize a transfer of the moneys from the State Treasurer to the trustee.
(4) In addition to authority conferred by law other than this section, the State  Treasurer or,
with the approval of the State Treasurer, a related agency may:
(a) Execute and deliver indentures, trust  agreements, auction agent agreements, broker-dealer
agreements, tender agent agreements, bond  declarations or similar instruments and other contracts
related to the sale, issuance or security of the bonds;
[53]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Deposit funds with trustees for the benefit of bond owners and the providers  of credit en-
hancement devices; and
(c) Enter into covenants for the  benefit of bond owners or the providers of credit enhancement
devices.
(5) The covenants authorized by subsection (4)(c) of this section:
(a) May include, but are not limited to, covenants regarding the issuance of additional  bonds,
the priority of payment  of bonds and, if authorized by law other than this section, the imposition
and collection of rates, fees or other charges; and
(b) Are intended to:
(A) Improve the security of bond owners or providers of credit enhancement devices; or
(B) Maintain the tax-exempt status of interest payable on bonds.
(6) In addition to authority conferred by law other than this section, in consultation with the
related agency, the State Treasurer may establish a debt service reserve  for the purpose of paying
when due the amounts owing on the bonds for which the debt service reserve  is established. The
debt service reserve may be funded out of the proceeds derived from  the issuance and sale of the
bonds for which the  debt service reserve is being established or from other lawfully available funds.
(7) In consultation with the related agency, the State  Treasurer shall select the underwriters for
the sale of the bonds requested by the related agency. An agreement with the underwriters may be
executed by the State Treasurer alone or with the related agency. An  agreement with underwriters
is not subject to the Public Contracting Code.
SECTION 77.
 ORS 286A.145 is amended to read:
286A.145. (1) The State Treasurer or  a related agency may enter into covenants for the benefit
of owners  of bonds that are intended to allow the bonds to bear interest that is excluded from gross
income under the federal Internal Revenue Code or that is otherwise exempt from  taxation by the
United States. The State Treasurer or a related agency may  adopt rules or procedures that are in-
tended to facilitate compliance with those covenants,  and may take any action that is required to
comply with those covenants. Covenants  authorized by this subsection include, but are not limited
to, covenants to:
(a) Pay any rebates of earnings or penalties to the United States;
(b) Invest  proceeds alone or in combination with other moneys in investments that have different
maturities, yields or credit qualities than the state would acquire under  the investment  objective
and standards specified in ORS 293.721  and 293.726 and section 6 of this 2017 Act  and other sim-
ilar laws, but only if those investments facilitate compliance with  covenants described in this sub-
section; or
(c) Restrict the expenditure of bond  proceeds or restrict the operation of, or otherwise limit the
use of, facilities that are financed with bonds.
(2) When the  State of Oregon receives interest rate subsidies from the United States in con-
nection with bonds, the State Treasurer or the related agency, to the extent permitted by  federal
law, may:
(a) Apply the subsidies to pay  bonds of the related agency and credit the subsidies to an account
that is used to pay bonds of the related agency;
(b) Pledge the subsidies to secure bonds of the related agency; or
(c) Use the subsidies to pay costs that would  otherwise be paid with proceeds of bonds of the
related agency and credit the subsidies to accounts that are used to pay the costs.
SECTION 78.
 ORS 311.701 is amended to read:
[54]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
311.701. (1) There is established  in the State Treasury the Senior Property Tax Deferral Re-
volving Account to be  used by the Department of Revenue for the purpose of making the payments
to:
(a) County tax collectors of property  taxes deferred for tax years beginning on or after January
1, 1983, as required by ORS 311.676.
(b) The appropriate local officer  of special assessment improvement amounts deferred on or after
October 15, 1983, as required by ORS 311.730.
(c) The department  for its expenses in administering the property tax and special assessment
senior deferral programs.
(2) The Senior Property Tax Deferral Revolving Account may  include a reserve for payment of
department administrative expenses.
(3) All sums of money received by the Department of Revenue under ORS 311.666  to 311.701 as
repayments of deferred property taxes or under ORS 311.702 to 311.735 as repayments  of deferred
special assessment improvement amounts, including the interest accrued under ORS 311.674 (3) or
311.711 (3) shall, upon receipt, be credited to the revolving account and  are continuously appropri-
ated to the department for the purposes of subsection (1) of this section.
(4)(a) If  there are not sufficient moneys in the revolving account to make the payments required
by subsection (1) of this section,  and the amount appropriated from the General Fund is not suffi-
cient when added together with the moneys in  the revolving account to provide an amount sufficient
to make the required payments, the [ State Treasurer,  in the capacity of investment officer for the ]
Oregon Investment [ Council,] Department may lend to  the Department of Revenue such amounts
as may be necessary to make the payments.
(b) The [ State Treasurer ] Oregon Investment Department  may lend moneys that may be in-
vested as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857.
(c) Any moneys lent under this  subsection shall be repaid within five years together with in-
terest at a rate determined by  the [ State Treasurer ] Oregon Investment Department  and consist-
ent with the investment objective and standards [ of] set forth in  ORS 293.721 and 293.726  and
section 6 of this 2017 Act .
SECTION 79.
 ORS 327.425 is amended to read:
327.425. (1) All moneys belonging to the  Common School Fund and not required to meet current
expenses shall be loaned by the Department of State Lands at  a rate of interest fixed by the de-
partment. The Department of State Lands  may consult with and obtain the recommendation  of the
Oregon Investment [ Council] Department  in fixing the interest rate.
(2) Common School  Fund moneys may be loaned in accordance with the repayment plan con-
tained in ORS 327.440, except that loans on property within the  corporate limits of towns or cities
shall be payable in not more than 15 years on the amortization plan.
(3) If at any time there is a Common School Fund surplus over and above all  loans applied for,
such portion of the surplus as the Department of State Lands  deems proper may be invested as
provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857. The  department may require the State Treasurer to deposit any
such surplus, until it is able to loan same, in  qualified state depositories, upon the same terms and
conditions as other public funds are deposited therein, in  which event any interest received from
any such state depository shall be credited to the fund on which such interest was earned.
(4) The Department of State Lands  may reduce the rate of interest to  be paid upon outstanding
loans from the Common School Fund and any trust fund placed in its charge,  to correspond with the
rate of interest to be paid upon new loans, but no reduction in  rate of interest shall be made upon
[55]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
any of the loans until interest at  the old rate has been paid in full to date of receipt of remittance
at the office of the department.
SECTION 80.  ORS 350.545 is amended to read:
350.545. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 350.550 (5),  the [ State Treasurer ] Oregon Investment De-
partment, as payment  for expenses, may deduct a fee pursuant to ORS 293.718 from a university
venture development fund administered by a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon
Health and Science University.
(2) A  public university listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon Health and Science University may
direct that moneys credited to its university venture development fund be held  and invested by the
university’s affiliated foundation.  Any moneys held by an affiliated foundation under this section or
ORS 350.550 are  not subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 293 or 295 and may not be considered
public or state funds for any purpose. Moneys transferred to an affiliated  foundation under this
section or ORS 350.550 may be used only as provided under this section and ORS 350.540,
[350.545,] 350.550 and 353.445.
(3) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon Health and Science University  may
retain or may elect to have its affiliated foundation retain some or all of  the principal contributed
to a university venture development fund for investment to perpetuate and  increase the moneys
available for expenditure. The  balance of the fund and the earnings on that balance may be used
as provided under this section and  ORS 350.540, [ 350.545,] 350.550 and 353.445.
SECTION 81.
 ORS 367.015 is amended to read:
367.015. (1) There is established in the State  Treasury, separate and distinct from the General
Fund, the Oregon Transportation Infrastructure Fund. All moneys in the infrastructure fund  are
continuously appropriated to the Department of Transportation for the purposes of ORS 367.010  to
367.067.
(2) The infrastructure fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the infrastructure fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Moneys transferred to the infrastructure fund by the department from the State  Highway
Fund or from other funds available to the Oregon Transportation Commission.
(c) Moneys from  any federal grant, state grant or other grant that are deposited in the
infrastructure fund.
(d) Proceeds of infrastructure bonds.
(e) Proceeds of Highway  User Tax Bonds issued under ORS 367.615 for the purpose of providing
infrastructure assistance or an infrastructure loan.
(f) Moneys due to a municipality that are withheld pursuant to ORS 367.035 (3) or  (5) and, for
a loan made with proceeds of Highway User Tax Bonds, moneys due to a municipality  that are
withheld pursuant to ORS 367.655 (2)(c).
(g) Earnings on the infrastructure fund.
(h) Moneys paid to the department in connection with infrastructure  loans or infrastructure
assistance.
(i) Any grants or donations made to the State of Oregon for deposit in the infrastructure fund.
(3) A pledge by the department of its revenues or other moneys in  the infrastructure fund is
valid and binding from the time the pledge is made as provided in ORS 286A.102.
(4) The department shall use moneys in the infrastructure fund solely to:
(a) Provide infrastructure loans and infrastructure assistance;
(b) Pay the bond  debt service for infrastructure bonds and pay the costs of issuance and other
[56]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
costs related to infrastructure bonds;
(c) Pay the  department’s costs of administering the infrastructure fund and providing
infrastructure loans and infrastructure  assistance, including any costs of monitoring transportation
projects and obtaining repayment of infrastructure loans and infrastructure assistance;
(d) Pay the department’s or another public entity’s costs for transportation  projects including,
but not limited to, projects funded with the proceeds of Highway User Tax Bonds; and
(e) Ensure repayment of loan guarantees or extensions of credit as provided in ORS 367.816.
(5) The department may establish separate accounts in the infrastructure fund for  infrastructure
loans, infrastructure assistance, the funding of infrastructure  bond reserves, bond debt service pay-
ments for infrastructure bonds  and related costs, administrative and operating expenses or any other
purpose necessary or desirable  for carrying out the purposes of ORS 367.010 to 367.067. The com-
mission may  adopt rules that govern how the infrastructure fund and its accounts are used. The
infrastructure fund or any of its accounts may be held by an escrow agent or bond trustee.
(6) The department shall administer the  infrastructure fund. Moneys in the  infrastructure
fund[, with the  approval of the State Treasurer, ] may be invested as provided by ORS 293.701 to
293.857 and the earnings from such investments must be credited to the  account in the
infrastructure fund designated by the department.
SECTION 82.
 ORS 390.135 is amended to read:
390.135. (1) Of the moneys deposited  into the Parks and Natural Resources Fund created under
ORS 541.940 from the Oregon State Lottery, 50 percent shall be deposited  into a Parks Subaccount.
[The State Treasurer  may invest and reinvest the ] Moneys in the Parks Subaccount may be invested
as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857. Interest from the moneys deposited in the Parks  Subaccount
and earnings from investment of the moneys in the subaccount shall be credited to the subaccount.
(2) Moneys deposited from the Oregon State Lottery to the Parks  Subaccount may be used only
for:
(a) Maintaining, constructing, improving, developing, managing and operating state parks, ocean
shores, public beach access areas, historic sites, natural areas and outdoor and recreation areas;
(b) Acquiring real property, or  interests in real property, that has significant natural, scenic,
cultural, historic or recreational  value for the creation or operation of state parks, ocean shores,
public beach access areas, outdoor recreation areas and historic sites; and
(c) Providing grants to regional or local government entities to acquire property for  public
parks, natural areas or outdoor recreation areas or to develop or improve public parks, natural
areas or outdoor recreation areas.
(3) All moneys in the Parks Subaccount shall be  transferred to the State Parks and Recreation
Department Fund and used to carry out the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section by
achieving each of the following:
(a) Providing additional public parks, natural areas or outdoor recreation areas to  meet the
needs of current and future residents of this state.
(b) Protecting  natural, cultural, historic and outdoor recreational resources of statewide or re-
gional significance.
(c) Managing public  parks, natural areas and outdoor recreation areas to ensure the long-term
ecological health of those  parks and areas and to provide for the enjoyment of those parks and areas
by current and future residents of this state.
(d) Providing diverse  and equitable opportunities for residents of this state to experience nature
and to participate  in outdoor recreational activities in state, regional, local or neighborhood public
[57]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
parks and recreation areas.
SECTION 83.  ORS 391.520 is amended to read:
391.520. The Oregon  Mass Transportation Financing Authority is hereby created as a public
instrumentality of the State of Oregon and  the exercise by the authority of the powers conferred
by ORS 267.227 and  391.500 to 391.660 is the performance of an essential public function. The au-
thority shall consist of the chairperson of the Oregon Transportation  Commission, the State Treas-
urer, or  designee, the [ chairperson] Chief Executive Officer  of the Oregon Investment [ Council]
Department, or designee, and a representative designated by the  board of directors of each district.
SECTION 84.  ORS 391.605 is amended to read:
391.605. (1) [ No] A transfer authorized by ORS 267.020 of a mass transit district system to a
metropolitan service district [ shall] may not  take effect while bonds issued by the  Oregon Mass
Transportation Financing Authority to finance mass transit facilities for the  district are outstanding
until a plan designed to repay any outstanding bonds when due is prepared by the  governing body
of the metropolitan service district and approved by:
(a) The chairperson of the Oregon Transportation Commission or the chairperson’s designee;
(b) The State Treasurer or State Treasurer’s designee; and
(c) The [ chairperson] Chief Executive Officer  of the Oregon Investment [ Council] Department
or the [ chairperson’s ] Chief Executive Officer’s  designee.
(2) Persons given authority to  approve a transfer under subsection (1) of this section may only
refuse to approve a transfer for reasons relating to the financial effect of the transfer.
SECTION 85.
 ORS 391.800 is amended to read:
391.800. (1) There is established in the State  Treasury, separate and distinct from the General
Fund, the Elderly and Disabled Special  Transportation Fund. All moneys in the Elderly and Disabled
Special Transportation Fund are appropriated  continuously to the Department of Transportation for
payment of the department’s administrative costs of  the program and payment to mass transit dis-
tricts, transportation districts, Indian tribes and counties as provided in ORS 391.810.
(2) The Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys transferred to the fund under ORS 184.642 and 323.455 (3);
(b) Other moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly; and
(c) Moneys obtained from interest earned on the investment of moneys in the fund.
(3) Moneys in the Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund[ , with  the approval of the
State Treasurer, ] may be invested as provided by ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and the  earnings from the
investments shall be credited to the Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund.
SECTION 86.
 ORS 411.128 is amended to read:
411.128. (1) In addition to other funds made available for  education and training of public as-
sistance recipients, the Department of Human Services may  accept gifts and grants from private
sources for the purpose of providing the scholarships or grants authorized under ORS 411.175.
(2) The Department of Human Services Scholarship  Account is established, separate and
distinct from the General  Fund.  The moneys received under subsection (1) of this section shall
be deposited in [ a special account, separate and  distinct from the General Fund, to be named the De-
partment of Human Services  Scholarship Account, which account is established ] the account . All
moneys in the account and all earnings thereon are continuously appropriated  to the Department
of Human Services to be used together with any federal funds that may  be available to provide
scholarships or grants under ORS 411.175.
(3) The amount in the Department of Human Services Scholarship  Account that is available af-
[58]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ter scholarships and grants  under ORS 411.175 have been awarded for any period shall be reported
to the Oregon Investment [ Council] Department by the Department of  Human Services and shall
be considered  investment funds within the meaning of ORS 293.701 to 293.857 and shall be invested
in accordance with the standards of ORS 293.726. All earnings  on such investments shall be credited
to the Department of Human Services Scholarship Account.
SECTION 87.  ORS 426.506 is amended to read:
426.506. (1) There is created in the State Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund,
the Community Mental Health Housing  Fund. All earnings on investments of moneys in the Com-
munity Mental Health Housing Fund shall accrue to the fund. Interest earned on moneys in the
fund shall be credited to the fund. All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the
Oregon Health Authority to carry out the provisions of ORS 426.504.
(2) The Community Mental Health Housing Fund shall be administered by the authority  to pro-
vide housing for persons with chronic mental illness.  As used in this subsection, “housing” may in-
clude acquisition, maintenance, repair, furnishings and equipment.
(3)(a) There is established  within the Community Mental Health Housing Fund a Community
Housing Trust Account. [ With approval of the  State Treasurer and ] Upon request of the Director of
the Oregon Health Authority, moneys  in the account may be invested as provided in ORS 293.701
to 293.857.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS  270.150, the authority shall deposit into the Commu-
nity Housing  Trust Account the proceeds, less costs to the state, received by the authority from the
sale of F. H. Dammasch State Hospital property under ORS 426.508.  The authority may expend, for
the purposes set forth in ORS 426.504,  any earnings credited to the account, including any interest
earned on moneys deposited in the account, and up to five percent of the  sale proceeds initially
credited to the  account by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services. At least 95 percent
of the sale proceeds shall remain in the account in perpetuity. Proceeds deposited in  the account
may not be commingled with proceeds from the sale of  any surplus real property owned, operated
or controlled by the authority and used as a state training center.
(c) Interest earned on moneys in the Community Housing  Trust Account may be expended in the
following manner:
(A) Seventy percent of interest earned on deposits  in the account shall be expended for com-
munity housing purposes; and
(B) Thirty percent of interest earned on deposits in the account shall  be expended for institu-
tional housing purposes.
(d) Interest earned on deposits in the  Community Housing Trust Account shall not be used to
support operating expenses of the authority.
(4) The Community Mental Health Housing Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Sale proceeds and earnings from the account under subsection (3) of this section;
(c) Proceeds from the sale, transfer or lease of any surplus real  property owned, operated or
controlled by the authority and used as community housing;
(d) Moneys reallocated from other areas of the authority’s budget;
(e) Interest and earnings credited to the fund; and
(f) Gifts of money or other property from any source, to be used for the  purposes of developing
housing for persons with chronic mental illness.
(5) The authority shall adopt policies:
[59]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) To establish priorities  for the use of moneys in the Community Mental Health Housing Fund
for the sole purpose of developing housing for persons with chronic mental illness;
(b) To match public and private moneys available  from other sources for developing housing for
persons with chronic mental illness; and
(c) To administer the fund in a manner that will not exceed  the State Treasury’s maximum cost
per transaction.
(6) The authority shall collaborate  with the Housing and Community Services Department to
ensure the highest return and best value for community housing from  the Community Mental Health
Housing Fund.
(7) The authority shall provide a report of revenues to and expenditures from  the Community
Mental Health Housing Fund as part of its budget submission to the Governor and Legislative  As-
sembly under ORS chapter 291.
SECTION 88.  ORS 456.530 is amended to read:
456.530. Notwithstanding the investment objective and standards set forth in  ORS 293.721
and 293.726 and section 6 of this 2017  Act,  and subject to the provisions of any agreement with
holders of bonds issued pursuant to ORS 456.519 or 456.524 (1979 Replacement Part), the Housing
and Community Services Department may  consider the willingness or commitment of a lending in-
stitution as defined in ORS 456.548 to make  loans for residential housing as a factor in selecting
depositaries and otherwise investing funds  held under ORS 456.515 to 456.725 in or through such
lending institutions.
SECTION 89.
 ORS 456.535 is amended to read:
456.535. The money realized from the sale of each issue of bonds shall be credited  to a special
fund in the State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund, to be designated the El-
derly and Disabled Housing Fund. Moneys in the Elderly and Disabled Housing Fund  are contin-
uously appropriated to the Housing and Community  Services Department for the purpose of carrying
out the provisions of ORS 456.515 to 456.725. Moneys  in the fund may not be used for any other
purpose, except that  the moneys[ , with the approval of the State Treasurer, ] may be invested as pro-
vided by ORS 293.701  to 293.857 and the earnings from the investments shall be deposited into the
Elderly and Disabled Housing Sinking Fund maintained under ORS 456.543.
SECTION 90.  ORS 456.543 is amended to read:
456.543. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall maintain,  with the State
Treasurer, an Elderly and Disabled Housing  Sinking Fund, separate and distinct from the General
Fund. The Elderly and Disabled Housing Sinking Fund shall provide for the payment of the princi-
pal and interest upon bonds issued under authority  of Article XI-I(2), Oregon Constitution, and ORS
456.515 to 456.725.  Moneys in the sinking fund are continuously appropriated to the department for
such purpose. Moneys in the Elderly and Disabled Housing Sinking Fund may be invested [ by the
State Treasurer ] as provided by ORS 286A.025 and 293.701 to 293.857 or, with the approval of  the
State Treasurer, by  the Director of the Housing and Community Services Department through a
trustee. Investment earnings shall be credited to the Elderly and Disabled Housing Sinking Fund.
(2) The Elderly and Disabled Housing Sinking Fund shall consist of:
(a) All moneys received from contract or loan proceeds;
(b) Bond reserves;
(c) Other funds available for these purposes; and
(d) If necessary, state ad valorem taxes provided  by Article XI-I(2), Oregon Constitution, and by
ORS 456.515 to 456.725.
[60]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The Elderly and Disabled Housing Sinking Fund  shall not be used for any purpose other than
that for which the fund was  created provided, however, that amounts on deposit in the fund may
be applied to the payment of operating and administrative  expenses of the department, including
bond issuance, administration and  repayment costs, allocable to its elderly and disabled housing
program under ORS 456.515 to  456.725, and for transfers under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
Should a balance remain therein after the purposes for which the fund was  created have been ful-
filled or after a reserve sufficient to meet all existing obligations and liabilities of the  fund has been
set aside, the  surplus remaining may be transferred to the Elderly and Disabled Housing Fund at
the direction of the department.
(4) The Director of  the Housing and Community Services Department may transfer moneys from
the Elderly and Disabled Housing Sinking Fund, with the approval  of the State Treasurer, for the
purpose of financing multifamily housing for the elderly and persons with disabilities. The  State
Treasurer shall approve such request if:
(a) The  cash flow projection under ORS 286A.010 associated with the bonds shows that, for the
term of the bonds outstanding at the time the  director transfers the moneys, remaining moneys in
the sinking fund, together with expected loan proceeds and fund earnings, will continue to be ade-
quate to pay bond principal, interest and administrative costs; and
(b) The transfer will not create the need for issuance of any bonds.
(5) The director shall deposit loan prepayments in the Elderly  and Disabled Housing Fund, and
lend such prepayments  for the purpose of financing multifamily housing for the elderly and persons
with disabilities for a term not exceeding the term of the bonds associated with the loan that  was
prepaid, if the director determines that such a deposit and loan will not adversely affect  the ability
of the department to pay outstanding bonds.
SECTION 91.
 ORS 468.215 is amended to read:
468.215. The money realized from the sale of each  issue of bonds under ORS 468.195 shall be
credited to a special fund in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund, to
be designated the Pollution Control Fund. Moneys in the Pollution  Control Fund are continuously
appropriated to the Department of Environmental Quality for the purpose  of carrying out the pro-
visions of ORS 468.195 to 468.260. Moneys in the  fund may not be used for any other purpose, except
that these moneys[ , with the  approval of the State Treasurer, ] may be invested as provided by ORS
293.701 to 293.857, and the earnings from such  investments shall be credited to the Pollution Control
Sinking Fund maintained under ORS 468.230.
SECTION 92.  ORS 468A.490 is amended to read:
468A.490. (1) There is established  within the State Treasury a fund known as the Residential
Solid Fuel Heating Air Quality Improvement Fund, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) All moneys appropriated  or received as gifts or grants for the purposes of this section shall
be credited to the Residential Solid Fuel Heating Air Quality Improvement Fund.
(3) [The State Treasurer may invest and reinvest  the ] Moneys in the fund  may be invested and
reinvested as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857. Interest  from the moneys deposited in the fund
and earnings from investment of the moneys in the fund shall accrue to the fund.
(4) All moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Environmental
Quality to:
(a) Pay all costs incurred by the  department for evaluating projects and programs, including
projects and programs proposed by local communities  or qualifying organizations, for project man-
agement and oversight of funds awarded for projects  and programs selected in accordance with this
[61]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section and for documenting the benefit to air quality from such projects;
(b) Fund the program established under subsection (5) of this section;
(c) Fund activities to enhance enforcement of ORS 468A.460 to 468A.515;
(d) Fund public education programs related to compliance with ORS 468A.460 to 468A.515; and
(e) Fund public education programs related to the benefits of the  use of solid fuel burning de-
vices certified pursuant to ORS 468A.460 to 468A.515.
(5) The department shall use moneys available under subsection (4) of this section  to establish
a program designed to reduce the emission of air contaminants  by providing grants, loans or other
subsidies for the replacement  or removal of solid fuel burning devices that were not certified by the
department pursuant to ORS 468A.465. In addition to any other requirements established by  rules
adopted by the Environmental Quality Commission, the program shall provide that:
(a) All forms  of new high-efficiency, low air contaminant-emitting heating systems are allowed,
except vent-free heating appliances;
(b) Any solid fuel burning device removed under the program must be destroyed;
(c) Any replacement device selected under the program must  be installed in conformance with
building code requirements and the manufacturer’s specifications including but not limited to  vent-
ing specifications; and
(d) To be eligible, program participants shall participate  in any home energy audit program
provided at no  charge to the homeowner and shall obtain all information available regarding subsi-
dies for cost-effective weatherization. The department  shall make the information required in this
subsection readily available to program participants.
(6) The department may enter into an agreement with a local government or a regional author-
ity in order to implement the program established under subsection (5) of this section.
SECTION 93.
 ORS 496.350 is amended to read:
496.350. (1) The Willamette River Basin Bonneville Power Administration  Stewardship Fund is
established in the State  Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by
the Willamette River Basin Bonneville Power Administration Stewardship Fund shall be  credited to
the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  State Department of Fish and
Wildlife for long-term operation,  maintenance and protection activities that preserve or advance the
conservation values of properties purchased under the Willamette River Basin Memorandum  of
Agreement Regarding Wildlife  Habitat Protection and Enhancement between the State of Oregon
and the Bonneville Power Administration, dated October 22, 2010. Moneys  in the fund may not be
used to purchase property or easements.
(2) The Willamette River Basin Bonneville Power Administration  Stewardship Fund shall consist
of moneys accepted by  this state pursuant to the Willamette River Basin Memorandum of Agreement
Regarding Wildlife Habitat Protection and Enhancement between the State of Oregon  and the
Bonneville Power Administration, dated October 22, 2010.
(3) Moneys in the Willamette River Basin Bonneville Power Administration  Stewardship Fund
may[, with  the approval of the State Treasurer, ] be invested as provided by ORS 293.701 to 293.857,
and the earnings from such investment shall be credited to  the Willamette River Basin Bonneville
Power Administration Stewardship Fund.
SECTION 94.  ORS 516.070 is amended to read:
516.070. (1) There is established in the General Fund of the  State Treasury an account to be
known as the Geology and Mineral Industries Account. All moneys received by  the State Depart-
ment of Geology and  Mineral Industries shall be paid over to the State Treasurer and by the State
[62]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Treasurer deposited in the General  Fund to the credit of the account. All moneys within the account
are continuously appropriated for the use of the department in carrying out its lawful functions.
(2) The Federal  Locatable Mineral Royalties Subaccount is established within the Geology and
Mineral Industries Account. Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, all moneys received
from the federal government by the State of Oregon  as the state’s distributive share of the amounts
collected for royalties for locatable minerals shall be credited to the subaccount. All moneys in  the
Federal Locatable Mineral Royalties  Subaccount are continuously appropriated to the State De-
partment of Geology and Mineral Industries  to conduct investigations of new mineral resources and
to carry out the provisions of ORS 517.840 (6).
(3) [ The State Treasurer may invest and reinvest ] The moneys  in the Federal Locatable Mineral
Royalties Subaccount may be invested and reinvested  as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857. In-
terest from  the moneys deposited in the subaccount and earnings from investment of the moneys in
the subaccount shall be credited to the subaccount.
(4) The Mined Land Regulation and Reclamation  Program Subaccount is established within the
Geology and Mineral Industries Account. Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, all moneys
received by the State Department of Geology  and Mineral Industries from fees assessed pursuant to
ORS 517.800 shall be credited to the subaccount. All moneys in the subaccount  are continuously
appropriated to the department for the purpose of administering ORS 517.702 to 517.951.
SECTION 95.
 ORS 541.942 is amended to read:
541.942. (1) Of the moneys deposited  into the Parks and Natural Resources Fund created under
ORS 541.940 from the Oregon State Lottery, 50 percent shall  be deposited into a Natural Resources
Subaccount for the public  purpose of financing the restoration and protection of native fish and
wildlife, watersheds and water quality in Oregon. [ The State Treasurer may invest and reinvest ] The
moneys in the Natural Resources Subaccount may be invested and reinvested  as provided in ORS
293.701 to 293.857.
(2) Moneys in the Natural Resources  Subaccount shall be used to accomplish each of the fol-
lowing:
(a) Protecting and improving water  quality in the rivers, lakes and streams of this state by re-
storing natural watershed functions or stream flows;
(b) Securing long-term  protection for lands and waters that provide significant habitats for na-
tive fish and wildlife;
(c) Restoring and maintaining habitat needed  to sustain healthy and resilient populations of
native fish and wildlife;
(d) Maintaining the diversity of plants, animals and ecosystems in this state;
(e) Involving people in voluntary actions to protect, restore  and maintain the ecological health
of lands and waters in this state; and
(f) Remedying the conditions that limit the health of fish and  wildlife, fish and wildlife habitats
and watershed functions that are in the greatest need of conservation.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, of  the moneys deposited into the
Natural Resources Subaccount from the Oregon State Lottery:
(a) Sixty-five percent of the moneys  shall be deposited into the Watershed Conservation Grant
Fund established under ORS 541.947 to be  used by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board for
the purposes set forth in ORS 541.956; and
(b) Thirty-five percent of the moneys shall  be deposited into the Watershed Conservation Oper-
ating Fund established under ORS 541.945.
[63]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) If the amount transferred from the Oregon State Lottery to  the Parks and Natural Resources
Fund during a biennium is more than  150 percent of the amount that was transferred during the
2009-2011 biennium, except as provided in subsection (5) of  this section, the State Treasurer shall,
during the  next following biennium, deposit from the Natural Resources Subaccount to the
Watershed Conservation Grant Fund the amount described in subsection  (3)(a) of this section plus
an amount equal to the difference between the amount deposited from  the subaccount to the
Watershed Conservation Grant Fund during the preceding biennium and  70 percent of the moneys
received by the subaccount from the Oregon State Lottery during the preceding biennium.
(5) The requirements in subsections  (3) and (4) of this section apply only for biennia in which
the Legislative Assembly does not  require a greater percentage of the Natural Resources Subac-
count moneys to be  deposited into the Watershed Conservation Grant Fund. The Legislative As-
sembly may not authorize the percentage of Natural Resources Subaccount moneys deposited into
the Watershed Conservation Grant Fund in a biennium to be  less than the percentage required to
be deposited under subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
SECTION 96.
 ORS 561.144 is amended to read:
561.144. (1) The State Treasurer shall establish a Department of Agriculture Service Fund, which
shall be a trust fund separate and distinct from the General Fund.  The State Department of Agri-
culture shall deposit all license and service fees paid to  it under the provisions of the statutes
identified in subsection (3) of this  section in the Department of Agriculture Service Fund. The State
Treasurer is the custodian of this trust  fund, which shall be deposited by the State Treasurer in
such depositories  as are authorized to receive deposits of the General Fund, and which may be in-
vested [ by the treasurer ] in the same manner as authorized by ORS 293.701 to 293.857.
(2) Interest received on deposits credited  to the Department of Agriculture Service Fund shall
accrue to and become a part of the Department of Agriculture Service Fund.
(3) The license and service fees subject  to this section are those described in ORS 561.400,
561.740, 570.710, 571.057, 571.063, 571.145, 571.305, 586.270, 596.030, 596.100, 596.311, 599.235, 599.269,
599.406, 599.610, 601.040, 602.090, 603.025, 603.075, 616.706, 618.115, 618.136, 619.031, 621.072, 621.166,
621.266, 621.297, 621.335, 621.730, 622.080, 625.180, 628.240, 632.211, 632.600, 632.720, 632.730, 632.741,
632.940, 632.945, 633.015, 633.029, 633.318, 633.362, 633.462, 633.465, 633.680, 633.700, 633.720, 634.016,
634.116, 634.122, 634.126, 634.132, 634.136, 634.212 and 635.030.
SECTION 97.  ORS 696.030 is amended to read:
696.030. ORS 696.010 to 696.375, 696.392, 696.395 to 696.430, 696.490, 696.600 to 696.785,  696.990
and 696.995 do not apply to:
(1)(a) A  nonlicensed individual who is a full-time employee of an owner of real estate and whose
real estate activity:
(A) Involves only the real estate of the employer; and
(B)(i) Is incidental to the employee’s normal, nonreal estate activities; or
(ii) Is the  employee’s principal activity, but the employer’s principal activity or business is not
the sale, exchange, lease option or acquisition of real estate.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, “owner of real estate” means:
(A) An individual who has a sole ownership interest in the real estate; or
(B) More than one individual, each of whom has an ownership interest in the real estate,  if the
ownership interest is by survivorship, tenancy in common or tenancy by the entirety.
(2) A nonlicensed individual who acts as attorney in fact  under a duly executed power of at-
torney  from  the owner or purchaser authorizing the supervision of the closing of or supervision of
[64]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the performance of a contract for the sale, leasing or exchanging of real estate if the power  of at-
torney was executed prior to July 1, 2002, in compliance with the requirements of law at the time
of execution or if:
(a) The power of attorney is recorded in the office of the recording officer  for the county in
which the real estate is located;
(b) The power of attorney specifically describes the real estate; and
(c) The individual does not use the power of attorney  as a device to engage in professional real
estate activity without obtaining the necessary real estate license.
(3) A nonlicensed individual who acts as attorney  in fact under a duly executed power of at-
torney in which the authorized agent  is the spouse of the principal, or the child, grandchild, parent,
grandparent, sibling, aunt, uncle, niece or nephew of the principal or of the  spouse of the principal,
authorizing real estate activity if the power of attorney is recorded in the office of the recording
officer for the county in which the real estate to be sold, leased or exchanged is located.
(4) A nonlicensed individual who is an attorney at law rendering  services in the performance
of duties as an attorney at law.
(5) A nonlicensed individual who acts in the individual’s  official capacity as a receiver, a
conservator, a trustee in bankruptcy, a  personal representative or a trustee, or a regular salaried
employee of the trustee, acting under a trust agreement, deed of trust or will.
(6) A nonlicensed individual who performs an act of professional  real estate activity under order
of a court.
(7) A nonlicensed individual  who is a regular full-time employee of a single corporation, part-
nership, association, limited liability company or nonlicensed individual owner  of real property act-
ing for the corporation, partnership, association, limited liability company or  nonlicensed individual
owner in the rental or management of the real property, but not in  the sale, exchange, lease option
or purchase of the real property.
(8) An individual who is a registered professional engineer or architect rendering  services in
performance of duties as a professional engineer or architect.
(9) A nonlicensed individual who is employed by a principal  real estate broker engaged in the
management of rental real estate or  by a licensed real estate property manager and who acts on
behalf of the principal real  estate broker or licensed real estate property manager pursuant to a
written delegation of the  principal real estate broker’s or licensed real estate property manager’s
authority, as provided by the agency by rule, if the real estate activity of the nonlicensed individual
is limited to:
(a) Negotiating rental or lease agreements;
(b) Checking tenant and credit references;
(c) Physically maintaining the real estate;
(d) Conducting tenant relations;
(e) Collecting the rent;
(f) Supervising the premises’ managers;
(g) Discussing financial matters relating to the management of the real estate with  the owner;
and
(h) Receiving and disbursing trust funds in a clients’ trust account under ORS 696.241.
(10) An individual who sells or leases cemetery lots, parcels or units while engaged in  the dis-
position of human bodies under ORS 97.010 to 97.040,  97.110 to 97.450, 97.510 to 97.730, 97.810 to
97.920 and 97.990 or an employee of the nonlicensed individual performing similar activities.
[65]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(11) An individual who is a salaried employee  of the State of Oregon, or any of its political
subdivisions, engaging in professional real estate activity as a part of such employment.
(12) A nonlicensed individual  who analyzes or provides advice regarding permissible land use
alternatives, environmental impact, building and use permit procedures or demographic  market
studies, or a regular  full-time employee of the nonlicensed individual performing similar activities.
This exclusion does not apply to the handling of transactional negotiations for transfer of an interest
in real estate.
(13) An individual who  is a hotelkeeper or innkeeper as defined by ORS 699.005 arranging the
rental of transient lodging at a hotel or inn in the course of business as a hotelkeeper or innkeeper.
(14) An individual who is a travel  agent arranging the rental of transient lodging at a hotel or
inn as defined in ORS 699.005 in the course of business as a travel  agent for compensation. For the
purpose of this subsection,  “travel agent” means a person, and employees of the person, regularly
representing and selling travel services  to the public directly or indirectly through other travel
agents.
(15) An individual who is a common carrier arranging the rental of transient lodging  at a hotel
or inn as defined in ORS 699.005 in the course of business as a common carrier. For the purpose
of this subsection, “common carrier” means a person that  transports or purports to be willing to
transport individuals from  place to place by rail, motor vehicle, boat or aircraft for hire, compen-
sation or consideration.
(16) An individual who is a  hotel representative arranging the rental of transient lodging at a
hotel or inn as defined in ORS 699.005 in the course of business as a hotel representative. For the
purpose of this subsection, “hotel representative”  means a person that provides reservations or sale
services to independent hotels, airlines, steamship companies and government tourist agencies.
(17) A nonlicensed individual transferring or acquiring an  interest in real estate owned or to
be owned by the individual.
(18) An individual who is a general partner for a  domestic or foreign limited partnership duly
registered and operating within this state  under ORS chapter 70 engaging in the sale of limited
partnership interests and the acquisition, sale, exchange, lease,  transfer or management of the real
estate of the limited partnership.
(19) An individual who is a membership camping contract  broker or salesperson registered with
the Real Estate Agency selling membership camping contracts.
(20) An individual who is a professional forester or farm manager engaging in property man-
agement activity on forestland or farmland when the activity is incidental to the  nonreal estate
duties involving overall management of forest or farm resources.
(21) An individual  who is a registered investment adviser under the Investment Advisers Act
of 1940, 15 U.S.C. §80b-1 et  seq., rendering real estate investment services for the office of the State
Treasurer , the Oregon Investment Department  or the Oregon Investment Council.
(22) A nonlicensed individual who refers a new tenant for compensation  to a real estate licensee
acting as the property manager for a residential building or facility while  the individual resides in
the building or facility or within six months after termination of the individual’s tenancy.
(23) A nonlicensed individual who gives an opinion in an  administrative or judicial proceeding
regarding the value of real estate  for taxation or representing a taxpayer under ORS 305.230 or
309.100.
(24) A nonlicensed individual acting as  a paid fiduciary whose real estate activity is limited to
negotiating a contract to obtain the services of a real estate licensee.
[66]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(25) A nonlicensed individual who is  a fiduciary under a court order, without regard to whether
the court order specifically authorizes real estate activity.
(26) An individual who is a representative of a financial institution or trust company,  as those
terms are defined in ORS 706.008, that is attorney in fact under  a duly executed power of attorney
from the owner or purchaser authorizing real estate activity, if the power  of attorney is recorded
in the office of the county clerk for the county in which the real estate to be sold,  leased or ex-
changed is located.
(27) An individual who is the  sole member or a managing member of a domestic or foreign lim-
ited liability company duly registered and  operating within this state under ORS chapter 63 and who
is engaging in the acquisition, sale, exchange, lease, transfer or management of the real estate of
the limited liability company.
(28) An individual who is a partner in a partnership as defined in ORS 67.005 and who is en-
gaging in the acquisition,  sale, exchange, lease, transfer or management of the real estate of the
partnership.
(29) An individual  who is an officer or director of a domestic or foreign corporation duly regis-
tered and operating within this state under ORS chapter 60 and who  is engaging in the acquisition,
sale, exchange, lease, transfer or management of the real estate of the corporation.
SECTION 98.
 ORS 757.738 is amended to read:
757.738. (1)(a) The Public Utility Commission shall establish  a separate trust account for
amounts generated by each of the two surcharges imposed under ORS 757.736. The  commission shall
establish the trust accounts as interest-bearing accounts:
(A) With an agency of the United States identified in the final agreement;
(B) In a depository that is qualified under ORS 295.001 to 295.108 to receive public funds; or
(C) With the [ State Treasurer ] Oregon Investment Department , to be  invested as provided in
ORS 293.701 to 293.857.
(b) The commission may establish  each of the two trust accounts with a different trustee among
those listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The commission may authorize transfer of funds from  one trust account to another as nec-
essary to fund removal of the Klamath River dams.
(2) If an agreement is entered into under ORS 757.742 (2), the parties  to the agreement may
agree that a portion of the  amounts collected under one surcharge may be deposited in the trust
account established for amounts collected under the other surcharge.
(3) Upon request of  an agency of the United States, or upon request of the designee of an agency
of the United States, the commission shall require the trustee of  the appropriate trust account es-
tablished under this section to transfer to the agency or  designee the amounts that are necessary
to pay the costs of removing the Klamath River dams as described in ORS 757.736 (11).
(4) If any amounts remain in a trust account established under this section after  the trustee
makes all payments necessary for the costs of removing the Klamath River  dams as described in
ORS 757.736 (11), the commission shall direct the trustee of the  account to refund those amounts to
customers or to otherwise use the excess amounts for the benefit of customers.
SECTION 99.
(1) The Oregon Investment Department established  under section 2 of this
2017 Act is the successor to the State Treasurer as investment officer for  the Oregon In-
vestment Council and to the council, with  respect to the assumed duties, liabilities, functions
and powers described in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The Oregon Investment Department is a continuation of the State Treasurer  as in-
[67]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vestment officer for the Oregon Investment  Council and of the council, for the purpose of
succession to the rights and obligations of  the State Treasurer and the council to the extent
the department assumes the rights and obligations under this 2017 Act.
(3) The four voting members of  the Oregon Investment Council appointed by the Gover-
nor under ORS 293.706 shall continue as voting members of the council until the expiration
of their  terms. A member originally appointed under ORS 293.706 is eligible for reappoint-
ment under the provisions of section 5 of this 2017 Act.
(4) The portion of the moneys in the Miscellaneous Receipts Account  established under
ORS 293.718 that the State Treasurer determines have been  deducted as payment for ex-
penses related to the investment of the  funds that the Oregon Investment Department is
charged with  investing under this 2017 Act and that the State Treasurer determines are
necessary for the department and council to exercise  the powers and perform the duties
granted the department and council under this 2017  Act or otherwise, shall be transferred
to the Oregon Investment Department Fund established under section 8 of this 2017 Act.
(5) The transfer of duties, functions and  powers by this 2017 Act does not affect any
action, proceeding or prosecution  involving or with respect to such duties, functions and
powers begun before and pending at the time of the transfer,  except that the Oregon In-
vestment Department is substituted, where applicable,  for the Oregon Investment Council,
or the State Treasurer as investment officer for the  council, in the action, proceeding or
prosecution.
(6) Nothing in sections 2 to 8 of this 2017 Act, the amendments to statutes by sections 9
to 98 of  this 2017 Act or the repeal of statutes by section 100 of this 2017 Act relieves a
person of a  liability, duty or obligation accruing under or with respect to the duties, func-
tions and powers transferred  to the Oregon Investment Department. The department may
undertake the collection or enforcement of any such liability, duty or obligation.
(7) Notwithstanding the transfer of  duties, functions and powers to the Oregon Invest-
ment Department, the rules of the Oregon Investment Council, or the State Treasurer as
investment officer for the council, in effect on the operative date specified in  section 101 of
this 2017 Act continue in effect until superseded  or repealed by rules of the department.
References, in rules of the council or the State Treasurer, to the Oregon Investment Council,
an officer or employee of the council or the  State Treasurer as investment officer for the
council, where applicable, are considered to be references to the department or  an officer
or employee of the department.
(8) The rights and obligations of the  Oregon Investment Council and of the State Treas-
urer as investment officer for the council, legally incurred  under contracts, leases and
business transactions executed, entered into or begun before the operative date specified  in
section 101 of this 2017  Act, and incurred for the investment funds the Oregon Investment
Department is charged with investing under this 2017 Act, are transferred to the depart-
ment. For the purpose of succession to these rights and obligations, the department is  a
continuation of  the Oregon Investment Council, and the State Treasurer as investment offi-
cer for the council, and not a new authority.
SECTION 100.
ORS 293.706, 293.716, 293.731, 293.736, 293.756,  293.761, 293.766, 293.780,
293.861, 293.863, 294.831, 294.847 and 294.850 are repealed.
SECTION 101. (1) Sections 2 to 8 and 99 of this 2017 Act, the amendments  to statutes by
sections 9 to 98 of this 2017 Act and the  repeal of statutes by section 100 of this 2017 Act
[68]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
become operative January 1, 2018.
(2)(a) The State Treasurer and the Oregon Investment Council may take any  action prior
to the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section that is necessary to allow the
State Treasurer and the Oregon Investment Council to carry out sections 2 to 8 and  99 of
this 2017 Act, the amendments to  statutes by sections 9 to 98 of this 2017 Act and the repeal
of statutes by section 100 of this 2017 Act on and after  the operative date specified in sub-
section (1) of this section.
(b) Prior to the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section, the State
Treasurer may transfer or loan assets  or moneys held by or deposited for the State Treas-
urer to the Oregon Investment Department on such terms as the State Treasurer deter-
mines will fully reimburse the State Treasurer for the value of  the transferred or loaned
assets or moneys.
(3)(a) The Oregon Investment Council created under ORS 293.706 may  appoint the Chief
Executive Officer  of the Oregon Investment Department established under section 2 of this
2017 Act before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The Chief Executive Officer of the Oregon Investment Department  may take any
action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary
to enable the Chief Executive Officer to exercise, on and after the operative  date specified
in subsection (1)  of this section, the duties, functions and powers of the Chief Executive Of-
ficer pursuant  to section 2 of this 2017 Act, including entering into an agreement with the
State Treasurer for the transfer or loan  of assets or moneys as described in subsection (2)
of this section.
SECTION 102.
(1) The State Treasurer and the Oregon Investment Council shall:
(a) Deliver to the Oregon Investment Department all records and property  within the
jurisdiction of the State Treasurer or  the council that relate to the duties, functions and
powers transferred by this 2017 Act; and
(b) Transfer to the Oregon Investment Department those  employees engaged primarily
in the exercise of the duties, functions and powers transferred by this 2017 Act.
(2) The Chief Executive Officer of the Oregon Investment Department shall take  pos-
session of the records and property, and shall  take charge of the employees and employ them
in the exercise of the duties,  functions and powers transferred by this 2017 Act, without re-
duction of compensation  but subject to change or termination of employment or compen-
sation as provided by law.
(3) The Governor shall resolve  any dispute between the State Treasurer or the Oregon
Investment Council and the  Oregon Investment Department relating to transfers of records,
property and employees under this section, and the Governor’s decision is final.
SECTION 103. (1) The unexpended balances of amounts authorized  to be expended by the
State Treasurer or the Oregon Investment Council for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017,
from revenues dedicated, continuously appropriated, appropriated or  otherwise made avail-
able for  the purpose of administering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers trans-
ferred by this 2017 Act  are transferred to and are available for expenditure by the Oregon
Investment Department  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for the purpose of admin-
istering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers transferred by this 2017 Act.
(2) The expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing or limiting
expenditures by the State Treasurer or the Oregon Investment Council remain  applicable to
[69]
SB 107
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
expenditures by the Oregon Investment Department under this section.
SECTION 104. The section  captions used in this 2017 Act are provided only for the con-
venience of the reader and do not become  part of the statutory law of this state or express
any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 105. This 2017 Act being necessary for the  immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[70]