Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS chapter 468B.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “camping site” does not include an established
campground used by individuals in accordance with the terms and conditions established by
the owner of the campground.
(2) Any person may submit a complaint to the Department  of Environmental Quality if
the person reasonably believes  that an established camping site used by homeless individuals
is causing the discharge of any wastes into the waters of the state.
(3) Upon receiving a complaint under subsection (2) of this section, the  department shall
investigate the complaint. If the complaint is verified, the department shall:
(a) Cause the homeless individuals to be removed from the camping site; and
(b) Clean any wastes at  the camping site as necessary to protect the waters of the state.
(4)(a) The department may contract or collaborate  with any local government to carry
out removal and cleanup activities under this section.
(b) The removal of  homeless individuals under this section must be conducted in a man-
ner that conforms to the provisions of ORS 195.505.
(5) In investigating complaints  under this section, the department shall give priority to
complaints of waste discharges into surface waters that  are sources of municipal drinking
water.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1462