Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 94.645 is amended to read:
94.645. (1) The board of directors at least annually shall adopt a budget for the  planned com-
munity.
(2) The budget shall include moneys to be allocated to the reserve account under ORS 94.595.
(3) At least 30 days before voting to adopt a  budget, the board of directors shall provide
a summary of the proposed budget to all owners.
[(3)] (4) Within 30 days after adopting the annual budget for  the planned community, the board
of directors shall provide a summary of the budget to all owners.
[(4)] (5)  If the board fails to adopt a budget, the last adopted annual budget shall  continue in
effect.
(6) The association may not impose or increase any assessment, fine, fee or  interest
charge unless the charge is:
(a) Described in a budget adopted in accordance with this section; and
(b) Approved by a majority of the owners.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 100.483 is amended to read:
100.483. (1) The board of directors at least annually  shall adopt a budget for the association of
unit owners.
(2) The budget shall include moneys required to be allocated to the reserve  account under ORS
100.175.
(3) At least 30 days before voting to  adopt a budget, the board of directors shall provide
a summary of the proposed budget to all owners.
[(3)] (4)  Within 30 days after adopting the  annual budget for the association, the board of di-
rectors shall provide a summary of the budget to all owners.
[(4)] (5) If the board of directors fails  to adopt an annual budget, the last adopted budget shall
continue in effect.
(6) The  association may not impose or increase any assessment, fine, fee or interest
charge unless the charge is:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1813
HB 2403
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
(a) Described in a budget adopted in accordance with this section; and
(b) Approved by a majority of the owners.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 94.645 and ORS 100.483 by sections  1 and 2 of this
2021 Act apply to increases in charges adopted by an association on or after the earlier of:
(1) The date the association adopts a budget on or after January 1, 2022; or
(2) January 1, 2023.
[2]