Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 260.532 is amended to read:
260.532. (1) No person shall  cause to be written, printed, published, posted, communicated or
circulated, any letter, circular, bill, placard, poster, photograph  or other publication, or cause any
advertisement to be placed in a publication, or  singly or with others pay for any advertisement, with
knowledge or with reckless disregard that  the letter, circular, bill, placard, poster, photograph,
publication or advertisement contains a false statement  of material fact relating to any candidate,
political committee or measure.
(2) As used in subsection (1) of this section, “cause” does not include the broadcast of  an ad-
vertisement by a radio or television station or cable television  company unless the advertisement
is for:
(a) The candidacy of the owner, licensee or operator of the station or company; or
(b) A ballot measure of which a chief petitioner is the owner, licensee or operator of the  station
or company.
(3) A candidate who knows of and consents  to a publication or advertisement prohibited by this
section with knowledge or with reckless disregard  that it contains a false statement of material fact,
violates this section  regardless of whether the candidate has participated directly in the publication
or advertisement.
(4) There is a rebuttable presumption that a candidate knows of and consents  to any publication
or advertisement prohibited by this section caused by a political committee over  which the candi-
date exercises any direction and control.
(5) Any candidate or political committee aggrieved by a violation of this section  shall have a
right of  action against the person alleged to have committed the violation. The aggrieved party may
file the action in the circuit  court for any county in this state in which a defendant resides or can
be found  or, if the defendant is a nonresident of this state, in the circuit court for any county in
which the publication occurred. To prevail in such an action, the plaintiff must show by clear  and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2073
HB 2445
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
convincing evidence that the defendant violated subsection (1) of this section.
(6)(a) A plaintiff who prevails in an action provided by subsection (5) of this section [ may recover
economic and noneconomic damages, as defined in ORS 31.710, or $2,500, whichever is greater. ] shall
recover:
(A) Damages of $10,000 for each violation of this section; and
(B) Reasonable attorney fees incurred by the plaintiff at trial and on appeal.
(b) In addition to any  award provided to a plaintiff under paragraph (a) of this subsection,
if a plaintiff prevails in an action provided by subsection (5) of this section, the judge  may
further fine the defendant up to $10,000 for  each violation of this section, with the proceeds
of any fine being deposited into  the Legal Aid Supplementary Account established under
section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(c) In addition to any monetary award  or fine established in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection, the court may award  such additional equitable relief as it considers necessary or
proper. The equitable relief may include, but is not limited to, a  requirement that a retraction of the
false statement be  disseminated in the manner directed by the court. [ Proof of entitlement to economic
and noneconomic damages must be by a preponderance of evidence. The court shall award the  pre-
vailing party reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal. ]
(7) A political committee has standing to bring an action provided by subsection (5) of this sec-
tion as plaintiff in its own name, if its purpose as evidenced by its preelection activities, solicitations
and publications has been injured by the violation  and if it has fully complied with the provisions
of this chapter. In an action brought by a political committee as provided by subsection (5) of  this
section, the plaintiff may recover economic and noneconomic  damages for all injury to the purpose
of the committee as provided in subsection (6) of this section.
(8) If a judgment is rendered in an action under  this section against a defendant who has been
nominated to public office or elected to a public office other than  state Senator or state Represen-
tative, and it is established by clear and convincing evidence that the false statement was delib-
erately made or caused to be made by the defendant, the finder of fact shall  determine whether the
false statement reversed the outcome of the election. If the  finder of fact finds by clear and con-
vincing evidence that the false statement  reversed the outcome of the election, the defendant shall
be deprived of the nomination or election and the nomination or office shall be declared vacant.
(9) An action under this section  must be filed not later than the 30th day after the election re-
lating to which a publication or advertisement in violation of this  section was made. Proceedings
on a complaint filed under this section shall have  precedence over all other business on the docket.
The courts shall proceed in a manner which will ensure that:
(a) Final judgment on a complaint which relates to a  primary election or nominating election is
rendered before the 30th day before the general election; and
(b) Final judgment on a complaint which relates to  an election to an office is rendered before
the term of that office begins.
(10) The remedy provided by this section is the exclusive remedy for a violation  of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Legal Aid Supplementary Account is established  in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the account shall be
credited to  the account. All moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services for the purpose of making  the distributions
required by this section.
(2) At the end of each calendar quarter,  the department shall distribute the moneys
[2]
HB 2445
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
earned by the account in the previous calendar quarter to  the Oregon State Bar. Amounts
distributed to the Oregon State Bar under this subsection may  be used only for funding the
Legal Services Program established under ORS 9.572.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2017 Act and the amendments to ORS 260.532 by  section 1
of this 2017 Act apply only to causes of action arising  on or after the effective date of this
2017 Act.
[3]