Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training shall  establish
a program to provide grants to a nonprofit organization to fund  the care of retired law
enforcement dogs.
(2) The department may award grants under this section to a nonprofit organization  that
agrees to consult on applications for funding with:
(a) A representative of the Oregon Police Canine Association;
(b) A representative of the veterinary industry; and
(c) A nonprofit organization that advocates for working dogs.
(3) A nonprofit organization awarded a grant under this section  may provide to a care-
taker of a retired law enforcement dog  that meets the requirements of subsection (4) of this
section:
(a) Up to $1,000 per year to reimburse the caretaker for the costs of  daily care and sup-
plies for the retired law enforcement dog; and
(b) Up to $5,000 to reimburse the caretaker for emergency veterinary  care for the retired
law enforcement dog.
(4) A caretaker of a retired law  enforcement dog is eligible to receive funding under the
program established in  this section if the law enforcement agency that used the law
enforcement dog certifies that:
(a) The retired law enforcement dog was  medically retired from a law enforcement
agency in this state due to an on-the-job injury or was used by a law  enforcement agency in
this state for at least 36 months;
(b) The retired law enforcement dog was certified in patrol,  drug detection or explosives
detection; and
(c) The law enforcement agency will notify the  nonprofit organization when the law
enforcement dog dies.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Public Safety Standards and  Training, for the biennium beginning
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1311
HB 2304
1
2
3
4
5
6
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $150,000, which may be expended  for the
purposes of awarding grants under section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]