Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 29, chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section  7, chapter 51,
Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 29.  As used in sections 29 to 32, chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021:
(1) “Community renewable energy  project” means one or more renewable energy systems, stor-
age systems, microgrids or energy-related infrastructures that  promote energy resilience, increase
renewable energy generation or renewable energy storage capacity and provide a direct benefit  to
a particular community in the form of increased community energy resilience, local  jobs, economic
development or direct energy costs savings to families and small businesses.
(2) “Community energy resilience” means the ability of a specific community to maintain the
availability of energy needed  to support the provision of energy-dependent critical public services
to the community following nonroutine  disruptions of severe impact or duration to the state’s
broader energy systems.
(3) “Community energy resilience project” means a community renewable energy project that
includes utilizing one or more renewable energy systems to support the energy  resilience of struc-
tures or facilities that are essential to the public welfare.
(4) “Consumer-owned utility” means a  municipal electricity utility, a people’s utility district or-
ganized under ORS chapter 261 that sells electricity or  an electric cooperative organized under ORS
chapter 62.
(5) “Electric cooperative  organized under ORS chapter 62” includes an electric cooperative or-
ganized under ORS chapter 62 that  is operating in this state and formed for one or both of the fol-
lowing purposes:
(a) To generate, purchase or obtain  electric power, energy, transmission services or ancillary
services; or
(b) To represent  one or more consumer-owned utilities in meeting rural, environmental or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 376
HB 2566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
renewable energy requirements and mandates.
(6) “Energy resilience” means the ability of energy systems, from production through  delivery
to end-users, to withstand and restore energy  delivery rapidly following nonroutine disruptions of
severe impact or duration.
(7) “Planning costs” means the costs related to planning paid by an applicant,  or an applicant’s
partner, described under section 30, chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021.
(8) “Project cost” [ means] includes:
(a) For a community renewable energy project,  the actual cost of the  acquisition, con-
struction and installation of [ a] the renewable energy  system incurred by an applicant, or an
applicant’s partner, described under section 30,  chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021, for the system, be-
fore considering utility incentives.
(b) For a stand-alone energy  resilience project, the actual cost incurred by an applicant,
or an applicant’s partner, described  under section 30, chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021, to de-
velop and complete the stand-alone energy resilience project.
(9) “Public body” means a public body as defined in ORS 174.109.
(10) “Qualifying community”  means a community that qualifies as an environmental justice
community as defined in ORS 469A.400.
(11) “Renewable energy system” includes:
(a) A system that uses biomass, solar, geothermal, hydroelectric, wind, landfill gas, biogas  or
wave, tidal or ocean thermal energy technology to produce energy.
(b) One or more energy storage systems paired  with an existing or newly constructed system
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) One or more vehicle charging  stations paired with an existing or newly constructed system
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d) Microgrid  enabling technologies, including microgrid controllers and any other related
technologies needed to electrically isolate a community energy  resilience project from the electric
grid so that the project is capable of operating independently from the electric grid.
(12) “Stand-alone energy resilience project”  means a project that supports the energy
resilience of, or prevents outages resulting from a natural hazard to,  one or more structures
or facilities that are essential to public welfare.
SECTION 2.
 Section 30,  chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section 8, chapter 58,
Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 30.  (1)  The Community Renewable [ Investment] and Resilient Energy Grant  Program is
established for the purpose of:
(a) Offsetting the cost of planning and developing community renewable energy projects;
(b) Offsetting the cost of developing stand-alone energy resilience projects;
[(b)] (c) Making community renewable energy and stand-alone energy resilience  projects
economically feasible for qualifying communities;
[(c)] (d) Promoting small-scale renewable energy projects; and
[(d)] (e) Providing direct benefits to communities across this state in the form of  increased
community energy resilience,  energy resilience,  local jobs, economic development or direct  energy
cost savings to families and small businesses.
(2)(a) A  federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe, public body or consumer-owned utility may
submit to the State Department  of Energy an application for grant moneys from the Community
Renewable and Resilient Energy  Investment Fund established under section 33, chapter 508,
[2]
HB 2566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Oregon Laws 2021, for the purpose of planning or developing a community  renewable energy project
or developing a stand-alone energy resilience project .
(b) An applicant may partner with a federally recognized Oregon  Indian tribe, public body,
nonprofit entity, private business with a business site in this state or owner of  rental property in
this state, but a grant for an approved application  will only be awarded and released to an applicant
that is a federally recognized Oregon  Indian tribe, public body or consumer-owned utility. Any
federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe, public body, nonprofit entity, private  business or owner
of rental property that partners with the applicant must be listed in the application.
(c) An application must be drafted in consultation with electric utilities that have customers in
the communities covered  by a community renewable energy project or stand-alone energy
resilience project  that is in the application and regional stakeholders [ for the purpose of ensuring
feasibility].
(3) An application for a grant for planning a community renewable  energy project must demon-
strate that the planning:
(a) Is for a project located in this state but outside a city  with a population of 500,000 or more;
(b) Will be completed within six months of execution  of the performance agreement or a rea-
sonable time frame if good cause to extend the deadline is demonstrated as determined by rule;
(c) Will result in a proposal for developing a community renewable energy project; and
(d) Incorporates feedback from:
(A) Members of qualifying communities served by the community renewable energy project;
(B) Businesses located in the communities served by the community renewable energy project;
(C) Electric utilities  that have customers in the communities served by the community
renewable energy project; and
(D) Other regional stakeholders.
(4)(a) An application for a grant for developing a community  renewable energy project must be
on a form prescribed by the department and contain:
(A) A detailed description of the project’s systems and the systems’ operation;
(B) Information showing that the project’s systems will  operate as represented in the application
and, if the project is for producing electricity, remain in operation for at least five years  or for at
least a period of time established by the Director of the State Department of Energy by rule;
(C) The anticipated total project cost;
(D) Information on the number and types of jobs directly connected  to the awarding of the grant
that will be:
(i) Created by the project; and
(ii) Sustained throughout construction, installation and operation of the project;
(E) Information demonstrating that the project will comply with applicable state and local laws
and regulations and obtain required licenses and permits;
(F) Information demonstrating that  the project will be located in and benefit a community in this
state but outside a city with a population of 500,000 or more; and
(G) Any other information the director considers necessary to determine whether the project is
in compliance with sections 29 to 32,  chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021, and any applicable rules or
standards adopted thereunder.
(b) An application for a grant  for developing a  community renewable energy project must
demonstrate that the project:
(A) Is located in this state but outside a city with a population of 500,000 or more;
[3]
HB 2566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Will begin construction within 12 months  of execution of the performance agreement and be
completed within 36 months of execution of the performance agreement or  a reasonable time frame
if good cause to extend the deadline is demonstrated as determined by rule;
(C) Results in  increased community energy resilience, local jobs, economic development or direct
energy cost savings to families and small businesses;
(D) Complies with applicable state and local laws and regulations and  has the required licenses
and permits;
(E) Does not exceed  20 megawatts of nameplate capacity, if the project is for generating
renewable energy; and
(F) Will operate for at least five years, if the project is for producing  electricity, or for at least
a period of time established by the director by rule.
(5)(a) An application for a grant for developing  a stand-alone energy resilience project
must be on a form prescribed by the department and contain:
(A) A detailed description of the project and the project’s energy resilience objectives;
(B) The anticipated total project cost;
(C) Information on the  community benefits and energy resilience benefits expected from
the project;
(D) Information demonstrating that the project will comply  with applicable state and lo-
cal laws and regulations and obtain required licenses and permits;
(E) Information demonstrating that  the project will be located in and benefit a commu-
nity in this state but outside a city with a population of 500,000 or more; and
(F) Any other information the director considers necessary to determine  whether the
project is in compliance with sections  29 to 32, chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021, and any ap-
plicable rules or standards adopted thereunder.
(b) An  application for a grant for developing a stand-alone energy resilience project must
demonstrate that the project:
(A) Is located in this state but outside a city with a population of 500,000 or more;
(B) Results in increased  energy resilience, local jobs, economic development or direct
energy cost savings to families and small businesses; and
(C) Complies with applicable state and local laws and regulations and has the  required
licenses and permits.
(c) The department may adopt rules  specifying the systems, technologies, equipment or
measures eligible to be considered as part of a stand-alone energy resilience project.
[(5)] (6) Upon receipt of  an application submitted under this section, the department shall review
and determine whether the applicant is eligible to receive a grant from the Community  Renewable
[Investment] and Resilient Energy Grant  Program established under this section. The  department
may approve an application if the department finds that:
(a) The planning or development proposal meets the requirements listed in subsection (3) , [ or]
(4) or (5) of this section;
(b) The proposal meets the standards described in subsection [ (10)] (11) of this section;
(c) The proposal meets any standards adopted  by rule under subsection [ (11)] (12) of this section;
(d) The proposal is technically feasible; and
(e) Any  federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe, public body, private business or owner of
rental property partnered with the applicant is listed in the application.
[(6)(a)] (7)(a) The department shall issue  separate opportunity announcements for each calendar
[4]
HB 2566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
interval that funding is available for the following categories:
(A) Planning a community renewable energy project that qualifies as a community energy
resilience project;
(B) Developing a community renewable energy project that qualifies  as a community energy
resilience project;
(C) Planning a community renewable energy project that does not qualify as a community energy
resilience project; and
(D) Developing a community renewable energy project that does  not qualify as a community
energy resilience project.
(b) The department may  issue a separate opportunity announcement for each calendar
interval that funding is available for developing a stand-alone energy resilience project.
[(b)] (c) Upon receiving an application, the director shall determine whether the application is
for a community renewable energy project that  qualifies as a community energy resilience project
based on the definition of “community energy resilience project” in section 29, chapter  508, Oregon
Laws 2021, and any applicable rules adopted under this section.
[(7)(a)] (8)(a) The department shall allocate, out of the [ initial] moneys appropriated for the
Community Renewable [ Investment] and Resilient Energy Grant  Program under section 34, chapter
508, Oregon Laws 2021:
(A) 50 percent or more for grants to be awarded for planning  or developing community
renewable energy projects that qualify as community energy resilience projects.
(B) 50  percent or more for grants to be awarded for planning or developing community
renewable energy projects that primarily serve one or more qualifying communities.
(C) 20 percent  or less for grants to be awarded for developing stand-alone energy
resilience projects.
[(b) The department shall allocate, out of any subsequent and additional moneys appropriated to
the Community Renewable Investment Program, percentage amounts for grants in a  manner consistent
with paragraph (a) of this subsection. ]
[(c) After two years  of issuing announcements of available funding opportunities from the initial
moneys appropriated to the Community Renewable Investment Program and ]
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)  of this subsection,  after consultation with the Advisory
Committee on Community Renewable [ Investment] and Resilient Energy Investments  described  in
section 32, chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021, the department  may, by rule, reallocate the percentage
of available funds across project categories.
[(8)] (9) The department shall review and competitively score applications separately  for each
funding opportunity announcement.
[(9)] (10) If the department approves an application under this section, the department and  the
applicant may enter into a performance agreement that meets the requirements set forth  in section
31, chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021.
[(10)] (11) In approving applications and awarding grant  moneys, the department shall prioritize
planning and development proposals that:
(a) Include community energy resilience projects.
(b) Demonstrate significant prior investments in energy efficiency measures at the project  lo-
cation or will result in aggregate improvements to demand response capabilities.
(c) Are for projects located in qualifying communities across the state.
(d) When applicable, are for projects constructed in part or in whole  by disadvantaged business
[5]
HB 2566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
enterprises, emerging small businesses or businesses that are owned by  minorities, women or disa-
bled veterans.
(e) Include inclusive hiring and promotion policies for workers working on the projects.
(f) Incorporate equity metrics developed in coordination with the Environmental Justice  Council
established by ORS 182.538 for evaluating the involvement of  and leadership by people of low in-
come, Black, Indigenous or People of Color, members  of tribal communities, people with disabilities,
youth, people from rural communities  and people from otherwise disadvantaged communities in the
siting, planning, designing or evaluating of the proposed community renewable energy projects.
(g) Help  the applicants achieve goals included in the applicants’ natural hazard mitigation plans
as approved by the Federal Emergency Management Agency.
[(11)] (12) The department  shall adopt rules, in consultation with [ Business Oregon ] the Oregon
Business Development Department , to carry out sections 29 to 32, chapter 508, Oregon  Laws
2021. The rules must:
(a) Define the planning and project  costs eligible to be covered by a grant provided under sec-
tion 31 (1) and (2), chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021.
(b) Adopt a methodology  to identify qualifying communities and assess the geographic diversity
of the approved  planning and development projects compared with the other planning and develop-
ment project applications for which grants have been requested in each opportunity announcement.
(c) Establish guidelines for significant, unforeseeable or uncontrollable delays that will  consti-
tute good cause for extending the timelines agreed upon in performance agreements.
[(12)] (13) The State Department of Energy may adopt rules capping the amount of grant funds
that may be paid to individual consultants and contractors in each round  of funding opportunity
announcements if the department finds such limitations necessary to ensure broad distribution of
funds and opportunity for emerging small businesses as defined in ORS 200.005.
SECTION 3.
 Section 31,  chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section 8, chapter 51,
Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 31.  (1)(a) A performance agreement  for planning a community renewable energy project
entered into between the State Department of Energy and an applicant under  section 30 [ (9)],
chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021, must provide, at a minimum:
(A) A  grant in an amount described in paragraph (b) of this subsection that covers up to 100
percent of the reasonable planning costs including, but not limited to, costs associated with:
(i) Consulting fees.
(ii) Load analysis.
(iii) Siting, excluding property acquisition.
(iv) Ensuring code compliance.
(v) Interconnection studies.
(vi) Transmission studies.
(vii) Other reasonable expenditures made in the community  renewable energy project planning
process as determined by the department by rule.
(B) A grant may not be used to cover any fixed costs the  applicant would incur in the
applicant’s normal course of business such as existing staff salaries or overhead costs.
(C) The  department may recover grant moneys if a project fails to abide by the performance
agreement or if planning is not completed within six months of execution of the  performance
agreement or a reasonable time frame if good cause to extend the deadline  is demonstrated as de-
termined by rule.
[6]
HB 2566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The department may establish differing limits on the maximum amount  of grants for planning
community renewable energy projects based on the scope and  attributes of the planning applications
not to exceed an amount of $100,000 per grant.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, the department may provide a grant that
covers up to 100 percent of the reasonable planning costs only if the application demonstrates  the
planning proposal is for a community renewable energy project that:
(A) If for producing energy:
(i) Will make use of an adequately available renewable energy resource to produce the energy;
(ii) Has a specific market for the energy; and
(iii) Will reasonably and efficiently connect or transmit the energy  to the specific community
identified in the application under section 30 (3), chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021; or
(B) If for increasing energy resilience:
(i) Will increase  the energy resilience of a specific structure or facility or collection of struc-
tures or facilities essential to the public welfare; and
(ii) Will provide energy resilience benefits to the specific structure or facility or to  the col-
lection of structures or facilities.
(2) A performance  agreement for developing a community renewable energy project or stand-
alone energy resilience project  entered into between the State Department of Energy and  an ap-
plicant under section 30 [ (9)], chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021, must provide, at a minimum:
[(a)] (a)(A) For a community renewable  energy project that qualifies as a community energy
resilience project, a grant that covers up to 100 percent of the project cost not to  exceed $1 million.
The department shall  reduce the grant amount, if the grant combined with other incentives and
grants received by  the applicant or a partner of the applicant exceeds 100 percent of the total costs
associated with the project.
[(b)] (B) For a  community renewable energy project that does not qualify as a community energy
resilience project, a grant that covers up to 50 percent of the project cost  not to exceed $1 million.
The department shall reduce the grant amount, if the grant combined with other  incentives and
grants received by  the applicant or a partner of the applicant exceeds 100 percent of the total costs
associated with the project.
(C) For a stand-alone energy resilience  project, a grant that covers up to 50 percent of
the project cost not to exceed $250,000. The department shall  reduce the grant amount, if the
grant combined with other incentives  and grants received by the applicant or a partner of
the applicant exceeds 100 percent of the total costs associated with the project.
[(c)] (b) Subject to paragraph [ (e)] (d) of this subsection, the department may release up to 30
percent of the grant moneys provided for in a performance agreement upon  entering into a per-
formance agreement with an applicant for developing  a community renewable energy project  or
stand-alone energy resilience project , if upon entering the performance agreement the applicant
demonstrates that the applicant or a partner of the applicant has:
(A) Taken meaningful steps to seek site control, including but not limited to  an option to lease
or purchase the site or an executed letter of intent or exclusivity agreement to  negotiate an option
to lease or purchase the site;
(B) If applicable, filed a request for interconnection with a  host utility or appropriate trans-
mission provider; and
(C) Met any other  requirements provided by the department by rule, such as filing a request for
a power purchase or net metering agreement.
[7]
HB 2566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(d)] (c) Subject to paragraph [ (e)] (d) of this subsection, in addition to grant moneys released
under paragraph [ (c)] (b) of this subsection,  the department may release up to 30 percent of the
grant moneys provided for in a performance agreement if the applicant  demonstrates that the ap-
plicant or a partner of the applicant has met the requirements of paragraph [ (c)] (b) of  this sub-
section and any  additional requirements for the release of grant funds under this paragraph provided
by the department by rule, such as demonstrating eligible costs incurred for the acquisition  or
construction of a community  renewable energy project  or completion of a stand-alone energy
resilience project.
[(e)] (d) The amount of grant moneys released pursuant to paragraph (b) or  (c) [ or (d) ] of this
subsection may not exceed, for each release of grant moneys:
(A) Thirty percent of  project cost for community renewable energy projects that qualify as
community energy resilience projects; and
(B) Fifteen percent of project cost for community renewable energy projects that  do not qualify
as community energy resilience projects  or for stand-alone energy resilience projects .
[(f)] (e) Grant moneys not released under paragraph (b) or  (c) [ or (d) ] of  this subsection shall
be released upon project completion under the terms of the performance agreement.
[(g)] (f) The department may recover grant moneys if:
(A) The project fails to abide by the performance agreement;
(B) For a community renewable energy project,  the project fails to  begin construction within
12 months of execution of the performance agreement or a reasonable time frame if good  cause to
extend the deadline is demonstrated as determined by rule; or
(C) The project is not completed within 36 months of  execution of the performance agreement
or a reasonable time frame if good cause to extend the deadline is demonstrated as determined  by
rule.
(3) The department shall gather information from grantees necessary to evaluate  indicators of
success as determined by rule.
SECTION 4.
 Section 32,  chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section 9, chapter 58,
Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 32.  The Director  of the State Department of Energy may appoint an Advisory Committee
on Community Renewable [ Investment] and Resilient Energy Investments  to provide consultation
on the implementation  of sections 29 to 32, chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021. A committee appointed
under this section shall consist of:
(1) A member of the Environmental Justice Council;
(2) A representative of [ Business Oregon ] the Oregon Business Development Department ;
(3) A representative of electric companies;
(4) A representative of consumer-owned utilities;
(5) A representative from an organization  that represents community renewable energy devel-
opment;
(6) A representative from a federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe;
(7) Three representatives of  local government to represent the interests of counties, cities and
special  districts;
(8) Representatives from nongovernmental organizations that represent communities of low  in-
come or disadvantaged households; and
(9) Representatives from relevant state and federal emergency management or response  agen-
cies.
[8]
HB 2566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
SECTION 5.
 Section 33, chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 33.  (1)  The Community Renewable and Resilient Energy  Investment Fund is established
in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Com-
munity Renewable and Resilient Energy  Investment Fund shall be credited to  the fund. The fund
consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys received from federal, state or local sources;
(c) Gifts, grants or other moneys contributed to the fund; and
(d) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State Department of Energy for  the
purpose of providing grants to applicants approved  under section 30 , chapter 508, Oregon Laws
2021 [ of this 2021 Act ].
(3) The department may use reasonable  amounts from the fund necessary, but no more than 10
percent of the fund, to administer the Community  Renewable [ Investment] and Resilient Energy
Grant Program described in section 30 , chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021  [ of this 2021 Act ].
(4) No later than  December 15 of each odd-numbered year,  the Director of the State De-
partment of Energy shall submit a biennial report to the Legislative  Assembly in the manner pro-
vided by ORS 293.640 regarding the expenditures of moneys deposited in  the Community Renewable
and Resilient Energy  Investment Fund and status of  ongoing projects funded by the moneys, in-
cluding but not limited indicators of program success. A report is  not required under this sub-
section if in the preceding 24 months the fund did not have  any moneys and there were no
ongoing projects that were funded by moneys from the fund.
[(5) Upon the expenditure of all grant moneys in the Community Renewable Investment Fund  or
four years from the effective date of this 2021 Act September  25, 2021, whichever occurs earlier, the
director shall submit a report to the Legislative Assembly regarding the expenditures of  moneys de-
posited in the Community Renewable Investment Fund and  status of ongoing projects that have re-
ceived moneys from the fund, including but not limited to indicators of program success. ]
[9]