Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 443.400 to
443.455.
SECTION 2. A residential care facility shall:
(1) Provide a resident with an itemized monthly bill that states:
(a) The monthly base rate for the facility; and
(b) The rate for each individual service or care provided to the resident.
(2) Reimburse a resident for  any services for which the resident paid that the facility did
not provide.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3667