Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Public Utility Homeland Security Commission is established
in the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
(2) The commission shall consist of five members appointed by the Governor,  subject to
confirmation by the Senate in the manner provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(3) The commission shall carry out the duties and functions described in section 2 of this
2025 Act.
(4) A majority of  the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(5) Official action by the commission requires the  approval of a majority of the members
of the commission.
(6) The commission shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there is a  vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment to be-
come immediately effective.
(8) The commission shall meet  at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the commission.
(9) The commission may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the commission.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section, “consumer-owned utility” means a people’s utility
district organized under ORS chapter 261, a municipal utility organized under ORS chapter
225 or an electric cooperative organized under ORS chapter 62.
(2) The Oregon  Department of Emergency Management shall award grants from the
Oregon Public Utility Homeland Security Fund established under section 3 of this  2025 Act
to consumer-owned utilities for the purposes of implementing projects related to  mitigating
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1345
HB 2519
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
damage resulting from the occurrence  of a natural disaster or responding to or recovering
from the occurrence of  a natural disaster. Projects to which the department may award a
grant under this section may include:
(a) The evaluation of facilities owned by consumer-owned utilities to determine whether
the facilities meet state safety standards;
(b) The  assessment of facilities owned by consumer-owned utilities to determine capabil-
ities and vulnerabilities;
(c) The  review of facility construction standards related to service reliability that are
used by consumer-owned utilities;
(d) The establishment of resiliency measures;
(e) The development of a prioritization schedule for restoring power to certain  critical
infrastructure, such as hospitals, after a power outage; and
(f) The review of operations, planning and infrastructure protection processes.
(3) To receive a grant under this section, a consumer-owned utility shall submit  to the
Oregon Public Utility Homeland  Security Commission a proposal for a project described in
subsection (2) of this section. The proposal must  include a description of the proposed
project, an explanation of the need for the project, the estimated cost  of the project and the
estimated amount of grant moneys that the consumer-owned utility needs to  complete the
project.
(4) The commission shall prescribe the form and manner of making a proposal  under this
section.
(5) Upon receiving a proposal under this section,  the commission shall evaluate the pro-
posal to determine whether to recommend to the Oregon Department of Emergency Man-
agement the awarding of  a grant to the consumer-owned utility that submitted the proposal.
In evaluating a proposal, the commission shall consider:
(a) The need for the proposed project;
(b) The  degree to which the project will mitigate damage resulting from the occurrence
of a natural disaster or enhance a consumer-owner utility’s  ability to respond to or recover
from the occurrence of a natural disaster;
(c) The feasibility of a consumer-owned utility completing the project; and
(d) The feasibility of a consumer-owned utility completing the  project at the estimated
cost.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Public Utility Homeland Security Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon
Public Utility Homeland Security Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated  by the Legislative Assembly to the
Oregon Department of Emergency Management for the purposes  described in section 2 of
this 2025 Act.
(3) Moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated to the department for the purposes
of:
(a) Awarding grants as described in section 2 of this 2025 Act; and
(b) Paying the administrative costs incurred under sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) In addition to and not  in lieu of the budget authorization to issue lottery
bonds under ORS 286A.035, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, at the request of the
Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the
[2]
HB 2519
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
Oregon Department of Emergency Management, the State Treasurer is  authorized to issue
lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount  that produces $
 in
net proceeds and interest earnings for the  purposes described in section 2 of this 2025 Act,
plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be  necessary to pay bond-
related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under  this section and interest earnings in an
amount sufficient to provide $ must be transferred to  the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services to provide a grant to the Oregon Department  of Emergency Man-
agement. The department shall use the grant  to fund projects as described in section 2 of
this 2025 Act.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that  the use of lottery bond proceeds pursuant to this
section for the purposes  of projects related to mitigating damage resulting from the occur-
rence of a natural disaster, or to responding to or recovering from the occurrence of a na-
tural disaster, creates jobs and furthers economic development.
[3]