Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 469A.020 is amended to read:
469A.020. (1) Except as provided  in this section, electricity may be used to comply with a
renewable portfolio standard only if the electricity  is generated by a facility that becomes opera-
tional on or after January 1, 1995.
(2) Electricity  from a generating facility, other than a hydroelectric facility, that became oper-
ational before January  1, 1995, may be used to comply with a renewable portfolio standard if the
electricity is attributable to capacity or efficiency upgrades made on or after January 1, 1995.
(3) Electricity  from a hydroelectric facility that became operational before January 1, 1995, may
be used to comply with a renewable portfolio standard if the electricity is attributable  to efficiency
upgrades made on or after January 1, 1995. If an efficiency upgrade is made to  a Bonneville Power
Administration facility, only that portion of the electricity generation attributable  to Oregon’s share
of the electricity may be used to comply with a renewable portfolio standard.
(4) Subject to the limit imposed by ORS 469A.025 (5), electricity from a  hydroelectric facility
that became operational before January 1, 1995,  may be used to comply with a renewable portfolio
standard if  the facility is certified as a low-impact hydroelectric facility on or after January 1, 1995,
by a national certification organization recognized  by the State Department of Energy by rule, and
if the facility is either:
(a) Owned by an electric utility; or
(b) Not owned by an electric utility and located in  Oregon and licensed by the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission under the Federal Power  Act, 16 U.S.C. 791a et seq., or exempt from such
license.
(5) Electricity from a generating facility located in this state that uses biomass and  that became
operational  before  January 1, 1995, may be used to comply with a renewable portfolio standard if
the facility meets the requirements of  the federal Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (P.L.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4086
HB 3313
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
95-617) on March 4, 2010.
(6) Electricity from  a generating facility located in this state that generates electricity from
direct combustion of municipal solid waste and that became operational before January 1,  1995, may
be used to comply with a renewable portfolio standard for up to 11 average megawatts of  electricity
[generated per calendar year. ] generated, per calendar year, from the direct combustion  of
biogenic material.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 469A.031 is amended to read:
469A.031. Notwithstanding ORS 469A.029, a facility described in either ORS 469A.020 (5) or (6)
is eligible for renewable energy certificates if the owner or operator  of the generating facility reg-
istered the generating facility with the Western Renewable Energy Generation Information System
on or after January 1, 2011.
[2]