Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.254, as amended by section 25, chapter 95, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
327.254. (1) The Department of Education shall use  moneys in the Statewide Education Initi-
atives Account to provide funding for statewide education initiatives, including:
(a) Funding the High School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Act at the levels
prescribed by ORS 327.856;
(b) Expanding school breakfast and lunch programs;
(c) Operating youth reengagement programs or providing youth reengagement services;
(d) Establishing and maintaining  the Statewide School Safety and Prevention System under ORS
339.341;
(e) Developing and providing  statewide equity initiatives, including any statewide education plan
developed and implemented by the department;
(f) Providing summer learning programs at schools  that are considered high poverty under Title
I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965;
(g) Funding early warning systems to assist  students in graduating from high school, as de-
scribed in ORS 327.367;
(h) Developing and implementing  professional development programs and training programs, in-
cluding programs that increase educator diversity and retain diverse educators;
(i) Planning for increased transparency and accountability in the public  education system of this
state;
(j) Providing additional funding to school  districts participating in the intensive program under
ORS 327.222;
(k) Providing technical assistance, including costs incurred for:
(A) The coaching program described in ORS 327.214; and
(B) The intensive program described in ORS 327.222, including costs for student success teams;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1657
HB 2580
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(L) Funding public charter schools, as described in ORS 327.362;
(m) Funding the Early Literacy Success School Grant program, as provided by ORS 327.833;
(n) Funding the Early Literacy Success  Community Grant program, as established by ORS
327.843;
(o) Funding any  additional amounts for approved recovery schools, as provided by rules of the
State Board of Education adopted under ORS 327.029;
(p) Funding education service districts, as described in subsection (2) of this section;
(q) Funding the Youth Corrections Education Program and the  Juvenile Detention Education
Program through the Juvenile Justice Education Fund established under section 22,  chapter 95,
Oregon Laws 2024, when necessary as provided by section 23, chapter 95, Oregon Laws 2024; [ and]
(r) Funding regional career  and technical education programs that are provided in part-
nership with an education service district or multiple school districts from the same  region;
and
[(r)] (s) Funding costs incurred by the department in implementing this section and ORS 327.175
to 327.235 and 327.274.
(2)(a) The amount of a distribution to an  education service district under this section shall be
made as provided by paragraph  (b) of this subsection after calculating the following for each edu-
cation service district:
(A) One percent of the  total amount available for distribution to education service districts in
each biennium.
(B) The education service district’s ADMw ×  (the  total amount available for distribution to
education service districts  in each biennium ÷  the total ADMw of all education service districts
that receive a distribution).
(b) The  amount of the distribution to an education service district shall be the greater of the
amounts calculated under  paragraph (a) of this subsection, except that, for distributions made as
provided by paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, the  total amount available for distribution to edu-
cation service districts shall be  the amount remaining after any distributions required under para-
graph (a)(A) of this subsection have been made.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, ADMw equals the ADMw as calculated under  ORS 327.013,
except that the additional amount  allowed for students who are in poverty families, as determined
under ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A)(v)(I), shall be 0.5.
(d) An education service district shall use moneys received under this section  as provided by a
plan developed by the school districts located within the education  service district. A school district
that declines to participate in the development of the plan or that has withdrawn from an education
service district as provided by ORS 334.015 is not entitled to any moneys  distributed to the educa-
tion service district under this subsection.
(e) A plan developed under this subsection must:
(A) Align with and support the meeting of performance growth targets established for recipients
of moneys under ORS 327.195 that are located within the education service district;
(B) Include the provision, to recipients of moneys under ORS 327.195 that are  located within the
education service district, of technical assistance in developing, implementing and reviewing a  plan
for receiving a grant from the Student Investment Account;
(C) Provide for  coordination with the department in administering and providing technical as-
sistance to recipients of moneys under ORS 327.195 that are located within  the education service
district, including coordinating any coaching programs established under ORS 327.214; and
[2]
HB 2580
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
(D) Be  adopted and amended as provided for local service plans under ORS 334.175 and approved
by the department.
(f) For the purposes of paragraph (e)  of this subsection, recipients of moneys under ORS 327.195
that are located within the education service district include, as applicable:
(A) Common school districts and union high school districts;
(B) Any charter school that is an eligible applicant, as defined in ORS 327.185; and
(C) The Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program.
(g) Each education service district must submit an annual report to the department that:
(A) Describes how the education service district spent moneys received under  this subsection;
and
(B) Includes an evaluation of the education service district’s compliance with the plan  from the
superintendent of each school district that participated in the development of the plan.
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules necessary for the distribution of moneys  un-
der this section.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[3]