Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to its other duties, the Legislative Administration Committee
shall direct  the Legislative Administrator to use moneys in the National Statuary Hall Re-
placement Fund established under section 4 of this 2017 Act for:
(a) The selection of one or more sculptors and the commissioning of the design and pro-
duction of sculptures  of Chief Joseph, Abigail Scott Duniway and Mark Odom Hatfield, in-
cluding the creation of pedestals and any desired inscriptions;
(b) The transportation of the statues and pedestals of Abigail Scott Duniway and Mark
Odom Hatfield to the United States Capitol;
(c) The temporary display of the statues of Abigail Scott Duniway and  Mark Odom
Hatfield in the Rotunda of  the United States Capitol during any unveiling ceremony to be
held;
(d) Other costs associated with the unveiling ceremony;
(e) The transportation of the statue and pedestal of Chief Joseph  to the Oregon State
Capitol for display in a place of  honor in the Oregon State Capitol building until the State
of Idaho obtains approval for the placement of the Chief  Joseph statue in National Statuary
Hall as described in section 2 of this 2017 Act;
(f) The removal of the statues of John  McLoughlin and Jason Lee, in that order, from
[2]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
National Statuary Hall  in the United States Capitol, transportation of the McLoughlin and
Lee statues to Oregon, and installation of the McLoughlin and Lee statues in places  of honor
in the Oregon State Capitol building;
(g) If the State of Idaho is unable to obtain the  permission of the Joint Committee on the
Library of Congress  for installation of the Chief Joseph statue in National Statuary Hall,
payment of the ongoing costs of rotating the Chief Joseph, Duniway and  Hatfield statues
between display in National Statuary Hall and display  at the Oregon State Capitol building
when an exchange of statues is so directed by the United  States Architect of the Capitol; and
(h) Any other expenses the Legislative Administrator incurs in implementing  this sec-
tion.
(2) Upon enactment of this 2017 Act, the Legislative Administrator shall:
(a) Immediately begin to perform the activities described  in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) Immediately write to the Architect  of the Capitol apprising the architect of the in-
terest of the State of Oregon in replacing the statues  of John McLoughlin and Jason Lee in
National Statuary  Hall with statues of Abigail Scott Duniway and Mark Odom Hatfield, and
requesting that the architect seek the approval of the Joint  Committee on the Library of
Congress for statue replacement;
(c) Immediately write to  the appropriate officials in the State of Idaho seeking their
commitment to replacing a statue  that currently represents the State of Idaho in National
Statuary Hall with a statue of Chief Joseph representing the  State of Idaho in National
Statuary Hall, as described in section 2 of this 2017 Act;
(d) As soon as adequate funds are available in  the National Statuary Hall Replacement
Fund established in section 4 of this 2017  Act, seek proposals from qualified sculptors, com-
mission and direct the production  of the sculptures of Abigail Scott Duniway and Mark Odom
Hatfield; and
(e) Convey all information received from the Architect of the Capitol and the State of
Idaho about the statue replacement project to the Legislative Administration  Committee and
the Governor or the Governor’s designee.
(3) As soon  as is practicable after the date on which the Legislative Administration
Committee determines that  it has obtained sufficient funding to undertake the remainder
of the project described  in subsection (1) of this section that has not already been performed
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section,  the Legislative Administrator shall seek proposals
from qualified sculptors and undertake whatever other measures are  necessary to complete
the project. The Legislative Administrator shall follow the directions of the Architect of the
Capitol in completing the project described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Legislative Administrator shall seek  the cooperation of the State of
Idaho for Idaho to obtain the  approval of the Joint Committee on the Library of Congress
for installation of the Chief Joseph statue as a statue representing the State of Idaho  in
National Statuary Hall.
(2) If  the State of Idaho obtains the permission of the Joint Committee on the Library
of Congress for the display of the statue of Chief Joseph that is created pursuant to  section
1 of this 2017 Act, including any pedestal and inscription, in National Statuary Hall  to rep-
resent the State of Idaho, the Legislative Administrator shall cause the statue  of Chief
Joseph to be delivered to National Statuary Hall for installation.
SECTION 3. (1) If the State of Idaho does not obtain the permission of the Joint Com-
[3]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
mittee on the Library of  Congress as described in section 2 of this 2017 Act, then 10 years
after the statues of Abigail Scott Duniway  and Mark Odom Hatfield have been installed in
National Statuary Hall, the Legislative Administrator shall  request that the Architect of the
Capitol seek the approval of the Joint Committee on  the Library of Congress for replacement
of the Mark Odom Hatfield statue with the  Chief Joseph statue described in section 1 of this
2017 Act.
(2) If the joint committee grants approval for  the installation of the Chief Joseph statue,
the Hatfield statue shall be removed from National Statuary Hall at the time the  Chief
Joseph statue is installed, and the Hatfield  statue shall be transported back to Oregon for
installation in a place of honor in the Oregon State Capitol building.
(3) The Legislative Administrator may use funds held  in the National Statuary Hall Re-
placement Fund established under section 4 of this 2017 Act for this purpose.
SECTION 4. (1) The National Statuary Hall Replacement  Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Moneys in the National Statuary Hall
Replacement Fund are  continuously appropriated to the Legislative Administration Commit-
tee for the purposes set forth in sections 1, 2 and 3 of this 2017 Act.
(2) All  gifts, grants, donations and other moneys received by the Legislative Adminis-
tration Committee for funding the  project described in sections 1, 2 and 3 of this 2017 Act
shall be deposited into the National Statuary Hall Replacement Fund.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]