Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 254.474 is amended to read:
254.474. (1) At each primary election and general  election, the county clerk shall maintain vot-
ing booths in the county as follows:
(a) In each county with 35,000 or more electors in the county, the county clerk shall maintain
a number of voting booths equal to at least one voting booth for every [ 20,000] 15,000 electors in
the county; and
(b) In each county with fewer than  35,000 electors in the county, the county clerk shall maintain
at least one voting booth.
(2) In each county with 35,000 or more electors in the county,  the county clerk shall es-
tablish at least one separate location for voting booths for every 15,000  electors in the
county. Each voting booth location established  under this subsection shall also permit a
registered elector to:
(a) Cast a ballot;
(b) Update the address information on the elector’s voter registration file; and
(c) Request and receive a  reissued or replacement ballot as described in ORS 247.307,
254.470 and 254.480.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this  subsection, the voting booth locations
required under this section shall be open to the public for no less than eight hours  on every
weekday and four hours on every weekend  day during the period beginning 20 days before the
date of the primary  election or general election and ending on the date of the primary
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3831
SB 1009
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
election or general election.
(b) On the date of the primary election or general election, the voting booth locations
shall be open from 8 a.m. through 8 p.m.
[(2)] (4)  The county  clerk may determine the location of the voting [ booths] booth locations
required under this section.  In making these determinations,  the county clerk shall solicit
public comments and consider:
(a) Proximity to public transportation lines and parking availability;
(b) Geographic features, such as mountain passes, that may affect access and conven-
ience;
(c) Equitable distribution across the county, with a goal of affording  maximally conven-
ient options for electors;
(d) The existence and location of population centers;
(e) Access for persons with disabilities; and
(f) Use of public buildings that:
(A) Are well known to electors in the county; or
(B) Offer cost savings compared to other potential locations.
(5) If the  county clerk determines that a private location should serve as a location for
the voting booth locations required under this section, the county clerk shall  develop a plan
to ensure the security of voting and services conducted at the location.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 254.470 is amended to read:
254.470. (1)(a) Except as provided in ORS 254.474:
(A) The Secretary of State by rule shall establish requirements and criteria for the  designation
of places of deposit for the ballots cast in an election.
(B) The rules shall also specify the dates and times the places of deposit must be open and  the
security requirements for the places of deposit.
(C) At a minimum, the places designated under this section shall be  open on the date of the
election for a period of eight or more hours, but must be open until at least 8 p.m.
(b) At each place of  deposit designated under this section, the county clerk shall prominently
display a sign stating that the location is an official ballot drop site.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this  subsection, the county clerk shall mail
by nonforwardable mail  an official ballot with a return identification envelope and a secrecy envel-
ope not sooner than the 20th day before the  date of an election and not later than the 14th day
before the date of the election, to each active elector of the electoral  district as of the 21st day
before the date of the election.
(b) If the county clerk  determines that an active elector of the electoral district as of the 21st
day before the date of the election does not receive daily mail service from the United  States Postal
Service, the county clerk shall mail by nonforwardable mail an  official ballot with a return iden-
tification envelope and a  secrecy envelope to the elector not sooner than the 20th day before the
date of an election and not later than the 18th day before the date of the election.
(c) In the case of ballots to be mailed to addresses outside this state to electors who are not
military or overseas electors,  the county clerk may mail the ballots not sooner than the 29th day
before the date of the election.
(3) For an election held on the date of a primary election:
(a) The county clerk shall mail the official ballot of a major political party  to each elector who
is registered as being affiliated with the major political party as of  the 21st day before the date of
[2]
SB 1009
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the election.
(b) The county clerk shall mail the official ballot of a major  political party to an elector not
affiliated with any political party if the elector has applied for the ballot as provided in this  sub-
section and that  party has provided under ORS 254.365 for a primary election that admits electors
not affiliated with any political party.
(c) An elector not affiliated with any political party who wishes to vote  in the primary election
of a major political party shall apply to the county clerk in writing. The  application shall indicate
which major political party ballot the elector wishes to receive. Except for electors  described in
subsection (4) of this section, and  subject to ORS 247.203, the application must be received by the
county clerk not later than 5 p.m. of the 21st day before the date of the election.
(d) If the  primary election ballot includes city, county or nonpartisan offices or measures, the
county clerk shall mail to each elector who is not  eligible to vote for party candidates a ballot
limited to those offices and measures for which the elector is eligible to vote.
(4) For each elector who updates  a voter registration after the deadline in ORS 247.025, the
county clerk shall make the official  ballot, the return identification envelope and the secrecy en-
velope available either by mail or at the county clerk’s  office or at another place designated by the
county clerk. An elector to whom this subsection applies must request a  ballot from the county
clerk.
(5) The ballot shall contain the following warning:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Any person who, by use of force or other means, unduly influences an elector  to vote in any
particular manner or to refrain from voting is subject to a fine.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(6)(a) Upon receipt of any ballot described in this section, the elector shall mark the ballot,  sign
the return identification envelope supplied with  the ballot and comply with the instructions provided
with the ballot.
(b) The elector may return the marked ballot  to the county clerk by United States mail or by
depositing the ballot at the office of the county clerk, at any place of deposit  designated by the
county clerk or at any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474.
(c) The ballot must be returned in the return identification  envelope. If the elector returns the
ballot by mail, the elector must provide the postage.
(d) Subject to paragraph  (e) of this subsection, if a person returns a ballot for an elector, the
person shall deposit the ballot in a manner  described in paragraph (b) of this subsection not later
than two days after receiving the ballot.
(e) A ballot must be received at the office of the county clerk, at  the designated place of deposit
or at any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474 not later than  the end of the period deter-
mined under subsection (1) of this section on the date of the election.
(7) An elector may obtain a replacement ballot if the ballot is destroyed, spoiled,  lost or not
received by the  elector. Replacement ballots shall be issued and processed as described in this
section  and  ORS 254.480. The county clerk shall keep a record of each replacement ballot provided
under this subsection. Notwithstanding any deadline for mailing ballots in subsection  (2) of this
section, a replacement ballot may be mailed,  made available in the office of the county clerk or at
a voting booth location described in ORS 254.474  or made available at one  central location in the
[3]
SB 1009
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
electoral district in which the election is conducted. The county clerk shall designate the  central
location. A replacement ballot need not be mailed after the fifth  day before the date of the election.
(8) A ballot shall be counted only if:
(a) It is returned in the return identification envelope;
(b) The envelope is signed by the elector to whom the ballot is issued; and
(c) The signature is verified as provided in subsection (9) of this section.
(9) The county clerk shall verify the signature of each  elector on the return identification en-
velope with the signature on the  elector’s registration record, according to the procedure provided
by rules adopted by the  Secretary of State. If the county clerk determines that an elector to whom
a replacement ballot has been issued has voted more than once, the county  clerk shall count only
one ballot cast by that elector.
(10) At 8 p.m. on election day, electors who are at the county clerk’s office, a  place of deposit
designated under subsection (1) of this section or  any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474
and who are in line waiting to vote or deposit a voted ballot shall be  considered to have begun the
act of voting.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of  $_____, to be allocated to county clerks for the purpose of hiring indi-
viduals to carry out the provisions of ORS 254.474, as amended by section 1 of this  2017 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]