Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this  2017 Act may be cited as the Education Equity
Emergency Act.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Enrolled student” means a student who is a resident of  this state and is enrolled in
the Oregon Empowerment Scholarship Program.
(2) “Parent” means a resident of this state who is a parent or legal guardian  of a student
seeking to enroll or enrolled in the Oregon Empowerment Scholarship Program.
(3) “Post-secondary institution of education” means:
(a) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341;
(b) A public university listed in ORS  352.002 or the Oregon Health and Science University;
or
(c) A  generally accredited, private post-secondary institution of education located in
Oregon.
(4) “Qualified expenses” means the following expenses of an enrolled student:
(a) Tuition or fees at a school described in ORS 339.030  (1)(a) for a complete course of
study for a particular content area or grade  level, including the costs for any textbooks or
required course materials;
(b) Tuition for instruction provided  by a private teacher, as described in ORS 339.030
(1)(d), including the costs for any course materials;
(c) The costs for any course materials incurred by a parent  for providing instruction as
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2353
SB 891
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
described in ORS 339.030 (1)(e);
(d) Tuition for instruction provided at a public school or fees for extracurricular activ-
ities at a public school that are provided to students at the public school free of charge;
(e) Related services, as defined in ORS 343.035;
(f) Educational therapies or educational  services provided by a licensed or accredited
practitioner or provider;
(g) Tutoring services provided by a person licensed by the Teacher Standards and  Prac-
tices Commission or licensed or  accredited by any state, regional or national accreditation
organization;
(h) Tuition, fees, textbooks or required course materials  for a private online learning
program;
(i) Tuition,  fees, textbooks or required course materials at a post-secondary institution
of education;
(j) Fees for a nationally normed assessment, an advanced placement  examination or any
other assessment or examination related to admission at, or  receipt of credit through, a
post-secondary institution of education;
(k) Contributions to an account in the Oregon 529 Savings Network; and
(L) Fees for management of an individual  account established under the Oregon
Empowerment Scholarship Program.
(5) “Statewide average  distribution” means an amount determined by the Department of
Education each school year that equals the average per student  distribution of the State
School Fund as general  purpose grants for all school districts in this state, as adjusted by
any weights described in ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A).
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Empowerment Scholarship  Program is established for the
purpose of providing options in education to the students of this state.
(2)(a) A parent may enroll or reenroll a student in the program by  submitting an appli-
cation to the Department of Education on the  form and by the date required by the depart-
ment, which may be  no earlier than April 1. The student must be a resident of this state
who has not completed high school and who meets  the qualifications of paragraph (b) or (c)
of this subsection.
(b) In the case of a parent seeking enrollment for a student, the student must have at-
tended a public school in this state during the previous  school year for at least 100 instruc-
tional days and must be:
(A) A child with a disability, as defined in ORS 343.035;
(B) A child who needs additional educational services, as identified by a school district;
(C) A ward of a juvenile court or the Department of Human Services; or
(D) Eligible to receive  free or reduced price lunches under the United States Department
of Agriculture’s current Income Eligibility Guidelines.
(c) In the case of  a parent seeking reenrollment for a student, the student must have
participated in the program  during the previous school year. Any changes in qualifications
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection do not affect the student’s eligibility to reenroll
in subsequent school years.
(d) Enrollment in the program is valid for one school  year only and a parent must enroll
the student in the program for each subsequent school year.
(3) The Department of Education shall enroll or reenroll the student in the  program
[2]
SB 891
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
upon:
(a) Finding that the student meets the qualifications described in subsection (2) of this
section; and
(b) Receiving acknowledgment from the  parent that the parent accepts the terms of
participation in the program, including:
(A) Restrictions on the use of moneys received under  the program for qualified expenses
only; and
(B) The requirement that the student:
(i) Receive at least an education  in English, mathematics, social studies and science; and
(ii) Comply with the requirements specified in ORS 339.035 (3) to (5).
(4) An enrolled student may not be required to attend public full-time  schools, as pro-
vided by ORS 339.030, but may receive part-time instruction at a public school  and must pay
tuition for that instruction.
(5)(a) Upon enrolling or reenrolling a student in the  program, the department shall notify
the State Treasurer of the enrollment or reenrollment.
(b) The State Treasurer shall ensure that an account  is established for each enrolled
student as described in section 4 of this 2017 Act. The State Treasurer shall notify  the de-
partment after the State Treasurer:
(A) Verifies that an account already was established for the enrolled student if  the en-
rolled student has participated in the program in a previous year; or
(B) Establishes an account for a enrolled student  who does not already have an estab-
lished account.
(c) Upon receiving a notice as provided by paragraph (b) of  this subsection, the depart-
ment shall, for each student enrolled:
(A) Transfer to an account established under section 4 of this 2017 Act  an amount that
equals 90 percent of the statewide average distribution.
(B) Transfer to the school district in which the student is  a resident an amount that
equals five percent of the statewide average distribution.
(C) Transfer to the Department of Education Empowerment Account established by  sec-
tion 5 of this 2017 Act  an amount that equals a percentage of the statewide average distrib-
ution that is specified by the  State Board of Education by rule and that may not exceed four
percent.
(D) Transfer to the Treasurer Empowerment Account established by section 6 of  this
2017 Act an amount that equals one percent of the statewide average distribution.
(6) A school or any other provider of services purchased pursuant to the  program may
not share,  refund or rebate any moneys received through the program to the parent or en-
rolled student in any manner.
(7) The  State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the implementation
of this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) For each enrolled student in the Oregon  Empowerment Scholarship
Program, the State Treasurer shall ensure that an  individual account is established. The
parent of the enrolled student has the right to withdraw funds from the account only  for the
benefit of the enrolled student and only for qualified expenses.
(2) Separate records and reports are  required for each account established as provided
by this section. The  State Treasurer shall ensure that, no less frequently than annually, a
[3]
SB 891
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
report on the account is made available to the parent.
(3) The State Treasurer may contract  with a financial institution to manage accounts
established as provided by this section with the supervision of the State Treasurer.
(4) Moneys in an account established as provided by this section:
(a) May not be assigned, pledged or otherwise used to secure or obtain a loan  or other
advancement.
(b) Are exempt from garnishment and may not  be subject to execution, attachment or
any other process or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.
(c) Are not considered income for tax purposes.
(5) For the purpose of ensuring that moneys in an individual  account are used only for
qualified expenses, the Department of Education shall:
(a) Ensure that an annual audit is made of each account; and
(b) Establish a toll-free  telephone line that is available to members of the public to
anonymously report any fraudulent use of moneys from an account.
(6) A parent, an enrolled  student or a provider of services purchased pursuant to the
program may  be disqualified from program participation if the person is found to have com-
mitted an intentional program violation consisting of any misrepresentation or other act that
materially violates a law or rule governing the  program. The department may remove any
parent or enrolled student from eligibility for participating in the program and  shall notify
the State Treasurer. A parent may appeal the department’s decision pursuant to the con-
tested case process described in ORS chapter 183.
(7) Individual account information, including names, addresses, telephone numbers and
other personal identification information, is confidential and must be  maintained as confi-
dential unless the person who provides the information, or is  the subject of the information,
expressly agrees in writing that the information may be disclosed.
(8) An enrolled student’s account shall be closed and any remaining funds shall  be de-
posited in the State School Fund upon the later of:
(a) The enrolled student’s graduation from a post-secondary institution of education;
(b) A period of six consecutive years after the  student has enrolled in a post-secondary
institution of education;
(c) A period  of four consecutive years after high school completion in which the student
has not enrolled in a post-secondary institution of education; or
(d) A period of four years after the student  no longer meets the qualifications described
in section 3 (2) of this 2017 Act and has not enrolled in a post-secondary institution of  edu-
cation.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Department of Education Empowerment Account is established in
the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
account shall be credited to the account. All moneys credited  to the account are contin-
uously appropriated to the Department of Education for  the payment of expenses of the de-
partment under sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The Department of Education Empowerment Account consists of:
(a) Moneys transferred as provided by section 3 (5)(c)(C) of this 2017 Act;
(b) Moneys appropriated to the account by the Legislative Assembly; and
(c) Any other moneys from state or federal sources.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Treasurer Empowerment Account is established  in the State Treas-
[4]
SB 891
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the account shall be
credited to the account. All moneys  credited to the account are continuously appropriated
to the State Treasurer  for the payment of expenses of the State Treasurer under sections 1
to 7 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The Treasurer Empowerment Account consists of:
(a) Moneys transferred as provided by section 3 (5)(c)(D) of this 2017 Act;
(b) Moneys appropriated to the account by the Legislative Assembly; and
(c) Any other moneys from state or federal sources.
SECTION 7.
(1) As used in this section, “participating school” means  a school described
in ORS 339.030 (1)(a) that provides instruction to an enrolled student.
(2) Nothing in sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act:
(a) Permits a state or federal government agency  to exercise control or supervision over
any participating school, private teacher, parent or legal guardian.
(b) Makes a  participating school, private teacher, parent or legal guardian an agent of
the state or federal government.
(c)(A) Requires a participating  school to change the creed with which the school is affil-
iated, or to change its practices, admission policy or curriculum, in order to accept  enrolled
students who pay tuition or fees as provided by sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act.
(B) Requires a private teacher to change the teacher’s creed, practices or curriculum in
order to accept enrolled students who pay tuition or fees as provided by sections 1 to  7 of
this 2017 Act.
(C) Requires a parent or legal guardian to change  the parent’s or guardian’s creed,
practices, or curriculum.
(3) In any legal proceeding challenging the application of  sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act
to a participating school, private teacher, parent or legal  guardian, the state bears the bur-
den of establishing that the law or rule is necessary and  does not impose any undue burden
on a participating school, private teacher, parent or legal guardian.
SECTION 8.
(1) Sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act become operative January 1, 2018.
(2) The State Board of Education, Department of Education and State Treasurer may
take any action before the operative  date specified in subsection (1) of this section to ensure
that students first be allowed to participate in the Oregon  Empowerment Scholarship Pro-
gram during the 2018-2019 school year.
SECTION 9. Section 10 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 10. (1) The Oregon Empowerment Scholarship Account is established within
the State School Fund.
(2) The account shall  consist of any moneys transferred as provided by ORS 327.008 and
any other state or federal moneys available for  the purposes of the Oregon Empowerment
Scholarship Program.
(3) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Department of Education
for the purpose of making transfers under section 3 (5)(c) of this 2017 Act.
(4) If the  amount available in the account is not adequate to meet costs, the Department
of Education shall submit a revised budget to the Legislative Assembly or, if  the Legislative
Assembly is not in session, to the Emergency Board.
SECTION 11.  ORS 327.008 is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
[5]
SB 891
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private sources  for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by  the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Education Stability Fund and moneys received as provided in paragraph
(b) of this subsection.
(d) The  State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077, 327.095, 327.099,  327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961 and sections 1 to 3, chapter 735, Oregon Laws
2013, and sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act .
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant, consisting  of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a facility grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as pro-
vided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases to  operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of  termination or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to  each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s  general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be  apportioned from the State School Fund to each education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall  be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in  the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district may  not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of  the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed $9 million in any biennium. If  the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the  Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for facility
grants among  those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does not  exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125 (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of  $35 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $33 million from the State
School Fund to the Network of Quality Teaching and Learning Fund established under  ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
[6]
SB 891
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $5 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $14 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $14 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified in  paragraph (b)(B) and (C) of this subsection shall
be adjusted by the same percentage  by which the amount appropriated to the State School Fund for
that biennium is  increased or decreased compared with the preceding biennium, as determined by
the Department of Education after consultation with the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language Learner  Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each  fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section and  ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend up to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration  of and support for the development of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend up to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of a program to increase  the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each fiscal year, the Department of  Education shall transfer to the Oregon
Empowerment Scholarship Account established in  section 10 of this 2017 Act the amount
necessary to make the transfers required by section 3 (5)(c) of this 2017 Act.
[(17)] (18) Each fiscal year, the Department of  Education shall transfer the amount of $2.5
million from the State School Fund to the Small  School District Supplement Fund established in
section 3, chapter 735, Oregon Laws 2013.
SECTION 12.  ORS 327.008, as amended by section 7, chapter 735, Oregon Laws 2013, section
7, chapter 81, Oregon Laws  2014, section 2, chapter 68, Oregon Laws 2015, section 38, chapter 245,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 2, chapter 555, Oregon Laws  2015, section 11, chapter 604, Oregon Laws
2015, section 2,  chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 8, chapter 783, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private sources  for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by  the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Education Stability Fund and moneys received as provided in paragraph
(b) of this subsection.
(d) The  State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077, 327.095, 327.099,  327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961 and sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act .
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
[7]
SB 891
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Fund grant, consisting  of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a facility grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as pro-
vided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases to  operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of  termination or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to  each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s  general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be  apportioned from the State School Fund to each education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall  be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in  the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district may  not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of  the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed $9 million in any biennium. If  the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the  Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for facility
grants among  those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does not  exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125 (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of  $35 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $33 million from the State
School Fund to the Network of Quality Teaching and Learning Fund established under  ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $5 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $14 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $14 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified in  paragraph (b)(B) and (C) of this subsection shall
be adjusted by the same percentage  by which the amount appropriated to the State School Fund for
that biennium is increased or decreased compared with the preceding biennium, as  determined by
the Department of Education after consultation with the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
[8]
SB 891
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
School Fund to the Statewide English  Language Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the  State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this  section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development  of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration  of a program to increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each fiscal year, the Department of  Education shall transfer to the Oregon
Empowerment Scholarship Account established in section 10 of this  2017 Act the amount
necessary to make the transfers required by section 3 (5)(c) of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 13. (1) The amendments to ORS 327.008 by sections 11 and 12 of this 2017 Act
become operative July 1, 2018.
(2) The amendments to ORS 327.008 by sections 11 and 12 of this 2017 Act apply  to State
School Fund distributions commencing with the 2018-2019 school year distributions.
SECTION 14.  ORS 339.030 is amended to read:
339.030. (1) In the following  cases, children may not be required to attend public full-time
schools:
(a) Children  being taught in a private or parochial school in the courses of study usually taught
in kindergarten through grade 12 in the public schools and in  attendance for a period equivalent to
that required of children attending public schools in the 1994-1995 school year.
(b) Children proving to the satisfaction of the district school board that they have  acquired
equivalent knowledge to that  acquired in the courses of study taught in kindergarten through grade
12 in the public schools.
(c) Children who have received a high school diploma.
(d) Children being taught for a period equivalent to that  required of children attending public
schools by a private teacher the courses of study usually taught in kindergarten through grade  12
in the public school.
(e) Children being educated in the children’s home by a parent or legal guardian.
(f) Children who are considered  to be taught by a parent or legal guardian because of
participation in the Oregon Empowerment Scholarship Program.
[(f)] (g) Children excluded from attendance as provided by law.
(2) The State Board of Education and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by rule
shall establish procedures whereby, on a  semiannual basis, an exemption from compulsory attend-
ance may be granted to the parent or legal guardian of any  child 16 or 17 years of age who is
lawfully employed full-time or who is lawfully employed part-time  and enrolled in school, a commu-
nity college or an alternative education program as defined  in ORS 336.615. An exemption also may
be granted to any child who is an emancipated minor or who has  initiated the procedure for
emancipation under ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 339.505 is amended to read:
339.505. (1)  For purposes of the student accounting system required by ORS 339.515, the follow-
[9]
SB 891
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ing definitions shall be used:
(a) “Graduate” means an individual who has:
(A) Not reached 21 years of age or whose 21st birthday occurs during the current school year;
(B) Met all state requirements and local requirements for attendance, competence and units of
credit for high school; and
(C) Received one of the following:
(i) A high school diploma issued by a school district or a public charter school.
(ii) A high school diploma issued by an authorized community college.
(iii) A modified diploma issued by a school district or a public charter school.
(iv) An extended diploma issued by a school district or a public charter school.
(v) An alternative certificate issued by a school district or a public charter school.
(b) “School dropout” means an individual who:
(A) Has enrolled for the current school year, or was enrolled  in the previous school year and
did not attend during the current school year;
(B) Is not a high school graduate;
(C) Has not received a General Educational Development (GED) certificate; and
(D) Has withdrawn from school.
(c) “School dropout” does not include a student described by at least one of the following:
(A) A student who has transferred to another educational system or institution that leads to
graduation and the  school district has received a written request for the transfer of the student’s
records or transcripts.
(B) A student who is deceased.
(C) A student who is participating in home instruction paid for by the district.
(D) A student who is being taught by a private teacher, parent or legal guardian pursuant  to
ORS 339.030 (1)(d) , [ or] (e)  or (f) .
(E) A student who is participating  in a Department of Education approved public or private
education program, an alternative education program  as defined in ORS 336.615 or a hospital edu-
cation program, or is residing in a Department of Human Services or an Oregon Health  Authority
facility.
(F) A student who is temporarily  residing in a shelter care program certified by the Oregon
Youth Authority or in a juvenile detention facility.
(G) A student who is enrolled in a foreign exchange program.
(H) A student who is temporarily absent from school because of suspension, a  family emergency,
or severe health or medical problems that prohibit the student from attending school.
(I) A student who has received a General Educational Development (GED) certificate.
(2) The State Board of Education shall prescribe by rule when  an unexplained absence becomes
withdrawal, when a student is considered enrolled  in school, acceptable alternative education pro-
grams under ORS 336.615 to  336.665 and the standards for excused absences for purposes of ORS
339.065 for family emergencies and health and medical problems.
SECTION 16.
(1) Notwithstanding section 3 of  this 2017 Act, the Department of Education
may not enroll in the Oregon Empowerment Scholarship Program more than 0.5 percent of
the students  who reside in a school district unless the school district provides written con-
sent for the department to enroll a greater percentage.
(2) Notwithstanding section 3 of this 2017 Act, if the number of applications from stu-
dents who reside in the school district exceeds the limit  designated under subsection (1) of
[10]
SB 891
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
this section,  and the school district has not provided written consent as described in sub-
section (1) of this section, the department  shall select students for enrollment through an
equitable lottery selection process. The department  shall give priority to students who en-
rolled in the  Oregon Empowerment Scholarship Program the previous school year and to
siblings of students who enrolled in the program the previous school year.
(3) The department shall provide timely notice to students who are not allowed to  enroll
in the program because of the limit designated under  subsection (1) of this section. The no-
tice must provide an explanation from the school district about  why the school district chose
not to give consent for the department to enroll  a greater percentage of students as allowed
under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 17. (1) Section 16 of this 2017 Act is repealed on July 1, 2028.
(2) Section 16 of this 2017 Act applies only  to applications submitted for any school year
from the 2018-2019 school year through the 2028-2029 school year.
SECTION 18. (1) A person commits scholarship savings account fraud if the person
knowingly obtains, by means of  a false statement or representation, by impersonation or by
other fraudulent device, any of the following:
(a) Assistance or service in violation of sections 1 to 7 of this 2017 Act;
(b) Assistance or service that is greater than that allowed under sections  1 to 7 of this
2017 Act; or
(c) Assistance or  service that is not a qualified expense as defined in section 2 of this 2017
Act.
(2) Any action that is considered an act of  scholarship savings account fraud under this
section is an act of  theft by deception under ORS 164.085 and is punishable as an act of theft
by deception.
SECTION 19.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[11]