Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Affordable housing” means dwelling units  in multifamily housing in which the rent
does not exceed  30 percent of the area median income as based on information from the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development  and subject to adjustment by
the Oregon Housing Stability Council for areas with unusually low incomes or  high costs of
housing.
(b) “Rural government” means a county with a population with less  than 25,000 or a city
within a county with a population of less than 25,000.
(c) “System development charge” has the meaning given that term in ORS 223.299.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department shall, with the advice and consent
of the Oregon Housing Stability Council, develop and implement  the Rural System Develop-
ment Charges Program to  expand the supply of affordable multifamily housing in rural areas.
(3) The department may use moneys appropriated for the program to pay system devel-
opment charges assessed by a rural government only if:
(a) The system development charges are triggered by a building permit for the con-
struction of multifamily housing or  for the addition of dwelling units to multifamily housing;
(b) The  person assessed the system development charges has taken actions to ensure
that the assessed dwelling units remain affordable housing for no less than 10 years, includ-
ing entering into an affordable housing covenant held by the department as  described in ORS
456.280; and
(c) The system development charges were assessed  on or after the effective date of this
2019 Act.
(4) The department, with the advice and consent of  the council, may adopt criteria and
priorities for making payments under this section that may prefer:
(a) Development in rural communities  that have received lower per capita spending from
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4323
HB 3406
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
other federal and state housing programs;
(b) Development that reduces  burdens on public infrastructure or results in lower system
development charges;
(c) Payments of system development  charges that have not been significantly raised after
the effective date of this 2019 Act;
(d) Providing the greatest number of affordable housing units for the funding provided;
or
(e) Providing the longest possible use of qualified properties as affordable housing units.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Rural System Development Charges Fund is  established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) Moneys in the Rural System Development Charges Fund consist  of amounts appro-
priated or otherwise transferred to the fund  by the Legislative Assembly or received from
any state, federal or private source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the Housing and Community
Services Department to  administer the fund and to develop and implement the Rural System
Development Charges Program under section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $750,000 for deposit into the Rural System
Development Charges Fund.
SECTION 4. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2019 Act are repealed on June 30, 2027.
(2) Any balance in the Rural System Development Charges Fund  established under sec-
tion 2 of this 2019 Act that is  unexpended and unobligated on the date of the repeal of section
2 of this 2019 Act, and all moneys that would have  been deposited in the Rural System De-
velopment Charges Fund had section 2 of this 2019 Act remained in effect,  shall be trans-
ferred to and deposited in the General Fund and made  available for general governmental
purposes.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]