Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Oregon State University shall study the feasibility  of developing nuclear
energy generation in this state. The study must include:
(a) An evaluation of the advantages  and disadvantages of nuclear energy generation in
this state, including the economic and environmental impacts.
(b) Proposals to maximize the use of workers who reside in this state and products made
in this state in the construction of nuclear energy generation facilities.
(c) An evaluation of and recommendations for:
(A) Design characteristics;
(B) Environmental and ecological impacts;
(C) Land use and facility siting criteria;
(D) Safety criteria;
(E) Engineering and cost-related criteria; and
(F) Small cell nuclear reactor capability.
(d) A socioeconomic assessment and impact analysis, including:
(A) Workforce education, training and development;
(B) State and local tax bases;
(C) Supply chains; and
(D) Permanent and temporary job creation.
(e) The timeline  for development, including areas of potential acceleration of efficiencies
and leveraging existing nuclear generation technology in this state.
(f) Additional efficiencies and other benefits that may  be gained from coordinating with
other advanced clean  energy technologies, including hydrogen, direct air capture of carbon
dioxide and energy storage technologies.
(g) A literature review of studies that  have assessed the potential impact of nuclear en-
ergy generation in supporting an energy transition.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1196
SB 635
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
(h) An analysis of national and  international studies of cases where development of nu-
clear energy is supported and adopted.
(i) Feedback or input provided from stakeholder outreach.
(2) No later than December 15, 2026, the university shall submit  the report to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to energy, in the manner  provided by ORS
192.245.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]