Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Oregon Corrections  Enterprises shall establish, administer and supervise
the Oregon Cleanup and Beautification pilot  program as a prison work and on-the-job train-
ing program as described in this section.
(2)(a) The program shall establish and operate a center to process wreckage and waste
materials through recycling, repurposing, reuse,  scrapping and disposal. The center shall
focus on the processing of materials not typically handled by standard waste disposal ser-
vices, including wrecked and derelict motor vehicles, recreational vehicles, boats,  hot tubs,
engines and other machinery.
(b) The center must be initially located at either:
(A) The Oregon State Penitentiary site; or
(B) Property within the Mill Creek Corporate Center owned  or leased by the Department
of Corrections, Oregon Corrections Enterprises or the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services.
(3) Waste processed at the center must come from:
(a) Waste from households dropped off at the center; or
(b) Waste removed from public property by programs  administered by local governments,
designated nonprofits or Oregon Corrections Enterprises.
(4) In administering the program,  Oregon Corrections Enterprises shall coordinate and
consult with the Department of Corrections, Marion County, the City  of Salem and private
industries that are involved in waste hauling, recycling, salvage and  beautification within the
Willamette Valley.
SECTION 2.
No later than September 15, 2024,  Oregon Corrections Enterprises shall
provide a report to an appropriate interim committee of the Legislative Assembly, in the
manner provided in ORS  192.245, on the Oregon Cleanup and Beautification pilot program
under section 1 of this 2023 Act, including recommendations for  the expansion or discontin-
uation of the pilot program.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 859
HB 2181
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $2,000,000, for distribution to Oregon Cor-
rections Enterprises for deposit into a segregated  fund under ORS 421.442 for the sole pur-
poses of sections 1 and 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[2]