Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) If  a court imposes a felony sentence on an individual that includes credit
for time served in a  local correctional facility, the Department of Corrections shall reim-
burse the county for the costs of incarcerating  the individual in the local correctional facil-
ity.
(2) Reimbursement made to counties under subsection (1)  of this section may not exceed
$125 per day.
(3) The department shall adopt rules prescribing the manner  in which counties may
submit a claim for reimbursement under this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4692