Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall purchase one cyanotoxin
autoanalyzer system instrument to be used  to analyze water samples for cyanotoxins. The
department shall  acquire any services and supplies necessary for the operation of the in-
strument described in this subsection.
(2) The department shall create, fill and utilize at least one  seasonal position within the
department to assist with  the analysis of water samples for cyanotoxins and to collect water
samples during peak periods.
SECTION 2. The Oregon Health Authority shall create,  fill and utilize the position of
small utility outreach coordinator to provide  outreach to small water suppliers and water
suppliers that depend on a vulnerable water body to ensure that water suppliers have the
plans, tools and training needed to respond to cyanobacterial harmful algal blooms and other
water-related emergencies.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Environmental Quality, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, out
of the General Fund, the following amounts:
(1) $95,000 for the purpose of carrying  out the provisions of section 1 (1) of this 2020 Act;
and
(2) $115,000 for the purpose of carrying out  the provisions of section 1 (2) of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $100,000, which may be expended  for the purpose of carrying
out the provisions of section 2 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 178
HB 4071
1
[2]