Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Corrections shall conduct  a study on the adequacy of
funding for counties for community corrections programs and present the results of  the
study, along with any  recommended legislative changes, in a report to the interim commit-
tees of the Legislative Assembly related to  the judiciary in the manner provided under ORS
192.245 on or before September 15, 2020.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1454