Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “critical energy infrastructure hub” means all
bulk oils or liquid fuels terminals, as defined in ORS 468B.510, located on the west  bank of
the Willamette River in the City of Portland.
(2) The State Department of Energy, in cooperation with the Department of  Environ-
mental Quality and the Department of Land Conservation and Development,  shall develop
an energy storage transition plan for the critical energy infrastructure hub. The plan  must
describe short, medium and long-term goals for the critical  energy infrastructure hub that
will ensure the resilience of the  energy sector in this state and allow this state to guide its
energy future.
(3) In developing the plan, the State Department of Energy shall:
(a) Engage industry  stakeholders, technical experts, researchers, affected community
members, state and local government agencies  and other interested parties to inform the
development of the plan; and
(b) Assess the potential for requiring owners or operators of  bulk oils or liquid fuels
terminals, as defined  in ORS 468B.510, to obtain insurance, a surety bond or other evidence
of financial assurance for costs associated with a catastrophic release of oil or liquid  fuel as
a result of an earthquake.
(4) The department may engage the services  of the National Policy Consensus Center at
Portland State University to coordinate  engagement with interested parties described in
subsection (3)(a) of this section and assist in the development of the plan.
(5) The department shall submit  the plan in a report to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to energy,  in the manner provided under ORS 192.245, no later
than September 15, 2026. The report  may include recommendations for legislation necessary
to implement the plan.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3523
HB 3450
1
2
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]