Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Public universities listed in ORS 352.002 shall jointly  establish a common
application for undergraduate admission. The common application  must allow a prospective
student to use one form to apply  for undergraduate admission to any public university listed
in ORS 352.002.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025  Act first applies to applications for the 2027-2028 aca-
demic year.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1450