Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “Armed Forces of  the United States” includes
the regular and reserve components of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast
Guard and Space Force of the United States and the National Guard.
(2) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income  for a taxpayer who has not
attained 63 years of age before the close of the taxable year for which a return is filed  and
whose federal taxable income includes retirement pay  or pension for service in the Armed
Forces of the United States up to  $17,500 in retirement pay or pension received for service
in the Armed Forces of the United States.
(3) The total amount subtracted under  subsection (2) of this section may not exceed the
taxpayer’s total retirement pay or pension received  for service in the Armed Forces of the
United States included in the taxpayer’s federal taxable income for the tax year.
(4) The  amount subtracted under subsection (2) of this section may not include any
amount of retirement pay or pension received for  service in the Armed Forces of the United
States that is subtracted under ORS 316.680 (1)(e).
(5)(a) The Department  of Revenue shall adjust annually the maximum dollar amount al-
lowed under subsection (2) of this section to reflect any percentage increase in the  cost of
living for the previous calendar year, based on changes in the  Consumer Price Index for All
Urban Consumers, West Region (All  Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics
of the United States Department of Labor.
(b) If the dollar amount of the increase determined under paragraph (a) of this  sub-
section is not a multiple of $50, the Department of Revenue shall round the dollar amount
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 203
SB 225
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
of the increase to the next lower multiple of $50.
(6) The department may adopt rules for carrying out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2025.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding sections 2 (5) and 3 of this 2025 Act, the  Department of
Revenue shall first adjust the maximum dollar amount allowed under section 2  (2) of this
2025 Act for the tax year beginning on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]