Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 92.018 is amended to read:
92.018. (1) If a person buys a  unit of land that is not a lawfully established unit of land, the
person may bring an individual action against the seller in an appropriate court to recover  damages
or to obtain equitable relief. The court shall award reasonable  attorney fees to the prevailing party
in an action under this section.
(2) If  the seller of a unit of land that was not lawfully established is a county that
[involuntarily] acquired the unit of land  by means of foreclosure under ORS chapter 312 of delin-
quent tax liens, the  person who purchases the unit of land is not entitled to damages or equitable
relief.
(3) If the purchaser of the unit of land is a public benefit corporation, as defined in ORS
65.001, and the deed from the seller reflects an intention that the  purchaser use the property
for conservation purposes:
(a) The purchaser is not entitled to damages  or equitable relief under this section against
the seller.
(b) A person acquiring an interest from  the purchaser or from someone subsequent in
title to the purchaser, is not entitled to damages or equitable relief under  this section
against the purchaser or the seller.
SECTION 2.  ORS 92.990 is amended to read:
92.990. (1)(a) Violation of any provision of  ORS 92.010 to 92.090, 92.100 and 92.120 to 92.170 or
of any regulation or ordinance adopted thereunder, is a Class C misdemeanor.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a sale of property that is not a  lawfully established
unit of land made to or from a purchaser as described in ORS 92.018 (3).
(2) Any person who violates any of the provisions of ORS 92.325 (1),  92.345 to 92.365, 92.405 (1),
(2) and (3), 92.425, 92.433, 92.460 to 92.475 and any alternative requirements of  the Real Estate
Commissioner prescribed pursuant  to ORS 92.425 (3), not waived by the commissioner pursuant to
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2028
SB 428
1
2
3
ORS 92.395, or who provides false information or omits to state material facts pursuant  to ORS
92.337, commits a Class C felony.
[2]