Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall conduct a study  of the
funding of sports in Oregon. Not later than September 15, 2026,  the department shall submit
a report of the findings of the study,  in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim
committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to economic development, and may include
recommendations for legislation in the report.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3188