Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.865 is amended to read:
327.865. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph  (b) of this subsection,  a school district shall
use a portion of the funds apportioned under ORS  327.859 to establish or expand career and tech-
nical education programs  in high schools that are relevant to the job market in the community or
region the school district serves.
(b) A school district may use a portion of  the funds apportioned under ORS 327.859 on
existing career and technical education programs if the school district:
(A) Has a high school that is a remote small high school, as defined  by the State Board
of Education by rule; and
(B) Demonstrates in  the biennial plan prepared under ORS 327.883 how existing career
and technical education programs satisfy eligibility requirements and how the  establishment
or expansion of career and technical education  programs would not satisfy eligibility re-
quirements.
(2) For purposes of this section, establishment or expansion of  a career and technical education
program includes the purchase of equipment, the construction of facilities and the recruitment, li-
censing, employment and training of personnel to provide career and technical education.
(3) The portion of funds to be used as described in this section shall be determined as provided
by ORS 327.874.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.874 is amended to read:
327.874. (1) A school district must  use the amount apportioned under ORS 327.859 to establish
or expand programs, opportunities and strategies under ORS  327.865, 327.868 and 327.871 and may
not use the amount apportioned to maintain programs, opportunities and strategies  established prior
to December 8, 2016, except when a use is necessary to  replace the loss or expiration of time-limited
grants or federal funds or except as allowed under ORS 327.865 (1)(b) .
(2)(a) The portion of  funds that a school district uses for the purposes of ORS 327.865, 327.868
and 327.871 shall be determined as follows:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2976
HB 2802
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
(A) If a school district receives less than $100,000 for the school year  from an apportionment
made under ORS 327.859, the school district may use all of the funds for  any one of the purposes
described in ORS 327.865, 327.868 or 327.871.
(B) If  a school district receives $100,000 or more but less than $350,000 for the school year from
an apportionment made under ORS 327.859, the school district must use a portion  of the funds for
the purpose described in ORS 327.865 and a portion of  the funds for a purpose described in ORS
327.868 or 327.871.
(C) If a school district receives $350,000 or more for  the school year from an apportionment
made under ORS 327.859, the school district must use a portion of the funds for all three of  the
purposes described in ORS 327.865, 327.868 and 327.871.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, if a school district receives an  apportion-
ment for the second  school year of a biennium that is greater than the apportionment for the first
school year of the biennium and the increase would affect the portion of moneys  the school district
is required to use for the purposes described in ORS 327.865, 327.868 and 327.871, as  described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school district  is not required to change the portions that the
school district uses for the purposes of ORS 327.865, 327.868 and 327.871  for the second school year
of the biennium.
(c) Nothing in this subsection prohibits a school district receiving an apportionment as described
in paragraph (a)(A) or (B) of this subsection from using any portion of the  apportionment for more
purposes than what is described in paragraph (a)(A) or (B) of this subsection.
(3) Notwithstanding  the requirements in ORS 327.865, 327.868, 327.871 and 327.889 (3) that ap-
portionments made under ORS 327.859 be used for career and technical education programs  in high
schools,  college-level  educational opportunities for students in high schools and dropout-prevention
strategies in high schools, a school district may use  up to 15 percent of the apportionments the
school district receives, after deducting any amounts used for administrative costs  under ORS
327.889 for programs, opportunities and strategies for students in  eighth grade. The use of appor-
tionments under this subsection must comply with the  distribution requirements described in sub-
section (2) of this section.
(4) When establishing or expanding career and technical education programs and  college-level
educational opportunities, school districts may, and are encouraged to, give preference to  programs
and opportunities in science, technology, engineering and mathematics.
SECTION 3.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]