Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 195.505 is amended to read:
195.505. (1) A policy developed pursuant to ORS 195.500 shall [ conform] include, but is  not
limited[,] to , the following provisions.
(2) As used in  this section, “personal property” means any item that can reasonably be identified
as belonging to an individual and that has apparent value or utility.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection [ (9)] (6) of this section, [ at least 72 hours before ] 24 hours
prior to removing homeless individuals from an established  camping site, law enforcement officials
shall post a written notice  of removal , in English and Spanish, at [ all entrances to ] the  camping site
[to the extent that the entrances can reasonably be identified ].
[(4)(a)] (b) When a [ 72-hour] 24-hour notice is posted,  law enforcement officials shall inform the
local agency that delivers social services to  homeless individuals as to where the notice has been
posted.
[(b)] (c) The local agency may  arrange for outreach workers to visit the camping site that is
subject to the notice to assess the need for social service assistance in arranging shelter and  other
assistance.
[(5)(a)] (4)(a) All personal property at the  camping site that remains unclaimed after removal
shall be given to [ a law enforcement official, a local agency  that delivers social services to homeless
individuals, an outreach worker, a local agency official or a person authorized to issue a citation de-
scribed in subsection (10) of this section, whether ] law enforcement officials, whether 24-hour  no-
tice is required [ under subsection (3) of this section ] or not.
[(b) The unclaimed personal property must be stored: ]
[(A) For property removed from  camping sites in counties other than Multnomah County, in a fa-
cility located in the same community as the camping site from which it was removed. ]
[(B) For property removed from camping sites in Multnomah County,  in a facility located within
six blocks of a public transit station. ]
[(c)] (b) Items that have no apparent value or utility or are in an  insanitary condition may be
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1042
HB 3774
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
immediately discarded upon removal of the homeless individuals from the camping site.
[(d)] (c) Weapons, controlled substances other than prescription medication , drug parapher-
nalia and items that appear to be either stolen or evidence of a crime  shall be given to or retained
by law enforcement officials.
[(6) The written notice required under subsection (3) of this section must state, at a minimum: ]
[(a) Where unclaimed personal property will be stored; ]
[(b) A phone number that individuals may call to find out where the property will be stored; or ]
[(c) If a  permanent storage location has not yet been determined, the address and phone number
of an agency that will have the information when available. ]
[(7)(a) The unclaimed personal property shall be stored in  an orderly fashion, keeping items that
belong to an individual together to the extent that ownership can reasonably be determined. ]
[(b)] (d) The property shall be stored for a  minimum of 30 days during which it shall be rea-
sonably available to any individual  claiming ownership. Any personal property that remains un-
claimed after 30 days may be disposed of  [ or donated to a corporation described in section 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 2020 ].
[(8)] (5) Following  the removal of homeless individuals from a camping site on public property,
the law enforcement officials, local agency officials and outreach workers may meet to assess  the
notice and removal policy,  to discuss whether the removals are occurring in a humane and just
manner and to determine if any changes are needed in the policy.
[(9)(a)] (6) The [ 72-hour] 24-hour notice requirement under subsection (3)  of this section does
not apply:
[(A)] (a) When there are grounds for law enforcement officials to believe that illegal activities
other than camping are occurring [ at an established camping site ].
[(B)] (b) In the event of an exceptional emergency [ at an established camping site ], including, but
not limited to, possible site contamination by hazardous materials, a  public health emergency or
other immediate danger to human life or safety.
[(b) If a funeral service is  scheduled with less than 72 hours’ notice at a cemetery at which there
is a camping site, or  a camping site is established at the cemetery less than 72 hours before the
scheduled service, the written notice required under subsection (3) of this section may  be posted at least
24 hours before removing homeless individuals from the camping site. ]
[(10)] (7) A person authorized to issue a citation for unlawful camping under state law,  admin-
istrative rule or city or county ordinance may not issue the citation if the citation would be  issued
within 200 feet of a  notice required under subsection (3) of this section and within two hours before
or after the notice was posted.
[(11) Any law or policy of a city or county that is more  specific or offers greater protections to
homeless individuals subject to removal from an  established camping site preempts contrary provisions
of this section. ]
SECTION 2.
 ORS 195.515 is amended to read:
195.515. (1) The Department of Transportation may enter into an  intergovernmental agreement
with a city that has a population of  500,000 or more for the removal, storage and disposition of
personal property deposited, left or displayed on property that is owned by the department. The  city
shall prioritize removal of personal property that is within the right of way  of a highway under the
jurisdiction of the department as a road authority pursuant to ORS 810.010.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 377.650,  377.653 and 377.655, an intergovernmental agreement entered
into under this section may  provide alternative provisions related to the removal, storage and dis-
[2]
HB 3774
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
position of personal property if the  alternative provisions conform with the requirements for local
government policy for removal of homeless individuals and personal property under ORS 195.505.
(3) In addition to the  requirements described in subsection (2) of this section, an intergovern-
mental agreement entered into under this section must include the following:
(a) Requirements for posting notice before the removal  of personal property, including but not
limited to the following:
(A) That the notice is created using durable materials and securely posted  within 30 feet of the
personal property to be removed;
(B) That the notice must provide the date the  notice begins and the date upon which the city
or department may begin removing personal property; and
(C) That the notice must provide a description of:
(i) How an individual may access personal property that is removed and stored; and
(ii) The length of time  the city or department will store personal property before the city or
department disposes of it.
(b) A requirement that the notice expires 10 days after the city or department posts  the notice.
(c) A severe weather protocol regarding the weather conditions under which the city  or de-
partment will not remove personal property.
(d) Provisions related to inventorying and storing the personal property to be removed.
(e) Provisions related to the city or department relinquishing unclaimed  personal property after
the storage period to the city’s or department’s designated agent.
(f) Provisions related to when the city will provide impact reduction services, including but  not
limited to trash collection.
(g) A provision providing that if the department requests  city services under the intergovern-
mental agreement, but the city is unable or unwilling to provide services as requested, the  depart-
ment or the  department’s contractor may perform the requested services consistent with the terms
of the agreement, including but not limited to posting notice.
(4) The [ 72-hour] 24-hour notice under ORS 195.505 required under subsection (2) of this section
does not apply:
(a) When there are grounds for law  enforcement officials to believe that illegal activities other
than camping are occurring;
(b) Where there is an exceptional emergency, such as  possible site contamination by hazardous
materials; or
(c) When there is immediate danger to human life or safety.
(5) Before the city adopts an intergovernmental agreement under this section or  changes to the
agreement, the city shall invite public comment on the proposed agreement or the proposed changes
to the agreement.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]