Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Education provider” means:
(A) A school district as defined in ORS 332.002;
(B) An entity that offers  a program that is recognized as an Oregon prekindergarten
program under ORS 329.170 to 329.200;
(C) The Oregon School for the Deaf;
(D) An education service district;
(E) An educational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program  or the Ju-
venile Detention Education Program, as those terms are defined in ORS 326.695; or
(F) A program that receives moneys pursuant to ORS 343.243.
(b) “Stop arm camera” means a video recording device installed on a school bus  for the
purpose recording persons who fail  to stop for bus safety lights in violation of ORS 811.155
that is capable of recording the date, time, registration plate number and location  of the
offense.
(2) Education providers may install and operate stop arm cameras on schools buses.
(3) When a stop arm camera is in use, a warning sign must be  posted on the school bus
indicating the use of the stop arm camera.
(4) An education provider that uses stop arm  cameras shall prepare a maintenance plan
for the maintenance of the cameras the education  provider has responsibility for. The edu-
cation provider shall review and update the maintenance plan as necessary.
(5) If the stop arm camera records a  person violating ORS 811.155, the education provider
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 188
HB 3036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
may submit a report to the local  law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the area
where the violation is alleged to have occurred.  The report must be made within 72 hours
of the alleged violation and must contain:
(a) The date and time of day of the alleged violation;
(b) The name of the street on which  the bus was traveling at the time of the alleged vi-
olation and either the approximate address or the name of the closest intersecting street;
(c) The  direction in which the bus was traveling and the direction in which the vehicle
alleged to have committed the violation was traveling; and
(d) A copy of the video recording.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a citation for violating ORS  811.155 may
be issued on the basis of a report submitted under this section if  the following conditions are
met:
(a) A police officer reviews the evidence submitted  under subsection (5) of this section
and signs the citation.
(b) The citation is mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle within six business days
of the alleged violation.
(c) The registered owner is given 30 days from the date the citation  is mailed to respond
to the citation.
(d) A rebuttable presumption exists that the registered owner of the  vehicle was the
driver of the vehicle when the citation is issued and delivered as provided in this section.
(e) A person issued a citation under  this subsection may respond to the citation by sub-
mitting a certificate of innocence or  a certificate of nonliability under subsection (8) of this
section or may make any other response allowed by law.
(7) A citation issued  on the basis of a report may be delivered by mail or otherwise to
the registered owner of the vehicle or to the driver. The citation may be prepared on a digital
medium, and the signature  may be electronic in accordance with the provisions of ORS 84.001
to 84.061.
(8)(a) A registered owner of a vehicle  may respond by mail to a citation issued under
subsection (6) of this section  by submitting, within 30 days after the mailing of the citation,
a certificate of innocence swearing or affirming that the owner was not the  driver of the
vehicle and by  providing a photocopy of the owner’s driver license. A jurisdiction that re-
ceives a certificate  of innocence under this paragraph shall dismiss the citation without re-
quiring a court appearance by the registered owner or any other information  from the
registered owner other than the swearing or affirmation  and the photocopy. The citation
may be reissued only once, only to the registered owner and only if  the jurisdiction verifies
that the registered owner appears to have been the driver at the time of the  violation. A
registered owner may not submit a certificate of innocence in response to a reissued citation.
(b) If a business or public agency responds  to a citation issued under subsection (6) of
this section by submitting, within 30 days after the mailing of the citation, a certificate of
nonliability stating that at  the time of the alleged violation the vehicle was in the custody
and control  of an employee or was in the custody and control of a renter or lessee under the
terms of a rental agreement or  lease, and if the business or public agency provides the driver
license number, name and address of the employee, renter or lessee,  the citation shall be
dismissed with respect to the business or public agency. The citation may then be issued  and
delivered by mail or otherwise to the employee, renter or lessee identified in  the certificate
[2]
HB 3036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of nonliability.
(9) If the person named as the registered owner of a vehicle  in the current records of the
Department of  Transportation fails to respond to a citation issued under subsection (6) of
this section, a default judgment under ORS 153.102 may be entered  for failure to appear after
notice has been given that the judgment will be entered.
(10) The penalties for and all  consequences of violating ORS 811.155 initiated by the sub-
mission of a report under this section are the same as the penalties for  and all consequences
of violating ORS 811.155 initiated by any other means.
(11) A registered owner, employee, renter or lessee against whom a judgment  for failure
to appear is entered may move the court to relieve the owner, employee,  renter or lessee
from the judgment as provided in ORS 153.105 if the failure to appear was due to mistake,
inadvertence, surprise or excusable neglect.
(12) An image or video recording produced by a stop  arm camera may not be used for
any purpose other than evidence of a violation of ORS 811.155.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 153.
SECTION 4. (1) If a court enters a judgment of conviction for violation of  the require-
ments of ORS 811.155, amounts collected under the judgment are payable as follows:
(a) One-half of the amount is payable to the Department of  Education for deposit into
the School Bus Stop Arm Camera Fund established under section 9 of this 2023 Act; and
(b) One-half of the amount is payable as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) If a judgment of  conviction that is subject to subsection (1) of this section is en-
tered in circuit court, the amount specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be paid
to the state.
(b) If a judgment of conviction that is subject to subsection (1) of this section  is entered
in justice court, the amount specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be paid to  the
county that established the court.
(c) If a judgment of conviction that is subject to subsection (1) of this section is  entered
in municipal court, the amount specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be paid to
the city that established the court.
SECTION 5.
 Section 4 of this 2023 Act applies to amounts  collected on or after the ef-
fective date of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 6.  ORS 153.633 is amended to read:
153.633. (1) In any criminal action in a circuit court in which a fine is imposed, the lesser  of the
following amounts is payable to the state before any other distribution of the fine is made:
(a) $65; or
(b) The amount of the fine if the fine is less than $65.
(2) In any criminal action in  a justice or municipal court in which a fine is imposed, the lesser
of the following amounts is payable to the state before any other distribution of the fine is made:
(a) $50; or
(b) The amount of the fine if the fine is less than $50.
(3) A justice or municipal court shall forward the amount prescribed under subsection  (2) of this
section to the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account.
(4)(a) The provisions of this section do not apply to fines imposed under ORS 339.990  or
811.155.
(b) The provisions of subsection (2) of this section do not apply to  fines imposed in justice and
[3]
HB 3036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
municipal courts under ORS 811.590, 814.485, 814.486, 814.534, 814.536, 814.600 or 830.990 (1).
SECTION 7.
 ORS 153.675 is amended to read:
153.675. (1) Amounts payable to the state under ORS 153.633, 153.645,  153.650 and 153.657  and
section 4 of this 2023 Act  shall be transferred by the court to the Department of Revenue for dis-
tribution as provided in ORS 305.830. Except as provided in ORS 153.640 (2)(b),  amounts payable to
a local government under ORS 153.640 to 153.680 and 153.657 and section 4 of this 2023 Act  shall
be deposited  by the court in the local government’s general fund and are available for general gov-
ernmental purposes.
(2) Justice and municipal courts must make the transfer required by subsection (1) of  this sec-
tion under ORS 153.633, 153.645, 153.650 and 153.657 and section 4 of this 2023  Act  not later than
the last day of the month immediately  following the month in which a payment on a judgment is
received by the court.
SECTION 8.  ORS 305.830 is amended to read:
305.830. (1) Amounts transferred  to the Department of Revenue by justice and municipal courts
under ORS 153.633, 153.645, 153.650 and 153.657 and section 4 of this 2023 Act  shall be deposited
in a  suspense account established under ORS 293.445 for the purpose of receiving criminal fines and
assessments.
(2) In carrying out its duties under  this section, the Department of Revenue shall have access
to the records and dockets of those courts charged with the duty to transfer moneys  to the depart-
ment under ORS 153.633, 153.645, 153.650 and 153.657 and section 4 of this 2023 Act .
(3) The Department of Revenue may  retain from the funds transferred under ORS 153.633,
153.645, 153.650 and 153.657 and section 4 of this 2023 Act  an amount not to exceed two percent
annually for its actual costs of collection  and disbursement of funds under this section, including the
cost  of  all examinations, investigations and searches, and of all traveling and other expenses in
connection therewith. The  department shall deposit the net amount of moneys in the suspense ac-
count described in subsection (1) of this section into the Criminal Fine Account.
(4) All judicial,  municipal and county officers shall cooperate with the Department of Revenue
with respect to the collections, searches and investigations and  shall furnish the Department of
Revenue with any  information contained in any of the records under their respective custodies re-
lating thereto.
(5) The  Department of State Police shall cooperate in the investigation of fines, penalties and
forfeitures.
SECTION 9. (1) As used  in this section, “education provider” and “stop arm camera”
have the meanings given those terms in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The School Bus Stop Arm Camera Fund is established in the  State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund.
(3) Moneys in the  School Bus Stop Arm Camera Fund are continuously appropriated to
the Department of Education for the purpose of helping education providers acquire stop arm
cameras.
(4) The fund consists of moneys deposited into the fund  under section 4 of this 2023 Act
and other moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly for deposit in the fund.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 820.100 is amended to read:
820.100. (1) The State Board of Education shall adopt and enforce  such reasonable standards
relating to school bus and school activity vehicle construction and school bus and  school activity
vehicle equipment as the board deems necessary for safe and economical operation, except that the
[4]
HB 3036
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
board may not authorize the use of school buses manufactured before April 1, 1977.
(2) The governing board  of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 may adopt and enforce
separate standards of  the type described under this section for school buses and school activity ve-
hicles that are  under the governing board’s jurisdiction, except that the governing board may not
authorize the use of school buses manufactured before April 1, 1977.
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt and  enforce standards for school bus stop arms
authorized by ORS 820.105.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt  and enforce standards for school bus stop
arm camera warning signs authorized by section 2 of this 2023 Act.
[(4)] (5) Standards adopted under this section:
(a) Must  be consistent with requirements established by statute or by rule adopted under stat-
utory authority that relate to the same subject.
(b) Shall be consistent with minimum uniform national standards, if such standards exist.
(c) May include different requirements for different classes or types of school buses or  school
activity  vehicles.
(d) May include any exemptions determined appropriate under ORS 820.150.
[5]