Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 319.883 to
319.946.
SECTION 2. (1) Not later than September 15 of each even-numbered year, the Depart-
ment of Transportation shall submit a report, in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, to the
interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to transportation, that recommends
a rate for the per-mile road usage charge that  would sustainably raise the revenue necessary
to maintain the public highways of this state.
(2) The report must include:
(a) The total estimated cost  for maintenance and preservation of Oregon’s transportation
system, including for local systems; and
(b) An estimate of the total vehicle miles driven on the public highways of this state
based on the most recently available data on vehicle miles traveled.
(3) For purposes of subsection (2)(a) of this  section, the department shall establish met-
rics by which maintenance and preservation needs are evaluated and reported,  including but
not limited to:
(a) The desired pavement condition index for each road type;
(b) Striping and painting standards;
(c) Bridge replacement timelines; and
(d) The department’s administrative costs associated with these maintenance and pres-
ervation needs.
SECTION 3.
This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 110