Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $6,000,000, for distribution to the following in-
stitutions in the following  amounts for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion:
(a) Eastern Oregon University: $1,000,000.
(b) Oregon Institute of Technology: $1,000,000.
(c) Portland State University: $2,000,000.
(d) Southern Oregon University: $1,000,000.
(e) Western Oregon University: $1,000,000.
(2) Moneys received under subsection  (1) of this section may be used for education and
training to expand the behavioral health workforce in Oregon by, including but not limited
to:
(a) Awarding stipends, fellowships, scholarships  or any other type of tuition assistance
to students.
(b) Providing behavioral and mental health  services to individuals from underserved
communities, including individuals who are veterans, homeless  or living in rural environ-
ments.
(c) Partnering with community organizations to develop career pathways.
(d) Developing education and training programs.
(e) Any other  method reasonably necessary to expand access to education and training
in this state for the next generation of behavioral and mental health practitioners.
SECTION 2.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 94
SB 1592
1
2
on its passage.
[2]