Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3, chapter 421, Oregon Laws 2019, are repealed.
SECTION 2.  ORS 187.110 is amended to read:
187.110. (1) The standard of time for the State of Oregon shall  be the United States standard
of time as  established by the Congress of the United States for any particular area of the state un-
der 15 U.S.C. 261[ , except that from  2 a.m. on the second Sunday in March until 2 a.m. on the first
Sunday in November the standard of time for  any area of this state shall be one hour in advance of
the standard established for that particular area by the Congress  of the United States under 15 U.S.C.
261].
(2) The portion of the State of Oregon that is located  in the Pacific Time Zone is exempt
from 15 U.S.C. 260a, pursuant to the authority set forth in 15 U.S.C. 260a (a)(2).
[(2)] (3) No  department of the state government and no county, city or other political subdivision
shall employ any other time or adopt any statute, ordinance or order providing for  the use of any
other standard of time.
SECTION 3.  ORS 187.110, as amended by section 1, chapter 421, Oregon Laws 2019,  is amended
to read:
187.110. (1) The standard of  time for the State of Oregon shall be [ one hour in advance of ] the
United States standard of time as established by the Congress of the United States for  any partic-
ular area of the state under 15 U.S.C. 261 .[, except that: ]
[(a) The standard of time for that portion of the State  of Oregon that is in the Mountain Time Zone
shall be the United States standard of time as established by the Congress of the United  States for that
area under 15 U.S.C. 261; and ]
[(b) From 2 a.m. on the second Sunday in March until 2 a.m. on the first Sunday in November the
standard of time for that portion of the State of Oregon that is in the  Mountain Time Zone shall be
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 18
SB 1548
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
one hour in advance of the standard established  for that area by the Congress of the United States
under 15 U.S.C. 261. ]
(2) The portion of the State of Oregon that is located  in the Pacific Time Zone is exempt
from 15 U.S.C. 260a, pursuant to the authority set forth in 15 U.S.C. 260a (a)(2).
[(2)] (3) No  department of the state government and no county, city or other political subdivision
shall employ any other time  or adopt any statute, ordinance or order providing for the use of any
other standard of time.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 187.110, as amended by sections 1 and 4, chapter 421, Oregon Laws  2019, is
amended to read:
187.110. (1) The standard of time for the State of Oregon shall  be the United States standard
of time as  established by the Congress of the United States for any particular area of the state un-
der 15 U.S.C. 261[ , except that from  2 a.m. on the second Sunday in March until 2 a.m. on the first
Sunday in November the standard of time for  any area of this state shall be one hour in advance of
the standard established for that particular area by the Congress  of the United States under 15 U.S.C.
261].
(2) The portion of the State of Oregon that is located  in the Pacific Time Zone is exempt
from 15 U.S.C. 260a, pursuant to the authority set forth in 15 U.S.C. 260a (a)(2).
[(2)] (3) No  department of the state government and no county, city or other political subdivision
shall employ any other time or adopt any statute, ordinance or order providing for  the use of any
other standard of time.
[2]