Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(a) Oregon state government makes better and  more effective policy decisions when im-
pacted persons and service providers are a part of the policy-making process;
(b) Oregon has a  growing and dynamic population that includes many from diverse racial
and ethnic backgrounds; and
(c) The input and guidance from those with diverse backgrounds, those  who stand to be
most directly impacted by policy decisions and those who stand to implement those decisions
informs decisionmakers and enhances the quality, effectiveness and efficiency  of policy de-
cisions.
(2) The Legislative Assembly declares that the efforts  of task forces and work groups
will be better informed, more  effective and more likely to achieve quality results and out-
comes if the composition of task forces and work groups  more inclusively reflects the com-
munities of this state that are impacted by and affected by task  force and work group
decisions and recommendations.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section and section 1 of this 2023 Act:
(a) “Community member” means an individual who has  personal interaction with or
personal experience pertinent to the focus of a task force or work group.
(b) “Community-based organization” means an organization that  is representative of a
community or  a significant segment of a community, that works to meet community needs
or to amplify the strengths of the community and that is  led by one or more community
members.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1691
SB 694
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) “Impacted person” means someone whose life is directly impacted by policies that  are
the focus of a task force or work group.
(d) “Task force” means a body:
(A) Of eight or more individuals  that is established by statute, resolution, administrative
rule or order, or by  decision of the President of the Senate or the Speaker of the House of
Representatives;
(B) That is charged with aiding in the development of proposed legislation; and
(C) That is reasonably expected to meet at least four times in a biennium.
(e) “Work group” means a body:
(A) Of  eight or more individuals that is convened at the direction of a member of the
Legislative Assembly, staff for a legislative office, the Governor, a statewide elected  official
or a director or officer of a state agency;
(B) That undertakes an assistive role in the development of proposed legislation  or in the
assessment of enacted legislation; and
(C) That is reasonably expected to meet at least four times in a biennium.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law governing the appointment of members of a task
force, the appointing authority of a task force shall appoint at  least 50 percent of the task
force from community members or community-based  organizations and 25 percent of the
task force from individuals who are or who  represent organizations that serve historically
underrepresented and marginalized communities or that provide culturally specific services.
(3) A person who convenes a work  group shall include in the work group at least 50
percent of the work group  from community members or community-based organizations and
25 percent of the work group from individuals who are or who represent organizations  that
serve historically underrepresented and marginalized communities or that  provide culturally
specific services.
(4) Where feasible, task force or work group meetings should be scheduled for  times that
are convenient to enhance participation by individuals  who have employment, school, par-
enting or other community responsibilities.
(5) A member of a task force or  work group who does not otherwise receive compen-
sation for participation in the task force  or work group is eligible to receive a stipend from
the Task Force and Work Group Stipend Fund as compensation for travel  and time to attend
task force and work group functions. The task force or work group member shall apply for
the stipend on the  form and using the procedures established by the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services under section 3  of this 2023 Act. The chairperson of the task force
or work group shall assist the member in applying for a stipend.
(6) Amounts paid under ORS 292.495 do not constitute compensation under  this section.
A stipend paid under subsection (5)  of this section and section 3 of this 2023 Act is in addition
to and not in lieu of amounts paid under ORS 292.495.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Task Force and Work Group Stipend Fund is established, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Moneys in the Task Force and  Work Group Stipend
Fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services
to award stipends described in section 2 (5) of this 2023 Act to eligible members of task forces
and work groups.
(2) Moneys in the Task Force and Work Group Stipend Fund  shall consist of moneys
appropriated to the fund, earnings of the fund and other moneys credited to the fund.
[2]
SB 694
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
(3) The department shall by  rule establish procedures by which a member of a task force
or work group who is eligible to receive a stipend under section 2 (5) of this 2023  Act may
submit a claim for a stipend for task force or work group meeting attendance.
(4) As soon as is practicable after July 1 of an odd-numbered  year, the department shall
estimate the number of eligible claimants for stipends. Based on  the estimate and the
amount in the fund, the department shall determine the stipend amount to  be paid to eligible
claimants who submit claims under section 2 (5) of this 2023 Act.
(5) Within 30 days after a claim for a stipend has been filed by an eligible claimant, the
department shall pay to the claimant the lesser of:
(a) The amount of stipend determined under subsection (4) of this section; or
(b) $
.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Task Force and Work Group Stipend Fund,  for the biennium beginning July 1,
2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for awarding
stipends to task force and work group members who are eligible  for stipends under section
2 (5) of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[3]