Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Licensee” means an individual holding a valid license issued  by the Oregon Medical
Board.
(b) “Noncompetition agreement” means a written agreement between  a licensee and an-
other person under which  the licensee agrees that the licensee, either alone or as an em-
ployee, associate or affiliate of a third person, will not compete with the other person  in
providing products, processes  or services that are similar to the other person’s products,
processes or services for a period of time or within a  specified geographic area after termi-
nation of employment or termination of a contract under which the licensee supplied goods
to or performed services for the other person.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 653.295 (1) and (2),  and except as provided in paragraph (b)
of this subsection, a noncompetition agreement between a licensee and another person  is
void and unenforceable.
(b) A  noncompetition agreement between a licensee and another person is valid and en-
forceable under the terms provided in ORS 653.295 and to the  extent that the noncompetition
agreement is between a licensee and a business entity:
(A) For which the licensee provides direct patient care services; and
(B) In which the licensee controls  an ownership interest that is equivalent to at least five
percent of the entire ownership interest that exists in the business entity.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4149