Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 215.283 is amended to read:
215.283. (1) The following uses may be established in any area zoned for exclusive farm use:
(a) Churches and cemeteries in conjunction with churches.
(b) The propagation or harvesting of a forest product.
(c) Utility facilities necessary for public  service, including wetland waste treatment systems but
not including commercial facilities for the purpose of generating  electrical power for public use by
sale or transmission towers over 200 feet in height. A utility  facility necessary for public service
may be established as provided in:
(A) ORS 215.275; or
(B) If the utility facility is an associated transmission line, as defined in  ORS 215.274 and
469.300.
(d) A dwelling on real property used for farm use if the dwelling is occupied by a relative  of the
farm operator or the farm operator’s spouse, which means  a child, parent, stepparent, grandchild,
grandparent, stepgrandparent, sibling, stepsibling, niece, nephew or first cousin of either, if  the farm
operator does or will require the assistance of the  relative in the management of the farm use and
the dwelling is located on the same lot or parcel as the dwelling of the farm operator.
Notwithstanding  ORS  92.010 to 92.192 or the minimum lot or parcel size requirements under ORS
215.780, if the owner of a dwelling described in this paragraph  obtains construction financing or
other financing secured by the dwelling and  the secured party forecloses on the dwelling, the se-
cured party may also foreclose on  the homesite, as defined in ORS 308A.250, and the foreclosure
shall operate as a partition of the homesite to create a new parcel.
(e) Subject to ORS 215.279,  primary or accessory dwellings and other buildings customarily
provided in conjunction with farm use.
(f) Operations  for the exploration for and production of geothermal resources as defined by ORS
522.005 and oil  and gas as defined by ORS 520.005, including the placement and operation of
compressors,  separators  and other customary production equipment for an individual well adjacent
to the  wellhead. Any activities or construction relating to such operations shall not be a basis for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1686
SB 788
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
an exception under ORS 197.732 (2)(a) or (b).
(g) Operations for the exploration for minerals as defined by ORS 517.750. Any activities or
construction relating to such operations shall not be  a basis for an exception under ORS 197.732
(2)(a) or (b).
(h) Climbing and passing lanes within the right of way existing as of July 1, 1987.
(i) Reconstruction  or modification of public roads and highways, including the placement of
utility facilities overhead and in the subsurface of public roads  and highways along the public right
of way, but not including the addition of  travel lanes, where no removal or displacement of buildings
would occur, or no new land parcels result.
(j) Temporary public road and highway detours that will be abandoned and restored  to original
condition or use at such time as no longer needed.
(k) Minor betterment of existing public  road and highway related facilities such as maintenance
yards, weigh stations and rest areas, within right of way  existing as of July 1, 1987, and contiguous
public-owned property utilized to support the  operation and maintenance of public roads and high-
ways.
(L) A replacement dwelling to be used in conjunction with farm  use if the existing dwelling has
been listed in a county inventory as historic property as defined in ORS 358.480.
(m) Creation, restoration or enhancement of wetlands.
(n) A winery, as described in ORS 215.452 or 215.453.
(o) Farm stands if:
(A) The  structures are designed and used for the sale of farm crops or livestock grown on the
farm operation, or grown  on the farm operation and other farm operations in the local agricultural
area, including the sale of retail incidental items and fee-based activity to promote the sale of  farm
crops or livestock sold at the  farm stand if the annual sale of incidental items and fees from pro-
motional activity do not make  up more than 25 percent of the total annual sales of the farm stand;
and
(B) The farm stand does not include structures designed for occupancy as a residence or for
activity other than the sale of farm  crops or livestock and does not include structures for banquets,
public gatherings or public entertainment.
(p) Alteration, restoration  or replacement of a lawfully established dwelling, as described in ORS
215.291.
(q) A site for the takeoff  and landing of model aircraft, including such buildings or facilities as
may reasonably be necessary. Buildings or facilities shall not be more than 500 square feet in  floor
area or placed on a permanent foundation unless  the building or facility preexisted the use approved
under this paragraph. The site shall not include an aggregate surface  or hard surface area unless
the surface preexisted the use approved under this paragraph. An owner of property used  for the
purpose authorized in this paragraph may charge a  person operating the use on the property rent
for the property. An operator may charge users of the property a fee that does  not exceed the
operator’s  cost  to maintain the property, buildings and facilities. As used in this paragraph, “model
aircraft” means a  small-scale version of an airplane, glider, helicopter, dirigible or balloon that is
used or intended to be used for flight and is controlled by radio, lines or design by  a person on the
ground.
(r) A facility for the processing of farm products as described in ORS 215.255.
(s) Fire service facilities providing rural fire protection services.
(t) Irrigation reservoirs, canals, delivery lines and those structures  and accessory operational
[2]
SB 788
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
facilities, not including parks or other recreational structures  and facilities, associated with a dis-
trict as defined in ORS 540.505.
(u) Utility facility service lines. Utility facility service lines  are utility lines and accessory fa-
cilities or structures that end  at the point where the utility service is received by the customer and
that are located on one or more of the following:
(A) A public right of way;
(B) Land immediately adjacent to a public right of way,  provided the written consent of all ad-
jacent property owners has been obtained; or
(C) The property to be served by the utility.
(v) Subject to the issuance of  a license, permit or other approval by the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality  under ORS 454.695, 459.205, 468B.050, 468B.053 or 468B.055, or in compliance with
rules adopted under ORS 468B.095, and as provided in ORS 215.246  to 215.251, the land application
of reclaimed water, agricultural or industrial process  water or biosolids, or the onsite treatment of
septage prior to the land application of biosolids, for agricultural, horticultural or silvicultural pro-
duction, or for irrigation in connection with a use allowed in  an exclusive farm use zone under this
chapter. For  the purposes of this paragraph, onsite treatment of septage prior to the land application
of biosolids is limited to treatment using treatment  facilities that are portable, temporary and
transportable by truck trailer, as defined in ORS 801.580, during  a period of time within which land
application of biosolids is authorized under the license, permit or other approval.
(w) A county  law enforcement facility that lawfully existed on August 20, 2002, and is used to
provide rural law enforcement services primarily in rural  areas, including parole and post-prison
supervision, but not including a correctional facility as defined under ORS 162.135.
(x) Dog training classes or testing trials, which may be conducted outdoors or  in preexisting
farm buildings, when:
(A) The number of dogs participating in  training does not exceed 10 dogs per training class and
the number of training classes to be held on-site does not exceed six per day; and
(B) The number of dogs participating in a testing trial does not exceed 60 and the number of
testing trials to be conducted on-site is limited to four or fewer trials per calendar year.
(y) A cider business, as described in ORS 215.451.
(z) A farm brewery, as described in ORS 215.449.
(aa) In areas lying  east of the summit of the Cascade Range and in counties with a pop-
ulation of fewer than 90,000,  a wedding or event venue that is conducted outdoors or in farm
buildings and that complies with any limitations imposed by the county.
(2) The following nonfarm uses may be established, subject to the approval of the governing body
or its designee in any area zoned for exclusive farm use subject to ORS 215.296:
(a) Commercial activities that are in conjunction with  farm use, including the processing of farm
crops into biofuel not permitted under ORS 215.203 (2)(b)(K) or 215.255.
(b) Operations conducted for:
(A) Mining and processing of geothermal resources as defined by ORS 522.005  and oil and gas
as defined by ORS 520.005 not otherwise permitted under subsection (1)(f) of this section;
(B) Mining,  crushing or stockpiling of aggregate and other mineral and other subsurface re-
sources subject to ORS 215.298;
(C) Processing, as defined by ORS 517.750, of aggregate into asphalt or portland cement; and
(D) Processing of other mineral resources and other subsurface resources.
(c) Private parks, playgrounds, hunting  and fishing preserves and campgrounds. Subject to the
[3]
SB 788
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
approval of the county governing body or its designee, a private campground may provide  yurts for
overnight camping. No more than one-third or a maximum of 10 campsites, whichever is smaller,
may include a yurt. The yurt shall be located on the ground or on a wood floor with no permanent
foundation. Upon request of a county governing body,  the Land Conservation and Development
Commission may provide by rule for an increase in the number of yurts allowed on all or  a portion
of the campgrounds in a county if the commission determines that the increase will comply with the
standards described in ORS 215.296 (1). As used in this paragraph, “yurt” means a  round, domed
shelter of cloth or  canvas on a collapsible frame with no plumbing, sewage disposal hookup or
internal cooking appliance.
(d) Parks and playgrounds. A public  park may be established consistent with the provisions of
ORS 195.120.
(e) Community centers owned by a governmental agency or a  nonprofit community organization
and operated primarily by and for residents of the local rural community. A community center  au-
thorized under this paragraph may provide services to veterans, including but not limited to emer-
gency and transitional shelter, preparation and service of meals, vocational  and educational
counseling and referral to local, state or federal agencies providing medical, mental health, disability
income replacement and substance abuse services, only in a facility that is in  existence on January
1, 2006. The services may not include direct delivery of medical,  mental health, disability income
replacement or substance abuse services.
(f) Golf courses on land:
(A) Determined not to be high-value farmland, as defined in ORS 195.300 (10); or
(B) Determined to be high-value farmland described in ORS 195.300 (10)(c) if the land:
(i) Is not otherwise described in ORS 195.300 (10);
(ii) Is surrounded on all sides by an approved golf course; and
(iii) Is west of U.S. Highway 101.
(g) Commercial utility facilities for the purpose of  generating power for public use by sale. If the
area zoned for exclusive farm use is high-value  farmland, a photovoltaic solar power generation fa-
cility may be established as a  commercial utility facility as provided in ORS 215.447. A renewable
energy facility as defined in ORS 215.446 may be established as a commercial utility facility.
(h) Personal-use airports for airplanes and helicopter pads,  including associated hangar, main-
tenance and service facilities. A personal-use airport, as used in this section, means  an airstrip re-
stricted, except for aircraft emergencies, to use by the owner, and, on an infrequent  and occasional
basis, by invited guests, and by commercial aviation activities in connection  with agricultural op-
erations. No aircraft may be based on a personal-use airport other than those owned  or controlled
by the owner of the airstrip. Exceptions to the  activities permitted under this definition may be
granted through waiver action by the Oregon Department  of Aviation in specific instances. A
personal-use airport lawfully existing as of September 13, 1975, shall continue to be permitted  sub-
ject to any applicable rules of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(i) Home occupations as provided in ORS 215.448.
(j) A  facility for the primary processing of forest products, provided that such facility is found
to not seriously interfere with  accepted farming practices and is compatible with farm uses de-
scribed in ORS 215.203 (2). Such  a facility may be approved for a one-year period which is
renewable. These facilities are intended to  be only portable or temporary in nature. The primary
processing of a forest product, as used in this section, means  the use of a portable chipper or stud
mill or other similar methods of  initial treatment of a forest product in order to enable its shipment
[4]
SB 788
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to market. Forest products, as used in this section, means timber grown upon a parcel of land or
contiguous land where the primary processing facility is located.
(k) A site for the disposal of solid waste approved by the governing body of  a city or county or
both and for which a permit has  been granted under ORS 459.245 by the Department of Environ-
mental Quality together with equipment, facilities or buildings necessary for its operation.
(L) One manufactured dwelling  or recreational vehicle, or the temporary residential use of an
existing building, in conjunction with an existing dwelling as a  temporary use for the term of a
hardship suffered by the existing  resident or a relative of the resident. Within three months of the
end of the  hardship, the manufactured dwelling or recreational vehicle shall be removed or demol-
ished or, in the case of an existing  building, the building shall be removed, demolished or returned
to an  allowed nonresidential use. The governing body or its designee shall provide for periodic re-
view of the  hardship claimed under this paragraph. A temporary residence approved under this
paragraph is not eligible for replacement under subsection (1)(p) of this section.
(m) Transmission towers over 200 feet in height.
(n)(A) Commercial dog boarding kennels; or
(B) Dog training classes or testing trials that cannot be established under subsection (1)(x) of
this section.
(o) Residential homes as defined in ORS 197.660, in existing dwellings.
(p) The propagation, cultivation, maintenance and harvesting of aquatic species that are not
under the jurisdiction of the State  Fish and Wildlife Commission or insect species. Insect species
shall not include  any species under quarantine by the State Department of Agriculture or the United
States Department of Agriculture. The county shall provide notice of all applications under this
paragraph to the  State Department of Agriculture. Notice shall be provided in accordance with the
county’s land use regulations but shall be mailed at least 20 calendar days prior to any administra-
tive decision or initial public hearing on the application.
(q) Construction of additional passing and travel lanes requiring the acquisition of right of  way
but not resulting in the creation of new land parcels.
(r) Reconstruction or modification of public roads and highways involving  the removal or dis-
placement of buildings but not resulting in the creation of new land parcels.
(s) Improvement  of public road and highway related facilities, such as maintenance yards, weigh
stations and rest areas, where additional property or  right of way is required but not resulting in
the creation of new land parcels.
(t) A destination resort that is approved consistent with the requirements  of any statewide
planning goal relating to the siting of a destination resort.
(u) Room and board arrangements  for a maximum of five unrelated persons in existing resi-
dences.
(v) Operations for the extraction and bottling of water.
(w) Expansion of existing county  fairgrounds and activities directly relating to county
fairgrounds governed by county fair boards established pursuant to ORS 565.210.
(x) A living history museum related to resource based activities owned and operated by  a gov-
ernmental agency  or a local historical society, together with limited commercial activities and fa-
cilities that are directly related to the use and enjoyment of the museum and located within
authentic buildings of the depicted historic period  or the museum administration building, if areas
other than  an exclusive farm use zone cannot accommodate the museum and related activities or if
the museum administration  buildings and parking lot are located within one quarter mile of an ur-
[5]
SB 788
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ban growth boundary. As used in this paragraph:
(A) “Living history museum” means  a facility designed to depict and interpret everyday life and
culture of some specific historic  period using authentic buildings, tools, equipment and people to
simulate past activities and events; and
(B) “Local historical society” means the local historical society  recognized by the county gov-
erning body and organized under ORS chapter 65.
(y) An  aerial fireworks display business that has been in continuous operation at its current
location within an exclusive farm use zone since December 31, 1986, and possesses a wholesaler’s
permit to sell or provide fireworks.
(z) A landscape contracting business, as defined in ORS 671.520, or a business providing  land-
scape architecture services, as described in ORS 671.318, if the  business is pursued in conjunction
with the growing and marketing of nursery stock on the land that constitutes farm use.
(aa) Public or private schools for kindergarten through grade 12, including all buildings essential
to the operation  of a school, primarily for residents of the rural area in which the school is located.
(bb) Equine and equine-affiliated therapeutic and counseling activities, provided:
(A) The activities are  conducted in existing buildings that were lawfully constructed on the
property before January 1, 2019, or in new buildings that are accessory, incidental and  subordinate
to the farm use on the tract; and
(B) All individuals conducting therapeutic or counseling  activities are acting within the proper
scope of any licenses required by the state.
(cc) Guest ranches in eastern Oregon, as described in ORS 215.461.
(dd) Child care facilities,  preschool recorded programs or school-age recorded programs that are:
(A) Authorized under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450;
(B) Primarily for the children  of residents and workers of the rural area in which the facility
or program is located; and
(C) Colocated with a community center or a public or private school  allowed under this sub-
section.
(3) Roads,  highways and other transportation facilities and improvements not allowed under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section may be established, subject to the approval of the governing
body or its designee, in areas zoned for exclusive farm use subject to:
(a) Adoption  of an exception to the goal related to agricultural lands and to any other applicable
goal with which the facility or improvement does not comply; or
(b) ORS 215.296 for those uses identified by rule of  the Land Conservation and Development
Commission as provided in section 3, chapter 529, Oregon Laws 1993.
(4) The following agri-tourism and other commercial events or activities that  are related to and
supportive of agriculture may be established in any area zoned for exclusive farm use:
(a) A  county may authorize a single agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity on a
tract in a calendar year by an authorization that  is personal to the applicant and is not transferred
by, or transferable with, a conveyance of the tract, if the agri-tourism or  other commercial event
or activity meets any local standards that apply and:
(A) The agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity  is incidental and subordinate to ex-
isting farm use on the tract;
(B) The duration of the agri-tourism or other commercial event or  activity does not exceed 72
consecutive hours;
(C) The maximum  attendance at the agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity does not
[6]
SB 788
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
exceed 500 people;
(D) The maximum number of motor vehicles parked at the  site of the agri-tourism or other
commercial event or activity does not exceed 250 vehicles;
(E) The agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity complies with ORS 215.296;
(F) The agri-tourism or other  commercial event or activity occurs outdoors, in temporary
structures, or in existing permitted structures, subject to health and fire  and life safety require-
ments; and
(G) The agri-tourism or other commercial event or  activity complies with conditions established
for:
(i) Planned hours of operation;
(ii) Access, egress and parking;
(iii) A traffic management plan that identifies  the projected number of vehicles and any antic-
ipated use of public roads; and
(iv) Sanitation and solid waste.
(b) In the alternative  to paragraphs (a) and (c) of this subsection, a county may authorize,
through an expedited, single-event license, a single  agri-tourism or other commercial event or ac-
tivity on  a tract in a calendar year by an expedited, single-event license that is personal to the ap-
plicant and is not transferred  by, or transferable with, a conveyance of the tract. A decision
concerning an expedited, single-event license is not a land use  decision, as defined in ORS 197.015.
To approve an expedited, single-event  license, the governing body of a county or its designee must
determine that the proposed agri-tourism or  other commercial event or activity meets any local
standards that apply, and the agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity:
(A) Must be incidental and subordinate to existing farm use on the tract;
(B) May not begin before 6 a.m. or end after 10 p.m.;
(C) May not involve more than 100 attendees or 50 vehicles;
(D) May not include the artificial amplification of music or voices before 8 a.m. or after 8 p.m.;
(E) May not require  or involve the construction or use of a new permanent structure in con-
nection with the agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity;
(F) Must be located  on a tract of at least 10 acres unless the owners or residents of adjoining
properties consent, in writing, to the location; and
(G) Must comply with applicable health and fire and life safety requirements.
(c) In the alternative to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, a county  may authorize up to
six agri-tourism or  other commercial events or activities on a tract in a calendar year by a limited
use permit that is  personal to the applicant and is not transferred by, or transferable with, a
conveyance of the tract. The agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities  must meet any
local standards that apply, and the agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities:
(A) Must be incidental and subordinate to existing farm use on the tract;
(B) May not, individually, exceed a duration of 72 consecutive hours;
(C) May  not require that a new permanent structure be built, used or occupied in connection
with the agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities;
(D) Must comply with ORS 215.296;
(E) May not, in combination with other agri-tourism or other commercial  events or activities
authorized in the area, materially alter the stability of the land use pattern in the area; and
(F) Must comply with conditions established for:
(i) The types of  agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities that are authorized during
[7]
SB 788
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
each calendar year, including the  number and duration of the agri-tourism or other commercial
events and activities, the anticipated daily attendance and the hours of operation;
(ii) The location of existing structures and the  location of proposed temporary structures to be
used in connection with the agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities;
(iii) The location of access and egress and parking facilities to be used in connection with the
agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities;
(iv) Traffic management, including the projected number of vehicles and  any anticipated use of
public roads; and
(v) Sanitation and solid waste.
(d) In addition to paragraphs (a)  to (c) of this subsection, a county may authorize agri-tourism
or other commercial events or activities that occur more frequently or for a longer period  or that
do not otherwise comply with paragraphs  (a) to (c) of this subsection if the agri-tourism or other
commercial events or activities comply with any local standards that apply  and the agri-tourism or
other commercial events or activities:
(A) Are incidental and subordinate to existing commercial  farm use of the tract and are neces-
sary to support the commercial farm uses or the commercial agricultural enterprises in the area;
(B) Comply with the requirements of paragraph (c)(C), (D), (E) and (F) of this subsection;
(C) Occur on a lot or parcel that complies with the acknowledged minimum  lot or parcel size;
and
(D) Do not exceed 18 events or activities in a calendar year.
(5) A holder of a permit authorized by a  county under subsection (4)(d) of this section must re-
quest review of the permit at four-year intervals. Upon receipt of a request for review, the county
shall:
(a) Provide public notice and an opportunity for public comment  as part of the review process;
and
(b) Limit  its review to events and activities authorized by the permit, conformance with condi-
tions of approval required by the permit and the standards established by  subsection (4)(d) of this
section.
(6) For the purposes of subsection (4) of this section:
(a) A county may authorize the  use of temporary structures established in connection with the
agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities authorized under subsection (4) of this section.
However, the temporary structures must  be removed at the end of the agri-tourism or other event
or activity. The county may  not approve an alteration to the land in connection with an agri-tourism
or other commercial event or activity authorized under subsection (4) of this section,  including, but
not limited to, grading, filling or paving.
(b) The county may issue the limited use permits  authorized by subsection (4)(c) of this section
for two calendar years. When considering an application for renewal,  the county shall ensure com-
pliance  with  the provisions of subsection (4)(c) of this section, any local standards that apply and
conditions  that  apply to the permit or to the agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities
authorized by the permit.
(c) The authorizations provided by subsection (4) of  this section are in addition to other au-
thorizations that may be  provided by law, except that “outdoor mass gathering” and “other gather-
ing,” as those terms are used  in ORS 197.015 (10)(d), do not include agri-tourism or other commercial
events and activities.
[8]