Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Library, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund,
the amount of $205,000, which may  be expended for the purpose of hiring a consultant to
assist the State Library, the State Library Board, public libraries established in accordance
with ORS 357.410, school libraries, tribal libraries as defined in ORS 357.206  and academic li-
braries in Oregon apply for federal moneys for the purpose of providing broadband access.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Library, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund,
the amount of $750,000, for deposit in the Connecting Oregon Libraries  Fund established in
section 6, chapter 60, Oregon Laws 2022, for providing  matching funds for federal moneys
received by the State Library, the State Library Board, public libraries established in ac-
cordance with ORS 357.410, school libraries, tribal libraries as defined in ORS 357.206 or ac-
ademic libraries in Oregon for the purpose  of providing broadband access to eligible library
facilities in this state.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1839