Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health Authority shall study access  to behavioral health treat-
ment. The authority shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the  Legislative As-
sembly related to health no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4066