Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department may  hire an attorney
with extensive experience in intellectual property law  for the purpose of prosecuting a patent
for any invention that faculty, staff or students reduce to  practice while employed by or
enrolled in a public high school in this state.
(2) The department may assume, assign, partake in or  disclaim ownership of any patent
that results from an invention described in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Under the terms of a contract or other agreement into which the department  enters
with the faculty or  staff, with students who have the legal capacity to enter into contracts
or with the legal  guardians of students without the legal capacity to enter into contracts;
and
(b) In accordance with rules the department adopts and other applicable law.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2318