Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of the wildlife laws.
SECTION 2. The State Fish and Wildlife Commission may not use moneys received from
the sale of licenses, tags and permits under the wildlife laws for the purpose of funding ac-
tivities related to wolf management.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2181