Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
COORDINATED CARE ORGANIZATION CONTRACTS
SECTION 1.
 ORS 414.590 is amended to read:
414.590. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Benefit  period” means a period of time, shorter than the [ five-year] 10-year contract term,
for which specific terms and conditions in a contract between a  coordinated care organization and
the Oregon Health Authority are in effect.
(b) “Good standing” means the status of a coordinated care organization if:
(A) The coordinated care organization  has met the minimum financial requirements un-
der ORS 414.572 (1)(b);
(B) The coordinated care organization has not materially  breached its contract with the
authority under this section; and
(C) The authority has not determined that the health or welfare of the  members of the
coordinated care organization is in jeopardy.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1537
HB 2229
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(b)] (c) “Renew” means [ an agreement by a coordinated care organization to amend the terms or
conditions of an existing contract for the next benefit period ] an agreement between  a coordinated
care organization and the authority to enter into a contract for a new 10-year term .
(2) A contract entered into between the authority and a coordinated  care organization under
ORS 414.572 (1):
(a) Shall be for a term of [ five] 10 years;
(b) Except as provided  in subsection [ (4)] (5) of this section, may not be amended more than once
in each 12-month period; and
(c) May be terminated or not renewed  by the  authority [ if a coordinated care organization fails
to meet outcome and quality measures specified  in  the contract or is otherwise in breach  of the
contract.]:
(A) If the authority determines that the  health or welfare of the members of the coor-
dinated care organization is in jeopardy;
(B) If, within the current term of the contract and for reasons within the control of  the
coordinated care organization, the coordinated care organization:
(i) Fails to meet outcome and quality measures specified in the contract;
(ii) Fails to meet the minimum financial requirements under ORS 414.572 (1)(b); or
(iii) Is in material breach of the contract; or
(C) As provided in subsection (4) of this section.
[(3) This section does not prohibit  the authority from allowing a coordinated care organization a
reasonable amount of  time in which to cure any failure to meet outcome and quality measures specified
in the contract prior to the termination of the contract. ]
(3)(a) No later than 15 months before the expiration of a contract  entered into between
the authority and a coordinated care organization, the authority and the coordinated  care
organization shall provide notice, in the form and manner prescribed by the authority,  of the
intent of the authority or the coordinated care organization to renew or not renew  the con-
tract.
(b) If the authority provides notice of intent not to renew a contract under  this sub-
section, the authority shall provide:
(A) Written notice, at least six months before the expiration of the contract term, of the
reasons for the decision;
(B) A reasonable amount  of time for the coordinated care organization to cure any fail-
ure to meet outcome and quality measures specified in the contract; and
(C) An opportunity for a contested case hearing under ORS chapter 183.
(4)(a) After the initial five years of a contract term, the authority may reevaluate a
contract entered into between the authority and a coordinated care organization if the  co-
ordinated care organization is not in good standing.
(b) As part of a reevaluation under  this subsection, the authority shall develop a cor-
rective action plan that provides the coordinated care organization at least  six months to
cure the reason that the coordinated care organization is not in good standing;
(c) If a coordinated care organization fails to cure the reason that the  coordinated care
organization is not in good standing, the authority may:
(A) Modify the  coordinated care organization’s service area if another coordinated care
organization has requested entry into the service area and a service area  entry assessment
has been conducted in accordance with section 4 of this 2025 Act; or
[2]
HB 2229
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Terminate the contract between the authority and the coordinated  care organization
and provide the coordinated care organization written notice of  the reasons for the termi-
nation.
[(4)] (5) A contract entered into between the authority and a coordinated care organization may
be amended:
(a) More than once in each 12-month period if:
(A) The authority and the coordinated care organization mutually agree to amend the  contract;
or
(B) Amendments are necessitated by changes in federal or state law.
(b) Once within the first eight months  of the effective date of the contract if needed to adjust
the global budget of  a coordinated care organization, retroactive to the beginning of the calendar
year, to take into account changes in the membership  of the coordinated care organization or the
health status of the coordinated care organization’s members.
[(5) Except as provided in subsection (8) of  this section, the authority must give a coordinated care
organization at least 60 days’ advance notice of any amendments the  authority proposes to existing
contracts between the authority and the coordinated care organization. ]
(6) The process for amending contracts under this section must be transparent and  must
include:
(a) An analysis of  the impact of the amendments on the Oregon Integrated and Coordi-
nated Health Care Delivery System established by ORS 414.570;
(b) Except as  provided in subsection (10) of this section, 45 days’ notice to a coordinated
care organization and the opportunity  for the coordinated care organization to comment on
the proposed changes; and
(c) The date on which the proposed changes are scheduled to take effect.
(7) The  authority shall issue the final draft of any guidance on a proposed change to the
terms and conditions of a contract entered into between the authority and a coordinated care
organization no less than  60 days before the date on which the proposed change takes effect.
[(6)] (8) Except as provided in subsection [ (4)(b)] (5)(b) of this section, an amendment to a con-
tract may apply retroactively only if:
(a) The amendment does not  result in a claim by the authority for the recovery of amounts paid
by the authority to the coordinated care organization prior to the date of the amendment; or
(b) The Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services notifies the  authority, in writing, that the
amendment is  a condition for approval of the contract by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services.
[(7)] (9) If an amendment to a contract under subsection  [ (6)(b)] (8)(b) of this section or other
circumstances arise that result in a claim by the authority for the recovery of amounts previously
paid to  a coordinated care organization by the authority, the authority shall ensure that the recov-
ery does not have  a material adverse effect on the coordinated care organization’s ability to main-
tain the required minimum amounts of risk-based capital.
[(8)] (10) No later than 134  days prior to the end of a benefit period, the authority shall provide
to each coordinated care organization notice of the proposed changes  to the terms and conditions
of a contract, as will be submitted to the Centers for  Medicare and Medicaid Services for approval,
for the next benefit period.
[(9)] (11) A coordinated care organization must  notify the authority of the coordinated care
organization’s refusal to [ renew] amend a contract with the authority to include the changes
[3]
HB 2229
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
proposed under subsection (10) of this section  no later  than 14 days after the authority provides
the notice described in subsection [ (8)] (10) of this  section. Except as provided in subsections [ (10)]
(12) and [ (11)] (13) of this section, a refusal to [ renew] amend terminates the contract  at the end
of the benefit period.
[(10)] (12) The authority may require a contract to remain in force  into the next benefit period
and be amended as proposed  by the authority until 90 days after the coordinated care organization
has, in accordance with criteria prescribed by the authority:
(a) Notified each of its members and contracted providers of the termination of the contract;
(b) Provided to the authority a plan to  transition its members to another coordinated care or-
ganization; and
(c) Provided to the authority a plan for closing out its coordinated care organization business.
[(11)] (13) The authority may waive compliance with the deadlines in subsections [ (9)] (11) and
[(10)] (12) of this section if the Director of the Oregon Health Authority finds that the waiver of  the
deadlines is consistent with the effective and efficient administration of the  medical assistance pro-
gram and the protection of medical assistance recipients.
SECTION 2.
Sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 414.
SECTION 3. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall develop standards for evaluating  ap-
plications for and awarding new contracts to coordinated  care organizations under ORS
414.590. The standards must include consideration of:
(a) Whether any existing  coordinated care organization in a service area is in good
standing, as defined in ORS 414.590;
(b) The performance during the  most recent contract term of any existing coordinated
care organization in a service area;
(c) The impact on the continuity of care for members of  any existing coordinated care
organization in a service area;
(d) The relationship  between the local community and any existing coordinated care or-
ganization in a service area; and
(e) The past  and ongoing investments made in the local community by any existing co-
ordinated care organization in a service area.
(2) In developing the standards under this section, the authority shall:
(a) Ensure that all coordinated care organizations are afforded  a meaningful opportunity
to participate; and
(b) Incorporate feedback from:
(A) Each coordinated care organization’s community advisory council; and
(B) Members of each coordinated care organization.
(3) At least 90 days before evaluating  applications for new contracts, the authority shall
provide the  final draft of the standards developed under this section to each existing coor-
dinated care organization and post the final draft of the standards on the authority’s website.
SERVICE AREA CHANGE
SECTION 4.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority may not allow a new or existing coordi-
nated care organization to begin serving an area that is already  served by one or more co-
ordinated care organizations, unless:
[4]
HB 2229
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The coordinated care organizations  serving the area have failed to meet quality
measures relating to access to care for at least five of the last 20 quarters; or
(b) The authority determines that adding another coordinated care organization to an
existing service area is in the best interest of the service area’s  members and issues a
written report explaining the reasons for the determination.
(2) If one of the conditions under subsection (1) of this section is  met, the authority shall
conduct a  service area entry assessment to determine whether to allow a new or existing
coordinated care organization to begin serving the area. The service area entry assessment
must:
(a) Be a public process;
(b) Be initiated at least 280 days before a new or existing coordinated  care organization
is allowed to begin serving an area that is already served  by one or more coordinated care
organizations; and
(c) Include input from the coordinated care  organizations serving the area and their
community advisory councils.
(3) In conducting a service area entry assessment under this  section, the authority shall
consider whether:
(a) The service area includes more than 50,000 members;
(b) The coordinated care organizations serving the area are  in good standing, as defined
in ORS 414.590; and
(c) Members in  the service area are likely to work or receive care in an adjoining region.
(4) The authority shall collect from coordinated care organizations that request entry
into a service area a fee for conducting a service area entry assessment in an amount rea-
sonably calculated to cover the costs to the authority of administering the assessment.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 5.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express  any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
APPLICABILITY
SECTION 6. Sections 3 and 4 of  this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 414.590 by
section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to contracts between a coordinated care  organization and the
Oregon Health Authority entered into, amended or renewed  on or after the operative date
specified in section 7 of this 2025 Act.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 7. (1) Sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 414.590 by
section 1 of this 2025 Act become operative on December 1, 2025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
[5]
HB 2229
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
and powers conferred on the authority by sections 3 and 4 of this 2025  Act and the amend-
ments to ORS 414.590 by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 8.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[6]