Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2021 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
348.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in sections 2 to 4 of this 2021 Act:
(a) “Eligible student” means an individual who:
(A) Is enrolled in sufficient credit hours  to be considered at least a half-time student in
a baccalaureate or graduate degree program at a public university;
(B) Is making satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the  Higher Education Coor-
dinating Commission by rule, at the public university;
(C) Is exempted from paying nonresident tuition under ORS 352.287;
(D) Has completed and submitted to the commission the Free  Application for Federal
Student Aid, or an equivalent Oregon application established by  the commission by rule; and
(E) Is not incarcerated.
(b) “Loan recipient” means an eligible student who has received a loan under the
Dreamers Access Program.
(c) “Public university” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; or
(B) Oregon Health and Science University.
(2) The Dreamers Access Program is established within  the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission, to  be administered pursuant to rules adopted by the commission. The
commission may enter into any contracts necessary to implement sections 2 to 4 of  this 2021
Act.
(3) The commission shall determine:
(a) Whether each individual who has completed and submitted to  the commission an ap-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1961
HB 2569
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
plication described in subsection (1)(a)(D) of this section is an eligible student;
(b) Whether each individual identified in paragraph  (a) of this subsection has a financial
need for the academic  year such that, in the opinion of the commission, a loan is warranted,
taking into consideration the availability of an Oregon Opportunity Grant for the applicant;
and
(c) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the dollar amount of the loan.
(4) If the  commission determines under subsection (3) of this section that an applicant
is an eligible student and that a loan  is warranted, the commission shall award a loan to the
eligible student under the program.
(5) A loan recipient may apply for  an additional loan under this section each academic
year. The commission shall by rule  establish academic standards and benchmarks that a loan
recipient must meet to qualify for additional loans.
(6) A loan recipient may not receive Dreamers Access Program loans that exceed:
(a) For an undergraduate student, the lesser of:
(A) An amount per academic year that is established by  the commission by rule to equal
the maximum amount of Federal  Stafford Loans, or their successor, that a dependent
undergraduate student could receive; or
(B) The financial need of the loan recipient for an academic  year, as determined in sub-
section (3)(b) of this section.
(b) For a graduate student, the lesser of:
(A) $10,000 in any academic year; or
(B) The financial need of the  loan recipient for an academic year, as determined in sub-
section (3)(b) of this section.
(c) An aggregate total of $50,000.
(7) Each public university shall provide loan recipients with entrance and  exit loan
counseling that is comparable to the counseling the public university is  required to provide
to recipients of federal student loans.
(8)(a) The commission shall establish the interest rate or  rates for loans awarded under
this section in the manner described in section 3 of this 2021 Act.
(b) The standard repayment  term for a loan awarded under this section is 10 years. Re-
payment by a loan recipient shall begin following a six-month grace period that begins when
a loan recipient graduates or is  no longer enrolled in sufficient credit hours to be considered
at least a  half-time student in a baccalaureate or graduate degree program at a public uni-
versity.
(c) Interest may not accrue on a loan awarded under this section during:
(A) Periods when  the loan recipient is enrolled in sufficient credit hours to be considered
at least a half-time student in a baccalaureate or graduate degree program at a  public uni-
versity; or
(B) The six-month grace period described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(9) All moneys from repayment of loans awarded under this section shall be deposited in
the Dreamers Access Program Fund established in section 4 of this 2021 Act.
(10) Eligibility for deferment or forbearance of a loan  awarded under this section shall
be determined by the commission in a manner that is consistent with the standards used  to
determine deferment or forbearance of federal student loans.
(11) If a loan recipient defaults on  the repayment of a loan awarded under this section,
[2]
HB 2569
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the commission may:
(a) Have any amounts due be collected by the Collections Unit in  the Department of Re-
venue under ORS 293.250; and
(b) Report the loan recipient’s default to a consumer  reporting agency as defined in ORS
646A.602.
SECTION 3.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall:
(1) Adopt rules to administer the Dreamers Access Program established in section  2 of
this 2021 Act.
(2) Develop a master promissory note to be used for loans awarded under the program.
(3) Subject to subsection (1) of this section, for each loan  awarded under the program,
service the loan, collect all loan payments and perform all due diligence required by the
federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq.) and any other applicable laws.
(4) Establish the interest rate to be used for loans  awarded under the program. In de-
termining the interest rate to be used, the commission must consider:
(a) The risk that loan recipients will default on the repayment of the loans; and
(b) The effect the interest rate will have on the cost for loan recipients to repay  the
loans.
(5) Track and record the dollar amount of loans awarded to  each loan recipient under the
program:
(a) For each academic year; and
(b) As an aggregate total amount.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Dreamers Access Program Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Amounts in the Dreamers  Access Program
Fund may be invested as provided in ORS 293.701  to 293.857. Interest earned by the Dreamers
Access Program Fund shall be credited to the  fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously
appropriated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  for the purpose of awarding
loans and administering  the Dreamers Access Program under sections 2 and 3 of this 2021
Act.
(2) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys received as repayment of loans awarded under the Dreamers Access Program;
(b) Moneys  appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assem-
bly;
(c) Moneys received from federal, state or local sources;
(d) Amounts donated to the fund;
(e) Investment earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(f) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source, public or private.
SECTION 5.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall file with the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to higher education, in the manner provided
in ORS 192.245, a biennial report that states:
(1) The mean and median dollar amounts of loans awarded during the previous  biennium
under the Dreamers Access Program established in section 2 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The total number of students who received a loan under the  program during the
previous biennium.
(3) The total amount of moneys  within the Dreamers Access Program Fund established
in section 4 of this 2021 Act at the end of the most recent academic year.
[3]
HB 2569
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
(4) The total amount of moneys  appropriated or otherwise provided to the fund by the
Legislative Assembly during the current biennium.
(5) The commission’s annual administrative costs for administering  the Dreamers Access
Program established in section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2021  Act first apply to loans for the 2022-2023 aca-
demic year.
SECTION 7. The Higher Education Coordinating  Commission shall submit the first
biennial reports required under section 5 of this 2021 Act no later than December 1, 2024.
SECTION 8. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]