Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 414.575, 414.577 and 414.578 are added to and made a part of ORS chap-
ter 414.
SECTION 2.  ORS 414.575 is amended to read:
414.575. (1) A coordinated care organization must have a community advisory council to  ensure
that the  health care needs of the consumers and the community are being addressed. The council
must:
(a) Include representatives of the community and of each county government served  by the co-
ordinated care organization, but consumer representatives must constitute a majority of  the mem-
bership; [and]
(b) Ensure that at least 40 percent of the consumer representatives are  parents of chil-
dren under 19 years of age who receive medical assistance, including at least two parents of
children from newborn to five years of age; and
[(b)] (c) Have its membership selected by a  committee composed of equal numbers of county
representatives from each county  served by the coordinated care organization and members of the
governing body of the coordinated care organization.
(2) The duties of the council include, but are not limited to:
(a) Identifying  and advocating for preventive care practices to be utilized by the coordinated
care organization;
(b) Overseeing a community health assessment and adopting a community health improvement
plan in accordance with ORS 414.577; and
(c) Annually publishing a report on the progress of the community health improvement plan.
(3) The community  health improvement plan adopted by the council should describe the scope
of the  activities, services and responsibilities that the coordinated care organization will consider
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2754
HB 2217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
upon implementation of  the plan. The activities, services and responsibilities defined in the plan
shall include a plan and a strategy for integrating physical, behavioral and  oral health care services
and may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Analysis and development of public and private  resources, capacities and metrics based on
ongoing community health assessment activities and population health priorities;
(b) Health policy;
(c) System design;
(d) Outcome and quality improvement;
(e) Integration of service delivery; and
(f) Workforce development.
(4) The council shall meet at least once every three months. The council shall post  a report
of its meetings and discussions to the website of  the coordinated care organization and other
websites appropriate to keeping the community  informed of the council’s activities. The council, the
governing body of the coordinated care organization or  a designee of the council or governing body
has discretion as to whether public comments received at meetings that are open to the public will
be included in the reports posted to  the website and, if so, which comments are appropriate for
posting.
(5) If the regular  council meetings are not open to the public and do not provide an opportunity
for members of the public to  provide written and oral comments, the council shall hold quarterly
meetings:
(a) That are open to the public and attended by the members of the council;
(b) At which the council shall report on the activities of the coordinated care organization  and
the council;
(c) At which the council shall provide written  reports on the activities of the coordinated care
organization; and
(d) At which the council shall provide the opportunity for the public to provide  written or oral
comments.
(6) The coordinated care  organization shall post to the organization’s website contact informa-
tion for, at a minimum, the chairperson, a member of the community  advisory council or a desig-
nated staff member of the organization.
(7) Meetings of the council are not subject to ORS 192.610 to 192.705.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 414.577 is amended to read:
414.577. (1) A coordinated care organization shall  collaborate with local public health authori-
ties, Early Learning Hubs  and hospitals located in areas served by the coordinated care organ-
ization to conduct  a community health assessment and adopt a community health improvement plan,
shared with and endorsed  by the coordinated care organization, local public health authorities ,
Early Learning Hubs  and hospitals, to serve as a strategic  population health and health care ser-
vices plan for the residents of the areas served by the coordinated  care organization, local public
health authorities , Early Learning Hubs  and hospitals. The health improvement plan must  include
strategies for achieving shared priorities.
(2) The coordinated care organization shall post the health improvement plan  to the coordinated
care organization’s website.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority may prescribe by rule requirements  for health improvement
plans and provide guidance for aligning the  timelines for the development of the community health
assessments and health improvement plans  by coordinated care organizations, local public health
[2]
HB 2217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
authorities , Early Learning Hubs  and hospitals.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 414.578 is amended to read:
414.578. (1) A community health improvement plan adopted by a  coordinated care organization
and its community advisory council in accordance with ORS 414.577 shall include a  component for
addressing the health of children from birth to kindergarten entry  and school-age youth in the
areas served by the coordinated  care organization including, to the extent practicable, a strategy
and a plan for:
(a) Working with programs developed by the Early Learning Council, Early Learning Hubs,  the
Youth Development Council and the school health providers in the region; and
(b) Coordinating the effective and efficient  delivery of health care to children and adolescents
in the community.
(2) A community health improvement plan must be based on research, including research into
adverse childhood experiences, and must identify funding sources and additional  funding necessary
to address the health needs of children and adolescents  in the community and to meet the goals of
the plan. The plan must also:
(a) Evaluate the adequacy of  health services for children from birth to kindergarten
entry and identify opportunities to partner with community-based organizations, preschools
and child care facilities to increase access to services;
[(a)] (b) Evaluate the adequacy of the existing school-based health resources including school-
based health centers and school nurses to meet the specific pediatric and adolescent health  care
needs in the community;
[(b)] (c) Make recommendations to improve the  school-based health center and school nurse
system, including the addition or improvement of electronic medical records and billing systems;
[(c)] (d) Take into consideration whether integration of school-based health centers with  the
larger health system or system of community clinics would further advance the goals of the plan;
[(d)] (e) Improve  the integration of all services provided to meet the needs of children, adoles-
cents and families;
[(e)] (f) Focus on primary care, behavioral health and oral health; and
[(f)] (g) Address promotion  of health and prevention and early intervention in the treatment of
children and adolescents.
(3) A coordinated care organization shall involve in the development  of its community health
improvement plan, school-based  health centers, school nurses, school mental health providers and
individuals representing:
(a) Programs developed by the Early Learning Council and Early Learning Hubs;
(b) Programs developed by the Youth Development Council in the region;
(c) The Healthy Start Family Support Services program in the region;
(d) The Cover All People program and other medical assistance programs;
(e) Relief nurseries in the region;
(f) Community health centers;
(g) Oral health care providers;
(h) Community mental health providers;
(i) Administrators of county health department  programs that offer preventive health services
to children;
(j) Hospitals in the region; and
(k) Other appropriate child and adolescent health program administrators.
[3]
HB 2217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(4) The  Oregon Health Authority may provide incentive grants to coordinated care organizations
for the purpose of contracting with individuals or  organizations to help coordinate integration
strategies identified in the community health improvement plan adopted by the community advisory
council. The authority may also  provide funds to coordinated care organizations to improve systems
of services that will promote the implementation of the plan.
(5) Each coordinated care organization shall report to the authority,  in the form and manner
prescribed by the authority, on the progress of the integration strategies  and implementation of the
plan for working with the programs developed by the Early Learning Council, Early Learning Hubs,
the Youth Development Council and school health care  providers in the region, as part of the de-
velopment and implementation of the community health improvement plan. The authority  shall
compile the information biennially and report the  information to the Legislative Assembly by De-
cember 31 of each even-numbered year.
SECTION 5.
The amendments to ORS 414.577 and 414.578 by sections 3 and 4 of this 2025
Act apply to community health assessments conducted and community health  improvement
plans adopted on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) The amendments to ORS 414.575 by section 2  of this 2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) A coordinated care organization may take any action  before the operative date spec-
ified in subsection (1) of this section that is  necessary to enable the coordinated care or-
ganization to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the coordinated care  organiza-
tion by the amendments to ORS 414.575 by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]