Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) In addition to its other duties, the Legislative Administration Committee
shall direct  the Legislative Administrator to use moneys in the National Statuary Hall Re-
placement Fund established under section 2 of this 2017 Act for:
(a) The selection of a sculptor or sculptors and the commission of  the designs and the
production of the sculptures  of Chief Joseph and Abigail Scott Duniway, including the cre-
ation of pedestals and any desired inscriptions;
(b) The transportation of the statues and pedestals to the United States Capitol;
(c) The temporary display of the statues in the  Rotunda of the United States Capitol
during any unveiling ceremony to be held;
(d) Other costs associated with the unveiling ceremony;
(e) The removal of  the statues of Jason Lee and John McLoughlin from National Statuary
Hall in the United States Capitol,  transportation of the Jason Lee and John McLoughlin
statues to Oregon and installation of the Jason Lee and John  McLoughlin statues in places
of honor in the Oregon State Capitol; and
(f) Any other expenses the Legislative  Administrator incurs in implementing this section.
(2) Upon enactment of this 2017 Act, the Legislative Administrator shall:
(a) Immediately begin to perform the activities described  in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) Immediately write to the Architect  of the Capitol apprising the architect of the in-
terest of the State of Oregon in replacing the statues  of Jason Lee and John McLoughlin in
National Statuary Hall  with statues of Chief Joseph and Abigail Scott Duniway, and re-
questing that the architect seek  the approval of the Joint Committee on the Library of
Congress for statue replacement;
(c) As soon as adequate funds are  available in the National Statuary Hall Replacement
Fund established in section 2 of this 2017  Act, seek proposals from qualified sculptors, com-
mission and direct the production of the sculptures of  Chief Joseph and Abigail Scott
Duniway; and
(d) Convey all information  received from the Architect of the Capitol about the statue
replacement project to the Legislative Administration Committee and  the Governor or the
Governor’s designee.
(3) As soon as is practicable after the date on which the  Legislative Administration
Committee determines that it has obtained sufficient funding to undertake  the remainder
of the project described  in subsection (1) of this section that has not already been performed
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section,  the Legislative Administrator shall seek proposals
from qualified sculptors and  undertake whatever other measures are necessary to complete
the project. The Legislative Administrator shall follow the directions of the Architect of the
Capitol in completing the project described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The National Statuary Hall Replacement  Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Moneys in the National Statuary Hall
Replacement Fund are  continuously appropriated to the Legislative Administration Commit-
tee for the purposes set forth in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(2) All  gifts, grants, donations and other moneys received by the Legislative Adminis-
tration Committee for funding the project described in section 1  of this 2017 Act shall be
deposited into the National Statuary Hall Replacement Fund.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
[2]
SB 1060
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]