Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Fish and Wildlife Commission shall:
(1) Operate a summer steelhead fish hatchery at the Rock Creek Hatchery; and
(2) Release the hatchery fish from the Rock Creek Hatchery into the North Umpqua
River.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for the purpose of  carrying out the provisions
of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1312