Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 136.432 is repealed.
SECTION 2.  ORS 419C.270 is amended to read:
419C.270. In all proceedings brought  under ORS 419C.005, the following rules of criminal pro-
cedure apply:
(1) ORS 133.402, 133.673, 133.693 and 133.703;
(2) ORS 135.455, 135.465 and 135.470;
(3) ORS 135.610, 135.630 (3) to (6), 135.640 and 135.670;
(4) ORS 135.711, 135.713, 135.715, 135.717, 135.720, 135.725, 135.727, 135.730,  135.733, 135.735,
135.737, 135.740 and 135.743;
(5) ORS 135.805 and 135.815 (1)(a) to (e) and (g) and (3);  and
(6) ORS 135.825, 135.835, 135.845 and 135.855 to 135.873 .[; and ]
[(7) ORS 136.432. ]
SECTION 3.
The repeal of ORS 136.432 by section 1  of this 2025 Act and the amendments
to ORS 419C.270 by section 2 of this 2025 Act  apply to criminal and juvenile proceedings ini-
tiated on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1957